##### CLUSTER 0 #####
and if yes, how?
It would be very handy to have a link to your System Status (https://status.
, got copious clients stuck on Banklink until this is resolved
Spoke to lloyds and they thought i was talking gibberish.
Currently using an outside source to do payroll.
They send me the amounts and employee statements each week.
Fantastic work with allocating Billable expenses to the client from the Purchase/ Bill data entry page.
Many contacts have multiple people setup against them.
At the moment only the main contact is included.
We are based in the UK and I want to get the tax rates set up so I know which ones we should be using.
I have looked online for help but have found it a little confusing.
My case now, in a start up company, the share capital not yet fully paid or paid for few % of the total.
My question, can we convert debt into equity when capital not yet paid ?
A portion of this sale was agreed to be paid to one of the owners as part of his cash contribution.
We are a non-profit foundation that is required by law to distribute to registered charities an amount that is determined by calculation each year.
We have one fund which we call "restricted"  to track the grants and another called "unrestricted" for all other disbursements.
We enter each Grant as DR.
Payable and CR.
BAS is done on Cash basis.
I don't know if this has always been the case.
I understand that problems can happen if you post into a period after a BAS is lodged for that period with ATO.
However these have already been reconciled previously.
This is an issue because 99.
9% of our revenue is by credit card and we receive batch deposits daily.
Since it was deposited in a batch transaction months ago it's already being counted as income.
I'm certainly no accounting expert, but I can't come up with a way to credit the vendor (from an accounting perspective) but not record the repayment of $870 twice.
Employer is then required to reduce the PAYGW in accordance with the software formulas contained in NAT 1004.
So my questions are:1.
Do reconciled transactions keep appearing in the list of transactions?
For one of them it's an amount of $5260  over 9 weeks.
I have read the other threads on this topic but still slightly confused.
Debit Expenditure and credit staff.
Hello All, Am hoping you can provide insight as I have combed through discussion and the guide, but unable to find an answer.
So here goes.
I recently made a purchase for office supplies, and entered the office expense.
A few days later, I had to return a few items, and the vendor issued a partial refund credit to the Visa.
For purposes of this post, how do I enter or categorize this credit refund to the card?
In this case I originally paid $100, and the refund credit was in the amount of $15 usd.
Does anybody know a way around this?
Or am I stuck making another feature request?
Desktop application makes that you almost must not operate it.
We have a Step by Step Procedure downloadable as a PDF available for download.
It helps to download the file as a pdf.
Transcription  Today I am going to show you how to fix up duplicate entries in your PayPal fees.
Click delete and it says ‘are you sure you want to delete this line?
Is there a way?
Hello All,Love the software it's brilliant.
Or a drop down menu when entering where you choose from a menu of Vat periods.
30 per ACH transactions is exorbitant.
I saw on PayPal's website that they have started a program of charging $0.
For example month+/-n e. g. month+1 for next month and month-1 for previous month.
Short formats would also be useful e. g. smonth for Jan, Feb, Mar etc and syear for 15, 16 etc.
Allow the formatting of a payroll paycheck to fit the check-voucher-voucher format.
00 refund appearing on the customer screen.
Nothing should block the focus on my active customers including the appearance that there are more than there are in reality.
Product information in the Inventory already resides within the system.
All other competitive software that I have looked at has this basic facility
I believe that there needs to be an appropriate entry appearing in the ucl field.
I am using multicurrency with AUD as base.
Hence have incorrect Realised Gains / Losses.
Am i missing something really basic or is there a work around?
For NZ tax (Company), if you have excess imputation credits, it is converted to a deemed loss to carry forward to the next year.
i. e. in the below example, how would I turn my excess credits of $56 to a deemed loss of $200?
Net Profite $100Tax Expense $28Imputation Credits: $86Dr Tax Expense $28Cr Tax Payable $28Dr Tax Payable $28Cr Imputation CreditsRemaining Imputation Credits $56 remaining to be turning in a Deemed Loss $200
Have i done the credit wrong?
Every 3 months, it allows me to perform a VAT audit for the 3 months in advance.
However, at the moment, it is doing June- August.
Now, I see in the description it says corrections so I assume this is the residue from the earlier error.
I frequently drive around Europe to visit suppliers.
Hope this makes sense to someone!
But some of them have null AccountCode.
Is that possible.
We have products that clients should purchase every 2 years.
We have found this guide:https://help.
In the Reports menu, select All Reports.
But no "Reports" available in this view.
Could you please advise why we missing all this options, is the documentation is incorrect or we don't have access to some features in the interface for some reason?
We also no issue credit note to client.
Please advice on accounting entry. "
It shows as an Asset for the Company $15,000.
Do I make a journal entry to balance?
Is a Director fee another way?
We only have a few months' of transactions - from PayPal, DirectLi, Stripe, and HSBC - but somehow everything got a bit confused, so I unreconciled everything.
It's driving me bananas.
Im not sure how I can fix thisAny advice is greatly appreciated as it is driving my bonkersRegards,Brooke
The due amount would get paid off by the credit company.
Also i'm looking to automate as much of this as possible so any help with understanding how this could be done via the API or importing CSV files would be very helpful.
Also is it possible to change the date format to UK so dd/mm/yy and not the American way of mm/dd/yy?
I Have tried a couple of ways but seems to not work for me.
I explained to him that this is duplicating the transactions as they have already been entered/coded previously.
Would love to find an alternative and leave Windows and QB behind.
In QuickBooks I can simply start or open another company file as needed since those files reside on the hard drive.
I know of no limit to the number of company files I can have.
But that's in my shop, 20 miles from home.
Please note Rent, outgoings and expenses vary every month too.
Is there away that this can be done?
I decided to take them out.
This would then offset each other and the difference is the net cash introduced or taken.
Coding the expenses.
The Match/Create/Transfer/Discuss tabs are greyed out but will allow be to click on them.
All the bestPhill
All reconciliation is complete for these periods and I am ready to file my returns except I have no idea how to fold the initial expenses into the first period.
I receive a commitment fee that is paid by the client.
(note:  this is refunded if the customer continues with service).
It would be great if it was consistent.
However, I cannot match these with the expense claim.
We are importing manual journals to reflect data which has been generated on other systems.
Although most of the journal lines have no VAT, some do have VAT.
I'm going to write my quandary in layman terms to clarify in my own head as well.
For example.
In fact it's fairly rudimentary.
I have around 2,800 credit with Paypal Credit.
However, purchases made with Paypal Credit (specifically) can be paid  by a monthly direct debit or at anytime you wish to reduce the credit outstanding.
Therefore for example.
I recently bought a special edition Vinyl for say £100 and some cabling for my office for around £125 from two seperate suppliers.
We receive goods and check off against our delivery notes.
Has anyone got any best practices for doing this or part automating the process?
I also didn't realize this after a month of transactions.
I've been too busy focusing on web dev rather than invoicing.
I've tried re-importing via the inventory import stock balance however it continues to throw errors.
Is there somewhere else that I can amend this oversight?
I have pulled these reports back till March 2015 and each month both doesn't match and shows a differing sum.
This works fine when we have been invoiced.
However, we are on proforma invoicing with some of our suppliers.
Our state law has taxes that are incurred by the person selling the product, not the person buying the product.
1)  The tax would reduce the amount owed the seller2)  Then Create a tax payable item to be reported and paid by the purchaser on behalf of the seller.
If I put the £100 then the VAT is worked out on that figure which is wrong.
Sorry if this has been answered, I could not find it with a search.
e. g. 1. will it ignore them2.
will the file import error3.
will it update existing items4.
might be easier to keep a manual diary of cash paid / cash outany ideas
Could this be done via manual journal to cancel it out?
However, I have some considerations before starting on.
My VAT period is yearly (ending 31.
This USD 100 have the interest and the principal.
Back in February we sent a check to a local nonprofit.
The check was cashed and has been reconciled correctly.
Unfortunately, it appears they never received the check and the funds were essentially stolen.
Or is there a method that makes more sense in terms of accounting?
For example, we decrease from 100 units to 50 units for, etc.
Is it possible?
I'm trying to manual journal, but couldn't make it balance to 0 either.
Totally lost here!
The problem is, it fouls up my monthly operating cost reports by making the monthly spend on website hosting appear much lower than it truly is since the large, up-front fee isn't included in monthly reports.
Im hoping for some help please.
IMPORTANT: In both situations the client is registered for VAT in the UK and also in Germany.
If they ship goods from the UK directly to a non-vat registered customer, I believe that they should be charing 19% VAT and subsequently declaring this on their German VAT return.
Secondly if it is, does it mean that the sale needs to be included in the UK VAT return?
I think this is a little more simple and they should be charging 19% VAT.
The company was not VAT registered until February this year.
My questions are as follows:1.
I thought there was only 1 method/option on the flat rate scheme.
If not, which should I choose and why are there 2 options?
Can someone provide me with the rules for using alternative delivery addresses on purchase orders.
I'm a bit confused and don't want to mess it up!
I would be very grateful for your replies.
Right now, I see all debit and credit items that have been posted there, and often it's hard to make out those items that actually make up the current balance.
There are no unfiled GST amounts at all as this is the first trading period for the company and no GST return has ever been filed.
For the last handful of years I have been recording my mileage (in a notebook), totting up the monthly figure, then at the end of the tax year my accountant allows 45p per mile for the first 10k miles off my profit and a reduced rate for more miles.
I do high mileage and the mileage reduces my tax liability more than my costs expenses would be, unless I have some bad luck with huge repairs!
This is the only thing I've not figured out.
I expected that upon the packages reaching UK border, they would be held in customs and we would be sent a VAT/duty tax bill, but we did not.
HiWe have a supplier who is a bit useless.
Then they refunded us too much money.
Then they took too much money again.
Then they finally sorted their **** out and refunded us the correct amount (I think, at this point I'm beyond caring).
Effectively, I'll be running 2 systems in tandem and on 1 October I want to start completely clean.
Where did it go?
I have a small car dealership that has purchased and sold a car I picked up from out of state!
We purchased the car from another state, I have travel expenses to pick it up that include the airline ticket, gas, food, and tolls.
If I paid a transport company to deliver the car I'm pretty sure it would have been a COGS but because I picked up the item and transported it myself I'm not sure.
I have been racking my brain and reading everything I can get my hands on about this for the last two weeks and I've gotten nowhere.
I have a client who is doing a Groupon promotion.
I have searched around but can't quite find the answer I am looking for.
Which does surprise me as I think it's a relatively simple thing.
So, I looked at setting it as a recurring bill but I am not sure this is right approach.
some receipts had a small amount of VAT due to a hot item or whatever.
but it wasn't 20% of the total amount.
so I've added about 6 receipts from the latest shoot.
added them all to a specific project.
Hello, Sorry if this is already somewhere.
Is there a simple way of doing this?
I am going round in circles and not really getting anywhere.
We have several years of accounting history but for 2017 we decided to fix a lot of things in our accounting processes that were broken.
What would be the correct way to smooth out this expense so that I can measure a real gross profit on days worked vs invoiced.
I have recently purchased some machinery which is on a hire purchase loan and part exchanged an older version of the same machine.
Was there reports removed or changed in the last few weeks as I used as recently as the 16th of May?
To give a bit more information we are a small charity so we have an annual budget for the year which incorporates two tracking categories, one covering the amount our funder has given us to spend and the other is the amount we have agreed to contribute to delivering our agreed outcomes.
I have a project with a current client with a total cost of $3500 which will be paid in monthly installments of $500 until complete with the balance due on completion.
I estimate it will be 6 months until it is complete.
The businesses produces hardware and sells to customers.
Level 1 of tagging, will be by team - Marketing/Product/Finance etc.
Costs will go to the relevant team.
If so, since it's not a department, we have no budget assigned for it.
Or assign revenue and COGs to each product using the second tracking field?
Unsure on Level 2 - would you recommend doing level 2 as each product we have?
We have credit card statements that are input by another employee.
This has caused a problem as he has left and now our automatic reminders have his name displayed in the "From" section of the emails.
Also, the purchases were all made before the date of commencement of GST registration, so each expense should be entered with NO GST.
We have a client who sends a fixed price purchase order which is then used for a quarter.
The employee promptly repaid the excess.
I'm not sure about the best way to go about this.
I entered the bill as a transaction (that is showing past due because I back dated it) but how do I show that it is paid and the mark the funds as an owner contribution?
Can someone please let me know how this is going?
The auditor is asking me to explain the gap in the sequence.
and I can't!
Owner wants to get paid through payroll and instead of getting paid she wants to reduce the 310- Loan from Owner.
I want to show she got paid and want to apply the payroll to the withdrawal.
I have been trying to make payments and once I try to export the file, there prompts an error saying that an "Internal Reference Number is required".
2017 which has AR and AP.
I have 2 tracking categories, each with the 2 sub divisions.
I have tried several option and yet I am stuck.
We issued shares in one organization then created a parent company and want to roll up the shares to the parent organization once it came into existence.
The standard file returns the message "Wrong number of fields in line: 1, found: 85, expected: 9 or 10" - any ideas?
I'm entering a bunch of expenses and I have a few conferences and networking events that I have attended.
if so, what was it?
I've tried editing a custom file to no avail.
I cannot click into this transaction to remove and redo it and when I search for it it comes up under no search.
Having trouble wrapping my head around the accounting in each of the organizations.
How is it done?
Hope to receive immediate response to this question.
Howto export this data to a CSV file, or something else useful ?
I understand what tracking is.
I have a company that has several locations.
00When I click 'preview', it says this near the total:Subtotal	240.
how would we therefore clear this balance?
I have a very small car dealership that has purchased and sold it's first car!
We purchased the car from another state, I have travel expenses to pick it up that include the airline ticket, gas, food, and tolls.
Some points are still unclear to me and I would hugely appreciate any help with them: - We are selling books online.
Is that a legit way of doing it?
So there's no payroll, invoicing, inventory, and there's no GST involved since the bulk of my income comes from the US.
It's the multi currency aspect that I'm having trouble with.
SITUATIONI live in Australia, but receive income in USD paid to my USD PayPal balance.
I also have quite a number of USD expenses.
Here is my proposed solution.
INCOMEUSD affiliate commissions come into my USD PayPal balance, so record the current XE.
com rate on that amount on the date those funds arrived.
They admit it's something I should speak to an accountant about.
Also, is it possible to have leave balances to be linked to reports, in the same way say, "superannuation entitlements" is linked?
I don't want my clients seeing the expenses.
So where would I code this to?
Trust A and Trust B are two separate entities.
All the share investments have been transferred at market value from Trust A to Trust B.
and also reduce the Owners Share Capital to zero to reflect that all investment funds have been returned to unit holders which are then reinvested into Trust B?
If anyone could point me in the right direction that would be great, thank you
I hope this makes sense, but how do I do it because as it stands now I can't seem to devise a mechanism.
For the PST, we have to file and remit on a monthly basis.
I then went to watch tutorials to see what I did wrong and it mentioned my scenario and I should have used Remove/Undo instead,How can I get rid of these extra transactions?
The answer may already be on here, but I can't seem to find it.
75 that was charged on my personal card.
I now have a refund of $69.
75 to my personal card, how do I enter that?
If some cash have been taken out for petty cash purchases, how does it get handled?
we took £800 as cash and £200 as card.
We took £50 from till as petty cash throughout the day to purchase some stuff.
Now we have £750 cash left in the till.
But the top approach will work from the POS if it's one of the ways to tackle petty cash.
The screen still clearly shows "GST Excluded"!
This has been going on for approx three months before being discovered.
I HAVE LOST OVER 10K IN REVENUE!
I work incredibly hard at a stressful job to earn this money.
And should it be 20% VAT on expenses, No VAT, or exempt expenses?
I am accounting on the cash basis.
The same question for stock that was bought before I became VAT registered, that wasnt sold until after becoming VAT registered, is this No VAT or Exempt supplies?
Some of our cash was stolen, then insurance company issued us some compensation.
Let's say it's £500.
I sell packages of 5 massage sessions for discounted rate.
I'm working on getting our restaurant into the cloud accounting craze.
This is a mom and pop shop that has recently opened and doing everything on paper.
Our restaurant servers receive part of their wages in tips.
The credit card processor's fee is taken at the end of the month.
Some of which are ZERO rated VAT as they are books or other things.
So that I don't have to go through all of these manually and prepare for my VAT return.
I wish to change the description of GL Codes (Name / Short title).
It was perfectly matched.
They come back to me that they cant provide accounting advice.
please refer to your accountant.
Oh ridiculous it is!
or someone else higher up can take my cases in?
I have reported 3 issues altogether.
now 3rd issue, I think it is the same thing BROKEN LINK.
I am at the stage that their support tell me anything to try anything financially, or I can do at my end or maybe involve my accountant.
So how long do you think I can get a tech to find that "BROKEN LINK"?
We are in the construction industryI have 3 questions .
I am not sure if they have been set up properly as they seem to have alot more owing then they should.
The initial due date is for the balance of the first month.
For example, we are going to lend some money to a third party.
Sorry if this is a dumb question but I don't know much about accounting.
I remember the Save button at the bottom of GST page used to have two options, Save Draft or Save Final.
Some charges and GST applies.
HMRC is now asking me for Employer's NIC for Jan, Feb and March.
I only can sign-up for 17/18.
I have received a letter from one of our existing suppliers informing us that they have been bought by a larger company and are changing their name and all details to the larger company.
I want to make sure I deal with this in the correct manner.
It is made up of many items below.
The total TNT amount is made up of:- GST- Entry Fee- GST on Entry Fee- Advance of Funds Fee @ 2%- Administration Fee- GST on MPI, Storage & Administration Fees- Credit Card Fee @ 3%- GST on Credit Card FeeThank youLucie
Should the intnl fee be added to the purchase price to form COGS?
Or is either approach acceptable?
I have found it works well.
If the asset is discarded or lost, the adjusted tax value of the pool isn't reduced.
Once assets are pooled, they're no longer treated as individual assets, so any capital gain made on the sale of any or all assets from the pool can't be separated from depreciation recovered.
Is it indeed not working or am I doing anything wrong?
Hello,My husband and I are going to file as a qualified joint venture this year.
I am about to do my first VAT Return.
My company uses the Flat Rate scheme with Annual Accounting.
When reconciling this transaction, I created an overpayment for the extra amount paid.
We have now received a cheque from the supplier of our credit.
How this could have happened?
and more importanly, how could I sort this out?
We overpaid an employee in error.
This year we have made a loss and therefore the Corporation Tax is in a reclaim position.
I cannot follow the same methodology as you cannot have a negative amount in the Bill.
I work as a pet sitter and a video producer.
Is there a way to track that.
I tried to do a manual journal, but that doesn't work as a manual journal must have equal credits and debits.
I now have two problems:1) I have to fix 9 months worth of these transactions.
So my employee's bring home salary is $1600.
This question has been asked before, however I have read what seem conflicting answers.
Members agree to a repayment plan and repay a certain amount weekly until the loan is fully repaid.
First part – Setting up the system for the loan.
4) I finally set up the loan recipient (So & So) as a 'Customer'.
Step 2 – Entering the repayments.
Equipped with the set up from Step 1 above:2.
2) On the 'Receive Money' form, the 'From' is the loan recipient: So & So (created in 1.
4) I select the 'Item': So & so Loan repayment (created in 1.
Is this the consistent with NZ accounting practices?
For example, revenue would be against a specific program and could have a restriction placed on it by the donor.
On a Statement of Functional Expenses, each program would be a column and each row would be a transaction type.
On a Statement of Activities, each transaction type would be classified into one of the restriction classes.
Daniel, our friendly CEO is in town and would be delighted to meet and hear your thoughts :)Please contact us here or directly at daniel.
Allow contacts to be deleted.
Archiving contacts is a great feature, but deleting should also be an option, in case you created it by mistake.
In the https://go.
com/Settings/Organisation page, there is an option to choose Organisation type, and a field called Registration number exists there but its not clear if this can be used directly if you don't have a registered Organisation/Company.
I dont see expenses list as we usually see in Quickbooks.
1) Any idea to undo the conversion balances?
my statement  line are 1866.
Ok can someone help, I started using tracked inventory for items i purchase (ie radios) and have been selling them as part of an overall installation sale.
I've decided to stop using WaveApps.
However I'm not seeing any quick way as this is being done other than clicking in to every single transaction to confirm for matched transactions if they have a receipt or bill attached to them.
I have a previously paid off mortgage (non-current) and previously returned security deposits (current) showing up under Liabilities and Equity.
Because this is a bit unusual, they agreed to forward me an advance to cover my startup costs, which were used for that purpose.
That money was sent directly to my attorney, who utilized part of it to cover legal fees and costs, and then cut my company a check for the balance.
I know it needs to be split, with part going to owner’s equity investment and part to the advance towards startup costs, but I’m not sure how to handle the latter part.
We have recently become VAT registered on a flat rate of 13% with our accountant filing the return etc.
When importing goods from overseas, I am reconciling the transaction at this point without GST.
I am paying the GST as the goods arrive into NZ customs thus there is a separate transaction for the GST alone.
And again tonight I have noticed another one.
18 but the amount we have received to reconcile is £89.
As obviously for this Canada one it is saying the amount is out by £12, so won't let me reconcile.
DavidTo CommissionThe Manual Journal does not allow me to Debit a particular contact name.
I tried to deleting the numbers to get it back to normal and they were then even further off.
and accounting is definitely not my forte.
If I were to see these two transactions, it should be easy to match off the Shopify payout against these.
I understand, from reading other posts here, this is far from ideal.
Something to do with 'owner drawings' and 'funds introduced'?
So, we are revisiting our VAT Tax Codes to ensure they are correct.
We sell , not goods, to the UK, EC and the rest of the world.
No VAT code also means it won't appear on the VAT return.
I guess I was looking for a Zero Rated code applicable to the sale of services outside of the EU - but nothing stood out.
I have been putting them in as an expense.
After we have allocated shareholder salary we have a loss.
It's simple enough, but to save money the transactions made are as follows:1.
Purchased a season ticket on 21/01/2017 for &#163;740.
Handed the season ticket in on 12/02/2017 and received a refund of &#163;447.
Squareup has worked perfectly from the first day.
I financed the purchase of some equipment for our office.
I adjusted Long-Term Assets and created a long-term liability for the full amount of the loan.
But doing it this way, my loan payments don't show on my monthly income statement as an expense.
36Total Cost of Goods (What it should be according the the cost prices in inventory items):£14.
Approximately, half of that is received in cash the other half is eftpos.
Approximately half of that cash is then kept on hand to purchase stock.
The other half is then banked generally once a week.
I now have a very inflated Float balance of approximately $80k.
I have an idea about what I may have done wrong, but am not 100% sure so would really appreciate some feedback on what may / could be happening.
I then get the bill afterwards.
00 inc 23% vat which is 11,700.
00 vatI paid the 2691.
00 deposit which is the vat on the van and an interest free loan of 36 monthly payments of 325.
I'm confused as to how that last piece of the puzzle works.
There's only me on the payroll so I can't imagine that anything can go too wrong.
My mistake.
com and accts@brandTwo.
We currently have subscriptions set up in Paypal for customers for recurring payments.
I run an online store based mostly on items supplied by sellers.
As for purchases, I issue online PO on my online store backoffice.
Refunds would be reconciliated against transactions from the original purchase date.
i. e. to group these customers together for the P&L?
It has only occurred once on the 27 March 2017.
i haven't found a way to offset a fixed asset that is an owner contribution.
I get invoiced for rent by my landlord.
83, which is correct as the insurance company have deducted our $500 excess.
HiI was loaned some money to make some purchases for resale to one week.
One week later I received the money from the client and the loan was repaid.
I've never had a loan come in and out before so I'm a bit lostOlly
because this is not the case right now I don't see them its the opening balance is 0.
I'm hoping someone can help me :-)I have created a bill, which has subsequently been paid and reconciled.
However they will not be paying this full amount, the government will be chipping in a fixed amount of 4k.
We registered for VAT and did our first VAT return last week.
However for the first adjustment to claim back historical VAT on stock, my accountant added a manual bill.
My client purchases stock from USA.
We are redoing all transactions from the last 3 years from scratch.
What advice can anyone offer for the best procedure to go through this month by month?
E. G. What reports should be run to check our work each month.
We take payments using Stripe.
To give some insight, my company is a partnership with two employees, myself and my partner.
Any help would be greatly appreciated :)Many thanks,Jody
This has been discussed before, but I haven't found a good answer.
The goal being to see trends by customer.
However that is not the case.
Does someone have an idea how to overcome this problem?
I cannot seem to find a place where I could set these up.
I have found it for invoicing but does not apply to us.
I'm in the process of setting up a virtual bookkeeping company and am wanting to ensure that my client's data is protected.
A service club (Rotary) uses a category for each of its projects.
This allows for neat P&L reporting for projects.
As well as receiving external income into a particular project the Club wishes to make a purchase from that project.
An example would be a fundraising breakfast where the Club wants to purchase 10 tickets to give to a local high school.
The following issues have arisen:1.
And the second query:2.
Previous book keeper created a bit of chaos in our books and created two transactions in March last year for a total of £762.
If the book keeper hasn't completed all postings from before 1st of April and then I change the VAT scheme on 1st of April will this mess things up when he then posts items from before 1st April?
We synced bills en contacts from infusionsoft.
We used the same name for contactname and primary contactNow we want to change the contactname in companyname and ad a contact id.
Looking forward for a solution.
Should i have not done this?
Would I raise a 'PO' or not at all as I am not technically purchasing it.
If anyone can let me know if I'm correct in my thinking or way off base, it would be appreciated!
It's a very old version of MYOB.
I've tried JetConvert and they were unable to assist.
I want an individual not a company, as I want one person who I can relate with on my financial needs.
freeland at gmail is my contact info.
A customer paid 2000 but only owed 1500.
Will be buying a residential property to develop / improve then subsequently (hopefully) selling it at a profit.
Everything we capture shows up as inventory.
When running the P & L with same period last year comparison for February 2017 I found that in 2016 it only included 1.
Good Morning,We are a loyalty and rewards program.
Concern:My concern is the amount received is a liability to us even though it is a revenue stream.
Applied measure:As being a loyalty program, the net of revenue is the actual source of revenue to us and also an asset to us.
We are trying to show it as an asset in the Balance Sheet.
The consequence of this is, it is showing a negative balance in the Current Assets side.
Is it a good way, we are doing now?
Looking forward to hear from you folks.
It seems the ATO is happy for businesses to keep electronic records only as long as they are secure and easily accessible.
In this case its to FIS who provides their entire backbone.
FIS provides this service for many banks and they have a lot of competitors that do the same.
They don't seem to be interested in trying to do anything other then wait around from Yodlee to try and fix the problem.
receipts that you have uploaded with transfer to another provider without you manually downloading and re-uploading each individual one.
I hope to be posting a revision to this stating there has been a solution.
How then do I move the item to Fixed Assets?
They charged me a one of fee of £600 incl.
The £3.
Also admins, if this question has already been answered, feel free to move this post.
I am aware there was recently an issue with draft assets not appearing as drafts on the pending section of the Fixed Assets section.
I am glad to see they are now appearing again however when I went to register an asset from drafts I couldn't as it had no asset type.
This used to work really well so its a bit annoying that it no longer seems to.
I don't want to charge interest.
For a single person it probably takes 3-5min, for a group 10+ min.
Its going to get really busy soon come May and June and I want to make this process easier.
So I now i have 35 items that were transferred to reconcile.
We are a training company offering a variety of courses to buisnesses and individuals.
There are two cases we are not sure how to handle though1.
I think the best way to handle this is as a tracked item and then "sell" it to our staff for &#163;0.
Is this the best way?
I have tried numerous ways to fix this but am really struggling to understand how I could make such a radical change and fail to revert back.
I'm sure I may be coming to this place for more answers and help as I go.
US Customs, and 4).
So basically my main vendor's PO information is now long gone, and rest of others are good and ready to be given to our accountant.
Then there are the loan repayments that come out after every PayPal transaction, these equate to 20% of every transaction, how do I reconcile these?
I have recently joined the company I work for.
We purchase in GBP and sell in USD which leads us to hedge our currency with a currency brokerage.
We are issuing it in favour of our customer against the performance (delivery of service).
Or it is contingent liability/Non current liability?
If I create an entry for it, I am then effectively double counting the sale.
Can someone explain what I am supposed to do?
They said it is a Chrome issue.
It still hasn't been fixed.
My team has been having problems with cash coding.
This creates opportunities for data entry errors if not being very careful.
Been trying to sort this out for a week now and getting no where.
I would be grateful for feedback and if this issue could be fixed it would be great.
I recently held a small event where I sold goods on behalf of artists.
We took no commission - the artists bought their wares and I sold them on behalf of the clients.
I am a bookkeeper in the farm sector in UK.
I am struggling to figure out the journals required each month to keep the balance correct.
This same question also applys to my purchases.
These are recorded as either billable expenses or cost of goods sold.
Because they are imported however, I'm not charged GST on the service.
I have a small Limited company in United kingdom, not charging VAT yet.
Not sure if this can go against my 35 Direct Expenses code?
I have a Customer who I also Rent space from as well and he sets of the rent from the balance he owes me.
Total cash is a bit misleading for a snapshot of performance when allocated VAT / HMRC money is being included.
I purchased goods from Korea that are imported in the UKThe goods are invoiced directly to the company, but the freight on FedEx is paid via my credit card.
I claim the freight as a personal expense.
Salary depends on experience.
The position reports into a seasoned head of finance and has lots of potential for growth and career advancement.
How would we create documents for loan stock.
It would be good to have an option of listing debtors by their surname instead of their first names
We received an annual bill for insurance premium at the beginning of the year (5th January).
On, 15th January a direct debt will deduct £100.
As the remaining £1,100 is for different periods and I only want to see/show the insurance expense for January.
And if so, what is journal entry needs to be entered?
b)	But, where would the other side go?
So it is already showing as a current liability on the balance sheet.
We redeemed credit card points by receiving statement credit.
This is apparently something to do with Batch payments, however it doesn't apply to ALL batch payments.
this will fix the problem.
A slow and tedious problem.
Would either of these influence the payroll?
Hey everyoneI have been using inventory tracking for a while now and it's been brilliant and automatically syncs stock levels over to my website.
However I can only enter reconciliation details to put items into stock when the stock actually arrives from my supplier which can take weeks.
That way it is tracked without going into inventory and updating website stock.
Is there a workaround or something I'm doing wrong here?
Some suggestions and feedback welcomed.
So am I missing something or should I be looking to create a manual journal instead?
If it's a bug?
It appears however that there are duplicate entries.
I've only realised this might be the case part way through the reconciliation and now i feel i'm in a complete muddle.
The order was not fulfilled, so we received the money back.
Related:I am setting up a rule for Speedway Gas Station purchases.
If so, it will be a "Fuel" expense.
00, it is a "Meal & Entertainment"  expense.
I refunded the balance of $1335.
16, but am unsure how to reconcile this.
or as another great American may have said .
one small leap for IRD, one giant backward step for tax accountants
Our Accountants journals include entries to AR and AP - can you please explain how to process these entries?
I run Facebook and Twitter advertising for multiple clients, and they bill in an annoying way.
Facebook bills £23, but, £3 of it is for Client A and £20 for Client B.
Client B paid £100 but I then spent £20 on Facebook Ads.
Basically, we keep an excel file where we calculated how much needed to be depreciated monthly, and we entered the journals manually into the system.
So I already have the correct values for the Fixed Assets in the Balance Sheet at 31.
47 however in the job system the GST rounds up to $33.
23 due to the half cent from the subtotal.
Should this appear on my VAT return?
If i record it as order, but the transaction has already been fully paid.
The supplier is gst reg.
For gst purposes is this treated as a financial supply - granting credit to customer - so NT or would it include gst.
The issue occurs when we issue a refund in PayPal.
com/l/ACbA1S5CHM5J2o_ruhiUOI5d64ouWB9-ERk- A refund for £143.
96 - Fee reversal of £3.
com/l/ACb3YkII2rhKNZoAsnupNv6nVduVO3yprAk- Refund of £147.
50- Fee reversal of £3.
Do I allocate it to Owner Share Capital under Equity or Owner Funds Introduced as a liability?
Never had this issue before and I'm really not sure how to rectify it :(
2 problems i Have at the moment that I'd love help with:1.
We are thrilled that we can possibly finally write these off as it was something we could never do in MYOB without affecting the balance sheet.
On the fringe is 7 payments over 104 weeks.
I have a conversion balance in opening stock from 31st December 2015.
No other adjustments to stock have been made for the year 2016 so it has a YTD value of 0.
I have a figure for closing stock and am not sure where to journal the figures from / to.
My logic would be to leave the opening stock figure as it is.
I'm reconciling my paid income to 814 Wages Payable Payroll.
However, if I go to 477 Salaries I can see the Payroll Expense Journals too (with obviously nothing reconciled).
I have 3 employee cards with Chase.
Right now, I'm left to enter all those transactions manually.
It's been a year since I've noticed.
I am currently processing a company tax return.
I have tried different permutations of this and am unable to get past that error message.
Thus, we treat the principal paid on our real estate loans as direct expenses as opposed to a non-current liability.
What we are having difficulty with is tracking our net worth.
Is there a way to delete Inventory and make anything coded to Inventory code to COGS?
I tried the find and recode, but it wouldn't pull up 1400- Inventory Assets.
I tried a negative value Bill but was told it had to be more than $0 so didn't work.
Hello,We ran an event in the summer that resulted in cash takings.
So it doesn't represent the full amount of money we took at the event.
I hope this makes sense, and that someone can help - it's driving me up the wall!
I tried adding as expense receipt but then it wanted to reimburse me the bookkeeper.
"PayPal Credit Transfer (charge) - Completed" and received $8.
Shall I go to an addon?
The customer service has come back to me STATING that are working on it.
But 1 year and still not fixed.
The financial statements require brought forward, additions, revaluations and disposals for each of cost and depreciation, for each classification of fixed asset.
IHi Sarah  It currently isn't possible to set a start and end date for a contact.
I have passed this request onto our Product Team for review.
This will then allow you to have a number of how many customers you are growing by or decreasing by each month.
He also transfers funds from one company to another.
I am unable to pull in transactions from Airbnb and VRBO, unable to pull in mortgage statements.
Me thinks its best to go back to spreadsheets.
I'm sole trader and I'm not VAT registered.
-Now i want to insert the opening balance after a month .
The Help centre instructions for GST reconciliation say to 'save as a draft' after entering each periods figures.
nearly four years out of date.
Generally my staff needs to purchase a lot of stuff every month.
Doing so would be really helpful for future collection efforts.
There needs to be an option for that.
It's the bonus that has me confused.
My company organize three month training for groups, so in every three months we have different batch of trainees.
Im trying to determine whether or not I have overpaid him by submitting 2 eft online payments in error.
Details of payroll: Employee salary is $ 500/m                        Employee     employer NY City Tax      1.
13SS                        31             31Federal IT             31.
I have exhausted all of my ideas.
I have checked petty cash/ reimb transactions and nothing is jumping out at me.
We are a Community Amateur Sports Club that now needs to manage its VAT using the Partial Exemption Method, we posted a return in September which showed HMCE owed us 12K, after a visit from the Inspector and we went through the PE process this was reduced to 7.
Our artists sell merchandise (our products) while on tour in various currencies.
we have various Bill Credit Notes in different currencies and an Bill from artist for their royalties in GBP for which we want to allocate that foreign currency credit.
HiSince setting up my home-office in the garden, I've installed all the equipment for my role, and my home electricity bill for the last 3 months has doubled.
I have a Client where I'm remunerated on a performance/commission type basis.
It is now  and I still cannot reconcile .
,According to my notes I reached my reconcile limit on 9th November for an October statement line.
I thought this was supposed to automated accounting software?
However, I have a direct debit to HMRC which pays them a fixed amount each month.
This is a really big deal to us and would appreciate responses very much.
This should be rather easy to accomplish but I cannot see where this happens.
Obviously the customer would then be in credit.
Scenario,I receive a statement from a supplier.
I recently took advantage of an credit card offer from my CC company which allows me to get a cash advance, 18 months interest free (for an upfront 3% charge).
Edit the Batch Deposit and it automatically comes up as Dec 21.
I'm a bit hesitant about trying it out as it seems once you have saved things you can't change or delete them.
Many of our customers take deductions from their payments they owe us.
For example:Customer A owes us $5000.
I think it will work, as the accounting will show as a dividend, which will meet the requirements for personal tax etc.
This is no longer an issue.
However, today, on one of my companies, it is showing the GST return as having zero expenses (Oct-Nov Return).
My head hurts a bit.
(I have already done extensive searching on this topic but not quite found the answer.
I have a somewhat unique situation with one of my bookkeeping clients.
I know if you have a QB POS system it will upload and link to the QB accouting software.
What some over, is it a manual import?
Eventually I noticed that I posted the same transaction more than once.
I finally figured that if I changed the discount amount to 99.
99 it went through.
I do the books for 2 interlinked VAT-registered companies.
They are quite disorganised, and some payments have been made to suppliers from the wrong company.
However that figure and the one in the P&L don't match.
This is the case if I run it as a cash or accrual basis.
I'm confused - which is right?
For example, I paid a company £42.
50 and set this up as a transaction (not a bill) that company has now refunded me £40.
Our fault for not doing it correctly initially but what's the best way to fix ?
I believe the way GST works is a little bit tricky.
Then, I apply a credit for the GST we have paid on 85% of the monies.
This means we end up only paying GST on 15% of the monies collected.
This means we no longer have to charge VAT on the insurance.
I currently have it set to "Suspense" so I could go ahead and reconcile.
Hello,I have a question on whether or not to include inventory purchases I made this month (December) on my company's tax returns "ending inventory" for 2016, despite the fact that the goods will not be delivered to me until January of next year.
For example, I've placed an order 1000 widgets and received a Bill for which I paid a 30% deposit for the manufacturer to start production.
Thoughts on this are greatly appreciated as well!
Next, I have ended up making two payments - £5.
50 and £1.
50 and £1.
I recently created a website that allows companies to list and sell their services on it.
Upon discovering a difference in GST I looked into the reason further.
I own a swimming pool service company that has purchased a pool route from another company.
The pool route is 40 swimming pools.
I am having a brain freeze and the journal isn't working.
This has been resolved with the VAT office and they have adjusted the VAT return accordingly, paying the company the VAT reclaim less the over-claimed amount.
Now that shows up in the current quarter claim as a negative balance.
Amazon & eBay will both reduce my fees respectively of 20% once I supply them an EU VAT Number.
Roll on a year later.
I'm looking for an accountant that is familiar with DCAA compliance and audit.
I'm submitting my first few quarterly statements for BAS in Australia, and am confused by the BAS GST Calculation worksheet using cash basis for both GST and income.
That is the advice I've received from my accountant.
Grateful for a quick sanity check on a bookkeeping issue.
We have two companies A and B.
- In the past my Paypal transations used to import perfectly well.
They had the odd problem where the odd transation would be missing and I'd end up importing the missing transactions individually.
Then recently I realised I'd missed many months of imports.
I imported these manually and sorted out everything.
All was reconciled correctly.
since I last did it manually.
Can someone please help me find oout why it no longer imports manually.
Or is there another way, Please help.
My PAYE (payroll filing) submission keeps getting rejected by HMRC.
As the Computers are being paid off through Flexi Rent, do we claim the GST on each repayment or at terms end?
I'm trying to run depreciation in 1 July 2016 to 1 Oct 2016 as I bought asset in September 2016.
Thus start date remains the same and max end date remains 30 June 2015.
It is not working since yesterday (17/11/2016).
It shows this https://reporting.
7Xz1x and everything else is blank white screen?
00If my customer opens as a csv they getAs Quoted Services                                                                       $500.
00Is there a way to remove the option to open as 'csv'?
4% + 20p so i won't receive the full £12.
-it's really really upsetting.
99 (included in our liability figure) but we actually owe &#163;6762.
27 my liability will be reduced back to &#163;0.
28 but where do I make a credit to to make it balance?
My bookkeeping knowledge on journals is still in progress!
Would be handy to see the full reference as it only seems to show a certain amount of characters.
As the trust is a “Testamentary Trust” I’ve included the whole amount of the income as Excepted net income, and the distributed it to four beneficiaries, one of which is under the age of 18 years, where I’m expecting the Trust to be assessed on behalf of the minor taxed at adult rates, due to the fact, that the trust income is through a Testamentary Trust.
If the trustee is payable, there is a section on the return where you can enter in the distribution amount where the beneficiary is not entitled.
I accrued some charges for a job over a week.
I paid the credit card bill that month myself.
How can I reimburse this staff member for this transaction?
Is there a way of finding how much we are in credit with these suppliers?
Best regards from Barcelona!
We have the tracking code set up per tail number, which works lovely.
Therefore i booked it as direct cost.
Hence, I do not want to pass the revaluation through adjustment.
Does anybody have a better solution?
and I can see this would be an owner's loan contribution.
When it came down to reconciling those payments with Stripe deposits it inflated the Statement balance beyond what it should be.
I have not used Dear so I could not help.
If you are interested please email me on: poppy@poppyk.
I hope to get some help as pulling my hair outMany ThanksNicola
I then compared the income to my profit and loss and each year is out.
When I look at my reports all I see is Contact Transactions - Summary.
Not sure if I'm being thick or if it's missing, not working.
Please note the inventory is tracked.
My yearly salary will be $30,000 and I will be paid 15K in Q3 and 15K in Q4.
egSale of bat 80cost 30+5 shipping(30/6*1) +9(30/100*30) custom=44profit 36
I have obviously made an error with my conversion somehow.
Should it have been 30/6/16?
Does it make a difference?
Customer places order for some screen printed shirts.
Once the decorator is done, they ship directly to the customer.
One ordering the shirts from Nike and shipping to decorator.
We submit the 3 "purchase orders".
The vendors each bill us, and we vouch those bills against the original order.
Depending on the job, we may charge for the decoration, or may amortize it into the sell price of the shirts.
The other 85% is pure inventory fulfillment.
If I make Closing stock a Direct Cost and make it negative, then it works, but surely Closing stock should not be shown as negative
I currently have purchased a giftcard at a discount from the face value.
($100 gift card purchased for $90).
I have been using PO standard templates and a modified PO for a specific supplier.
the system seems too drop the item code randomly and this is becoming a problem with it appearing on my screen but not on the emailed version delaying shipment.
We are paying the balance, which is USD 106.
Every day I manually transfer the float between the safe & till, & the income between the till & safe, using the transfer money option.
We are two partners, each of us contributed in the capital investment.
The past investment expenses included :* Construction expenses* Furniture expenses* Kitchen Equipment* Rent expenses* Salaries paid in the past* Legal Expenses* Advertisement* Bills* SpendingHow to record these past expenses as capital investment?
The  references match.
Currently I have to download the file and customise it to meet our reporting requirements.
I've also received a tax refund from IRD.
training class to be a qualified contractor.
for Unisource Electric Company and paid $495.
class completed now and  upon completion they refund the 495 class fee.
If these transactions were counted as income they would be reflected in reports and we would be over the $60,000 threshold.
Which is the best way to keep track of it as a loss where I dont want to continue trading thanksAndrew
I started following the link, but what I read confused me.
HelloWe're a two person company, and I do the books.
The freelancer will then return receipts, and any moneys owed.
Confusingly, we will then claim this accommodation expense from our client.
So say I have a cash advance of £100.
Please help, my brain is melting :)
So at this point, I have not recognize the revenue yet.
Is anybody else experiencing similar problems?
It showed the outstanding amount.
Basically, I have an expense for one month of office rent that is in limbo since it wasn't expensed in 2015.
I see there’s an option for PayPal but not WePay.
I am looking to post a journal I have drafted manually.
Hey Guys,I had a question about how to enter my payroll entries.
I categorized the 1st transaction, the employees' direct deposit one, as 668--Wages and Salaries (Expenses).
So I have 2 questions.
First, what category does a fee to a payroll company go under?
Second, when I mark the employees' withheld taxes as a liability, that creates its own issue because there's no "debt" on my books to match it with.
So it messes everything up.
I want to reclaim the tax charged on these items too.
Again, thought it was OK and then had to go back on Wednesday only to get locked out again Wednesday night.
Right now I have (by month) one amount in categories.
)Background:UK based, non VAT registered sole trader, selling on Amazon UK, and EURO zone.
Multi currency option is available in my subscription.
The procedure is mentioned here:https://community.
Relatively straight forward for transactions in my base currency (GBP).
I sale product varying in sizes for XS to XL.
I reported this to support but have heard nothing since and they are still missing.
This is a bit of an insidious problem because the only way to see that the balance is incorrect is to compare with the paper statement.
If I select "Statement Lines" it shows a different balance for the same date.
Both views show green "Reconciled".
A portion of the services I provide is subcontracted.
I currently code purchases of inventory for sale to 5000 COGS.
Inventory Destroyed - if we bought 2 widgets for $100 each and coded it to 5000 COGS, but 1 widget was destroyed, what entries would we do to show that?
Could we create a Bill for this, coding to expenses, and paid from COGS?
When we try to reconcile this month we are left with a difference of the amount that was recalled back!
The total is $36.
I had a customer that had a refund of $68.
33 due to them.
Because we actually did issue two checks and two checks should be reconciled for banking purposes.
I tried to unvoid the first check.
I had deleted the refund that was applied.
Now, check 2 is showing voided and it will not let me unvoid.
For the same vendor I've created bills, but if I know it is a 100% cancelled transaction I wonder if the hoop jumping has any value later down the line that I may have missed?
I have no experience of accounting requirements for these regions/countries and was wondering if anyone can share any experience on this.
If I refresh later it'll return some results.
If I wait long enough ones with a lower letter in the alphabet will show up.
but at some point something must happen on your end and it get's removed.
Several staff in my team are encountering errors with cash coding.
The GST code is not filling at all.
This is recurring, on an inconsistent basis with no apparent pattern, using both Chrome, and Firefox browsers.
Since the financial years have closed, I can't void the outstanding bills.
I'm therefore unable to close down the year end.
Does anyone have any idea what may have caused the discrepancy?
No problems here.
Your help is much appreciated.
If I dispose of the whole asset then the wrong loss will go to the P&L and I will be left with no remaining asset on the balance sheet.
Anyone is experiencing the same issue?
Regards,Justin AnkusAustralian Festival of Chamber Music
I have a client who has carried over multiple uncleared checks for the past few years before I took over their books.
It's safe to say that a check from 8 years ago isn't going to be cashed now.
I obviously don't want to delete a check from a prior period.
The company is a PTY.
My Ltd company is based in the UK.
This is outside the scope of VAT.
According to VAT Notice 700/12 para 3.
Other categories - Zero Rated or Exempt - aren't technically correct either.
I don't know where to find the opening balance figure of inventory.
Do you mind to help me ?
I am confused about how my VAT is being reported.
94 - net of $2,614.
47 and VAT of $1,429.
The VAT amount in the ledger to be $143.
53 on 15 March3.
At the moment is shows around 35% - i. e. $1,429.
Also, they have different categories in the old system, I'm guessing as long as it goes into a similar category or equivalent, it will be fine?
Gift cards were purchased from third-party sources.
Example:Purchase $100 gift card for $90 to Store A from Store C. Purchase $50 gift card for $50 to Store A from Store D. Purchase $250 gift card for $200 to Store B from Store D. Make $95 purchase at Store A using gift card.
Store A - Remaining gift card balance: $50Store A - Face value of cards purchased: $150Store A - Funds used to purchase gift cards: $140Store B - Remaining gift card balance: $0Store B - Face value of cards purchased: $250Store B - Funds used to purchase gift cards: $200Store C - Spent $90 purchasing gift cardsStore D - Spent $250 purchasing gift cards
Dear All,Is it possible to merge two tax rates with same tax rate but different name under one common name.
I put a deposit down on a commercial lease which was subsequently turned down as we couldn't agree on terms.
These transactions have been left sitting as unreconciled for a while now.
Sometimes we refund a customer by applying the amount back on their credit card or debit card then we create a credit note for this transaction.
Our client is a touring company that hires talent from overseas to perform in Australia.
We are required to withhold Foreign Withholding Tax from these entities.
At this point we do a simple negative on the purchase to allocate the portion to a balance sheet.
Hello all,I posted this in the wrong thread before, so here I am again.
I have:Purchases VAT @23 & 13.
From an accounting perspective, how can I 'remove' these transactions?
I will try my best to explain it.
I have a contact that is both a supplier and a customer.
We currently are registered for GST and have a car that we have financed.
The loan amount for eg is $25000.
Seems too complicated.
This was refunded when the equipment was returned.
Processed the refund as an overpayment (receive money).
Then go to process the original debit as an overpayment, and turns into BAS Excluded, which is not correct.
GST needs to be deducted from the actual amount (total minus the refund of deposit).
Help is not clear.
the current date/month.
Default Date/Date Range to End of Previous Month/Previous Month3.
Default Date/Date Range to Current Date
I am based in the UK, I am a sole-trader registered for annual flat-rate VAT.
I travel to film shoots and so I incur frequent taxi/train/public transport cost.
When I arrive at those film shoots, I have to buy lunch/coffee/refreshments as none are usually provided on set.
I am on a flat rate scheme, so should I leave this selected to No VAT?
Have I missed something?
Is that about right?
(Other than customising the layout to fix it?
On one of my tryouts i´d created a bill, and then try to print it to see the layout.
the think is after clicking the PDF button, and then "print" nothing happen.
I paid my first VAT bill inconveniently forgetting I had already set up a direct debit for VAT.
the credit would be PAYE payable but what would the debit be?
A total of $675 PAYE had been deducted from this before it was paid and is due to be paid by 20 September 2016.
However, I want to ensure that it is the correct way of doing things.
If anybody can clarify this for me, I'd be most grateful.
"Done" doesn't seem to do it?
I don't mind to be reimbursed or not but for each case how should we class these, 1. expense claims OR 2. pruchase/billed to ourselves?
And should we mark them as paid when it's paid back?
Bought 100 Widgets at $10 each on credit card 1, created a bill for $1,000Upon inspection, 10 widgets were damaged, and returned to the supplier.
They issued a refund to a different credit card.
Credit card 1 shows $1000 expense Credit card 2 shows -$100 ('income')I discovered a Bill couldn't be used for a negative value.
I have tried sending an email to support but have not had a reply.
I am choosing not to reclaim VAT on fuel.
I asked the question to the support but they said it wasn't something that they could help me with.
I'm not sure what to do to fix this, as the year has been finalised, I've run depreciation, submitted my tax return, etc.
If so is there way to change them all at once to tax exempt (other than a click macro)Second question, I know this has been addressed in other threads but usually by people asking to call them.
My scenario is I dissolved my sole prop company and opened a corporation.
I want to make a journal entry for transfer of assets, etc to the corporation.
Might be a silly question, but.
HiI have a real newbie question that I can't find the answer to.
I figure it's either an expense (code 505 income tax expense) or liability (code 830 Income tax payable).
What to do?
Any help would be fantastic, this is the first of many and keen to get it correct from start!
HiWe are looking for a practice suite solution, specifically looking at workflow and client management.
I have limited experience of practice manager but it seems to be more of a manual job costing program.
There seems to be no way to edit a submitted claim.
Would it automatically bring the codes from the other company with it?
What are you going to do about it?
It could also be adjusted via a Journal if it was seen to be increased?
The money has all been spent.
I contributed about $16,000, and this was used to purchase lots of bits and pieces, and I've kept track of this.
I borrowed $7000 from a relative, and that money has been spent too.
I have kept records of what the money was used for obviously.
So essentially what I want to do is create a bunch of expenses, and then create the loans, and say that expenses and the assets have been paid for by money from the loan, so I will have a net liability of the loan amount.
Currently a QBO customer but looking to switch.
And then personally get to reap any benefits of the investment?
I have an interesting situation.
I am looking to dispose of an asset but have some questions.
Lets say I have an asset of $1,000 in the Fixed Asset register and on my Balance Sheet.
I have no depreciation.
I sell the asset for $1,000 to keep it simple.
I receive $1,000 in cash for the asset.
HiI purchased a tablet ($2,084) on12 July 16 and accessories ($99.
Have I coded these two transactions correctly?
I travelled overseas 31 July 16 and received one refund of GST $198.
54 on 4 August 16.
No import tax applied on re entering the country as my wife was travelling with me and the officer waved us through after thanking me for declaring that I was over my allowance.
We regularly purchase food, and have a GST and Non GST component to the purchases.
I provide medical services for $500 and 20% commission goes to paying administration and rent.
So out of the $500 earned, $100 will be paid for administration and rent and an additional $10 will be paid as GST.
As an online based company we sell on e-commerce platforms (e. g. Amazon) across the world.
The owner has been paying the credit card bill with their own personal funds.
The only work around I have found is a two step process: 1.
In order to be compliant with IAS 108/AASB 108, we should be revising the estimated life of our assets at least once a year.
84 (shop has its own loyalty program, points earned on previous purchases)Shipping $10.
84 to COGS and then have a rebate for the points redeemed, or something else?
One of the services I offer is as a reseller for a particular online service.
On a per client basis I would purchase a license and then resell the service.
When buying in the service, would I assign that to 310 "Cost of Goods Sold"?
The client paid a deposit of €300, she then cancelled but loses her deposit.
I'm having difficulty with getting right the conversion balances and opening entries for 2016.
We are on accrual, but as a construction company are also on the completed contract method.
This balance is automatically being shown as Current Year Earnings on the Balance Sheet at 12/31/15, which is incorrect according to our accounting method that defers earned income.
Then, it shows as RE at 1/1/16 - which is also incorrect.
And how can I work around this?
There's no interest on the loan.
The other part (let's say 50% to keep it simple) is capital to be put into the company.
Hello, hoping someone can help here.
The spreadsheet shows our opening balance at the top.
However there is always a discrepancy even though we have ensured that all activity has been listed and accounted for.
I have asked him to stop the payments until i work out the correct method of these payments.
But it only gives me 'contacts' to choose from.
Or is it simply considered another Non-Current Asset purchase?
It is a direct cost in that it was necessary for provision of the service.
However as they are not an employee I don't think 320- Direct Wages is appropriate.
Is 310- Cost of Goods Sold the correct code?
Or does it go under 412 -Consulting expenses?
If I ask for clarification of something I get a long winded answer that leaves me more confused.
What entries should I complete for this?
Having trouble as the GST rates don't match and it won't let you transfer.
In turn, she immediately sold the items.
This started small back in May, but has ballooned into a big problem.
However, the missing inventory has prevented me from full reconciliation.
I have not yet formed a LLC, due to the fact that I must leverage personal loans/rates/credit cards to get started.
This also includes fee's such as notaries and postage via overnight packages.
So far, ive only put $1000 downpayment (money order from cash).
Ill have it sometime next month.
-Loan #1 - Cash advance from CC with fees but 0% interest till next year-Loan #2 - 7 year personal loan from lender.
Loan 1 and 2 mostly cover the second home.
They have then asked for a refund but it is outside the 60 days within which you can refund on Paypal.
I have a Not for Profit set up.
There is no conversion balances.
The file has been operating for about 3 years.
This is considered 'miles' rather than cash back.
Are there better ideas for this?
Hello,We have an asset entered last September (2015) that has been Fully Depreciated at Purchase.
* Is it correct its book value shows the amount we paid for and that differs on the balance sheet (Purchase - GST)?
Hello,I wounder if someone can help me with my situation.
I got some contracts with local council and my drivers do the work.
can i record this in Bill from drivers, bill that you own ?
Eg, on the 26th June 2016 I have a Stationery expense under the tax rate GST On Expenses, with $0.
Similarly the GST Calculation Worksheet shows nothing under Amounts The Tax Department Owes You.
I have confirmed that the period is 1st April - 30th June 2016.
- When job goes ahead customer changes mind and doesn't want to go ahead with part of the service.
- This creates to lines to reconcile 1.
- Do I have to create 2 create notes?
EG 6 months rego is $451.
05However the GST component is only calculated on Insurance so the correct amount of GST is $17.
We are contract towers for a larger company.
We extended the period from November 15 to January 16.
Which tax code should be used for an input taxed capital purchase?
We have a residential investment property and all capital purchases relating to the property must be reported at both G10 and G13.
However, we haven't yet added the unspent grants as a liability.
I have one customer who pays in wads of cash generally to even &#163;100s amounts approximately what is owed.
But this isn't always possible.
So I plug in a statement line for &#163;3k coming from the client.
(Without having to shunt cash back and forth.
Have called TSB direct and nothing on website.
These are now showing up on my balance sheet.
I ideally want to record the capital we have received (ad hoc), the amount we have paid back (monthly) and the interest as an expense.
Hello to everybody.
I have setup two tracking categories, one for project and the other for grant.
This allows for a many to many relationship between projects and grants.
For instance, say that I track Internet costs separately from phone costs but in my grant budget I have a single line item allowance for communications.
Perhaps I should be structuring my system differently?
It's looking more likely that'll I'll have to register for VAT in the next 2 months.
I was wondering if someone could help me understand how to code the reverse charges that eBay fees and Amazon fees are paid at?
Could you please shed some light on how to charge for GST in the system and how to reconcile, GST received vs paid out?
Some background info:I sell goods online and am based in the UK.
I take payments through Paypal and Worldpay and have domestic and international customers.
I then deleted the above payments, and tried to reconcile by using the 'split' feature in the reconciliation screen.
I am a month in to my second quarter and have decided to apply to hmrc to swap to flat rate cash scheme.
I then changed to flat rate in financial settings assuming they will accept my application but won't know for up to 30 days.
It seems more complicated than staying on the cash scheme but I thought it would be easier!
To clarify I have paid for goods sold by USA merchant for $153.
The PayPal Transaction details states: Funding source - &#163;107.
Do I even have to attach these at all?
25% discount, making their share of the bill $31.
88 instead of $37.
Do I still forward the 15% additional discount?
There would now be only one organisation there and no billing discount so their charge would obviously go back up to the full $37.
We have a customer in Germany who buys from us on a consignment basis.
We are registered for VAT in Germany.
Should we look at creating separate companies/divisions to handle the UK and German VAT reporting separately.
We were left in a bit of a mess with our previous accountant.
HMRC will not play ball until this has been located and uploaded.
Plus, we are due back VAT on that previous return which hasn't been paid.
As of today (Monday 3pm), the status still says "Pending.
I don't understand why it hasn't been submitted or why it hasn't failed by now.
Sorry - this is a very basic query.
It’s the night before my 4th annual Vinnies CEO SLEEP OUT and I could REALLY do with your help!
You see I'm normally well organised and at this point of the game I would already have reached  my sponsorship goal, Regretfully this year I've been plagued with ill health over the past 8 weeks.
and my family have strongly requested that I don’t do the CEO Sleep.
But what I see  is that when you commit to such a worth while cause and knowing there are so many people living on the street with out food and shelter in the atrocious weather conditions we have been having that my own issues pail into insignificance.
Sincerely and with warmest regards ….
Background: Client paid for allied health consult in full.
We submitted client rebate request to Medicare - funds should be paid directly to client.
Medicare issued a cheque for refund to practitioner not client.
This increases the risk of accidently double paying!
What on earth?
If there is, could someone please tell me!
Help me to meet them.
Here is a fun one.
Some of our current employees are contributing cash in exchange for a perpetual percentage of that specific location's profits.
However, this is all contractual and they do not own actual shares of the whole company.
I look forward to your suggestions!
We had to shift through 9000 transactions going back to March 2013 to find the culprits.
Took nearly 60 hours of work to find and solve the problem.
Has anybody else noticed this or have any ideas to help me get to the bottom of this.
When charging a customer of ours for a product - We have applied a discount - Do we apply VAT after the discount or apply the VAT then discount?
"Hello,I have recently signed up to be a MYKI distributor of Public Transport passes in Victoria, Australia.
Hello everyone,Would appreciate some help on the issue I have outlined below.
We are a digital agency assisting businesses in advertising on Google Search, Facebook, Linkedin etc.
I look forward to your input and suggestions.
5% of the would be VAT figure that is removed from my revenue generation.
Please could you advise how we process a credit via expenses?
We are using the expense claim process as a way of managing our company credit card spends.
Is this the way I should be doing it?
I don't want to double up or not be allocating money correctly.
Which when we sell the old van, will be paid back!
Monthly payments to the finance company of &#163;313.
We are at the final stage to get it on App store and become a full partner.
So I guess this means any accruals we book in the month would have to get set up to auto-reverse the first day of the following month.
I own a portfolio of several properties which are mortgaged and provide rental income.
I want to track recognized (but not yet realized) capital gain (or loss) for each property on a yearly basis (or whenever a property is re-valued, or re-mortgaged).
In addition, I have not yet sold any properties, but will do so at some stage in the future - this will be realized capital gain (or loss).
Another example would be when to 'flip' a property to minimise capital gains tax.
Shall I do manual journal to reflect that?
So we are showing as a loss which is correct and fine.
I understand you can do this individually with each transaction but if you could do this in a similar fashion to the cash coding function that would be great!
So my VAT due is including the VAT that I havent even received yet and probably wont do for a couple of months (construction industry).
HelloCan someone advise me on how I should reconcile paypal payments?
Happy for replies.
Is it possible to restore the data backed up as on a particular day.
Is it possible to overwrite a data with the backed up data as if a particular date.
Though it may result in loss of recent changes made in the accounting.
I'm assuming it's going to be GST - 820 but wanted to confirm first.
Very simple and straight forward setup.
If I go to a Warehouse Club, for example and I later try to sort through the receipt to assign the items as necessary i. e. office supplies, office furniture, etc.
For example, I'd have Box of Copy Paper $27.
50 excluding Tax, then Box of Copy Paper $0.
Is there some other way to do it?
Google shows up 1 result in the whole work, which is a tweet from another book keeper to NAB, in which no light is shed.
The sum result of all these is 0.
I've checked thoroughly, it seems to be some sort of computer thing.
But how to reconcile these?
There are enough of them that to process each one as an overpayment and refund will take forever.
Is that OK?
I'm leaning towards assets, but then is this "Plant and Machinery"?
Is that correct?
We have accessed a program that pays 50% of wages for 6 months for one of our employees.
The grant isn't earned revenue, it's a subsidy so I don't think we want to show as revenue.
I'd rather show it as an offset to the wage expense.
I've had conflicting advice and have ended up doing it both ways.
there is a charge of 0.
$4 is the charge for using the system.
Each line on this PO is an item I will warehouse and re-sell later.
Also an option is "Cost of Goods Sold / 5000" under "expenses"?
Look forward to hearing from you!
I hope I can get some help here.
Here is my situation.
Because this is a Merchant Fee there is GST included as shown on the statement, so I've been manually changing the tax rate to .
Is this the correct way of doing it or do Merchant Fees generally fall under General Expenses (or something else for that matter)?
Has anyone else tried to do the same thing?
If anyone can offer a solution, I'd be grateful as I'm now starting to get confused about the best way to do this.
Could you help point me in the right direction?
We have two companies, company A and company B.
Can someone shed some lights on this.
I am currently trying to customise the P&L layout for a UK charity.
I am struggling however to get the P&L to show cash funds brought forward and carried forward.
Is there any way to get this to work automatically or will we have to export to Excel each month and manually adjust this.
Obviously this slows the invoicing process.
Does anyone have any ideas how to track company vehicle mileage on a day-to-day basis?
31 and a credit of $63.
I have processed Expense Claim for expenses paid by Owner out of other personal cash for year ending 2015.
The service would be subject to 20% VAT if sold in the UK.
The problem is that if I do this then my revenue and expenses will be artificially high and my profit loss will be more difficult to analyse, not to mention it would be all very messy.
The other two were incorrect.
One of the incorrect transactions was a check that was imported as a credit, not a debit.
The other was a direct deposit payroll transaction that was also imported as a credit and not a debit.
Only the sign is incorrect.
I logged in to on-line banking.
What should I code this to to reflect this?
The same goes for our suppliers however these vary.
Hence there is discrepancy of 1-2 days between dates of each record.
What would be the best practice to do this if we want to have least number of accounting entries?
He pays fees on his side.
The end goal is pretty simple.
Why does that not exist, or am I missing something?
All expenses incurred by us before the purchase date were taken off the overall purchase price.
Why is the tax default on No Tax.
All suggestions welcome and much appreciated!
I would appreciate some assistance on the best to set it up.
"If I remember correctly you were recognizing revenue as cash is collected?
If so I could have mentioned that we should book revenue as it is earned, with the debit to AR.
Then, when we do an aging of AR and book a reserve (bad debt expense) against the expected uncollected portion of AR.
Once we know we won't collect the AR them we write off the reserve and the AR (no PnL impact at that point).
It's not a bill, and it's not wages as such so shouldn't go through payroll.
We are now paying the debt collection agency off in chunks via private funds from the owner.
07 NZD at exchange rate of 0.
I would be grateful for a quick response.
This is the scenario.
I want to take the vehicle with me and want to put the vehicle in my name.
I hope I am being clear with my explaination.
After a bit of research I have found this bill has in fact been paid.
My VAT returns are prepared on a  cash basis.
Consequently, the VAT return is incorrect.
I'm at the understanding that this needs to be done as 'Owner A Drawings'.
Is that correct?
I also understand we have tax obligations and are not sure how to handle this.
I have been putting down all my work purchases as 710 - Office equipment.
Is this correct or should it be 310 cost of goods sold?
I also distributed one sample item to the designer of the denim Jacket.
Manual journal would not allow me to transfer the Cost of good to advertisement.
The other solution that come to my mind is to pass stock adjustment and transfer the cost to advertisement for items given away for photo shoots.
From what I can see, it can't be done.
Am I missing something or is the only way of removing the v. a. t. to do it manually?
That would mean writing it off.
Most of our vendors are paid on Net 30 terms, but some are paid via Credit Card (either automatically or manually) and some are paid via Check.
It's so different than QB.
We had a "wine dinner" where we sold tickets in advance and held the event on 04/06/2016.
As such these purchase orders are for services I on sell to the customer.
e. g. Eftpos for $500, I receive $499.
00I know its possible to do it somehow because pennypipe can do it with Stripe payments?
however that amount was paid by the other people.
however, if I do the latter then it will still show up in my accounting recordsAngus
This is due to things such as paypal exchange rate being different to the exchange rate I calculated when inputting the details into the PO etc.
So here's mu situation.
How do i record cash collections we receive from their customers which we now owe to the retailer?
As far as the dealers in my contacts, I have around 30.
Dealer 1, dealer 7, and dealer 13.
See a month summary and total of my salesHere's where it gets even more tricky.
So the total pre-tax is $853.
The tax is $53.
Would the goods have to be itemized via Proformas?
We paid a deposit to hire a van which was charged to our credit card.
A member of an LLC paid telephone bill using his personal credit card.
How can these bills be paid to reduce the liability and increase member equity.
I have an idea for doing it differently.
But I cannot figure out how to calculate or view the relationship.
Sometimes there will be multiple bills to a single client that are outstanding and the client will end up paying all of those bills at once with a single check.
I could have a lot of silly questions in the near future.
I'm setting up a restaurant in Dubai and we are close to opening.
Would it be a credit note?
Will it matter if I can't?
it is very tedious and my boss HATES it.
ie the costs to deliver the engagement are upping the operating expense so while the net profit is the same the Total Operating expenses do not reflect the true run rate.
Because these are overseas companies does that mean I can't claim GST on these subscriptions?
I take prepayments on jobs.
It's off by default.
We have two staff that mainly deal with clients in terms of the services that are required.
I check and approve them.
It's all getting a bit much and I slow down the process of invoicing and collections.
I guess I don't know how to let go of control without being worried that all hell will broke loose.
We are currently entering bills from overseas suppliers at the rate we have forward purchased foreign currency at.
I am thinking that, accounting for the forward purchased Foreign Currency may be a better way.
i. e. if the exchange rate changes, there would be a liability (the bill) and an asset (the forward purchased currency) both in the same currency and any fluctuations would balance each other out.
A few days later, the Creditor has received $ 2000 from the finance company.
However I am a little confused, the mileage goes in as an expense &#163;0.
45, which is fine.
The last conversion balance done was 30/4/13.
I received a bill from XYZ - booked under Bill $ 50002.
Our year end is March and each year I want to see what payables and receivables are due in April or May.
This is totally illogical when i am trying to forecast expenditure etcWhy put in an arbitrary block for a process that runs 365 days a year?
My brain hurts.
We are paying $50 per month and the interest is calculated on the statement the supplier sends at the end of each month.
I'm so close to converting!
My stumbling block I think is pretty simple.
Secondly, the unpaid expenses.
Converted over from QB.
During the conversion, I setup up conversion balances.
I purchased some equipment few years ago on a loan.
I have been paying off the loan each month.
I am not sure if did something wrong during the conversion process from QB or if the info in QB was incorrect.
I don't want to go edit the conversion balance and mess things up there.
Hey guys,I am self-employed (resident in Australia) and have a number of clients in the USA.
com for that day and generates an AUD value for it.
I have a small restaurant and at the end of each day we cash out the credit card tips from the cash drawer, pool them with the cash tips and distribute all the tips to the employees.
I have set up a ltd company and my and my wife are both directors.
My accountant takes care of the rti and payroll side of things.
In effect the company always owes me X.
But the the p&l sees two deductions one actual and one virtual.
Last month, we sold those Trademarks to another company, gain some profit.
Subject to Income tax, the gain of Intangible Asset" is nontaxable, therefore, how to make journal regard to this transaction.
We are trying work out the best way to manage loans between a number of businesses (not banks or finance companies).
However, the purchase date was entered as Oct. 2014 instead of Oct 2015.
Looking for your suggestions.
Is it software or accounting service?
POS systems: Software or professional service?
Zenpayroll monthly fee: software, professional service, or payroll admin fee?
Legal Shield Insurance: legal service, professional service, or subscription?
Paypal have given me a fixed amount, which included the fee, and it is paid back by them taking 10%of each daily settlement.
Is there an automatic process available?
If i have a tax element in the discount it calculates discount after tax instead of before tax.
Would it make any affect to the reports?
Not sure this is the right forum for this.
Work out the cash equivalent of the benefit (£720 per year).
84, liability a/c: Sundry Creditors, expense a/c: Staff training & welfare),  as benefits in kind are subject to Class 1A deductions.
This doesn’t deal with any of the special cases, though — e. g. if employees leave or the value of the benefit changes.
And when?
Is there an online copy as well?
54, a difference of Some $506.
I was sort of expecting them to be the same and sometimes historically they are, but I am a bit mystified by the difference.
I put it through as GST free income.
I then went to my clients file and crated a credit note - this credit note tax rate was GST on income.
I have several fixed assets, including tangibles (computer equipment) and intangibles (IP).
How to I manually enter depreciation and amortisation?
Do I have to do the following:1.
My questions are:1.
Will this keep my books accurate?
Have I missed anything?
We buy our products in bulk.
It would be easy to measure the quantities of products used to actually assign the real quantities to the project.
Enter line for -1.
Create credit note for 1.
Same as above but with negative credit note.
Problem is, can't have a negative credit note, makes no sense.
I really don't know how to treat that.
I have tried using expense claims.
I am running into an issue on tracking consumables.
For instance, I go to the field and perform oil change services.
I keep supplies on hand such as brake clean, WD40, box of rags, window wash, ect ect.
My customer only wants to see one line item for the service and doesn't want to be nickle and dimed with supplies.
So I have to consider those supplies as a necessary expense to perform the service and the amount I charge the customer will cover the misc costs of supplies.
This won't allow me to track an accurate inventory of how many cans of WD40 or rags I have on hand, but that's not an issue because consumables are expected to be consumed and replenished when low.
can't reconcile it at all.
The Help screen at  says "A locked tax rate has a padlock icon next to it in the list of tax rates.
You can still edit it according to the editing rules that follow. "
This has left our first period as 1st Sept 2015 to 29th Feb 2016 (6 months).
Pointers to useful info I couldn't find or words of advice would be much appreciated.
Help center is very overwhelming.
When i process a transaction in PayPal Here, once authorised, will it give me a transaction number?
Hello, Does car insurance get coded under "insurances" or "motor vehicle expenses"?
I click on make a note, enter the details and click save.
Is it something I'm doing wrong or am I doing in the wrong place?
$30 to $50 a month and may go on for years.
This would keep track of the amount owing.
We don't issue receipts for payments immediately (we are a preschool -- take tuition and issue a receipt 2x per year for tax purposes -- parents lose them otherwise).
I do not want to print 6 pieces of paper for every child.
So we are an IT Company.
We are looking for an app / 3rd Party App that will allow us to track customers job's / Enable Job Card per Machine.
Hello-From reviewing prior questions and comments, seems that credit cards and transfers cause lots of confusion.
I have noticed that the cc has a large balance outstanding.
So this is a problem on the cc side alone.
Obviously this would not be the case since this was an internal transfer.
The problem I'm having is the card is showing a positive balance due to these rebates that come in the form of a statement credit.
* Law firm accepts payments on behalf of their client from people who owe them money.
For example.
Client A is owed money by person A.
Law firm will take the money and send it to the Client A.
Law Firm is not quite sure if they want to show it up on their own reports since its not their income or expense.
Is this the right way to go with this or can you recommend another solution.
Ok, so I may have this completely wrong so please help me if something I say is wrong which may help where I am stuffing up!
Please help, this is driving me crazy!
We are using Ush - which is approx 3400/= to the USD$.
As a result we keep needing to calculate wand work with decimal rates (ie 0.
000294117) - which means the home currency reflection is always slightly out.
This would remove the spreadsheet we have to keep to properly code and then match to the combined deposit for that day.
Really hope someone can help, point me in the right direction or otherwise advise.
Bit of a long shot this one.
Please note this is accrual accounting, therefore at the quarter end my VAT liability should equal my TB.
They have never been on cash accounting.
Is that correct ?
For example, I might charge a $1 CAD Service Fee.
Naturally, there may have been hundreds of $1 service fees dispersed over a month, with varying exchange rates for each transaction.
My dilemma is that I have hundreds of individual disbursements, and have to manually create a bill for them with each line item.
Is it possible to create a bill from the output of a disbursement file, if I was to export and filter to Excel all outstanding disbursements?
The purchase price is 76,000.
HiI am converting a significant client over from SAGE and have a large number of debtor and creditor balances (in multiple currencies) to import.
How am I best to deal with these within the conversion balance module?
For example, should I import these lines as a dummy credits?
If so, to which nominal?
This is a great feature as he can make an appropriate selection on screen while invoicing.
I transferred over from MYOB.
This has resulted in me issuing quotes that didn't have the correct GST.
including Sage Pastel Evolution?
There have been other disposals and journals created during the course of the year, and repeating the disposal of these assets is not an option.
This was not a problem prior to the November 2015 improvements.
I am inclined to think that a fix needs to be created.
I put in the balances from the trial balance (from the start of our accounting, not a YTD value) as of Dec 31st 14 and Aug 31st 15For balance sheet items it is treated as expected, let's say you have 2000 in assets at 31 Dec 14, and 5000 in assets at 31 Aug 2015, you put 2000 in the conversion for Dec 2014 and 5000 at Aug 15, and the balance sheet reflects the correct amounts.
For P&L items however, it treats the conversion amount as a YTD figure.
Has anyone else had this problem or is this somehow the intended behaviour?
Have a good one,Phil
I have been having problems with a CBA credit card feed for one of my clients for quite a while and finally thought I should make sure I haven't done anything wrong.
The reason it doesn't it that there are a number of transactions that don't appear on that statement and are actually on the following months statement.
Is anyone else having this problem, or does anyone know how to resolve this without having to also perform a manual reconciliation to check the balance is correct?
Is that appropriate?
We have several customers that are registered charities.
Some tell us that they are exempt from being charged VAT on recruitment advertising.
Am I right in thinking they will have registered with HMRC in a special way if that is the case and that we should ask for some proof of this status?
Straight after the purchase, the client requested to cancel the order and therefore refund the money.
I had processed the cancellation of the order from ebay and PayPal refund was taken care of automatically.
We manufacture products and there is often some design expenses including samples being ordered and shipped to us.
With regards to fixed assets depreciation methods, what is the difference between Diminishing Value  and Diminishing value (200%).
My question is, is it necessary to always split out the transaction fees?
Does it really matter?
I've entered the conversion balances including AP.
They receive deposits this financial period for tours which happen next year.
Currently we process this deposit as an overpayment.
This overpayment shows in my A/R as a credit.
I recently did a few local markets and needed to take some cash for a float.
I'm trying to work out the best way to reconcile the withdrawal and want to keep it simple!
Apologies if this has been asked umpteen times before but have searched I promise!
The customers paid through Paypal.
I have what I think is a bit of an unusual situation.
I want to have both tracked and untracked inventory which isn't all that unusual.
But I want to deal with my untracked inventory in a unique way (I think).
Every year I purchase X dollars of inventory.
By the end of the year I complete the movement of all items to tracked inventory.
Any remaining funds in Unallocated Inventory are eliminated by a charge to COGS (since those were obviously items that I sold during the year).
I think that is legitimate but it only provides me a full profit/loss picture on an annual basis.
As far as I can tell this is not currently possible.
Is that correct?
Alternatively I don't see any way to make an item tracked unless I know exactly how many of them I have.
The best thing I can think of is to estimate the quantity of all of the items and then adjust them all once I complete the full inventory.
Not had anything since 3rd Jan, but lots of txns showing on the PayPal website  :-(---
I usually set aside 30% of profit for tax (GST and company tax).
Has anyone found a way to do a summary GST return rather than the detailed version it runs?
Background: I'm using tracked inventory items and average purchase price for costing.
As expected I see the COGS expense increase by $10 and decrease in available inventory by $10.
Now I purchase two more items @ $19/ea, average cost should now be $16/ea (one @ $10, two at $19, total is $48, divided by 3 is $16/ea).
Quantity in stock is 3.
Finally, the customer returns the item.
Quantity goes up to 4 but the average price remains at $16/ea, so now the value of the inventory is $64 where I only paid $58 for it.
It also means my COGS expense is $6 too low.
But I sell roasted coffee in 3 different sizes.
How does one enter green coffee inventory (say 150lbs) that is then in various unit sizes?
I purchased some supplies for $100 and paid tax of $8.
HiThis question applies to Australia.
Purchasing Inventory from overseas involves 3PL costs, Customs Duties, and many disbursements for importing.
The inventory costs more that $1,000 so Customs Duties and GST apply.
When I went to set up grouping and I cannot as there are not transactions as yet - we are commencing 1 Jan.
I cannot find a rounding option in the reports optionsThanks for any suggestionsXero Newbie
This has worked well until now, but we've noticed an issue.
However, the cost of the supplies is not very significant.
Is there a faster way?
As its still so young I haven’t got an accountant yet so thought I’d post the question here to see if someone could help me.
It’s my understanding that the rental equipment is a Fixed Asset as they should last minimum 3-5 years depending on the machine.
Then I have accessories that are hired out with the equipment such as a popcorn scoop, popcorn spice shakers, the candyfloss containers, etc.
These we do not charge for as they are returned after every rental (they’re also cheap and not meant to last too long).
Then I have stock that I have to buy that comes with the package of renting out a Popcorn machine such as popcorn kernels and the spices.
My gross profit from the rental is R400.
Is this the correct way of doing it or is the machine also meant to be allocated as cost of goods sold?
My gross profit is now –R4600.
Then I guess once the machine is paid off it will begin to reflect as a profit?
The problem is that Paypal then adds 20% VAT again.
I don't want to recognize $4000 expense on Jan 1, but rather $500 per week for Jan and Feb.
Now, I have this issue: 1.
I have both the $1,000 and $970.
70 is the real amount I gained.
HiI have built up funds in my Paypal acnt and now want to withdraw them.
and   bother share the exact same expenses, payroll etc.
I note the main issues seem to be with the balance sheet in terms of earnings and retained earnings.
For example, running a BS for the calendar year shows earnings for the period April - December and retained earnings for 31 March.
Will changing the financial year end date work to run the calendar year reports and then change back to NZ settings?
Will this cause any issues with reporting in the future?
I recently posted a inventory revaluation transaction to wrap up freight and duty into the unit cost.
However I accidentally posted it to a different month than the month I posted the Freight and Duty.
Rather than showing that the transaction was a wash (netting out to zero), it now shows the huge swings of expense between the two months.
So If I made 30% sale of Import goods in the same month, so My Profit will be (Sale - Cost of Goods Sold- Landing Cost - Import Duty).
: There is more that 1000 products in single Import Purchase.
We are a on Cash Basis scheme and all the money was received during the VAT period.
So for my ecommerce store, I have a points reward program.
Entering comparative P&L items is straight forward but I cannot see an easy way to enter the B/S figures at the end of each month in the previous year.
Here is our situation:We often put our products on consignment at department stores (for reference, we make watches).
Cost of goods sold does not quite make sense from an accounting perspective when paying out commissions for example.
I want to implement practice manager in my practice .
i want to know exactly where and how i should start .
eg  data gathering,staff alignment , work set up etc anything to aid me off to a good start for implementation.
I overpaid VAT last quarter and want to adjust this quarters VAT amount to reduce the amount due by the amount overpaid last month.
Have had a look at Manual Journals but not sure what to do as it didn't reduce the VAT due (must not be doing something right).
Also I tried adding in a purchase but it wouldn't allow a VAT amount due with a -ve value.
Please can this be a feature considered and voted for?
One issue though is that the from email address is "invoicereminders@post.
com"  this is causing problems with some customers as it is not from our company.
I appreciate the reply to is as with the email settings but i can see no way to change the from addressor am i being thick?
However the inventory change won't.
At the moment it is skewed because it shows a massive amount going in and out which isn't reality.
(PS- I know that "sortable" is not a word.
I am confused about where to enter my true COGS.
I purchased 10 of item A for $1.
00 each and 5 of item B for $1.
66 to the cost of each item to get my true COGS.
I would REALLY appreciate it!
I have a client who accepts a lot of deposits for work to be performed at a later date.
This is making it so the actual revenue isn't being accounted for in the period earned.
Two Step Authorisation should also be available for Practice Manager as there is a very large amount of personal and sensitive data.
I've read all the help docs for converting and everything is pretty clear and straightforward.
and they are all pretty self-explanatory.
Is there something above and beyond what's listed in the help docs that any of these accountants or programs are doing that is not already detailed in the help docs?
Some additional "cleaning" that needs to be done prior to conversion and is going to make things easier going forward?
Trying to eliminate all paper related to bookkeeping.
I sell a number of items which are vatable, reduced vat, and non-vatable, so the best thing for me to do is the VAT Apportionment Scheme, which essentially takes averages.
Do I put ever sale as no VAT, and then calculate it at the end of the period?
In short the amount calculated re G20 (GST on Purchases) ignores GST free and organisations not registered for GST.
The calculation is simply =IF(ISERROR(C27/11),"",C27/11) Which means that all purchases recorded at G11 for the purposes of this calculation attract GST - which is incorrect.
The help page (https://help.
I recently made some changes to my insurance policy which resulted in a refund.
Situation: An NFP company with a head office and state/territory branches, each with a tracked budget.
They are mainly sterling companies but have a few transactions in Euros.
I want to bring in the last 24 months of data?
Or will it only give me the overall figure?
We are distributors for certain stock.
At the end of each day I receive a consolidated amount from my merchant.
I was wondering if someone could offer up a solution for an issue I have.
My company sells products to dealers (retailers).
These dealers send us a PO when they want to buy products from us.
Sometimes when we get a PO, it may be a week or so until we actually ship the order.
Upon shipping is when we bill them.
Password hasn't changed, tried disconnecting and reconnecting.
Has anyone else had this issue in the last few days?
Apologies in advance - this must have been asked before, but I couldn't find anything when searching.
These projects will have associated costs.
However it may be several months before we are billed for those costs.
That way we would not be doctoring P&L figures from earlier periods and re-reporting internally.
Hello Experts,My base currency should have three digits after decimal points.
and the fields seem to overlay each other.
I have current expenses against future revenue.
I feel kind of thick, but I can't see how to do that.
Receive $2,000 as commission advance from company ABC.
I'm wondering how I should record something for a "comp" item.
Example:I sell directly to dealers who resell my items.
I have almost depleted it by drawing credit notes against it and can't work out if or how I can load it again.
First post here.
Entered the same bill twice.
Paid the bill from both companies - very naughty.
Reconciled both the payments - silly.
It really never happened in that company anyway.
As it stands, the product is unfit for purpose for anyone who sells outside the UK.
txt file for import.
I have finished the COA for UK incorporated, and I am in the process of finalising the COA's for non-incorporated (VAT reg.
My client uses worldfirst to do money transfer from Euro to GBP.
The client is an Amazon seller sells in most of the EU countries & the money then be transferred from Amazon FR, Amazon DE et c. to world first.
BAS: Capital Purchases show as $0What have I done wrong?
I have a client who has come on board with a financial year end of 31-July and a VAT quarter year-end of 30-Jun.
I'm a game developer, and have my product listed on a distribution portal.
The accountant no longer works with me so i'm trying to do it myself.
They appear to be due to rounding as there are no back dated or unfiled transactions.
I've tried recording adjustments & changing the filed amounts.
As the total is only a few dollars I'm not too concerned.
but in reality i received on 25th sept. Am i doing anything wrong?
how to work around with this situation
I hope that is enough detail.
Our year ends on 30 June and we're happy that our transaction figures and reconciliation are accurate.
Go to Dashboard2.
Is it possible to do any of the following:Can you import into this area from excel?
Can you copy and paste from excel?
My reason is that I am creating some payments that have about 200 lines.
I realise that once it has been created once, then it will remember it next month.
One for all my GST inc suppliers and one for all my GST ex suppliers?
I hope this proves to be a dumb question!
Currently, a director deposit "approval" has to be initiated every two weeks by our administrator.
We realize that in it's current form it offers heighten security.
I've set the conversion date to the start of the financial year (1 July in Australia).
Wine equalisation tax (WET) is a tax on wine consumed in Australia.
It is based on the value of the wine and generally applies to the last wholesale sale (usually between the wholesaler and the retailer), although it may apply in other circumstances.
We work in three currencies.
It was a trivial discrepancy, but irksome.
com on 31 Mar 2015Note the small difference between 0.
673541 and 0.
Should I make an expense claim to myself and treat it as Owner Funds Introduced?
This quantity would be used to track numbers sold for updating a livestock schedule for example.
MYOB did it years ago and was very useful for farming businesses.
This is due to strengthening of the USD against SGD during the 2 dates.
- How to resolve this?
nothing quite answers it.
Im sure this is very simple.
would really appreciate someone clearing it up for me.
I don't have one currently.
trying to figure out how we can receive rented dvds back into the system without refunding a customer of $0
I dont see why we cant process it as I have suggested.
Am I not doing something right here?
We prepay shipping cost and recover it from the buyers later.
Freight-out expense                                                  8However, it is not right.
The file size is not a correct multiple of the record length.
The lodgement is due tomorrow, so this matter is very urgent.
I have a 3 year fully amortizing loan at a 15% rate of interest.
I have been making payments against it but the balance of the bill keeps increasing.
Alternatively I can set each of us up as a company contact and tie every Owner Draw and Owner Contribution transaction to the appropriate contact.
Is one better than the other?
I understand that tax and book depreciation can differ.
Let's say I change my tax accountant some day, how will he or she know how much has already been depreciated from a tax perspective?
HiI'm guessing that this is a slightly unusual request.
Here's my problem:I've had various web dev/programming contractors working for me over the years doing work for my clients.
Do you have any advice on the best way to go about that?
If that's possible, do you think that would be OK to do?
i. e. : end of year income and expenses statements that get emailed to me.
Hello,As of 6/8/15 we became a company.
•	Gain on sale?
This would usually be done as a transfer but I can't seem to allocate the £30 drawn as a transfer and the £1.
I received a partial refund on car hire insurance I paid for.
Is this where the credit notes come into it?
The figures.
58Paypal had credit of £45.
For example.
So the figure we then receive is £95.
This plays havoc with cash flow and results in some fairly terse discussions with our suppliers.
So my questions are:1.
I have a client that has an extremely large number of transactions through PayPal on a daily basis.
Has anybody had this issue or know how to fix?
The questions are1.
Is this the right way of recording the transactions?
I have a client that has started using tracking, if there a way to ensure that every single transaction has a tracking code applied to it?
They receive deposits in this financial period for tours which happen in the next financial period.
We have bought a office safe and paid for installing it.
My question is 1.
Will the installation cost be coded under Repair and Maintenance ?
However because of my start date it wont let me dispose of them at 31st March 2015 as it's before my fixed assets start date.
Transaction 1 (e. g. on Day X):Buy a £100 gift card for £90Transaction 2 (e. g. on Day Y):Buy inventory worth £100 (= £83.
i made an entry for the deposit paid.
I have been waiting for a week.
But it has not come through.
Can you please advise me what I'm supposed to do.
Would it be 970 Funds Introduced?
My company takes advantage of the flat rate VAT scheme.
This scheme allows you to claim back the VAT on capital purchases of £2000+.
An option to set the default length of reports or,2.
I recorded the charge but know that I had it refunded.
So I then went to make a debit memo under purchasing.
When I searched for a match I could not find it.
I have the POSTAL ADDRESS as my Registered Office (as instructed) and the PHYSICAL ADDRESS as my office address.
This is confusing me as there are codes which aren't necessary.
I have a private Credit Card for occasional overseas purchases because it has no international transaction fees and a good conversion rate.
I've nearly got everything setup after converting from QuickBooks.
However I have three problems, I think two of which are related to having put money into "Undeposited Funds" in QuickBooks.
Should I unreconcile these amounts and change them to transfers or is there another way to solve this?
I'm wondering how I should handle invoicing them / accounting for their payments.
For example, we transferred US$22,471.
91 or PHP1,000,000.
We entered it as is in the transfer money window.
To make things more interesting, we are currently using JPY as our home/functional currency.
The exchange rate (PHP to JPY) that we used was 0.
I want to make sure I'm getting it right.
I'm redirected to https://invoicesettings/InvoiceSettings.
As it stands, I'm paying the bill using owner's draw, and then making a journal entry to slide that amount over to owner's equity.
Is there a better/more-standard way of doing this?
Should it be 826 - NIC Payable?
I'm confused because it states that this is is the proportion due to be paid.
We will convert up to 10 of your customers for FREE.
com and PayPal.
I'll appreciate any suggestions or tips from the community.
Also have this as the standard rather than changing for every client?
I may have selected the wrong date as I am only seeing transactions starting from 1st July 2015.
Is there another way?
We cannot undo it and therefore can no longer access them.
Or is there a better way?
com) have an escrow service for fixed-price contracts.
So, when you're hiring someone you transfer money to upwork.
com when the contract starts, and release it on completion.
I could sit and look at the screen and enter them in a spreadsheet, but that is not the solution I'm looking for.
Your help /advice is much appreciated.
Should i enter these all as expense claims and if i do that does that automatically transfer them into my expenses for tax reports?
60 worth of services.
That same supplier is buying 2,160.
48 worth of services from me.
Do i put in the cost price as usual.
as i have sold the items as a bulk buy to the company.
Because this will directly effect our margin by the end of financial year.
Are there specific Month End or Year End programs I have to run to close off a month or year?
Does anyone in the UK have expertise on this?
I uploaded a CSV file with the latest transactions.
Any attempts to search for the transactions in the reconciliation screen by amount or name also fails to bring the transactions up.
Is it possible to amend the fields to show it in this form?
I relied on the class system in Quickbooks as I run a number of events.
Say for example, £100 is withdrawn and there is a £1.
There's the same question here:https://community.
The customer later cancelled the order before paying the second half and the $2,500 was refunded back to the customer.
I have a few question:1.
I am looking for an easy way to build purchase orders.
of the year.
These categories all have unique Asset GL codes (and Accum Depreciation).
3 categories are missing and I cannot work out why this is the case as all fixed assets are set up correctly.
I've found info on this but it all seems to be for accrual accounting.
Does anyone know if i can auto pass transactions that have matched my rules, instead of manually clicking OK on every line?
The part that I'm really having trouble with is the reconciliation.
I'm becoming increasingly frustrated, so any help from the Community would be very much appreciated!
I want to go back and create a bill for each one and then mark it paid with the already existing check.
Having made extensive investigation on this topic, I am non the wiser.
My predecessor however used the day rate set by XE even though we purchase Euro's on a monthly basis.
Is anyone else having problems at the moment?
I know legally it might not be essential but it's almost a courtesy to whomever has to handle the paperwork.
I would be grateful if someone could assist me deal with a peculiar situation on inventory.
My client rents out warehouse space to his clients.
I have now received a card statement and everything matches up perfectly.
The Cash revenue doesn't appear to be as easy.
(I know youre mean to stay to &#163;10k?
I have found it in reports > liabilities.
Is that whats best to do?
Currently we collect Qtrly fees from the families.
I've gone around in circles trying different methods gleaned from this group and support.
Which I'm not sure how to do with Tracking.
I can't claim to be an accounting expert, but surely it's better to have the numeric value rather than the percentage on each line?
I'd say this is a very recent development.
Is it possible to track inventory where the purchase and sale quantities are different?
I purchase items at 17m2-25m2 (depends on item) lots at a set price, but sell them per 1m2.
except for one problem.
So onto the question!
We are looking to purchase a Tesla eletric car as a company car since the UK tax treatment makes it incredibly beneifical to buy this as a company car.
The car is roughly worth 80,000 headline price with structure of the lease payments / despoit is as follows:24,000 up front payment950 (approx) per month for 6 years @ 5.
I sent an email about this to support, but I haven't heard back yet.
Maybe someone here can help me?
however it won't let me.
I frequently make deposits consisting of multiple checks.
I know I can manually group them during the reconciliation process but that can be very tedious if I have 15 or 20 deposits each consisting of 5-20 checks during the month.
We run a small online food store.
Many of our customers have store credit with us, whether it was from a marketing campaign (free credit giveaway), refunding to unsatisfied customers or bulk buying discount.
Would any of the following options work?
but that doesn't seem to make sense as it is not a direct cost.
Problem is that we don't want to record all the store credit that we gave away since only a fraction of customers would actually redeem it.
so we simply receive less revenue?
I have a balance that is incorrect, even after going through and checking all of the transactions, so I wanting to check the running balance to see where it was going wrong - I went to reports to do this.
Here is the scenario.
and we get part payments for stays.
I cannot adjust the fee.
adjust the value.
and then re-reconcile.
and to complicate matters.
eg:  ($100)  means customer is $100 in credit.
I require the ability to print a list of customer receipts.
The spreadsheet opens, eventually, with a load of rubbish symbols.
Looking for some accounting help.
I cannot manually adjust the balance to zero.
This has been going on for a few days now.
eWay provides transaction and settlement reports (CSV and Excel).
eWay provides transaction reports, covering all the payments passed to MEMNET, and settlement reports, with the entries dated by settlement date.
Is there anything out there that does this?
My gut says no.
If I owe $2500 to the credit card, do I want that liabilities line to say (2,500.
The problem is its one transaction not 2.
I have a tracking category entitled "Properties", Each entry being a property.
Each is entitled (with COA number)900 - "Property 1 Mortgage", 902 - "Property 2 Mortgage",904 - "Property 3 Mortgage", etc etc.
I have seen the "Rental Guide" (https://help.
I cannot associate it with my set up.
Getting a little disheartened mainly due my lack of knowledge and understanding of the subject matter.
Do I enter the whole bill in as a purchase, keep the unit price as the total bill, and unit as 0.
5 for private?
can I make it a custom size?
I want to see current drawing in liabilities ( owner drawings) it comes up with a figure that adds a carry over figure from last financial year.
Is there a compliance issue here?
I'm keen to get your thoughts
the customer Paid a Deposit of US$250 leaving US$ 750 outstanding.
Surely there must be a way of doing this.
The issue is simple.
For some reason, remittance advices default to "no branding" and it is necessary to have to remember to choose a drop down to get them branded.
For.
Is.
We have clients entering details of transactions in the discuss tab.
We note you can see the narration by clicking through to the source transaction but this is an inefficient process so looking for a solution!
My understanding of the Edit Bill page is that we don't put the asset numbers there but they're given automatically by the system.
Is there a way of doing this I am not aware of.
I am trying to put some travel receipts (taxis, etc) into the mobile app.
Im trying to correct an erroneous inventory amount done by an outside contractor, but it wont allow me to run a MJ to offset against the inventory lines - is there a workaround for this, or is it a broken feature?
The inventory lines will not be used, but are locked with a Cr balance.
The batch data looked good but we received a CSV file as output.
My client pays artists on a quarterly basis.
Sometimes, the artist owes money to the company so a check isn't generated.
In QB, we would write the check and if there was a negative amount, we would write a line adjustment on the check making it a $0 balance, so there wasn't a financial impact.
How can I track what is owed?
However to make matters worse, they are not recorded as a supplier or a customer but appear in my overall contacts (so what are they?
I converted my books from Quickbooks.
I tried following the steps if the two balances don't match, but nothing has worked.
#2 - Reconciliation seems to encompass much more than I'm used to.
To me a reconciliation is when you match all your entered transactions with an end of month statement to make sure you have entered everything correctly.
This is because their income is higher than previous.
The tax will catch up but unlikely for a few years.
Where they shoudl allow for $45,000 a quarter.
But unless i take up the $25K shortfall his budget expenses are understated.
Charities are zero rated for VAT afaik.
The answer to this may already be posted, but I don't know enough of the lingo to search for it.
If not, ask me for missing details.
How to I mark this transaction?
I bought an expensive item and entered it as a Fixed Asset(computer equipment) with VAT.
The item was faulty and it went back, the supplier refunded all my money (including the VAT).
Grateful for your help.
I wonder if this will be easy to answer.
Where did the $50,000 come from?
I think Black seems to be mostly for expense claims , but not always and Green is  normal Am i right ?
One of the people paying &#163;15 then asked for a refund.
I have sent them their &#163;15 cheque and they have now cashed it.
I now have two figures to reconcile i. e. the original &#163;75 credit and the &#163;15 debit.
This relates to wages etc.
2014 and it should have been £6929.
Now this has totally messed up my Fixed Assets.
Surely I am doing something wrong!
Our team enter their expenses using the iPhone app.
It also takes for ever to process.
i have balances the conversion journal in setting/conv balances/ it all balances.
We have these backdating over 2 financial years and lots of VAT returns.
These seem to be getting later and later in day.
I then write them a check for that portion.
So if it comes in i have to show it going out.
I've tried importing an empty statement, but that doesn't work.
00 amount transaction line, but that doesn't work either.
01 transaction and an offsetting -0.
In Wave we make this manually through journal transactions.
This for bringing 100 units of Product A.
Example: Inventory appears for $100.
And for each Product A sold only $1 of cost of goods.
However, I have already paid the VAT I charged them to HMRC.
Hence the BAS is only picking up the GST from the month of March and not the conversion data from Jan and Feb.
Does anyone have had the same problem or would know why this would be?
When trying to open a discussion I am receiving the following error:"There was an error formatting your discussion.
Hello,We've recently joined the flat rate scheme for VAT.
I sell on ebay and a website.
I live in the US.
I have purchased some items through Dell which I am going to be selling to a customer (along with service charges).
They are one-off purchases and I have added them to untracked inventory.
And vice vera with bills etc.
I had a question.
I try to create a rule, but it makes me give a contact name for every little transaction.
They all assumed I already knew what it was.
Did a reconcile and choose "publish" but I have no idea what it even did.
on a plus note this is the last day of my financial year - the books are almost up to date and ready to go to the accountant.
We purchase blank t-shirts, print on them ourselves and then sell them.
I am missing the part where the printing happens.
Shirt printed on.
Or the date is was paid.
The one I set up with a beginning balance is still on the books and I am trying to get rid of it and it's balance.
Even if I archive it, it still reports on my balance sheet with the old balance.
The entry I wanted had already been reconciled and it left me with a -&#163;18 figure to complete the action.
I have had 4 customers who started dance classes with us and paid their fees in full.
Now they are not continuing so I have had to refund them their fees and registration either in full (1 customer) or as a partial refund (3 customers).
I have a consulting company that only recently started allowing payments via credit card.
We are currently reconciling past transactions and transfers.
Your advise is appreciated
"I have done everything to make sure the CSV is compatible.
The dates are changed to the correct format DD/MM/YY, i deleted empty columns and rows, but the problem persists.
I have a client who has a limited company (4 years trading).
06The customer paid 5 payments of:1500150015001500912.
I can't code it to import VAT as this will mess up the VAT return calculation for this month.
( we do a monthly return) And likewise if I update if for next month will it show up on the vat return calculation even if we paid for it during the last return period?
I'm struggling to figure out how it is set up as currently, the information is incorrect.
Hello,I have an accountant who wants me to post a G/L of 755 (left column).
I usually post these transactions directly to an "Accrued Income" code.
Has anybody ideas as to how I best process these transactions?
I'm assuming that this will require the setting up of some pre-payments but I'm not 100% sure onthe process.
That computer had a part break and I had to replace that part.
The claim itself is then a liability until it is paid.
What do I do at that point, since I do not want any real money to move.
In case this changes anything, one of these expenses was the purchase of a vehicle, which I expensed against a fixed asset column I created.
Is this as simple as creating a bill?
Currently my Income Statement is reporting on an Accrual Basis.
Obviously this was paid with my personal money.
My opinion is that the ICA should reflect all past due amounts so I reconcile to it sorted on effective date - which is the date the liability was incurred/due not the date it was lodged.
We are a wedding/event styling company and we try to sponsor a few events a year for charity.
What can be the reason for it?
So far I have tried setting up these suppliers as separate liabilities.
Is there a much better way of doing this than my hatchet job?
Non-deductible categories such as Estimated Tax Payments or Health Insurance Payments - those aren't considered deductible in tax returns but I'd still love to keep track of those categories.
I know with this paperwork I can not submit for a VAT refund, that is fine.
I know I can not reclaim VAT on items where I don't have the paperwork.
Added all my notes to my financial statements, Saved as a draft and when re-opened an hours worth of work had disappeared.
Surely, these shouldn't even be mentioned wherever VAT is concerned?
All I find a Purchase interface which provides a screen to enter bill.
I find it confusing to enter item, description, and qty.
Message received for cheque received from Canada and is it any job related matters to convert or transfer requirement in trial period?
One of the Items I sell is a membership.
this allows me to budget expenses based on each membership.
I have a predefined amount for everything.
Hey guys,We have purchased multiple hardware parts which we have used to build a larger asset.
Currently, each purchased part has been coded as an individual asset on our FA register which is of too smaller value to bother keeping an eye on.
Ultimately, we want to merge each of the parts together to form one, more valuable asset which we can then depreciate more succinctly (and un-clog our FA list).
We seemed to muddle throughExcept my client has run a P&L (which of course she needs ASAP) and discovered that it appears that the conversion adjustment (? )
Now because I didn't enter the balances I'm a bit at a loss of where to start looking figure out why it would end up there?
It only says ''the templates have been designed specifically for practices in Australia''.
I currently try to avoid holding too much stock and only order when I receive a PO from a client.
This is normally after I have provided the client with a quote.
I then convert the quote to POs on different suppliers.
I'll explain more on what I've done:The Surface pro 3/keyboard and care plan comes to a total of &#163;1037.
So Curry's/PC World break the discount down into percentages of each item.
53 on it as well.
96 on the day (over and above my gift cards) which consisted of &#163;14.
95 towards over equipment cost and &#163;10.
01 towards the care plan (insurance).
I can obviously give the asset a higher cost in the asset register than I actually paid for it but wasn't sure about this for tax purposes, etc.
I have found similar subjects to this but nothing addresses my issue exactly.
We take a $1,000 security deposit from every client.
After the cruise we refund the money.
I have a few issues with this.
At present we raise a bill for each refund, and then process the refund.
If $1,000 went into 811, then $1,000 comes back out of 811 and our balance sheet shows the correct total held.
When someone part pays and then cancels and we have to refund.
Maybe this seems obvious, but I'm not sure exactly how to go about it.
It's really more for me to keep track of how to spend my money.
really depressed and hope someone could help?
This can apply to both my own home (not tax deductible) and the investment property (deductible).
Any thoughts on the best (even right! )
Registration fee, andMotor vehicle taxI searched that motor vehicle regisration fee is GST free,Does is mean the motor vehicle tax attracts GST?
I am quite confuse on the terms.
It gets uploaded into the third party system.
I may have to do some reformatting in a CSV file, this this should be okay, as long as I can facilitate the existing automation process.
Can anyone please suggest how I could get the stock purchases to show up in item 7?
Or else share details about how they record similar purchases?
Hardly important, but it's rather triggered my OCD.
way of doing this?
I have started using a Direct Debit agency who collect payments from a number of my clients.
I have a couple of inventory items, one of which I want to writeoff.
Second, I want to donate inventory to charity.
However, last week I banked £100 less to top up my petty cash.
I have set up petty cash as described here: https://help.
We've been only using the Westpac one and the PayPal hasn't been used.
My product typically sells for &#163;35.
61 (which has 20% VAT) or should I import one as &#163;35 sale (with 20% VAT included) and &#163;1.
What started as a rough record keeping of income/expenses/fixed assets in the most basic of spreadsheets has continued until this day.
It's a badly organized mess if I'm honest.
for Example:Item1 purchase to my supplier 20 pcs @ 1000 each and I'm going to sell for 1200 each.
SOLD from costumer 2 PCS.
They purchase stock based on the Customer orders they receive.
Its also have central kitchen which supplied most the raw material to each restaurants.
We want to know the PL for each branches and consolidation with the central kitchen.
I have never received a response to either of these questions.
To say I am frustrated with a cheerful email response of them being aware of the issue and it being worked on is an understatement.
This response does not answer my question.
We often have backorders in our online store that won't be filled for 6 weeks.
Can these transactions be exported and re-imported as a bill?
We have a loan that we have received the funds for over the course of the year.
The balance is off due to a few fees that were rolled into the loan.
Or perhaps I am not asking the question properly.
I have a basic accounting question.
Example:The property management fee, let's say is $50 for all.
I have two customers which are sister companies.
This causes them a bit of confusion and worry.
I obtain inventory from jobs at no cost.
Howdy, I run multiple projects and for each project I collect items (inventory) and assign it to a project (tracking code).
Is the any other way to enter them via import?
I'm not sure how to model that in an accounting system, though.
I imagine there are several ways to make this work out, but I'm going in circles trying to work it out.
We run a small family camp.
We have a number of cabin reservations that were pre-reserved with deposits.
Herein lies the dilema.
Going back and removing and reconciling these transactions will be a nightmare as they were not entered with the intention of splitting and some were grouped up as daily deposits.
Good Day,Hoping someone can give me a little help on this.
Should this company be issuing me some kind of tax forms for 2014?
Some transactions are showing up 4 times on the same date.
As background service is a separate application and will not have same session and access token.
Both are shown on the same bill.
I am seeking advice for the treatment of these credit bills.
We have several clients set up with Bill.
We also have encountered a situation in which a client of ours paid a contractor for tenant improvements.
Here's what I've tried:1.
Remember, this would have been in the year prior (2014).
(So I voided it.
Here's what I'm trying to do.
I'm using the actual monetary values involved in the sale, as it might help the example.
Customer purchases item for $145 from my online store, pays via Stripe.
84) to cover Stripe's fees.
I am confused on how to handle credit cards.
This is being looked at as a deposit but it's my own money that has already been accounted for.
Could someone clear this up for me?
Newbie Question:My credit card feed pulls in my credit card data.
from there I reconcile against my various expenses and payments?
These amounts are to appear as text only.
My Word skills for fields and tables is very basic.
The first day of the month deposit has the prior month's fees deducted.
00Example 2 - cc proceeds 0 and previous month's fees are straight 'spend' transaction (the easy one)Sept CC Fees 12.
00 We're highly seasonal so we regularly see all three of the above happening.
We sell inventory item "PART A" which includes components X, Y & Z.
00) and not -£1.
It is confusing a lot of my customers.
How can I can see multiple/more than one months' view for Budget vs Actuals comparison.
Interest on the outstanding balance is paid monthly.
We then draw additional funds to cover 100% of the build costs.
Which is the best or easiest method please.
Hello, I am hoping someone can help me.
For example, 6 months ended December 2014 compared to year end 30 June 2014.
I have a unique contract type, where I am obligated to track 50% of the revenue I get, and spend it in a certain way.
They have now refunded it.
it would be painful to go through Fixed Asset list one by one.
52 for 48 months at 9.
99 which I have a monthly interest vs principal schedule for.
07 on FBT Return-	Set up Current Liability: FBT Payable accountAny feedback or advice greatly appreciated!
We're a two-owner company.
Our accountant wants our books to reflect a draw owed to the other owner for an equivalent amount, and I'm assuming it should be a long term liability.
Here's the link https://www.
so for example fuel cost £48.
Is this the case?
had a moment and my fingers moved quicker than my brain.
In working on a reconciliation, I noticed checks written have been imported as Money Received, when they should be Money Spent.
I have tried changing options but have had no success yet.
Our car is gone!
Our servers is gone!
Our Furniture is gone!
We have lost many months worth of accounting effort and work hour.
How to get them back?
Note: This issue happened after we tried to export Detailed General Ledger record and received error:  Regards
Is there a way of turning on a 'running total' - or 'running balance' so I can quickly check to see where my entries and the paper statements diverge?
It seems a really obvious feature but I can't find it.
Accordingly, I am also now unable to login @ the HSBC Credit Card login.
I own a printing company, and recently purchased a MIS system to smooth the process workflow.
The problem potentially is that it links to "quick books " for its invoicing etc.
Greetings,Our company has received grant  from Government in term of  office Furniture.
Or is there always this kind of discrepancy between bookkeeping numbers and IRS numbers?
Isn't the point of bookkeeping to accurately reflect your net income as defined by the government?
I have an item on my credit card statement that shows the purchase of the dishwasher for say $100.
It is difficult (if not impossible) to get a value for everything in the bucket due to the quantity and possibly the range of types.
Why is this - surely one should be debit and the other credit?
once again its cost should be increased to show the transfer and the empty pot then classified in a different category of stock item.
I have recently changed my quarterly VAT periods to end 31 January, 30 April, 31 July and 31 October.
My last VAT return was for the period 1 June 2014 to 31 August 2014.
Unfortunately, we cannot guarantee that the recipients are receiving them correctly.
Surely, we are not the only company to experience this issue, are we?
I have paid myself a reasonable salary throughout this year.
I'm not worried about the numbers, everything matches up well and looks good.
So, the question.
Perhaps it's best in a numbered list:1.
When to do so?
Everything before that is simply reducing my equity in the company.
All advice and tips appreciated and welcomed.
They have multiple companies within their group.
They currently have a different company set up in MYOB for each one.
If I was selling these products in the EU i charge VAT at 20%.
I didn't realize it would get to the point it is now.
Is that correct?
End of year / taxesWe're quickly coming up on this.
I treat everyone that works for me as a 1099 employee.
I bought some items in Officeworks and paid by personal credit card.
After that I back to change some item and Office work refunded 99 AUD.
In Sage it is easy to produce aged payables and receivables to include after date receipts and payments.
Advertising/Marketing isn't right (since we sell to the public, not to the people we're networking with).
Staff Training isn't quite right, since it's not an actual training course with a learning outcome.
I deal with domain names and hosting charges for around 30 clients.
In the inventory items, I have set up 2 part numbers : "Part 1" and "Part 2".
The last thing I want to do is to have to go through every sale manually.
If I disposed of these in the normal way, wouldn't this create a double entry?
Hello,We treat employees as suppliers for expense claim purposes.
I think I'm getting a bit confused with the multi currency function.
If I produce P&L's on different days could they be different depending on the rate on that particular day.
If that is the case above.
Is it possible to fix an exchange rate that does not change?
we are looking to change from 31 March to 30 June.
We understand that the Fixed Asset Module doesn't cope to well with the change?
Also what impact does this have on the GST periods?
I run an iPhone and iPad repair company and over the past 3-4 months my company has run several iPhone and iPad repair deals on Grabone.
Example: -We list a service for sale on Grabone for $100-Customers then purchase the service on Grabone’s website for $100 paying via credit card.
Grabone pays us 50% upfront, takes a 25% commission, and withholds the final 25% amount as a retention, which is paid to us 3 months later.
(Trying to follow this ).
I haven't yet customised the balance sheet to show it as a liability.
As yet, we have made one part withdrawl for the purchase of stock.
Hello I sell my goods via farmers markets on a weekly basis.
I have today drawn out &#163;350 cash as a float and entered it as a 'spend money' transaction.
Would this cause problems in terms of accounting at all?
This money is simply collected by us and passed onto the two companies which provide these services for us.
We collect no profit, providing the two services at cost to our customers.
Finally we run a charity show once a year, selling tickets to the general public.
The same question applies here.
, especially coming from a manual bookkeeping / invoicing system (word/Photoshop).
I searched on the forms to see if anyone asked the same question but didn't find anything.
32390/15 - Depn of computers - Debit balance .
258524/22 - Fixtures charge for year - Credit balance .
2069526/22 - Computer equip charge for year - Credit balance .
apologies again for the possible repeat postregardsDW
I have two issues on hand.
Issues 2: my vendors have paid in installments one was in a different financial year.
This is welcomed but remains transaction based and still fails to address the issue of classifying and reporting customers and suppliers by type.
As it stands we are having an analysis exercise each month.
I can usually work my way around more systems but completely stumped!
The unit price is $41,028.
I incur costs (disbursements) during my engagements.
I have also set up project codes so i can run P+L reports by project.
Dividend Income Is it GST Free and BAS excluded.
It is from several months ago.
Does anyone have an approach that has worked in the past
They do not want me to reimburse them but would rather that the money sat in credit to be applied against their next purchase.
I've checked my Financial Settings and have the following:Accounting Method: CashGST Calculation: AnnuallyPAYG Withheld period: QuarterlyPAYG Tax Method: Option 2:Income times RateSame as I used in Saasu.
although already sent out and cashed.
but I am learning very fast!
I am not sure what to enter.
have no experience with the system at all.
The 3 directors of the company have supplied loans of $10,000 each for us to manage cashflow for start up costs etc.
We're not planning to charge any interest on the loans either way.
The USA company is not invoicing me, and are in no hurry to do so, but I want to provide for the expense so my P&L reporting and cash flow can be managed with the anticipated expense included.
Or is there an easier way?
recently rented car to make delivery to client.
charges on credit card from car rental company as follows:40.
I am thinking of two things here:1.
Ok so I've come across a problem which must have been encountered before.
A job charge which needs to have VAT added on top.
A Fuel charge which is VAT inclusive and needs to be separated out by the system to show the total (imported data) and the reverse engineered VAT amount.
The first month shows a correct opening and closing balance.
Why and how can I correct?
I end up making a csv file from Stipe exports.
There hast to be a better way.
Help is much appreciated here.
We are registered for GST - Cash Basis.
Does anyone know what this cash checkbox actually does, as it does adjust my figures when I click on it?
I have searched the FAQs but can't find the instructions.
As a promotional exercise, we are auctioning off vouchers with a face value of $35 from $1 reserve on TradeMe.
Lets say the voucher sells for $10.
50 We then have a liability of $35.
00 worth of services to provide which have an effective discount of $24.
50 To recognize the liability of $35 of services to provide and the discount of $24.
Unfortunately, the written line was short by $10 : "One hundred dollars. "
All Australian governments (Commonwealth, state and territory) have agreed to accept NSCOA when requesting information from not-for-profits.
It is most commonly used in the ‘not-for-profit’ sector, including charities.
from: https://www.
For instance, if I am comparing by certain class, will the layout remember this when saved?
When we are reconciling our credit card, certain charges we receive, we want to bill directly to clients.
I make expense claim transactions and then I paid it from my petty cash.
How to change this transaction status to paid?
The result I'm getting is 236.
5% which is fantastic but highly unlikely.
ThanksI've since worked it out but it doesn't seem correct to me.
We are about to begin selling large volumes of repair parts to another company who exports some of them overseas.
On the billing side, our supplier will send us multiple bills throughout the month which may or may not include core deposits they collect from us.
To be clear, we don't profit on the core deposits, our contracts are such that we only pull profit on the actual parts costs.
This will be fairly high volume (container-loads per month), so what would be the fastest, easiest way to deal with these?
Are credit notes and debit notes our best route?
My corporate equity is loan.
I recorded the credit note and added the details of the cash refund to the credit note.
We only sell via a website and we will receive the payments by paypalif we sell products from 2 or more categories will we only receive one line from paypal?
I really have no idea to solve this problem.
I appreciate any help from others that were in the same situation :)
What I find REALLY annoying is I can't see those different transactions together.
Not something odd to request - so I wonder if anyone has found a way around this - perhaps there is a plugin that will make this work?
And I'm from Indonesia.
Looking forward to some ideas, feedback!
I did this from the date I thought was the last date of feeds, being the 9th.
In Sage I can simply create a £0.
In our current program we got the option to book the costs and then mark them be released in another period.
Rent received in March will be booked by the system on Other receivables (entire amount) and then be released each month to the costs.
One of the rooms is rented by the employee (market value).
Most of the formulas will probably end up being percentages (GP%, NP%, Staff Costs over Revenue etc) and a Net Profit % showing as 0.
31 instead of 31.
Quickbooks has it nailed
And also how to update the journal I've already posted?
This will give you more accurate numbers and help you calculate your gross margin and monthly profitability.
Technically they should be applied to the credit card feeds but you can't transfer money to two separate card transactions.
The above still requires quite a few steps to approve the bill etc.
The client has since reimbursed us.
I'm not sure how to fix these up and reconcile them?
I have entered journal entries for periodical inventory:-At beginning of each month for Opening Stock - Debit opening stock (Direct Costs) & Credit Stock on Hand).
Then at end of each month for Closing Stock - Credit closing stock (Direct Costs) & Debit Stock on Hand).
Then at 1st of the next month, reversal of that Closing Stock transaction.
If so, there would be an Opening Stock at beginning of each month.
The employee has returned with their receipts totalling approximately $350.
I also looked at another thread listing how to deal with a cash advance but that is slightly different as the amount loaned is equal to the amount being paid back by the employee.
Not sure if I'm explaining this properly but I figured this thread would be a good place to start.
When I was using a spreadsheet, I would manually enter the price the customer paid - Wholesale - Shipping = Profit / Loss.
- Backup versioning for post-event recovery.
I have followed all of the procedures for reconcilliation, but still can not find the cause of the error.
I don't want to lose all the transactions from the old credit card as it is currently reconciled.
Hello,I am looking for a way to track month to month profits accurately for a private healthcare clinic composed of several contract workers and one owner working herself as a healthcare provider.
It's hard for me to believe that this doesn't exist.
We do have access to payroll and other features.
This is freaking us out, we have sent an email with no reply as of yet.
Are there implications for this that we haven't realised?
I am now converting an accountancy practice over from MYOB and am having quite a few difficulties and am hoping I can get some help from the lovely forum members.
We decided to run the 2 accounting systems side by side for a couple of months and our converison date was 1 May, 2014 (I have input the trial balance from MYOB from 30 April).
25% SG rate etc to match these off?
or is there perhaps an easier way?
Is there anything else I have forgotten or overlooked?
We don't currently take credit card payments.
I keep on reading conflicting information.
Mainly:  -  Transactions where I have no valid VAT receipt, from what I have read this should be entered to exempt expenses -  Purchases outside of EU, from what I have read this should be entered to No VATI did read on the HMRC website that purchases outside of the EU are out of Scope for VAT and therefore I assume corresponds to the No VAT tax code.
Our Accountant said the two above types of transactions should be entered as Zero- Rated, so who has the right answer?
A start up Company in the leisure sector will be operating as one Company but from several locations.
I don't want to go back to QB's.
We have an online toy store that opened Jan 1st, 2014.
Plus we noticed there is extensions for eBay and WooCommerce.
So far all I've heard is "we're looking into the issue" or something.
I produce e-commerce websites for small businesses.
From these I can calculate the commission owed to me for total orders (cash and debit/credit card orders).
all the debit/credit card money received from 00s of small businesses is grouped together in any one withdrawal and b. )
Customers A, B and C make three separate orders from Small Businesses 1, 2 and 3.
Customers D, E and F make three separate orders from Small Businesses 1, 2 and 3.
I charge Small Businesses 1, 2 and 3 different rates of commission.
These rates are 5%, 10% and 25% respectively.
After the orders my PayPal balance is £80.
I'm stuck and really do not know what to do.
Google+ allows vanity URLs to be set for pages, and the http://plus.
or some other workflow I haven't thought about?
For the tax year 2012/2013 we overpaid VAT.
How do I make an adjustment to the VAT return to reflect this?
HiWe are an event company and we have multiple events.
Our merchant settlements come through daily in one lump sum for all events.
We have been using receive money and breaking down the daily settlement into the relevant client category which seems to be working fine.
My problem is when we transfer the money to our client in weekly batches we retain the merchant fees and I'm wondering the best way to do that - should we be including it as a negative line item in the spend money?
We currently don't separate the registration fees and merchant fees when we receive the money though.
Why do I find a "Reference" field in the bill window?
Whether a "contact" is a supplier or/and a client is really a tag.
I paid this bill from my private VISA card.
I only have the amount of NOK224.
Of course, I can calculate the exchange rate, but do I really have to?
Investigations so far have resulted in:•	www.
I have found that on Google and some QA on site.
Do you enter the bill in its entirety at the date of issue 31/07/2014?
Accrue WorkCover monthly based on actual wages to the expense.
Any difference in the WorkCover payable amount should reconcile to the end of year WorkCover reconciliation.
I have set up all of our customer contacts and I have created a list of all our inventory items (products we sell).
The inventory items are all set as standard at our RRP, however for some customers we have agreed special prices for one or two products.
Is this possible anywhere in the system?
30) on their BAS.
My client is a Doctor who works in various locations.
We buy equipment for our clients and have them reimburse us for the cost in addition to a mark up fee.
I could ask my bookkeeper but she is away on holiday.
I know the answer will be you can't, but I'm going to put it out there anyway,
This system is implemented in parts of Europe and quite elaborately in Norway.
In Norway, the UBL specification is called EHF (Elektronisk Handelsformat).
wg_abbrev=ublHere's the wikipedia entry: http://en.
Is it true?
com/article/223730With some clients I am paid for the number of hours I work.
I have assigned the transaction as COA "438 - Repairs & Maintenance";I have assigned it to a tracking category of "Property 1"It is listed as a Debit.
Now for the glitch:I view Reports / Profit & Loss.
I click the "Compare Properties" (I have a main tracking category of "Properties", with sub categories of "Property 1", "Property 2" etc etc)I gives a lovely breakdown of all COA's per property etc.
BUT For "Property 1" I have made a Net PROFIT of £200.
00 and it displays the transaction that I reconciled!
Surely the software should know it is going out and therefore do this automatically?
The cache has been cleared, cookies deleted, multiple web browsers have been tried.
I have several investment properties.
When I click on "Contact - Property 1" at present it doesn't show any money out (even though I have management fees going out).
It would be great for a more detailed help guide for property (I think I'll put that in a feature request! )
I guess it's neither?
In the expense ledger, I also show this as paid.
I currently have these payments in and out sitting there unreconciled.
Is there another way I can handle this entry?
csv that allows me to reconcile these off.
It seems a little long winded though.
We don't care about the customer.
We do care about the customer  as we only allow this for bigger customers.
All this is being done an interface which we can modifyregards Paul
Surely there's a way?
It seems you can only allocate one team when setting up the asset in the FAR
Can anyone come up with any idea as to how I can get this information to the customer.
The option to change it for a specific FA acount isn't present.
I'm having trouble trying to differentiate between Purchases and Stock on Hand.
My integration automatically creates a journal entry that will decrease Stock on Hand and increase COGS when a sale is made.
The figure used for this is the value of my goods (the 'cost' of the goods) that were sold.
Then when a sale is made Stock on Hand would decrease and COGS would increase.
Have I been doing it wrong?
Which is the standard way every one follows ?
If you’re after advice on how to treat dividends in other jurisdictions please join the discussions as below:
If you’re after advice on how to treat dividends in other jurisdictions please join the discussions below:
I’ve started this page so we can get a discussion going on the best way to treat dividends in .
If you’re after advice on how to treat dividends in other jurisdictions please join the discussions as below:
I’ve started this page so we can get a discussion going on the best way to treat dividends in .
If you’re after advice on how to treat dividends in other jurisdictions please join the discussions as below:
I’ve started this page so we can get a discussion going on the best way to treat dividends in .
If you’re after advice on how to treat dividends in other jurisdictions please join the discussions as below:
I recently changed my Financial Year date to 31Dec.
All my depreciation to that date reversed.
I've registered my assets again with their accumulated depreciation for each asset.
I want to fix that now by doing a stock take.
Lets say I want to buy $1000 worth of inventory from a supplier.
But since I don't actually have that stock 'on hand' I am not sure if that is correct.
Because that would be the true total value of my stock on hand (supplier cost plus delivery cost)?
What's going on?
Has anyone else come across this who could potentially shed some light on the matter ?
No point in making smart looking reports if the data cannot be Audited or analysed by the users.
Anyway back to year end.
When trying to log in we have to enter the card number, access code (AC) and memorable word.
We are not sure if we are entering the correct information here so not sure if this is the issue or whether it is something else.
The card number field only has 12 spaces whereas the credit card has 16 numbers.
Is it the first 12 numbers from your credit card?
Memorable word - we think we know what this is.
Any assistance would be greatly appreciated so we can determine if its our log in info or some other issue.
If I created an expense claim, We would be paying it from money that we have already deducted commissions from.
Basically, we want to see income/expense for each of these youth.
So much so that their accountant has suggested we start again.
To fix the issues would be a long arduous process that would take many expensive man hours and a fresh start would be way easier.
Is it possible to alter the allocation of transaction data fields (as is possible in a csv or qif download)?
The answer received from support after more than 24 hours was to keep trying.
Anyone else having the same issue.
I've asked support to call me - still waiting!
I know I can have tracking categories that are a sub category of a 'head' category.
But what if I want to run a profit & loss for two tracking categories that are part of different 'head' categories ?
The local currency of our company is in Hong Kong Dollar.
(after using the spend/receive money process).
For example, I have an $8.
I read the posts in the community, in the guide and then decided to play around some.
Some of you may already know this, but I found this one trick to be pretty cool.
That seems to work fine.
My client is using the Flat Rate Scheme for VAT.
I have posted the "Savings Made" journals for the 2 quarters so far.
But I think something has gone wrong.
I would have thought one would be a credit (sale of the item) and one would be a debit (refund of that item via credit note).
The value of SOH should goes down after sale, and back up again after it is returned?
The opposite is true for the COGS.
Shouldn't one be a debit and one be a credit?
We would export in Excel and double check all the transactions were coded correctly.
Is anyone having the same issues?
I tracked it down to a customer who has accidently paid me instead of someone else.
Should it BAS included or Excluded?
Finally, I believe there is some amount of depreciation and GST which can be claimed 'upfront', how can we ensure this information finds its way into our next BAS?
It’s a very handy feature and helps to avoid duplications in posting.
However I’ve realised it’s not 100 percent reliable.
Anyone with the same problem?
I'm trying to accrual some bills over 12 month.
com in the USA.
It'll save on ABA file upload fees.
We did manual entry until this last month, as far as we can tell we were entering this right up until now.
Any way to "flip" these transactions to the right credit/debt entries?
The alternative is "15% gst on expenses".
Up until now the club's books have been in an excel spreadsheet.
However would it be possible to delete or hide old items from the list once that competition had ended?
So I could set up different tracking categories for each team for each given season.
When I look at my conversion balances, I have 3 things in there:1.
My Visa card with the amount owed as of Dec 31 also entered into the credit column.
With all those numbers combined, I now have an adjustment of $4,959.
99 showing up on my balance sheet.
Anyone have any advice that can lead me in the right direction?
I have accidentally entered it as paid twice, however I have only paid it once.
So there are going to be individual refunds coming in from some suppliers and credit notes issues for others.
I have updated the Financial Settings screen in the screen (under General Settings).
Looking over the other posts, I was going to do option 2.
A lot of our income is received from booking agents.
They collect payments and send them on to us.
6) which is consequently giving me a net and gross profit 16914.
6 higher than what it should actually be.
The other issue is, we also require a bond, refundable on tidy return of the premises.
Please can someone help before I turn this into a bowl of spaghetti?
That other software has the capability in their accountant's copy.
There has to be a better way.
Their accountant recently forwarded me the opening balances as at the 6th April 2013.
What is the most appropriate way to manage those transactions between 31st March and 6th April which would have hit the P&L for the previous year?
For example.
I have several of these transactions which mean that I cannot agree my opening Trial Balance.
Fair enough, but this includes transactions that are outside of the range that I require.
And is it possible to do what I am trying to do?
For completeness, this is a challenge I'm facing for my own SME (not a 'client'), and I am a qualified accountant  :-)Cheers,Andy
If this is you can you please email me and info@ice2heat.
surely, there's a better way?
We have a client who uses Farmlands pre the merger of the the 2 firms.
HiHopefully a quick question.
I have a client whose financial year end falls on the 5th April.
So I'm guessing it should be classed as a Direct Cost.
Should I be creating a 'Bill' for these fees each month?
At the moment I have been putting it through my purchase orders as 429 general expense.
For tax purposes, I then import the individual sale amounts and fees amounts separately, which allows calculation of GST etc.
I have a client who hosts an online site for e-commerce sellers.
Thus their only revenue would be commissions and advertising.
Feel free to email me directly if needed.
Good Day,Due to some confusion, the Dept of Rev.
However, I don't want that transaction to show as income.
I am currently working with a client who has been invoicing customers on a monthly basis, on the first day of the month.
We have received the tax rebate from the ATO for R&D work we have done.
com/finance/2013/01/08/common-accounting-mistakes-that-can-cause-serious-trouble/I am not sure where the best place to track this.
I have registered an inventory item.
This is a really big issue.
Our accountants do the payroll and have taken away the £2000 entitlement which means the PAYE bill this month is much smaller!
Is there something wrong with my settings?
Found it but it meant me adjusting the amounts brought over.
But the main question is can it be done?
Please try again or contact Customer Care if you require assistance.
We receive income in different ways and initially I used the tracking feature so that we could track those different revenue streams and programs.
I'm setting up some investment properties that have been purchased recently.
In the statement I've imported the loan amount is listed.
I recently completed my manual journals for the year end 31 March.
Each ticket has a face value, and a service fee.
And the merchant fees as an expense4.
I'll want to mostly do this through the API.
Do I owe taxes on my take of the service fee considering my contracts stipulate that the client is responsible for any and all tax on their tickets?
I've purchased some whitegoods on a store credit card and I'm not sure how to manage the payments.
Instead of being a lost, it gets recorded as income?
Whats going on?
I purchased some stickers on behalf of a conference, using the company credit card.
I could say the stickers were an expense, and the reimbursement was income, but is that the best approach?
I was trying to get an idea from accountants and bookkeepers about the split between those using Office 365 v Google Apps in their practices.
Delivery cost should be added to the asset, at the moment on my list of assets I have this delivery as well.
Is this normal or am I being daft here?
Hope someone can put my mind at rest.
Have my 1st client using Bill Me Later service from Paypal.
I tried to create my own custom template from custom .
Is it possible somehow?
Has anyone else hit this issue, or have any suggestions how to overcome the problem.
However, I have one more question before the daunting task of correcting my books.
This will reflect the "earned" income in the appropriate month.
They carry over constantly - year-to-year or month-to month.
My first trading year was 2012/13.
I am cash coding and want to memorize transactions not unlike what you can do in Banklink.
YYThis suddenly began occurring when we ran the reconciliation summary for Dec 2013.
Every month since it has been exactly the same.
Sometimes this incurs a charge of &#163;1.
But to who Then?
Now I have to remove that amount from the system, to pass my conversion balance and save it?
I may have to pass an adjustment entry but I am not sure.
This client is a calendar year end cash basis client.
My former experience is in retirement planning, investing, insurance and banking.
I hope to have my cpa license over the next year or two.
so please be kind (cut me some slack for hiring myself).
When I imported my first statement there were three lines that were duplicates, each for 2000.
Anything I'm doing wrong here?
The ability to put a footnote or comment would be great.
Am I/him doing something wrong?
Have I allocated him the wrong user profile?
I have searched Help and the forum and can't find how to locate these codes.
I had a query from one of my clients who is running church.
I've a feeling it's totally obvious but its Friday afternoon and I can't think.
I am processing the TB adjustments for a year end.
Our services are delivered through a number of programs and tracking categories would be suitable for this.
It would be lovely if I didn't have to open each manual journal to obtain the journal number.
We were too!
Simply download a copy from http://0CPAs.
I am in the US/Florida.
In the building industry our clients usually hold back a retention.
Another option would be to list the facility as a Trade Creditor.
This leads to my next issue.
I bought it for $205,000.
I'm not sure what to enter.
I'm pretty sure I understand how sale/disposal of assets works in general.
Unfortunately, I can edit the rate (it has a padlock).
Clicking brings up the normal tax rate edit dialog box but nothing can be changed.
I understand this is a system feature but its pretty useless to have a tax rate that can never be changed.
I'm trying to avoid the situation where the automated FAR becomes more work to maintain than using manual journals.
Our waste metal gets bagged up and taken for scrap.
We receive money in exchange for this.
Hisorry if this has been asked,  I did search but couldn't find what I was looking for.
I sell digital products and receive payments through Paypal.
What the heck do I do with it to show closing stock value at the end of the year and to open the next year of trading?
Scenario:An employee paid for $1000 credit (prepayment) with a supplier using his credit card and had put in an expense claim for it.
Looked up my main company's books and found it missing.
From the demos, I cannot work out if this product uses cost centres in any way.
I work for a charity that takes grants and delivers projects.
Every contractor is signed into a self billing agreement and up until now; everything is done maually in excel.
However it seems difficult to do that.
I set my conversion date as December 1st.
My conversion balance is obviously $100 off.
but it is not?
but I have imported many before this and they all work fine.
I have bills set to be paid later in teh month.
The dashboard shows the running balance, but only up to today.
The transactions view shows the future transactions, but not the running balance.
So Joe Bloggs brings in an item to be sold.
The item is sold for say £100.
Our client keeps 10% and the remaining is given/paid to Joe Bloggs.
I was thinking of using purchase orders, because Joe Bloggs doesn't get any monies until the item is sold and this way also keeps a track of what is actually in the shop.
This means the dividend affects either operating profit, or net profit.
But dividends are a distribution of profit to shareholders!
In annual statements, the dividends paid appears in the statement of cash flows, or the statement of changes in equity.
Because it would be so helpful if it used the name of who paid it as well, then it might actually get some of the matches correct.
I keep getting an error when I try to dispose of my fixed assets that have a zero balance!
I get paid during the week and make my deposit typically on Thursdays.
So I will have several checks.
Of course this means that it wants to tax over $600 of our monthly wage but really with the tax free threshold there should be no tax (sometimes it goes up to close to $2K for a month and those months there should be a small payg contribution).
Hello,Our accountant has finalised our books for the year and provided me with some adjusting journals to do.
And that "GST" would be the other one - in other words, GST paid on inputs - and that this would be the negative figure.
I have separate tracking categories for the head office and the branches.
directors) and others to the branches ( eg.
3) Insert, in the same bill, a negative (2,000) value and code it as "Adjustment for instalments".
FWIW, in Brazil almost everything you buy is paid in instalments.
); and 2.
I have attached two links to view the conversion balance, and the FAR.
I have tried this on two machines, Windows 7 & Windows 8.
1 with multiple browsers on both.
com/#Q_ImportPayPal$BK_ManuallyimportI've done the first month (Transactions and the separate fee import) and I've reconciled all transactions up until this point.
however whenever I import the next month's statement it misses the Payee Name and Gross amount.
HiI have received a refund cheque from HMRC for overpaid PAYE/NIC contributions from 2011/2012.
I don't want to credit PAYE/NIC as this will reduce the total amount of PAYE/NIC I have paid this year and increase my corp tax liability.
I don't want to show this as income as again this will increase my tax liability.
We then also get invoiced by the voucher provider (plus a service charge line) which also gets posted.
Is anyone having problems with the Feeds for CBA Credit Cards
89, so essentially each month the balance is growing further out of whack.
I've found a few duplicate transactions and deleted those but it hasn't been much help.
I honestly can't take another day of screwing around with this.
These expenses occurred in 2011 (within the last 4 years AND no later than 6 months prior my GST registration, per ATO guidelines).
I am currently completing my BAS and have come up with two different amounts on different reports for my BAS.
I have search and tried to work out where this difference is coming from to no avail.
I thought it might have been related to tracking but I have checked this and it is not the case.
Adding Reference Field to email send template.
Trying to reconcile my Paypal feed - I have 700 items that all match a "rule".
Do I have to press OK 700 times?
It is a nightmare.
I also sell on Amazon Marketplace and eBay UK.
Could someone please explain how I should set up my books?
I've only been trading since May and am planning on starting the integration from May.
We had several customers who had paid in advance so I set the opening balance "income in Advance" to the amount I had received in advance.
Also I have paid one of the customers back his prepayment.
I'm looking for an enrolled agent in the Atlanta, GA area (ideally in Gwinnett County near Duluth) who can do our personal and biz taxes.
I have a client with a corporate visa with multiple directors each with their own card however their office receives a paper statement with the seperate card transaction details and then a covering statement to combine.
I would normally charge GST on the services and not charge GST on the Expenses.
Hello,I have got myself into a bit of an accounting pickle and would greatly appreciate your advice in how to handle this:My situation.
This is straight forward, and I think correct?
I hope I've explained my problem clearly.
I would be ideal if this was attributable to specific products/inventory.
We have three Sites set up as option in tracking category "Site" Many of our purchases relate to all sites and the purchase amount needs to be apportioned to each site.
We have approximately 20 licensors and managing payouts is a BIG problem for us.
Anyone else have the same issue?
Especially when someone mistakenly creates the same category twice and many transactions have been posted to both categories.
all is good.
50$ gets added back to the meals & entertainment expense.
In Quebec, GST is 5% and QST is 9.
If I have a meal that's:Before tax: 5.
5% and QST @ 4.
15$ (in actuality it should be 0.
29$ (in actuality it should be (0.
However I am charged GST from suppliers.
80I have a difference of $3.
Looking back I should have set up two transactions.
Hey TeamStruggling to find how I should code this?
Would there be a possibility to create feature through the inventory tab to stop duplicate invoicing, it is something that only occurs occasionally, but when it does happen, it can be embarrassing.
and if so how?
Does anyone know if this is already on the agenda?
My problem is that I have tried to compare VAT returns where I have some differences.
Boxes 1 - 5 are relatively easy to figure out but not with 6 and 7 unless I am missing something?
Mostly loving it despite a few minor annoyances.
07 paid and $1505.
93 to be paid.
(Which I admit is non standard)
We all have company credit cards, i,e the cards are in the Company name, the bill goes to the company and the company pays it.
However the registered address for the card is each individuals home address - this is so they can order online and get the goods delivered to where they work from.
So the only solution I can come up with is that they stuff the receipts in to an envelope and mail them to the book keeper who then manually types them all in.
Surely there's got to be a better solution where each user can scan in their receipt and enter a few details about it so that the book keeper has an easy life ?
I was thinking that as customers and suppliers can be put in groups this would be the obvious solution.
I have also looked into Tracking but I don't seem to have a payroll > settings optionMany thanksChris
Here an example scenario, could someone kindly check I am on the right track.
Sale of £3.
00 and 50p P&P Total = £3.
18 is received from the paypal accountDo I match the £3.
50 to my sale, then the £3.
18 that was in my paypal.
18 rather than the £3.
50 and including the paypal fee in there somewhere?
I'm sure there is a super simple answer!
I gave my balance sheet to my accountant who frowned.
or at least, this is what I thought I was doing.
Help is appreciated.
I think it's because the prepayment was created before the year end and my current bill is from 2013.
Hello everyone,I have an unusual scenario which I was hoping someone might help me with.
My client has paid for a lot of expenses for his start up out of his own personal funds.
Thanks  - all help appreciated!
I am not to clear about which way I should set this up.
I added it to the asset register, but it doesn't show up on the balance sheet?
Then do I record the loan amount as money received against it ?
We have the opening balances entered, but the accrual isn't happening.
Good evening all, A very (too) simple question from a French newbie who missed one point.
I am not doing the reconciliation.
Every Friday we withdraw a cash float for our cash register of $xxxxThe following Friday we deposit the entire weeks cash takings, and it includes the $xxxx float.
The amount we deposit, less the float, is determined as our cash takings for the week.
With 95% having GST and 5% being GST Free.
And.
repeatAt the moment I am reconciling it by setting up 2 rules.
Is this the best way to manage this situation?
Otherwise we can all find out the best way to manage it.
I have created this as a deduction on the payroll system.
It adds it on rather than deduct.
Also, does someone have a solution for dealing with Tax refunds.
Canadian user here.
Currently I have several ‘Spend Money’ transactions that remain ‘Unreconciled’, as a result (dating from 2011).
I have an airplane flight that will occur in a different financial quarter (Q3) than when the ticket was originally purchased (Q2).
Set both Date and Due Date set to the date of travelFrom the bill:  4.
"Prepayments" will then show up in the dropdown of step 4 above.
Listed as main number on statements and is what payments are issued too.
My partners.
I have several lawnmowing contractor clients, who operate through one of the popular NZ franchises.
I have trained each of them to code their weekly APs to the GL code I have set up in the Current Liabilities section of their ledger.
100% is the maximum allowed.
csv with credits and debits (-ve values).
Transactions are correct and are reconciled.
Nonetheless, we are pushing on.
Our current issue has plagued us for weeks and we cannot resolve it.
( is one of these bills.
)I have dumped the general ledger and have scoured it for any evidence of the amount applied against the bill but I cannot find any.
This includes items that are not legible to be reclaimed back.
Did you guys remove it?
I have accidentally deleted an entire expense claims (which had about 12 expense claim items attached).
Or is it gone forever?
I have tried looking under Archive.
I. e. recharge the hotel cost onto the client.
I've had my first dealing with a NSF check this week.
It is an order.
So here are my questions1.
Your help is much appreciated.
We have a credit card to process with upwards of 40 transaction lines per month.
We enter the credit card monthly statement in as a purchase, allocating all the various line items.
Is there a quick way, cash coding?
We would prefer the accountant to be based in Manchester (as thats where we live)Any recommendations would be appreciated.
This have been registration fees, flights, samples, product packaging, product order from china factory , marketing, etc.
The total is about 10,000 pounds.
Where is it?
I have had colleagues take a look and we can't find it anywhere.
I can't search for amounts at all.
with the above in mind i have the following question;When we look at the current vat liability amount (for end of May) will this currently carry over any previous VAT the system thinks we still owe HMRC?
I want to re edit them correctly but don't know how.
I've tried, but there are no options for changing.
And I've searched for tutorials about this.
I have a few bills (e. g. telephone, office rent, etc. )
It will then be there to reconcile with the imported statement line.
My company is on the Flat Rate VAT scheme (accruals basis).
HiI can't see details of customer payments received on customer statements (all activity statements).
Am I missing something really simple?
But this seems cumbersome.
I believe it has to do with taxation charged and paid.
Is this something that can be pulled from the system or now?
I apologise if any of the following has been answered elsewhere.
Is it even possible?
Prior to this he would pick up the transactions as a journal against drawings and put the payments to drawings.
Should I do month to month and reconcile everything.
And after I do that month and I am ready to do the next month is the process the same.
I am a sole proprietor, and I contribute monthly to my IRA.
For further details please get in touch with gary@robinsonandco.
For further details please get in touch with gary@robinsonandco.
795 because this is the rate I have calculated my pricing on (in my pricing speadsheets).
I am not sure this is right in an accounting sense though.
I am essentially making a gain on the product value because it works out cheaper to buy because my pricing is "old" or the pricing is not based on the current rate of exchange.
Or am I wrong with my concern and everything I am doing is right?
Ok this is not probably the place to ask.
both figures now appear on my reconciliation screen and im not sure how to go about reconciling the amount as i dont want it to reflect on my profit and loss sheets.
I want to see these up for each individual course to get an idea of what we our profit / loss per course is.
Advice and help much appreciated.
I have read all the existing Q&A on similar topics but none really seem to answer how to get rid of it.
This amount is still there, and no-one has really mentioned how to get rid of it.
So these are expenses that have been paid for personally, but I want to now claim for the home office costs portion.
Because I as an individual am not GST registered - Only my company is.
or is there a way of reversing.
My VAT quarter runs from 1 March 2013 to 31 May 2013, so there will be an opening balance due to HMRC at 31 March.
My client has a 31 March balance date, but the funding received (from Govt) runs over 2 financial years.
I've since written a check out to myself for the amount.
Charitable donations - I donate monthly to a charitable cause.
Refunds - Transfer returns and items that I have bought and have subsequently returned.
:)I am an Australian and am dealing the Australian company tax system.
My conversion date is 31 March 2013.
Prepayment before conversion date is 1000.
I have tried putting customer Due amount in unitAmount field in salesinvoicetemplate.
If somebody could help in how to go about treating such a transaction it would be really appreciated.
Hey everyone, in my Balance Sheet I have my conversion balance (end of Feb this year) sitting in Historical Adjustment - Liabilities.
I did check the conversion balances and they were entered correctly in the debit column.
Why wont it let me mark it as paid before it goes out.
I have had a look through the forum, and could not find a suitable answer.
I added this as a fixed asset and can work out how to do the depreciation etc quite easily.
ie we have been short paid 10 cents to what I was expecting, which normally I would input a spend money for the difference (write off) so that we balance.
19 by VendorThe sum of these transaction is zero.
For illustrative purposes, let's say I receive $1,320 upfront (incl.
and on - 31 March, credit income, debit Unearned revenue ($300 or 330?
The next comparative balance tab is dated from the 1 April 2009 to the 31 March 2010.
I couldn't see it in settings?
Overheads sharing the same series of numbers with Liabilities.
I have a problem in that on the balance sheet, the Withholding Tax is higher than it is supposed to be.
I have a question regarding depreciation.
Our current scenario is we journal $1,000 1st of each month.
Debit:  expenses (depreciation)Credit: Assets (furniture and fittings).
I think that I selected the option to untick entries, but they have all disappeared from the system.
I have checked the nominal activity and can't find any of them.
There was no 'Are you sure you want to delete everything. '
A linked total amount is listed alongside the contact details, although the user is unable to click through to find out more (they don't have sufficient permission - they're redirected to the dashboard, and a message is displayed).
I can't work out why this information is shown here as it defeats the usefulness of the role.
No sure what common practice is?
There is no VAT Return menu item in my reports tab.
I cannot make it out.
Revenue want to know these 2 figures.
I am going boggly eyed trying to figure it out.
Brain is fried.
I am working in a firm and all my clients only want to sign the form with all the details filled.
The issue is that it has created a large amount of shareholder capital which I believe has skewed the figures.
Please help as this has impacted my personal tax quite dramatically.
How do you get that to appear?
Is there a better way?
So here's the situation.
We have a particular large customer - a well-known high-end retailer.
We're a small artisan bakery and we supply freshly-baked bread and cakes to the retailer.
We raise a credit note against this RTV.
So how do I set things up to do this with one (or two or three) click(s)?
Trying to get my head around this.
Can you please tell me where I have gone wrong and how I can fix this matter.
In the following days, he returned the item to the store.
Since he as a several other expense receipts for that claim, the overall claim will still be in his favor.
All these transactions occur on his personal credit card, so this situation applies within the expense management feature set.
Thinking out loud here.
This is due to the last two decimal places being a very insignificant amount.
00Where the correct figure would be 342,090.
Or, should I be doing something completely different?
I see this as an issue I am going to be facing on a daily basis, so looking for the best practice & easiest way to handle the issue (as we all do!
all the things our banks tell us not to disclose to third parties!
This is a challenge I have been bumping into lately and am looking for some other perspectives on how its being resolved.
For example:My service cost:      $ 100.
Every receipt is coded to a job – up to 100 – and many are charged back to clients.
We are currently tracking on a spread sheet outside the system.
Easy to find as they are already filtered for that Customer.
It's been as unreconciled for weeks now.
As in, one of our services (rarely) is computer repair.
In some cases, we may round up the price of the part.
Really don't know and I know it's a simple one!
ie: does it get recorded under 'GST on Expenses'?
In fact, I have another related question that I'll ask at this point.
Hope that makes some kind of sense!
My finances are pretty simple: I have 4-5 customers.
my expenses are office stuff, travel and mileage allowance.
Dear AllThis is my first post (I think) in the forums.
So will start from the beginning.
I now have an investor, who has committed x amount of money as his investment.
But that money will be paid in multiple parts.
Only option I could see is recording this transaction as a sale and record multiple entries.
In the past I've recorded my Capital investment the same way (I have committed x amount to the company and paid it in small chunks).
All these claims have been approved and paid.
For expense claims however, I could not find a way.
My company has been in biz since circa 2007.
I want to make an entry that records this from before the conversion date so that my VAT calculations correctly include this value of 7,144.
Can anyone suggest where I record the 7,144ukp VAT "liability" ( is that the right word ) for the conversion date pls?
I have checked in Financial Settings that the Period Lock Date is 31 Jan 2010, and the End of Year Lock Date is not set.
As such, a Fixed Asset that I have registered that was bought in Dec 2010 had to have an accumulated depreciation value keyed in for the period of Dec 2010 to Jan 2011.
However, this accumulated depreciation does not show and is not accounted for in the balance sheet as of 31 Jan 2011.
The Card list detail shows all the info but takes forever trying to copy it into the template.
Is there a way of filtering these out?
The calculation is (Fixed Assets – Depreciation) / (Non-current liabilities + Liability).
I have found this ratio mentioned in several Japanese books but no western ones.
I have searched all my university accounting books and can’t find this ratio.
The customer paid, all was well, until the customer came back to us saying they were VAT exempt, and requested that we refund the VAT.
Monthly seems to be all that I can do.
which looks OK to me, but it might be more of a dirty fix.
Here's my dilemma:I'm converting from another accounting system using Jan 1 2013 as my conversion date.
I uploaded the QIF statement as I've done before.
The issue I've had is that I've used the create option in the reconcile screen to do quick reconciles where say I've missed a fully fledged Bill.
However it appears to have only generated a transaction marry-up.
It's got me total bamboozled and I'm now going to bed in a severely grumpy mood.
A small % of the income is revenue but the majority is a liability that is payable to the charity.
I referred to this note http://help.
com/#Report_ExportGL We exported EXPORTED GL TRANSACTIONS and tried to import but no luck.
Is that correct?
Where to from here?
The issue is key to us deciding on which online accounting product to choose.
However doing this results in the loss of some UK specific reporting such as VAT and is not technically right!
I look forward to everyone’s feedback.
We are only going to reimburse up to the limit of 15,000.
We have also paid these expense claims so everything is good there.
It doesn't show up the GST from the expense claims for expenses that happened in the period mentioned above.
Well, two months ago I logged in and pulled transactions in and there were NO suggestions.
if this was the result of an update?
Now the client wants a statement, which is by now completely out of whack.
Each student pays monthly automatically from PaySimple.
0 on my old computer.
I decided to research a company I purchase from regularly.
I made a screencast of this problemhttp://youtu.
Im guessing this would be a journal of some sought but wanted to check on here before i give it a go.
I've been using inventory items to track share purchases (very simply) but cannot enter unit prices above 3 decimal places (eg 1.
Is anyone else experiencing the same?
Therefore I have some vital questions:1. )
files from my online banking.
Also then again I have to print it every day and store in the according folders with the right number of our own system, so it can be tracked in the end?
It would be great to tie these two together for reporting reasons.
So I have several suppliers.
In the past I have used excel spreadsheets to track revenue, expenses and their GST components as well as wages and PAYG tax, super etc.
A list of money received for the quarter, money spent for the quarter, GST we have received and paid etc.
I have checked and re-checked and all of my entries appear to be correct.
Is there a "turn rule on" button I am missing?
I cannot work this out for the life of me!
I could not find a post in this regard and would appreciate your help.
My confusion?
Is my conceptual understanding correct?
Today I received an email from HMRC reminding me to file my VAT return.
But we are now exploring selling our services directly to small customers online.
We are using a service called Recurly to manage customer subscriptions and collect payments via Paypal.
It manages automated emails with customers.
For example right now when I click into an employee I can only access their 2013 PAYG PS.
We love showing our clients a P&L which gives them an idea of where their income/expenses have come from on a monthly basis.
It would be great to show clients they are actually getting closer to owning their home.
Check out advice on our blog from our panel of not for profit (NFP) experts about how best to manage finances within a non profit organization.
The panel is made up of non-profit practitioners and accountants from the US, NZ, and Australia.
They've offered up tips and tricks and also explain why the cloud makes perfect sense for non profits.
Hello,I am not completely sure how to deal with the following situation : the company sometimes needs to make cash-advance / short term loans to its employees.
The payee, in this case, is the Company.
This problem appears to apply to the entities with conversion balances.
Is that a journal entry idea and if so can someone break it down for me?
He told me that was not the correct way.
Currently it will appear in July.
It should have been accrued in July, which will mean it will appear twice.
A supplier credit note without a net figure doesn't seem to work!
How to we reconcile these?
And we only reconcile with them once every 2-3 months.
Am I going about this the right way?
I live in South London and have a small Property investment portfolio.
I'm looking for some advice.
I am unsure how to depreciate this item and over how many years.
We send out bills twice per month.
My customer pays me through a third party direct debit firm who deduct $15 setup fee (no GST), and 5% commission on the total amount collected ($28.
I have two amounts that make up this shortfall.
$15 (no GST) and $32.
55 income and $47.
Is that correct?
69 as income, make no attempt to record the $47.
All our credit card processing and subscription management is handled by a reseller company.
Hello thereWe are paying wages tonight for the 2011-2012 year but the wages are dated 3 July 2012.
Is there a quicker way?
Has anyone else found the same?
One of the properties has had a devaluation in 2009 and for reporting purposes we have this as a separate asset on the asset register with a negative balance.
However the system won't allow me to journal dr Wages Payable.
EDIT - I think I've found a way to do it.
Is this the correct way to do it?
Off the top of my head I gather I probably will have to create and journal entry .
All income in the company is then distributed to the shareholders (by journal) so my net result in the P & L will be 0.
My s-corporation has two shareholders 60/40.
For example lets say we record a $6000 USD withdrawal for shareholder #1, and a $4000 USD withdrawal for shareholder #2.
I thought there may be a better way of doing this.
This is the link which MYOB supply www.
my beginning balance is 0 which is true but after i reconcile i still have 0?
I have got two payments going out to IRD for Deductions.
So I'm guessing it should go against "Income Tax Expense", but that doesn't sound right either.
And I really have no idea what to do about the Kiwisaver stuff.
Actually I still have to get my head around the ESCT change too.
I have already placed the transactions in the system on the spend money facility as stated above.
I'm probably being very stupid here.
I. E. we order inventory part A and inventory part B from vendors which when combined form inventory item A.
We have setup our company.
I had to deactivate them ultimately after getting red error messages all over my dashboard.
Has anyone else had the above problem?
And if so, how to correct!
My question is why is this figure $400.
YOur advice would be appreciated Thanks
I have a customer security deposit that is sitting in current liabilities.
I want to sell a fixed asset to an entity at Net Book Value to a connected party.
That same party will also bill me separately a management fee for the same amount.
This means there will be no cash or VAT impact on either party.
As background info - I'm winding down a company and want to clear out the balance sheet.
I have a few properties and the letting agent takes their fees out of the rent.
So I get paid every month the rent minus the letting fees.
99 a month from "Letting agent X" to be paid to "850 - Suspense".
I appologise if this is simple or if I haven't explained properly.
Looking at the Balance Sheet I saw that our Fixed Assets were negative.
Coming from Quickbooks where a transactions have 3 states (uncleared, cleared, reconciled), I'm finding it difficult to balance/reconcile to a specific date because everything shows as reconciled when downloaded (vs cleared).
HiI don't know if anyone from the community can help but here it is.
i have emaile dsuppor but as yet no response besides auto responder.
My original login was al@e4m.
co. uk and i changed it to feed me@e4m.
I look forward to hearing from you soon.
I looked for a general journal entry but this doesn't give the option of itemising the inventory.
(this client provides 15 year guarantees on his product)
we converted a client from quickbooks.
has anyoneles had this issue or know how to resolve it?
We receive deposits from Customers for vehicles to be ordered and delivered in the future.
Despite the recent update that said Yodlee feeds should be updating automatically, I continue to have to update my ASB Credit Card feed manually.
This is incorrect - ASB FastNet Classic does not have two-factor authentication, and if I click the Refresh Feed button it happens without any further input (although it can take several minutes!
Needless to say what I've been given back doesn't make a lot of sense to me looking at my P & L so I'm now in the process of reviewing this.
80 per month and this is broken down as £19 charge for service & £2.
00Tax Rate = 20% (VAT on Expenses)Amount GBP = £19.
Oh and within General Settings > Financial Settings, I have the VAT Scheme set to None.
I have a client who raises an order as soon as the customer signs the customer.
The customer pays a number of deposits against this order prior to delivery.
HiI have a conversion date of 1 November 2011.
Her old accounting system did not record any of the paypal transactions.
I am now claiming the expenses back.
Every week we have anywhere between 2 and 250 unpaid direct debits, which are processed on a different accounting system.
We are based in the UK so deal primarily in GBP.
There is no problem running a P & L for the period but the balance sheet only runs to the month end and also the reconciliation reports do.
At the moment have set to 31 March year end and then adjusting the dates.
At the recent roadshow, several people asked how to convert PDF files to text so they can be imported to XeroA relatively cheap solution can be found at www.
I have to generate a bill to the customer for the part-xchanged goods.
I'm in receipt of what now becomes a stock item (i. e. a current asset).
But I don't know how to clear that bill as paid when I'm in receipt of the goods.
The only thing I cannot seem to do is apply the write off (run depreciation) in the previous years.
How can i run write offs for 2015-16 and 2016-17?
Hope that makes sense to you all.
Am I doing something wrong, how does everyone else breakdown their batched payments to match against individual payments?
I am trying to figure out how to input all the purchases I have made.
I hope that I am missing something as to me it would beggar belief that there is no way to input purchases which were paid in full.
I purchase items to sell which are bought in bulk ie I purchase a bulk pack of 6 items for $25.
Have a separate tracked inventory item for the sale of the item.
Also, does this mean that my profit on cost of goods sold would not be recorded for individual item reporting purposes?
One owner used his own debit card to purchase 919.
We currently have separate accounting systems - one for the London office, and one for the Hong Kong office.
Does anyone have experience with this, and can advise on what would be the best option for us?
Should I enter a manual transaction for this?
I have emailed support, but thought this may direct me to the right place quicker.
Then I go to the check styles section and get a notice that this has been updated.
HiI run a small salon and am using iZettle to take and record both cash and card payments.
Book keeping is not my forte and this is causing me a huge headache!
But no, it is creating me more problems and extra work!
Assuming I take a loan with a roll up of interest and fees using the hypothetical figures £100000 loan, £10000 interest and £100 fees.
The total liability is therefore £110100.
Until the loan is repaid in full it needs to show as £110100 liability.
How can I check off the money paid to me is as per services rendered to my client?
Lloyds have found no anomalies so it must be a yodlee thing.
I am getting fed up with these not working.
Please can someone explain why this is as the debtors figure is now totally incorrect!
Getting really frustrated by this as there is a considerable amount of money involved.
Each day when we deliver we take returns of any bread not sold on that day and return it to our supplier - they credit us for the returns.
It currently has <<UnitAmount>> and <<LineAmount>> Is it possible to change?
I would be grateful if you could look into this for me.
Anybody else out there have similar issues or fixes?
OK if I have a question.
Basically I have a large number of firms I contract to.
Is it doable?
Originally designed for the foodservice industry (back-of-house), we think that we can benefit multiple industry's with our technology.
-Do you find it difficult obtaining quotes to compare pricing?
2) Create an platform to place 1 order to multiple wholesalers (by email or fax).
4) Alert your wholesaler/supplier of these discrepancies.
We are only looking for 15 participants.
Honest and unfiltered constructive feedback at the end of the 14 day trial.
What will we give you?
Free access to our basic tier subscription for 12 months.
Feel free to reach out to me at st@owna.
Some of my Supplier and Customer balances have gone completely haywire.
In short my Credit card was hacked a few weeks ago, have had issues obtaining replacement card as it was sent to our previous address.
One of my old employees has now contacted me to say that he's lost his 2015-2016 group certificate and wants another copy.
We are now at a level were it is very hard to keep track of all the customers so any feedback is much appreciated!
I'll give an example of one:Client sells mattresses and he operates out of a small warehouse (ie big garage).
It's completely unreasonable for him to keep 1 or more of every item he sells on-hand but he has a relationship with a supplier that over night things to him once a week.
So he sells it to them.
We have tried everything locally with Metro helpdesk but cannot move forward.
Each van has a code set up for repairs and another for fuel/oil and another for tyres.
My query is where do I record the VAT?
I am seeking an app to enable Clients to make credit card payments in Singapore.
After searching the Community I am unable to find any reference to same, so here I am.
Which is fabulous.
Is there anything similar in Singapore?
When i print or email statements to customers, under where it lists the Reference - it only shows "CustON:'.
- the column isnt big enough to display the full reference which includes the address and is very helpful.
I've started a small company with me as the only employee & shareholder this year.
I have been coding my 'salary' payments against 'Owner A Drawings' in accordance to what I read on IRD's website:Shareholder-employees can periodically draw money from the company.
nz/how-to/taxrates-codes/bit-taxrates-companytax.
We would also have billable expenses down the track for these clients.
Mr. Jxxxx thinks he has right to have a full claim of his cleaning cost performed by www.
8 as an expense and 0.
By month end this will have become unmanageable.
It doesn't allows me to do USD in the system I bought.
How can I record this purchase so it is properly coded and then reconciled?
com/us/Save-Us-From-BerlusconiWhen it normally reads:https://www.
com/us/I did a quick search on the term and didn't really find anything on it, except that it could be a sign of a site getting hacked.
Direct job costs (materials and subcontractors), 2.
I can't seem to figure out a way to do it.
Say I went to  B&Q and brought:2 x Dulux Paint £20.
00Could I enter the receipt as Painting materials -  £27.
My FY runs from 1st April - 31 March, but my PI insurance renewal falls in September.
Or, should I be handling this type of transaction differently?
It was five transactions totalling $600 but I only received $500 back from them.
I tried expense claims (incorrect) and adding a bill, but then I can't reconcile them.
Or is it another method?
We dont know why.
It seems really odd that this is missing.
Our expensed are generally recharged to the clients for whom we deliver the course.
However I can not authorise the millage clams  it because they have no receipt  Typically each trainer will have 10-15 different journeys for 4-5 different clients.
We often then recharge mileage to a number of different clients, so each journey has to be recorded separately.
How can we process these expenses especially mileage without uploading a receipts.
In which case we might as well stick with our existing manual process.
I can make expense claims through the mobile app but image upload keeps failing.
Now I'm not sure if I have done it incorrectly.
I have a flexirent agreement for our laptops.
so have quite a few transactions.
However, when I go to the Overpayment and to 'Overpayment options' I don't have the option to 'Allocate Credit'.
This means that rather than a balance of a few hundred dollars I now have an unreconciled balance of >$8m.
We have a customer who has paid for their "group" .
In the remittance they have taken up a credit for one entity (customer card).
However that customer card doesn't owe as much as the credit note and they have applied the residual to another customer card within their group.
I have expense claims and when I submit for approval it tells me they are incomplete?
not sure what is incomplete as they are all assigned codes and tax rates.
Also my subbies Ive put on expense claims is that correct?
I hope this makes sense, it is doing my head in!
com with the Subject "Beta Request".
I've been running through my PayPal feeds and in cash coding and attempting to reconcile all transactions, I spotted something curious.
At first, I thought that this might have something to do with multiple banks (US v. CAD PayPal), but upon checking all feeds, all reconciled transactions, all unmapped transactions, there is no transaction that corresponds to collecting money for a transaction that has a fee present.
One of £35.
70 and one of £84.
60 which left a balance of £115.
60 short I can see this transaction but cannot for the life of me select so I can reconcile,regardsJeremy
The vehicle is not in the company name.
Essentially the company is paying for the directors personal vehicle.
I have tried a minor adjustment but that doesn't work either as the amount is over £1.
Hello,I am seeing a balance sheet for the year of 2016 that shows an historical balance of (€6,804.
Why would my share holder loan shows this as historical balance please?
is in place.
I really wish I started book keeping from the beginning.
Now I've have almost 1 years worth of inputting data.
I have a few basic questions that I can ask.
Currently I'm in my dashboard, creating rules for my transactions.
Can I have 2 rules for VRBO, one for VRBO debits and another for VRBO credits?
So my statement might show a $6.
95 charge and a $6.
4) I have 3 Airbnb properties, how should I keep track of each of them individually?
Each place has separate income and expenses.
5) I had to travel to purchase these homes and to get them ready to list on Airbnb, how to I record airfare transactions?
That's all for now.
I searched the community for an answer.
1 - It imported transactions from 01 December to date.
I have now deleted the statement which was easy to do so all sorted here.
But nonetheless this needs sorting quickly.
If I have a user that has "Read Only" permissions and they download the IOS (or Android) App, do these role permissions flow to the App?
and reconcile?
I have noticed this as I have ticked "send me a copy" option when emailing my client.
Please help pulling my hair out!
I find the videos really frustrating and I don't learn well by watching these.
We are considering starting invoicing in the customer's local currency which brings exchange rates into consideration for us as well as transfer fees.
Then they file GST with the IRD.
As you might appreciate, I can't necessarily have an objective discussion with my accountant on the issue given this represents a loss of revenue on their part.
i know its got to be there but i cant find it
Despite being instructed to turn the customer facing portal off on December 15, our web developer did not.
This means before I started to earn revenue, I was paying for everything I needed to start the company with my personal credit card.
The company I run finance for has nearly 200 employees.
Prior to this role, I was running another medium sized firm that had 600.
(We did implement Netsuite around that point though and hit 800 before I left)Revenue wise, we are near $20m USD annually and growing, with 14,000+ customers.
I run a collective of artists who reimburse me for exhibition expenses I make on their behalf and mine.
By my way of asking the question, you can tell I'm a noob when it comes to accounting.
But I'm a fast learner!
Would really appreciate some advice on how to secure my environment.
HiI receive regular rent payments and wonder if the facility to have payments entered regularly automatically is available.
Hey everyone,I’ve got a company in Australia which consists of one employee (me).
Most of my earnings are coming from consulting, but I also have passive, recurring income from an online software I sell.
My priority at the moment is saving money for an investment property (20% deposit).
Will it look odd from the lenders perspective if I didn’t have any income for a whole year?
The dynamic links .
«Amount»=Total Total would be the field that I linked to the dynamic variable.
but its not totally at the bottom of the bill?
do i always have to put a qty and unit price?
This is because my occupation requires purchasing outright, or subscribing to, software that charges me in USD or GBP.
If it is I can't find it.
I have a standing order set up for this.
The sync generally works without issue for most parts, however, i recently began a tracked inventory and ever since this point it has become a nightmare.
This then makes more work for me as all end of day data has to be manually altered for the EOD sync to take full effect.
Unlike PayPal the fees charged don't come through as seperate to the total transaction.
We have a customer that is also an advisor for us.
He also has a bill from us in which he owes us $6000.
He wanted us to write him a check for $4000 for what we owe him.
Apply the remaining $4000 to what he owes us, leaving $2000 remaining on his bill to be paid later.
I can do a full year comparison but I can't find a way to do a monthly comparison.
And I have a private car.
All other fuel goes on personal debit card.
I was thinking that would be the right thing to do, but now I'm wondering if I've created more confusion.
(*In case you're wondering - it has to be a limited company because no-one will consider grant / social tech funding for sole traders/individuals).
I'm confused about which ones I should be reconciling to.
I have a situation.
Suggest how to do.
for our company.
Do I have to go back over the every transaction and take the VAT off somehow?
I currently do this on excel at the moment.
I suspect it's something to do with the way that I've coded the expenses in the first place.
Any ideas as to how to code them properly so the VAT will be included?
From start to finish, a project may take up to 2 months to complete (an important detail for below).
Adhering to my understanding of the accrual method of accounting we want to be realizing that value we're delivering progressively.
That in mind, we  want to be invoicing our customer 2 or 3 times during a project (hurts customer experience).
The issue I am having is surrounding travel expenses for client projects.
This is sloppy at best, and error prone at worst.
I've looked at MoveMyBooks but they only cover Sage and Quickbooks conversions.
We generally buy all our materials off the same supplier who has a website where we can search each product individually and see our cost.
When we do invoicing at the moment we are manually entering each item one by one and looking up the website to see our cost.
I have pressed the Redo button on a few of the transactions but had already reconciled payments.
We did not doing anything different such as deleting the files.
Is going to contacts the only way to update telephone numbers
It would streamline sending items such as contracts, terms and conditions etc.
I now wish to delete that field column.
I would presume it is the theme but that doesn't seem to be it.
also allowing for changes/amendments after completing the job.
Have a great Wednesday.
Should I instead be tagging it as one of the following instead:960 - Retained Earnings970 - Owner A Share CapitalCheers.
Something needs to be done.
Ive been using stripe for a while now.
And all I can say is, it sucks.
The owner had contributions from other family members.
One of these appears to be from a Spend Money Transaction which was incorrectly entered and then deleted.
The transaction was deleted almost as soon as it was entered so was not mistakenly reconciled or anything else.
What is the correct way for me to remove the GST component so it is not showing on my GST late filed return.
I have already enter inventory and opening balances, so I dont what it to posted there.
I have created an excel spreadsheet so that I can keep track of Income and expenses so that I know roughly how much I can safely withdraw as a wage each week.
I have worked out my yearly budget and broken it down into weekly amounts so that I know how much I have to save towards bills and yearly expenses.
The Cash Summary is good as you can include the GST in the totals however you are unable select individual dates - it is only available in monthly format.
I posted and expense and paid it, I then realised it's in the wrong currency, I have to delete the whole thing and start again.
(I am the book keeper btw)We start making payments next month.
However, I have found it can be good for SME owners to focus and talk about the financial issues they have to help get clarity and work on how they address such issues.
Looking forward to your responseThanksMike Capper
In these cases is easy because I match them to the Month Year placeholders.
Sadly we weren't notified that this has been occurring, yet a search shows that is has indeed be happening.
However in the P&L and the budget we only want to have one line Marketing.
For example, last month my credit card bill was say 2K and constituted many different items, 6 different diesel payments, concrete, rebar, drills, drill bits.
Perhaps, something in red on the dashboard would be useful?
Hope someone can assist me with this so my first staff member can be paid today.
This rubbish has been going on for months.
think Im going back to my old system/bookeeping.
slow but reliable.
Once you get one wrong it all starts compounding.
If you do have a problem you will know because the date of the suggested match will be far different from the date of the transaction you are trying to match and there are no other transactions that it could be matched against.
First note down the date and amount of the suggested match/unreconciled transfer.
Show statement lines and then search by exact date and exact amount.
Click on the transaction and in the "Reconciled transaction details" screen you should see that it has been matched with a transfer with the wrong date click "Remove & Redo".
TIP: In almost all cases "Remove and Redo" is the better option.
What to do?
Total on both sides £200.
I've put in an expense claim for all the claimed rent for the last financial year and coded it as rent.
Have I done something wrong here?
I am sure there must be a simple solution!
It adds up to quite a bit so I'm sure this should have some effect on my profit and loss and should be recorded.
The TB shows a balance of &#163;5,111.
The general Ledger shows &#163;5,889.
98 but this reflects an opening balance at 31st March 2016 which makes no sense.
Can anyone explain what is going on so that I can file my VAT return to 30th Sept tomorrow - with some confidence that it is correct!
It also provides summary sub totals and is exportable as a CSV file.
We developed this for a customer who is happy to offer the software to other users in exchange for a small contribution to the development costs and our hosting fee.
Hello All,I have been reconciling my transactions today and notice that on the 12/10/16 - 3 transactions were duplicated.
i have now reconciled everything but have left the duplications - they are still showing in my "to be reconciled.
Look forward to your repliesSue
Example: I have a debit of $30 and a deposit of $14 to and from the hire company.
(Cost of hiring was $16).
HiI have used my company credit card to buy some goods online, I took a picture of the receipt and logged it as an expense against the company credit card.
I recently entered an expense claim to be reimbursed.
Hope that all makes sense to someone :-)TIA for your response
I am interested to know which credit card feeds people have had most success with.
as well my other requests.
I have emailed 3x times.
I have called RBC 3 times and they have assured me that there are no blocks on their end.
We carry most of our tasks in house such as day to day accounting, GST and PAYE returns.
I have claimed the gst on full purchase price.
I have an inventory of over 1000 items.
com rates for simplicity / to determine equivalent $CA.
Obviously would prefer the simplest solution (xe.
I have raised a PO to buy in t-shirts that I am selling.
MorenaIs anyone else having trouble with the search engine top right hand side of page?
Is there a workaround that's not creating 3 different contact cards?
However, because i am human I sometimes make mistakes.
This is entirely my fault but has sometimes happened because I have been distracted by the phone for example in the middle of the procedure.
That way, it would be impossible for me to forget to do it.
Completely my fault.
Only trouble is that I've been categorising them incorrectly and filing the purchases as fixed assets under the assets tab.
So the bill may be divided by a dozen or more people.
We have more than 30 horses.
Feedback is greatly appreciated.
Hello,I am entering expenses claims.
(advance to staff)I want to route through:1.
Debit expenses and credit staff 2.
I have an investment which is $50k tranched with three payments over 3 years.
A number of my home office expenses are the same amount every week (e. g. rent) or month (e. g. insurance).
Is this approach sound or is there a better way?
I'm trying to import transactions (originating from Mint.
com) but as you can see in the below screenshot, even-though for Transaction Type 'debit' is specified, the transaction is imported as 'credit'.
See example statement line left bottom of screenshot.
Even the ones I have ticked as not wanting to be shown for expenses.
If you submit via the App you get the whole list!
I have looked online to find out the various tax rules and regulations and have printed out scarily huge piles of information.
Is there a quick way of doing this?
Good morning, I have a question for you.
I do t want to duplicate the expense.
We are currently doing this via tracking categories and assigning a code to each project and then allocating income and expenses against this category.
However I am not naive enough to think this is the full picture.
I keep around $100 in there to cover the cost of a fuel fill up.
Is the Budget the way to do it?
so bare with me for a sec.
We sell premium coffee beans.
To do so we have to purchase coffee bags & stickers.
Thx to you all!
I look forward to hearing back from you as I am so surprised that this is not available!
My husband has a small limited company and I've been doing his book work (not my forte though!
(I have tried to look at previous discussions on this but am getting confused as to whether it's a liability or an equity.
And I'm assuming NI is 826.
I'm hoping this covers it all or is there anything else I should be doing?
Hopefully this is the correct procedure!
Am I doing this the right way?
Wondering if it's possible to increase the higher number to above 200?
Also, it would be easier if the page numbers were at the top of the page as well as the bottom to allow faster flick through the pages without having to scroll to the bottom.
The contractor is VAT registered, and therefore added 20% to final bill submitted to client.
Should my percentage be calculated from total including VAT, or ex VAT?
20% makes a huge difference and I want to be sure I'm doing the right thing by my client, by HMRC, and by myself.
Hello all,Apologies if this is the wrong forum.
Perhaps it should be under Accounting.
I assume it is Purchase VAT at the Exempt rate, but I want to be sure.
the discrepancy is causing an imbalance in my reconciliation.
This could also be 3 weeks later or more when the refund request comes up.
I knew about this particular one because of its huge past due amount.
( as it has happened before).
For exemple:This month I will create a bill for company Xin the description:John Woz  amount $550.
How can I un-publish so as my BAS figures will be correct?
77 for Postage, Courier (Code 425) is showing in the Trial Balance as Heating Lighting (Code 445).
I have entered the Conversion Balance of &#163;1337.
She has been paid £500 every Monday for three weeks - i. e. a total of £1500.
ie - you are building a deck and it requires posts, the decking timber, and screws, which you put in your quote separately, however want to make this one line that says "Deck" and $X - because the customer doesn't require that much detail.
However want the detail on our side for invoicing purposes.
The client on retainer is asking for my SSN.
Is this something that I should provide them with?
I wasn't aware that businesses had to provide other businesses with a personal SSN from the owner?
I am a little on  edge handing over my SSN or EIN to a client but unsure of proper procedures for retainer work.
When I get bills from one particular supplier (Telstra) they have a very odd gst component.
It always wants to put in the 10% and I can't edit it.
How can I put in a custom amount of gst when entering a bill that i get?
If I leave it as is then I end up paying the government too much money - at least according to my Telstra bill.
My company has a number of suppliers who have their payments sent out via direct debit.
We are looking for beta testers of the integration.
8% of respondents who have introduced electronic payslips say they have seen benefits from doing so, however 11.
My year end is August 1.
How can i start fresh on August 1st?
Please let me know if there is a magic restart button.
- all expenses are generally paid on credit card.
I had to purchase some airfares and such on my personal credit card.
Note that I'm a sole trader, so the whole expensing thing is mainly to keep the books clear as it's all one legal entity anyway.
It seems needlessly complicated.
To clarify, I purchase an item/stock for resale.
We tried Squares Cash.
Hello,For the past couple of years I have been managing my transfers from PayPal incorrectly.
It doesn't seem ideal to continue my book-keeping from here on with a debt that is in reality not present.
If you are interested please call Louis Mills on 07973 727 865  or email us:  info@garagerefurb.
My customers orders vary greatly day to day, both in quantity and multiple items.
Repeating monthly invoicing is not a solution.
Its a workaround, and makes the draft folder messy.
What about those of us with 10 to 15 products to sell.
I have worked out two possible options (I have also read a few community forum feeds) but they both have pro's and cons.
I have submitted a tax return to the IRD to claim donations I made in the last fiscal year.
Now I don't know which code to choose to reconcile?
Try again by going back to your previous page.
If the issue continues, check out the Help Center.
The creation of a copy of the General Ledger to excel is a lifesaver, but why can I not print a simple Journal without using excel and re-sequencing the Ledger?
I created a number of credit notes for customers earlier in the year.
I have tried different ways and looked it up with no answers.
So far I haven't seen any Remove and Redo option for the credit note.
(current financial year, soon to be 17. .
and one of them has 999. .
and is still listed before numbers starting with 16. .
Is it the system problem?
Or is there a way I've not thought of?
I am in state of Virginia, USA.
I am looking for some assistance with expense claims.
I'm curious as to how I should be recording stock sold if the customer who purchases health and mobility equipment from us comes under the VAT Relief act.
We buy stock from UK Manufacturers - The stock we buy has VAT on them however when a customer buys, for instance, a mobility scooter and suffers from a health condition that allows them to be VAT Exempt we supply the goods to them at the VAT Free price.
When doing our current VAT repayment period we are showing to be paying a huge amount of VAT even though we haven't charged our customers as they are legally exempt from VAT.
Unknown op code for conditional.
e. g. I have a unit that costs $300.
tax is configured in the settings as tax inclusive.
However, I also have overseas customers.
This appears incorrect to me.
Should we put it in the reference box or in the description?
and where do we put the check number?
Thought I'd share my weekend project.
50% of our power bill is being claimed.
Is there a video I can watch?
The total cost before discount came to &#163;25.
01, the cost after discount came to &#163;15.
Is there a way to ensure all customer payments are entered so that they can be reconciled?
Simple food and beverage transactions.
What's the best and easiest people have found?
In other words, I make PO detailing parts required from vendor along with costs for each line item.
So, I go to the purchase order and turn it into a bill.
Please let me know of better way.
Everything seemed ok on the reports which I was going to download and send to my accountant.
But then I decided maybe I needed to enter the balances from before the start of my financial year!
If someone can point me in the right direction here it would be great.
Having trouble knowing what to do from here.
We've used WFM for about 8 years and loved it.
But it's particular biggest fall down is scheduling and collaboration.
Is it possible to pull or convert something that I have put in as a Bill/Purchase onto an expense claim?
I know it's not earned income yet.
All our employees are entitled to Annual Leave.
In other systems that I have used the actual accrual rate will be automatically recorded once I have assigned the leave to an employee, and hence it is error free and also global changes can be made if the amounts changeThanks
I have a number of small imports which I am charged for by the post office on delivery.
I now also want to sell digital products, i. e online course, membership subscription etc.
The dilemma is that the purchase and receipts are handled through Stripe via Kajabi, automatically.
They would be small amount each transaction but I predict there will be huge number of them, not practical to do a manual invoicing for each one.
HiSo when it comes to the credit card, I'm not sure how to reconcile.
Happy to clarify if needed.
Shouldn't be too hard to do?
But there is also Manufacturing and Packaging as well.
As in I put in $300 and then the GST rate of 10% is added to the amount additionally.
How can I set this inclusive GST rate in my Tax Settings?
as a bookkeeper, while I find it annoying to deal with, its relatively easy to figure out.
And don't tell me to turn off the automatic feed and import them myself - that is a clumsy workaround, and not a long term solution to a fundamental error!
Is there a more elegant way?
I have yet another reports question.
thx in advance for your help.
i. e. so I have a triangle of data being shared automatically.
We manufacture to order so have a 14 day turnaround.
We can have loads of open orders on various deadlines and it all gets confusing when we are really busy.
D)A CRM system which pulls the above all together, showing order history, notes on customers etc.
I currently run on which kind of does it, but it is rather long winded and prone to human error.
I have looked  and can't see anything suitable.
As a plumbing company we do buy materials and on-sell these to the customer.
I have been coding these materials to an Expense code I have called Materials.
Then I recorded two lines under this one transaction, one for interest received which I put under Interest Income (code 270).
Can't see a way of entering Unit of Sale?
I hope this is the right place to post this.
Is there a best practice?
I have received a couple of statements from our big plumbing suppliers.
However a few things are tools or protective clothing etc.
We also then gt a bill once a quarter which has a varying balance based on the usage less the bill smoothing payments.
For example, I send out quote QN-1980.
I could not find anything in the Help Documentation Thank you in advance,Roland
I get a bill from Verizon for $420.
Only sending to primary contact person.
Upon reviewing our BAS's, I realised that the BAS has been reported in Accrual basis instead of Cash.
I was wondering if someone could guide me about the right accounting treatment for such costs.
Hello Forum, I want you guys to share some good information about  in Dubai.
I am interested to buy freehold property so land title will be on my name, I know property market goes up down, but I am want to hear more risk in buying property overseas.
I base this on a total of incoming revenue vs outgoing expenses, more or less.
HiI'm Jade and I've recently had to set up as a Limited company.
For example nails, thread sealant, silicone.
Also if we do buy an item that gets charged on to the client such as a shower head, what code do we put this under?
Is there any way i can put a car reg somewhere when entering bills so that i can see at a glance how much a vehicle has cost.
I'm with eWay currently, good service and has a lot of room to grow.
We had a debit card refund from a supplier.
HiHoping someone can give me a quick fix on this.
I have no idea why this is or what has happened.
I am not sure why or what to do with it?
We are an importing company and place orders which could take up to three months to be delivered.
My questions: 1.
Secondly, when entering bills such as the accountants monthly charges, would these be entered as a bill.
And the same question for vehicle registration/insurance?
Is there a way of bulk deleting statements or do I have to do this one by one?
Is this correct, or should they be "No Tax"?
00 too much.
Does anyway know if this is even a working feature?
Hello everyone, ill try and be as concice as possible.
Here is my set up.
The easy part I have found is reconciling card payments I make to suppliers.
But that for me is where the ease endsIssue 1.
At the end of the day we may have taken &#163;525 in cash (&#163;475 in notes and &#163;50 in variouse denominations of coins).
I believe I'll move him to Veeqo but not yet.
Previously they kept a spreadsheet of Profit and Loss, for filing their Self Assessment with HMRC as it was straight forward.
An initial test suggests that I can edit approved supplier bills after they have been approved but I am not sure if that is frowned upon or not strictly allowed.
My book keeper has told me to stop as she is having to cancel and re enter them as bills.
I am self-employed and the only person in my company.
Should this be filed under expenses or as a bill?
I put on training camps across the country and my customers change every year.
Eg I have a discounted unit price of 10.
84 but if I have 10 items the total is 108.
00 which I think should make it show more places but it doesn't seem to work.
Trying to work out which is the best way!
I have two scenarios that I'd be really appreciative if someone could talk me thorough.
I have a job where I have a daily rate - let's say &#163;1000.
00 and I'm allowed to claim expenses on this job, let's train a train ticket for &#163;20, and a lunch receipt of &#163;10 - of which I have receipts for and will have to send a copy to the client.
Say 45p a mile for 100 miles.
I realise a lot of this may be personally preference but would love to get your advice!
All the information in my adjustments is correct EXCEPT I was choosing the month and day of the wrong year.
So I was trying to enter my inventory adjustments for 2015 but now they're all showing as inventory adjustments for 2016.
Is it really possible that Zero designed their system so once you make an adjustment you cannot edit it?
I imagine that it's not too uncommon for someone to have to edit an inventory adjustment, be it for a more accurate cost, quantity, or the date as in my case.
Is there anything?
So, I'm trying to reconcile our 2015 year end counts.
We have the physical counts.
Go to Reports > Inventory Item Summary > Last Financial Year - Settings: Item Code; Closing Balance; Closing Quantity.
76 for Closing Balance.
Go to Reports > Balance Sheet > December 2015.
It's a really simple company and I cannot find anywhere else the balances might be, nor can anyone else (physically) here.
Hello,I know this could be a question up to personal preference but would appreciate your view.
Would I code that as 320 Direct Wages, 477 Salary or something else?
I'm not sure if it is a direct cost - although as we work on commission you could argue it is.
or is there another way, I was hoping that all of this equipment could be used to offset tax.
I want to put some procedures in place.
Well sell concessions and spirit wear.
We will be using it a lot.
Ive had a search for this and there are three treads which seem to discuss a similar thing, however each are missing one key fact.
Firstly the background.
All ok from here.
HOWEVER, and this is where it gets odd.
We have accumulated depreciation for each year.
If anyone has a solution I would appreciate the help.
It isn't many and tends to be the same customers.
This is is spite of them being supplied with full statements going back to the last nil balance.
We are looking to implement an online training system to assist in the onboarding and ongoing development of the team.
Has anyone done such a project or had any experience with the following softwareLitmosMindflashELMOGrovoOr have you had a good experience with another software?
Preferably Byron bay or Brisbane but happy to work remotely.
Must be efficient and proactive.
Especially because of credit card fees.
Want to set the financial year to show from 1st Dec 2014 to 30th Nov 2015.
I am unsure of how to handle this.
After a head start I suppose I will remember each for the future:- paying for yearly web hosting services- paying for web domain yearly registration- paying for ip telephony charges- Non-Sterling transaction fee charged by VISA for non GBP payments- paying overseas company for commercial samples of product for the intent of testing quality and maybe having them manufacture them- buying products from competitors to asess their qualiy- paying for software license- paying for VPN services- paying for custom manufacturing of products overseas- paying to third party quality inspection company overseas for making inspection to goods manufactured for meThank you very much in advance!
We registered for VAT which started on the 1st Jan 2015.
Can you advise how we can rectify?
So I have to take up the gross and nett that off with the nett rental and the expenses.
or is it?
We want these to be bang up to date each day, but sometimes supplier bills are delayed coming in, which in turn distorts the GP figures.
I have clients who run their businesses on a 4, 4, 5 basis.
We are using it for a strictly retail shop.
Is this the wrong software for me ?
Thanks guys any advice is great appreciated.
Unfortunately, it seems that expense claims only work with employees.
When I looked at timetable of scheduled feed there is nothing under Paypal Australia.
2) Is it possible to have a EFT/Check and a C. C option on from the same provider?
Hello Everyone,First Software develop and support Cloud ERP software for Retailers and Distributors called N2 ERP, N2 ERP is seven years old and well proven in a range of businesses.
We are live with one so far and have another about to test.
Details here: www.
co. nz  We also build websites that utilise our ecommerce functionality.
co. nz for more information
When I print, it looks bad and I can't work with it.
I own a domain name (personally) and have found a buyer for a few thousand dollars.
The domain would only be in the possession of the company for a 24 hour period and is not related to the company's normal operations.
Is this the normal way to handle adhoc reselling of goods?
I thought there would be a few internet guides on this but can't find anything.
When the other company's paid an expense of this company then we transfer the money to the credit card and decrease the balance.
We have been requested to provide a 'hire bond' on the amount of $500, which we did 4 months ago.
We have now finished the hire, and the last rent fees have been deducted from the bond (the value of $300).
As well as a Credit for the amount of $200.
If I get this reconciliation wrong, can it be fixed by an accountant when submitting tax files?
Simple, practical approach is appreciated.
I have given them COE Codes of 900, 901, 902, 903 etc.
I have also set the Tax to "No VAT".
Depending on the above, are they Liabilities - current, non-current, liabilityAsset - fixed, current, non-current, pre-paymentOr non of the above!
and a purchase order number available for entry on the bill screen.
If there is someone out there who could contact me and help me I should be most grateful!
I am wondering how to code the tax paid on my Salary amounts.
Any thoughts about coding the tax paid on salary?
And as I have many deductions for propty etc then I get tax back.
So shoudl these amounts be coded as expenses or liability?
Our typical fee structure sees us charging 1%pa of the liquid assets.
I would be very interested to see how you work around some of the complex processes.
Is there a better solution?
She's spent about a month getting our books setup and caught up.
I have looked as using Zapier.
So the process I have come up with is1.
Am I on the right track here.
Is there a better way of doing it?
I went into another customer and I can see it sent.
This is only one customer out of many that should have received it!
I'm doing a work around for expense claims.
I want to import a bill that is on a csv file.
HiI'm adding a water bill to my purchases.
Please see image for clearer detail (IVA = VAT in Portugal)
they're not my customer b. )
Is that still the only solution?
For example:Office rental = €1000Tax on building rentals = 25%    (ouch, right?
But still having same issue.
So, I'm trying to get my head around setting up the correct rules.
This is a a little odd as all my expenses are paid up.
- This screen, despite having date ranges for the entire financial year, only shows a very small portion of my expenses.
Also I get totally confused with importing and exporting files.
Is this normal or something I have done.
the company credit card was compromised, and there was one rather large amount that they charged to the card.
or enter the amount spent, and then the refund?
Inventory is one meaning that we have to still run both systems.
The unpaid expense claims don't appear in the expenses section.
I don't want to track inventory.
Any inventory (at this stage) will be minimal, and any change in inventory well under the ATO's $5000 limit for mandatory stocktaking.
but I am transitioning from MYOB and I am used to having it there.
such as my health fund provider number etc.
I'm sure there must be a better way?
in the paypal feed the transaction is split into to 2 line items.
1, the total value before fee deduction and 2, the paypal fee.
also for clarity, VAT is charged to the total transaction value before fee deduction and NO VAT is charged on the fees.
i've created a rule but i still have to hit ok for each fee line.
Expenses - Wages Salary or Liabilities - Wages Payable?
Am I best to put this through as an expense claim or can I put this through as a Purchase Bill?
Sorry, probably very basic but can't get my heads around it.
Would it still be cost of goods sold or depreciation?
I have set up "Cash Sale Client" Under contacts.
I edit all the field I want to be kept.
I then raise a quote using "Cash Sale" as my client.
I then email quotation to the client by manually placing an email address in the relevant field and hit send.
I review the email address I manually entered into the specified area is now stored as the primary email address for "CASH SALE".
This was due to me manually entering it when I sent the quotation.
My partner is a screenprinter, so purchases clothing requested by clients from suppliers (GST included) and then screen prints the garments and sells them onto the clients.
My question is, would GST be accounted for on both the purchase from supplier and on the sale to customer?
For example:Our product is €29 inclusive in IRELAND - VAT rate is 23%.
How do I change it to mine.
Recently I switched from windows to mac and by mistake when converted i used an window backup file, which is 3 months old.
Instead I should have switch from mac file.
That is now not happening i. e. the "sent" is not changing to "viewed".
Is there a setting issue ?
We haven't looked at reconciling what we receive with payments from customers and assume that we are not being ripped off by the credit card company.
It dates back to 2006 and is a minor amount less than $6.
I realise it is in a Locked Period.
Should I void it?
Edit it?
or do some kind of reversal entry to write it off?
5%, Extra protection costs and these all change daily.
thought it might be a one off, but there is a second one missing for another company.
10 (the 2.
I have been operating two businesses separately for about a year now.
I want to merge them in to one.
From an accounting stand point this is not a big deal.
So Web hosting for one biz is the same as the other.
Also if I make a mistake can I roll it back?
That is a very long process when you are quickly trying to scan through your reconcile screen for review before clicking Ok on each auto-match.
I have set up my budget using the Budget Manager.
When I set my stationery budget I put in so much for paper, so much for printing, scanning, etc.
I am associated with a small B2B service start-up that is currently using excel spreadsheets, and manual invoicing.
nz or find out more at http://ow.
updating the inventory?
Estimates vs budgets vs invoicing (estimates is our estimate of project cost VS budgets - actual budgeted quotes received from sub-contractors VS invoicing - what we quote to client)2.
Also ability to charge % complete incl variations - eg painting value of quote $100,000 + variation A for particular item $20,000 + variation B for a different area $5,000.
Ability to provide a summary BY JOB for ALL subbie info - being subbie info, budget, contract value, variations, retention info, Progress claims to date, amount left to claim on contract/variations etc.
We will convert up to 10 of your customers for FREE.
And Taking was of $600 on eftpos and nearly $300 on cash.
However, since the budget announcement of immediate write off of assets under $20K, my client has started purchasing larger items of furniture to hire out.
So, my question is, are these larger items assets if they are being hired out?
I have never come across this scenario before.
I have already paid tax on this amount.
I have sold a microphone which is listed as a Low Cost Asset in my Fixed Assets Register.
Or is there something else that I may have overlooked here?
Other than writing quotes the package is light on with CRM tools.
When I tab across and enter this, the GST % disappears!
This happens on most of my quotes - after saving the quote sometimes they reappear, but not consistently.
Anyone else having the same issue?
Dear all, newbie here.
here's the thing.
Is there a trick I'm missing in terms of "Contacts"?
How hard are these cash transactions going to be to reconcile?
e. g. the receipt shows:Item A $50 + GSTItem B $25 + GSTSubtotal = $82.
Please try againIt's possible the problem you have encountered is temporary.
We're on itIf this is a problem you've encountered before, it's likely we're already fixing it.
We keep a record of every error that occurs and regularly review and set about fixing them so they don't happen again.
Including details such as the specific steps which lead up to the problem and the name of the organisation will help us identify the problem and resolve it.
To view the whole post including the pictures to clarify all of the points check out I think you’ll find something amazing starting to happen on Google:Google is making it easier for small businesses to appear on the front page and get all that free Google traffic for your store!
’Within the first month he was ranking on the front page of Google and here is where it gets crazy: The keyword ‘buy car Auckland’ alone gets 2,000 searches each month from local, qualified people who are interested in buying a car in Auckland.
Take advantage of it!
Before we dive into the fun stuff let me explain even more benefits of local.
The same goes for if you’re searching for a hairdressers.
It makes sense to show the hairdressers in your area before it shows the hairdressers further away.
I hope you take a moment to really let that sink in.
Google Local is appearing above organic results.
Local doesn’t provide small improvements to your online presence, it has the potential to double and even triple profits!
So I hope you finally understand that local is important.
If you still haven’t quite got it yet put a Post-It note on your computer to remind yourself everyday!
Below the two ads you have seven local results and on top of this you have a map on the right side drawing even more attention.
The first is the fact that you get so much real estate on the front page of Google.
Take a look at the Ministry of Hair below.
Look how easy it is for people to pick up and call you!
You’ll be signed up instantly and again… for free!
The next step is the most important step in the system – getting verified.
To view the whole post including the pictures to clarify all of the points check out
I'm finding it extremely frustrating to set it up and was wondering if, as a product, it is worthwhile to persevere with it.
I'm at the point of cancelling my subscprtion but thought I'd look for other input.
My friend asked me to look at a problem he has.
It appears that advisers have been locked out of the system.
That could only happen if the year end lock date was set prior to the year end calender date.
I would suggest a test so that the year end lock date could not be set at a date prior to the year end calender date.
Some items have work done to them or repairs carried out before being sold.
I recently went back to iOS for full functionality via an app as Windows Phone wasn't supported.
We specialize in Web Development,  and Customized CMS Development.
If you are interested in me developing something for your needs then please let me know.
Quickbooks Dashboard does somewhat of a good job at this by breaking down expenses in a pie chart and showing profit/losses on a daily/monthly basis.
Hello everyone,We have done a 20 min in depth overview and how to get most of Online Quotes video here: http://avers.
Let's nevermind how I ended up with my receipts in confusion.
and I don't particularly care.
All I want is to make sure this item is in with the rest of my expenses, categorized for the IRS.
com/us/Report1099$Rules) on how to create rules for 1099 recipients.
So whats the story is everyone using the ref field incorrectly?
That's where businesses look out for solutions that integrate your e-commerce platform and accounting tool.
I have listed down the top-3 benefits of integrating .
Which one is your favourite benefit?
Can I include this supplier in a batch of other suppliers even if they're in different countries.
Looking forward to receiving your input :)
Any thoughts on the most suitable product to do this would be greatly appreciated.
Every accounting tool has pros and cons.
Not all tools offer all the features.
In such a case, If an e-commerce owner has to pick one tool from all the options available, what all accounting features he/she should look for while assessing the tools?
From reading other posts on here I was going for the overpayment route.
Is there a way to do it better.
)3. send the customer a monthly statement showing their deposits and drawdownsI really thought I'd cracked it :(ThanksEmma
It would be a total disaster if it was gone.
Luckily it disappeared from dashboard only.
dont accept no tax when i type it in CSV file .
so I have access to each bill to enter the tax manually by selecting No tax .
So What I have to do?
A friend loaned me some money to start the company.
The app seems to have very limited capabilities.
Since I import goods, forex and freight price fluctuations will cause variations on my landed costs.
Looking forward to your responses
If I send to my accountant (who is a MAC user) and she makes no changes at all, it will import.
The error message that she gets says the date format isn't recognized.
I have saved it as CSV (for Macintosh) and so has she.
I require an inventory management system to keep track of my stock and easily enter stock when it is purchased.
I have a client who uses NatWest Bankline.
Has anybody else managed to get this to work.
We are currently keying in the individual payments to bankline and it would be so much easier if we didn't have to.
We are a PR firm that purchases media for our clients.
Client wants to buy an ad for 1,000.
We bill the client for 1,000.
We buy the ad from a magazine for 900.
100 is our commission for the ad.
We will also have a small website (Squarespace) featuring a few products we are also manufacturing.
Is there are website featuring a reseller I can look at?
In our case, we have two main items (camera and computer) that were recently purchased and paid for privately (interest free HP).
How do I transfer the funds from 861 (Shareholder's loan in Current Liabilities) to 970 (Share Capital in Equity)?
This affects a whole stack of transactions so rather than go back, unreconcile, amend and re-reconcile each of these, does anyone know of a way to change this, or balance it out?
I'm really rather miffed about it!
Timestamp’s key focus is to provide project insights that your team can act on.
We initially plan to support the UK/US market.
All feedback is very welcome.
We look forward to hearing from you!
Previously with MYOB I could never reconcile a statement unless it balanced.
It takes us over 2 minutes to raise a purchase order now.
Unfortunately, when we delete the login and reapply it does not correct the issue.
I receive say $1000, but the original sale was $1150.
This is all that is written under description at the moment - &#171;TableStart:LineItem&#187; &#171;Description&#187;
I have been previously recording it under 'COA Income Booking Fees' However.
When a client comes in, we usually raise a sale of say $1000.
In our CRM System (Lightblue) we raise the $50 booking fee as a transaction (not a sale) and that transaction remains unallocated until the sale is raised.
We currently have a head office that buys in specific goods or services on behalf of our other centres.
To date this process has been handled by setting up a code called recharges followed by the centres name.
I recently ordered some items from online vendor, which were subsequently billed to my credit card.
Unfortunately, the items were never delivered.
Also, we sell certain items to certain customers at different price.
10 and some customers we sell the same item A for .
The $25 sub doesn't fit because only allows for max 30 transactions per month.
The answer?
A  $39 subscription to cover these people!
And other suggestions for accounting systems I should investigate?
com and I feel I've met the limits of what it can handle.
I've always worked with tax professionals and love the work they do.
I'm at an internal impasse because I'm a Mac user and feel the future of most software is online.
I work off of this retainer until it gets to a certain point and then I bill them again.
I'm hoping someone can help me here.
Customer XYZ will contract with us to produce 1,000 TShirts for a total cost of $3,000.
Then, about 30 days later, the production is finished.
But what typically happens is that instead of getting 1,000 tshirts, we get 980 or 1,020.
And here's where the problem arises.
We are a small company, and it is hard for a non-bookkeeper to deal with all these steps.
I have a customer who has paid their bill and then afterwards requested a partial refund.
It's all a bit confusing for me right now so please forgive my rookiness!
I have recently been issued with a VAT registration number for a FRS.
The rate I have is 14.
I am struggling to work out the best way to enter small receipts.
I have a pile of receipts paid for by my client from his personal funds.
We currently check the best vat payable method at the end of each trading period.
Cash accounting or Accrual based on where our position is with payments.
We have something we dont understand.
HIOne of our centres, A, paid our head office with a cheque, which was banked.
It was actually meant for one of our other centres, B.
We built a piece of furniture for a client earlier this year.
Unfortunately the client subsequently cancelled the order.
If I simply delete the draft, then there's no record of the work done, regardless of whether it was paid or not.
might be on the newb side.
and have some years experience in bookkeeping (AR, AP, etc.
I will finish my Bachelor's in Accounting next year then on to a Masters as I am planning on sitting for the CPA.
Here is my issue, I am very knowledgeable in accounting and bookkeeping but I have no idea how exactly one can do books for multiple companies?
These feature have been asked for over and over again, by many, with no response from XeroC'mon guys, focus on important stuff first!
We are a small start up and growing rapidly.
50 fee if the 1 or 2 cent payments I make turn out to be invalid.
That user (Sally) left our organisation, so we deleted the user.
Is it possible to reinstate the old email address id.
To complicate matters, the 30 items purchased may go to several clients, not simply one.
This makes it even more difficult to make sure all items are properly billed back to customers.
The PO Copy function doesn't appear to be capable of handling this type of operation.
We have multiple vehicles purchased under Hire Purchase arrangement.
How to delete all Expense Claims and start again from receipt no 1I have deleted one, but I lost ordinal number of deleted claim.
Has anyone else noticed or having trouble with the reconcile screen not brining up rules or details of last similar transaction.
I have to keep refreshing the screen to bring up details.
I know there is probably some standard for that.
I don't know how I have managed to do this but I have entered the same amount £70.
1 - an item for an insurance excess.
After using MYOB for 25+ years I have some reservations.
As a result, the balance is way off.
I have no idea what is going wrong, nor why it wasn't happening at first, any help would be much appreciated.
- Adding in additional text in the message.
I can get it back by pressing ctrl-z (undo).
It would be great if you could look into this as it makes sending customised messages a real pain.
for dummies!
Out of the box it shows this month, 3 previous months and a YTD figure.
We normally operate in US-dollars only, but we have a large multi-month Canadian-dollar transaction in progress.
I added an expense and a receipt to the app on my phone and it has yet to show up on my desktop so I can reconcile.
It's been almost an hour.
Price-wise they are all a bit of a muchness, but I've struggled to find any feature comparisons of the payroll systems online.
The following are the suggested options, but the franchise tax doesn't seem to fit.
The software is going great on my end.
It never gets attached.
Even when I select attach files on sending email.
I am eager really to avoid any future issues with incorrect recording etc but I am not sure what these issues may be until they happen.
As this card will have funds loaded on to it regularly, and charges made to it, does anyone know how best to set it up for reconciliation purposes?
I've had a look, and I can't see any of these cards listed under the credit card list.
So when it is returned a credit note is issues.
Weird, I was thinking the other way.
I tried to log in using my ID and a generated password but it failed.
I don't know why it does not work  today.
Both bars will be using vend on the same subscription, but have different registers and outlets.
2014 and that is all fine.
It is pretty easy and only takes me about 15 minutes at the end of each month.
The total amount will be paid over three installments.
I have seen before with a similar system with a web company, using MYOB, however their service posted customer receipts once a week.
I think it will work well but to the best of my knowledge it is unproven so I am a little unsure.
Even when I select 'Find & Match' using cheque number or amount they do not appear on the list.
you name it! )
I also want to attach the paperwork as a File attachment.
So I can't do this from Reconcile; I must first go to Bill, open the bill to edit it and revise the actual amount charged, and save it.
I would have thought that while on the Reconcile page, I could revise the Bill amount and attach a File.
Can someone please help with my reconciling issue?
I don't know which one to put it under as I'm not sure why one would be a Liability.
If this is the case (and because we can't change it once paid) should we put it under #881?
Or am I supposed to always be reconciled to zero at the end of every quarter?
(I know I should be doing this but it doesn't always happen)Cheers,
Browsing the community I didn't find anything similar.
The company I work for owns and operates a number of pieces of equipment, sometimes used on projects by us, sometimes leased to clients.
The equipment is transported from location to location and beyond a simple asset register and the project management staff we have no way of physically tracking it.
I have had a brief look at Unleashed, but can't see that it can definitely provide location tracking.
Can it?
for exampleQty - Price - Amount2    -   620 -  $1,240.
We thought this would be fairly common situation with simple transition procedures from the beautiful accounting software.
Shop will only take cash or credit/debit card payments.
My supplier is in South Korea, I'm in Tanzania.
I order cameras and accessories, stock them and sell them off.
I assume their systems look at the incoming email address  in this case message-service@post.
com    and simply reply to that address.
We have set up the default email reply which works for everyone else; whom run manual invoicing systems.
My client has been trying to several months to get this working with no success (e. g. unable to connect, reconciled transactions reappearing, duplicate transactions in the feeds, etc).
I have a quick question.
This morning I entered a reimbursement for a check to one of our employees.
Your help to resolve this issue would be greatly appreciated.
The two seem to follow the same numbering system.
Does this make sense - I'm happy to clarify.
Or is that a bad idea?
There is no drop down at all.
I am interesting in setting up credit card processing.
I see Paypal and Stripe, but the fees are about 3%.
Is there a setting I'm missing somewhere?
I'm sure this has been tackled in this forum somewhere but I have searched for hours :(Can you please help?
I have a shop.
(using the same details, numbers etc).
Would be good to have them in a same place.
Can't I archive the order and mark it as cancelled?
PO changes - if I change an order, it treats it as the original order.
If I email it again, it doesn't change the text to indicate an updated PO.
I have been trying to figure this out for days now but how do I process the transactions?
Scenario: I purchased a bookcase and used my personal credit card.
We have a purchase order that we do monthly to our suppliers.
The opposite also happens when I am entering a gst inclusive purchase it shows as gst inclusive.
It is extremely annoying and means I have to check each line to avoid making mistakes.
- Click the 'Transactions' tab.
- Click 'Search', enter the contact name.
- Click the appropriate transaction from the list that appears.
I tried, instead, to do it via the 'Contacts' page, searched and found the correct contact, but there didn't seem to be a link to click through and view all transactions associated with that contact.
This works fine on the app but I can't seem to make it work on the web.
Is this how it works, or am I missing something?
The way my payments work is:1.
Customer pays 50% of total price of service to secure their event date.
I typically write checks to cover 10 or more bills from the same vendor.
For the life of me, I cannot figure out how to do this.
In this case, does it still come under "Revenue"?
95 but it costs me about $10 to send items out.
Also, possibly a silly question, but is GST charged on postage or is it BAS excluded?
I prepared a spreed sheet on excel for my assets and I want to upload it no problems till here.
But under the Fixed asset I have already some assets, but no possibility to do a depreciation, and which are incomplete.
They do not appear in the paypal feed.
As I understand it, scanned or emailed docs can be imported into the clients file and kept there  - this would be the big advantage to me.
We have few vehicles purchased under Hire purchase arrangements.
I work in the office of my parents' company, a special effects company in South Africa.
Our production/office manager recently resigned to be more integrated with her family.
Manager had her "own way" of doing things.
As such, trying to integrate myself into the current system is driving me insane, especially when I read about standardised systems online, and try and reference back to our own systems, I'm confused.
I'm sure all of us would.
i know this is asking a lot, but this is where I'm at right now:How do I explain to my bookkeeper that this is the direction I want to go?
How, or where can I start learning decent methods of taking care of our own books if our bookkeeper is unhappy with this decision?
(plot twist - bookkeeper's daughter used to work for us, as such, bookkeeper feels a connection to us (see: Debt owed to her.
Obviously, banked cash shows up as a single deposit.
I don't want to enter anything erroneously and cause headaches for myself down the line.
We are a small shop retailing equipment, so we have anything from 30+ suppliers that we buy stock from and sell to the general public.
We have had ongoing feed problems.
The initial setup times out.
I have checked the settings.
My ignorance = your gain.
We seem to break this software daily.
I have fantastic nighttime support from the wonderful Cassandra in Australia.
During entering I come across a problem on the page of entering financial settings.
The page freezes and shows a window saying "gst registered" but doesn't let me enter anything.
I am desperate and cannot find support anywhere.
My mobile number is 512-789-0001.
If someone could let me know if I have the right method (or what it should be) you input would be greatly appreciated.
After the end of the current VAT period I plan to:1) Ensure all transactions up to (but no further than) the end of the VAT period are correctly accounted for in Xero2) Generate/publish/submit the final VAT return under the Cash Scheme3) Change the VAT Scheme to Flat Rate Cash Scheme4) Only now begin to input any transactions from after the end of the last VAT periodIs that all that's necessary?
I tried by selecting gst on imports but this then shows it as a subtotal and then $0 total gst.
However those expenses require hard copies of the receipts.
Usually I send 2 files from harvest.
I have been using the Aged Receivables customisable templates but am frustrated by the restricted options for including certain fields.
For example, a customer may order '6 sausages' and then the actual cost of those sausages is calculated by weight, which I cannot know until after I have received the items from my supplier.
One thing that bugs me though, is the customer contact addresses.
I sell mostly in Ireland, with a few orders to Northern Ireland, so I don't really have any international orders at all.
I've narrowed it down that it appears to be using the first letter of the county to pick the country.
So, for example, I'll have an order from a customer in Dublin, with the country allocated to Dominican Republic; or a customer in Cork will be Croatia, Antrim will be Armenia etc etc.
No mention of Ireland at all!
The rest of the address that the customer inputs is all correct.
Today's announcement of blistering bonuses all round was the final nail in the coffin.
To put it as mildly as possible, in my experience, Barclays are a detriment to society.
I thought they would be the same.
Hello everyone,I have recently created a company which will sell products online, install vegetable gardens in peoples home and rent some equipment out.
HMRC website lists at least twenty vendors and I don't know where to start.
I have two questions.
I found some long winded way, but surely there is a function to go straight to journal entry?
The employees are all paid on varying hourly rates as well (penalty rates for Sat/Sun/Pub Hol etc) Am I not setting payroll up correctly?
They also state that most of their other suppliers do it this way, hence their preference to see their data in this form
Apparently, I used the wrong FRS percentage of 14.
They've given me the amount of overpayment and advised that I include this in box 4 of my next return.
Obviously one would be VAT, but the other?
I've googled all day and cannot find an answer.
Hope to hear back soon.
I got an impression Owner Contribution is alway treated as EQUITY .
We're a relatively low volume-high value shop.
One of the good features on MYOB is that if I make a mistake, I can download the previous days journal entries and overide my mistake.
Had a quick search through the threads but couldn't easily find an answer to my question.
But it's not.
Where is the data stored?
And the tax rate for a good receipted in would be Tax on Expenses?
We run a small buying club for food where we take a bunch of orders from our members and create one large order to our supplier.
We allow members to pool their individual orders together to buy in bulk.
Say, we have five orders for corn and the supplier won't sell unless we have six orders, we order one order of corn for the club and sell it to our members later as an overstock item.
I don't want to create a purchase for these items, because they are already included in the bill we get from the supplier.
I have managed to get one back to where it should be but I cannot work out the rest.
I have already mistakenly paid bills by BACS which were then subsequently taken by direct debit.
My current get around is to put the info at the end of the reference field in the bill e. g. <bill no.
I know other people copy previous bills and handle it that way but I find that very tedious.
I don't know if they have a 'development matrix' where they take ease of implementation into consideration against no.
of votes etc.
It's really ruining a great piece of software for me.
One thing that we're finding is that the data flowing from these banks is quite inconsistent.
For example, with our Westpac data feed, the description of the transaction is displayed in the "Payee" field.
Client is a wholesale fashion distributor.
They purchase ‘fashion’ from clothing manufacturers and sell them to fashion outlets and online shops.
The only complexity really comes down to the inventory.
Inventory–	15 000 only 25% are active –	The number of inventory items is constantly growing–	Buy inventory in bulk and sell it in bulkThey never sell to single customers only bulk distributions.
They’re currently using MYOB Premier which process wise does what is required however it’s struggling to cope with the ever growing list of inventory, and this means it is running really slowly.
Looking to improve speed and efficiencies.
Anyway of solving this issue?
The issue is that it displays the results in the following form 9/92013 12:00am.
This all works great up to the point where I wan to setup budgets and track against these.
Should I create my own as an asset?
That all went smoothly and recently, I paid the witholding tax to the tax office that we withheld for these salaries.
When I search through the charts, I can see a (825 - PAYG witholdings payable) which has a lock on it.
Where has the witholding tax amount that I generated in May gone?
I appreciate your help as I am tearing my hair out trying to find it.
Want it to do something more?
Is it possible to setup  an employee with 2 different email addresses - one to receive their own payslip and another to receive requests to authorise Timesheets or Leave requests.
Naturally, the employee/manager does not want her payslip going to her work email, but does not want leave etc requests going to her personal email address as she does not check this during work hours.
All done within 3 working days and no problems whatsoever.
I found the back-up and support prior to and after the conversion to be exemplary and even included a one on one training session.
The team at Jet Convert and very knowledgeable and if I have a query, they have no problems in finding out for me and getting back to me in a very speedy and professional manner.
I am more than happy for anyone considering these services to contact me to discuss my experience.
but I will get there :)
Would be good if there was a little drop down next to ''Apply Rule'' so we could choose the right one.
At the moment I have her manually adding all 10 payments to the bottom of a bill.
Is there a quicker way I've not though of?
A customer over paid me for some goods.
I tried importing receipts from Shoeboxed today, and they imported as bills that needed to be paid although they are obviously already all paid.
However then I tried to match some of these receipts with my Credit Card statement via reconciliation, and none of them would show up.
My first issue is that PAYE is subsequently showing up on balance sheet as a credit instead of 0 balance (i. e. outstanding payments made/ no liability or credit).
It would be great to re-run older VAT returns.
I granted him basic access and then made the mistake of thinking that the Expenses function was the same as SPEND MONEY.
I have several lawnmowing contractor clients, who operate through one of the popular NZ franchises.
I have trained each of them to code their weekly APs to the GL code I have set up in the Current Liabilities section of their ledger.
I'm now trying to import the second and it's querying my statement lines.
I've checked they're identical to the first one.
It doesn't help me understand what's wrong.
I've even tried moving the content of the second file into the first and re-uploading that and I get the same error message.
I'm at my wit's end.
Ultimately we end up footing some sort of bill and/or negating any profit from the transaction  or  worse still losing out if a part is damaged and we cant claim from the carrier.
Our T's & C's cover us, should we want to stick to our guns, but this isn't good for long term customer relations.
It's still spinning.
What am I supposed to do?
I have two small businesses;1.
Currently it is adding super onto the $1,000 and calculating tax?
(For the tax year 2012-2013, small businesses in Australia can claim an immediate deduction for most assets costing less than $6,500 each)
In relation to Australian Tax and GST legislation, how would you allocate the following scenarios:Nb.
In all cases assume the receipt is a proper tax receipt and the staff member has indicated where they were/what they were doing1.
A fuel receipt from an employee who gets a car allowance4.
A receipt from a food outlet/cafe from a staff member who is out in the field most of the day, most days of the week5.
I'm getting really confused with how to record payments to myself.
I have tried both the admin login and my personal login to no avail.
)To fix, open in Notepad or other text editor:Remove the lines below and remember to save with .
Hopefully that fixes the error and saves having to reformat in CSV!
Does anyone have specific feedback on Citibank, HSBC (in the US), and Chase .
I am looking for a function that allows me to view reports at different levels of detail.
I would love to hear from someone who have overcome this challenge in XeroThanks,
There are lots of software packages that have this option.
I have a system whereas I receive a Security Deposit for bookings in the amount of $250.
This deposit is fully refunded back post event.
My issue is that I want to attach inventory items to some of my income & expenses.
I have the total amount included in the conversion balance, this causes no issue.
This is simply so that the client can see whom he owes money too and whom owes him money, because currently his conversion balance only provides the total amounts of acc.
and acc.
This would be handy when customers say yes we will go ahead, but then change their minds - so we can still have a record of the quote.
I was hoping I could create and inventory item e. g Filter Unit and then select each of the components used.
I'm concerned I'm paying for some great software but have absolutely no access to some of the tools.
Could be based on a sliding scale.
This was a serious mistake by us and exposed us to unprecedented risks as we soon discovered - a mission critical single point of failure of our entire accounting system.
We found out the hard way.
c. Your relationship with the adviser turns sour and he comes back to harm you.
2)  Additionally your adviser can at his/her own discretion outsource the work to another contractor who may not be bound by any non-disclosure statements you've had them sign.
This happened to us too.
This happened to us a week before important audits were to take place.
We are still trying to recover.
The bar hosts both events and private functions.
I would love to store them in some sort of online solution.
We have three companies.
They all transfer funds back and forth between each other.
I read somewhere that half of this is deductible.
Hello,We are now in the process of evaluating our options in moving to a SaaS solution.
We are a small team of 5 people occasionally having to run large projects of 5-6 weeks with 100 of external contractors.
So far we used their personal email addresses.
A nice-to-have feature here is to see when a certain contractor have actually accessed the file (I think Huddle can do it, but it's faaar to expensive for us).
Here again I tend to try Harvest for this one.
everyone is happy bar one.
I want to remove a single URL reference retrospectively  (and potentially ongoing with other customers)CheersMike
According to the tax office even if when I buy second hand goods if it doesn't state that I have paid GST then I can still claim GST for these items in 2 ways (I am registered for GST).
I started my company 2 years ago .
I'm using the field "«TaxInclusiveLineAmount»" to do this, but it displays the amounts with 4 decimal places.
I can't find it anywhere.
is this somehing i have done wrong when i first set it up?
I've called it CSV2Cloud.
Here's how our first customer uses it:1) uploads a excel based order form that his customers send him2) downloads a CSV file for a given day that his warehouse uses to pick and pack his products.
Now, I'm after some more people that have similar issues!
If so, drop me an email on the address below with an example of your CSV/TXT/Excel file and i'll take a look at it for you.
For example I go buy a hard drive at staples to back up my laptop and an office chair.
The hard drive costs $99.
So far all is WONDERFUL.
I will now have assets (a chair and a hard drive) recorded as different types for depreciation purposes and I didn't have to get out a calculator to handle the tax.
No doubt, you’ve heard endless mentions of “the cloud” over the past couple years.
we introduce our latest .
We're starting to rack up a number of businesses that have either different locations or different contact points that we deal with for differing things.
it might go into early 2013.
Many reports will have customization options or comparison period options.
I'm trying to look at our inventory movements and see how they change week to week.
We are thinking about getting an ipad to to this.
Take a look and let us know what you think:
I have an issue where my staff (bless them! )
I did installed the module on PS back office, and all seems to be OK.
I have some messy clients.
I want to record daily cash income for a counseling practice.
Is there a straightforward way of getting there?
I run a confections, chocolate, and cake company.
* Using  (free edition), , to handle email.
* for SEO metrics -- my other hat in life is a digital consultant, that tool crosses the divide.
* Social Media is huge with us as we rose from the grassroots and those mediums are fantastic for generating support, especially if you are a human.
, , and our peer Network *  &  are also heavily used.
* Since we have a menu we aggregate with , this populates a huge amount of sites
We can't figure out why the information is not uploading.
Whereas I'm looking for best practise in anticipating how much Estimated Tax Payments might be.
The process is not reversible.
Odds are you’ve picked up a thing or two on invoicing.
That’s why we’re asking our community to help us create an invoicing guide.
So what are you waiting for?
One of those is Tracking Categories.
Of course we're a chocolate and confections shop so maybe there isn't much beyond our inventory, wholesale, & retail to track that's outside the bounds.
For others though maybe this thread would be a good place to throw your creative uses of Tracking Categories and others can learn a thing or two.
The funds are definately entered but the drop down is empty.
What I have been told is, once I get my head around it, it will be blissfully easy!
I have put a picture up here of my profit loss in excel, as to better give you an understanding of how I am currently managing!
us/photo/my-images/59/69782214.
Ie internet is basically 90%!
Is this expected behaviour or is there a reason why is does not appear?
I've looked in the Help centre but seem to be looking for the wrong thing.
Sign up is open and free so we'd love your comments and feedback.
Has anyone else had the same problem - Any ideas?
Total received is $185.
Then I used Overpayment, this shows up nicely, but doesnt generate GST.
As servers become sparse with this trend, is the overall cost of IT Services really necessary?
We've got a client that has a significant amount of transactions (approx 600) on one day of the month.
I have uploaded to my website a quick-reference guide by Industry.
For my company, we create our purchase order and send it to our manufacturer.
Sometimes we actually receive our goods in many different shipments and want to record these under separate dates with notes so we have a bit of a history.
I'm keen to get feedback on it, it's free to feel free to sign up  at  and check it out and let me know your thoughts.
If this can be done, how is it done.
However, I'm running into a few hurdles where I have many questions.
My first guess was under the Liabilities section 'Income Tax Payables'.
I do not see a way to choose a customer when completing an Expense Claim.
72USD (colour and international shipping. )
Not to mention the delay due to the international shipping!
Manual refresh is slow and often fails.
Its the little things!
This would allow me to process most payments in one office session & then schedule EFT & remittances as required throughout the month.
, is very useful.
However, some emails aren't directly from the contact in question.
For example, details on a particular transaction may come from another volunteer in our organization.
However, this has to lead to a number of journals listed in the 'repeating' tab of the Manual Journals page that have run their course.
It would be much handier if there was a selection box next to each repeating journal so that multiple journals could be deleted with ease.
Will it not make more sense to default up to the day?
Would be particularly useful for the clients that we have.
I take photos of a lot of receipts with my phone using a scanner app that auto crops and converts to PDF.
It would be great if Payroll admin users weren't automatically listed in the leave approvers.
Our client has approximately 6 leave approvers within their organisation, however when they request leave, it also shows all of the accounting staff who have payroll admin rights.
See screen grab here;http://d.
But I can't.
So instead I wait until I can get to the desktop, sync my phone photos and then attach.
This sounds great until you try to generate a cash summary.
I entered a batch of receipts online and saved in draft.
But you don't actually say which one.
It would be useful if reports could be exported as Microsoft Documents, to allow for additional editing and the addition of letter heads, if Companies require or want to release reports to Stakeholders at AGMs and EGMs.
Now that we still to manually calculate and enter the figure.
They are shown on the calendar so it knows there are holidays approved on that day.
It's absurd that there are no timestamps on these forums!
I'm fairly sure they used to be present, so it is super uncool that they were removed.
So hostile to users that I'd say whoever approved that needs some ultra negative feedback about the result.
However, I feel it would benefit from having a responsive dashboard that could adapt to the different sized screens used on different computers.
It would be great to have an additional page to amended Activity Statement (AS) forms to show the previous figures, revised figures and net adjustments made to make it clearer to clients what their adjusted obligation is.
So if you have a BAS that originally had $20,000 payable and has been revised to show $19,000 payable, the client often thinks that a further $19,000 is payable, rather than clearly seeing they are actually due a $1,000 refund.
However if a customer has made prepayments, it shows the customer balance as zero.
It would be really helpful if there were any prepayments to show the customer balance as a negative number.
We have found it virtually impossible to see at a glance the size and amount of customer prepayments.
Is my understanding above correct?
Has anyone encountered the same issue?
Is there a work around?
we have a part timer who works specific days each week (never Mondays), however, public holiday etc are often assigned to her incorrectly, as she is not entitled to that day.
Can you amend the employee set up so we can record days an employee actually works and these are then reflected in holidays etc?
Our card holders have down loaded the app on their phones to take a photo of their receipt, however they often do not do this and I have to chase them.
My team are good at requesting through it already but noticed one thing missing which would make it even better:When I approve some leave for a person, I can't see it any more.
It's not under the leave tab, and not under the employee tab.
I have numerous employees who have different roles within my gym each with a different hourly rate.
For example:Merrick may work 5 hours per week on reception at &#163;7.
They have a fully documented public API, so integration with Yodlee should be easy, and far more secure and reliable than most of the horrible screen-scraping mainstream ones!
It's a really nice feature and it would be great to have this ability on more reports.
Example: I had to prepare supporting evidence for a VAT investigation.
If there were a page where you could view all uploaded files such as 'Upload History' page this would make it easy to see what has been uploaded.
listing (adding) individual clients on timesheets (eg.
Instead of staff filling in paper work.
I would send a timesheet of places staff were rostered to clean.
My credit cards are managed on Paypal as they are so much easier to deal with compared to the banks.
I think this would be an issue for many other users -- if so, please comment and vote!
Hello,My request is to remove the ?
We present bills to our buyers and it looks bad with this extension.
It was working well until last week when extension ?
utm_source=email started to show.
It is essential for us that the Quote summary text quantity be increased from 3000 characters.
We require up to 10000 characters.
Along with this, as the text quantity increases, so would the text box size.
Even after you create a receipt there are up to 8 steps to go through to email it.
Surely there must be a quicker way.
For example, if I have entered no private health insurance and not eligible for 365/366 days, but family income is $190K, can there be a warning to check as the income is above $180K family threshold and to check number of days not eligible.
When we do a stock take periodically, we prepare (in Excel) ‘purchase credit notes’ to reduce the stock on hand.
In some cases this reduces the stock to zero.
2912 as opposed to 2.
I attempted to change the unit cost on the credit note, but I think the issue is that the program calculates the value only to 2 decimals.
All of this is very tedious, and error-prone.
It would also be helpful if income entries on the VAT return were separated from purchases (as Sage do) to make miscodings more obvious.
'Outside scope' would be a nice option too!
At present, all data is imported without exception.
However, our company and sole traders are financially separate.
It is an easy task, but a monotonous one that occupies about half an hour a week at present.
I have also submitted this request to Coreplus.
Once an item is paid by credit or overpayment the lines then show as Zero and it's unhelpful.
I know your amazing developments will get right on to this to help out our book-keepers using XeroMaria :) x
Because at this point, any updates (especially for changes in amount) will overwrite the existing approver.
I have to print payroll Activity Summary reports for each of our 10 depts and I have to hand write on each one the group name every month.
It is rather annoying.
There should also be fields for "Primary Person" First Name / Last Name in the import template.
The problem with the current template is that it doesn't import the primary person/s' name so that the email will be addressed to "Dear (blank)" (where NO contact is imported into the email template), or "Dear North Wales Police Force" (where the *ContactName is imported if it is a company name).
It does nothing to placate your paying customers but only serves to antagonise us further.
It is confusing when threads are merged and is becoming quite disconcerting.
I have tried to defend you in being diplomatic on this forum, but removing the datestamps is one kick in the face too many and defies belief.
In the meantime, I encourage all to do what I have started doing:
Becomes hard to remember to check if you have a few on the go.
Is this in the works?
This is a feature that is current in Sage Handitax, and is a valuable tool.
Surely this can be locked down so it cannot occur?
I wish it has IP based LOGIN where my staff can only login from office computer & from nowhere else.
Restriction on IMPORT & EXPORT of DATA3.
I am willing to dump NetSuite even though I have paid them already for one Year.
I have companies based in 6 Countries & I signed with NETSUITE for ONE WORLD PACKAGE.
Very similar to how the bills can be coded and held against a customer to be uncharged.
Therefore better profit as no way for errors.
Electronic filing and payments are not supported in my state.
No big deal, it shouldn't be too hard for me to fill out a form and write a check.
Functionlity not available with the Mobile app.
eg - a note refers to year end, or month end will be updated depending on the period you are working on.
sms) so I won't forget about those important tasks while on the move.
It would be a genius feature to allow users to enable a feature to number items.
It would make it a lot easier for people with similar issues to connect and find solutions to problems.
When a staff member requests leave they have to tick the box to send to management for approval.
Is there a way of having a note appear in the staff member note section when applying for leave, in case this happens again?
It should all happen automatically.
The direct debit is a fixed sum.
I'm sure someone else must have this problem?
I am not scrolling through 100s of pages to see if this has already been suggested.
Now, unless I have missed something, I believe this is currently not possible.
Is is a very tedious job downloading them.
A way to choose to lock it.
The problem being that someone could modify an accepted quote, and then it would not match the quote that was actually sent.
I'm a tradie, so before and after photos are a common element of my work and for obvious reasons I'm always going to be adding more than 1 file.
I have created email templates for each of these scenarios but they all go according to the same timetable.
i understand that we can view them from if the web browser after logging in, but when your with a customer it would be quicker to access this information from the app.
If you want to centre something across several cells there is a command for that, but I have even seen empty cells merged.
It would be nice if you could do this in the old ones too.
Currently we cant send payslips out before final FPS.
In our situation quite often employees come back with something missed out or incorrect value somewhere.
It would good if we could export ATO TPAR for overseas contractor - instead of an error saying there's no ABN.
As one of my clients solely uses overseas contractor to complete his job.
Please extend this field to allow for 4 decimals.
:) Searching for only the items I have create would help me tremendously!
As it is now I have to sort through all the items everyone in the office has created.
We are a charity and therefore not VAT registered.
I green light "connected" light or something would be great!
It would be very helpful if the number of lines could be altered to whatever the user prefers.
Tick off boxes  to mark off as being billed would be fantastic.
Afterwards my husband will tell me that he has already charged that expense to our customer.
I can go to the editor and organize the columns one by one, but takes too long.
Currently, the app only shows payments made, not payments received.
I would love 2 features added to this area:1.
For some clients we send Management Reports etc with their BAS.
It would be a more seamless communication with the client if they could be part of that one email.
I feel it would appear less disjointed to the client.
One communication covering all that needs to be covered.
The addition of supplier column would be great.
HiIt would be mighty helpful if in the credit card transactions one could identify which card has been used to make that particular transaction.
When one tries to reconcile all monthly transactions it is a lot easier to do this when you know who's card has been used to make certain transactions.
We had been previously advised to put a "-" in between it to fix the issue, but this is ridiculous.
Customers get really upset which is understandable.
It has now reverted back to Outstanding - Why?
It would be useful to select the first, hold in shift, select the last and delete in bulk (In the same vein as the the cash coding scenario).
Seeing the lock date at the top of the screen would make it easy to check this.
Exportable to excel with formula's would be good too, then we could change distributions and easily see the effect on each entity.
Other users have requested same.
Why is there no day placeholder?
9% of the businesses on it we do not and never will deal with - and I can’t get rid of them - they are in our look up lists forever it seems.
None of the businesses on this list are relevant to our company nor I suspect many other small businesses.
An 'email from' drop down section would be really useful indeed.
To have the option to auto-fill these columns would be very helpful.
If you are please VOTE for this.
6) Reload the page At step 6, you're back to the start with the box asking you to "file now with IRD" which is confusing.
If I put a unit of 1 and a combined rate, assumprions are drawn that the rate is an hourly charge.
We run tracking categories for multiple locations and its very easy to miss this field.
to ensure we are updating details, to see what has changed, and to clarify why two related clients have different postal addresses for instance - easy to confirm if one got updated which one is more recent.
It would be good if Jobs have a similar audit trail to see when a job was moved to Completed or Awaiting Queries etc.
If I schedule a job that takes two hours and is due in two weeks, I'm not going to work on it for 12 minutes a day.
Employees Tax, Social Security and other deductions.
An alternative would be to give Advisors access to edit tax brackets and deduction calculations.
This means that to calculate the number of diesel litres, you cannot simply export to Excel and sum total.
Could it be ticked ON as default?
That is not a smooth action right now, as the supplier name in the 'edit bill' page is a text field, not a hyperlink.
Maybe after a bill has been submitted for approval, the contact field should be frozen as a hyperlink, and an 'edit' option be added to the 'bill options' dropdown menu.
The option to select more than one would be ideal.
As a CFO, I want to know when someone changes that setting as I cannot have prior months being changed without my knowledge.
I do not know whether there is an audit trail showing me who made changes to this field and when but an email notification confirming each change would also enable me to see what is happening and if I changed the date myself, the email would act as an additional reminder to re-lock the period.
How great would it be to have the G1, G10, G11 to ensure GST agrees with grossed up figures.
My issue is that in a certain contact, we have a "primary person", i. e. , the owner, and person we converse with most often.
As I was typing this, I realized that related to that, there should be a "notes" field for each person so we can describe who they are and/or their roles so others know what's going on.
I also noticed, the emails sent to Support are one-way and terminate the moment a response is sent to us.
Our company is working with countless of suppliers online.
Here's a  of what I mean.
I hope I have been clear enough in my explanation.
Dear Sir,I am an user from Malaysia for a small medium trading company.
As a result, when they are there, I sometime fail to notice them until they are quite old.
structure of US tax code.
This protection needs to be included.
We are an accounting firm using BGL for SMSF preparation.
BGL is switching off the Tax Return electronic lodgement.
In order to upload a receipt on mobile I have to complete every input field too.
If i could justquickly get it up in system so I can allow mybookkeeper to code it it would be HUGE change to make the app much morefriendly and usable.
My request is the removal of the requirement for all forms be compete in order to submit the receipt.
As much as I had many complaints about Quickbooks, this is something they did well!
Could this be made simple and straight forward by creating a form for entering the relevant data?
You have the ability for actions to trigger when expenses are created but you don't allow expenses to be submitted or created via API.
I have multiple contacts who have more than one email address.
For example we have a lot of real estate property manager clients.
This seemed to change around a year ago.
Would be great if we could print inventory pdf that actually contains quantities!
This would prevent having to go to the payroll settings screen to find this.
The feature will also make spotting mistakes easier.
However, this is before anything is even printed out, let alone mailed.
This would assist in keeping track of these extra payments in the tax management section.
This will now cost me another hour to re-input all the now lost items again.
Is it possible that when sending statements to clients that the age analysis for outstanding amounts can be shown at the bottom of the  statement to show the client what amount is outstanding in 120, 90, 60, 30 days and current.
Currently I have to send the statement and then an age analysis afterwards.
The email is received as a simple text email, with a link to the bill.
We cannot sort by transaction type, except manual journal.
We cannot click on a journal to open the original transaction.
I understand the rationale is to ensure security and take all actions into the book.
Unless I am missing something really obvious this is a really big pain.
Another online CRM has this functionally and it is great to manager emails in by was of searching job name / number / email address associated with it.
I really don't care about total AR, other than to know how much of our cash on hand has yet to be invoiced.
My feature request is pretty simple.
00)This would make the desktop app info match the mobile app info.
And of course, it would be much more useful to see when looking at the Dashboard.
It will help businesses to proactively benefit from this feature.
The rates we get from them are far better than the services offered.
There really needs to be two emails when registering for Auto super.
One to confirm that they have received the application.
I have a few customers which all fall under the same group but are invoiced individually.
It might seem a small thing .
Good Morning,We have fixed assets that get frequently get moved around our venues.
If a notification was sent to the client that would be great.
It would be useful if you could sort the Journals by 'Next Journal Date' as currently you can only sort by 'End Date.
'The 'Next Journal Date' header is greyed out and cannot sort.
At the moment we run reports in XPM and import manually into MailChimp.
I noticed in the tax modules that i have to import the details for shareholders salaries.
Surely it makes more sense to update those automatically from they relevant IR4/6 or 7.
Huge potential for a major stuff up.
This placeholder is very important, as our company name is registered under a DBA.
It would be perfect to have a button for them in their settings, where they can choose to auto-submit them on a certain date.
It would be handy to have GST reports available for ledger clients.
It has gst coding available but no simple GST reports.
This would be more efficient as only one action would be needed rather than multiple actions to be made to achieve this.
That's all very good and useful.
For surely, that is exactly what it is?
This causes problems if for some reason one does not click 'approve bill' during that one chance to approve it.
If it has been copied to a bill, then it is now a draft bill, and should not matter if it has yet been approved.
I used Find and Recode today to recode many transactions and a few small improvements would have made things much faster: 1.
The ability to filter transactions by Reference2.
The ability to select a range of items on a page by clicking the first item, holding down the shift key and then clicking the last item.
This is standard functionality in most applications that allow you to select many items in a long list.
my created folder is called paid - awaiting rec.
gst or perhaps income in one column and gst in the next, specifically on the dashboard.
It tends to over inflate peoples perspectives of how much income they have coming in.
I think it would be useful for small businesses especially, a lot of my clients, don't know that value includes GST.
Primarily, I want to avoid exporting contacts already exported.
How, doesn't matter too much.
If I could sort contacts by "date added" and filter by "date range" and export only the filtered list that would be "hunky dory".
It would be better if it was cropped to include the document only and not the background.
This could be achieved by either making the currency symbol a stand alone sortable column in the purchases table (i. e. sorting payments by clicking on the currency heading) or by adding a currency search option in the search dialog.
A date range to select would be nice too.
The current process involves rejecting the timesheet if it is incorrect and waiting for the employee to update it correctly.
As a result, we are having trouble registering the assets as they do not have the tax values and we have to manually update them to proceed.
This is a crucial piece of information in terms of transfer of risk between seller and buyer and should be incorporated in the invoicing system via a series of dialog boxes/options so they have to be filled in before issuing.
Modified Accelerated Cost Recovery System (MACRS) is the current tax depreciation method in the US.
Ideally there should be a possibility of changing the status of individual items on the PO as well the entire PO to "purchase received", then send it to bill.
When you are in say the P&L and have 5 codes under a group R&M.
it would be good when you first click into it to go to a summary of the codes that are in there first instead of actually going into the detailed GL.
Nice to have1.
but digging through our laws it appears that isnt a biggy as long as the other 2 criteria are met.
We are frustrated with the Staff Permissions in XPM.
We require other staff members to have access to certain features so that they can assist with the set up of our practice and ongoing maintenance  Eg.
For this we will have to give them Full Administrator rights.
There needs to be another administrative user level added.
Could we possibly have the two step authentication security question responses masked with *****.
The Profit and Loss Statement reports Superannuation guarantee contributions.
Salary sacrifice contributions are tied to Wages and Salaries.
I prefer to have the control.
I would vote on this but for some unknown reason I only have 10 things I can vote on?
But what if the gas station has a n ATM machine and the client withdrew a couple of hundreds from the ATM there?
Please keep in mind that this is only an example and the benefits of my suggestion are far beyond this one, it will solve many other issues.
With our timesheets we have a base hourly rate then an additional line for- Saturday Penalites- Sunday Penalties (ie 100% on top of base hourly)- Public Holiday Penalites- Casual Leave Loading (ie 25% on top of base hourly)this has been recommended by our accounting team due to the requirements from Fair Work Australia.
Unfortunately since doing this the Fortnightly Total hours in the top right corner of the timesheets includes both the say 6 hours base hourly rate plus the penalty rate  which results in an indication the staff have worked 12 hours instead of 6.
Website is www.
If it is an existing Contact, it is great now that the contact details come up on the screen, but is it possible to link directly to the Contact, so contact details can be updated?
Unfortunately, this is not sufficient and more are required.
HiWe have noticed XPM does not allow the client code to be searched.
Example - while not necessary next year -10% income rule for super contributions.
With in Practice Manager (Job Manager) we would love to have the ability to drag and drop jobs to a different date on the 'important date' screen.
e. g. Payrun (semimonthly ending MM, DD) due in 3 daysTime Off requests (1)Taxes and Fillings (2 due in 3 days)Timesheets to approve (8)
Sadly, this might be a reason for me to move to your best (worst? )
I have clients with employees that are exempt from Federal Withholding taxes.
It is needed.
after putting on 'millions' of cash receipts or visa card receipts etc and working to very strict deadlines, can't you put an authorise/reconcile button.
you have the tick boxes next to each entry.
come on, you know it makes sense.
At the moment we have to search through every email in date order rather than typing in a key word to find a specific email.
Name of member, his/her address and contact details2.
NFP organisation address, contact details, IRD number and charity registration number5.
note/comment section for additional details6.
Looking forward for strong support from everyone to have this voted upon to the best interest of NFP organisationsThank you,Anthony Lebis
Can the budget manager include the ability to include the 2 tracking layers (if tracking is set up for an org)Example if you load a csv budget file that has $500 income in rental income (Tracking 1 commercial, Tracking 2 property 1), and $500 rental income (residential,property2).
Currently I have to load some 60+ budgets, and then.
When reporting you then have to select the tracking options against the matching budget.
This is common practice among high end ERP's (ie Microsoft Dynamics) and feel the development to include the 2 tracking layers into budget manager wouldn't be huge.
The current filtering abilities in Auto super only allows filtering by due date.
With 10+ employees it is currently taking way too long to individually select all the relevant payments for the month.
Inviting users is a great way of maintaining access on a client level.
Is it possible?
send it to client and forget about it.
Is it possible?
Would it be possible to have a download button in the file library to enable the bulk download of pdf documents attached to transactions?
This will give the service provider a better understanding of areas where improvements needs to be done.
Is this option on the agenda to do.
Is it possible to have a total for the quantities at the bottom?
Is this possible, or can you recommend an alternative method?
Not off to another area I am not working on.
and an existing PO.
That came to light today when an inventory items price was updated in inventory, but that change was not seen on an existing PO.
As of right now, it is locked the moment it is added to any PO in any status.
I have a client that creates and writes many checks throughout the course of a month.
You have to then select "search" in order to find the date range you want.
It makes the most sense to me to automatically show the current "month to date" date range.
As all staff are listed under the staff tab in the practice admin sign on, it could be controlled here which clients were accessible by which staff, rather than having the client invite 5 practice staff, they could invite the Admin user and then the admin could assign clients to each staff member.
Different people in my organization quote jobs.
I am entering an old bill which was placed in instalments.
We changed the Financial Year End to 28 February and this allows us to edit the lock dates again.
5% that will inevitably be introduced on the 01st April 2017 for 'Limited Cost Trader' (i. e. Labour only industries), will mean that for those businesses that remain on the FRS there will be an overlapping period where their FRS rate is e. g 14.
5% for one or two months then changing to 16.
5% in the same return period.
In Sage, one can see & examine the items that shouldn't be on the return, but should none tthe less be verified as such.
Numerous transaction updates to historical trans, as we fine tune our processing, & that have no effect on the vat what-so-ever, are listed on the vat return.
It would be great if it was possible to turn this feature off for files.
FROM "Tax Inclusive" - TO "Includes Tax" FROM "Tax Exclusive" - TO "Excludes Tax"
We have a recruiting firm where we often times split deals 50/50 - one for the salesperson and one for the recruiter.
We have several customers with the same name and the only way to tell them apart is by the address.
At present it if I sort my paypal transactions by date, the transactions actually appear in reverse order which can be very confusing.
This would speed up the process no end!
ADP GL Integration will sync with the classes in QBO.
This is a really important feature so my client does not have to re-classify 40 employees wages every single payroll.
A lot of duplicates I am seeing in this view is where duplicate contacts have been merged.
Could there also be a field added for an Accountant.
As we have a 3 tier structure in the firm working on a client.
Expand app functionality to allow administrators to view/approve/decline Leave requests and timesheets submitted by employees.
We have many users.
We also have a number of “connected apps”.
A way to know who connected which app will be very useful.
Please expand your two factor authentication options by adding support for U2F FIDO security keys.
Now I know this is my fault, but it's really not very intuitive from a UX perspective.
As it stands, we have to do a lot of manual calculations to 'back into' the amount for each location.
None of whom should be receiving day to day correspondence for the company.
Sure, once the reader clicks on the PDF link then the docx template is seen but the first thing they see on the online link is the company registered office as the company address.
Maybe have a pop up appear once you hover over the words, "Missing Details. "
This is the link to the Banesco login site: https://bbubdfl.
I have met users who are unaware of the directory and it occurs to me that such a link may well be useful to users as well as Partners.
Bill Batch formatFrom;   Date; Due Date; Reference; Item; Desc; Qty; Unit Price; Acc; Tax Rate; Dept; Amt GBPNew billNew billNew billNew billand so on.
It would also be nice to have an Extra Reference box as in most companies the filing is done numerically and this reference can be added.
At the moment, this field is only available at Quotation.
If you have a number of staff approving expense claims, they can see all employee expense claims.
What would be great is, for example, Joe Bloggs can see and approve expense claims for Jane Smith and Roger Taylor only.
But nobody else.
At the moment, we have to do an onerous manual process.
We export the reports in Excel and email them to the appropriate managers.
I would find it far more useful if we could have the most recent ones first.
It would be so much easier if they were all on the same Payrun reporting, and its easier to reconcile
Have asked before but having spent another hour of my life archiving obsolete tracking categories, am going to ask again - pleeeeaaasse can we have a bulk archive facility ?
Or at the very least a 2 click archive where we could click on the x then on okay THEN on to the next xThe way it works now is click on x, click OKAY, scroll up, click on the category you are working on, scroll down to your next x. .
Trust me, when you have a lot to archive it gets a little tiresome
They have tagged the individual wage transactions to a Contact - being the employee's name.
Surely the system should only collate historical info on Customers or Suppliers specifically setup in the system?
We moved over from Clearbooks recently.
One really handy feature that we had was a Dashboard widget that showed VAT building up since the last return.
Whilst we put all our VAT aside as we go, it was a handy feature to show future liability which does not appear in the Bills Dashboard widget.
Is this something that can be considered for implementation?
Please vote for this simple and necessary basic improvement.
This was not mentioned in the help centre (although I understand it has now been added after my support request yesterday).
The workaround is to temporarily upgrade them to an Advisor role, but this is illogical.
I understand the limitation is to protect a Standard user from accessing contacts SS numbers, etc.
, and don't have a suggestion - will leave that to the developers to solve.
We had MYOB which had all these features.
Not sure when this changed I have noticed it this morning while working through my latest round of reconciliations It is exceptionally confusing - because at a glance .
I love Zero, but find the reporting is so lacking compared to other programs.
If you have a lot of customers, this is clunky.
What is needed is simple visibility into item level performance by customer in order to understand performance drivers and optimise pricing.
This is no good, I cannot simply convert the currency to the purchased currency (in my case CNY) because the exchange rate is always changing.
Even with all categories "unhidden", the number of reports is not large and still easy on the eye (54 as of today).
This will also reduce the amount of calls to the backend.
Example: Search by name or reference: 12345, 14540, 12058Result: 12345 14540 12058
With several thousand customers, we can not remember which customers have which preferences.
Please please please make a bulk option for this.
For instance a client paying $50 per week , subsequently asks for the balance to be refunded after 14 months of payments.
This means we have around 60 over payments, all of which we have to go into to make the cash refund.
If a related client then gets invoiced there is no easy way to transfer a credit from another customer.
We again have to manually go in, edit each overpayment to the other customers name, then apply.
Saves risk of typos too on each vat return.
(Canadian and US)
Working with freelancers for whom we set up details as per their contract, it would be useful to get bill line item details in the remittance advice
> Approve bill *Bill approved page loads *> go to Files> find and select file> etc.
multiple bills" and then in the subsequent  page the Approve button would be "Approve and Next".
and to continually return to a stateless File Inbox page is a nuisance.
I can't think of a single instance where a single attachment doesn't pertain to a single bill so the processing can usually be procedural.
We advance money on behalf of clients for purchases.
Marking each expense as a Billable Expense works great when Billable Expense is properly selected and marked for each line item.
Look forward to your reply.
Can you please put dates on your help articles or remove "old" articles when a feature is updated?
Request for feature to be changed.
In order to actually delete clients from a group you are required to click options then select remove, I believe the two features should be changed/swapped.
It is more likely that you will be removing a client from a group rather than deleting an entire group so why is the deleting option so readily available?
There has to be a better way!
Currently not available and makes is a pain to work around.
Make a separate field for the "make payable to" and "send to. "
This would also be helpful in the case of DBAs.
The supplier wants the check made payable to the DBA, but the 1099 should be in the name of the supplier.
based on the Tracking category used.
We have discounts based on total number of cases (12 bottles a case) ordered by a liquor store.
Example: Store orders 11 cases, the total order is discounted by $132 (11X12. )
The option for certain stores to automatically be discounted won't work because each store doesn't always get over 10 cases.
This provides you with the guarantee to fulfill the order right away.
Transparent pricing – Interac Online is charged at a flat fee, with no hidden caveats.
Lower PCI compliance costs – with Interac Online, there’s no private data to store, therefore, no cost to you.
It would then be nice that while I am in inventory looking at an item that I realize needs to be ordered that I can create a PO with that item and the supplier details are filled in automatically from those fields.
When entering inventory items I would love a button that says "Save & copy", creating an identical copy of the previously entered item.
This would also be useful in entering the same item over and over with multiple prices until you implement tiered (or multiple) pricing.
Often items are priced based on quantity ordered.
The only way to do this at present that I can think if is have the item in the inventory multiple times at each price.
A company can have multiple contacts each with their own address, phone no.
Having what is essentially only one contact in a company is broken.
There isn't even a single field to store this information.
That is fine unless that field is requested to be used for other purposes.
This is very common practice and my order process below is quite typical.
My order process is:1) Quote a customer2) Customer accepts and gives me a P. O. Num.
Please advise if this feature already exists if not how can I have this produced?
Is this something that could easily be changed?
That's both silly and terrible.
This feature would be great if it could be extended to iOS systems as well.
This would be particularly helpful for payroll reports as an example.
It is the same calendar widget that is currently available to the payroll administrator role.
It shows all approved leave dates and who is taking the leave.
There is no other leave detail shown, and rejected leave is not displayed.
The advantages of having this feature available to all would be;- better workflow planning- resource management, and - accountability.
Other than a manual check against an externally saved budget is conducted, there would be no way to know if changes are made and who has made them.
I hate having to manually change the date to today.
Sometimes I forget and I realize I'm looking at useless data.
Seems it would be nice to get something positive from the system.
I bet you can link it to some app and manage it, but it would be a cool feature from within the system.
I've only been using the system a few months.
If this can be incorporated it would be a great help.
This box allows up to 8 decimals.
So the exchange rate is 540.
00184870 USDThat gives me the wrong amount in CRC, and that means the reconciliation will have issues.
A more thorough solution would be to enable entering the exchange rate backwards:X CRC = 1 USD
Even having the ability to duplicate a line item would be a good start.
I have a select number of reports I view frequently.
Since the other banks have their logos for direct feeds, it can get confusing to not see a logo for Natwest or RBS that I know are on activated direct feeds.
SAF-T files will in the near future be a requirement for audit controll across Europe.
I thought this was the norm having used it for 4 years in our previous cloud accounting software.
Would be useful to have a data column that is referenced but not displayed in reports, for example a column that is referred to in an additional formula based column.
It would be much nicer if I'd get an e-mail whenever someone did something of interest.
I believe this should be fairly easy to implement and would be useful for many people.
Our notes have customs rows in them as placeholder so you can input data.
I find it very frustrating that schedules print in Alpha order and not code.
It would be great to have an options button to choose one way or the other.
Is there a function that we are missing?
To have the option to post & copy on a manual journalThis will then post the current manual journal and create a copy straight away
That information is not accepted into that column.
Meaning that information is not available easily at all.
This will be so beneficial to all AND will reduce the amount of Admin work that sometimes goes into sending such items.
It would be good to categorize/hide the inventory items to 'we sell' 'we buy' separately so they are easier to look for when adding, editing etc.
This woould make sure the tax rate ins included correctly.
My clients, and myself, take the PDF copy that was emailed and attached to the draft manually.
It seems logical to have it happen automatically.
I've missed the last three submissions because I don't go in every week and check the tax reports.
ie have totals and notes kept to the bottom of the page.
Right now it only shows opening and closing balance.
Could we possibly have one or two more email fields in the client contact details.
We could then populate these fields with the appropriate information and generate the emails accordingly.
Again, I think this feature is wonderful.
I don't know if this has already been requested (I can't find it if it has! )
When employee submits a leave request, could we have the system automatically identify whether they have enough leave.
If they do not have enough, the balance of the leave request should be allocated as UNPAID LEAVE.
possible added to the "+" shortcut feature
Why is the tax rate hidden in the first place?
I have to create one by one at the moment.
Then the adviser can setup the chart and all other matters, but not be responsible for paying the subscription.
It would be good if in the leave request itself it showed the total hours to all team members.
This would clear up so much rubbish in the Notes section, as well as give us the option to place checks and balances in all reports.
MasterCard Prepaid Management Services Australia Pty Limited distributes Qantas Cash (together with Qantas which is an authorised representative of MasterCard Prepaid Management Services Australia Pty Limited for the purposes of providing general financial product advice with respect to Qantas Cash).
We have very many bills from a small number of suppliers and due to VAT rounding errors the amounts are out by a small amount, usually only a few pence.
Save a lot of emails flying backwards and forwards and unnecessary concerns being raised by our clients.
It would be useful to have an accountant advisor permission sitting above the normal advisor permissions which we could set from practice settings.
For mor informationhttps://en.
Here is a classic problem that we get.
So narrow and small!
I'm guessing you have area to submit ideas/improvements.
The standard theme is great, the only problem is logo so small/restrained limited to small narrow window.
even if 400 wide must remain, can we look at 200 high?
Importing statements is so boring!
It will really helped if this can be enhanced in immediate effect.
This could be similar to the find and recode option - maybe a find and populate option.
oI appreciate that this can be done by exporting, amending and then re-importing.
Hello|We have a CPA firm called Pro Accounting and Tax Services, located in Lakewood NJ.
I understand that you run allot of radio commercialson the west coast.
The same thing has to be done in the Northeast region (NY, NJ and CT).
We are the onlyXero certified partner within a radius of 50 miles.
comor on my cell number at 718-964-8990.
We are looking forward to a positive reply.
Owen and Dina Dornstein
Currently have to enter these manually and if there are changes they could easily be overlooked.
its not allowing to make those as blank.
Could you please help me to overcome this problem.
I have trouble typing in my native language in search.
I love this feature, however I have a request for a change to the import of the template.
I hope it's not too difficult to implement and it would be extremely useful for Asian businesses as credit terms here are very often quite long for small businesses.
It would save having to scroll down to the very bottom of the screen simply to go to a client that you know is on a latter page.
Currently they are scaled based on their individual balances.
I have 2 departments (dept 1 & dept 2) so I should have the options to allocate to Dept 1 or dept 2 or none.
These have been available for October in BankLink since the 6th of November.
99 times from 100 I'm looking for data to go on a spreadsheet
Currently it's a real pain to have to make a note of key aspects of the entry, write an email referencing it so that the remote worker can find the transaction I'm referring to & then work on / correct it.
They then click on the notification and it opens up the item & they can see the query in the notes.
Listing all employees in last name order or an option.
It would be very useful to have a free-format field in the Contacts database that allows us to see which subscription category each Contact belongs to.
It take 3 seconds.
Once done you have to click back twice or three times and so on.
come on guys!
(Sorry have copied someone else's narration, but they had it so right without me re-creating it)
I think this is pretty urgent and would be used often by all of us.
I've noticed that you cannot manually link assets back to their original bills, only the system can create these links.
You have said we can view the clients TFN when using our reports.
You have also said we can see the TFN when we edit the tax client.
In our firm we specifically only give the admin team access and rights to do this to ensure that things are updated correctly.
Instead it says "TFN Recorded".
But to now make us search for the TFN as well is a bit much.
as we can set a branding default template per customer,
So in short, next page jump to top not bottomthanks
This is clearly not the case.
Client was previously on MYOB and the date was stamped on those reconciliation reports.
It would be great if we could customise the aged payable/receivable reports to show the tax rate (code) field.
The main problem is often the gateway pages are poorly designed, 1995 looking and especially bad on mobiles.
Our clients often end up confused or seeing so many brands.
But it's missing a key element.
This plugin let's me receive payments on your own website by passing the PRICE and optionally a REFERENCE and ITEM NAME in the url.
Bonus points if we can have some kind of rich editing (bold/italics/underline/dot points etc.
- What to do?
Who is now thoroughly annoyed by a seemingly redundant series of events.
Then I create a note for myself (somewhere) to remind me about this in 20 days.
The fees vary based on external factors.
But I can't.
No more re-entering the address - company number - VAT number etc.
i now have columns so small they take multiple lines (ONE IS THE DATE!
Or even an option to have the description come up?
This is a very common feature used in such popular programs as  ;  ;  - even  uses tags (though not freeform ones!
This could be linked to customers, or certain orders, or particular items.
Is there another way?
At this stage it is to hard to do this through the custom DOCX.
We love it at RED-Lab!
The simplistic nature of it is amazing!
Some docs on how to integrate it in currently would also be great!
presently it has 7 days, 4 weeks, 6 months, last year, 2 years.
As an advisor of a file I receive these notifications.
As the client is in charge of their payroll they make these changes.
If the notification could include the users name who made the change this would be a useful notification.
Support staff emailed stating it is not possible to suspend all activity when selecting "none" access will only allow user to access Payroll Admin function.
A function to change the status from active to inactive, and not deleting user is good.
This however is a work around ie.
Of course that still leaves it open to someone making it up but it's a record/transparency that it's been done.
This would give a more confidence and allow us to work more efficiently for our clients - everybody wins.
So if you go to print a copy after this, it shouldn't ask you then if you want to mark it as sent.
It would be useful for recording petty cash receipts.
Have the option to include all of the employees details.
We sometimes give clients a discount of say $30, $50 or $100 as a whole figure.
With the current restriction of two decimal places, it gives some odd cents after the decimal place either below or above the amount that we have promised our clients.
A promise is a promise!
Although we can create an extra line to show the actual amount of discount given or promised as a workaround, it defeats the whole purpose of having the Discount function in the Invoicing module in the first place.
On bills, you have placeholders, for year, month, week, month year, and week year.
I found it interesting that you don't have bill day, due day, bill date, and due date.
But i can't find it on the app.
we're meant to be improving and moving torwards an EEO environment these days.
It would be great to have the option to export manual journals.
It would make everything much easier as opposed to having to type out the whole journal again in the second company.
Not sure if this is currently an option, but I cannot find it anywhere.
Please advise on this oneAndrew
Why we don't have this essential functionality?
The workaround is to have separate Branding Templates with and without this wording, but really it should come up automatically when we choose VAT code: Zero Rated EC Services.
Problem is that in the UK that will cost me £22 per month which is prohibitively expensive.
Even £10 per month is really too much.
In order to stop businesses trying to ride on the back of the cheaper Home version, , e. g. - Invoicing- Payroll- Inventory- Fixed Assets- Expense claims- etc.
I hope everyone agrees and votes positively!
Would it be possible to send the relevant person working on a file an email advising when a client has submitted workpaper queries.
We have the RDI live feeds coming in, and after we have coded the transactions the to field has unknown in them.
It would be great if there was an option for due end of following month.
An extra column so we can see what actual price we are quoting is for a single item (otherwise we have have to put in a single item and then reenter the volume required).
I have asked many times about item 1 without much success.
Examples would be:- my website as in an email footer- a link to a customer survey i. e. surveymonkey, to survey customer satisfaction
It would be very useful if in a client's contact details you could have more than one phone number such has home, work, mobile.
As an Accountant who is frequently working on reporting in past financial years it would great to see an option under 'common formats' for the previous financial year.
The addition of a cash flow statement would make this package complete.
The current practice is that any user, save for the read-only user can edit the sale price.
Also the information for capital gains tax will also have to be recorded e. g. original cost etc.
Is this in the works?
However, because i am human I sometimes make mistakes.
This is entirely my fault but has sometimes happened because I have been distracted by the phone for example in the middle of the procedure.
That way, it would be impossible for me to forget to do it.
The option to create a custom calculated field but not for numeric calculations but for text fields.
Currently all classifications appear and employees have to choose their classification from amongst multiple options.
Or it would be great if we could at least upload our mugshot (the functionality doesn't appear to be working yet)
As the supporting document is "downloaded" this means changes cannot be made to the schedule directly.
- it would save so many clicks!
Both are really useful, but could you rename one of them to make it clear which is which?
If as I have found you receive a receipt with VAT from a supplier which has been adjusted to be different from the standard 20% the expense claim cannot edited to match the receipt.
EVEN THOUGH I SELECTED THE ITEMS - 35 IN TOTAL.
Or comparable to a check register in Quickbooks.
Now what's problematic is that my document is a compiled receipts and I want to repeat my attachment into multiple transactions from that compiled receipts.
We keep track of all our projects using Google Sheets and have the same projects as Tracking Items under a Projects Tracking Summary.
It would save us double typing of information if we could link these two databases.
An example of this is the livestock numbers for agricultural clients.
So the bill might have non-relevant information on it.
Would it be possible to create Recurring Expenses in the Expense Claim area.
Excellent for auditing.
It would be great if you could sort by month say have twelves tabs for every month and you can code only those transactions and save and reconcile only those transactions.
or the internet crashes.
This would be a very useful aid for credit control.
but if you forget?
The first available number is chosen automatically.
But if the original check number was way off, the next number might be too.
BASIC ACCOUNTING function should allow the user to change the number to an accurate one.
EVERY SINGLE ONE of my clients has asked me for this.
I know it was raised on here a couple of years ago (and the solution was the formula approach mentioned above) but I'm surprised more users aren't asking for this.
Are others getting clients asking for this?
Also with some names it is difficult to guess which one is the first name and which one the family name, unless they are specified in the client's record.
This will work as an extra check to make sure that all data has been entered correctly.
They have had 4 hours Sick leave and 10 hours Annual leave during the week.
The current setup requires manual entry and thus could lead to error.
Payments on a Tuesday for example require a different rule to those on a Thursday.
Please VOTE for this.
If I go to Payroll > Superannuation I can see the list of Auto Superannuation Payments showing when they were processed.
This would allow the accountant to easily reconcile super payments against accruals.
Not only is relevant training so important but credit for what's already being completed and undertaken is a must.
Ability to print serial numbers on asset listing
Fixed Assets would be really valuable if bar coding was available so that each barcode could be read (through a scanner) when carrying out asset stock takes therefore having all the information in one system.
This feature has also recently been added to the QB online softwareThanksAndrew
Its too rigid at the moment, not to mention it doesn't contain all of the necessary information and some incorrect information.
Not the end of the world I know but surely for a tax important document it should be correct.
Following on from that, the payslip should also show the "employers" PAYE reference number, IE their registration number with HMRC.
That's fine for monthly paid employee - not so great for weekly paid people - it should show the (tax) week number!
I wrote about it in a blog here, to very positive response:http://www.
com/obvious-but-overlooked/For tech companies, even small ones, this is a method of disclosure that VCs are MUCH more attracted to.
Keeping track of all those possible payments when we have to ask for various purchase orders that could be traced to one quote has brought about various mixups.
Could this be added to Draft Manual Journals?
I have a client who adds a lot of details into the description field.
The Search function is great but doesn't work with numbers.
Is that possible?
Integration could also be used to convert an appointment from the Calendar into billable hours for existing contacts etc.
I've had several clients mention and request this feature.
Have the ability to store the search you do, as this is often repeated for a client.
That wastes 2/3 of a sheet of paper per check.
Our expenses are paid by related company or directors, so we input them in Manual Journal.
This would be used to for customers who make advance payments towards services that have not yet been invoiced.
For example multiple contacts were created and used for 1 entity.
When merged the old contacts still appear in profit and loss when you drill down to see detail.
Can we have a way of resizing these images PLEASE.
Once you click into a final GST return, in order to get to the next finalised GST return, you have to repeat the process.
A button here to skip next, or skip back, would be ideal.
Tax is calculated by line, and then summed.
I want this to be a feature request, not a comment on someone's discussion thread.
It would be great if we could export reports with the filtered results.
I. e Leave Balance Reports (with the amounts filtered out).
Currently when you export as PDF, it still shows all filters.
Only way is the export into excel and then amend it at the moment
The Australian Securities & Investments Commission is a pain to deal with but is vital to keep up to date records.
And of course its another reason then to get rid of Accountants Office.
Is this possible or will it be added in the future?
We make several large transfers each year and this would enable us see the average exchange rate for the year which is important for budgeting and management reporting.
Hey, this is a hopefully super-easy edit -- but on mobile devices, quotes show up as one huge unformatted paragraph, which doesn't look great.
:)Here's a demo:
this would then automatically apply the same tracking code to all transaction lines.
this could even be extended to the contact screen, so that all transactions applied to a contact have a default tracking code?
Really needs to be a choice of this or month name for clarify eg.
Perhaps a parameter at the end would do it, and it was optional to turn on in your general settings?
Relates to Workflow MaxIt would be great if Workflow Max had the ability to provided the ability to manage Risks, Issues, Assumptions and Dependencies against jobs.
We are a not for profit and some of our managers / treasurers for the very small entities do not have scanners to attach documents with each transaction however they do have mobile phones.
It would be very helpful if this feature was made available.
Despite telling our clients, they forget this and send erroneous information to the recipient.
Not everyone sends remittance advices afterwards, so this isn't a cure for the problem.
I don't know if you're going to roll it out.
It would be great if you are.
0049 should be rounded to $2.
It would be great if a filter was installed on this page that allows all Inactive Items to disappear from the display, and if this setting (Hide Inactive Items) could be retained for further visits to this page.
As soon as one is saved in one it should automatically appear in the other owners tax return when you open and refresh it.
The inefficiency exists when we purchase lets say six products on the same order from Amazon.
You can't have the two modules open in two separate tabs or windows and do them concurrently.
The only option to get rid of it is to delete it.
It gets rid of trails as if it had never existing.
We find comfort in knowing that we can always find historical records to support existing transactions.
5% and the other at 13.
Can the VAT Return be modified to operate both VAT rates?
If you are using SKUs, that is what is available for you to choose.
It should bring up the camera and scan the common types (Code 39, QR, etc.
Of course, if I've missed something obvious, I'd be delighted if someone could point me in the right direction!
Her son is her alternate address/contact and I am unable to enter any of his details because -  Additional people cannot be added when the primary person has no email address set.
You have to then exit and go back into the "awaiting approval" tab, find the correct Bill that is awaiting to be approved and approve it.
So very tedious having to go through menu steps to thesis options.
I've passed your feedback on to our Product Team for consideration.
I've included a link below to our Community page.
Sometimes there's a cross over between reconciliations and the automatic reminders that would be best to avoid.
Effectively it's a reminder to me to check it before it goes out.
Not happy with the related party note and unable to change it.
Or is there a work around?
The owner could then organise a special gift or something to say thank you to such loyal clients.
Once they have approved it, then an email alert should be sent to the A/R person to then send it out to the customer.
3. bulk editing functionality, to assign multiple transactions to a given customer at once.
The second would make coding reimbursable expenses quicker.
Which is called "Delete statement line".
If this is already available, please let me know.
Therefore if a PO is raised for a value of &#163;10k (to cover a range of work and/or services)- Once the matched value reaches the PO value you can no longer book anymore bills to said PO.
It would help to ensure bills are only being posted to the approve value.
E. g. AASB number for public company reporting next to figures?
Feature request for email integration with Kerio Connect.
With growing concerns about the global domination and potential security vulnerabilities of Google and Microsoft it would be great to see a culturally compatible integration at the lower tier providers.
This feature request is something most accounting practices have had with traditions software for past 30+ years.
Looking at the Tracking page, my single Category Name has many Category Options in it, and they all have long names - usually a short sentence.
Can you please allow widening of this column (or an auto-fit feature).
Under the Tier 3 reporting guidelines, credit card balances and term deposits with a maturity greater than 90 days do not meet the definition of cash.
Therefore these should not be included in the opening and closing cash balances in the Statement of Cashflows.
Unless of course your search feature doesn't bring up relevant posts or the wording may vary for each different person & country.
Why does this button default to a Spend Money transaction?
On numerous occasions, I have intended to enter a Receive Money, clicked this button, entered the transaction only to realise it has been recorded as a spend money instead of a receive money.
I would love a feature that I could enable/disable which would send contacts into a "cleansing que" for me to later review.
We have been advised that if you select a Contact THEIR email will sync (so in theory it's straightforward to action), but this is useless for us as the primary email we enter in the clients email is the one that is relevant to the accounting.
Can we please have these bugs amended ASAP?
Deductions an only be matched to credit notes.
We do not, however, wish to raise a credit note until the issue has been checked thoroughly.
Often these deductions come from Letting Agents, or their subcontract bookkeepers, who erroneously make deductions and then repay them some months later.
I cannot believe we are the only ones who's clients suffer in this way and cannot then enter the receipt until either they have issued credit note(s) or the client has repaid.
The formula function in Schedules is great.
76 instead of 76%).
When bills are entered, saved and submitted for approval they do not hit the GL until they are 'approved'.
This feature needs to be changed.
At the end of the transaction it does show the following line but it is not correct as a line has already been added - it should show - Total is out by (difference between the total transaction and the lines already allocated).
The sum of your selected transactions must match the money spent - Spent 164.
78 AUD - Total is out by 164.
It would certainly save me phone calls from angry suppliers!
I have several customers I am currently attempting to collect on well past the 90 day mark.
QuickBooks is apparently seemless with Q2 ebanking.
Same should reflect in P&L and Balance Sheet.
We can calculate physical stock instead of putting entry into kgs or ml’s after every bill.
Its much better to count the stock physically on last day of every month.
Once a month calculation is no big job.
Please forgive if this has already been requested, but I cannot find such a topic despite searching.
I've been doing my head in trying to find a solution for this but I'm not sure where to start.
Does anyone know if you can create a template for this purpose in WFM so it merges all the required data?
This is creating a rounding error in the unfiled GST.
My Summary and Terms fields often have several sections, and it would be hugely helpful if I can format those sections (with headers, for example) so they look better and more understandable to the customer.
One option would be to change that field to include a rich text editor (not unlike the one I'm typing in now: https://cl.
Alternatively, if that field recognizes and properly formats plain text (akin to the Markdown or Textile formatting syntax) that would be amazing.
It would be helpful if when you click "done" when editing the reports, that it stays on the same page that you are editing.
Unfortunately, banks are not helping by failing to be consistent with references.
Suggestion: search function in Match UI should be more intelligent: - it knows the amounts, date, and currency conversion that day.
Companies may ask a client if they want their billing with NCF or not.
The Dominican government has 6 NCF categories.
Each has a sequential numbering that starts with an alphabet and 19 other numbers.
From a privacy point of view we prefer to not show the TFN on any of the returns saved to PDF unless necessary.
I'd love to see a global option to have the show TFN off by default.
For example, it only shows items which are "In stock" - which means it's greater than 0 quantity.
It's not useful to show a list of 200+ records with every 2nd row to be "0".
A way to "archive" old inventory.
Practice Manager needs to have a better way of managing disbursements.
That is no good.
It would hugely be appreciated.
If there is a way and I am missing it, please advise?
Currently missing "Reconciled Until" feature.
In the old reports you could nominate DUE DATE and select a month and it would show only those Customers/Suppliers where payments were still to be received or paid.
Annoying that it is structured the way it is.
Don't delete the old reports!
It would be really helpful if a control was put in place to alert the user if a balance in the Balance Sheet, P&L or in the Equity etc.
doesn't match the balance in the notes.
OR if the equity balance in the Movements in Equity doesn't match the equity note.
My clients makes a lot of prepayments, it would be good to see how much credit each supplier has through prepayments.
It would be good to see how much you have paid in advance.
It would be great if they could attach their purchase order when accepting the quote, rather than having to send it through in email.
As a reseller of software, we don't hold tangible inventory of the software.
It would be great if the last items appeared on the grid in a greyed out font to enable the user to see what the last items were.
Now, after I post a manual entry, I have to view the trial balance and leave the entry screen, or download a detailed GL to excel.
I try to avoid all Microsoft in my life.
I work for a large church and we have, naturally, confidential information in our financial data.
But we also have many staff members that have expense management responsibility.
So - - a very helpful user role would be a user: - that had access to Published Reports only (for managing expenses) AND - had access to expense claims to process personal reimbursements.
It would be great to get the info populated to the partner's tax return if it's a 50/50 in regards to the one not on the prefill.
It would be great to have a few more "automatic options" ie "Last year to date", "previous month", Prior YTD etc.
When you click on Date options in reports - they are very frustrating.
A calendar or recent date option would be good.
The date today is July 2016.
I click on the drop down option and the first date that appears is June 2017.
It is counter intuitive.
However, I have reconciled all these transactions before using payroll service.
It takes about 20 seconds per line item.
Ability to manage user access across a number of entities.
I do not understand why your depreciation calculates to the neared pence (or cent).
99 and it is depreciated over 4 years.
The first month will have depreciation of 15.
99 and the NBV will be 734.
to say it was edited by, or something was added, I find this very distracting and it can make the list very long.
If you're going from a different order eg.
spent, description, status back to date, it puts the oldest first.
Who wants to see a transaction 3 financial years ago.
Can we ditch it?
So an alert here would have been good - also a delete button beside the archive button would be good too.
ABA file) for wages, super as well as supplier payments in one?
This option would help us and others a lot, especially for a cleaning company.
BBX are bigger and more worldwide than Bartercard, so would have thought this would have been possible by now.
For example if a Payee starts with 'Z *' it could apply a Motor Vehicle 90%/10% rule.
Surely this can't be right and should be a simple fix?
It took me about an hour.
While checking my work, I clicked into one of the fields to amend it.
I clicked 'backspace' on my keyboard to delete the field entry annnd.
In doing this, I actually activated my browsers 'page back' button.
Please please please, get rid of that possibility.
I almost put my fist through my PC.
(ie if you have more than 200 transactions)Currently you have to click the "Show More" button multiple times until all transactions are displayed.
It is easy to forget this and it results in quotes going out without GST added.
This has cost me several thousands of dollars having to honour quotes that accidentally excluded GST.
This is a major oversight of an accounting package.
the client could file the GST return instead of or as well as the tax agent).
While we're at it it would be good to see a differentiation between financial advisor users - eg.
External accountants (particularly subscribers) and internal administrators.
Conversely "standard" user access gives too little access to internal admin.
It would assist in locating duplicate entries as you could sort by amount.
Also it would be useful to have a separate option of what status to select - as that would be really useful when sorting this stuff out.
We then go back into 'Reconcile' and complete the rest with matches and transfers.
But creating rules takes too long.
I lost all that was typed in the Description column simply through not clicking out of the column.
I hope this is fixed before these reports are officially added.
The ability to scan and attach a document to the GST return would help, especially in regards to debit and credit adjustments.
This would be particularly helpful when creating end of year adjustment journals.
If the Email Template could be changed to match the Email Screen from Purchase Orders that would be very helpful.
I have been using the integration into Power BI, but it is missing the payroll data.
This data is quite critical to a lot of data analysis and would be great if you could put it in there.
It would be great if some sort of discount could be offered for these funds.
It'd be great if you could Save & Mark as Sent.
At the moment when I click on the transaction, sometimes a graph springs up, some fields I click on and nothing happens.
There is a European Standard for eInvoicing and eOrdering, among other standardised workflow functions (http://www.
Could this not be done for VAT.
(so it is easier to split the large PDF file into smaller PDF files for later processing).
E. g. Job Code: Australia 2016 | Detail: Perth / Brisbane / SydneyIt would be great to firstly have the detail budgets flow through to the header job code budget.
The problem is that this delete button is visually the same or similar to the exit button for other pop-ups such as the attachment viewer.
This makes it confusing for users as to the purpose of the buttons and makes it too easy to delete attachments (in spite of confirmation pop-ups).
My suggestion would reduce confusion and accidental attachment deletion.
should have both an exit button and buttons to delete attachments.
instead of having to go out of inventory and in to 'approved purchase orders' and go through them all to find them!
When going to Tax > Returns, it would be good to see another status column added for a list of tax returns that you are holding for lodgement at a later date.
This way if the email with the link to view doesn't get sent through, we've still got a link to watch the webinar.
When we send out a receipt to our clients, we send a link in the email for the customer to click on and place a review on our company.
In regular email programs you can rename this link to look professional, ie "Click here to place a review on us".
I've found 3 things which would really make it much more useable.
But on the mobile app, it _asks_ for the due date, and _invoice date_ is hidden well down the form.
However wouldn't it be a fantastic addition to also have a plus line as well.
This could take a ten minute task to a few seconds.
My supervisor has been asking for this feature for over two years now.
it's to difficult to checking backcan you kindly help in this matter?
In the Find and Match reconciliation area.
I can sort by date - but it is not quite the same.
They will drop their statements in a secure online vault and then I have to enter each transaction one by one, and their are many transactions, so after I enter each one, I have to reconcile them one by one as there is not a way to reconcile all of them at once.
This would be a great feature for budget comparisons and to analyse data.
My suggestion is for the calculation to be based on cumulative earnings.
A facility to protect outgoing PDFs would be useful.
I could link our contacts to their filemaker pro records if the fmp protocol was not excluded
The financial statements for SME feature is amazing.
We have a client who has hundreds of employees.
So updating details is very slow.
you want to change it"
It would be useful to identify those customers without a contact email.
If this isn't possible, could it be added as a feature request?
I would ask for a "passcode" for Accountants in relation to this to protect ourselves from potential fraudulent activity.
Is there anyway we could have a global archive feature?
We have a number of Customers that are running more than one PO simultaneously.
Having requested this feature for 4 years now it would be REALLY good if we could make some progress on it!
Look forward to hearing back
I am happy that I have selected the correct option, so I click outside the drop-down.
However, the drop-down stays in view.
I click on the drop-down, however the drop-down stays in view.
However, this deletes my scenario and query, and I have to start again from scratch.
(Control-Z didn't work, by the way).
Here's an example of what I mean:http://jsfiddle.
It is very useful and a quick way to view Tax code allocations and correcting where necessary.
There also has to be an easier way for advisers to correct Tax code allocations than to go through the whole process of "Remove and Redo" when correcting GST coding for transactions with payments or receipts already allocated.
This would also be an outstanding feature on the App for when employees are submitting receipts.
I feel that the ability to extract specific customer information is extremely limited.
It would also be great if there was an easier way to navigate my inventory.
I do regular price changes and after each one i am getting taken back to the start.
However, there are many cases when this is not correct.
For example a motor vehicle purchase via finance is non cash but there is GST on the purchase of the vehicle.
Obviously if you select the journal to be cash the transactions will show in the GST return but then your cashflow is incorrect.
There needs to be a function within the journals to select non cash but also enable the relevant transactions to be included in the GST returns.
In our company we have one manager and three assistant managers ( salesman).
Each assistant manager has 3 to 4 salesmen under his umbrella.
Currently you have to go into each individual transaction to check whether anything has been uploaded.
At the moment we have to ask them to send us these details and then enter them manually which is a bit silly really.
up to you guys.
As a bureau we want to set-up our managed client dashboard with every facility - in fact our constant updating of the client dashboard is a major selling point of our service.
except as soon as I set the client as managed pretty much everything disappears from their screen (especially Cashflow and Performance Graphs)!
except as soon as I set the client as managed pretty much everything disappears from their screen!
$ of BAS, yet to be paidb.
$ of Income Tax withheld from Employees, yet to be paidc.
Needless to say, we pulled the plug frustrated by in-house developers (we even opened an office in India to speed up the process) and spent countless dollars over a 3 year period.
So ya, we speak Java, Ruby on Rails, SQL, you name it.
with 22 million rental houses (not even including apartments) in the US alone, the market could benefit from Xeros simple, clean design and user friendly approach to complex task.
The accounting software portion is already built, WorkFlowMax already handles the repair and maintenance request, the only thing missing is the CRM portion to house the owners, renters and asset (i. e. , house) information.
This would be a great feature to have on the desktop login screen as well.
This would allow users to play with the interface without having to first create an organisation.
If you type any more than 12 characters the search stops working properly.
Here's an example of the problem: I have a client called "Health Consumer Service".
If I keep typing more letters (to more than 12) it changes to "no results".
These searches all correctly display the client in the results:"health ""health c""health co""health con""health cons""health consu"But any extra letters and the search returns .
This limitation is highly annoying and very poor from a usability point of view.
I have a client that travels a fair bit and has an Air NZ OneSmart card.
This would allow the accountants to reverse the affect of any wrong adjustment.
If you do a search on the Manual Journals and then want to edit and post a journal entry, after posting  the original search list is lost.
The search list needs to be retained somehow.
If you cant retain the search list then the following feature needs to be included.
I am forced to download, month by month, and then re-consolidate.
I have reported this over the last few months, and confirmed with Support.
They have asked me to post here.
Hope to see this soon.
It would be great if you could lock individual users out with the lock dates.
This makes for a bit of a headache as things keep changing!
As a user of your software I have noticed things that in my opinion would make it more user friendly.
At the moment you have to click in the search box before you start a search.
If we could sort by Serial number or location, we could find the actual asset being disposed of regardsPatriciapmetcalf@vodaphone.
I think three months into the future would be more valuable than three months into the past.
Can you please include a current month VAT breakdown on Statements.
No other total is shown.
You would have to be directed straight back to the reconcile page however to reconcile that remaining balance.
The Aged Payables/Receivables Reports currently show a breakdown by month per column.
But, a user cannot delete a file without having to login to Google Drive directly.
We love the fact that you can email a client a link for them to sign a tax return.
So my feature request is once a client has signed up for DocuSign they are given an option to either sign the return (e. g. in the office during the appointment) or be emailed a link to sign (external)
Have I missed something?
In the reports it would be great if "Last Financial Year" was a standard option.
As accountants we are usually trying to reconcile and regularly run reports on the Last financial year in order to close the period and an easy click would make this much quicker.
The functionality to "Enable Mark as Reconciled" should be more obvious to find and easy to access - refer comments on the community forum.
For example:Customer orders once every 2 months, but has now not ordered for 3 months.
Only option is to change the user role to 'advisor' which then causes other issues
We supply a range of products to a number of different customers that have multiple branches.
Sort Expense by Contact on a cash basis
PLEASE, it can't be that hard?
We have several branding themes (a good feature).
Or not have to search through pages & pages in contact search.
(I frequently insert a bunch of relevant text into the email body when sending a quote out. )
Then perhaps a preference setting so that entries can display in contacts sorted by either first name or surname.
It would be nice to have a second amount value designed for payments in a positive format.
Also, a Balance field would be helpful for CSV files that give running balances.
Why is Find & Recode only available to Advisers and not available to Standard Users?
A Variation Order Form - similar to the Purchase Order but with a section for approval.
Saves having to go to another screen then searching for that one supplier.
It should not be possible to change a contact's important banking details without going into the card and authorising it.
This is a huge flaw in the security of the system.
_____________________________________________There should be some safeguard so this is not possible.
Calendar days, particularly around Easter, Christmas or public holidays are necessarily fair.
I overlooked them a few times thinking that they were not active until I thought to try them to see what happened.
Currently we have to download the file saved in the File Library to our computer again and then upload it to Workpapers.
Export Reports and Statements as Excel Workbook (*.
ie 4th April to 29th April.
the whole expenses item needs some work to it.
I am concerned that  I missed some key points, so can I get some information of the Road Show from somewhere?
sage used to have a really good feature on it
People move on and details change.
There has to be a better way.
nz) enables the individual to maintain their personal details in one place and share profiles (of that information) with others and organisations.
The beauty of such a service is that the individual contact does all of the work .
that is they maintain their own contact information in one place and when there is a change it synchronizes with all those people and organisations that they have chosen to share their information with.
Done Once and Done Right.
However, that means we lose the ability to do adhoc intra-day feed imports.
It is often skipped to be added on the Credit notes.
It would be a good reminder!
I have a user I recently added to help me with invoicing.
This really negated the point of why I added him as a user.
Can we have an option against each payable item (salary, pension, etc) as to whether it produces a single journal from each payroll run, or a series of bills for reconciling against?
For example.
Could a Cash Basis checkbox be provided or is there some other way of reporting this?
Either that or if we had SQL access (read-only) to the backend tables we could write our own reportsPeter
Is an integration in the pipeline?
It's great on my dashboard.
It's a small thing but it would mean a lot!
We have customised templates at a practice level, and we further customise reports at a client level.
In particular this affects the signing dates, and year end date within the body of the reports.
Eg for monthly services or software licences, monthly retainers Nuapay is owned by Sentenial one of Europe's largest Saas Sepa authoritieshttps://www.
Currently on Payslips and in 'My Payroll' the annual leave entitlement is displayed in hours.
However, this , and of course, .
Not to be rude, but this is sloppy and  for filtering in these sorts of records.
Sage has a numerical transaction log that can help identify such back postings.
in the history of every transaction found at the bottom of the page but unfortunately this cannot be "sorted" or "filtered" an as such is a useless resource in this particular scenario.
This would display which PO the item is coming in on.
This would help us tracking down the item and when it will be here.
We are having to manual go through all of our open POs to find the item.
One of the benefits of a forum is to see other users feedback and issues.
This forum is the only one I have ever seen that hides other replies in favour of Official answers and "best" answers.
This is counter-productive as often much help comes from other users input.
This would be most useful for those of us who are not very disciplined at entering our expenses claims and only do so every few months.
One is a standing order , the other a manually initiated transfer.
And don't get me started on February end dates!
We set up tracking categories (jobs) and budgets for each job.
Rather than the current 4 column format?
It would be brilliant if we could sort the "Ref" column in Purchases/ Bills into alpha/numeric order.
At present all the other columns sort into order.
I login through here:https://www.
We'll be manually creating payslips until the hourly rate can be hidden.
BUT the reporting capabilities are terrible.
Where notes are written on contact files and follow up is required on a certain date etc, it would be incredibly useful for a list to show on the Dashboard of daily/weekly/monthly tasks/followups required.
At the moment the only update that flows through is the email.
This needs to be updated!
If there is already a way of selecting that preference, please let me know.
Would it be possible to display a 'Current issues' (or similar) message when you are resolving  problems on the site.
This could be either at the start up, or on the page where the problem is occurring.
This leads to a lot of UI bloat with unnecessary, endlessly repeated information and, worse, increases the row height of each transaction by 300% meaning that you see much less relevant information in a single window and have to scroll much, much more.
In my opinion, whether a transaction is user-created or not is irrelevant, but I may be alone in this.
Often however, I do not want this, and have to remember to note what the original date was before hitting 'revise' and then manually re-enter it.
co. uk copied in “"We currently don't have an option to have the 'send me a copy' email address show in the history and notes along with the main recipient.
A simple update similar to the  "related addresses" function would be exceptional.
Manually allocate a portion to a tracing detail3.
Repeat steps 1. and 2. in the same bill to apportion the same item to various tracking details.
In our case currently we are manually loading the same item 6 times to get access to this information.
However, perhaps my suggestion could be implemented through the Adviser tab, where only those with Adviser rights can select for auto approval of rules.
This causes all sorts of issues for us as the accountant.
Not to do it manually.
But it still happens too often.
I instead get removed from the 'spreadsheet' and have to shift+tab back to the cell that I was in.
Can you include individual employee totals on your Super reports.
We are not using / have no requirement for several of the available fields.
Is it at all possible to simply rename them on the front end only?
Is any of this possible with the API right now?
i can however see how it would also be useful if you had credit controllers who look after different departments.
I keep getting caught out by forgetting to send emails after they've been created.
I've voted to have a 'send and email' button but here's an alternative/addition.
It would be even better if it also picked up an exception when a GST rate used for a contact was different than its default.
If you checked against the default contact GST then this would eliminate this line.
Can you confirm a timeline of when you may fix this intergration as quickbooks have already sorted their integration for this software already.
Their site is practicepanther.
It would be helpful if, as an Expense Approver, I could update an expense and save prior to approving.
When importing purchases / bills, then editing said bills you do not get an error if the totals mismatch.
You go into the bill and amend as per requirement.
The line total and bottom total match.
Work through these tabs from left to right, if possible.
'It would be more efficient for employers if once the employee was created they could log into their login and provide their information rather than the employer having to key it all in.
HiThis is a great release, however it only shows the emails that you have sent to a contact and not another staff member's.
This I know seems hyper critical, but I setup dozens of companies a quarter and am still perplexed as to how long it takes me to find a timezone in the US!
I have raised 4 in all as separate features (see below for one of them) and hope to see at least some of them as future updates!
I have a client who wants receipts/bills attached to EVERY spend money and receive money transaction.
If this feature is somehow available already, please point me in the direction.
Appreciated much your concern on this.
Currently the same contacts have to be added twice.
but many fields such as name, position, phone, email, etc.
However, it then runs through them all to check if there are duplicates (so it can lump multiple Bills into one check) and at this point the ordering gets lost.
It would be super helpful to have bills from bills.
Also, in the same way it would be good to see the same graph but for direct and indirect costs?
Rather than having to go back into the customer set up area.
Have a dedicated area where you can view your payments, see how much is owed.
On more than one occasion someone has inadvertently deleted a valuable expense claim and there is no way of undeleting or recovering this.
Let’s have a recycle bin please.
Right now there are only two columns on the dashboard.
I have all plant and equipment set up as tracking classes.
My point is when you put leave request far in advance the employer tend to leave until last minute and then forget that it exists.
Leave is important to the employee work cycle therefore it also needs attention.
I have a number of repeating transactions on the credit card.
I suspect this will be easy to implement as many other listing screens have this function already.
I'll try and keep this short and sweet.
Off the top of my head i can think of two main uses for it (i'm sure there are others) 1.
Once the Theme is set, (on a Quote for instance), the only way to change it is to load the 'Revise' option.
Where the Quote is 'accepted', this entails a further couple of steps to Unmark as Accepted - and remember to Re-Accept.
We love the bar graph that shows total cash in and out for the current month and previous 5 months.
But from the "Great job!
e. g. I have two tracking categories (Staff and Department) so I can run specific P&L reports, one for a Staff P&L and one for a Department P&L.
So I can run the Staff P&L and it works perfectly.
I run the P&L by Department and the staff salaries don't show!
I have had this GUI problem with many other applications, and you guys are too good to make this mistake.
Would also be helpful if you could turn this function on and off with the different suppliers.
This is the most ridiculous thing ever:1.
users have been going on about that for unicorn ears!
GET BEHIND THE UNICORN!
It's getting to the point where it's barely affordable as an annual expense.
I would hate to have to discontinue, and this is most certainly no ultimatum; I have way too much regard for your company for that.
It's more a sign of desperation.
Think on it.
But there will still be all of the Payroll and Expenses listed under Tax Exempt.
Our Request: have some kind of Organization set-up that does NOT count Payroll as Tax Exempt, and allows us to NOT assign tax codes to Expenses.
I fill in the prompt and then am rewarded with the normal login screen where my email address and password go.
It would be great if you could have a simple inventory solution that functions similarly.
Since I create inventory in small quantities and on-demand, tracking inventory with the current setup doesn't work.
It isn't updated frequently enough so it runs out on the books and prevents invoicing.
Also, it would be great if this could facilitate tracking of multiple inventories (e. g. Raw Materials and Finished goods).
The 4 boxes at the top are nice for summary, but below that you should see all transactions so you don't have to click "see all".
If we had the ability in Cash Code to have a Check Number column that we could sort by the process would be greatly speed up the data entry process.
When we live in this modern world with on-line accounting why do the credit card companies not update their systems to have better information on their statements.
I am a property manager and have direct debits set up to come out of my credit cards each month.
There is a requirement to publish your corporation tax return to Ireland Revenue Commissioners in iXBLR format.
The only thing it is missing is a notes section against each tracking item.
Would be great if our employees had the option to put down a few notes against their times.
These little notes make all the difference for us as employers.
Is this upgrade/feature something you could please consider?
It is even worse for clients trying to do it themselves!
For privacy reasons we choose to print tax returns without TFNs showing.
However, some clients think their TFN is missing and keep hand-writing their TFN on the Electronic Lodgement Declaration for me.
When in practice manager (or Tax) you click the tax tab, then Returns.
However it always opens up on the Draft Returns Tab,I have only actually benefited from it opening on the DRAFT tab once.
If there's currently a way other than manually calculating, please enlighten me!
I'm using the 2-step log in process and have a request.
A small thing I know, but can you enable the pressing of enter?
Institute of Professional Bookkeepers of Canada (IPBC) is Canada's largest non-profit bookkeeping association (see ipbc.
This could be strictly only available to SMSFs, as evidenced by a trust deed/etc.
The ability to do single message or group message would be great.
There is an ability to apply a Brand Theme to a selected Group of clients, but where any of the clients have used both Brands it will not deliver 2 Statements that is one under each brand/theme.
This would be very helpful to simplify planning.
If so, can you also select who to approve the claim (similar to leave request).
Good apps to look at are Mint, Acorns, Betterment, Personal Capital.
For the love of God, why do you not have the ability to view the Category and Notes on each transaction without having to click into each transaction?
I find it mind boggling that the user has to click into each transaction, then click edit to make any change.
Mint Logical Way to recode on the flyhttps://www.
dl=0Xero Asinine limited view of transactions that requires 2 clicks to get into each transaction = hellhttps://www.
This would be very useful in order to track for example all issued Credit notes and to check for possible errors.
I believe this is essential as it will make the document filing easier and auditor can search the supporting document and journal easily.
One example of this is imputation credits.
It would be nice if there were a few 1 click links that would directly create the defined additional reporting default periods with a single click - Year TO Date, Last Year, etc.
It doesn't even go away if you enter the FIND AND MATCH option.
A small thing yes, but very annoying nonetheless.
There's a few improvements to be made:1.
It should be $19.
It should give a choice to display "All" transactions3.
It would be a great addition if XPM could have a "Place of Birth" field for individuals (probably next to client's Date of Birth) .
Retention amounts are only due in for eg 12 months.
If these could be identified separately it would be useful to know this value.
It makes legal discovery nigh on impossible.
I service clients that rely on having electronic backup attached to their transactions, but that doesn't always happen.
This would be a great feature to implement; it would help identify which transactions are missing backup immediately and help speed up the process of attaching backup.
Why aren't the widths adjustable anyway?
I couldn't find anything about it.
Either way a lot of extra work.
IT WOULD BE GREATER STILL, if we could save more than one template!
Please implement this type of functionality.
As BAS Agents/Bookkeepers we have the benefit (dubious) of experience and know that some users can't help themselves!
But the attachment name does not follow the profile name.
It is always named with your legal entity name.
Similar to the "bulk payments" option but for individual payments.
It would be very useful to have a field showing if the bill has been assigned to a client.
I have suppliers an on-sell those services.
Should be a fairly simple feature / option for you to install.
Would it be possible please to colour our Contacts to differentiate between Debtors and Suppliers?
Green for Debtors and Red for Suppliers.
We have instances where we have Contacts who are both Debtors and Suppliers.
Firstly, why has the B been dropped so that we are now preparing an AS?
This is not a flattering acronym and makes no sense as to why change it at all.
Could BAS and IAS be two separate titles?
Secondly 8B no longer shows on the AS which may lead to confusion for our clients.
There's currently no way to re-create repeating bills!
even from the browser controls.
However, I only have one user profile.
I think it would be a good idea to have a different profile for each company and a personal profile for each user.
the phone number section will not allow us to put any letters in the field only numbers.
This causes all sorts of issues.
1) At the moment it only can be linked to Online invoicing.
This looks unprofessional on reports.
Can't think why this is not possible.
This is an ongoing and regular issue for me.
When assets are disposed or sold, we are required by NZ regulations to reverse the depreciation relating to those assets for the current year.
Under the old Fixed Assets module, this reversal would be part of the disposal journal, so the adjustment would occur in the current month.
However, why is it NOT displayed in the Demo Company?
It would save having to go into Organisational settings to look it up.
Accountant 19/02/2016 10:45am : ThanksThis will enable cleaner communication between client and accountants/bookkeepers and enable more information to be available.
It would be very helpful if we could run two fixed asset registers on the same client as some of our clients have a tax asset register and an accounting asset register.
It would be ideal in the name field, so it can never be missed.
However, it cannot be a field that is included and sent to the ATO on tax returns & correspondence.
To show a client all the outstanding quotes they have in with you.
There could be boxes to tick in the "Supplier details" where we could confirm they have the necessary insurances and then a reminder established for when we have to chase their renewals.
My clients want to know how much they have taken home in their pockets this year easily rather than drilling down into reports.
Of course this is only an issue if there is multiple trading statements.
For example if the group is Motor Vehicles the total line is Total Motor Vehicles.
We enter the membership details in the contact page.
We have information for the date the member joining the organisation.
Also, it will be good if there is couple more field for filling in member's organisation and interest/profession.
Which could then be exported to PDF or excel.
It's very slow.
com and CapitalOneInvesting.
This would make it much easier when dealing with loans, UPEs etc.
Saves me having to email it to the accountant at a later date.
There doesn't appear to be a way to get both
- When logging into an org or switching between orgs,a simple notification appears saying "Jim Smith is currently logged in"- Then when working on the org, if someone logs in to that org, a notification should appear saying "Jim Smith has logged on"- If when working on the org, someone logs out of the org, a notification should appear saying "Jim Smith has logged off"It would be great to hear from any other users encountering a similar issue and if perhaps there are alternative suggestions to increase visibility of concurrent users.
Please adjust so that the logo is on the actual right.
An option to select to charge a full year's depreciation in the year of purchase.
Alternatively could the description out the side  have a section that relates to these PBE's where it is different to other entities.
EG telephone and tolls goes in cost o providing goods and services for a PBE, but goes to expenses for other entities.
Can you put in brackets number of journals in draft at top of manual journals page so we can verify if there is anything there.
on a couple of occasions we have not picked up that there were draft journals as it does not stand out
Ledger Only clients are really a once a year client and it would be helpful to match the fees to the once a job rather than have these monthly charges.
but this isn't exactly what we wanted to.
I suggest that the Platinum, Gold etc designations are based on active rather than prepaid licences.
Simply having "Net Profit" for reporting purposes presents better.
I usually end up having to trawl back through previous trial balances to work out what has changed.
The whole thing needs to be completely overhauled.
Instead of getting out of the view mode and having to select it from the inbox to delete.
The date range options on the newer reports works well, making selecting a period really quick and simple.
For example we are in February now, but selecting Last Quarter to Date would do reports for July to December, or last month to date would run reports for July to January.
I am in the Staff/Manage Access screen.
It would be a huge help if this list could be searched by organisation.
It is such a pain to have to try and guess which page an organisation is listed on.
When the guys have nothing else to do!
and to be added beside the transaction date.
It would be great to have this live on the dashboard.
Ideally it would all be within 1 or 2 clicks of completion, from the Dashboard.
Income By Contact includes refunds from businesses eg return something you have bought and it is "Income"?
Not a credit for an expense!
Similarly, get an ATO refund or Insurance refund and it is treated as income?
I shouldn't have to filter out credits from non customers.
You've recently added a Statement of Cash Flows - this is great.
So the CASH balances actually include LIABILITIES.
Would it be possible for you to perhaps change, highlight, or animate the icon in the header to indicate that the timer is running in the background?
Possibly even display the current timer value next to the icon?
Is this a feature you may think of puttting into the system or is the work involved to much?
Looking forward to a solution!
This creates the requirement to train people to do this extra step and almost guarantees that sometimes it will accidentally be missed.
It would be great if you could choose to sort with newest at the top.
Perhaps there could be two options on the drop down list at the top under "Show by".
It could say "Date (oldest first) " or "Date (Newest first").
Unless there's a  way to change this already that I've overlooked.
This means the person entering the payable bill should not be allowed to approve it.
and they can't see bills entered by other users, and so can't reconcile supplier statements.
Not because you spend a handful of impersonal machine cycles to give me empty encouragement.
Nobody wants to share with lenders or investors about how much spent on meals but do want to know that internally for cash flow purpose.
I love your files feature which I have newly discovered!
But I have one big plea!
We are starting to attach scanned copies of service agreements to each our customers.
As an accountancy practice our clients are recorded numerically using reference numbers (for our filing system, electronic filing, accounting software, HMRC portal etc).
It will not let me select 'ALL'.
To have Accept or Reject button in the client's end when we email out the quote to client
You normally have to show the accounting income then show the tax income.
I believe this is the main issue.
this is a valuable way to cross check budgets and cost to go on projects otherwise I have to do this within a different software and essentially double entering invoicesany help would be much appreciated
and so on.
Then a purchase order can be edited by adding in Freight and other landed charges as credit amounts.
This will be useful when sending clients the outstanding reconciliation items with comments.
Are you working on that?
Toggl already integrates with a lot of other apps and services, and their API is extremely well documented https://github.
It's frustrating if a client wants to maintain Adviser access and then unlocks a period that we (bookkeepers) have locked because something has been lodged or reconciled for reporting purposes.
Likewise when bookkeepers and accountants are working together on a file.
The app allows for a straightforward photo to be taken - which is invariably distorted by perspective/ angle.
So I've been using another 'camera scanner' app to get 'flattened out' images, (it interpolates the 4 corners of the page and then transforms the image into a rectangular one while cropping the background).
We support several accounting packages:  Sage, Cardinal and Passport (used to be Real World).
It would be nice, on the Check Style page if there was a way to print a test check.
It would then show in the correct category in the balance sheet and not look odd having  brackets around the amount which would mean that it really needs to be disclosed in the other category in the balance sheet.
Sage handles this well - allowing you to choose certain codes for this very purpose.
It makes presentation to a client look more professional.
This adds the ability to customise the quotes better as you can't have 500 different templates and you templates are also only up to 1MB which is way too small for professional looking quotes with a cover letter, scope or job, terms and conditions etc.
I have a list 1000 customers long with 99% zeros.
Needs to sort by data or $.
Also, it needs to live on the dashboard.
Not ideal but I'll take it.
We have shipped to many billing addresses and billed many shipping addresses as a result.
However, right now we're not in a position to work on this. "
"but for now this isn't something the team are looking into at the moment.
status=Planning*shakes head*To be scheduledAre you serious?
status=StartedMost of these are reporting based or helpful to back end accountants or partners.
Where is all the below with huge number of votes and requirements and years of asking?
I am not taking away from the above being real requests and necessary, but seriously?
"And while Job Costing is certainly on our radar, we haven't been in a position to develop a solution to this.
Huge of resources available.
Even MULTI-CURRENCY TO WFM, which may fix a lot of things for most real life users and day to day actual operations.
I have the same issue with employees charged to each category.
as i think this would achieve a better response to the reminder from the customer.
Its important (especially for small businesses) to track these changes.
A few improvements would make my life easiers:1.
This is not the same as the negative inventory request.
I don't want to track changes to stock levels through invoicing.
The attachment window is way too small and doesn't resize horizontally - it's limited to 618 pixels.
On a widescreen monitor with loads of space I want to have the attachment window get a low more space so it's not zoomed out so far - make it more flexible to the screen and easier to read.
If OneDrive is working, show will show how much space is available: http://1drv.
The reason being is that with the Symantec VIP Service, the user simply receives a pop-up (push notification) on their device (phone or ) to Deny or Allow access.
No, I don't work for Symantec.
- Payslips should have YTD summaries and have logo included on payslips.
Doesn't have to be bespoke, but cover more bases that current Global version does.
Doesn't have to be bespoke, but cover more bases that current Global version does.
- Some functionality are predefined as 'Exempt', but not every transaction needs to be reported on in every Jurisdiction.
For example, payroll entries are automatically posted to 'Exempt', but 'Exempt' is some Jurisdictions is defined by the law of that Jurisdiction.
Looking over our P&L, we have erroneously put some bills in for the wrong date.
We have linked these to payments and the only way to edit this date (so our P&L looks correct) is to un-reconcile and change the date and then re-reconcile.
It seems to be one of the only things you can't edit (other than quantity and price which is understandable but still not that flexible).
I guess we will have to go back through all of these and normalize them (and spread them out over the months we want) to sort this issue out.
So if I havent logged in on my computer fro some days - it doesnt pick up that I have logged in via my phone.
I was questioned the other day on a team members leave by the persons manager as she was not aware of any leave that had been approved and we couldn't find the trail.
This way if you are doing catch up work for a client you could 'load' the documentation first and then you can select the correct documentation relevant to the correct period while reconciling etcTo prevent removal or replacement of attached documents during a subsequent 'remove and redo' of a transaction a prompt screen should appear with the option to either leave the document(s) attached to the actual transaction or not.
I can see groups that contacts are a member of on their screen, but can't edit them there.
I think once an expense claim has been done, the transaction should not be shown in the Receipts list, but instead "Expense claim 5/1/2016, 3 receipts            575.
Issue 2:The dashboard shows e. g. 24 awaiting repayment 15,000.
00This might be the total of the not fully paid expense claims, however it could very well be that this was one approved expense claim, with an amount paid of 14,000 and Amount due of 1,000.
- A while later I want to check my emails.
Request, from the credentials login, have an option to jump to the Touch login.
The information on my client's statements is now different.
The statement that I send to my client does not show how many days overdue a certain invioce is.
I can see for myself on the contact info but my clients  cannot.
Too many clicks to obtain what we could see with one click beforehand.
Unless we can sort by these, the list will read 1 Anchor Close, 1 Harbour Way, then 10 Anchor Close, 10 Harbour Way.
Got to be easy surely?
Can we get a search function for previous and current expense claims?
Having a search function or auto duplicate detection would be amazingly useful.
Even if this was only available to Advisors level access it would be useful.
I frequently get given files to bring up to date where the transactions are all over the place, and receipt capture apps incorrectly used etc, so a lot of data to correct.
If I could bring up a list similar to what I can do in Cash Coding, I could very easily track down duplicates, and re-alocate expenses that have been incorrectly coded to the wrong GL.
That's right I have replaced my credit card.
Went to your app and couldn't find where to edit it.
Eventually found a little edit word right over on the right where I finally got a reset,  which on the face of it, wasn't certain.
Please make this work for people who think in different directions than you.
Have a date range search function.
We have over 1000 asstes and it is really difficult to view and search them.
So I still have to have the hassle of billing and invoicing separately through both interfaces.
I know there's a custom docx template that can be used and adjust the unit price on there but would be great if the standard template would display exactly what was put in.
If it allows 4 decimal points it should display it.
But only one of those pieces of data is presented as a Hyperlink, the Contact name.
the transaction.
I guess I should then track down the Quote and mark it as invoiced - but I always forget!
There are ways to do this through first and third party apps on your phone, but they require unnecessarily complicated workflows.
Until now, copying a Quote to a Purchase Order resulted in the Quote Number transferring to the Purchase Order Reference field giving traceability.
However, today, I noticed the Purchase Order Reference field is now populated with the Quote Reference (which is meaningless for us).
I have reported this bug several times to no avail.
Perhaps if I post this as a 'Feature Request' it might get actioned?
Unfortunately, it sets it to one day in the future!
It could also be incorporated next to the send statement option
As an accountant I am constantly going into a client's file and opening three tabs, Profit and Loss last year , Balance Sheet last year and Manual Journal Entry.
It would be great if these could be one click away and open in one go alltogether, anyone else have this issue?
Then you have to go find the client and BAS again to take it to the next stage.
In Tax Returns when you complete a tax return it stays with the tax return allowing you to either approve, out for signing or signed.
So much better than the BAS return process.
This means we cannot generate template letters containing information directly from the tax system.
I assume that is the same reason we cannot customise tax return cover letters.
The first thing I look for in an email is my name.
If I don't see my name, I immediately consider it junk mail.
We have certain customers who will not allow us to email, and we are trying to get more onto email delivery.
We currently have to press email, see that there is not an email address entered, then close and then click print instead.
Let alone if you get interrupted half way through, and forget to print after attempting to email.
Similar view to the transaction list view but for the statement lines.
Also have starred group added the the quick list window for access when navigating from a client file.
Especially helpful when working on different entities in a group.
This would help make it a more rounded experience
Old reports fast to display.
I don't want to click on 'assign expenses to a customer' and then have to enter that customer's name a hundred times under the 'customer' drop down.
Instead of having to save everything as a draft, go all the way out to inventory items and adjust it there, simply double-clicking the item code would take you directly to the item page.
Once it is sent it should be shown in history so we can refer to our customers that a reminder was sent on this date if they argue they never received one.
At this stage I cannot see if they have or haven't.
The tiered credit cards end up showing a negative balance.
The workaround for this is tedious (detailed here: https://community.
There's no way of knowing unless you actually go into the client, or try & send it via email.
Wider OPTIONS are required for setting USER permissions.
This offers flexibility with the CORE ACCOUNTING functions.
HiWould it be possible to have the function to split a PDF file that has been uploaded or emailed into the File Inbox.
It would be very useful if there was a way of splitting the pages in the inbox.
The Approve button is at the bottom of the page and not next to the action buttons at the top.
AND THE TOTAL OF THE WHOLE IN THE BOTTOM.
Cashmanger has the functionality and it makes budgeting simple.
Presently  it's set to look for amount first, then reference.
Security is only as strong as its weakest link.
The same comment about professional certifications, and professional organizations.
An illustration:I am the CEO of a firm that besides being a US CPA I am a1.
UK ACA and CTA2.
Australia ICA ACA and will be a CTA3.
Salesforce - Consulting Partner and Five Certificaiton4.
Google for Work, Education, Chrome, Android , Cloud , AdWords, Analytics Certified Partner5.
com Certified Firm and individual Guru11.
The is not MENTAL MASTURBATION.
Dina Moscowitz is already doing something similar with her AppExchange and IBM Wastson.
I have many similar transactions, both outgoing and incoming, which have nothing that works for a automated rule.
It would be nice, so that when you select one, that the financial reports with appropriate titles and groupings be populated with that kind of organization.
Or to have financial statements that match the type of organization they are be populated in these spots?
Some features people have been requesting for nearly 3 years now are:- better user allocation for people to fill expense sheets- better Withholding Tax solution- better comment blocks on bills and receipts for discussion and reminders.
(Google docs style)The answer always seems to be "we're waiting to upgrade many things in one go".
This seems very odd but my accountant says so and I trust him.
Your bill will not be recorded in a state that allows you to match and reconcile!
~ click 'Options' (top right corner)~ Click 'Copy to'~ Select radio button 'Bill'~ Tick "Mark this purchase order as fully billed'~ Click 'Create Draft'~ Adjust so the draft bill matches the paper bill.
Can we have the description section included as an added means of searching for a particular item/product?
I have asked about this before but I can't find anything in this Community so it may well be there somewhere; when our customers send us a remittance and (occasionally) bother to include the bottom part of our statement sent to them, there is nothing on this portion that tells us the date we either issued the statement or any date to help identify the month in the aged columns (only "overdue" or "current".
That changes history and is a flaw.
As is .
I think this a flaw and leads to audit issues for us.
My customers constantly change what they require from us.
Happy with the billable expenses feature so far.
That does not seem to be possible at present.
HiI currently cannot process payroll for an employee who only works 3 full days a week.
This means, whilst the payroll is correct for a full year, it is incorrect on a month by month basis.
Is anybody else having the same problem?
My organisation screen is becoming very long, full of active, old trials.
I can set up groups but this doesn't tidy the initial screen, Would prefer it that as organisations are added to groups that there is a list of 'ungrouped' that can be tidied.
The initial view could then be set to ungoruped or a specific group of your choice.
Its becoming difficult to manage
This feature would be of benefit for one of two reasons; efficiency and accuracyThank you
I'm sure you are already working on this but.
the option to easily  create amendments to previously filed BAS's would be greatly appreciated.
And one that records both the original BAS and the amended BAS.
Stripe has a nice "Remember Me" feature on its checkout screen: https://stripe.
This would at least let my customers avoid having to enter credit card info every month.
By doing this there will be changes in realised gain and loss.
We considered three options as follow:1.
At the moment editing or voiding large volumes of manual journals is a tedious process.
Along with Automatically email the customer on payments, due dates and terms and conditions.
So, to get &#163;12.
34   At the moment you have to hit the decimal button, which is an extra keypress and an extra chance for error.
Our previous system has this feature on the front screen.
Please adjust the screen so that the save button is closer to the left side of the screen.
If you have more than one email on a contact you can only search for the main email address.
Currently a purchase order has to be deleted.
Or if this already exists could someone point me in the right direction.
Stripe integration with Alipay (China's best and leading Paypal equivalent) is perfect.
I am aware that you can do this via reports but would be handy if you are showing the transactions from the debtors list once drilled in to view?
Given your current system the client will be unable to delete these items of inventory, and will have to run reports that include inactive inventory items.
This is inconvenient, especially when large levels of inventory are involved.
This would be extremely helpful for several of our clients who are tracking inventory.
Would it be possible to get this calendar added to the home Dashboard?
It would be fantastic if the find and recode function had the ability to split transactions.
Working through a quote this evening, I wanted to enter a percentage discount offer at the bottom of the quote before the total is shown.
You have acknowledged this issue, when can we see improvements?
Here is my short list:1.
Reversal/ Unauthorise - enable expenses to unauthorised.
Expense reporting - enable reporting by category and contact4.
Flexible periods - enable expenses to charge to different dates.
Happy to discuss.
would it make more sense to have these in the same order as above?
One of those possible steps is to Send Receipt and have it send receipt to the client and needing to ask them for their email address.
and at the bottom click to send a copy to myself.
It would also be handy to be alerted to follow ups with bad debts.
Additionally, the CC/BCC feature would enable me to see the exact email the customer sees, instead of merely seeing the fact that it was sent. )
Would greatly help in consolidating tax reports here in the Philippines.
Is it possible or can it be made possible to allocate part payments "split" on the apps instead of later logging into the website to allocate split payments.
It would be useful to integrate the tax reconciliation in Workpapers with the year end reports.
Currently the information is input in work papers and has to be entered again in the financial reports.
It would be ideal if we could setup the emailing so that it went via the company email server.
Surely all companies have a repeating clientele base.
We work with many currencies.
But that cannot work with numbers in different currencies.
I then later transfer that to USD and apply against my USD receipts.
This is not a very clean method, but it works and it maintains a reasonably applied exchange rate.
This option exists for the default currency, but can't be done for foreign currencies.
I hope this feature will be of value to other Xeroeons!
We believe this should be a matter of urgency to make all reports editable by Advisors.
Over six million transactions are carried out daily in Kenya - that is probably more than Western Union and Paypal combined, globally.
They have a solid API that should make it quite easy to integrate.
This would save us from either:1.
Currently they show remain visible under All and they cannot be removed.
we call our customer once a month for the jobs we do, and this would be a great feature to have!
When viewing the Contact page (where all contacts are listed down the page) it would be great if there were some shortcut links (icons/buttons) at the end of each row to either:1.
Edit the Contact Information2.
"And I think their complaint is valid given the unappealing and unsatisfactory presentation of the contents page.
however because the line appears, the Save button moves, so you go to click again, miss the save button, and have to re-navigate the find the Save button.
It would be good to have some space for entering data with an editable heading.
As it stands, I have to go into each transaction and edit the reference field.
currently the system only allows word docx templates with lots of usable fields.
I was shocked to learn that those fields could not be used in an email or ability to create email templates.
Hey guysIs there any update when the payslips will be updated to include annual leave hours accrued?
Every month I get asked by 4-5 people who are confused by the current layout of hours due and $ accrued.
Custom fields would ideally have several different types: free-form text, check box, drop-down box of options, a number, and a date.
I missed this in an earlier GST period but picked it up later.
The resulting adjustment to correct the error was quite significant.
As opposed to accumulating all quantity totals together.
I would love to see at least 2 size options for people with smaller elements in their logo's.
Our businesses (5 in total) all have the same problem where we bill out weekly and we are paid weekly by our clients.
This will give a complete over view of what is still outstanding with due dates and what has been paid & when, it will also save going into each bill individually to check when it was paid.
So want them to see reports prior to a 'lock date' setting.
we have over 1,000 inventory items, and it would be really helpful if this could be automatically ordered from best seller to worst seller, by volume and $$ etc.
Can we increase the last 10 transactions in each inventory item to at least 25
At present jobs within client groups are strewn throughout my job list as the only way to sort the list is by the range of current column headings (eg job number, client name, job name).
Using Word for design is an amazing technological feat, but not ideal for custom design and layout (I'm not sure if I've ever met a designer who used Word for layout).
It would be much better to let us edit the template using HTML and CSS.
Or whatever direct formatting markup you are currently using.
You wouldn't want to deny us all that now, would you?
Statements should be in detail showing all the transaction sort by date and with full description and amount thereby.
This would immediately process all transactions- but does not link them to the inventory?
For our approval systems I print out the bill as entered on screen to show my manager how I've recorded it for a credit card statement for example.
However when I print from the screen it prints quite large on 2 screen and not compact as it shows on screen, is there a way to modify this at all or is this something you could review!
, for audit purposes.
Tracking is a field you can enter in all of these areas, so why can't we search/filter by it?
Other SBR enabled software (MyGov & GovReports) allow you to lodge an FS70 direct from your software.
It would be great if you could set a default zoom level.
It would also be fab to have a small preview in files in order to establish which type of transaction I wanted to create.
A notification that the return hasn't been finalised would be great on the date the return is shows as overdue.
My clients are best identified by street address so please let's have that option on main contacts page
Often as I'm adding inventory on the fly I have calculate a unit price on my calculator, not cool.
Also can we have a markup option for the sell price.
So a value field for % markup on the buy price to populate into the Sell price field.
Once deleted using the website the receipt also disappears off the mobile app.
This is unnecessarily confusing for users - it either leads to a huge increase in individual expense claims submitted for very small amounts, or users saving their receipts and forgetting or not promptly logging into the website to then submit the claim for all those receipts.
To process approval of each claim you must click on each claim, which takes you to the list of individual receipts that make up that claim.
"awaiting review"), reference number (receipt number), supplier name, receipt date, date entered, number of extra line items the receipt is split into, and the total cost of the receipt.
I don't want to see transactions from 2009 by default.
Is there any way these messages and alerts can be done on a by user basis (so if I dismiss a help message or an alert) it is gone from all organisations I access?
Yall have a great product, so I'm pretty sure I'm missing something here.
There are so many FRs that its hard to find if someone has already raised one for your requirement.
Perhaps they could be grouped by function following the menu hierarchy?
Apologies if this already exists as an FR but can't find it among the 2000+ search results!
Would be good to have the same ability as in the app.
So we have to print it out and physically stamp or write "Paid" and sign it, and then scan and email to them.
Please provide something for us!
We supply to a company with multiple branches.
Except it defaults the sort back to standard date order.
this feature needs to be added as at the moment its not practical or professional to do this through the portal and this doesnt allow us to give the client a copy before lodging with the ATO.
I'm trying to print the check number onto my checks, along with the payee, amount, memo, etc.
It would be great if in the Smart Lists options there was a 'Quote' selection available so that you could run a Smart List showing clients who: - Haven't accepted a quote in 6 months  - Have quotes outstanding etc.
And also to help show the success rate of quotes.
It constantly shows as being in development, but 3 months in and still no feed?
The workflow really needs to improve.
Many of them have errors.
My only choice is "Approve" or "Approve and View Next".
(this process becomes pointless, if we cant see whom approved the leave in the first place.
10-20%) to their expenses.
We are always having to edit the email address to where our remittances are sent to as they are generally sent to a different person/department to who we made the initial order with.
I am looking forward to hearing from you !
The contact info captured in this field must be saved in DB for further transactions or tracing, however they can not be found in a contacts search.
It would be nice if this was included in the tabbing.
Can we have access to the back ups for our clients.
However, with this upgrade, we are finding many asset types get duplicated because of inconsistency existing in the first setup.
It would be great if they could be deleted once they are no longer attached to an asset.
We have an issue with the inventory section.
We are Medical devices company and stock over 5000 items.
For each item we have more than one supplier.
Your system allows only one supplier to one products and that won't help us.
Would be great if there was a user role to give access to people (eg.
Investors) access to specific reports as a read only.
Similar to the progress claim feature someone else nominated.
Having the "reference" field show in the "Select Billable expenses" window will allow me to accurately  select expenses related to different job numbers or "references" under one customer for accurate billing purposes.
Is there a way (or could there be) of adding info to a contact about contract renewal/cancellation dates, e. g. utility companies?
It would be great to have a list on the dashboard of contracts coming up for renewal.
Since your upgrade in the Asset Schedule the link to the IRD Depreciation Rates has gone, this was very handy.
We have a client who charges out billables  to MULTIPLE Customers.
Instead of only including an Upgrade prompt when transaction limits have been reached, how about telling me when my 20 transaction limit will be reset?
Currently I have no idea so have to check every couple of days.
I thought it was tied to my billing cycle, but nope.
You charged me yesterday and I still can't reconcile.
Talk about a slap in the face.
I have recently signed up to Checkfront as our booking software and it is mainly working well.
Then I would not have to remember to look at the document folder to see if the client has uploaded anything.
Or possibly make the columns user sortable?
Not sure if this has been suggested and whether it strictly fits in as a 'Feature Request'since it's more about removing a feature and perhaps lowering the price accordingly.
Would appreciate some feedback on this.
However we have made a number of changes to our initial set of templates.
i. e. replace the notes with the updated version.
I manually took a vote off a feature, which is now in planned status.
Therefore, I agree in part with another voter in that closed thread, that"Votes should be "returned" to users, from any feature that changes to status of Started, scheduled, submitted .
e. g. the month the value is outstanding for.
Only 62 transactions - but the pdf comes out as 8 tans per page & a whole lot of white space.
7 pages long and not at all practical.
Choose templates for e-mails.
(I have a list of templates and the default one is the only one available on the app)2.
Edit my contacts - edit their name, address etc3.
On the screen you have a solid line under the Profit Line and or below ,lines where the is a formula.
Having say Double lines under the profit line helps draw the clients attention to this line.
Our employers travel a LOT and usually have to stay connected by there mobiles.
In Australia a Trial Balance should have up to 3 standard columns of figures:The last full financial year.
The previous financial year as a comparative.
The option of a user defined interim period.
That's it.
Although any increase from the current 10 would be beneficial.
I think it will be more easy and cool if it's possible to place some attachments in the discuss tab.
That way a running tally can be kept of what remains.
Links to relevant reports on the dashboard would be great so that they don't have to navigate through too many options.
There shoud be a button Save and Send, or Approve and Send.
This will help the user by going direct to the send box rather than having to approve, then on next page, send.
I work in a bookkeeping practise and can sometimes have a gap of about 2 or 3 weeks between clients.
In particular those in the address or reference fields.
For example: Department of Workplace Health and Safety, Department of Family and IndustryPractices.
Hey All;It'd be great to have expenses totalled by name.
Then scan to pdf and email or post.
also for receipts from clients
Client asked for alert if exchange rate moved a 'set' amount.
I guess an alert to suggest something should be paid now, as if you wait the rate may trend and result in a greater outlay.
It is hear skewed towards bookkeepers and clerical which means that firms can't be properly distinguished.
It probably not worth extending the discussion.
This cant be too hard to achieve as its a very common feature.
I have been liaising with a client who is looking at structuring their data by two tracking categories.
The central costs of the company will then be split throughout these tracking categories.
A software package I used back in the 1990's solved this type of problem by allowing you to enter predetermined percentage splits across departments (you could have several of these to allow for different circumstances) by entering the correct departmental split code.
You don't have to do anything else.
it logs the amount, the name of the provider and allocates an expense category.
click the schedule date to filter the bills list to these3.
Tick all of these and batch for payment4.
If we have missed ticking a bill to be paid then we have to scrap the batch entirely and then go back to point one for that one bill and then re-batch, then re-edit all part payments.
We keep doing this until the batch matches the amount authorised.
Presently you cannot do a "Dry Run" connection with the ATO.
You have to lodge a form of some kind through to the ATO.
I would think this is a really easy fix that you can look at and it would mean a lot to me and potentially give me back 5 hours a quarter, which for a busy accounting practice is very valuable.
Month to date, year to date, this quarter etc.
We had to manipulate the CSV import to reflect the correct balances.
How to fix that?
I put more information in the ref  as inTown .
At the moment our clients / firm have access to3 x "User Defined Revenue 1/2/3"5 x "User Defined Expense 1/2/3/4/5"Can we create more?
At the moment the formatting is very basic, so all of these disclaimers are left aligned etc.
A simple modification to allow to flag a customer that should not be delivered because outstanding amount or a customer with a special discount.
This could be done by having either a background colour on the box where the name of he customer appear or insert a box next to the customer name.
It would be good to have the "Total" column frozen to remain "on screen" at all times.
MYOB had a very simple way of doing it.
On each item, was a summary for each month of how many were bought, sold, cost, sale price and profit.
This would make it quicker and more intuitive for casual claimers.
Good day is there a way to limit a financial period that a customer can view.
This might require the ability to dip into negative inventory to work.
No Cowboys (if you are registered with them) have 2 logos with links attached to them.
A great feature for Quotes, and for the quoted client to see independent feedback from other customers.
At a glance you could see how you were doing this month compared to last and previous months (you could swipe left and right through the months).
There should be an alert at this point as well - to suggest what people should look at.
it is ala QB.
It is.
Similar to the option to lock in comparative balances.
Merge the lines of multiple bills into one bill.
My Warehouse management system creates a bill for each received purchase order.
This means I have to delete all created bills and create a merged one manually.
It would be great if the schedule of planned payments could be exported as a spreadsheet.
However, I have been advised by WFM that the budget field cannot be imported (I note that it can be exported).
My request is that the system allows for the budget amount to be imported into the budget field of a job when importing jobs.
The only way I can do this currently is to select the customers owing and copy them to a word document to print.
We were using Sage and at the moment we prefer it and are considering going back to it so I'll really appreciate any improvements.
Could we have the ability to control that workflow a little more with suitable user options.
A further option "Draft and Submit" would allow a user to create DRAFT and also SUBMIT FOR APPROVAL but not APPROVE.
Why not allow that to hyperlink directly to the contact?
This would be extremely valuable to us.
This would be very useful when looking at classifications before finalising the GST return.
These two screens used to look almost identical in layout which was a VERY GOOD thing.
Would save an extra click and shouldn't be hard to program in.
In order to identify and rename an image, you must go through the following steps:    - Click the file to preview it    - Close the preview    - Click the gear next to the file to rename itIt would be helpful if the file could be renamed from the image preview itself, by clicking into the preview header that shows the file name.
The dashboard has a lot of information, the type of information you could supply to a client.
Rather than having to go in and create reports.
When adding a drop down function when starring items (favourite) can this not be applied for the user for all companies they have access to so that will not have to apply this to every company.
It would provide better function and reduce the number of steps required to output this view.
Would it be possible to create and save quote templates in the quoting section - say 10 or 20 templates that can be used as required?
Recently I made a lot of changes and ended up with over 3000 items in the Late Claims tab.
It would be really great if the Late Claims tab on the GST return only included those items that have had their GST altered.
Solution: Change the field labels to "Given Name" and "Family Name"
After having a good look through all the feedback on this thread: , we’ve made some changes which solve the majority of issues.
It’s not likely that we’ll look into this in the near future, but we do want to be across all feedback in this space.
Although it took some getting used to.
However, I think its best you keep consistency and also have the Billing side of things enlarged too.
Its quite strange flicking between large and small calendars and fields.
Hello,It seems that the only way for a Cashbook Client to write checks is for that client to be given the Advisor user role.
Or, the client must be upgraded to the Standard Subscription and then be given the Standard user role.
For my Quotes, the Item Description from Inventory is a basic description that is heavily modified for each quote.
I think it would be an advantageous feature.
Not convinced of the "Official help file method".
6) Check nominal - 9999 refunds & returns to see it has a zero balance.
This may seem involved but as you can go from one screen to the other it can be a smooth process.
For example currently I can’t see in a defined period what we paid a specific creditor.
From the cash coding screen or reconciling screen it is impossible to create a rule for this one transaction.
As it stands at the moment you can only do this once it is a bill.
Im really struggling with the finalising of producing a quote.
This would make life so much easier and the work would flow better.
Please put i na feature on reports (BS P&L.
i. e showing a P&L that compares current 9 months to prior 12 months, allows us to total all periods for a LTD balance as well.
There is a lack of reports on expense claims.
It's incredibly frustrating when trying to write out a description, in few words (less than twitter?
Our current workflow is that we receive an email from a client, and that email might turn into a Lead, Quote or Job by replying to them.
The Details of the job will be the reply, and any attachments added to the job folder.
The email would be bcc'd to the xyz@emailmyjob.
A email could be send back to the sender with the details to check if the lead/quote or job has been set up correctly, with a URL that takes them directly to the page with the Lead/Quote or Job.
When searching through a big product list it is very hard to make out each individual product as each product code and description could roll over into multiple lines.
It would make more sense if once you start typing the window opens up wide to give you one product per line, and taller to give you a decent enough scope of products rather than scroll through endless lists.
It would be very handy to search a big product database using more than one word, not necessarily in the same order, to narrow down the list.
This is a very neat print out, and makes the most sense for us.
to see a screen shot.
It's a must, pleaseFrankie
At the moment itsContactsAll ContactsSearch NameSelect contact from search resultsView Recent BillsFinally see list of bills for this contactThere must be a more efficient way to do this, cause if you want to then search another one you practically have to start over.
Unless there's a better way than I'm doing it.
Hello,Sorry this may be a fairly simple question but i'm struggling getting an answer from Clydesdale.
email to Support today.
otoh manual export formats do include the identifying data – e. g. OFX.
If I export that trans from CBA netbanking as OFX (attached) then the missing info clearly comes through in the Memo field “Transfer from SALLY SMITH CommBank app Tax”.
The cover sheet doesn't contain the partner details ie the partner name address, phone numbers, email, web address, or anything else a front cover usually has.
This would have to be included in the import.
The only way at the moment is to save the template, exit, send yourself an email then go back in and change as required.
Also a print facility whilst you are at it
This can be quite tiresome when you have many employees.
I have been in touch your with your support people and they say this is not possible without entering lots of manual journals each month.
What I require is in month 1, 1/12 of the income hits the P&L and 11/12 goes to deferred income on the balance sheet.
Then each month 1/12 of the income is released to the P&L, until in month 12 all the invoiced income is in the P&L in the correct months.
Please can we have ''Printed on dd/mm/yyyy at nn:yy" on General Ledger reports.
That means Trial Balances, Profit & Loss (using the 'Print' option) and Balance Sheets (same option).
It can be quite confusing looking at 2 printouts and not knowing which was the most recent.
The Total Cash In and Out dashboard widget is very useful.
When the numbers are FX'd to GBP this month actually has a negative cashflow.
Each Fee Earner is listed in a Tracking Category.
I want to show the Revenue section of a P & L Statement for a specified period (eg, month) and list across the page what each Fee Earner has invoiced out.
Often the packs have many customisation that are unique to that client.
There are quite a few  businesses that have $2 million in cross border transactions.
s at once, but I don?
I feel it could really streamline the way I do quoting and invoicing.
We regularly get clients calling to ask why a lock symbol is next to certain items preventing them from archiving/deleting.
I have seen many similar requests, however nothing quite the same.
We can't create a separate custom .
docx for these clients.
I feel this would solve a lot of the other similar requests - again, if this isn't already implemented.
Multi-column (month by month) Profit & Loss, displayed in chronological order (July XX to June xx, Plus YTD) - Current Financial Year2.
Multi-column (month by month) Profit & Loss, displayed in chronological order (July XX to June xx, Plus YTD) - Last Financial Year  I would've thought this was a no brainer.
On a positive note, I have become an expert in combining hlookup and vlookup in excel.
I enter all 10 Descriptions and the Save & Reconcile.
However 5 post and 5 are yet to be posted but now I have lost the descriptions for the 5 which weren't posted.
Here's an idea to remove more paper.
bdoc files to my expenses.
This isn't currently supported because the uploader checks if the file extension matches an entry in the allowed list of extensions.
The situation would be tolerable if that was the case.
Thus my request, remove the easily bypassable file extension limit.
Allowing any type of file uploads will solve a similar problem for multiple users and there will be no management needed for the file extension list.
I did a quick search on the board and found two requests that would be solved with this "feature".
What would be useful would be a balance of the current lines total to the total initially put in at the start.
Often my bills are two lines one with GST and one FRE so if i enter the FRE first it would then tell me the GST balance figure for the second line or vise verca.
Pleas give us the ability to select our own link text, or at least edit the hard coded text so it's not as clumsy.
for tax payments and filings.
Ideally, these notifications could be configured to send to multiple people.
When you have finished entering a purchase (hit approved) along with the link to enter another bill, also have a link to go back to the list of approved purchase orders.
A simple star rating and a section for comments would be plentiful.
Please allow more characters for item name at least 250 characters would be much appreciate.
As you can imagine this is a large client with many contractors and hours of additional work.
It would seem logical that it should have values in at the day you export.
We receive all of their service "bills" (AP) for their businesses, sent directly to us.
When I email support with screen shots it seems to be random whether they come through or not.
would be helpful to include the whole component - cause i have to then calculate gst.
Many times we have to put 1 or more items on back order.
This really needs to be added to make it faster and easier for both me and the customer.
This would greatly help with debt management and prioritisation.
For example, using Jan-June 2015 and comparing to a prior period will compare to July-December 2014.
Certain countries having different requirements for how an accounting system should work.
When I go to the recent bills page for that supplier it takes quite a while to load and it's only going to get worse.
I often have to manually select the "Mark as reconciled" item for a group of transactions and before I do, i am having to check the total matches what I am after by using my calculator!
com' but found no public key on the following keyservers: pool.
net and pgp.
It is too inconvenient to go back into settings and change back and forward.
It would be a huge help to me if there was a Deposit feature on the phone app.
Also when I return an item there is no way to enter a negative number so it make uploading a receipt for returns a pain, as well as deposit tickets.
It would be really useful if there was a way to automatically (or even semi-auto) complete the EC101 form relating to UK VAT returns
The jump from 30-70 is terrible.
I may be forced to put this client back on Quickbooks  (OH NO!
Have a lovely day,Leanne
having them emailed can be a nuisance if email changed or email not functioning correctly.
I keep my accepted quotes un-invoiced until we deliver and I attach the client's PO and other docs to the quote.
We make around 10 payments to our water provider and 6 to our electricity provider each month.
It would be much more helpful if the Month Date dropdown boxes were in the most current order onwards (or at least near to the current month) rather than from March 2016 backwards.
I am mostly requiring the current or previous month - definitely not way ahead to March 2016
Now I will probably be given some reason why this is not possible or not viable (as usual) however I feel that this is the thing holding find and recode back from being a rather useful tool!
We are only a small organisation and my administration officer only works 2 days/week.
Now that the feeds have changed, these are only occurring once a day.
Even Gmail has a tab+enter to send mail.
One that they could turn or off if desired (not all users may want this warning).
When you have multiple users, there is no way to insure that all entries are dated correctly and your income statements may be incorrect.
Maybe create a way to close & (maybe archive) the past year, so entries could not be posted to prior year without an additional okay or confirmation click.
This makes the team's job lists too long.
For example, I had approx.
Some of these were "Once every Month" and some were "Once Every 3 Months".
Instead, they appeared in my "Drafts" on the 28th June, or 30th June (e. g. didn't refer to calendar month, e. g. 1st day of the month, but multiples of 30 days).
Because May had 31 days, this threw the calculation out.
This also meant that the "placeholder text" fields displayed the incorrect month (June instead of July).
Is it possible to have a feature that allows us to select options such as:1.
I hope that the window can be automatically selected so that I do not have to press the window again to start typing.
this then meets the IRDs requirement and the Construction Contracts Act.
Also the last standard font type and size was very small especially on the compilation and declaration reports - we have some older clients that had trouble reading the size of the font.
As we all have all good banks in Australian partner (direct) feeds list; American Express direct feed will help us too.
Please help and suggest !
We prepare drafts of planned journal entries in a spreadsheet, before posting through the Advisor menu's Manual Journal.
When we select Manual Journals from the Advisor Menu, it opens a webpage with the title "Search Manual Journals".
•It would be great to see an additional column that shows the Journal Entry numbers.
•Furthermore, that the JE numbers should not change should we choose to edit a JE and repost it with a correction.
I've had a look but nothing really stands out.
The Income and Expense calculation details could be sub-grouped by their tracking category so that the individual divisions could simply identify the GST balances which related to their individual division.
We are having issues with clients not saving the GST return as final when they send the return off to IRD.
This way you can easily see who has been setup to access the data file & from what company which will help manage user access as people/external organisations come & go.
Should be easy enough to do right?
At the moment it is hard to allocate these deposit payments against specific purchase orders.
5s to stream down!
I'm guessing this is intentional, because if I put that file on AWS S3 to test the difference, it downloads in 1.
ms/1LpW9ER* same 2MB file from S3: http://1drv.
Some of my clients apply for Funding through Grants.
This saves neatly trimmed, OCR’d PDFs to iCloud/Dropbox/Google Drive.
We apply similar methodology to our payruns when they are prepared.
Everytime I edit an item in the inventory and save it, it stays on the item and I have to then click the back button to get back to the main inventory.
Dear AllA method of permanently rotating an uploaded image / related file would be useful.
It is possible to rotate currently but the position is not saved.
When viewing a quote on-screen it displays "Subtotal (includes a discount of $.
above the total amount.
But this isn't printed onto the paper version for some reason?
Note it only happens with quotes that include GST?
When quote is excluding GST, it prints this line okay.
As well as seeing all bills, paid and outstanding.
Many tradesmen have far more than 1,000 items.
Simply invoicing and reconciling every two months is all that some require.
We have the same items imported in inventories for all of those companies.
Is there a workaround or a feature request that would solve this?
This would be helpful to order additional stock if required.
In quotes would be nice to have field markup so I could instantly know how much money I make.
Splitting a year in to 12 months without a totals column is not that helpful - I have to take it in to Excel.
This is pre-formated with the Employee's Name etc and Details of the Company's default Super Fund and makes it a lot easier than sourcing and completing the ATO form.
Also maybe this could be attached, in pdf format, to the employee's record?
Ok so I will try and explain.
I'm thinking of trying to trick the html editor into thinking its a command for text <h1><span style="color:#0000FF;">bill@Idontcare.
Please remove this feature, or have it as an option that you can choose.
It would be great if this could be done from the app!
Are you going to develop something for those or is there a section for it and I don't know?
For instance, it would be wonderful for us to measure income vs wages.
It would be really great if in the Find and Redo function we could also change the date of a group of transactions.
How many times I've had to go in and change the date of a transaction because the wrong date had been used and it would be so convenient.
For audit purposes we attach images of the checks and any supporting documentation to the records.
Would it be possible to generate an alert (an email maybe ? )
Is there a comprehensive database?
Regardless of the tool or our reasons, however, fact remains that it would be extremely helpful to both us and perhaps others as well to have some or all of these search and export capabilities:Expanded search parameters:~Date last modified (so that we can pull any bills that were modified or added in the week prior, so we don't miss bills if they have a transaction date from earlier).
We process 200 bills a day, and want to pull all bills for a month, 'Refining our search parameters' is a joke.
~The option to export selected bills.
Perhaps I don't want to include a couple of credits, or a few bills with different terms.
I've searched the help info and it doesn't seem to be something currently under consideration.
The standards are available on this link: http://www.
nz/Site/Accounting_Standards/Current_Standards/Standards_for_Not-For_Profit_PBEs/Stds_for_Not-For-Profit_T1-4.
I love the Find & Recode feature and have extolling the virtues of using it to anyone that will listen.
This way I can search for entries that may not have necessarily been created by a particular person, but edited by them.
This would then allow a history to be established on each clients vehicle.
This then makes it very simple when cross checking all work performed on each clients vehicle.
Would be very interested to hear ideas on this concept.
We are on the road a lot.
Occasionally this doesn't auto sum resulting in a form validation error, so you have to manually enter the total so it matches the summed total below.
This way the audit trail is more specific.
On export of contacts we can change all particulars of a contact in excel, and re-import the list - giving a fast change option on all fields.
the benefit would be shown across a number of areas.
I work for a real estate investment firm where we have multiple properties and have multiple utility bills.
It would be a great way to stay organized.
It would be great to have the option to have a different name for the payee name.
An example would be that I have two contractors with the same name (son and father).
It seems very silly to me that I have to select every "location" within the state.
Note the current PayPal logo's include the AMEX logo.
E. G. I want to tell clients how Jan-May 2015 compared with Jan-May 2014.
also a simple YTD (year to date) current year V's prior year woudl be very useful.
It is one of the most frustrating things in a really great program but terrible oversight.
085 = &#163;425Thus daily it would be 425/365 = &#163;1.
Specifying a default behavior on a per-client basis would be great.
HiOur clients have encountered this several times when completing their own VAT returns.
My natural inclination is to hit the letter "e" twice to take me to the second option (for example, in most software/web programs, if we are using a drop down menu to select a month we would type "j" once to arrive at "january" twice to arrive at "june" or three times to arrive at "july.
It would be uber helpful.
Why not have a print button on the bottom of every page.
As it stands we can do for the period week 22 to week 26 for example, but showing the dates would be preferable if at all possible.
It would be helpful to choose columns, have Tracking items information, etc.
Have  a great day!
This is the first payroll I have done.
Already within the platform you can send customer quotes, and they can view it online.
Would be great for it to be all in one service.
Keen to know what everyone thinks.
We are aware of the 'un-accept' option but to save double handling it would be easier to receive an email only and then our accepted process can begin.
When A/P was converted, the vendors' bill numbers (Num in QB) were not converted over.
Cases where the reference field would be blank, then the normal "INV-9999" protocol would be followed.
Demo series needs to show:- The purchase of the properties- Mortgages being set up- Mortgages being renewed / refinanced to another mortgage company after the initial period- Mortgage repayments- Maintenance & management transactions- Selling of a property- Profit and Loss reports showing mortgage payments etc.
History log of 'Why' description  provided in drop down menu similar to 'Who' contact entry drop down field when reconciling to help streamline data entry and minimize repetitive typing.
If a client has a large inventory, but only wants to interrogate specific items, having to filter or search a large output becomes problematic.
See  for a workaround,
We recently starting experimenting with liveplan.
Its a nice site and relatively cheap in the SaaS world.
The biggest problem though is adding in the supplier references.
There should be an option to post monthly depreciation through the depreciation tool.
To enter +7 is slower that clicking on the drop down calendar and selecting the date.
I also have another request .
On the other hand I love the software and have HUGE discussions with my Son who leads a developer team for MYOB!
This would reduce the number of mouse clicks by half.
2) An option to allow me to select which clients i want reports for, and then select which inventory item i wish to search for.
It would be good if they could also upload a document/image file to attach to the transaction.
We have client groups with multiple entities, with the 1 contact for all entities.
Looking for a feature to chat  or message with other users assigned to an organization within our practice.
If you insert the (Online Quote Link) when emailing quotes to clients, so customers can accept quote.
as you start to type the name in.
We have to send quotes for the same project to multiple tenderers.
Often the tenderer will ask for different quantities and different items.
There are many other things that could be a lot easier to manage as well.
Would definitely help in being more efficient and professional.
When you have a large inventory order it is a long process.
It would also be helpful to see a total tax due at the bottom of both reports.
Can we have a save button on the finalizing page?
This works very well and pops them into draft bills.
But the main benefit is reconciling early payments.
It would be of great help if DXF/DWG files are supported in the related files.
A big share of our work is based on custom cut products based on these file formats.
You then have to scroll down the list trying to find where you were at before.
When sending a remittance advice it would be good to have the option to include the reference from the billing information provided.
It would be great if we could consolidate or merge multiple quotes into another quote, this is handy when working on larger projects and the client then decides on signing of a single quote to simplify things.
However as I'm using 1Password to login - it would be great if the logged out screen is always the same and allows me to login straightaway.
Currently there is three different screens that we I can get.
This feature would be similar to the existing Contact Groups, obviously in the area of Inventory management.
Accounting software FARMPLAN generates these with ease will this be a facility available to our clients in the near future.
Is it possible that this feature could be created?
This would allow a simple and quick way to for eg calculate profit or total assets.
The online Quote acceptance page is cool, but only does half the job.
UK Payroll is great and but for a few lingering little hic-ups is mainly working well.
A very complex area and each country will have its own tax rules/funnies.
Again one line for each employee and totals.
This is a recent ticket reply to a support query :We are a UK accounting firm and look after many businesses in other countries.
It would be great to see this addedThanksHelen Fortune
This is an accounting system and it would seem a no brainer to have a field to search for activity/conditions that happened last month.
Even better give us from/to date options.
We have lots of clients and everyone of them has different hourly rates.
Even within one client we have different hourly rates for different services.
If you would permit us to group P&L by this reference #, then bam!
When we enter a number in this "Reference" field.
Our team were a bit overzealous with setting up tracked inventory and now we have a whole bunch of tracked product codes that should have been kept as untracked.
I have been going through our options and they are limited.
session date and transaction date.
You can drill down into into the History and Notes activity but this is unable to be exported.
HiI see there was a thread in 2012 regarding this but it is closed.
Months when inventory is purchased are still overstating cost of goods sold unless freight is capitalised in inventory.
It could be done manually but with big purchases this would be very cumbersome.
As we have our own format, the quote number doesn't get display in full.
It will be great if we could resize the field width.
Because if you don't have an amazing computer it takes ages to load and crashes the computer.
Would it be possible to have an "unapprove" option from the bill options drop down tab?
Currently the P&L balance sheet and other reports show the newest column to the left and then older going to the right.
The eyes read left to right.
Then with the P&L you have the YTD column after the oldest month - this makes no sense.
The first is the ability to enter exchange rates up to 8 decimal places instead of 6.
It would be really useful to also see the actual date the journal was physically posted.
This is to long in the item section of a Delivery note /InvoiceThanks
Its exceedingly handy, but that information only exists within the Contact screen.
I typically manually accrue annual leave liability (and any other employee payments) manually at the end of the month.
A lot of our customers join us on multiple tours, and have to make multiple payments.
its a pretty minor thing, but it would be pretty useful for me.
I select the country column in PP statement as the 'reference'.
Suggestions for improving my way appreciated and hope it might help some others through this nightmare thrust on small businesses.
He wanted to know if ytou could set up the theme so that it defaults to the theme of the person who is logged in?
It would be great if there was an button next to each contact in the Contacts list that took you straight to the edit screen.
It is currently hidden way in all reports on a tab called HMRC.
My suggestions:1) Remove fade animations.
Heck, remove the OK feedback.
Potentially change it to a notify bar at the top.
Have background ajax requests queued so I can quickly reconcile multiple items without waiting for a response.
2) Have checkmarks for bulk reconcile.
If I work on the weekend or on a public holiday - I don't want clients to receive emails on that day.
For instance yesterday I did something and it instantly came up and said I did it 9 hours ago.
Public holidays could be picked up from Payroll maybe?
You have to go all the way back to the original bill to see if anything was attached to it.
I love the notifications feature but it would be really good to have a feature to delete all of them at once.
I have a lot of Contra payments offset against money owed.
Example:  The building is shared by each division.
Could there be a function added that you can choose to allow when a log in session has finished that (if chosen) when you log in next you are taken to the last screen that you were on in your last session?
I would think this to be a system choice set to each specific log in (and something that would be a choice when you send the user invite).
It seems an oversight to me that these are not allowed on a receipt template.
Having multiple reports up to toggle between would be my feature request.
Also all assets are imported as pending and have to be individually "registered".
As this is also a request by Accountants at the end of the financial year, this will eliminate the end of year work checklists for both clients and Accountants.
Would be great to see some more improvements to the mobile apps.
For contractors working in the field a couple of common requests per below:1.
Ability to extend the timeout on the app, currently it is about 2 minutes.
After the app times out all info is lost2.
Many platforms connect directly or thru third party plugins to allow for direct payments.
Checks) at all for certain vendors, etc.
It lets us quickly change as many as 2,000 entries at once.
Also, the height of the table that displays the list should go automatically to my screen height.
Unfortunately, the Cash Coding page has its table dimensions hard coded with inline "element style" rather than using css style sheets.
I have even tried to create a 3rd party application for this using the API but it is too difficult to join the tables.
Avalara seems to have very good service for looking up rates and remitting payments to the various authorities.
We are trying to setup our payroll ready for the month end.
Can we have the fearure where even untrack item will reflect quantity on hand?
Not sure if it's a bug, or if I have neglected to flip the "show discounts on quote" switch somewhere.
for more info see here http://help.
htm&node_id=91&show_children=false - great function for SMEs!
Maybe some sort of tick or alert if they have not been received.
Has anyone found a method so that staff paid an annual salary do not have it converted to an hourly rate on the payslip ?
I've lost everything I've entered several times because of its 'jumpy' nature.
Format required is:                Column A              Column B                  Column C             Column DRow A   Nominal Code    Nominal Description     Debit Entries           Credit EntriesAny of the other CSV's in the same format as a workaround ?
Tracking theses is very helpful to us and it would be good to have them all in one place, as a separate tab.
I also think that an "Expired" tab would be beneficial too.
I don't understand why the online quote doesn't look the same as a PDF quote.
The online version shows the legal name.
For example if the legal name is xxy in trust for abc and trading name is XYZ Pty Ltd then the online version shows the trust and the PDF version shows the trading name.
Most people I assume wouldn't want their legal name showing on anything.
Currently it shows the date, reference and amount only.
Similarly, an option for a cut off for future invoicing (those set up on the system but not yet sent) be offered.
This could be linked to the sent toggle.
The conversion date doesn't help as we often back date to the last GST period / financial year end.
Then at client level you would customise based on the client.
If you could hide the note you could then unhide it the following year instead of re-typing.
Currently it's only possible to map fields in the manual CSV import.
We have a number of divisions in our company which I have set up under one of the tracking categories.
Would be great if this allowed for some read only functions.
can it be achieved?
We sell electronic goods, so each unit has a serial number.
It will be good to know which unit was sold to which customer.
This helps for guarantee purposes.
Using other reports I can easily see dollar values filtered on my tracking category but not UNITS.
Example of application: My client pays taxes to various localities on UNITS Sold rather than Dollars Sold.
To whom it may concern.
it would save email to myself and then printing from the email.
Two questionsHow do you (is it possible) to set up a reducing balance deduction?
were thinking that it would be really useful if there were a box to check on the contact detail page for 1099s
It's only a small change, but it would make a big difference.
Ability to delete unnecessary or incorrect Work papers within a work paper back.
Currently, to remove them you have to make the work paper inactive or start again.
It would be great if you could see those figures side by side for each month.
This will allow one to quickly audit transactions to ensure correct tax rate has been applied.
i cant see these colours as they have a very similar tone.
Could i recommend either the colours/tones of the fonts be more distinguishable.
Or that a colourblind mode be integrated to assist us colour impared people doing our books.
To save on coding.
We have to create the Schedules in on year and then its seems very inefficient to then have to recreate them in future years.
you already roll forward the Finance lease and Permanent File
Would be great to let each company create roles and select each specific permission.
Today, it’s possible to set accounting basis Accrual or Cash.
Then we could have a folder for the 2016 year as well.
This would make the files area really user friendly.
At the moment it cannot be organised very effectively.
so you get a drop down of previous details you have added.
I was positive that this feature was advertised but I don't get this option or feature.
this can be a big job and this adds unnecessary work.
help review the possible bad debts to be reviewed.
MAny thanksHabel maybe  it could be done using the smart list.
instead of the last option of 7 days - 60 days etc.
, we could insert the financial year date and the date at wihich the comparison needs to be made.
and calendar to highlight today's date
Is this on the roadmap?
You've now released Payroll for UK, NZ, AU and the US.
I can't tell how well we are going from when we originally started til current or a selected month.
Now that basic stock has been released, can we have a field on each item for minimum stock level.
It would also be nice if we could set it that as soon as we drag an attachment over a Bill screen (especially one with no data in it) that it would go straight to SBS mode.
Great to see the Inventory tracking come online.
Presently there is no step between "purchase order approve"and "bill" that receipts the goods into stock so they can be sold.
That gives both sides 960 pixels of space.
Most applications and websites fit comfortably in this space.
There's no good reason for this.
I see that the original thread on this has been marked as Done and is no longer accepting replies.
That there is a workaround does not resolve this issue.
It's dangerously misleading if you rely on the Income Statement for Schedule C filing, as I do.
Assembly inventory will remove each items from the shelves to complete one unit.
Unleashed Inventory have it and its okay but it's working.
Would it be possible to include the tax code data alongside the transactions?
What if we want to track raw material inventory where we manually update the amount used by manufacturing?
It would be great if you could modify a receipt from the app.
Adding a receipt is great for working on the road, however if you enter an incorrect detail or forget to upload a photo of the receipt, there is no way to modify from the app.
I have to get the computer out.
Opening Balance, Share of Profit, Drawings, the total comes up as "Total.
(plus the name you gave that group eg Smith Family Trust)".
"Closing Balance 30 June 2014" or "Closing Balance Smith Family Trust".
Currently if multiple line items exist, all of them print.
I think it would be great to have realtime graphs that you could display on the dashboard and in reports.
This would really help people to understand their financials better.
Some simple performance graphs would be a great way to connect with the numbers.
This can create confusion and double ups, especially with multiple users.
Would it be possible to have a second reference field in Credit Notes?
We request a credit from a supplier with a Credit Reference Number and the supplier issues the credit with their own reference number.
)I know you can shrink the whole zoom ratio using IE10 Tools, but this makes the print too small to read comfortably.
I often feel it would be beneficial to have 2 types of 'Period Lock Dates'.
We are all human and can accidentally enter incorrect dates etc, also the fact that there are usually several Advisors using the file, being staff at both the clients Accountants and Bookkeeping businesses, gives us less control over ensuring work we have done is not accidentally altered without being prompted of the effect.
Here's a link to the feature in QB:https://support.
Details of those claims (submitter, expense type, date of the receipt, etc. )
So the request is that it would be great to get the same support for PDF templates, as we could then export from indesign, illustrator.
This would be a similar function to the original profit and loss.
Hello XeroThe previous thread on this issue is now closed.
Your response is appreciated.
I have found that there are times that you will refer back to a voided item, and not know why it was voided.
If possible, can we have a heading for the notice that says "NZ only", "Aus only", "UK only", "US only", "Global only", "All", or any combination of these, so that we don't have to read the whole notification, only to discover that is does not apply to our country.
This will prevent us from becoming jealous or frustrated if the notification is not for us.
Every month I have to put together a large Spreadsheet analysing various items in company.
Original task:Submit one expense claim with multiple receipts with different receipt dates for each of the receipts.
Current behavior & work around:Once you authorize this expense claim, all receipt will "default" to the current date of the expense claim date.
This causes a problem for accrual accounting between the fiscal year boundary.
Specifically if you have expenses accrual in 2014 but you did not expense them till 2015 then all of your receipt expenses will be in the books as 2015 accrual instead of 2014 accrual which are not accurate.
ve configure it this way in the system (as oppose to cash accounting method).
A simple tick column next to 'sent', saying 'printed', would suffice.
Our client now wants to see the photos of all the receipts (fair enough!
I could ask to make individual receipts available for on-charging as they are in my old MYOB version, but this is too much functionality to ask for, and so I’d be happy with a .
When a customer contacted me to say they couldn't see their attachment, it took me a while to figure out why because I could see in the summary screen that there was a file attached.
Allow for negative entries when submitting expense claims, for example when an item has been returned & refunded.
Look forward to seeing this happen one day soonCheersRachel Barnes
There are two specific related features that I would find extremely helpful in speeding up the entry of my bills and general reconciliations.
I regularly group different types of purchases into a single item.
For example I do a grocery order to stock the kitchen with about 50 items.
5 include GST and 45 don't.
It'd be much quicker and easier if the cell could handle some simple calculations.
Using the example given above, I now know the total value of the order AND the value of the GST inclusive items.
It'd speed up entry considerably if this automatic balance calculation was possible.
Market position: leaderBranches: 66Market share: 20-29%Serve private and corporate customers.
At the moment when you enter a creditor adjustment note there is no warning if this adjustment note has been entered previously.
In MYOB the PO number was simply entered when we raised the supplier bill.
Why cant a purchase order number be tracked on a bill rather than having to make 2 entries?
Its a lot of work to tidy up a chart- and it only requires a simple solution to fix.
This way we get quick and informed input as to what the future might hold.
At present it is difficult to distinguish between the differnt sections of the P&L.
Please introduce Rolling Forecast as this is the way forward for Accounting.
Budgets are created too far in advance to reflect important changes.
Forecasts have been around for longer than I have been an accountant.
It would be great if you could include the option to have the entire reference field appear on a mouse hover, or if the Ref column could be expanded.
Unhappily, the formatting of these schedules leaves something to be desired.
The schedule name should therefore be in the same or a smaller size font than the note item heading.
In practice, however, the schedule name is in a much bigger font than the item heading.
This looks ridiculous and sends the reader misleading visual cues.
Many Banks and Credit Cards feed their information into the PAYEE field with little or no data in the REFERENCE OR DESCRIPTION fields.
The default for this field should be the contact's main email address but can be changed to another address if required.
We have multiple Contact Groups as we contract to a number of businesses.
This meant we had to manually tick back the VAT returns to the VAT nominal to find out what we needed to bring in manually on the VAT return.
I have started to simply check each employee then hit cancel to bring me back to the main timesheet screen and do this for each employee and once I am confident they are all correct I then tick all boxes and approve all in one go which is a little faster.
In my opinion this could become and important piece of differentiation for MYOB because it can be handled from withing MYOB.
Only six predefined date range options is madness.
Please reintroduce this feature, I don't know why it was disabled.
It made it so quick and easy to find and click on the date.
It would be great if we could search in our Contacts using the clients address (as well as the name).
It would be great if this could also be done when entering figures in Quotes.
In Australia employees have 14 days to hand the form in otherwise we have to withhold tax at either 47% or 49% (non-resident).
Please make it happen.
It's only another 2 clicks, but it's annoying that there is no consistency between modules.
I have recently purchased a laptop with Windows 8.
Could there be a feature where you can select bulk receipts for printing in one batch?
Our charity client has many cash receipts that require an individual receipt to be printed and at the moment the task is pretty tedious.
(I can't find a feature request in this area, please merge if there is one and let me know?
There should be a docx field that can be inserted into a custom quote docx that will insert the name and email address of the person that composed the quote?
I would suspect that BoA is not the only one who's doing this.
I'd love to see the ability to restrict user access by tracking.
If the bill is in an approved status, it should then remain locked for editing via the PO.
However a standard procedure should be that a bill can't be drafted or created without having a purchase order first - this is a basic "procurement" flow chart.
There should also be a function that allows you to set $ approval limits, once you have exceeded your approval limit on a purchase order, it should then be escalated (and email notification) sent to your supervisor / manager to approve.
Only once it is approved can the PO be sent to a supplier.
Some of our client's heavily rely on the creation and approving of Purchase Order's within their organisation.
It would be great to have a feature button next to the error, that when clicked on will take you directly to the label that requires fixing.
If I don't approve them on the road can I do it as a batch on the PC and then do payments together.
If not please can you develop this so I can have multiple receipts on one "receipt".
If you want to see what I mean log in to our company.
However, due to the volume of payments that may come in this isn't always easy to do.
Alternatively this could be a tick box which is selected before reconciling.
aba at the end of the file.
aba so it is easily identified in my computer downloads file.
Currently when a quote is declined the status of the quote appears in red at the top of the page due to the css below.
sq-view-quote-title-declined {color: #c00;}If a quote is accepted it is green because of:.
sq-view-quote-title-invoiced {color: #390;}and.
sq-view-quote-title-expired {color: #c00;}To allow for easy differentiation when viewing a quote.
Can we please have uniform data entry across modules.
That would mean having 3x subtotals (labelled Opt 1, Opt 2, Opt 3) that include the price of the first line (installation costs) + the cost of which ever air conditioning  unit the customer has chosen.
The manual import feature is great for repeating entries of differing amounts.
It would be really helpful if one could include the ability to enter checks in this manner.
One would import all the entries and then have the ability to print checks.
Would be really handy to have the comments that our clients put in the discuss tab shown as a column in the cash coding screen & also on the transaction detail reports.
This would really help to make it easy to check on where things are financially at a glance from the mobile app.
This would be great on the mobile app too.
An instance I have found is where it was represented at barely one pixel high.
Other programmes I have used allow me to continue on if the first suggestion, after the first few letters, is the correct one.
Increase the maximum employees in payroll.
but it doesnt allow for more than 100 employees.
It would be great if it would increase the amount of employees.
The current limited security model only allows all reports to be access or none.
Please implement a way to include or exclude certain reports to certain users or roles please.
Is this something that has been discussed or considered?
Currently not available, and a darn site annoying.
This wouldn't be a big deal except you have to go through the entire validation process again.
2) Allow users to edit the "Name" associated with each email address.
This radio button is explained clearly in Help but I think the label for this radio button is misleading.
I now realize that I should have chosen simply “Approve”.
“Approve for Sending” means approve sending and is a bit different from approve send.
The option we have at the moment is only pdf and takes longer in doing these steps.
I appreciate your help on my request.
PayPal discontinued the separate site for Bill Me Later, and they now call it PayPal Credit.
It would be good if you could have separate links/tabs for expenses  and those .
We operate a 2 step process for this with our book-keeper approving them (looking at the detail) and myself as Finance Director authorising them.
Having both categories combined makes it unclear who needs to look at which expenses.
As an alternative, perhaps there could be a "text wrap" in that field within your coding group so that the reference field would be shown completely, even in the portrait format that now exists.
It would make the statement longer with the word wrapping, but no details would be lost in the reference field.
I'm a graphic designer and often times I run into the issue of needing to send a client multiple quotes as part of a larger project.
imho, there needs to be an "include Nil Activity" checkbox in the statement type blue box, or "include Nil Outstanding" depending on Statement Type selected.
This may be a small thing and something we are missing, but having page numbers on the quotations would be very helpful.
Our quotations run to multiple pages and it would be good to track.
It would be quite useful for us to see on a draft quotation the amount of margin per quotations.
In some cases we have different discounts applied to different lines in the quotation, and it would be helpful having a % margin figure shown, so we don't have to keep double checking in the inventory - so to summarise, how much money are we making at these selling prices.
It would be great now that quotes have been added if there was a way of the customer digitally signing the quote to say that they agree with the quote and are happy to proceed.
and have accepted the quote and e-signed it.
We have had several situations where we have doubled up orders in error and this feature would have helped us to pick that up.
Manual journals each have a reference number, in an incomplete sequence.
I have difficulty ensuring that I have included all transactions in successive reports, and haven't included some twice.
Is there another way to do it?
This would effectively give a mini P&L on your dashboard.
If you could customise the graph so you could change it to Year to date that would also be good.
There should be expirations as well as email alerts for occasions where a dismissed employee is trying there closed acct.
Unlock requests should be a matter of Client Company admins prerogative to verify and unlock.
YOU HAVE BEEN WARNED!
Currently, i have to manually manage this process, ie: for suppliers i have S00001, S00002 etc and for customers i have C00001, C00002 etc.
It would be really helpful if a simple auto generation of these numbers could happen
This would save about a minute per setup and make it really easy to see at a glance how an item is tracking.
I'm needing to know how to print the 'Total cash in and out' graph off my dashboard please ?
The Purchase Order feature is a nice addition and its good that you can quickly turn the PO into a bill but.
We feel that this could be an incredibly valuable tool - the ability to quickly review your client list to see who you should get in touch with and discuss.
Very often we will for example be asked to quote on a Laptop but give 3 x options on the same quote.
Quickbooks provides this and it is a very helpful feature.
More focus on this in upcoming UI work would be very beneficial.
On my laptop (1366 x 768 resolution) the increased vertical padding in the rows means that the save buttons are all below the bottom of the screen - so I'm continually having to scroll to click the save button.
It's not possible to tab into the first item field.
This makes entering multiple transactions slow, because I'm always having to switch between keyboard and mouse.
And if you could maybe either reduce the number of empty line items shown initially, or reduce the vertical whitespace (either universally or for screens less than say 900px tall) that would be amazing.
What if a check was mistakenly written for more than owed?
For example, a signed print of a IRD GST submission.
Auditors love that kind of paperwork.
That way I can tell that we have backup against every transaction.
Is that possible?
And if not, is it going to be?
As a not for profit we have regular donors and want to issue one annual receipt rather than a receipt for each donation transaction.
I believe this is also confirmed from the online training on getting started.
A much wanted feature here.
It would be so great to get total number of transactions plus subtotal for debits & credits to assist with figuring out what went wrong when clients change something after reconciliation.
it would be great if transactions showed up in the month they were reconciled, not entered!
Could we have an option it so that the quote is marked as 'Sent' if it is printed out?
An example of this would be close down periods over holiday periods etc.
I tried doing a negative discount, but that didn't work.
All our pricing is based on our cost plus our markup and not a discount on RRP.
I've tried adding the department head as an additional contact, but there is no option to send it to the contact of my choice from a list.
It would be really good if there was a way we could track quotes on the Dashboard!
Example:I have about 80hrs current leave.
When you apply for leave you can only see the dates you have requested.
It's visible from an admin perspective but not an employee's.
Is this possible or will it be soon?
Myob have a WOF reminder feature to generate WOF reminders.
I discovered that this reversed previous depreciation postings and moved registered assets to pending.
This meant that I had to go into each asset and register again as well as posting depreciation again.
I recommend the following features to be added:1. a pop up warning explaining what will happen if you change the depreciation start date and a prompt whether you wish to continue.
2. an option to select multiple pending assets and register in bulk.
it would be really great to have a button to do this on the dashboard, so that I don't have to hunt through menus.
I've added a link to an excel spreadsheet showing the data we want in our reportyear
I think there should be an option when creating a contact to set a specific unit price for that particular customer.
Cheers for now,Michael
When tabbing through fields in some screens, the cursor blinks and is ready for data entry, however, in some screens, the cursor does not appear, the field is not ready to accept data, and you actually have to click in the field to activate it.
A export option for your fixed assets.
Showing a cash basis trial balance and exporting that balance.
for the TL;DR types - Feature Request - Cash basis option for Trial balances and their export.
If this is already available please let me know.
We do 100+ jobs per year, so I'm adding a few jobs per week, and allocating between 10-20 income/expense lines to each Job.
And there's now more than 200+ Jobs in the list.
It would make balancing certain suppliers bills much easier.
Once the potential duplicates are identified, I would suggest allowing the user to sort through then and merge and or archive the contacts.
Currently, it shows Income Statement.
We currently do this manually by exporting the information, as we have a very tight cashflow and plan our payments on an almost daily basis.
Any news on whether this feature will be available in the near future.
Many have the same name, some have a meaningless name.
In my case, each Folder has/is a Tracking category.
- Finally, as already raised - it desperately needs a running balance column.
When a quote goes out it would be a lot easier for everyone to refer to line numbers.
"I want to order line 3, 8 and 12. "
02 which is supported by all 31 countries in the SEPA region (including the UK).
02 XML file to collect direct debit.
It would be very handy if the approved purchase orders would list the applied bills amounts underneath the purchase order total, in much the same way as an approved bill shows the payments applied against it underneath the bill total.
we have found that because of this, some BAS' have been missed as we don't get notifications from the ATO about available BAS' anymore.
The columns presently shown are If we could have  and  columns it would be great.
of days late.
I imagine it's fairly common to have a combination of repeating and one-off items.
Are there other approaches to this?
Is that preferred, even?
Note: this is *not* branding (https://community.
That is literally one line of CSS.
This causes quite a bit back and forth for us with the auditors re-sending documents that have already been attached.
If users with Read Only access could view the supporting docs in the spend/receive money transactions it would eliminate a lot of duplicate work for us and make the process much smoother!
While this is certainly much better than no information about the GST component of any accounting changes, it does also include a lot of clutter!
For all I know, this could be quite difficult to implement, but would be a very handy little feature to have.
Always have to change date and refresh list.
Given when we 'spend' or 'receive' money, we have to choose who the money is going to/from, wouldn't it be helpful if we could see details of these transactions when viewing the supplier or customer it has gone to/from?
That would be handy to me in my work.
It would be helpful if all the revenues related to rents received from clients were together, rather than being interspersed with grants received from government.
How frustrating is it to have matched and be ready to reconcile your transaction, only to be foiled by the transaction limit after you click GO?
This is FRUSTRATING and makes me quickly want to switch my books to something else (pun intended).
Mobile phone companies have been doing it fpr years with minutes instead of transactions.
Upgrading or using all 10 of freebie one-off transactions should not be considered a solution.
With Workpapers it logs you straight in without having to re-enter all of your data.
This is a minor issue but quite irritating & a simple fix.
This means that 6 months results to September 2014 cannot be compared with full year results to March 2014.
Fortunately I can trust them not to touch anything else, otherwise I would have to still be processing all the bills myself.
The search in the community site is useless.
The more detail you put in the search terms, the more results come up.
This makes sense in general and should be released as a feature overall.
I now you can do this for assets dated before the Asset register start date but a lot of the addition dates I have entered after this.
The European Union includes the following services within this definition:•	Download and online games•	E-books (e. g. Amazon Kindle)•	Download and streaming music and videos•	Cloud computing, including software provided as a service (‘SaaS’)•	Mobile phone services•	Internet telephony (e. g. Skype)•	Streaming television (e. g. Netflix)I have a client selling cloud based software in the EU to consumers and non VAT registered businesses.
This adds many hours of work to our data entry and makes it very difficult to managed on bills with lots of line items.
I’ve looked for ages but can’t find anything, the Balance sheets shows as running totals.
As an example, as someone coming from QB I am used to seeing check numbers in my transaction register.
There must be other uses for this column that other users would find very handy.
This must be so simple to implement.
The BAS form deals only in whole dollars.
As when you are doing year ends you always run it for those dates so would be nice for that to be possible.
As we have numerous items that customers purchase and keep inventory it is not practical to have numerous prices for the same item.
While not pretty, it was working okay until the GST upgrade.
Now the numbers per the filed return don't populate and they don't save when we enter them either.
Am happy to help with ideas to make it work.
Administration access should only lock down items which will affect the system or allow people to change other users access.
With 205 current pages of feature requests viewing these at only 10 items per page is sub-optimum.
How about including a drop down setting so we can choose to view 50 or 100 per page?
and still considering other Acc.
In my opinion this is a must have, as a lot of assets have some value after the depreciation period and this should be visible (and adjustable).
Or allow syncing with some external provider - Google, Linkedin, Full Contact - issue with this is usually the addressing format is not as easily interchangeable.
It can be done, but exchange controls in South Africa can be tedious at the best of times.
When you are adding footnotes to Profit and Loss reports you have to make sure that you know what numbering you plan to have them in as you can't change the order once it has been setup.
It would be great if you could say drag and drop to move the order around.
Gmail has the ability to filter and forward emails automatically based on their content.
In order to get this working though Google Mail wants to verify to the forwarding address by spending a verification code.
Think of all those Google Apps people out there!
Would be good if there was at least some kind of simple search.
As we have been lodging Income Tax Returns I have noticed that there doesn't seem to be a feature for when we receive the Notice of Assessment back.
A feature where we can tick the return off as assessed or create a date that it has come back in.
It then takes half an hour or more undoing that momentary error.
I undo quite easily but end up with extra transactions that shouldn't be there, then I have to delete them.
This is a lot of tapping in of figures to allocate the one large credit.
People seem to ignore statements when sent.
Please vote for these features!
because you either want it this way because you are allergic to development or you want it for advertising.
It drives their suppliers scatty.
These are very basic features for Accountants.
com/#Contacts$BK_What) I wondered if this could be changed to help keep the contact listing clean & ensure contacts are entered correctly.
I have also loaded the client logo into their ledger via organisational styles.
Option to Search:1.
I want to search all the bills from Supplier A, Supplier B, & Supplier C (plus date range)2.
I want to search all the bills excluding the ones sent by Supplier A & Supplier B (plus date range)4.
com This would be helpful for two reasons - 1) to the client / customer it looks as though they are visiting a subsection of our site - which increases their trust in the link (even if on a subconscious level) AND 2) for branding purposes, it increases our brand equity.
Depreciation for $10,000.
But, its really tough to manage that.
If we can have the Pooling on direct basis it will be really a great feature update.
But now I'm getting carried away - right?
If you run a Profit & Loss with a comparison to budget, the "variance" column takes the actual value less the budget value, to get a positive or negative number.
Therefore, if income is bigger than budget, you have a positive variance (or negative if the actual is lower).
This makes sense OK - but it's not right for expenses.
Costs should work the other way around - if actual spend is less than budget then this is a positive variance.
The second situation is US withholding tax, which is deducted from payments to my company by a US company that we work with.
When I am reviewing Bills entered by my staff it is really annoying to have to click the arrow and fine the "approve and view next" option, especially if I am going through 20 items.
This would provide a quick means to extract this list and follow up on those customers.
It would be a hybrid between the Activity & Outstanding statement and would display:1.
All activity for the chosen period, and2.
The simple answer is to allocate the credit or make a cash refund so it appears in the reconciliation, but with this client of mine, hundreds of credits a week is the norm.
Is this on the roadmap to be included in a better version of Batching?
This could also work for batch payments too.
It would be useful to customise these with the company logo, registered office and company number (the latter should be set up automatically in the template).
Could we have an extra column in the Inventory list for suppliers with a drop box selection to create a link back to our supplier list
Selections, and 2.
It would be really useful to have an additional standard category 3.
This will speed up my Month end reporting a GREAT deal.
It might also help people with images turned off in their browser, or screen readers, text-to-speech etc.
A link that you could attach to your emails that will enable your clients to complete their contact details.
It would obviously require authentication from you prior to uploading to your contacts database.
Can there please be an Undo Last Merge option for customers, in case two get merged by accident?
Please would you work on this one?
It would be of benefit to accountants and bookkeepers if the pages were improved by allowing a Search function allowing a name search as well as a postcode search, plus improvements to the Map search to allow for narrowing down on postcode areas to allow current and potential clients to list more local advisors.
Could we have a option to select discount recieved?
(been there and had that - very frustrating).
If not, please consider this for a future release.
Perhaps a graph too if possible.
In this instance, we have a client who receives income and incurs expenses that relate to two different sites, but also incurs general expenses that cannot be attributed to either site.
It would be very useful if the maximum could be increased to at least 10!
We all communicate with clients that can have multiple email contacts.
It would be really helpful if it could bring across the main contact telephone number with ability to edit if necessary.
Can there be an option to set a default branding theme across the whole organisation instead of defaulting to "Unbranded"?
- There should be an option to show GST and/or the GST code in a column.
Hopefully this would be a simple enhancement, and would appear as 2 extra check boxes in the columns selection list.
I know Reckon stopped exports as well whereas their older versions of Cashbook used to export at least as a QIF.
Problem is the file name is automatically generated, e. g. OfficeLens_{date}_{id}.
I can rename the files, but it takes ages.
I think it would make more sense if the files stayed in your library instead of being removed.
This allows the same file to be attached to multiple items, as I occasionally have a requirement for.
I have recently needed to import a manual journal with multiple dates which has lead to individual csv files for each date, it would have been much easier if I could have imported it as one, obviously there would have been a contra entry for each date.
I accept it may only work well with cash type transactions.
eg Profit and Loss
This is particularly true of the Analytical Review workpaper.
Obviously, I could always be more descriptive in my queries, but a solution could be similar to the approach used when attaching a document to a line item in Workpapers, where the line item name is automatically inserted into the name of the attached file.
I want to move the majority of Contacts to my Customer group.
Visit my .
These would be added to your profile.
We currently only have the option to look back from end of month by 1, 2 ,3, 6 or 12 months.
It would be good to create a smart list for suppliers based on various criteria, such as annual spend.
csv to subtotal.
Have ability to over-ride email address listed in contacts.
Our firm prints checks for many clients and we previously utilized MICR information on blank check stock with our other accounting system and it worked great.
However, in MYOB they have a transaction recap (CTRL R) which shows you the effect on the ledger that is about to occur.
I notice that it is there already in Payroll, but no where else.
Please vote for this if you could :) You'll love it.
Aim - to communicate with book keeper rather than using emails.
A small project management type system or way of communicating with book keeper would really speed things up.
Or let me know if you have a better way.
My suggestions are as follows:Current topics aren't specific or indicative of where to post your question or browse.
Saves going into many posts that aren't relevant to country accounting standards.
These are necessary in some cases for payroll.
After publishing a BAS it rolls to the next period.
Would be better if the app realised you hadn't yet done the 2014 year summaries, and consequently defaulted to the last period not lodged.
This creates a data security issue for businesses and staff alike due to them seeing other staff's personal details such as credit card details and home addresses on expense receipts.
Consequently, I propose that there should be a restriction to block users from seeing inappropriate files or a method of deletion from a super user preventing this from happening.
a YTD total for the current year, and3.
a YTD total for the previous year to enable comparison with 2.
When the "save button" is pressed, the whole page should stay in the same place ready for the cursor to be pressed immediately however the boxes/text etc.
We’ve looked through all the feedback on the  and found the top 10 User Roles requests.
With nearly 250 comments on that thread, it’s quite hard to get quantitative information to justify what should be done first.
com email address but it would be good to have a shorter version.
My Dell MFP allows scan to email but the Inbox email format is so long that it rejects adding it to its address book.
I love the simple login via the app.
Having it's own app, means employees and suppliers alike don't have access to our other financial details.
Having a last used field appearing on the summary page of contacts would allow you to easily identify & archive those contacts they you haven't used for a while.
Could that (and the default tracking code) be added to the export / import file?
1) Consider removing the "Upgrade now" messages directly beneath Money Coming In and Money Going Out from the Cashbook Dashboard.
end of financial year as I will only take up the currency gains/losses then.
Renaming the Best Answer would take one programmer a day.
Makes no sense when I already have the contact and have to enter all the info again.
For example, a particular purchase may only be used once per month.
Please find attached quotation for .
On opening a repeat template it shows the status as "save to draft".
Then I see a small message at the bottom of the template telling me that the status has been changed from "Approve and Send" to "Save to Draft" automatically by the system as the user which set them up, has been deleted.
The scale charge is generally the last item to be processed on a retrun and this would make things easier to undersatnd and easier to adjust.
I only say because I'm obviously on the budget version!
This has put me in slightly stuck situation for now, which i can sort ok when next month pops up, but i still think it would good, neh, great!
The Cash Summary is very basic - in fact it is too detailed, as it simply lists all the codes, to be useful.
I would have thought it would be easy to apply the same customised formatting options as is in the P&L reporting to the Cash Reporting.
Hope to see progress soon.
Maybe an option for a future enhancement?
We always have to maneuver the preview screen around to see the transaction screen.
In order to make this process as good as entering from a paper copy, I request that the user interface be sized so as to ensure all of the components of the transaction can always be seen whilst viewing the file preview.
There should be an options to have more than one Principal (formerly Practice Admin) to manage staff in the practice.
Do we have to journal out the net profit/(loss) manually as journals to the partners?
eg Owner Drawings + Shareholder Funds IntroducedSubtotalling is available on the custom BS and P&L reports, but can these, or similar subtotals be flagged to display on the dashboard
Again you miss the point by several miles.
The remittance advice forestalls much extra work of dealing with phone calls, statements, etc for bills that have already been paid.
If items on a PO are billed in stages (because an order has been part-shipped), then this can easily be reflected when carrying out the Copy to Bill operation.
However, on subsequent Copy to Bill operations, the billed items remain.
If not, for how long I should wait?
My client likes to see a printed checkbook register on a regular basis.
There really should be a quicker route to Purchase Orders.
Indeed, this would remind users to follow this workflow.
However, we cannot select a recipient when composing the document itself.
Additional/customisable statuses for purchase orders, eg.
Part Numbers aren't listed on the sent purchase order.
Could not figure out why a credit was not allowing me to allocate till i finally found that i had two customers with the same name, one in capital letters!
Merged them and no more problems.
But have done it a few times now and there is no warning .
Unless I am missing something, there doesn't seem to be a way of forcing users to change their password every (say) 28 days.
I realise it may not be a popular user request but as an admin I would value it very much!
However if I untick and re-tick one box then i can split that transaction.
At this point I have a horrible habit of pressing the return key which promptly loses the information from the bill and the tracking option is not saved.
I would prefer that the enter key performs a default action of Save within that popup or at the very least Cancel.
i. e. In the US, we take out one-half of meals/entertainment expense.
My example is, I had a customer ABC PTY LTD that owed $121 for Feb, $121 for March and paid $121 in May.
There needs to to be a way to select multiple records for not only deleting, but also for posting etc.
If this problem persists after you have completed these steps, please contact customer care.
So a specific sequence of reports can be generated across multiple entities.
This would help display to the client a better picture of where their money has been allocated and the effect this is having on their financial performance.
Takes out a bit of guess work.
Insert a column to allow choice of vendor at "Inventory Items"
It would be good if tracking options that have been deleted could be removed from reports.
If you delete a category then it does not show up on reports which is great, but we have one client who had multiple tracking options with a particular category, and while they have consolidated these into a lot less options the old tracking options still show up on reports.
Monitoring and predicting Cash Flow is well known to be a vital requirement for all businesses, but especially for small businesses that are growing.
Where as I note, once approved the address (although not email) can be added - albeit too late.
A company name, which is often associated with the ABN and also a trading name.
under which it is commonly known as.
At the moment we are having to prepare additional reports in conjunction with the GL to obtain this information.
The issue we face is the person who can refresh is now on holidays.
I have a client with a large asset register (2 levels of tracking - also applied to assets) but still needing another level to sort on etc.
Is it possible to have the asset description included on one/both the asset reports?
Surely it's a quick fix?
We've had a few instances where this has happened.
Sometimes we first buy from the supplier and then sell to the customer.
But its always two ways.
same product name, delivery, description to the customer and to buyer.
More flexibility in reporting is requested.
It would be awesome if the main menu had a flyout menu function.
Currently method is.
It would be good to support SAML in a service provider role.
This would allow businesses to manage the identities themselves (a lot of businesses connect their identity provider to LDAP for instance)This would also allow staff to login easier and depending on the identity provider setup, more securely.
Most of it is fine, however the lack of functionality in the billing section is a huge let down.
The main reason our clients have come to wanting this service is for cashflow and then budgeting as second.
Being unable to produce reports showing bills owing makes cashflow tricky.
For example you may have a budget against a supplier for $44K comprising of a few line items that matches your budget and a contract to supply for that amount.
Unless you are diligent, it would be very easy to overspend on the PO.
Different clients have preferred formats of the way the Profit and Loss (and other reports) show.
As I have over 600 of these to create, I was hoping there might be a way of bulk importing these from a CSV file, rather than having to create each one individually.
I get the following error - xxxxx is missing the placeholder: (bracket)Contact First Name(bracket)I've been through all of my contacts and ALL have a first name.
I've already contacted customer support twice, but no fix and no timescale for a fix.
User profiles, CSS updates to navigation are completely irrelevant to me.
So in order to get the correct P&L coding, one must click each Approved PO individually.
It would be ideal to have the ability to create sub folders within Files, Folders.
This is so documents that are not attached to an exact entry (e. g. Bill) can easily be sourced by Auditors etc>
I'm not sure whether it's right to mention it here (apologies if not! )
I have been told it is the API with Google.
Risk may be low, but it would still be good to dictate it.
I think it would help no end if on the dashboard a rough equity statement and a summary of key profit ratios were added.
, metres, lengths, cubic metres) in Purchase Orders and have it shown on the printout.
Is there a way to insert page breaks in reports such as the Balance Sheet so that Assets appear on one page and Liabilities & Equity on the next?
Can we have the ability to have clients with exactly the same company name?
Please let us search by amount too, many other accounting programmes offer this.
Also, if you put in the wrong year.
Would it be possible to change contacts so that when you export to Excel, the contact group is included as a field and can then be sorted.
Would it be possible to show the prior year comparatives in the annual special purpose financial statements profit and loss and balance sheet schedules.
This would be really good feature for those who export reports to google doc & working out formulas by filtering tracking categories.
It's only a small feature but can be benefited alot in return.
Is there a simple way of doing this.
This &#163;2k would show in the month of the bill on the P&L but in reality it should be split over the year.
Sage would then automatically make the postings in the records e. g. reduce the PP current asset balance and adjust the monthly charge in the P&L each month.
Have had to manually set both Currency and Exchange rate for a large number of transactions.
I would have been nice to have the ability to set this at import.
This would be so helpful for when cross referencing /checking / or having a query Then these items could be highlighted to bring to the users attentionCould even be helpful in Reports as well?
How about a 'flag' to include data from fixed assets in Cash reporting?
It also creates a security issue for client sensitive information.
Making it a secure field on the contact record would go a long way to improving security and improve internal controls.
Thoughts and comments please.
It would certainly make it easier to identify who needs to be chased up.
It would be great to at least have the option to reorder the month columns sequentially i. e. eariest month left current month right, with YTD on the right hand side as currently.
I notice under revenue it is accrual only.
The iPhone app lets you login with 4 numbers.
Can we get that happening?
Flash is dead.
Any progress on the front?
the client could even raise requests to the Accountant here perhaps.
I love Files - clients send anything they are not sure what to do with to Files and we process them.
Great for documents but not for anything else.
Clients can't 'open' a query that is closed if they find more information related to it.
I email queries, To Dos and information requests to clients, but invariably they forget or miss things, and then ask me to email them again with what's outstanding!
Please allow tracking categories to be added to payroll taxes for employees in payroll.
This seems strange considering I have Manage User access.
When it came in, it reconciled automatically.
I added one date to a batch of entries in the Schedule of Planned Payments.
For example, in order for my law firm employees to do some of the most basic tasks (ie.
G'Day all,Here's the backstory - I enter our daily takings from the till total each day.
For a bakery, this means a mixture of GST and GST-free items.
I would be a nice feature to have a different background color for each side of the transactions.
Example:  Pink background when spending money and light green background when in the receiving money feature.
Perhaps under the help menu?
At the moment I have to email myself and then print it.
Many apps now have the ability to print directly to an AirPrint printer from either the iphone or iPad
The first two would be my most important requests, the others being 'nice to haves'.
Another handy feature would be a column at the end showing a GST variation.
05 GST, that it shows a $0.
This would help the bookkeeper/accountant identify such transactions without having to run additional formulas in Excel.
This needs to be increased.
There has been a lot of discussion about this on either forums.
To assist users it would be useful in resolving this issue I have two suggestions:1.
Interested to hear other suggestions.
The less moving from keyboard to mouse the quicker.
Would it be possible to have a user name for log in as an option instead of email address?
We often export our data and manipulate the data in MS Excel, using PIVOT tables and other such tools.
It would be good to have a user role formatted to suit the requirements of an auditor or audit firm.
Some features of the adviser user role are required, i. e. the ability to manage users (audit staff), access to all areas and all reports, access to adviser tab, etc.
However, it is also preferable for the auditor log in to be read only for all areas of the software.
As the online nature of the data makes it difficult to lock down the data that is being audited, to ensure that changes are not made during the course of the audit work.
LLC and other types of LLC companies.
Quick camera capture of receipts with as few button clicks as possible would be great.
Making the "" field in Expenses mandatory is also a nuisance.
The "" label in Expenses itself leads to confusion.
I end up having to archive the resulting Contact records.
Each tire sold requires a flat tax of $3.
00 remitted to the state.
For instance: Coastal Patios and Country Furnishings.
then go back and issue statements.
I think all you have to do is create a "me" point of view and a "customer" point of view.
QB & NetSuite have this capability.
Users struggle to find it.
After files are assigned to a transaction they are very difficult to locate.
(2) Compare periods date selector should default to last financial year-end month if one clicks the drop-down selector.
Or even bring forward the already saved income statement layouts that are in my profile, I can live with that.
Now I have to export to excel, regroup and adjust the reports before I review with my clients, lots of extra work.
I've received expense claim, approved it, authorized it, and paid.
We have put in a work-around but it's still dangerous that one might get left off.
I understand this may be a US issue primarily, but we receive credit card statements that have a balance due on a specific date.
Also a pretty big problem for those of us in the US.
My base currency is GBP, but the majority of my customers are invoiced in Euros.
Every other payroll company I have ever known charged based on employees or transactions.
My initial solution was to sign up many one and two employee clients at the $39 introductory rate, for the 10 employee plan.
We MUST either have E-SERVICES IN ALL PLANS OR APPROPRIATELY PRICED SEPARATELY!
10 employees for $70, 20 employees for $90 and 100 employees for $180 seem reasonable, especially with the 25% discount I give even non-clients.
Most companies start payroll on January 1, so fast action is essential.
Ideally to be aloud in a Adviser role access only and from the gst audit screen as a second protection against wayward edits.
It also appears on every other user for the organisation.
We have several hundred clients, if they were to start uploading files, I will be told about each and every upload.
Is this something that's on the roadmap ?
Also would be nice to have this option as the default for a customer.
I have a few clients that receive money via their ezidebit programs which at times is made up over 80 payments.
Apologies in advance if this needs to be merged with the existing webcam thread.
If I enter a contact's ABN, could this not be used to: 1.
Check against ABN Lookup to auto-fill Tax info.
to the clients.
However, we have two divisions for the company.
com tied to theme Domain2 theme (maybe multiple)I think this will be better for company branding.
For large reports it would be great to have a "frozen" top row and left column.
We often raise purchase orders with nil amounts in a line item because we don't always know what the price will be.
If you think about it logically, the idea of a negative unit price is a nonsense.
One never finds a negative price on anything in the real world.
For example.
If I wanted to keep digital copies of all my receipts, I have to take a photo or scan these all separately, and then manually upload and try to match them up.
- take a photo, review to check sharpness and readability and hit done.
- the image is now associated with the transaction.
- the transaction list needs to be viewable on the phone app and also allow you to select any historical transaction and upload a file.
For example check out the iphone app CamScanner - you could automate some of this functionality (or have it as an option) to keep file size down and receipts readable.
(using the $ value as a way to automatically suggest a match).
They continue to repeat their mistake over and over.
It would be great if we could create a repeating purchase  order against a customer / supplier.
is a good example of how this works really well.
If you type @ a list of all users pops up.
If you do not know that a purchase order has been created when you are entering a bill it would be useful to get an on-screen prompt alerting you to the fact that an unsatisfied purchase order existed for that supplier.
The prompt could be similar to that currently in place when unallocated credit notes were available to apply against a bill.
This would be great for when clients attach dividend statements etc.
The two codes would be interchangeable and relate back to the same inventory item so that no matter which of the two codes you used it would pull through the same description and price info as well as still count the quantity purchased and sold in the existing reports.
The alternate inventory item code would be an optional field or automatically default to the same as the primary code so that businesses that don't work with different product codes would not be affected by this change.
The data would pull from 1.
This setting could be optional by vendor or a company-wide setting if desired.
A tick box to allocate a contact as a customer, supplier or both.
It would be nice to email quotes or estimates to clients and for them to review and APPROVE them online instead of us 'approving' them on their behalf in WorkflowMax.
This would eliminate an important human step in the workflow and capture the customer's approval electronically right within the system (handy in case of disputes).
+1 here
could be used for this process and make this process much more user friendly.
Currently the same contacts have to be added twice.
but many fields such as name, position, phone, email, etc.
Image:Option to insert 1-3 images with product pictures, designs or scribbles to avoid confusion or misunderstandings.
But in contacts it isn't possible to enter multiple email addresses.
A received email returned to a designated email address   would allow us to know that it had been opened.
)I consider this to be one request as they are interconnected!
Currently you have to scroll to the bottom of the list to navigate to another page.
A 'back to top' button would also be useful.
On page "https://go.
It's made me think a few times in the past as to whether I was doing the right thing in the right part of the site.
It would be good if the PDF were sent along with the transaction details and automatically saved in the client's file,Cheers, Rhys
Allowing staff to enter expense claims via the employee portal with attachment option for receipts
Enable to run PL for a SINGLE tracking category code or checks for ones you want to see.
This needs to be addressed.
Somewhere allow a check button next to a user or something to allow access to enter, amend, edit tracking categories.
It is a painful experience.
If a match was found, that record would be flagged via some mechanism (and either not imported, or placed in some other easily identifiable state) so that it could be dealt with accordingly.
This would import the transaction directly to be reconciled - but allow the user to "restore" it and treat it as it would normally.
I have searched the forum and am very surprised to find nobody has requested Order Acknowledgements (or Acknowledgments depending on locale).
If I put an item in at $10 cost and sell for $20.
would be handy as accountants to have a quick overview of what journals that have been posted have attachments and what don't, without having to click into each individual journal.
It's fantastic that we can upload files etc.
and connect certain directories with specific clients.
This is the only real manual work at the moment!
I look forward to this feature being added!
htmlThe SEPA deadline  of February 1st 2014 is fast approaching.
What do you have in the roadmap the be compliant with that norms?
Currently I have to export the records, then export a detailed transaction list and do an external join in a DB or spreadsheet to re-join the information.
I then have to do my reporting manually in a spreadsheet.
Is this feature in the road map?
However, I can't tell from the transactions page which already have receipts attached and which do not.
It is frustrating having to print out the actuals and type them into the master budget.
Our last programme did it automatically.
At year end you have a month by month picture of each GL code and can decide how to budget going forward.
I appreciate that they are helpful for the customer, however surely for the partner who has set up quite a few Xeros there's no requirement for these boxes to come up?
It would not hurt to allow even more.
Currently I have to export revenue by customer.
I hope you consider adding some of the above.
But that is not offered.
Ability to delete contacts who have no related records/activity.
Click again to reverse the sort order.
eg Want almost all  "Coles"  to go to Drawings ( for personal groceries ) except for "Coles Express" which is usually fuel and not a grocery store.
But there are a couple of user interface options that would make it easier.
Secondly, if you have the supplier bill on your computer, you can attach it to the bill or expense claim.
Sometimes I find myself having to input the same details 20+ times.
Specifically, the ability to separate variable and fixed expenses so that you can more easily forecast.
We had this in QuickBooks and though it was a simple feature; it was extremely handy for checking what was done on a certain date quickly.
The entire point is PAPERLESS, NO SOFTWARE TO INSTALL.
why go back to printing checks - most companies should never have to print checks anymore.
It isn't secure.
My suppliers do not give discount on carriage and likewise, we do not apply discount on carriage to our customers.
I am working for a small UK Limited company who has also registered to trade in Australia.
As such they have registered for local GST in Australia and must submit a GST return quarterly.
If you change between tabs it closes too.
I think it would be a valuable feature for those people who are already in secured locations for an option to be present where they are not automatically logged out.
When you make groups of contacts to contain different customers (for example we have made a different group for people paying by Direct Debit, Cheque or BACS) you are unable to send a statement based on what group they are in.
We did this as a learning curve a few years ago after we needed to contact a NOK urgently whilst we were working away.
The software I import from has these lines as "tax inclusive".
This often results in small rounding errors of 1c due to the tax calculations.
I am sure I'm not the only one with this problem as I know of one other person in my small town that has the same problem.
Perhaps if the unit price field loses focus and the quantity field is blank, it auto-fills with 1.
As the only two options here would be to 1) tab across or 2) enter more info after the general narrative, it would be handy if the cursor was placed at the end of the default description text.
It would be great if we had the option to rename published reports.
This feature would also assist in helping to manage and sort the list of published reports, particularly as the list grows longer and longer.
It's a simple calculation!
Am I missing something or is there a work around anyone knows other than dumping two different years in Excel and comparing that way?
It would be good if it was possible to send the credit note to the client to show the overpayment.
It is quite frustrating that you can only allocate it to a sale but not actually email or print it for the clientIf there is a work around for this I would appreciate knowing how to do it!
It serves to help our customers reconcile individual months outstanding and also helps in getting payments from them as they are looking at smaller figures rather than one lump sum.
Have proper processing for EC acquisitions so that there is no "fudge" to get it to display properly.
"20% VAT on EC Purchases" and enter this with a Tax Type of EC Purchases and a Tax Rate of 20%.
Enter the line item for &#163;100 as you would any other line item except that the Tax Rate applied should be that of the rate set up as above eg.
"20% VAT on EC Purchases".
The result should show an &#163;80 subtotal, made up from the first line item of &#163;100, less the second line item of &#163;(20).
Your VAT Return should then display &#163;20 in boxes 2, 3, 4 and &#163;100 in boxes 7 and 9.
Companies House allows companies to extend a financial year to up to 18 months, or shorten it down to 6 months - subject to certain rules.
Can I please have  when reconciling?
At the very least can I have page number changing at top and bottom.
I am currently negotiating with a client paying multiple subscriptions versus the one of subscription of his current accounting package.
Even with a 15% discount it is $124.
The benefit I foresee for multiple companies is that they have lots of inter-company transactions.
Can the Reconciliation feature be opened up so a transfer can actually go across into another file.
I think this is something that will really benefit clients with multiple interrelated companies.
Could we please have quarterly - i. e. This Quarter, Last Quarter.
Essential for BAS reporting.
We post out bulk newsletters to clients printing address labels (Avery or Arrow have online templates).
Exporting into excel and designing the format then removing all the clients we don't want to send it to takes over a days work.
This feature improvement would allow an efficient way to monitor expenses for each Item against their budget.
food travel), and monitor it against the Item's (in our case, Courses organised) budget.
It would make a currently tedious process, a fast and efficient one.
i. e. "worked weekend due to deadline".
And the US needs the balance of transactions with US clients each year too.
Customizable reports for these cases would be nice.
A side note: The option to do a global search across all data would be a good alternative solution.
Unless there is currently another way?
Place document to scan in scanner2.
Click  'Direct scan' or 'Instant scan' button.
Also, when you are converting from another accounting system, you have to reconcile items manually.
If your list has multiple pages, you then have to go to the page you were on.
It would be much, much faster if you could select multiple items, and then click on a "Mark as Reconciled" button to take care of them all at once, without losing your page.
Show contact group on list of all contacts.
Similar to MYOB's "save may changes when i record this recurring transaction" option.
Currently we have to advise clients of this manually as the statement doesn't show this.
Its very confusing for both client and us.
It would be great to have an additional button next to the "attach a file" link that allows the user to take a snapshot with their webcam.
That way we can simply hold small receipts in front of the camera (every laptop has one these days, right? )
Even if it was for a minimal $5.
00 per month of $49.
00 per year to cover storage space.
But the most important for bussiness owner is a cash flow.
This is very usefull so everyone knows this is the real worl; customer not allways paid on an due date and probablly you can not paid bill on due date.
Stripe recently rolled out Payouts for marketplaces: https://stripe.
com/blog/send-payouts-with-stripeI've read the thread about your recent Stripe integration - great stuff.
I am using the subtitle at this stage to show this.
This is normally the section you would have the Point 5 written.
Would be great to have built in to the Fixed Asset register the ability to sell part of an asset.
This would save having to log into both.
The Canada Revenue Agency (CRA) uses GIFI Codes to support their electronic filing and T2 processing system.
GIFI CodesThe GIFI (General Index of Financial Information) is an index of items generally found on balance sheets, income statements, and statements of retained earnings.
g.   9 months to 31 March vs 12 months to June 12.
Here is the Sample GST/HST Return Working Copyhttp://www.
html  Information page for Developer Canadian Electronic GST filing http://www.
If you are interested in developing electronic filing software, contact us at:GST/HST Electronic Filing Services SectionCanada Revenue AgencyEast Tower - E03Canada Post Place750 Heron RoadOttawa, ON K1A 0L5
We have 4 different taxes that we are remitting on a quarterly schedule on different dates.
We have scheduled commissions due on certain dates.
We have different insurance renewals on different dates.
We also have to download reports for commissions paid over the year and send statements of taxable incomes to external brokers for income tax purposes (T4A's in Canada).
Maybe repeating bills could automatically show on the calendar too and payroll run dates as defined by frequency.
Unfortunately the asset still did not show up in "Pending Items".
com/2013/06/more-control-over-your-emails/ introduced on June 17 2013 has introduced the mandatory display of message-service@post.
com from outbound emails.
If it was, we would have a large number of clients we would move tomorrow.
Instead, it would be helpful to automate the importation of data / metadata from Stripe to at least make reconciliation more straightforward.
In my experience this is a very common requirement worldwide from users of ERP systems.
For small suppliers it is usually a "do it our way or don't bother us" approach from the large entities.
This would make reconciliation of batch payments a dream!
Feature request:Assign trading terms to customers / suppliers.
Period:  within X (10days) of X date.
Period:  within X (30 days) of X date.
Period:  within X (50 days) of X date.
For us, we have some products that are fragile & get broken if mishandled, so we charge 100% before delivery for those.
Other products, we give 30 day credit terms.
a   Cash flow is the heart of businesses.
would improve the customer experience.
So I declined a staff members expenses and asked them to make some changes and re-submit.
However they have now vanished.
Also it would be great if the tracking categories could be linked to employees.
The US market has (some) different needs and is not a small market.
For larger companies this means downloading a massive amount of data to Excel.
This will help speed up the submission of recurring expenses such as Home Rent or Home Power.
I think this has the potential to offer a huge productivity gain and make expense claim submission for such expenses a much easier process.
It also has a great API, and really good customer service.
I'm constantly running reports for Current and Previous financial years and would love a way to select these options from a drop-down.
Getting tired always entering the start and finish dates.
This would have been far too much to do in the Demo system.
Obviously only available to Financial Advisors.
In my case the date entered by accident was 2212 instead of 2012.
Entering a dollar figure instead of a percentage (e. g. apply a discount of $10 off that item), or2.
By entering a discounted sale figure (e. g. this normally costs $225, but I will sell to you for $200).
or tag everyone in my contact group with a special tag this would become easy.
We've several clients who sell products to large buying groups and companies with multiple stores.
I can see it working as a option from the contact group screen or as an option to apply groups when sending statements.
The Due Date field is not auto-populated the same was as it is in the desktop browser.
On the desktop, selecting a customer causes the Due Date to be updated to reflect that customer's billing terms, but this doesn't happen in the mobile interface.
The way the cursor moves into the quantity field is a real pain.
The inventory item autocomplete is pretty slow.
I suspect it is communicating with the server to retrieve the items.
Could the item list be cached locally to make this (a lot) faster?
I'm searching for the best inventory module and connectors for Magento and Amazon.
To Do List: It would be super cool to take that a step further and record tasks, to do's or actions agreed between client and Accounmtant, record owners and due dates3.
This helps to eliminate 'contacts' being duplicated because of spelling errors when typing etc.
There should be a drop down list of contacts you can scroll through at this point in the transaction.
The work around makes me have many differing descriptions for essentially the same thing.
But why does it default to the end of the previous month?
When I'm sending a statement to somebody on the 29th of the month, the 'all outstanding' at the 30th of the previous month doesn't make sense.
When a line is removed - its gone.
Check styles needs to allow free placement of each individual field on the check - e. g. , the vendor, date, amount, amount in words, vendor address, memo, etc.
My information is already created in my Excel document.
Regardless of whether its used the way I intend to or not, it would be a useful feature to import/export as many things as possible.
Excel is a much faster method of entering information and it can remove the chance of human error if its done automatically.
But, for now, import/export spend and receive money would be great.
I'm an expat in the US operating freelance as a Sole Trader in Australia.
The bulk of my expenses are in USD, so when I generate a P&L, for example, it converts my USD income/expenses to AUD using historical currency rates which is fantastic because I don't have to think about it.
Everything gets reported to the ATO correctly in AUD.
I can also run reports in USD, and compare my expenses here in the US with similar expenses in Australia, make comparisons with previous years, etc.
As I think of myself as Australian, I want to make sure I'm keeping up 401k contributions, have my life insurance correctly adjusted, etc.
I'd also be happy with a cap on the number of times I could request it.
Obviously, if it was the correct match I would have selected it initially.
Currently, I have two choices both selected which is of course will never work.
I have many many products that are identical except for their item code!
It would be a massive improvement and would be of benefit to many, in my opinion!
Perhaps it could be an option for the widget to show (or not show) comparison to budget?
In the above many have said they now check the manual statement.
By providing this type of information (ie performing the manual mechanical check for us) the software is not only using the improving information available, moving us to best process but also helping us check that the information is sound.
It would be great to have a log for all emails including payslips, so we can know when & if they were sent also listing to whom and who from.
At the moment it is too hard to remember to go back into the payrun to send the payslips once the payroll has been paid!
It has currency exchange so no matter which country you are in, it converts the local currency expense back to your normal currency.
That option appears not to be checked by default.
Does anyone know how to have "Send me a copy" selected as the default?
For example, I take my team out for Friday afternoon drinks to bar 'X' each Friday.
The next Friday I go to a different bar (bar 'Y) as a one off treat.
Order Number is correct.
Supplier name is correct.
Total amount  is correct.
But this can be a pain to get when you only have the base currency equivalent.
It would work better if you could enter the base currency amount instead.
This would be a great place to keep signed employment contracts, statement of duties and other employment documentation relating to the individual employee.
The current 5 is not enough for their different types of customers.
As such it actually requests the reversal of another request that was executed without proper regard to the full impacts on usability of the product or user experience.
Let me explain: Prior to this recent change, users could delete statement lines.
In effect, the recent change has eliminated a straightforward process that already had  security in place (warning + somewhat complex undelete) and replaced it with a complex delete process.
So in effect the complex portion got moved upfront, and the straightforward portion has been eliminated.
An example of a well thought-out process being scrapped without proper investigation of consequences.
For me 1 week increment would work.
Maybe have the option for people - if possible?
I have a few clients who have large prepayment amounts and these are carried over several months as the jobs to be invoiced are large and over several weeks or months to complete.
and awesome online vat filing.
Otherwise you cannot do this tip from the help centre.
Running a VAT Return when flat rate percentage changes during a VAT periodIf your flat rate VAT percentage changes halfway through a VAT period, it's a good idea to generate 2 separate VAT Returns.
"This is not possible as things are currently.
I have a Droid 4 phone which has a slide out keyboard.
(I am assuming this is the global default).
However, there is no confirmation of action.
As we are a non-profit organisation some of the leaders have queried me as to whether it is possible to change the profit and loss statement to read "Net Surplus/Deficit" rather than Net profit/loss.
Is this possible and if so, how would I go about doing it?
No doubt others will have ideas of what the options should be available, but .
Well, apparently there's one small detail getting in the way of actually making this work.
This knowledge was available in advance but buried so far in the Help Center that it could only be stumbled upon after the fact.
The current standard PDF template isn't that pretty anyway, so it would definitely be an improvement.
Both print and online would match up perfectly right out-of-the box.
They often have enquires from the public for where the nearest store is.
Be great if you could improve search function for Contacts eg.
Search Postcode From - To.
Surely it would be quite easy to have these amounts shown next to "Money Coming In" and "Money Going Out" on the dashboard?
00  (for GST)DR Office Supplies expense 7.
00 (for PST on office supplies)                           CR  A/P   112.
We are a UK company, registered for VAT in the UK as well as Germany and France.
In the company set-up admin needs to specifiy all the VAT registration codes of the company and to which country they belong:e. g.  GB123456789 (UK VAT)DE123456789 (German VAT)2.
Important is to remember to also assign zero-rated VAT rates to each VAT registration.
Seriously, after a year we still don't have a total column in budgets.
e. g. The category is "Crit Series 2011-12" but I see "Crit Series 20. .
which means I can't distinguish 2011-12 from 2012-13.
Is this planned for the future?
At least for Accountants?
We receive prepayments in multiple currencies.
This creates lots of problems.
Is this a feature that is on the way?
Tracking on Payrun is really essential if you are tracking expenses by department.
So long as the data integrity and proper entries are maintained on a single transaction, this should be possible.
The 'All Reports' page can very quickly become full of published Reports.
it is seamless and allows great work flow.
E. g. We receive a number of payments by Creditcard, these go through a stand-alone eftpos terminal.
They are then batched and processed through a CRM package.
Hello,Is there a reason that you are offering only PayPal integration?
I agree that it is a good option especially when you deal with many countries and different currencies.
The dashboard needs a total cash balance (in primary currency) at the top.
But what it doesn't distinguish is whether a company is a Corporation or not (there is no field in the Contact area to clarify who is/isn't so have to manually go through and create a group for all non corporations. )
I'm also not clear if debit card purchases are considered to be credit cards and should be excluded as well.
pdf and W8BEN – http://www.
Would be great to have the option to select various tracking category (child) budgets to total up to the overall (parent) budget.
It is not a big deal when you have 4 5 clients, but it is a big deal when you have 40 clients.
This would eliminate a lot of email (no-one likes email! )
Currently, this is a tedious process (particularly if you have multiple reports for multiple clients).
Would be great if we could get a check box next to each of the reports, so that multiple reports can be selected and archived all in a single step.
I recently transitioned here from quickbooks.
We would loose hundreds of dollars a month if we used paypal.
It needs to delete in full and reset the numbering to the last one used.
The only method of extracting this data at present is to export the information to Excel and subtract one TB (Say November 2012) from another (Say August 2012) to find TB for the quarter ended November 2012.
I know it's my fault for not saving as I go along, I normally remember, but not always.
Apologies if this matter has been raised already, but I couldn't find it in a search.
This would save quite a few steps and ensure that the original purchase order is recorded in the system.
Email updates of this nature could be applied to payments, remittances, purchases and so on.
The data displayed is Date, Type, Transaction & Amount.
I don't expect many people to support this because it's such a minor request, but you never know.
It sure would have helped with a reconciliation issue today!
This cannot be done by "search and replace" (if you search for all "," and replace with ". "
you will have to manually change the thousands separators from ". "
to "," and the other way around).
When clicked, an audit trail is displayed.
nl, main website is http://www.
We have clients with a year end that doesnt fall at the end of the month.
Would this be possible to include.
We have a "&" in our company name and the emails created via the template replace this with "&amp;" (in the subject & body), meaning the thousands of randomly-typing monkeys downstairs will have to stick with ye olde manual statement processing for now.
While I understand that this may make the software somewhat easier to understand for end users, this is still accounting software and not Facebook.
I know that the blog (http://blog.
And where bugs have been "passed to development" via support some feedback on progress would be nice!
Would be good if it also allowed a credit note to be input rather than having to go back to purchases menu, click the down button and click on credit notes.
I reckon a half decent programmer can sort this out over a cup of great coffee if they were made aware of it!
I have a client that is a NFP .
I'm happy to send out all emails from my own address (tom@.
and payroll queries to go to payroll@.
We've introduced and closed the .
- First Name - - Last Name - - Reference - - Current month/year - - Amount Outstanding for Statements - - -
Please vote and comment on this specifically on this thread.
As our inventory items consists of a lot of details required to be added, these descriptions can often be 5+ lines long.
We have as yet rolled out a mobile workflow for our staff, and would love to have the mobile app as part of how we operate.
2) login to PayPal, generate CSV spreadsheet with all appropriate transactions, spend an hour fiddling with columns, date formats, etc.
Why do I have to enter a Total amount ?
Why do I have to enter Qty?
AND HERE IS HOW IT SHOULD BE !
I have a question regarding my Inventory Items.
I sell special cosmetics and they come in almost one hundred colours and each of those colours comes in about five different sizes!
When doing batch payments each month i have to do it in around 3 or 4 batches.
At that point I have to click to my dashboard, and click on reconcile again.
When an expense claim has been submitted (to a single email address no matter who submits it)2.
Currently they go out at ungodly hours of the night.
If I could schedule them to be emailed out at say 10am rather than midnight that would make a big difference.
Cash coding screen doesn't quite cut it because you can't find and match from there.
Could we get an inbuilt calculator in all value fields?
Zoho books has this feature and I love is so much.
Made it easier.
We also transact in Argentine pesos and while you do have the Argentine peso listed as ARS on the currency list, the XE.
com exchange rates are worse than useless because it is based on the official government exchange rate instead of the "street" rate, which is the rate at which small & mid-size businesses can purchase and sell dollars in Argentina.
Can I request a feature to stop potential duplicate entries of expense claims or at least warn against them?
I can CHANGE the date, but I can't select "-" and go back to the empty field that it was.
I'm sure others can think of more.
Tracking of costs per job (or per customer) is a large part of how I forecast my budgets by month and quarter.
My suggestion would be the entire background colour changes when you switch to tax inclusive as a warning.
The movement inside a transaction is terrible, confusing and inconsistent, sometimes I have to click enter, sometimes I have to click tab.
If I choose the wrong one it takes the cursor somewhere I don’t want or worse I have to click the mouse to get it back altogether2.
Input cells starting out with a blue box, and then I have to click enter to input.
All basic things, but all extremely frustrating and slow the process down
We both would have Financial Adviser access and depending on the clients tasks such as locking periods, preparing BAS, posting journals and financial year end can all overlap depending on the client.
We both have access to changing period lock dates and changing transactions.
Even better would be the ability to upload a document as well in the same section.
eg the lodged financials could be uploaded.
Would certainly make my life easier.
There is a number of services that provide some sort of funding such as premium funding for insurance to smooth cash flow.
Much easier that setting up all the manual journal entries.
Ability to consolidate multiple entities in the reporting section would be great.
A custom user setting would be fantastic for this.
I have had experience over the years of many aged receivables/payables, the best ones have the total on the left, followed by current month on the next column to the right and so on.
The reports that have the total on the far right then have the current month on the next column to the left of the total.
Implement the UK reverse charge VAT system for services, and for products.
Having basic perpetual inventory means that the monthly Profit and Loss is much more accurate and to subject to fluctuations in inventory.
So part of the work has already been done.
This topic has been discussed at length already and the ability to capture and record livestock quantity information is already included through tracking categories feature, so this shouldn't be a backbreaker to implement.
For more information about what has been discussed previously please see:https://community.
The forms would then be approved by a manager.
Same for line item payments.
So unfortunately my reporting at the end of the year doesn't show all these figures properly which would be nice.
Its very confusing and clients get annoyed.
I can see that Bartercard NZ is already up and running.
Upcoming AR and their expected dates.
Why do I not have a view, a graph, a something which can show me what is going to happen tomorrow (week, month, quarter.
to my balances?
I believe this field already exists, but is currently hidden (the facility is present to import into a second ref field via text import).
I'm thinking along the lines of Dropbox.
And the revenue (or costs) would turn up in that month.
Could you please implement this or similar into a future update.
In the event of both being set, I would suggest that inventory item has priority (but would be happy if contact has priority).
ie) Automatically enter the amount left to allocate.
otherwise i find the one i want and then have to "untick" the one i didn't want.
I find this very frustrating that you have put a limit of 20 transactions per month on the basic membership.
Would be over the moon if you increased the 20 transaction minimum or got rid of it all together.
Seriously considering moving to MYOB in the cloud.
"My suggestions:-Please save your users a lot of 'trial and error' by linking to a page that provides a list of causes for this error with examples.
I would have found that hint very helpful at the point where the error was first brought to my attention.
I think it may be more useful if it were designed as a sequential numerical reference field.
We work with the local council here and their contract is huge, with a custom price list to match.
This equals alot of manual input and ALOT of room for human error, which in turn makes us look unprofessional and uncaring.
Luckily at present we only have one customer with custom pricing, but at one stage a few years ago we had upwards of 6 major customers with custom pricing, all different to each other.
You can see my issue if this happens again (and it's likely that it will!
This is I hope a simple request.
This includes the date, user and amount, but NOT the reference, which is often the most useful bit of information.
i. e. before approval, rather than having to go to Journal reports to find out.
The one let down staring me in the face at the moment is the invoicing system.
i. e. Freshbooks, Blinksale and more.
Hopefully some of you agree with the above and if so reply to this discussion to make your voice heard!
I currently have to provide a separate spreadsheet showing the info my client wants to see.
Is this already possible or a feature request?
Perhaps this is something the sniper team could look at?
I hope this will be improved soon to provide users with better stock balance control, adjustment and reports.
This would be great for inter-entity loans and quick access to other entities.
Stock that you bought but haven't sold yet, shouldn't show up as COGS.
htmIt shows the following:Cost of Goods Sold = Opening Stock + Purchases - Closing StockI understand that some businesses do stock checks once a year, at the end of the financial year.
I created this screenshot to explain it better:http://i47.
gifThe image shows three Profit and Loss reports.
It shows Purchases, Opening Stock and Closing Stock.
The one concern that keeps popping up over the internet is the lack of a full audit trail (a la 'Sage) that shows deleted transactions in red etc etc.
This is a huge market segment in NZ.
Why run a full e-commerce shop when your a tradesman or provide a service.
with 'Click to go back to the XXX you were working on'.
Right now there are two seaperate threads that appear to be very closely related in the API feature request forum on User Voice.
I don't believe that there needs to be a seaperate Overpayment or Prepayment API necessarily because we do have the ability to create Credit Notes via the API currently.
However, if I type "P" the system won't show any contact, despite the fact that I have 2 companies that have a word starting with P in their names.
Why cant we include PAYG and withholding tax in the current activity statement?
It is, after all, an activity statement, not a GST statement.
I'm trying to figure this out and I don't think it's possible.
We process through Square & Elavon, when the money comes in we (in prior systems and as advised from our CPA) pull that money from a Cash Exchange, individual ones dedicated to each merchant.
Every day we get deposits that we're reconciling and I can create a good set of rules but I don't seem to create a rule that allows me to do a transfer.
If not can it be added as a request?
When preparing the financial statements, we also have to  manually enter the figures in the distribution summary.
When can we expect a better profit distribution summary?
I also needed to do this workaround with the Initial Conversion Balances.
Does it?
It wouldn't even have to bee too sophisticated - even a ZIPed up bunch of CSV files would surely be better than nothing at all.
but .
This is such a glaringly obvious omission in an otherwise beautifully designed system, it seems such a shame.
GST return completed and ready for signing!
It would be great if both totals were to match upon hitting the update button!
Incorrectly added 2011 as the year when should have been 2012.
The history and notes feature is a really good idea.
Why have it then?
Its as though your system architects have never been a CFO of an SME before.
But for this issue I cannot.
Also its visually its easy to follow and manage too.
This would be useful for my German customers.
In many scenarios the product or service is sent or delivered on a specific date.
I miss this from MYOB.
Did I overlook it somewhere?
Your initial response is fairly prompt, but if you have further questions, it means another delay (I'm still waiting for an update on Paypal feed delays).
Unfortunately nobody in the SME cloud accounting space is offering it right now - so it could be another way to stand out!
Applies to dozens of industries, must be tens of thousands of businesses.
Some reports have "blue links" but they dont work.
After all, the global version should be very flexible so that it can serve as many countries as possible without adopting a "one size fits all" approach.
Can they either disappear completely if they were Draft (why would you want to keep them) or be moved to a Deleted tab?
So the vendor is forced to wear the charge.
This certainly would have speed up the process if I could quickly navigate down the lines items instead of physically have to click into every cell to edit it.
Couldn't find much about this in the discussions, only one idea from this post by Brendan:He talked about evernote doing the OCR's of receipts.
as well as there is still no Android app.
I've come here to post a feature request if not already made.
There's such a long list of feature requests to search through.
Be nice if it was clearly visible which feature requests had been actioned eg.
Would it be possible to have a system of "votes" or "likes" or even how subscribers would "rate" a feature on the wishlist.
I look forward to hearing from you.
Would anyone else find it useful to have this information displayed on the manual journal reports?
Did I net positive or negative this month?
Similarly, service providers receive their income net of withholding tax.
Any chance of an extra radio button for the different templates or at least a prompt before invoicing?
in the item dropdown box it would be good to display both the item code .
I have a real estate client who wants to track clientID and Postcode but also Agent name and property value range.
If we could have more than 2 tracking categories that would be great!
I miss this from MYOB
The import failed on those records.
Perhaps there is a workaround and if so, I'd love to hear about it.
Something easy and lovely?
It would be useful if it were dynamic, and you could: - change the tax type estimate between Income Tax for Sole Traders, and Corporation Tax for limited companies - and set the appropriate tax rate in Settings.
- also include Class 4 NI contributions for Sole traders, and change the threshold each year as HMRC update their tax tables - you could switch it off for clients who don't want it
Easily done by making it a multi-selection box instead of a dropdown.
And it should be require minimal work as all information is already available.
It would also be good if this preview good be printed to ensure it does look as intended.
it's the first expense you want to track, I think.
We are currently using Freshbooks in order to us our Authorize.
If it is, that would be very cool.
It would also be a good idea to integrate the forums more completely with the help centre.
2 people needed for a 1 person job.
Would also be useful for contacts that have different delivery addresses.
The ability to filter the list of statement lines to be reconciled would be really useful.
For example, if you're working on reconciling a particular supplier or type of transaction, you have to scroll through multiple pages to find each instance of transactions that match your criteria - if this is over a month or two, it can be a significant amount.
Wow, and what about reconciliation?
Requesting the option to in some way brand each company page.
This is where web-based systems loose steam compared to desktop-based systems, and when that slows down accountants it starts costing money.
I've got two possible solutions to the speed up the last step.
There also is no reason we should have to deal with many transactions, covered by existing Rules, to focus on unclassified transactions.
There should be a Seup Option to apply Rules automatically.
Setting this Option to default to Off will not affect those who want to review Rule results.
However, many will opt to increase the speed of their automated accounting.
If I send a statement to a customer it is because they owe money, and I want to see - and I want them to see - them to see everything they owe without havig to guess how far back to start the search - and also without having to click another date box to get it to show up to today's date.
I cannot think of a single reason why the statement function should not default to this.
However, I have been unable to find the answer in the support so far.
then you have to find your way back to the reconciliation page afterward.
I'd love to see this added.
We really should have information on setting up an SPF record as you are sending out email from our domain
I know the current work around would be to save the PDF and then email separately, but this seems to defeat the purpose.
I realise that I can see this information on the P&L and BS, but it would give a useful overview of the entire situation.
While it is possible to import fixed assets via csv, they land in the pending registration area and you then have to go through each & every item to register them.
Especially if you have more than 200 & they cannot fit on one page.
I  miss this feature from our last software program.
A solution that prevents customers from buying from us is out of the question.
I signed up for Vend thinking that this would be a good option since Vend does keep track of inventory and it is a really nice system.
I've also looked at Unleashed, but I find it to be the most clunky and hideously user unfriendly piece of software I have ever worked with.
I am sure that other people are asking for the same thing so it must at least be on your radar, but when can we expect to see it?
Love the ability to take photo's of receipts.
slightly cumbersome with Android having to manually find the picture but still a great improvement over others.
One last note:  The entry box for text on this Forum/Community post i. e. where I am typing now is only 2 lines high on my Chrome 17.
Particularly, for a particular inventory item, I'd be interested in seeing when we last changed the price, and what the price was prior to the change.
hence the same information would be useful!
HelloI know that with the budget manager you can export to google docs or excel to perform additional analysis, but something I would find really useful would be to have running totals and actuals displayed in one place.
It is more focussed on personal finance and so it does lack some of the budget variance reporting but it does handle everything else fatastically.
In my quest for a paperless office I scan all documents when they arrive by post.
Truly in the cloud.
I've found myself using one more institution lately which is saving me from credit card fees and allowing my to manage finances on the web.
The product is Dwolla.
Also, regarding the developer workshop.
I reckon it would be a good way to get up to speed by watching a recording of the workshop.
Would be good to have this available in the P&L & Balance Sheet layouts.
I know there are some for the date but are there others?
- Copy the line above.
- Copy the field above.
Good for me and my clients.
Plenty of examples similar to the above :)
If, for, example, that popup is sitting over the dashboard, all the info on the dashboard is still visible.
I know I've banged this drum before, but the quicker you integrate with Bill.
Yee haw, dang it!
The first place I always seem to click is the details however which doesn't perform any action.
NET it should not be a huge stretch to port some functionality on to Windows Phone
For example, we run a UK limited company, but we have a French branch.
I'm surprised that no-one else has asked for it here.
At the moment I have to manually edit and type in the extra required email addresses
It would be helpful you could price items in the unit price column in fractions of cents i. e. $0.
051, for 5.
We're currently indicating the Unit of Measure as part of the description.
Currently the fixed-width theme limits this.
Fluid-width theme or full screen mode on more screens including edit screens
Can we please have a cash-based P&L / Income Statement and Balance Sheet by default?
As soon as I try it goes all gaga and refuses to be nice.
Android apps are generally much easier to do than I-thing apps, so why the hold-up?
I provide quotations to customers for many of my services before securing their sale.
Deleting statement lines on reconciliation page only be available to Financial Adviser users,or better still,2.
When looking at BAS, each of the "totals" cells have a Letter/Number.
It would be great if we could click e. g. G11 to see a detailed page of every individual transaction that went into that G11 cell.
I loved the way that quickbooks used to do this.
Quick and easy!
{set a html email with wildcard entries}Send reminder on due date.
Why doesn't it populate with my details as I'm the one preparing the EMPDUPE?
I then download their hours and process the payroll.
It would be great if they come up in the order I’ve already sorted by.
And the hours column should be editable so you can quickly change weekly hours for all employees while on 1 page instead of opening each employee's profile to change their weekly hours.
The 2 weeks notice is tax free, the Annual Leave taxed at 32% and the RDO's taxed as an ETP at 32% (from advice obtained from Aust Bookkeepers Network).
Can't believe this isn't part of payroll :-(
It is current wasteful of space and uses a tiny font.
ALL financial reports should have totals!
The export BACS file here works differently to the equivalent in Bill Payments.
And to get the PAYE figure I have to download and enlarge the P32 to read the monthly total.
The PAYE reference number is on the P32 PDF but is not copyable, at least using Preview on a Mac.
Sage Payroll has a similar facility - the password is set on the user's personal record and known to the user and the Admin, and easily re-set.
A prompt or warning message would be helpful.
At the moment its not setup in a user friendly way.
You have to go through different menubar items and different levels, that aren't in any particular order.
That's confusing for monthly employees who are paid the same amount each month whether they are working or on holiday.
For example, sickness (non-ssp), study leave, bereavement leave, permitted unpaid leave.
This would both act as a record of ongoing absence, and as a trigger for formal leave requests.
It would also be useful if there was linkage between leave requests and the timesheets.
ie if an employee had a leave request approved in a particular period, this could show on their timesheet.
Could still be overridden if they actually ended up working on previously agreed leave dates.
It would be great if I could send my employees a copy of their payslip without having to post the wages as final.
Adding this feature would cut down on manual calculations and the possibility of human error.
I have set up payroll, however the default tax forms are incorrect for the agricultural businesses.
It would be great if the YTD amount could be displayed for each earning type on each payslip - rather than lumped together.
I'm a qualified accountant, and have done payroll for many companies.
When calculating a daily rate for an employee everyone I have ever known has always taken the annual salary and divided it by 260 days.
So we dont have to double enter information?
I have a client that operates with approximately 40 variable hour/day employees.
The number of days/hours per week differs greatly so setting days per week and hours per day is nigh impossible.
5 on another site.
After processing the payrun I print all available reports under the "View Reports" tab.
it would be much quicker and would also save paper!
Otherwise a further manual journal has to be entered to move this out of unassigned because the payroll journals cannot be edited, which makes the automatic payroll journal not quite as useful as it could be.
I think this would make it a lot easier to keep up with the daily work hours.
If this is on the agenda, at any stage, I know it would be really beneficial.
We have multiple sites, and as per our Enterprise Bargaining Agreement, the employees are to receive their payslips in hard copy format each week.
It takes forever!
For instance we have employees at various centres and the centres are the tracking category.
However I am sure there are many cases when it would be desirable to manipulate the data with Excel.
While the approver is suppose to check the timesheets, she would have to sit down and compare all timesheets with manual lists to ensure each employee has selected the correct level.
At the moment we can only allocate tracking to each employee (under employee group) for one tracking category.
This means that when viewing profit & loss and filtering by tracking category, the P&L for one of the tracking categories shows amounts unassigned.
It is never straightforward working out leave as the system automatically assumes the opposite.
It needs to subtotal by Tracking category.
e. g. we have 3 centres and each staff person works in a centre.
Now it sorts by employee first name.
Exporting to xlsx would be very useful, as this sorting could then be done in Excel.
When I do my payroll run, all the benefits and deductions I have set up appear as they should.
Specifically this is for both the employer and employee SIMPLE IRA payments.
The category is used to form the complete the roster algorithm based on award, competencies and labour and leave flash rates that are managed by the Excess Leave Reports.
It is quite simple and would avoid a lot of unnecessary going back and forward to make corrections.
I know you can arrow down on the filing with IRD, but it would be more efficient to have this feature on the schedule so then you do not click on the wrong Start Date for each employee.
When entering hours in an employees timesheet it would be great if their age could come up at the tope so you know exactly what rate to apply.
Would save the hassle of going into Employees to find their age.
com/toolkit/sbg/tax-info/payroll-taxes/payroll-tax-obligations-for-tipped-employees.
This is very important to the tipped employee businesses.
It would be great if both of these were provided.
Therefore, in order to calculate the SGL, this needs to be manually calculated for each SGL line, for each employee.
Single Touch Payroll proposes to streamline the administration of employee payroll, tax and superannuation obligations for employers.
It is proposed that Single Touch Payroll will be available from July 2017 for early adopters; and all organisations of 20 or more employees will be required to start transmitting from July 2018.
Our authority is currently overseas and does not have access to their phone to receive the SMS.
There should be provision for 2 authorities.
We have a company where there are multiple people with authority to approve and we want to ensure that the right person is approving the leave request.
I suggest having a note at the bottom of the leave request that shows who the approver was.
The ATO requires annual electronic reporting for Employee Share Schemes.
especially states that don't have reciprocity.
Only MN taxes are withheld and filed on the employer side.
The employee needs to file 2 tax returns, one in MN and one in WI, but on the payroll side, it is the exact same as if the employee lived and worked in MN.
This is a pretty big limitation for MN since the Twin Cities are so close to the Wisconsin border and a lot of people cross the border to work in Minneapolis, St Paul, and Stillwater.
I know very little focus is given on the global "payroll" but some basic changes would be nice for all of us small businesses under global edition for whom paying for a full-fledged payroll system is not relevant.
Is it possible to see the date a Leave Request has been approved?
It is only the line manager who approves the leave that can do this.
I have recently moved a number of temp staff on to permanent contracts.
If this featured worked working out annual leave of the Christmas break with three public holidays included would have been much easier.
We have largely farming based clients and it would be good to get a payroll system designed for that - I currently am not aware of any systems that do that.
For example they do 3 weeks on and 2 days off so the weekends are all out of whack with working out the days in lieu and stat days worked.
Even showing the Employee's group after the name would be useful.
But, in some situations the # of hours approved is actually different.
It would be ideal to show both the # requested and the # approved.
We currently sync timesheet data from Zoomshift.
Probably providing it both ways would be helpful for those who still print and those who don't.
Similar concept to Super clearing house.
A warning/pop-up indicating someones birthday and requirement for wage change would also be very useful as I have had to redo 4 employees this month.
I have to keep a separate spreadsheet with peoples dates of birth and wage rates.
The legislation is very complicated.
Please advise of a timeline for implementation.
I want to give my Office Manager permission to enter leave requests of all employees so that I can approve them and our payroll clerk (external) knows all leave when it comes to running payroll.
HiI'd love it if we could attach a copy of the employees leave request form or medical certificate in the leave facility in payroll.
Or even on the employee card file.
This takes away to ease of superannuation payments.
Currently UK users have to trawl through all payroll feature requests to find UK ones.
A Superannuation payments reportThese are the same thing, but they suggest otherwise.
Invariably there are always part payments made payroll or payments made on different dates or payments made and no payruns processed.
Likewise with Superannation and Payments made.
(Costa Rica Social Security Stuff)How ever, It would be nice to import all those data from and excel.
That way Excel can make all the heavy lifting of calculating and I will only have to set very specific information.
It could be called "% of hours" or "multiple by hours".
This takes me about an hour to do currently and this would streamline the longest part of paying employees.
Establish an auto sync feature for sure payroll?
To get this information at the moment I have to export to excel then reformat myself.
It would be great if we could have a save and next button when entering employee timesheets rather than having to go back and forth between menu boxes.
5hrsI have several clients who would benefit from this feature.
The amounts due for the insurance is based on exactly how many hours the employees work as reported in payroll, which means no over/underpaying and adjustments for workers comp and its all automated.
I can't readily see myself giving up that feature to save on the monthly cost of Square payroll.
I have now changed the employee percentage to 0.
Employee 2 is on $19.
Gusto has this feature on its payroll offering.
Could you development for using payroll full function in Thailand?
Would be even better if a notification could be sent to a slack channel on the day they're away too!
Please can we get support for regarding UK P11D details and reporting.
These are payments that are made on behalf of the company for example.
It is ridiculous.
Under the headings above, can we have an option to show or not show these items when employees are submitting there timesheets.
If you click the "Save" button the employees payslip is saved BUT you stay on the same page.
I have to fold up the paper & then fold in one side so that it comes across enough to show in the address window of the envelop.
The payroll deductions reduce the PAYG liability of the employee, so the laptop ends up costing the staff member only around $1,300.
There is no FBT liability.
(The software was Quickbooks payroll premier if you want to take a look)
one very frequent feature we used in sage was the ability to check an employees average earnings (weekly) by using the last 12/13 weeks payments.
Why oh why are only current liabilities allowed for deductions?
As such we have a roster system and work Public Holidays regularly.
My concern here is twofold.
Currently it only has a total.
The standard for most Awards is $450.
Working in both the UK and Ireland we have staff i both locations.
50 hours off for a doctor's appointment?
There are a lot inquires from employees who want to know how many hours/days annual leave they have accumulated.
Leave accrual, taken and balance will be displayed on payslips and also on "Payroll/Employees/Leave" screen".
During a year, a client may increase or decrease their subscription depending on the number of employees on the payroll.
It is so handy and efficient.
It would really help if we could get the following reports each month prior to posting the payroll: 1.
For example I run a fitness centre and I have a team member that does say 10 hours reception, 2 classes and 4 Personal training sessions.
for e. g. John smith reception 10, classes 2, PT 4 total 16 hoursJane smith reception 8, Classes 4, PT 8 Total 20 hoursand so on.
I want to remove manual entry and simply run it.
I know have a heap of admin ahead of me .
More space so you can read the longer tracking descriptions would be great too!
this will prompt to keep these details up to date, as it might be often left outdated.
HIWould be possible to have all the details we send out on click siper to be made available to us (Bookkeepers/Accountant) and the ability to go in and change a phone number or a contact person.
Now that HMRC have withdrawn their on-line filing facility for Agents, please would you consider adding a direct filing facility for CT.
The on-line filing of VAT Returns works very well.
Currently if an employee or director has an allowances such as 'meal allowance - domestic' or 'travel allowance - domestic' - you have to record them as a reimbursement.
The ATO classes these as allowances and as long as they are within the ATO specs they are not reportable on the PAYG summary but are earnings   These are true allowances and other software providers give you an option to tick items you feel are not to appear on the PAYG summary.
I have a rejected leave request that has been sitting there for 4 years.
It would be great if there was a way to delete/hide/archive such requests.
One application or addition I’d love to see, would be the inclusion of a signed docket/timesheet setup.
Unfortunately I think she got side tracked and I didn’t follow it up.
Is there such a beast?
I look forward to your reply.
At the moment, it's only possible for someone to authorise all requests or none.
The timesheet approver needs to have access to approved timesheets under the team management tab.
Currently, once approved, the timesheet is no longer accessible unless one is a payroll admin.
I have a client who operates his payroll for two shops.
Our company does direct deposit for all payroll checks.
Their super continues to sit in the superannuation list from every payrun.
It would be great if you could remove this from the list so it doesn't block it up.
This was due to the staff members payslip being emailed to the incorrect spelled email address.
The NSW Fair Trade has advised that there should have been a "fall back plan" to ensure staff have received and if they have opened their emailed payslips.
It would be great if there was a feature available that allows employers to check if staff have received their payslips and/or opened them.
This would keep the NSW Fair Trade happy and ensure these documents are being correctly received and opened.
On your list of counties in Payroll, you have North Humberside, which does not exist any more.
We have an employee paying back a loan.
csv file with the transactions to Reconcile against the original paycheck and the Receive money transaction.
Also, it would be good if you can schedule when payslips are sent.
It's sort of 4-4-5!
Could payroll send alert re National Minimum Wage (or National Living Wage) thresh holds?
If employee has a birthday and moves into the next bracket it would be really useful to know!
for each employee.
If the company has a policy of accruing TIL, only if,  the employee works 30 minutes or more over standard hours, is it possible to re-design the timesheet area and include the following sections/ columns so that TIL is automatically calculated on the timesheet?
hrs = 9 to 5 pm ( worked up to 5:30 PM, therefore, accrue 30 minutes TIL)i. e. std.
hrs = 9 to 5 pm ( worked up to 5:29 PM, therefore, NO TIL ACCRUED)i. e. std.
Could you have the system so that when you enter an employees DOB it calculates the age and shows this next to the DOB?
Currently you have "save and next" and "save".
Auto notification when expiry date is 1 month out.
If I post a payrun and get the message box telling me I have an invalid payslip, why can't you tell me which one it is?
This is handy as my clients don't have to worry about their PAYG obligations each quarter as they know it has been transferred when they upload their payroll aba file.
Either one would be a better solution than changing the opening balance.
Since I have to process ACH payments 3 days in advance it would be nice if there was a delayed email to the employee on the day they are getting paid.
Each employee is paid an hourly rate.
I have a payroll that runs to the end of the month.
Eg: Fortnightly RDO's taken but multiple staff each fortnight.
The timesheet feature only allows for one tracking category.
Changes to a project could be included in this second category.
I know scheduled leave also shows up on the calendar in Payroll overview, but this isn't very helpful at all when you have 100 employees and you want to distinguish between different departments.
Is this in the pipeline?
How about quicker ways to access great functions already there, such as:*  and  buttons on Dashboard.
Saves always scrolling down to get these.
We are finding there are too many clicks to get to these functions.
At the moment we 'hack and slash' the RTI file to reduce it to a readable Excel file and then do the calculations.
It would be very handy (and less error-prone) if we could "Export RTI to Excel (cleaned-up)" from Payroll.
HiI was hoping to have the space available in the Employee Notes section made bigger to accomodate more information.
If I enter the hours in timesheet against the tracking it changes their salary in payroll to reflect this.
It would be great if you could select either "Approve" or "Approve and schedule" when processing the leave request.
If a matrix was available with all employees on a single page then the entry would be more efficient.
this would save you having to click on the entry to see how many hours leave was processed per entry.
5% to.
This also throws out my payroll tax as well.
2 ) of the full hourly amount calculated for Superannuation?
Can you install a tool owing section that shows the remaining amount owing every week.
Although the numbers are correct this looks really odd - any ideas why it is displaying in this strange way and whether there is any way to show it normally now - without retyping all the payslips?
However currently it only has space to allow total shift.
When running payroll reporting you only have the option of one payroll item or all.
Ordinary hours and overtime, but not include allowances etc.
100 characters is extremely short (even twitter is 140 characters) and limiting when attempting to fill in some details regarding requested leave details, caveats, issues and or options.
If you're concerned about database space, or implications, at least increase it to the 255 limit.
Can you change the background color of Scheduled Leave line items so it's easier to delineate Completed Leave and Scheduled Leave?
Please can there be an email template for sending payroll emails.
Since we are project based company and we are using the job costing method in accumulating the cost of each project.
If I didn't understand it we weren't doing it.
I deliberately looked for an Auditor who would 1.
With minimal headache and minor changes (first year SMSF so I hadn't put the right ATO charge amount on) I have successfully completed my Audit.
I got so far in setting it up but then hit a few snags.
(We capture our detail timesheets via a subsidiary application  called Harvest which captures the detail information required for our billing.
i. e Week 1 would include:- Monday 29 June & Tues 30 June as locked for entry of- Wednesday 1 July - Sunday 5 July available for inputWeek 2 would include:- Monday 6 July - Sunday 12 July available for inputetc.
It doesn't appear to be anywhere in the payroll settings.
Currently, there isn't an option to display the year to date values for Earning lines that aren't being used.
I have used earning lines in previous months that are not needed in the current month.
I have tried to set-up the repayment of this advance as a deduction.
This is incorrect and would then further require a manual journal.
Can a separate email address be set up for receipt of payroll online submissions.
I assume that the email address that is used for the receipt is the email address set up in the organisational settings but this is not necessarily the payroll processor.
Can these be linked so we can auto update from employee cards?
For example, an employee with 9% standard and 1% catchup must be reported this way to the 401(k) provider.
PLEASE VOTE FOR EMPLOYEE NUMBER CREDITS!
I've received an urgent request (with deadline) from HMRC for P11 data in respect of one of my employees who is retiring, in order that she can receive her state pension.
Normal hours in hours (or days!
It seems that at the moment I have to translate everything to "Hours".
Why not allow the whole mix of units?
Is there a way to charge charge Employers NI expense to multiple profit and loss nominal codes.
Is there a solution?
It would be really useful if there was an (optional) password layer that could be activated in order to access the payroll tab.
As obviously we are always looking at ways to complete our tasks efficiently, I think this would be a very useful tool.
Keep a record of salary changes on the employee file for reference.
Having timesheet entry on "My Payroll" for employees to enter their hours, and submitting for approval to Managers would be a huge benefit.
Having this available on phones would be "beautiful".
Currently an approver (who is NOT a payroll admin) needs to put in a request with a payroll admin user to retrieve this information.
Once they receive this info they can log back in to either approve or reject the leave - very tedious
Will help with scheduling and rosters.
5 to be used.
This tax rate has to be manually set.
When loading leave requests the leave owing to that employee should be visible on the request page so that it is clear what entitlement the employee has.
For example - if the organisation uses TIL, the approver could instruct payroll admin how many hours (of those worked above contract) to accrue.
I know it seems lazy, but this would be helpful to know immediately, instead of having to look it up if the employee isn't at work that day, and they haven't called in sick yet.
It would be great if it didn't show them there as it can get quite confusing, as in our situation, we have so many current and past staff members.
Is that a possibility in the future?
I am concerned the 40 hour default can confuse some small businesses.
My understanding is that accounting should always be prudent.
I think both defaults should be changed to 38 hours, therefore:normal entitlement for annual leave will be 152 hours default, and normal entitlement for personal/carer's leave will be 76 hours default.
My client recently asked to set up his Superstream.
What can you do to help him.
At the moment we are doing in Excel and adding number manually in the payroll software.
In our case, we'd be happy with API access so that we can set up our own reminders in our task management App.
I was really surprised that we got as far as filing an RTI with this error in the payrun - it's a standard length and format field for every UK employee.
I understand at the moment re-running RTI submissions have to be done manually by the support team so it would be great if we were unable to run a payroll with these type of simple errors in them.
Preferably, payslips should be sent password protected too, another feature to consider.
It would be lovely to look through the Payruns to see if any have been missed for processing.
Ability to write a private note on a payslip for an individual
To give selected staff member's permission to login and enter all employees timesheet's without having access to all the payroll information.
The employee only works 3 days per week.
They do 4 hours a day (12 hours per week)They have taken off two days this month.
8 hours (not 8) as it is assuming that the 12 hours per week is over 5 days.
These are not our receipts or expenses and should not be showing in our P&L.
As the timing of the receipts and the payments to staff very seldom coincide, it is not a good practice to have these transactions recorded in the P&L.
Is it possible to have this as a built in feature in the payroll, once a casual employee is entered as 'casual' can we put in the base rate and have the casual loading calculated and shown separately on the payslip.
•	Payslips can either be in hard copy or electronic form.
The following information must be included on payslips:1.
The employer's and employee's name2.
All superannuation contributions paid for the employee's benefit8.
All loadings (such as the casual loading), allowances, bonuses, incentive-based payments, penalty rates, or other paid entitlements that can be separated out from an employee's ordinary hourly rate10.
The name, or the name and number, of the superannuation fund the contributions were (or will be) made to.
But it's a good idea and best practice to have it on there because it allows employees to keep track of leave balances and can make dealing with leave requests easier.
Yes there is a BACS txt file but that means nothing, I have tried to import it into Excel.
If an employee completes 10 years of service they accrue 13 wks of LSL.
3 wks for each completed year thereafter.
Is it possible to change the layout of a payslip?
This gives silly hourly rates when you are paying a Director an annual salary of &#163;10,600 and, also, how many hours does a director work?
A quick and (hopefully) easy one but vitally important!
Am I missing something, or has this feature not been added yet?
Would be more efficient and beneficial if everything was on the same screen so you could review if better before saving.
Move the Earnings, PAYG, Super.
information to the bottom, its not very relevant while entering individuals pays.
Is it possible to change the default leave settings so it records in days and not hours?
My own part timers don't have set hours, and so have accrued their leave (via Ace) in days and then when it gets paid out it is done on the average daily rate.
To make the database effective it would be good to have cell and land line capability.
"The Email already exists for another employee.
Should be a quick "sniper" coding that on the existing popup, we want all the details that are being submitted to the Australian Taxation Office.
Seems kind of silly really!
This would assist in regards to syncing with HR systems.
Some categories appear to be mis allocated in the general ledger.
The Payroll Expense Journal - PD2 appears to be a link but nothing happens when clicked on.
Instead of needing to hand write it on or export to excel and then type it in.
I've noticed that the payroll overview screen is constantly being upgraded which is great.
Perhaps in the screen that appears when you click 'send payslips' there could be a count next to each employees name for how many times they have been sent.
The payroll administrator enters all timesheets, rather than the employees entering their own.
We've noticed that the entry process is quite cumbersome.
Please allow for Branch numbers in payroll!
If someone has changed address, or telephone numbers, or is enquiring about errors on payslips.
It would be efficient if for each employee you could attach a default timesheet template that loads automatically when you select that employee.
Can we please get this changed.
Based on Fair Work Australia rulings the Standard Week is 38 hours, and its this that should be used as the default for determining Annual and Personal/Carers Leave accruals.
Once the leave request has been approved and scheduled, it also shows in green, the status "Scheduled".
Maybe an idea would be that "Requested" is red, "Approved" is orange and "Scheduled" is green.
Is it possible the have payroll for global customers.
Also the character length is only 50 characters, it is possible that in the future some of the syntax require to be longer than that.
(For Earning Name and Display Name)
It would be excellent if the Payroll Administrator could access the employee's portal to troubleshoot and assist employees with issues processing timesheets.
Employees could also later edit the info from a browser or the Touch app.
Can we please have a full NZ payroll?
Leave that has been applied for or approved should appear on the relevant timesheet when employees are completing the Timesheet.
So the employee can see and as the payroll administrator, so I can see what leave is applied for or approved for the that particular timesheet when approving.
When you a number of employees all with different hours it becomes very tricky to keep track of everyones leave relevant to the hours they have submitted on their timesheet for approval.
Instead Public Holidays should show as a separate line item on the payslips.
That way it can be made distinct from "Ordinary Hours".
Can anyone point me in the right direction for where this is going wrong?
When they apply for leave it automatically prefills with 7.
As another example, we have staff who work 4 days per week.
When they request a week of leave it automatically applies 37.
5 hours and not 30 hours.
I assume this would be a quick process to address and a high priority?
I look forward to your reply.
The Fund validation & Tax File Number validation routine referred to in this Vid ?
At present the pre sacrifice amounts allocated to gross wages.
I would expect the sacrificed amount should be allocated to the appropriate expense.
For example where there is a gross wage of $1200 and $200 sacrificed for superannuation the gross wage of $1200 goes to wages expense and none of the sacrifice to superannuation expense.
This means each month/quarter/year manual journals are needed to correct the allocation.
This becomes more important with other types of salary sacrifice, such as motor vehicles where GST applies.
This would at least allow the credit entry to be allocated against wages.
This would then shows correct gross wages and allow the salary sacrifice expense to be managed separately.
There is currently no way to import these checks, and there's no way I'm hand-entering them two or three times a month.
My payroll service exports as a .
The super reporting is really disappointing.
Currently you do not see the total until you send for approval and then have to withdraw it and start again.
If I've understood the leave approvals mechanism correctly, it appears that a) to approve leave you have to have full access to the entire company's payroll information (have voted on changing that in another thread) but also, there's no way to say that Manager A can approve employee A and B, and Manager C can approve employee C and D.  It's all or nothing?
I frequently have zero rate items appearing on the payroll because an Employee has entered an Earnings Rate not applicable to their circumstances.
Have many SME's who have contractors who are predominately for labour and are not employees but Super needs to be paid.
As I was on the road, maybe something strange happened with my internet connection.
However, if I had a confirmation number I would know whether or not it had been completed.
On parental leave with dates.
An address auto fill and check for Employee Address details.
My suggestions are:1.
I understand I can get a summary for the employee but they have requested copies of all payslips and this is a bit of a narc to do at the moment.
Trying to work around it using the multiple of base hourly rate is far too cumbersome and does not always work with complicated EBAs and Awards.
(We've had to run a payrun and see who shows up with a zero dollar payslip. )
If it could also combine with a batch email out to remind staff to submit their times, that would be fantastic!
Similarly for other Payroll Reports for other purposes.
This would help serve as a reminder for clients to show that they haven't processed their pays correctly.
Would be great if employees could enter their timesheet data directly through the iPad app.
I think you're getting the picture.
Therefore, the numbers do not match my cash-basis P&L.
However because we will exceed the 5 employee threshold we are now required to upgrade to a higher plan, in essence a penalty for having a staff member on maternity leave.
comIs this possible or is it in the pipeline at least?
Super contributions should max out once earnings exceed the MSCB (currently $48,040 per quarter).
Current situation is - SGC will not be automatically reduced when an employee has a salary sacrifice portion on their payslip
Termination of an Employee is currently terrible for paying out leave and easily fixable.
I understand that the non active earnings lines are consolidated to keep a payslip at a manageable size  where an employee has many infrequently used earnings types, but there are a lot of employees who might only ever have 3 or 4 earnings types.
I think that we should have the option in setup to force certain earnings lines to appear on their own line even if there is no current week activity (eg ordinary hours, overtime, personal leave, annual leave).
We have most our clients on Auto Super now.
None of the 'split wage bill' nonsense.
it would be good to store several email addresses in the Employe details.
We deal with companies who employ a lot of backpackers, who often request a copy of their last payslip from each employer before they leave the country to go home.
very similar to the MYOB "Find Transactions" function.
It would be much better if we also had the option of EDITING the timesheet and then approving it.
Often it's only a small change, and it completely stops the payroll if a timesheet is incorrect.
This can be confusing for employees.
I have a client who has a large number of employees and editing their setup involves going in and out of each individual employee to make the changes.
(Alternatively, the ability to export to excel, make changes, then re-import would provide the same result. )
Unit description can be confusing for employees.
We have clients with quite a few casual employees under 21.
- The ability to type the state initials (e. g. NSW rather than the full name) or the full name in the address part of the employee details
htmThere are free software packages that will do RTI but it can't be done through the web browser.
It cannot be removed.
Is this because we simple users can't be trusted to know the difference between a bug and a feature?
So its not an efficient solution as it requires double entry of data
It would be great to include job costing/tracking with the timesheet function
To let me know immediately by email if my Staff Roster has gone over budget when a staff signs out of work.
We have clients with multiple entities and have found that on occasions they move their employment or they are casual employees that work across the entities.
We have employees who can't count.
This will help the approver to see if the employee has enough annual leave to take their holiday.
For example:1.
We have setup employee with annual salary, based of 40 hours work week.
I have recently had several clients having the same problem with tax refunds for their employees.
Can we get the formatting of payroll reports changed from having a big green block - it's a huge waste of ink of any colour.
I find this very handy especially when entries get voided/edited in the multiuser environment where users sit miles apart and you can't ask who did what on a file.
HowdyClient has their employees using the portal to submit leave requests.
Where leave being requested is for less than a standard day, (ie: 3 hours), there is no option for the employee to stipulate this amount.
This has to be done by the approver.
Days on this table would not be counted as leave days.
Does anyone know if we can select only to see our current employees on moving to the payroll tab.
We have many names on our list of employees whom have left the company and I only want to see the current ones.
Can any one help on this, or is it something that is planned for the future.
Will there be a future option coming in the payroll section for adding notes for employees?
We recently ordered custom computer equipment and paid a deposit upon ordering.
We've now paid the balance owing and this 2nd transaction has created a duplicate fixed asset record.
I'm sort of learning as I go.
Is it possible to have the finished unit (an inventory item) made up of all of the components, and when I sell the finished unit, it will decrease the inventory of each of the parts?
clear it as reconciled have to hit the back 2 or 3 times and find another one.
This is quite common in other online service provide (such as Stripe) so, please kindly consider this feature and I really look forward to having this function available soon.
I would check by filtering the date column after and only June dates would appear on the drop-down options, which means I did input the dates right.
One is categorised by one of my tracking categories (location).
It still shows the overall budget and a whole lot of additional data not required for that location.
We have significant bills that were incurred in October 2016 but aren't due to be paid until December 2017.
I thought the BAS statement should be ignoring these bills because I had selected the  method of accounting but it appears they are not?
The system presented a log in box to check I was still here even though I have been regularly entering information.
I am not sure what is wrong and can not fix this problem.
However, I am finding that one of my clients would benefit more from an overall annual budget (i. e. a total budget for the year as a whole) rather than a month-to-month budget.
We are noticing that for some contacts the information is available on the details page for the contact, but on some contact that field is not shown.
Why are some contacts showing it and others not?
for those that don't show it, how to find it?
At this stage I find reconciling the payments a little clunky.
Firstly finding the paint then finding the fees.
Do we have to do a journal each year?
I thought it should sync up until present day?
I have imported paypal transactions through a csv file but it is importing every part of a transaction so I end up with 3/4 lines to reconcile.
I often find that we either missed a group of transactions that should have gone under a specific tracking number or the client decides that he/she wants a number of transactions under a specif tracker.
Surely this is a common task.
Would love some help getting on top of this daily challenge.
But what happens when that transaction comes through?
Do I have to then reverse that particular entry then recognise the money received?
For some unknown reason our Users can no longer carry out some basic tasks that they could do yesterday.
We have tried changing the User Permission but that did not work.
I'm guessing it's for auto completion of contact names  ?
I am a bit stumped as to what to do now.
What would be the best way to handle it, if we want to assign a tracking category to the overall transaction?
I want to do a simple thing.
Some of them show payees but the majority of it doesn't.
When working fast I have closed the browser page.
Hello,When we view or approved employee expenses, we do not see whether the employee has assigned the expense to a customer or not, it would be useful for it to be shown when approving and authorizing expenses.
But that would break the flow of conversation.
Please tell me if this can be done, and how?
Embarrassed other customers are going to see it?
We scan them in using a phone app and upload them to Google.
With this addition, my life will be that little bit simpler and better!
I feel it would be a good idea.
WHERE MY PAYROLL TAB AFTER I PAID FOR MY SCRIBTION
We have two categories, Source and Activity.
Since adding it I have had no transactions even though I have refreshed a few times
Once a Credit Note is created I can remove it manually from the UI.
This may already be requested, but I couldn't find it.
How can accents be entered on a customer record?
I have tested on another client and setup to start using assets from scratch and I have the tax reporting tab on theirs.
At present you can only email a receipt to a client when using the Batch Deposit feature.
At present we have to email to ourselves and the print out.
To give a bit more information we are a small charity so we have an annual budget for the year which incorporates two tracking categories, one covering the amount our funder has given us to spend and the other is the amount we have agreed to contribute to delivering our agreed outcomes.
Once approved all prices automatically go to ex GST price.
We have authorize.
Have I done something wrong?
(it does not appear to have gone down in the past half hour now)
It would be very helpful to recode transactions where the entity needs to be added or changed.
the phone app allows us to quickly accept a transaction type, but it is no clear which entity this goes to.
For example, I want to fly from and between Quotes to POs, or POs to Bills, etc.
I have setup another email so I can send emails from a trading name --------@name.
It seems the only way I have found is to go into the email setting and change the default email setting.
E. G PO0200 and INV0900.
Is there a way to do it?
Our full list of codes is huge so the reports are unreadable.
Currently, it is only guesswork and at the best of times the receipts tend to get lost.
It would be great if the Auto Suggestions in the Payee column could be turned off.
Typing ‘ama' is overwritten by a contact beginning ‘ala’ even without committing the type ahead value.
I made an Amazon purchase (say $1000) and I recorded it as a single Spend Money transaction.
It is very similar situation to this but without the Split option.
I wanted to take some training videos but it is telling me that I am not practice staff.
We have several Brands which we trade under.
We have set up branding theme's for each Brand, and associated with the correct customer.
This has caused us a couple of issues if we forget to select the correct templates.
This would really solve a few issues for us.
The customer statements only show RANGES 31-60 Days.
We want to remove the frustration from you all thinking it’s ‘taken 3 years to do X’, When in actuality, it’s not in active development and can't be scheduled into our plans.
However, we are humans, working hard to develop for a bunch of different people - and it’s physically impossible for everything to be done.
Idea - default statusUnder Consideration - we’ve passed onto the team and they’re thinking about it.
We’ll come back to update with a yes/no once they’ve investigated the ideaWorking on it - in active development, we’ll give an ETA in a comment Done!
You can always see what we’re working on by filtering Community Feature Requests by In short, yes!
However, there’s so much that goes into the prioritisation process, it’s not the only factor taken into consideration.
This way we can track when a customers equipment needs replace if it is under warranty or not.
for example,  15017 shows instead of 15 May 17. not sure where to dig to address this and don't want to edit/whiteout and text fill the pdf's!
Otherwise I have to manually maintain my inventory costs.
I have read what I can and searched the forum but can't find any info on this.
Though it shows me the USD CC in dropt down but is showing it in wrong currency, in CAD.
While it should be USD.
Hence it finds it 'foreign currency'.
So frustrating I can't stand it.
When Cash Coding and inputting the Payee detail, there is an Autofill feature which would usually be great but it seem to overwrite what I put in with something completely wrong.
The first thing many order entry people do is enter the address at the top as they work down the page, enter the few items, and move to the next order, they are not going to read the details at the bottom.
This shipping address should be at the TOP of the page, front and center, not buried at the bottom.
Many order entry people are going to think these "delivery details" are for us, not them.
I've even called out that the items is being drop shipped in caps in the delivery instructions at the bottom and the order entry people still miss it.
For now I am going to start manually entering some verbiage on a line on the top of every purchase order, and investigate how much these purchase order templates can be modified, to stop these shipping errors from happening.
For example, April 2017 with April 2016 and April 2015.
However, when I then leave my computer for lunch, my system auto logs off and when I log back in again I am back to square one with all my reconcilations and it not balancing.
So obviously somewhere along the line it hasn't saved.
So, now that we have the Income Statement properly formatted, we're attempting to create a similarly formatted budget.
but we cannot seem to find a method for doing so.
I assume I'm missing something, so any tips on how to create a Budget for a Custom Income Statement would be most appreciated.
However my colleagues have agreed that it's only 1 contact.
Created a bill and added the various travel expenses2.
Google has  for their authentication app.
Why was the feature removed in the first place?
Factory restored my phone being SURE that this would be a seamless process and bang!
I foresee a lot of angry customers if customers aren't warned and more people switch phones since the last Google Authenticator update.
When I look at my transactions online within ANZ I get a clear page with the name of every vendor or payee clearly displayed.
It could be related to Visa purchases or paywave ?
I've only figured this out because of some programing work I've had done on the API for a customer application.
I’ve bolded three lines relevant lines from below.
However, the API is telling me the date it was fully paid is Feb 8th.
You offer a Excel currrency conversion tool, which fails to work due to the extra colums output by Paypals download despite using the correct comma deliminated option as per your instructions.
I want to allocate amounts not percentages to transactions.
Percentages never work out to the exact amount you want to allocate due to rounding.
It then lists the fees and charges incurred by us regarding the sale (for example: Yard fee, Weigh fee, Transit Insurance etc.
), which is then deducted from the proceeds of the sale.
Lots of info on refunds, but all seem to be outgoing refunds, not incoming.
Edit the bill to include the refund i. e reducing the amount to be paid with a second line negative amount.
My PayPal feed contains transactions from customers all over the world.
Our only financial activity is donations from groups coming in and reimbursements to members (contacts) going out.
In the last six weeks I've had around 100 receipts in Singapore Dollars, USD, Euros, Swiss Francs.
which is where the problem lies.
21 for the FX conversion plus 14.
5p (the FX surcharge) -- in total £5.
42 but shown as two separate transactions.
Otherwise it's going to take me a minute or two for EACH transaction and there are a LOT of them!
I would have thought they would be in the same order as the journal, but no?
Is there a method?
2 and admin .
3Salary code of 400 for this exampleSales - Salary & Wages 400.
But its seems to only work sometimes.
aspxfor example the my voip never remembers each month.
The conversion was carried out by the Jet Convert team.
I have logged into my profile today only to find there's no accounting information at all!
It would be great if they could be matched and reconciled automatically.
3 January transactions, are showing after March, instead of with the other January transactions of the same year.
This then means though that I am accounting for depreciation that is not actually there.
Is there something I am missing?
There are very limited options for narrowing things down and it's a real hassle extracting information and making my own big spreadsheets.
It takes forever since we have about 10 codes for each item we sell.
I’m working to prepare year 2016-2017.
Here is what i'm currently doing:1.
For every Item, change Tax Rate = 15% GST on Income              iv.
For these, we receive  from American Express, with .
On the American Express site I can also easily apply a filter to view charges by user/card.
Does anyone know if there are any solutions or workarounds so that when I look at the Reconcile or Statement feed, I can tell who made a charge?
Thanks, any help or ideas is much appreciated.
I have been a sole trader from April 2016, but it has started moving faster from November 2016.
Also, would I go back and put everything on from the last year?
Essentially I want to print or export to PDF the page I see when I go to Contacts > Customers and then choose this specific client.
We are on a payments basis for GST so I do not entered bills before they are due unless its end of year.
Also, it would be good if we could opt for less dead space.
Again and again and again.
fyi, I'm a huge fan of YNAB https://www.
com/ so I've got that mindset of assigning every dollar a job.
com/support/article/rule-one-give-every-dollar-a-job I hate it when I have a month where my budget is showing a $10,000 net income, but then next month's budget has no way of "using that income".
If I have a "loss" in one particular month, I can put a negative amount in that category in order to "zero out" the budget.
We ask for a 50% Deposit on Order and balance on shipping.
Is there something that I'm missing here?
Display the organisation financial year end date on every page you are working on.
We have a situation where we have more detail in our General Ledger than we want.
This could work similarly to merging contacts together.
Specifically, merging inventory codes that have tracked items associated with them.
It was available last week.
And other people of our organisation have had the same problem today too.
Or temporarily go up a tier before dropping again to the cheaper tier?
I checked out the Chrome inspector and I see this error - screenshot: http://d3fy.
xyz/RWte ("trying to decode an invalid JSON String.
2016-2017 is totally unreconciled.
Here's where my problems come in.
It is reconciled as BF's.
I don't understand the system properly.
I have bills ready to input but a bit worried that my flow isn't correct.
- Workflow management where staff follow procedures and workflows.
- Email management where:    + all (email) communication with clients is centrally managed and visible to staff.
Not always the same, but very simliar.
Someone might have 1000 litres of milk and 500 blocks of cheese one month and the next it might be 1100 litres of milk and 300 blocks of cheese.
I am unable to process payroll for my staff due to Payroll module being down.
It has been down for six hours now.
However I now have a ton of payments in the credit card feed and have no idea what to do with them so that they file away correctly.
They are advising services for free.
HiWe received a government grant which doesn't have to be repaid.
I've managed to upload a logo and have all custon information appear on payslips etc (yay for me).
Currently download the completed monthly timesheet in excel, copy it into a template, save it as, print to pdf, have it digitally signed, send it on.
So I'm at a bit of a loss.
HiI accidently locked my periods for all users (including the advisor).
If so is there a way to fix this or would I have to go back and update each number in there?
The client has the login details, not us at the firm.
How would you have prepared, knowing what you know now?
Lloydslink is a more "commercial" version of Lloyds internet banking.
Look forward to hearing from someone!
I created a whole lot of transactions as 'receive money' in error; they were supposed to be 'spend money' transactions.
Is there a way I can quickly revise it without having to remove & redo then start all over again creating spend money transactions?
"I have already checked the file to ensure that it does indeed contain those headers.
If it isn't there, wouldn't the trial balance not tie upon import?
Attached is a link to the file I am trying to import Thank you.
I tried the lowest 8pt font size.
I've successfully entered in my first inventory order from my supplier, as a purchase order and then as a paid bill.
We are not a VAT registered company so we definitely want to include this amount in our cogs.
Does this happen to anybody else?
Apologies if my explanation is rubbishCheersDan
is not populated.
I've tried this in Chrome and Internet Explorer.
Same issueAlso I've noticed that LastPass (chrome extension) breaks this page by preventing any of the form controls from receiving focus.
I've had one person tell me that it's the subscription price per month per userI've had another person tell me that it's one subscription price per month for unlimited users.
Thinking it would be really helpful to have a notes section within the contact.
I have a few clients who are theatre producers.
I can think of other instances this would be helpful.
Is it possible to create a item that calculates the 12% automatically based on the line above it or a predefined line?
I have now left it on for about 3 hours with no progress.
I know this because in my frustration, I wondered if all services couldn't access Synchrony.
But they managed to iron it out in.
The manual import works without error but I am hitting a mental wall regarding the reconciliation process.
My home currency is $AUD and any income in PayPal is generally $AUD as well.
But for each $USD transaction it's importing 4 line items when it's sourcing funds external to PayPal which I am ok with so you can see where the money is coming from, but it's mixing the currencies and treating the $USD transaction as $AUD (pre currency conversion).
So, even if I create a bill in $USD to match the transaction, it complains about the PayPal item being int he wrong currency.
Where I live, tax rates change by the subdivision.
When I cannot select a pre-set tax rate, I enter an extra line in my reconciliation.
and what are my other options?
Then the generated image still shows a line saying it's 7 days overdue if today was the 8th March
I have searched the forum and can't see this being asked before.
As an accountant and experienced user of most software programs it would be great if you could save your viewing preferences.
Most other software programs have this functionality.
Ie the trial balance to Y/E last financial year or today's dateThe trial balance in code order rather than alphabetical order.
when you click on show transactions it defaults 25 entries, i prefer to see the max 200 and scroll down the screen.
com"The original sender is then blissfully unaware that a reply has been sent.
I have let the client know, who wants me to make the refund.
It’s really frustrating.
Far too many key strokes.
Far too many key strokes.
aba file to work.
Well I checked the settings and added the number i was told to, 165320. still no joy.
I have tried with and without self balancing transactions.
Yet previous year periods allows up to 11.
My financial year started in Feb 2016.
If so, how is it accomplished?
Is there a know issues being fixed or something else going on?
Can it be "turned off"?
So if I want to refund one of these $300 payments I create a $300 CreditNote and make a cash refund on it (As I learned from one of the threads here).
50 claim entered on 1st Jan and paid on 1st Jan.
I mark that as paid 1st Jan too.
However I cannot as there's nothing to match it to.
Then when i start typing it beeps at me every key i press.
If I search for that number I see now results.
can you have the same for prepayments?
Even if I go into find and match it simply does not turn up.
I don't even have an entry, it's as if the sale never happened.
Any help or pointers into where I should be investigating the cause of this problem would be great, thank you!
com/nz/Billable-Expense-AddTrying to follow these instructions, I have added a bill which i want to on charge to a customer.
No substantive reply over the weekend.
The trouble is, I now end up with one transaction being reconciled, against the bill under Professional Fees and under Direct Expenses too, so the transaction is counted twice in my expenses.
Here's a screen shot showing it is showing as Spent Money and as a Bill:http://msmclients.
Is there a way possible to go back and change the amount entered on the conversion date and have it reflect on the continuing entered transaction/balances?
I don't know anyone who uses excel at 150% zoom and the default should be a workable size
The scenario is as under:1.
We have created the necessary CSV file as per the format and it is importing correctly.
kind of defeats the purpose of uploading by csv.
Is there a quick way to do this or do I have to line by line?
Is there a way to import those inventory items that they choose, via a .
When saving CSV in iMac it states some formats etc may change.
Could this be the issue?
What should I be doing to fix this auto amendments?
An ideal would be, when a client accepts an order they are prompted to upload their purchase order PDF and this then is sent to me and stored in documents.
Look forward to hearing back Scott
I set the Fixed Assets start date to 1/1/2016 (the beginning of a financial year - we run on calendar years)3.
I first setup all the assets with their purchase date and depreciation start date the same, and entered an accumulated depreciation balance.
I then went back and change the depreciation start date to 1/1/16 thinking I had misunderstood how it needed to be setup.
This then generated depreciation for 2016. .
but it had wiped the accumulated depreciation therefore opening written down values for every item.
Our auditor is currently reviewing our books and require this to be resolved ASAP.
HiSorry if I have missed this somewhere, but I am customising the Profit and Loss and want to show the Month and YTD amounts (as well as budget amounts).
Month works fine - picks up the month from the date range selection - if set to a month, uses that month, if set to a longer period, uses the last month.
YTD I cannot get to work.
It is unavailable to do that formatting.
I have seen a few people have posted about this but no real answer yet.
I do have so many revenue transactions where the description of the transaction is different but the nature is same - all rental income.
I cannot set up a rule as the description is not consistent.
It would be great to have a feature to apply rule along with the tabs "Match, Create, Transfer & Discuss" .
I primarily sell at art fairs so I rely on Square.
My understanding is.
BUT.
I have tested a bit and see no reason why this would not work.
Please tell me why you believe this would or would not work.
We have off-site staff with debit cards.
We obviously do not want to provide greater levels of access to the staff.
but want to check.
I keep getting the following helpful message: -"Your Yodlee Feed Login Details Don't Match Your Online Banking Login Details" .
I have also tried the troubleshooting tips.
And I know the login details work online, and the online portal has not been down either.
I even tried the "" to see if we had it allocated to the wrong Schwab!
I'm specifically confused by the concept that the debits and the credits in the conversion balances should match each other.
principle - assign to 'SME LOAN'As a result, the latest Balance Sheet shows updated amount - LOAN AMOUNT minus Principle paid.
The credit union says that they only support Quickbooks and Quicken.
Wouldn't the data be the same?
I have a UK company.
I can think of three possible solutions:1.
Revamping 'Expenses' to allow foreign currencies.
00, credit card on 25/1/17.
HMRC have confirmed that 24 hours later they haven't received the return, and despite several attempts to get a response from support, they aren't.
I wish to allow certain employees to log their expenses (billable hours and mileage if possible too) for authorisation.
Ideally using either web and/or mobile app
I have notifications as recent as today (Jan 30) indicating that the feed was updated.
Sometimes it says session timed out.
I've tried re-entering passwords etc but no change.
HelloI am a sole trader and for some of my work I do sub-contracting for construction industry contractors registered under the CIS scheme.
One of our customers uses alpha-numeric PO format, with a .
12 etc at the end as their job code.
it's a bit annoying!
Also, I'm in AU and most of the subscriptions are in USD, so we don't know the eact cost until the exchange rate is applied.
We also sell clothing.
Specifically, in-house we create quotes using Google Sheets.
All well and good.
However, it adds items VAT NET.
This is WRONG according to HMRC if the item is used by me, rather than by the client.
Billable expenses for travel and accommodation must be billed GROSS according to HMRC.
Only "disbursement" expenses (i. e. those elements actually used by the client) can be billed NET of any VAT paid.
I am trying to set up a contact for a company where I do work for multiple departments within the same department.
My email address: jo@prspartners.
However, where it says.
This should happen shouldn't it?
Is this something that is coming soon?
HiDue to a random coming together of planets at the HMRC we have to make a 6 month VAT return instead of the usual 3 month return.
I have an example of 3 transactions that I can see on one of our credit cards in our online banking dated 10 November and 2 on the 14th of November.
Can someone shed some light on this?
When i save my payments in a batch they are ordered by contact name.
I started my company in Nov 2015, but accountant listed my first financial year end to be on the 31st of December 2016.
Accountant mentioned I should not have any retained earnings for the first financial year.
Did I miss a step or key something in wrongly?
We do not want to ask the client to provide an exported list, as this will totally inconvenience them.
Is there an easier way?
I feel we are going about it the wrong and creating extra work for ourselves.
We recently decided to change our reporting currency from Mauritian Rupees (MUR) to USD.
I thought it would be a fairly painless procedure, but needless to say, it wasn't.
From there steps 3, 4, 5 as usual.
It doesn't I don't think.
I am willing to re-think the process to accommodate how it does work but am struggling to.
Is there a tutorial I missed or a step-by-step that shows this?
There is a bug since an update sometime this year.
Internet explorer doesn't render PDF files, does anybody else have the same problem?
Often we have expenses (eg.
taxis, hotels, airfares) which we charge to clients at cost.
Example is a house rewire when I quote for a complete rewire I end up send my client 7+ pages of costs for individual items.
I then have to roll to bottom of the sheet (another small nuisance) and lick End >>.
It should display the most recent transactions first - surely most users are interested in the most recent ones.
I have a shipping charge as an inventory item (is there another/better way to do shipping charge? )
and I don't want that line item to appear on the packing slip.
this goes on and on.
It's really holding my work up now.
Looking for direction on this query.
What can I do to show all transactions in their respective currency?
I can't work it out.
On the occasion we receive an overpayment or have to refund a customer for any other reason, it really would be useful for it to appear in the "Awaiting Payments" list.
Should be Owner Contribution but I can't set up the currency.
HelloWe have invoiced a client and charged VAT and this bill has been paid.
This was a couple of months ago and have already submitted our last VAT return.
Is that wrong?
Is that right?
All I have to do is hit OK on the reconcile screen.
Lots of clicks.
I set up a Fixed Asset and set the Purchase Price to $70,000, however I don't see this on my balance sheet, why?
For the mortgage, I entered a Manual Journal entry as follows:Debit: 1000 - Rental Property (Fixed Asset): $56,000Credit: 2701 - Rental Property Mortgage (Non-Current Liability): $56,000On my Balance Sheet it shows 'Rental Property' as $56,000 instead of what I would expect which is $70,000 - $56,000 = $14,000.
HiI have a bill from a supplier.
Due to their own mistake they took only half the value on our company card (I thought our luck was in).
The following day they realised and took the other half.
HiA receipt was entered in error when in fact it should have been a Bill.
The bill was also entered.
The receipt was claimed as one of many in an expense claim.
Meanwhile the amount was correctly reconciled via the bill.
I've deleted the line transaction and reimported the line twice and it's still showing as a debit.
It isn't under purchases surely?
Been attempting to import 3.
This was an interesting learning curve and the balances now match.
Before I could realise (and I clicked them!
Why are my Rules being ignored over matches?
The sample import CSV file has a column TaxType.
I've added "0", but it's being ignored.
Apologies if this has been covered loads of times before!
Is it possible to show on the dashboard a running total of the PAYE/NIC conts and VAT owed to HMRC?
The only fix I can find is to go into each imported credit memo and mark both the quantity and unit price as positive values.
This obviously defeats the purpose of importing the credit memo in the first place.
Anyone else have a method to import credit memos that will yield a memo exactly as it would appear if you created it via the website?
”  has been quoted (there is a bar and change of color).
As I say, this is present in all my email messages.
The amount outstanding of $USD 229.
50 is due on Jan 23, 2017.
com/cvIUIUOIKEJDAK6FukTRFDi5ozXv0GXj9DCsh|>From your online bill you can print a PDF, export a CSV, or create a free login and view your outstanding bills.
This seems to be an ongoing iassue since recent outages.
I see the little spinning wheel on the save button letting me know its trying but it never stops spinning.
My only escape is to hit the X in the top right corner.
Where is it connected?
Why can't I delete that "connection" and start again?
, i. e. install the Google Authenticator app onto a 2nd apple device?
We all lose smartphones.
It happens.
A backup option is smarter.
I have the Google Authenticator app on one device, my iPhone.
I was not confident that I had located the correct procedure and was concerned that I would lock myself out of the system if I messed things up, so did not proceed.
NewLight Africa sells solar lights and other life-changing products to families in rural Africa under the Heya!
Approximately a billion people still live off-grid without access to light and power, often replying on dirty and dangerous kerosene.
We've sold 30000 products in our first year and a half of operation, alleviating poverty and reducing climate change - and we're super ambitious to grow further and faster.
com for more information
but nothing else.
We recently lost a customer & a decent bit of revenue due to an unfortunate incident which occurred on 29 November 2016.
Thankfully, it seems to be an isolated instance.
No surprise here.
Interested to hear if this has happened to other users.
(ie outside of scope for VAT).
The VAT return to September has been reconciled and submitted already.
I've never come across this scenario before and I'm now doubting myself!
Does anyone have the correct workflow they can share?
, nothing is coming up.
Grateful for a more automated / professional solution.
or do I reconcile this amount when I refund to the customer a similar amount ?
To have the ability to enter within an input field a formulae.
Hey All,We are trying to work through a reconciliation.
Not sure what is going on.
HelloI am having trouble using the budget manager.
If I then go back to the saved budget, lines have either been deleted or duplicated.
I have checked and double checked their email address and it's correct.
I have also found that it is importing more lines than before, doubling up on some transactions.
That is irrelevant at the moment as once I decide on the import options and try to save it says theres a problem.
This is the last straw.
The last high-priority panic email I sent was three days ago and I still haven't heard back.
The above search returns between 700 and 3000 replies.
Smith case of Jones, Smith case of Wilson, Smith case of Thomasor something else?
As a result I have double paid my supplier.
If someone could help me, it would be greatly appreciated :)
AT least i can remove and redo easily - that feature is great.
HiI've logged three calls and noone has replied.
My Paypal feed is not working and this is about three days now .
I had a random download after a day or so and then since then nothing.
have used DPS for processing USD credit card purchases for the last 7 years.
We get a lot of deliveries creating a lot of bills from 1 company.
I have stupidly published a forward VAT period in error and I'm not sure how to correct it?
If I delete the published one is the data lost or merely reinstated to the VAT calculations?
That's the easy bit.
However when I am trying to reconcile my Money Received with prepayement Loan or Legal Fees then these do not seem to be getting picked up.
This would be great to provide extra context around the current year numbers.
I have thousands, so clicking into each on and selecting remove and redo is not a viable option.
I can't find it.
Also, really missing the option to put a customer on 'hold' / 'stop'.
ie is there a way of selecting which company it goes to when you are sending it from company B.
I have now received a refund of my overpayment.
I also have the same problem with someone who's overpaid me and I've refunded them!
What would be my next step in tracking these down?
Receiving a canned response every few days is an unacceptable level of support.
These have been approved and paid already.
This is done by clicking on the down arrow on the branding theme and selecting the option “Custom.
The choice can make a big difference when it comes to percentage calculation.
My real question is around sending more than one document to one email address, for example sending a husband and wife's tax returns to one email address for e-sign.
Does anyone else see a security risk here sending two tax returns to one email address then for e-signature?
Alternatively, to EXCLUDE by Contact group would be helpful too
I have email Support I am still waiting for a replyAnyone else experienced the same ?
I have downloaded the app on my android, however it will not sign in?
I have also restarted the app, restarted my phone, and uninstalled and reinstalled the app.
error that is coming up after entering login info is "Something went wrong.
"Green" reconciled button could then be pressed.
This is from 30th September.
I have a client who I've developed a client side stock management system (SMS) which replaces MYOB EXO.
I made an earlier request that the balance sheet correctly showed fixed assets above current assets.
pngIt's only happening with a few purchases, but none of them were refunded.
Let me give you an example:I purchased a lens filter for £71.
64 including VAT from Amazon.
The VAT included in that price amounts to £11.
Now, I can't reclaim the VAT back from that purchase as it isn't over £2000.
My bills imported fine from a CSV file, but when I 'approve' them I get the above message.
Here's my request.
I received this message this morning when trying to access Reports.
All else seems to be working fine.
I cannot seem to find an easy way to fix this and as a result I have had to resort to importing transactions via a downloaded statement.
However even on the statement, unless I mark amounts as negative and positive, it continues to import transactions where we have spent money as being transactions where we are receiving money.
We have had it working quite nicely before but recently they changed their login process!
even my BAS looks strange, no G!
My company has two EFTPOS machines.
So it is showing up on the reconcile page even though it was never officially spent.
In fact, it doesn't even deduct 0.
11 rounding, it did the calculation, but that the bill doesn't balance.
I have a problem I can't see a way round.
We had one project where we worked for a US customer and used a European based contractor to do the work.
Doing my my BAS and it isn't working as I have those double payments from clients,Any ideas please?
Therefore there's no quick way of dealing with a backlog when reconciling if you're on the VAT cash scheme.
I was really surprised this functionality was not already working for spend and receive moneys.
My hope was to automate the matching using the reference - sounds fair right?
Try again by going back to your previous page.
If the issue continues, check out the Help Center.
QB allows us to manually enter credit card information and charge customers directly (e. g. , collect a deposit/advance).
Currently I do that manually by calculating VAT for those suppliers who charge VAT - but some suppliers deliver mixed goods, some including VAT, some not and then a simple calculation does not work.
The help says for the detail lines we should only include the relevant information on the detail.
We get seemingly random errors telling us the Contact Name is required on this line, or that line - whether we put the Contact Name on the detail lines or we don't.
I'm using VBA to generate the file, outputting the worksheet as csv.
no option for attaching photos.
Not the case with these ones.
Is there a way of copying these across simply?
I added them in again as bills, but then there was a double up.
At present there is no simple way of correcting this.
Basically the only thing that changes is the date.
Ideally this would have data in it.
Here is my situation:A student receives a $15,000 scholarship spanning three trimesters.
Trying to process payroll and cannot get any further than the draft - unable to open the individual employees?
Stripe charges 3%, whereas a BACS transfer is free.
I only want to offer the option if I know they don't want to bother with BACS.
Or do they all have to follow the default?
If I could have a list of credit notes that are active, i can hound the vendor to provide me with a credit no ref no.
, and they can actually put it on the statement.
Not only have they not added the feature they have also made it even more difficult to delete them.
I've added a few formula rows to some groups, which work nicely, but they appear REALLY BIG AND BOLD and I don't really want them to.
we have been down here for over 30 minutes.
Any more tips for me before I make the big switch?
”   No indication of timing of fix and no response to email requesting timing for fix.
What I am now left with is two transactions ($282.
50 and $1900.
Is this possible, or a suitable workaround?
This disappears after changing the bill reference to be unique, but if changing to another reference that also exists, the error remains (also correct) but does not update.
Is there something else im doing wrong?
My year end was set as May end but that cant be it as we have no transactions showing for juneThanks in advance for any help
To make matters worse, if we export data directly from Lloyds to .
4 due on their separate due dates, e. g 30/4, 31/5, 30/6 etc I found that the may and june would show on the 30/4 statement as current even thought not due yet.
I hope this is the right forum to ask for help.
I'm doing my first VAT return.
This behaviour has existed since first reported 2 or 3 years ago.
The line from support thus far has been to note the request for an "enhancement", but to say that no further work on matching is planned.
The following images make it clear.
Documentation says that matching is based on date, amount, and then name (and support have said date, amount and reference).
Hello here.
• Adding receipts on the mobile version works great and then you get to the desktop version and it's laughable• There is plenty more but my fingers would start hurting from all the typing.
Traditional accounting and accounting standards take income less expenses to get to profit before tax, then a tax line to give net profit after tax.
For ExampleIncomeLess Direct costsGross ProfitLess overheadsProfit before taxTaxation expenseNet Profit after tax
We're on UTC + 1 so this may be a timezone issue.
It would be great if there was the option to exclude Inactive Items
I have been creating a customized .
I have seen that people have managed to complete advanced formatting for the «TableStart:LineItem>> table, where every subsequent row has a different format ie.
Different background color to the last row.
I currently make this an item description and leave the other fields blank.
Has anybody come across a way to specify the last row of this table to be formatted differently from the above rows?
I have spent ages searching the guides and got my self into a muddle.
Here goes: 1.
I have spent ages searching the guides and got my self into a muddle.
Here goes: 1.
Of course without these details it wont save and reconcile.
(She is not from an accounting background at all).
The codes are not consistent either so her P&L BS is nonsense.
I want to run a previous year to ensure that all b/fwd figure are correct.
It creates a contact code against each customer.
Very strange as I have the correct email address and have not ticked the option for me to receive them?
It would be very useful if we could attach documents to a contacts details page.
We work with a customer whom we work on several different jobs.
This resulted in there being double stock (Eg 4 instead of 2).
00CR, instead of 1,590.
I therefore had to manually correct in the email.
We were sent a cheque for this cancellation.
It is normally under the reference.
There is $560 remaining which was not used and I can now keep since it wasn't used within that year.
This is so I can claim in the next period.
- The comparative balances have been entered as at 30 June 2014.
Is this software down twice a day?
Its a big job for my latest bookkeeper (the previous two were not up to the job.
I have set up the Tax Rates accordingly.
Everything has been working fine for years.
But from what I see it still is an option.
Is there someway i can get it back?
We are in the commercial hygiene industry, i. e supplying hygiene dispensers and consumables to hospitals.
Our supplier provides us with all of the hygiene dispensers at no cost in order for us to pass these on to our clients on afree-on-loan basis when the client sign a 2 year supply agreement with our company.
The supplier ultimately remains the owner of the dispensers.
The problem I am having is keeping track of all the dispensers and the client locations, etc where they have been installed.
I have looked at possibly using the fixed asset register and manipulating that to suit my needs but it may not be an ideal solution.
For that transaction there are then PayPal currency conversion fees and PayPal transaction fees.
When I create transactions - when I reconciliate - from these incoming statements I still don't find these transactions through "Find & Match".
What's going on?
Is it possible to copy companies' details from one to the other?
Some clients often transfer money to us for fees payable by them.
The tax is coded automatically but the interest income isn't, even though it is the same every month.
Some of the areas Andre will cover include:* Point of Sale* Inventory* Workforce Management* Staff Rostering* E-Commerce
Also, they have different categories in the old system, I'm guessing as long as it goes into a similar category or equivalent, it will be fine?
By default I see the graph "Total cash in and out" on the dashboard which is pretty useless (it doesn't show any numbers and doesn't even display a full year).
How can I show EBT (earnings before taxes) or EBITDA (Earnings Before Interest, Taxes, Depreciation and Amortization) on the dashboard?
I switched from a single-member LLC to Corp (in USA).
aba files on my tablet from back in May .
From what I read, this can be done through manual journal.
Or is manual journal the only option?
If so my contact list will very quickly become crowded.
Is this already a feature or can be be done?
Note that both contacts have financial information.
I can easily do an export and merge but the finacial stuff is the problem.
Im hoping someone here can help me out quick smart!
Surely this is a glitch that needs to be fixed sooner than later?
Has anybody else had this problem or has a solution to it?
The auto suggest feature then matches these.
Based upon the few transactions I manually reconciled.
I do not want to turn off auto-suggestion as a whole.
It would be good if there's an option to remove the due date function in these scenarios.
I hide it so it doesn't come up while visiting clients.
Has anyone encountered the same issue?
Is it maybe under a different name?
See here: http://d.
Logically, it would be attached to Client Profile to improve debt control.
If this isn't an "appropriate way"  of doing this, I'd be interested in knowing the accounting reason why.
It enables me to pre populate the text for each of our customers we have long standing contracts with.
HOWEVER it would be good if I could format the text.
i. e. so the HEADER is centered?
and text below?
Is this possible or is the only way around it to Input a header separately?
The deposit is then refunded around week later.
So in essence I have say £300 paid out in one transaction and then £200 paid back in a separate transaction.
The rule works and applies everything else besides the tracking and leaves this part blank.
I’ve got returned money from travel reservation.
I have employees and have been paying payg and gst.
I figure it's probably somewhere but cant find it.
We'd be very interested in hearing how to handles the local variety of electronic invoicing and so on.
Is creating a credit note the way to go?
This shows online but im printing to send by post and it is causing many problems and confusion.
I'm not sure why the Chef setup two companies.
I believe that she would be invoicing her clients from both companies.
But from a bookkeeping standpoint, I consider this one client.
HiIs there somewhere that I can access previous quarterly BAS records/reports that I have already lodged with the ato?
It's the WFM that has made him look at other options out there because of the limited capabilities.
HiXero is truly fabulous.
This is a very handy feature in MYOB.
At this stage one has to remove and redo, edit the transaction, and mark as reconciled individually.
So in the Manage Transactions window, alongside the remove and redo, there should be a reconcile all ticked transactions as an option.
For example: 1 widget @ $160 + $15.
09 totalSo in my CSV i have $160 for the UnitAmount and $15.
Is it possible to provide some reassurance or certification along with the e-mails and links to avoid these questions and provide confidence for clients?
This is mainly to track their cash flow and debt repayments etc.
However, they also have a portfolio of share/managed fund investments.
I've tried many alternatives, searched  this forum and google.
When entering an overpayment from a customer, I get this error:* Overpayments must have a tax rate of No GST.
I have not had a problem entering overpayments before.
We overpaid a supplier who we no longer trade with.
How do I reconcile that entry when I have nothing to allocate it to?
It's doesn't show the company/contact name either ?
Some products I am not selling anymore have a zero quantity on my inventory but still have a slightly positive or negative value on my balance sheet (few cents each).
As I cannot reconcile a Credit Note my reconciliation doesn't match.
The Payee Name Recommendation understandable is a good consideration.
It slows us down.
can we we have this option turned off.
Should it be reflected in opening balances?
The request has been terminated.
also showing any and all deposits paid and the dates they were paid
This also means my liability totals are incorrect.
For example - we have many fuel suppliers.
And then reconcile the payments, of course.
it asked me to fill in 5 boxes.
In creating my Fixed Asset Register, Equipment and Vehicle transactions appear in FA drafts.
However, Computer and Office Equipment are not showing up in drafts.
It now gives an error when I try.
It was correct at the end of June but has dropped at the end of July.
We used job numbers in MYOB to separate different entities.
Its seems to be working really well.
I have a tenant that I took a deposit from £600.
He subsequently left abruptly and I have to refund his deposit.
Is it at all possible to insert format for amount which includes currency symbol i. e. &#163;,$.
I have manually imported data before so I'm pretty confident I'm doing the right process.
So bill $2000 -I paid her $1500.
Which is the best way to book/record this?
I have my C/A Shareholder setup as current liability.
It's been working fine for months now, except today - 1st July it's not autogenerated etc.
I've done "landed costs" calculations in Excel and can accurately tell how much items I sell cost me, including GST and shipping.
Of course, customs stopped the shipment and charged me, let's say, NZ$ 150 in GST and fees.
Hence, my cost of goods sold are: USB stick - NZ$ 13 SD card - NZ$ 16I don't quite understand how to tie it all together.
Lump all purchase orders, including all orders, shipping, GST and customs into one huge bill and then make several payments to it?
i have come across an issue that i don't know how to deal with.
I can only see this in files that I made it a favourite.
I know they were there a couple of months ago!
We obviously don't want to be micro checking every detail as it defeats the purpose of using software.
I loved this graph and it was a real performance indicator for me.
See graph here - https://db.
We paid 800 dollars to the college from where we organise there qualification and they dont charge us the GST.
Find and recode timing out.
All 11 staff in the office have been having this issue using Chrome over the past month
There's no magical number here.
Some requests have zero votes, but are still implemented as they're a great idea.
We'll update you when we have an update to give - so as to not bombard everyone's inboxes.
But the gist of it is that we can't do everything at once, and we have a lot of different people requesting different things.
The age of a request doesn't necessarily push up it's priority.
We still have a bunch to do - eventually we'll get there!
Sometimes we look to solve more than one problem at once.
So instead of making a bunch of small additions along the way, we'd rather make one big improvement - which can take a bit longer.
Not everything has a feature request though - and there's a bunch of other projects that we haven't necessarily shouted from the rooftops about.
Community's a forum, primarily for peer to peer support.
There's no fun for others if we answer everything!
If you've a burning question, you can , and when you get your answer make sure you update the Community :)
Now I want to debit supplier and credit customer through Journal.
Id rather do it by the day.
Hello there,Unfortunately a message you sent could not be delivered to one or more recipients.
org/best-practices/ip-reputation/ for more information.
I can make the column blank out successfully but I cannot grow the description fields to push the qty and unit price over so it leaves a gap between unit price and amount where the discount used to be.
it is obviously achievable if it is done in the standard branding theme
We recently made a purchase from a supplier which was subsequently refunded.
The original transaction was recorded as spent money and then 2/3 days later was refunded.
And question 2. .
Is there a known issue?
I am trying to enter my bills relating to the purchases of inventory.
For example: Shipping costs, custom duties etc.
I have no idea why, I have checked everything in the CSV and it all looks correct.
Is anyone on here experiencing the above problem.
I have emailed support and am awaiting an answer but was interested to see if I am suffering alone
We have over 100 products that's customer buy weekly or monthly.
I reconciled in muscle-memory mode before I realised that the two missing entries weren't there.
I've tried various flavours of details but it never saves.
For example, I rent out indoor plants that I charge weekly rent, so If I put description 1 plant in decorative pot at $xx it show the price for that item, but the way my contracts are structured we calculate on weekly basis but charge monthly.
So $10 per week needs to be invoiced as $43.
I have followed the guidelines to clear everything, tried different browser, however I cannot get back into the file.
No company logins will work and no possible way to finish the work I was doing by tomorrow.
Is there a way you can simply remove quantity and go with description?
I have a problem I am unable to figure out.
Had a vendor charge our credit card incorrectly and they later came back and issued a refund.
I am running the TPAR for a client and they have quite a lot of credit notes applied to purchases.
I went on Chase to download OFX / QFX / CSV statements from before that date, but Chase tells me that it only can do that for transactions in the past 24 months.
Or is there another way?
csv file, but when it gets imported it's swapping debits for credits and vice versa, which is mucking up my accounting totals something fierce.
Not sure how to fix this.
Also my ledger is out by few pence and tried everything to find the difference but having no success I thought i'll ask for tips or advise here.
Can you please list your good and bad experiences?
and on the statement not to have a due date column.
Save these draft reports somewhere and then email a URL link to my department managers so they can see what their tracking categories are up to, without having to look at all of the others (again a win for QB).
Have i missed something?
E. g. can I set it to show the tracking categories I have set up?
The Dashboard says this:Balance in Xero21,886.
68But the statements page says this:21 Jul 2016	Debit			XXXX 			469.
Im wanting to run regular reports which will show what my expected earnings will be for each month.
Right now we are trying to reconcile the credit card transactions and we have a question.
It seems inconsistent, as some 'spend money' transactions seem to have been reconciled ok, others not.
Would love to know how its going.
So, the possible solutions appear to be as follows:1.
Should i reconcile them items or remove them?
Our data starting from 01/05/2016.
The cheque was only cashed out mid May.
I want to edit the name of a group that I have created.
19 but they only charged me 88.
Now they've sent me a credit note of 70.
A few people have had this problem but I have not found an answer, can someone please help.
opening and closing balances show 0.
However, each of the start/end balances says "0.
I'd find it really useful if it contained the actual balances in those columns.
Standard users don't get the option to print to PDF.
Is it possible to track an advance paid to a supplier with the relevant purchase orders ?
Every article about it talks about the benefits/ what the role can do - none talk about how to get it.
I saw an article on this community and the bloke said do it through the profile - however, I don't see any options to be an adviser role on my profile.
I have a question hoping someone can help with.
I have created 2 groups of customers so I can identify which workshop etc has what outstanding balances and so I can then print off the correct statements (both have separate templates).
I want to change over to a direct feed with Natwest.
and will anything reconcilled be affected with this changeover?
Will I have issues doing this?
Going along normally then bang 2 July imports from 7 June to 27 June again.
As it, it's about 3 clicks from the dashboard.
I only get this error from templates held in the drafts folder.
Works fine on a computer using Chrome but not on an iPad using Chrome.
Also works fine using Safari on an iPad
Many times the text I entered in the (um, second) reference field (the references fields in the body, not in the deposit header) was not saved.
Of course there could have been cash and CC payments as well, and I would have to look in those two other places to find those as well.
Im trying to import the last 3 years of bills.
slightly more doable as there are only 60 or so, but its still tedious.
i could only set my calculate fixed asset date to this year, so i have to manually enter the depreciation of each asset for the previous years.
surely there are less painful ways to do this, why cant i set the date to 2013 and have it automatically calculate everything?
On page 2 it starts at 1.
Look forward to finding a solution
The document is then marked that it is associated with Spend Money.
He advised to process as a non cash journal.
To Debit Asset for each vehicleTo Credit Beneficiary Loan (Liability)I cannot find anything about non cash journals.
The ultimate goal is that these vehicles appear in balance sheet as a fixed asset.
I have click send payslips and they are not arriving?
For example we have a supplier who has approx 20 outstanding bills in USD.
Does anyone know how to set the voucher to have 1 line for each reference number?
It would be nice if you could actually have a field where you could manually enter the reference in the rule.
Easily doable by having an execution field that shows the order of execution.
This then makes it easier to replicate the layout of previous similar rules.
Although there will always be 'odd' transactions, we are trying to quickly deal with the bulk of the transactions quickly so that the human can make the correct decision about the rest.
How long for.
For example, we could take payments of 16.
00 & 1500.
Can anybody think of a workaround before I chuck it out of the window and head back to Sage?
Our conversion for a client has gone wrong.
Feel we may have a big operation to fix this mess.
I have a refund from a supplier on my credit card statement as the supplier was paid by internet banking and also by credit card.
I am trying to reconcile the credit card statement but do not know how to handle this refund.
Are you aware of this problem and can there be a solution?
I mean we are in the automated age are we not?
I'm adding line items in an expense receipt and one of the items is a web offer discount.
I want to represent all of these line items on the expense but I'm not sure how to properly.
We run our operation in project form.
Currently we have to xfer to Excel which means deleting non-required items and then finishing up with a spreadsheet which prints out on 3 pages.
Very messy and is ridiculous.
However, my main issue is with the Read Only role.
At our company I want to give the Read Only role to our managing director.
But with this role he cannot submit Expense Claims.
Anyone that would have this role I imagine would be a fairly high up employee, as in our case the MD, and therefore require a other basic functions employees have such as Expenses Claims.
So we have a few users and pretty simple expenses.
Looking for help with best practices processing bills and monitoring unpaid bills.
This makes difficult to see which bills needs to be paid as these already paid bills are showing up in the unpaid bills list.
Is it possible to print the activity list produced when drilling down on the Contacts tab to individual contacts.
Does anybody know a way this can be done?
-----An error occurred during a connection to my.
SSL peer rejected a handshake message for unacceptable content.
HiI have had a query from our client when identifying a transactions appearing yesterday but dated 16/5/16 $304.
99 which is totally incorrect.
99 and has already been processed.
Its hard to give the client confidence in the system when this occurs.
I've tried doing a credit but then it won't reconcile as the amount paid was 222.
So it wants to reconcile the 13.
Changing quantities and deleting unrequired items.
The same applies to the licence types that I sell.
I reversed the order of the transaction lines (out of interest) and that did not fix it the issue.
Surely it would make sense that the order of the transaction lines in the spend money would appear the same on other reports?
Can we have it opened again please?
I'm not sure I understand how starting leave balances will be entered if there is existing Payroll transactions.
I'm wanting to give them a fresh start from 1/7/16 or possibly earlier.
)The payroll is a bit of a mess with incorrect leave calculations, weird set up of salary sacrificing etc.
16 to 30.
16 to 30.
OrIs there some other easy way to edit the contact person name?
CX0003337308 Lets see how long it takes "support" to respond.
We track and sell in single unit quantities for most items, but we typically purchase in case quantities.
I did see , which I have voted for as we sell numerous product bundles too, and that would solve both problems nicely.
It all feels very limited.
However, it doesn't show a column for the description.
com with the date and amount.
It would be helpful to see if that transaction was for pencils or coffee for instance.
We have had a couple through so far and have approved and authorised them but I imagined they would then show in the "you owe them" column on the contacts page but they do not.
Could you advise if there is an easier way of doing this please?
I want to clear all balances reconciliations and start again.
I've done my best to go through as much as possible on the software and Ive jumped on in and attempted to swim along.
However, i THEN found out / noticed I needed to enter in starting balances etc etc to begin with and I basically didnt do this.
1/ Ive basically done the following.
We don't have a multi-currency plan as since Amazon has moved to charging in AUD it hasn't been necessary.
There does not appear to be an option to change their billing methods.
My understanding is that even with a multi-currency plan (out of our budget) you can't handle multiple currencies in a prepayment anyway.
I was hoping someone could help me out, i'm trying to reconcile with last nights balance and last nights feed however its about &#163;20 out.
I want to check im doing everything right.
The two non-ideal ways I have identified so far:1.
Not ideal when you have 100+ customer balances.
This way is probably marginally better but is still pretty clunky.
We received a remittance advice from a customer who claimed to have paid their bill via credit card, but we do not have our system set up to receive any payments online or via credit card.
I have a difficult situation to record a transaction.
Here is the situation.
But somewhere I think it's not right.
It means I create the same bill twice and I have $100USD left.
I have noticed it happening more & more each month, over the last few months.
and in particular today and yesterday its crawling basically.
or is there known issues?
Our net connection is fine we are ISP/IT Company.
The amount that is showing in the widget lines up with a receipt that was submitted, I believe via mobile, and may have been incorrectly submitted as an expense claim and later deleted/changed - I am not sure about this.
But either way I don't know how to access this incorrect expense claim record to remove it from our widget.
Upon sending a client their statement, they came back and asked for reference information for each line.
At first I was confused - full reference information is on the statement right?
But when I printed a PDF and viewed it I could se the problem.
The reference information is cut off after 9 characters.
Alternatively, take it to two lines so the full reference can show.
Am I wrong in thinking that the only way to change a statement line is to delete it, edit it in a CSV then import the corrected line?
Bit of a hassle.
I have a large asset purchase made before the end of last financial year.
It's not an expense as I won't be deducting it, it's not an asset, nor a liability.
Un-tick the wrap text and merge cells option, so the columns have a consistent number of cells.
much appreciate for your help
Can this please be fixed as a matter of urgency?
it must be a very simple bug to find.
to market segment and product to produce departmental reports.
My workaround involved:1.
I removed those transactions using the 'delete statement' 4.
I have emailed support several times however they have simply responded they know there is a problem with the feed and haven't addressed the situation I've created as a result of that.
I am talking about me paying others.
I am coming from sage software and have used quickbooks online for another company both have had something similar to this.
This means that the newer bill is still to be paid.
However, even though I had unreconciled it and it shows as such, under my bills/purchases, it is still saying that the bill has been paid.
We made a purchase from USA and was charged $29 dollars (converted to £19.
The goods did not arrive so received a credit for $29 dollars - but exchange rate meant the refund was £19.
This left me with a negative balance of 31p.
When I travel or park, it's not always for the same customer, so I can't assign a bill to a customer for it.
One that's created as a generic travel, or parking fee.
Is my thinking way off here?
I was told when I registered for bankline that this was easy and certainly compatible.
Both have internet connection.
I'm thinking there are a couple of ways forward:1) try to catch up on all these unreconciled transactions, setting up rules as I go.
I suspect there is a quite few hours work in this.
I'd really appreciate some of your thoughts.
The desktop version has this features and allows for printing reports using all submitted expense claims.
There's only a 100 transactions on the cancelled card so if there was a way to do it manually i could easily grind it out.
My client (landlord) has large payments from a local authority (housing benefit) that covers lots of little payments for clients (weekly rent etc).
Thus a number of incorrect lines as well as a grossly incorrect amount for the Statement Balance as at last refresh of feed (today's date).
I get the following messageIm sure I am using the correct passwords etc.
Every single debit has been ADDED to the balance, and every credit has been SUBTRACTED.
I've browsed through the 'help' section but can't find anything similar.
There are no missing transactions, and the amounts are all correct - the only difference is as stated above: all debits have been treated added to the balance, and all credits have been subtracted.
I'm going crazy trying to figure out how to fix this!
Am I expecting too much from these type of packages?
My phone number is 0437-070-233 My email address is : jerry.
I know these may be a newbie question but I'm confused.
And if isn't supposed to match.
I send email to support and  still waiting for answer.
The feeds have always worked.
The company I work for is a manufacturing company with about 75 employees (about 25 office staff and 50 factory workers).
Nothing too crazy.
My main concern is with transaction limits and scalability.
We sell about 200pcs per month across 850 sku's.
We process about 110 checks per month to 40 vendors or so.
I know the TCs will /usually/ be used for internal tracking/reporting, but my customer wants some of these to be usable for information that can be reflected to their customers.
If the answer is no, then I'll have to move this to Feature Requests.
Wanted this for reporting and tracking purposes.
As such, there was no super or tax associated with these.
Allow us to include our Company Logo on email templates2.
Allow us to send to different delivery addresses for one customer instead of having to change the postal address every time4.
The loan amount is for $10,000 and will be paid back in August this year.
So of course my trial balance is off.
to many variables.
Billable expenses dont work too far down the track.
I used the downloaded Word file as a template.
Would be nice if it was simplified down to one or two buttons and if it only affected one section without changing the magnification of the whole programme.
We do this to be friendly and to ensure that the relationship between our customer and us is kept light and bubbly.
I think this is my lack of knowledge of CSV files that is causing the problem.
HiI've got an issue with the Automatic Paypal Import.
It's missing a lot of transactions.
50 USDCharge From Credit CardOur issue: we never see this transaction on Paypal USD or Paypal CADWe have to create manually each transactionsBolo
HiWe had lots of unpaid expense claims (awaiting to be paid) over two years.
So I tried to go to each individual expense claim and enter that the expense is paid.
Note : I m using Oauthconsumer for authorization purpose ,Its finely working for Get methods.
23 when in fact that is incorrect.
is this something that is in the pipeline to be looked at.
The situation is as follows.
The last one I received indicated that they hadn't actually read my query sent well over 24 hours prior.
I usually run monthly profit and loss reports.
Im wondering if the conversion date is causing the issue ?
I'm in Fiji so all tax rates were originally set to zero.
However I can't change 'Tax on imports', 'Tax on Purchases' or 'Tax Excempt' at all, they are all stuck on zero.
Our invoicing and payments are handled via a third party billing platform (which does a very bad job of debtor management).
We have hundreds of individual payments processed daily via these three payments gateways.
When I "create" on the right hand side (".
Is the info being recorded as it would had I added a bill?
My aba has exported as a csv file.
I' m still working my way around all the features and seeing what it can do.
I’ve made a few admin errors where there are double entries of expenses of which have been approved and paid for.
Is there a best practice here that I'm not using?
I have uploaded a pdf to file inbox then created a bill.
I then realized it was a credit note.
I was playing around with tracked and untracked inventory items and created two items which I no longer want in the inventory system.
I'm currently limited to 20 reconciliations per month.
or is it based on the date you took up your subscription?
As I have been doing research I am struggling to find resources in the US that might provide training or even conversion / set-up.
I have looked through a lot and everything seems very country specific except the US.
I have had problems before where the changes made would have been catastrophic so did not finish the import.
Back of card states Wesfarmers Finance.
Here's the scenario.
I took &#163;10 out of the cashpoint and was charged &#163;1.
I spent &#163;5 on a networking event (for which i have a receipt) and &#163;1.
50 on a bridge toll (again i have a receipt) and i have &#163;3.
For example, in my feeds from ANZ I have 2 transactions showing for Uber.
But .
that is unacceptable.
Here it is 1.
Nothing comes though on Saturday, Sunday or Public Holidays.
We had transactions on Tuesday 26 April and they are STILL not showing.
I've also tried over the last few days - same result.
I asked Chase for help but they said they can't (surprise).
I saw transactions called "Expense Receipt Created" but could not click into it to see what is it or how it got there.
I tried to look for them everywhere but could not figure out why they're there.
Does anyone have the same problem, Any help would be much appreciated.
Is anyone else having issues with Annual Financial Statements for clients that have a February Balance date The reports are not picking up for this year 28 Feb 2015 to 27 February 2016 and last year picking 28 Feb to 27 Feb. Any fixes other that exporting out to excel.
i'm moving over from Netsuite and happy with the change.
My client has entered transactions after the year end but before I locked the dates.
I have tried all the suggestions in the linked help article here: https://help.
It seems that as soon as you allow a user to send quotes that allows them to view all the payments we have made.
I find this particularly useful for creating specialised notes.
However, this function only works vertically and not horizontally and creates columns for this year and last year only.
When entering 'Receive Money' or 'Spend Money' could there be 3 'Date' boxes at the top to make it quicker to make entries.
It has never defaulted to anything before, and never happened before.
);* an overseas software purchase of $20USD turned up twice, a day apart, with 2 different AUD figures completely.
The whole idea of automating this is that we (I) don't have to spend hours trawling through statements and receipts doing the books by hand and getting kicked out of online banking every 5 minutes as I'm not constantly clicking buttons and links to keep it open.
No problem here the cursor moves on.
Once the date shows it can not be removed.
Actually whenever i export the return it only provide me the First page of the return in some cases.
Unlike in contacts there isn't an option to "ignore" black fields.
I archived two Directors Loans on the Balance Sheet (Non-Current Liabilities) both with balances of $5000 outstanding.
HiI've entered a heap of expense claims but have them against my name instead of the employee who needs to be reimbursed.
This would allow accountants to easily extract this data to send to our customers without using workarounds.
This would be especially helpful for partner edition cashbooks.
HiI registered for VAT some months after I should have.
Is there something I am missing here?
I have noticed for some reason (unknown to me) certain checks (cleared and reconciled) have an asterisks by the contact associated with them.
This is screwing up all of my reports and is making tax preparation difficult.
(ie, 3 department budgets the sum of which is our company budget).
I am sure this is very straightforward and I hope that someone can quickly point me in the right direction.
I feel very stupid, but i cannot find anywhere on the app to edit or delete a receipt?
That way it puts us back in control of the data we're importing, which quite frankly is imperative.
I have two separate vendors who issued partial refunds after a purchase was made.
One was because we were charged too much for shipping and the other because we were charged for an upgrade that we did not end up using.
Both of the original expenses were one off expenses paid via credit card and do not have associated bills.
I cant seem to find a way to fix this and have emailed support several times over the last few days with no reply as of yet.
Is it possible to have search parameters that include ANY of a number of either contact or GL codes, and then to find ALL unassigned transactions within those contacts or GLs?
I have used the services of one of my suppliers on a job for one of my clients.
When my staff enter expense claims, I can't see it in full until they submit it, however the amounts show up in dashboard widget under "total of current claims" even though it's not yet submitted by them.
Should it be showing at all until they are submitted?
How can I see more on this?
Other data which I have loaded online is visible such as contacts so I'm not sure what is going wrong!
Any help would be greatly appreciated, Thanks!
I’ve noticed that once I create a bill from a document that is stored in a folder it remains there with a note about which file it is associated with.
Ideally, I want it to be gone from there.
And customer service isnt replying.
The problem with this is that the company has a large volume of clients and revenue lines.
If this was once a year fine, but its now a requirement of the US holding company on a monthly basis.
Not sure if I'm daft or if this is a pretty significant UX and/or feature oversight.
We have three companies all essentially operating as one.
One of them is VAT registered.
This all sounds possible, but would the fact that one is VAT registered pose a problem?
Can we have the ability to list the requests based on the number of votes?
My GST Next Period Due Date shows 1 March to 31 April, and I cannot seem to change this to 1 February to 31 March, as per my GST Return with IRD.
80		Cost of Goods Sold		30.
75		Cost of Goods Sold		11.
12		Cost of Goods Sold		166.
05		Cost of Goods Sold		56.
6011		Cost of Goods Sold		82.
I found it incredibly tedious to create a bill for every receipt due to the small amounts.
(it will show the items, but not the customer name & address.
Interested to hear other's thoughts on this.
Am I missing the point?
The problem is 31/03 was the last tax year day so I am wondering if there is a option to change the reconciliation date from 01/04 to 31/03?
or please advise how to fix it.
The issue I am facing is that  decimals are not enough to express the official rate in colones per 1 USD.
Example: the official rate today (April 2nd) is 542,23 col per 1 USD.
My company is in the UK.
Certainly do not want to do all entries by hand.
They always used to work without a problem, but now I'm having to waste hours manually generating them.
Im at the end of the month reconciling and noticed the out of balance withinthe statement exceptions and they are  dated the 1st March?
I hope that this feature comes available in the future.
As most small businesses, my accounting is based on a cash basis.
As such, my books aren't correct when I run reports on a cash basis.
In that case, after realizing we had to reverse ALL of those inventory adjustments, we decided the work around would be to do a manual journal entry and then a receive money for $0 to "adjust" the inventory.
Basically, I have no way of accounting for samples given out, on a cash basis!
It makes things annoying for me and my client who is paying me by the hour, in effect doing nothing productive until this can be fixed!
To me, in some instances it doesn't always seem clear cut when an transaction is a 'Spend Money' outgoing or a Bill!
For example, we have numerous software subscriptions that get charged on our credit card monthly.
These are recurring - so I would class it as a bill.
Also, we have some yearly subscriptions to various services.
Close to the renewal period we log on and renew the service and often the cost varies from year to year depending on discounts applied etc.
Once paid, we receive a receipt.
I have spoken with our IT support and they have no reason to believe that there is anything wrong with our computers or our e-mails, we have had everything recently updated and even replaced computer parts to increase performance.
Did you manage to fix this?
Then we paid it.
then we ask a refund, then don't know how they charge on my personal credit card again.
I send many email to support, answer all the same.
It was actually a test to myself so I know it hasn't been received.
Finishing up my year end stuff and noticed that there are transactions listed for last year that aren't reconciled.
Some of the initial transactions I found were duplicate entries for payments we had made, however now I am finding payments we have received etc.
For example: a supplier bill for $100 comes in, which has retentions of 5%.
We enter the first bill for supplier "ABC" for $95, and a second bill for supplier "ABC - Retentions" for $5.
Can't find anything in settings or anywhere else.
I am finding this to be extremely frustrating and I think there is something completely different occurring that is stopping it from working, but I can't see anything else wrong further down the rule page.
They both occurred in the same year.
Is there an option in between ?
When I log into my credit card website it only shows pdf can be downloaded.
I have a question into my card provider presently to see if they can send to me in another file format.
This is frustrating as all i require is a phone number which normally should take seconds.
AUD I wanted to get rid of the AUD as I only deal with locals.
The charts and stats were not feeding.
Pretty much we were dead in the water.
I've been requesting status updates and getting some emails from tech support and they keep saying the problem only affected a small number of customers and its resolved.
Is anyone else having the issue and did you have a work around, maybe another browser since they say it's fixed?
My company is a booking agent, working on behalf of artists.
Got this after a slow and painful start to using Xreo this morning.
Gateway TimeoutThe proxy server did not receive a timely response from the upstream server.
1bf07c6e Looked it up and found this:This problem is entirely due to slow IP communication between back-end computers, possibly including the Web server.
I have tried Chrome (default), Firefox, IE and Safari - all with the same results
All,Seeking advice re the following (maybe I'm missing something.
Does it require a manual journal entry?
This is really frustrating and causes a huge work-around in order to sort things.
I can't contact support for support :|
Is there anyway you can force a feed through?
It would make my weekend, if someone posted a step by step guide!
One has an iPhone and the other an android.
My iphone does still have this option.
Is there function where payments/credits and costs/expenses/wages can be tagged to a job (not a category) to to determine a Profit/Loss per each job.
I have recurring expenses such as telephone that is paid monthly.
I have a credit card with the vendor and I login to their site to make a payments, sometimes one lump sum for prior  two to three months.
HiIllustration:1, Bill received from XYZ : Amount $ 5,000.
I have 2 employees, who have been with me for little while.
The $450  regulations is met.
But instead of quantity 1.
2 and 19.
00 and 199.
So, my question is: is there another separator than a point or comma?
Except from help guide is there anything else I should read before I start?
For example I don't know where to find the instructions on how to record opening balances or how to a make a double entry for an expense.
Can we have it back again?
NCA is one of my key reporting figures.
HiIf i follow the below mentioned link I am unable to create an asset type.
Go to Settings, then click General settings.
It only seems to search on the "ContactName", "Firstname" and "Lastname".
My conversion date and start date for my books is 1st July 2014.
Problem: My previous book-keeper started entering transactions as at 1st June 2014.
Hello everyoneWe’ve still got lots more improvements in the pipeline and will continue to share and keep you updated on what’s coming next, here.
We'll keep you updated here as we progress.
:)For those interested, previous updates can still be found on the previous thread linked above.
Their books are on an cash basis.
This is where I think I might have a fundamental mis-understanding of what "balances" means (which may reflect my single-entry mind.
Or (more likely) have I completely mis-understood what is needed here?
HiI am currently working for a leasing company who buy cars/equipment and lease to customers.
Car is purchased and is entered as a fixed asset2.
Does anyone have experience with leasing companies and if so is the above along the right lines?
This would be great info to know.
I have entered an items cost and sale price.
The old supplier refunded the money but I couldn't find a way of matching the income to the overpayment.
I don't have an option to void the overpayment.
The current advisor is not my accountant and I have little support from them.
I do not know some of the users who has access to my financial information.
I also cannot delete them, because I do not have the correct privileges to do so.
Using the placeholder of month would be perfect if we invoiced in that month.
e. g we are an early stage startup want to reconcile expenses such as hosting costs under expenses to make trending easier.
The Profit for September 15 has dropped by &#163;3500.
I have a question regarding the mobile app.
I paid myself on December 30th.
Zen Payroll even has a W2 for 2015.
After breaking with my accountant, I'm trying to find another but also want to see if i can make these changes myself since otherwise it's a pretty intuitive system.
I'm sure it's straightforward however, sign of age perhaps!
Why do I have to click 3-6 timeless before it saves it?
They have a lock on them.
For example.
Is there a work around?
Any one got any idea as to why is only imported some and not all of the transaction?
I assume this is down to the column headed *TaxTypeWhat format does this have to be in?
The item is a specialised piece of technical field equipment.
Trial and error is up to approx 15 so far
HOW TO DELETE AN ARCHIVED EXPENSE CLAIMS?
I have recently imported my credit card transactions for American Express.
It takes me through to the help page.
Anybody knows how to do that?
I've raised a Purchase Order and sent it to Supplier and the goods have now arrived in the warehouse.
Is there somewhere we can go that can advice us if the servers are down and if so do they post an ETA on when the service will be back up and running?
From 11:25AM until after 12:30.
1X8    We had multiple staff trying to access the service from two different buildings in different parts of Hamilton.
Multiple attempts to login failed.
Here is only a few of the Issues reported:Internal Server Error - ReadThe server encountered an internal error or mis-configuration and was unable to complete your request.
3faf69e1 -------Internal Server Error - ReadThe server encountered an internal error or mis-configuration and was unable to complete your request.
361c750b -------Internal Server Error - ReadThe server encountered an internal error or mis-configuration and was unable to complete your request.
The request has been terminated.
--------MSG REC--------We're sorry, a problem has occurredPlease try againIt's possible the problem you have encountered is temporary.
We're on itIf this is a problem you've encountered before, it's likely we're already fixing it.
We keep a record of every error that occurs and regularly review and set about fixing them so they don't happen again.
Including details such as the specific steps which lead up to the problem and the name of the organisation will help us identify the problem and resolve it.
Suggestion:  We are left in the Dark.
Possibly there is somewhere to look to see a service or tech message in relation to the service being down, but we do not know where this is.
The music is too god damn loud.
I am struggling trying to hear anything all I can hear is music, and the voices being spoken are too softly spoken.
So I've created an expense claim for each expense, then I split the expense into separate lines.
It appears to truncate to 51 characters (not including the '.
The transactions appear to be grouped per customer, although this is still very messy ie with 20 of one customer and then a random one in the middle.
It was much easier when they were in chronological order.
Actually it appears that all the received money is at the front and all the spent money transactions are at the back.
How can we bump a Feature request that started in 2012 but that has current interest?
"My description that refused to reconcile with the above error was 257 characters.
When I enter in username/password, sometimes it seems to recognize the login info and passes me on to multi-factor authentication questions, answer one or two, then fails.
High and dry without feeds.
I fixed most of the balances except the A/R balance entry is glitching out.
I am saving it and following all the instructions.
The issue is that the fields come wrongly sorted.
But at the moment I'm getting:.
Is there some underlying issue with that that I'm not catching?
This is occurring with a few Fixed Assets so my guess is I'm doing something incorrect.
Somehow, it can only delete the exchange stuff.
any given product could have a series of different cost prices depending on the rate of exchange on any given purchase date.
This impacts my margin and my stock valuation - is there a standard and easy way to reflect such variations?
Part of my service is that I handle all the event funds, and simply send them a cheque with the profit at the end of the event.
The problem I have is that they also wish me to deduct my event management fee from the profit I send them, so there is only one transaction for them to manage.
Anyone is using CBA and it would be appreciated if you could let me know the right DE User ID.
90% of our payables and receivables are by this method .
I have nothing to allocate it to-what do I do with it please?
The problem is this product database and Inventory system feeds two separate front end sites.
Can someone tell me if the backspace or Esc key can be used to go back a step when looking for information.
There must be a better way.
Square register shows them to be $4368.
On the transaction summary there are two types of transactions for square showing up.
Donations and legaciesCharitable ActivitiesOther trading activities etc.
But I cannot see a way of doing this.
Forgive the newbie, guys!
I hope the answer to this is not embarrassingly simple.
I have done and re-done this in different ways, and the result is always the same.
00, but $0.
dl=0Any help here would be hugely appreciated!
I currently have to categorise them as something else (usually travel - taxi) and then wait until I can get on a laptop to edit them into the correct categories.
If these could be added it would be amazing!
), I created an even larger line set and ran it through the standard Demo co template - and the print failed - again after 2 minutes or thereabouts.
I have a client who travels abroad frequently.
On his way back from the airport, he visits Starbucks and again pays with his card.
The only thing is.
It may be that I'm totally doing it wrong!
I have rental money that comes in periodically, combined with a statement from the agency that itemises all the income/expenses.
let me know it would be possible.
I have a customer who was invoiced for $3600, and they have paid $3993.
Now with year end, we paid utility bills from 2015 in 2016.
This transaction is shown as being reconciled.
What are the best practice we should follow?
Am I simply overlooking a simple feature that is already available?
Looking forward to receiving some insight!
The conversion balance date is set at 31st Jan 2016 but the data that gets imported is only what makes up the conversion total.
I get item from vendors and then sale it online and for some items my cost price and sale price is same.
It says that the item is not in stock.
I found that the BatchPayment.
i. e. the reference number of the bill being paid in the batch would be nice.
At present a little slow and clunky compared to other products.
8x, and if x is1, 2: the final rounded figure paid by the customer will be $58.
803, 4: the final rounded figure paid by the customer will be $58.
856, 7: the final rounded figure paid by the customer will be $58.
858, 9: the final rounded figure paid by the customer will be $58.
02 is rounded off.
All the best, Dan ChambersDraft Wheelchairs Ltd
It is only pence usually but it is still wrong.
Because it has been paid.
So in myob 's purchase bill export file,transaction  Status is B  no matter  it is open status,or closed status purchase  bill.
I have uploaded the custom templates and set my template set as the default.
My guess is it is not pulling in the custom template at all, but it is also not giving me any kind of error information to indicate if there is a problem with my template.
This will be to share tips and tools and see how people are using the product in a practical way.
And how  to solve it.
It would help a lot!
This seems harder than it should be.
I have spoken on the phone at great length with PE, and they have never seen this happen before.
Phone support is completely necessary.
Solving issues via email and support forums is not adequate.
Each feed has a unique username and password.
Then the credit card works.
I know that you can make a line item inclusive of GST but one of my clients wants the see the GST as a separate line item.
Or is there something particular that needs to be done to carry them across?
"Have tried logging out and in again.
never the twain shall meet!
a stationery bill needs to go 20% to Div 1, 20% to div 2 and 60% to div 3.
You could then click on "bill" and it would take you to the bill it was copied to.
It seems the ability to do this has now gone :(This was a great feature so unsure why it would have been removed.
I made a mistake with my first attempt at adding a budget and want to delete my budget and start again.
What have I done wrong andf how can I rectify?
Other than asking her to check her spam (and me double-checking I have the address right), is there anything else that can be done to troubleshoot this or avoid issues in the future?
I'm not quite sure where to put my questions, so they get randomly placed under one of these three topics.
Well and good.
So it's all very confusing.
I am with Santander in the UK, is anyone else having this issue?
This seems trivial but it's actually really annoying and, if you are used to it working properly it's easy to create dupe contacts which we've done several times now.
Can you advise if this glitch is being looked at?
I have been manually imputing the word "Renewal" in the reference field.
I have been trying to email receipts from my phone to the inbox without success.
HiMyself and my collegues have an intermittent issue with the global search function.
I have tested this on various browsers and get the same result.
As far as I can tell, it's not done.
'Last financial year' does not appear under "common formats" or "show date range".
I have deleted the app and re-installed it but I keep getting the same error.
I have a customer who owes over $3,000.
I've also checked under "history and notes" section, but it's not listed here either.
Let's say I have a sale of &#163;250.
00 due to merchant fees being subtracted from the income at source.
So I have a &#163;9.
It would be really helpful if dates could be added as numeric only rather than alpha and numeric - much quicker to input date as 12.
Right now, my balance sheet shows 10K contributions, 5K draws with year earnings/loss of (5K) for previous year.
For this year my balance sheets shows all the same, except the year earnings turn into Retained Earnings.
Even after I set up Touch ID access it is extremely frustrating to open the app a few days later to be greeted by the login screen.
Please address this as it's extremely irritating
They had a bookkeeper try to manually migrate a MYOB file and did a terrible job at it.
Is there another intended mechanism?
Is this a limitation of the free trial, or is something wrong?
Card transaction 00000000So I have to click on the annoying little 'more' tab to get more information.
then I'm stuck with the information box until I manoeuvre my way to the tiny x to close the box.
would it first of all be better if clicking anywhere of the info box closed it down?
It works well, unless credit notes have been applied.
Is that correct?
One of my contractors has entered a Tracking Code in both Tracking Categories by mistake through an expense claim.
This completely throws out my Project Code allocations and my Profit and Loss.
In quick books (I was using 2003) i simply entered in the check wrote and the balance went down as it should.
i am about to buy a van on hire purchase.
What do I do then to make everything reconcile though?
I've searched help and online with no luck.
Your help is appreciated!
This will be okay if we don't continue post trial period.
I've got the iOS app on my phone, and after setting up two factor authentication, couldn't then login on the phone with Touch ID.
So have now turned it off and can login fine on the iOS app again.
Ok so may have made a bit of a boo boo hereI have collected cash from about 20 transactions.
00Out of this money I have taken  160.
00 and deposited 840.
For instance, we have a client setup to be invoiced for their usual services on the 1st of January.
I could change the conversion balance but would prefer a better way.
I fear that I will have to do everything separately (ie.
- INV-0019Reference should be - "customers name"but it comes up as INV-0019I went onto the .
I started my 15/16 financial year on October 1st.
On November 1st, I didn't owe anybody any money and at this point I was only owed &#163;300 by clients.
It's this part that stumps me.
Please make sure it's a comma separated (CSV) file and try again.
How do i restore back to yesterday?
I have tried doing an automatic feed but there are too many transactions, especially as every fee shows up as an individual transaction too.
I don't want to create thousands of customers so my main customer is Paypal and then I manually input the name of the buyer as a reference (via details).
This then shows under "reference" in the transactions record.
Anyway can now NOT click on the letter of the alphabet our contact starts withDo we either hit the search button to find them and god knows what else will pop upOr do we have scroll through each page of contacts to get to the one you wantNot sure so try it outSearch does Not Bring up all customersScrolling through each page - Um are you serious is this how its going to be now?
Ie if I'm looking for a Customer who starts with BEnter B into the SearchIt will not bring up my B CustomersSo other option is to scroll through each page until I get to the B'sDONT WANT THIS UPDATE XEROTake me back to the good waysAnd Tell whoever is doing your latest updates to THINK MORE!
I authorised and paid one of my own expense claims but later realised that I forgot to attach a photo of the receipt.
Also whats the status of emailing reports on a schedule?
It is working well and we have received several payments already.
eWay wanted to help but couldn't answer my question.
The way Transferwise operate is to overestimate the transaction value initially and then to give a credit back once the actual cost has been calculated.
I have looked at the comments on splitting the one transaction and have found that it can't be done.
Am I missing something, or is this something that I have to go a long way round and input several transactions in order to get a reconciliation.
I'm a handyman and my best customer is a real estate property manger.
They raise WO's on me to perform works on the behalf of their clients.
My problem is I'm accumulating a massive number of customer contacts that all relate to my one customer, "acme property agents".
Can I set a default theme for my PO's
Hello there,Unfortunately a message you sent could not be delivered to one or more recipients.
Not delivering to previously bounced address
I have a bill entered from a vendor.
I have made partial payments on this bill (progress based).
BOA does not appear to understand what I am trying to do.
It would be great if you could fix this.
Banks feeds have only imported part of the period needed.
This is for the credit card accountCheersK
I first searched this community to look for the answers, but unfortunately I couldn't find any.
HiNewbie question.
My CSV feed has two columns of transaction values - one for debits and the other for credits.
All client should see is Package A with a total of $26.
Certain key parts of the aircraft have to be replaced at a set number of hours.
For example, when we changed a bill of USD 3000 to GBP 3000, the History says:1.
"Created - From XYZ for 3,000.
"Edited - From XYZ for 3,000.
Does anyone know how to track changes of a currency in the bill?
I want all those costs to be hidden.
I would so appreciate it: regardsPeter
But if I try to select Start = Dec 16 Actuals  = 6 months, Period = 6 months I get a year going Jun-May which is not our financial year so the total is meaningless.
I think the solution is very simple - can we have the ability to select any number of months in Actuals and Period?
So eg in May I would want to select 10 months of actuals and 2 of forecast I also think it would be easier to call Period "Forecast" by the way and "Start" should be the first month, not the crossover month - that seems confusing to meSo I would want to logically select the following:Start - July 2015, Actuals = 5 months, Forecast = 7 months, in order to give me my full financial year July 2015-June 2016ThanksTom
I am wanting to get the total dollar value for an item cross referenced with a category.
i've reset his payslip, i've reset the entire payrun, i've made sure the leave times are approved,.
it's not showing those additional 2 leave times and i don't know how to get them to.
Actually, I wanted to only ask a question about Two-step Authentication.
If it came through unreconciled that would be a much better starting point.
Is there some other way that I can go about this?
What is going on here?
Given that 1Password is massively popular, it would be great if this could be made compatible on this feature of the system.
It would be good to know if this is resolvable as it will make life a lot easier when reconciling specific items.
My apologies if this has been covered elsewhere, or already requested/dealt with; I had a search before posting but couldn't see anything.
If no, is it something which could be added?
My tracking category is called Jobs and will house job numbers.
I've used both methods but I don't know which is the correct one or if you do it either way and it doesn't make a difference.
I found the below discussion on this in Xerohttps://community.
I am not sure if its the same globally or if its differs each country.
I am currently getting the contact id from the url when I view a contact but with over 1000 customers export is the only real way to do this.
Dear Community,We had a major event where we collected a huge amount of donations in cash.
However, the ATM Cash Deposit Machine only allows a certain limit of cash per transaction.
Suggestions on this?
Right now its using the Item settings.
Net $ and GST $.
I currently track inventory of our t-shirts.
We previously had one company that we paid to furnish the shirts with print on them so I was purchasing the completed item.
I purchase each shirt for 4.
92 each and it costs $6 each to print.
Total cost of each shirt is $10.
It is listed as being in beta with Yodlee.
As a film company, we recharge clients for a) props bought, b) travel.
BUT.
They were incorrectly entered and should not be there.
There would have to be over 100 expense claims incorrectly put through.
PerfectBut, the outcome is of course a summary.
I've been searching the guides on how to do this but can't seem to find anything, could anybody help?
Going through the transactions I can see all the reconciled and no-reconciled transactions, and some of them have many file attachments when they should have only one.
I click on the transaction and view the attachments and at the bottom of the list, there is the required one, and the rest are all attachments that should link to different transactions.
So for example there might be 5 files, one for this transaction and the other four for four other transactions.
Getting very annoying to scan down the transactions list and open up the ones where there are more than one attachment and then delete the non relevant files.
This is left as unreconciledThen, on the same day I have the same name and no ref but reconciled.
I did not see a discussion of this specific issue, but if it has already been covered, my apologies.
)I am planning to restructure tracking for next year.
Currently, I have a single category that combines departments and projects.
Example: In 2015, for ABC Company, we spent $100 on Materials, $200 on Services, etc.
I require to import a journal which includes posting to  the Regions we have.
In demo company i can see Region when posting a manual journal however no Region appears in template for importing a journal.
They constantly make changes and dont' tell you and then obviously aren't checking anything before they roll out these changes.
This would have to be one of the most frustrating accounting package that I have ever used!
It has merged all the contacts, but the contact details are all over the place.
Wrong email and address with incorrect contact.
Hope that makes sense to you?
(I didnt set these up is it automatic.
this software is definitely accounting software and not intuitive for the non-accountant!
I entered a bunch of receipts/claims.
I would think that I would include the money's owed as part of the payroll process.
must be an different Australian way of thinking.
I can't figure it out.
It makes no sense at all to me.
One of our staff later advised that is was a hoax email.
Can you please let me know if this was actually a hoax email or whether we should all be changing our passwords?
I have setup a bankfeed for the employee credit card which successfully imports his purchases.
Is that correct?
Under the Features heading, click Fixed Assets.
Click the asset type to open its details.
Make the changes to the asset type.
However, when I go to General Settings, there is no such things as 'Fixed Assets' under Features.
It really isn't there.
Our company bought a PC, that we then cancelled and got refunded our money.
Also, there doesn't appear to be a company field.
Apologies if I am missing something here.
I download the CSV template so I can copy all my info into it.
For example, you get to column "O" -  in the template, this is "InventoryItem" and in the exported CSV from the dummy company, it's "Planned Date", whatever the heck that is.
"Download the CSV, fill it in, and upload it" is not enough.
It's not that big a deal, considering the tax rate is GST on Imports, and at present they've been using GST Free.
We had a customer loaded twice because with one of them we had the name wrong.
How to fix?
Now I have a -SPENT $500 in my checking and-RECEIVED $500 in my credit card accountCan these be linked?
I hop someone can help me out on that.
Previous advice from all accountants I have used is that date of purchase is used for BAS/GST/assets etc, not the date it finally shows up on the statement or date statement is paid.
I have narrowed it down, It went strange on the last week of August.
which is $940.
Much easier to copy and paste!
Is that right?
Basically I'm trying to invite our employees to start using the payroll section so they can get access to their payslips.
I tried adding the email address via the contact card itself and still getting the same result.
for individual clients?
HiStill running Trial ATM but looking to move from QB Desktop - Can I set up a customer with more than one department or branch and have everything outstanding appear on one statement?
Is this type of bulk editing possible?
Is that possible?
Or: is there a doable work around?
I've been having an interesting discussion with a company that wants to move away from their Sage50 accounting software.
However that's not really the main issue.
available for Odoo covered pretty much everything they needed (except Satago!
From a glance at Odoo it seems pretty decent, looks good and does indeed have lots of modules that cover many bases.
I'd be interested to hear thoughts.
May mistake was &#163;100 underpayment on slip.
Too large for minor adjustment.
I’ve really enjoyed helping every one of you out, and seeing the Community grow to become an awesome peer to peer channel.
Would be nice to have the option to NOT have tax column as some states don't have tax.
Unless I am missing a step which is more than possible.
Does anybody know how to either amend, reverse, delete or otherwise correct this?
I have found that I classified some goods as a general expense and not direct expense as they should have been.
I have gone into inventory and changed the codes to the right ones.
but none of these merge fields are documented anywhere I can findIs there good documentation somewhere on this?
Or some way I can see a list of all merge fields?
The problem is that incomes and expenses for one year, might overlap incomes and expenses of the same project for the next year.
This makes it extremely difficult to isolate a Profit & Loss for a particular year' event.
So here is the question.
Would it make sense to create a custom 'Project' option per event, and archive it once all incomes and expenses have been reconciled?
If not, please let me know and I can try reiterate it differently.
In this Free Online Financial Modeling Training Course, I will take an example of Colgate Palmolive and will prepare a full integrated financial model from scratch.
Financial modeling is a general term that means different things to different users; the reference usually relates either to accounting and corporate finance applications, or to quantitative finance applications.
In simple terms, financial modeling means forecasting the future of the company or an asset by way of an Excel Model that is easy to understand and perform scenario analysis.
In the context of our discussion here, we will discuss Financial Modeling with respect to the forecasting of the future financials of the company.
This free financial modeling training course will help you forecast the financial statements of the company i. e. Income Statement, Balance Sheet and Cash Flows.
Most of my items are sold both wholesale and retail, and they have different prices.
Is there a way to make that happen?
At this practice, I am charged 25% of the fee I charge patients (this means I can bulk-bill without significant cost to my practice) + GST.
So, at the end of a week, I receive an statement from the practice which pays the income from my services provided minus their service fee (25%) and the GST of the service fee (10%).
For example, if I earn $750 they charge $187.
50 for rent and $18.
75 for GST with the remaining $543.
Is this the correct treatment?
However, I also sell the same products at markets and events and at these we offer deals such as discount for 3 items, or knock a few bob off to take the sale.
but because of these deals it may be £90.
Trying to make it easier for staff to choose between options and avoid error.
All the payments I receive through Stripe contain slightly different names, but all include the phrase "STRIPE TRANSFER".
50  - I get the &#163;42.
Why has it changed?
One of our employees has accrued excessive leave.
I'm unsure of where to code these.
Please don't laugh too much!
My client purchased a Neat.
We take money either by cash or credit.
Does anybody have experience with this?
When I create a rule and at item 2.
Which is very frustrating during reconciliation.
How can I change this so that it allows me to amend the tax rates?
I see that using the "transfer money" function is the recommended way to do this.
We have a company MasterCard.
I have tried posting and deleting to get rid of them but they pop right up again.
What do I do to get rid of these duplicate charges?
Each member of staff have their own login (email address).
Would it be possible to have the reply email address the same as the login email address?
Is anyone having the same problem.
to reconcile it.
The multitude of transactions means there are so many contacts that may only get used once as most are once-off transactionsIs it worth archiving these contacts or does anyone have tips on how I can better organise this so my contacts doesn't blow out to ridiculous numbers?
To show how many contacts I may have I have reconciled 7 days’ worth of transactions and already have 109 customers in July 15 with the rest of the year to go.
With the Reference been the order number?
Here, we have compiled .
The list consists of top CPAs, CFAs, and Bookkeepers.
Error message is;Certificate-based authentication failedERR_BAD_SSL_CLIENT_AUTH_CERTXero support have been unable to help so far, does anyone have a similar issue?
incidentally on some assets this edit didn't work.
All I see is a blank page.
I haven't had much luck trying to design them myself.
An email has been sent inviting you to take over the subscription.
From: David Johnson (currentaddress@company.
I find this troubling from a security perspective.
Anything to be aware of?
Is there a quick way of doing this?
Or do I have to manually change each and every expense code in the Chart so that it links through?
We're trying to import a fixed asset schedule, but we cannot import a fixed asset that has a depreciation rate of 0%, yet also has some accumulated depreciation.
Under the no depreciation option it refuses to allow Accumulated Depreciation greater than 0.
Currently we've added the assets with this issue using a depreciation rate of 0.
01% but this isn't quite an ideal solution.
00, however the amount owed to me was only $261.
18 short and I am unable to continue the set up process.
Am I restricted to 99 codes?
I meet a lot of clients at cafes, and apportion these expenses 50% Entertainment, and 50% Entertainment (non deductible).
I'm not an accountant - is there a reason why this happens.
It's not an expense paid for personally, so not an expense claim.
And it's not a bill with a due date in the future.
HelloMy question relates to entering Insurance funding.
This includes a finance charge and the total amount is payable in 10 equal monthly installments.
So amount financed is $10237 and finance charge is 500 which equals $10737 and divide by 10 installments, means monthly deduction of $1073.
In MYOB I used to:1.
Your help and comments will be much appreciated.
at the moment I have to manually attach it before sending out.
Client has a rental property and only has land & buildings listed as fixed assets.
How do we get to show
we often do COD and the coins dont get banked exactly hence the rounding amounts.
It is as if the functionality is blocked or not working.
I have tried with different Web Browsers.
HiI am trying to reconcile a group of payments.
This is usually how it works with no problems.
We've been syncing with Freshbooks for years.
I have been asked to take on another organisation, with different partners but the same Accountant.
Apologies if this has already been answered, I did look and checked the closed thread, but couldn't find what I was looking for in existing threads.
You should have thought about that before you tried to skip the blank uneditable field.
Is it a template?
Is it searchable/filterable/reportable?
It's definitely not a recipe for clients entering clean data.
Don't make a mistake, because you'll be stuck with it forever.
We've been waiting months for importable bulk assets, so I was quite excited this morning.
But immediately it was obvious assets aren't really bulk importable, not without a bunch of manual work.
Firstly, any tool you've written for importing assets from other systems needs to be re-written.
If you've previously been using assets, you're in for a treat.
Now you can have Buildings (1) and Buildings (2), Office Equipment (3) and Office Equipment (4).
Have fun cleaning that up.
In my view they're overcomplicated things with this Asset Type field, screwed workflow badly, and created enormous headaches for people who were already using assets.
Overall my most highly anticipated release of the year has turned into the most disappointing release of the year.
This item has no cost, and hence no CostOfSalesAccount either since there are NO cost related to the sale.
Credit - Funds Availability - Funds availableFrom my understanding the feed is pulling the initial transaction which is held by PayPal, and then pulling again once the funds clear in PayPal.
I am aware of the exclude late claims check box but there are a few late claims that are actually relevant to the return.
Or to partially receive items?
All I see is a "mark as billed".
But I want to confirm what I'm seeing and make sure I'm not missing something.
We do not have the same problem on the android app.
Worse still, once the credit note has been allocated, it is no longer possible to view the attached document at all!
Client is saying he never received it and text was important.
docx template could come into play or is there a better way to try and accomplish this?
A few months ago I inadvertently set the reporting date for an expense claim to one year earlier than I meant to.
According to https://community.
We can't even make it past the upload, let along start the conversion.
The file starts to upload quickly, then hangs at various points during upload.
I think this has something to do with having comparative balances through the conversion balances page.
, what is last name of employee "Jane", etc.
I was thinking about making my own html forms to put on a password protected client area on my own website.
Also I am not getting a response from the elusive customer service team.
26PayPal fee transaction of £1.
Right now the placeholder only offers Week, Month, Year.
Any help about that would be appreciated (:Thanks,Met.
Our company recently changed their year end from 12/31/15 to 8/31/15.
There are lots of old posts in here or posts relating to other countries but no definitive answer.
Keen to hear of your experiences ;)
This might be an obvious one but.
I have searched around and can seem to find the option, i'm sure it must be in there somewhere.
Sorry if this is in the wrong category.
Do i have to create three different inventory items even though it is the same item, same price decripton etc the only difference is the size.
Also, why would there be items in my find & replace to select form almost 12 months ago.
Have I missed something here?
So here's what I wanted to ask.
Would really appreciate your comments and thoughts.
On one of them I can see everything and it is up-to-date.
On the others it hasn't refreshed any transactions in almost a year.
I can definitely say that I have used those credit cards a lot recently.
Now I have five little paypal payments sitting on the feed that cant be reconciled.
HiCan anyone advise if there is a way where I can allocate my client's operating expenses back into each program we've created under Tracking?
so that we can specify different default due dates for instance.
Last year I had 2 DBAs (Referred to as K and H) under my sole prop.
One makes much more money than the other and at times I needed to move cash between the two to keep one going.
This looks messy and is difficult to find the right item from the drop downIt seems the way around this is to enter a simple code into `Item code` with nothing in the `Item name' section.
But then the item name will be blank in the Inventory section.
Am I missing something simple here?
Here I mean, If I am tracking an item and the code changes, will the tracking pick up on this change or will I have two reports for the same item both pre and post code change?
It requires 8 clicks and 4 data field entries, always the same.
However the feed box still asks us to import a feed manually.
We have done everything according to the instructions.
Is there usually a delay?
Then at month end I could run a receivables summary using the applicable identifier, for credit cards I would get a list of contacts and their balance owing and then sit down with our eftpos terminal and process.
This has only happened from about two or so weeks ago.
And how do I get it back to print normal font?
For internal management purposes, we organise the financial statements differently with more granularity and slightly different groupings.
com/68819400) I recognized the 'edit branding theme' window at around 0:40.
I now wonder why I cannot see the full window for my uploaded .
docx branding themes, but only the left column and not even completely.
I am very much looking forward to your answers.
00" for all line items, even if there is no discount given at all!
docx template and the whole template works perfectly well except from the discount column.
Can anybody tell me where my mistake lies?
We have a user who in the find & recode function has been running for more than 20 hours.
Instead it throws this in debugger:Exception in onResRdy: TypeError: Cannot read property 'htmlRes' of undefinedContentScript.
js:116 Exception in onResRdy: TypeError: Cannot read property 'htmlRes' of undefinedContentScript.
js:116 Exception in onResRdy: TypeError: Cannot read property 'htmlRes' of undefinedContentScript.
js:116 Exception in onResRdy: TypeError: Cannot read property 'htmlRes' of undefined2repeattransactions-a42b7979.
js:1 Uncaught TypeError: Cannot read property 'dom' of null
This would require opening and closing balances.
We organise a service where our employees are allowed to save some part of their wages or salaries from which they can borrow or get loan to take care of their immediate needs.
The main idea is to assist them in developing their living standards through easy loans.
And also a feature to record the loans issued to employees, interests must be calculated and added, records repayments, statements issued, etc.
We invoiced a supplier for work done on their behalf.
And I know this should be simple but I cant seem to work it out.
Inv 1 is correct but Inv 2 is short.
I would have preferred to restrict her rights to do such functions.
Every transaction associated with their launch party is tagged with a Reference of "launch. "
If I could export to Excel I could easily sum the total of all items tagged 'launch. "
Sarah only has 4 hours sick leave but has been sick for 37.
5 hours in the next payroll.
Now, if I, or my PA input the receipts etc via ipad/phone, I then have to authorise each item separately on the pc, am I missing something ?
Seems to be much more work required than previously.
Also, clicking the 'Multiple line items' link in the Description shows blank split lines with the total amount displayed.
I am starting to think this is not normal practise and our current data is not being dealt with until this historical data is entered and reconciled to get an "accurate" list of debtors etc.
The conversion balance page advises that debit and credits should be the same, is that really the case since we are in profit?
It has to do with NOT counting BOTH paying our credit card vendor AND counting each credit card transaction thereby doubling the actual 'spend'.
Im aware thats its possible to attached and image for spend money transactions but cannot seem to find a way to attach and image to a receive money transaction.
We have invoiced a customer in GBP and they have paid us in USD.
Note: we have the top subscription package that enables multi-currency.
On some banks it does this refresh, but others you have to refresh manually.
1) Payments to personal CC are considered Director's Advances (Money paid to shareholders).
The employee submitted an expense claim including that receipt.
I have approved the expense claim.
There are clients out there that have corporate year-ends other than the end of the month.
It would also be nice to have a log of all the emails sent each month to refer back to if necessary too.
For example Wages, Air Fares, Accommodation etc are purchases but are Expenses not Inventory.
At this stage we can download as a pdf and then manually send though outlook with the extra documents
The problem we have is that we are basically a subscription model (based in Canada).
However this creates bad debt in the event they choose not to renew.
Is this possible and does it make sense?
00 which was payed in along with a couple of other cheques.
Not convinced of the "Official help file method".
6) Check nominal - 9999 refunds & returns to see it has a zero balance.
This may seem involved but as you can go from one screen to the other it can be a smooth process.
I have stripe setup to accept online payments.
There is no conversion balances to look at and there is no duplicated statements.
I have a customer that is also a supplier.
Is there another way I could send them an 'outstanding balance' each month?
Then I can inactivate instead of delete.
I don't want to be using a third party software, or spreadsheets.
I want my accounting software to manage all of my costs in one place.
Is there a bug or am I missing something?
At some point in past I made overpayment to same supplier.
if not where do they show up in the ledgers ?
I made the mistake of not double checking and the error was pointed out to me by one of my clients.
However, the problem has returned.
And, can you please make this change permanent for us.
I've recently imported all my data from Quickbooks Premiere.
00 but we refunded &#163;27.
00 yesterday, so when we reconcile all of the payments on that screen, we end up with -27.
00 and cannot reconcile.
and how?
But now with tracked inventory, I was wondering what would be the best way to do it.
For those who are using tracked inventory, how did you manage to record lost, broken and tasting stock?
The updated multiple email field in the contacts card is brilliant, however there is a lack of area to show multiple telephone contact numbers.
It would be great to have a telephone number field next to this, some contacts have multiple departments and no allocated space to record these details besides in the notes tab.
I can enter gst number,accounting basis and filing frequency but next period due column is blank and I can"t enter anything there.
I have created two problems for myself.
Both a result of entering the incorrect reporting date for an expense claim.
To further complicate things, I thought it might be possible to change it by voiding the claim and re-approving with the correct date.
Or do I have to enter all the re-enter all of the expenses and start all over again?
50 of that.
I have also tried similarly small GIF and JPG files.
As per the instructions here:https://help.
I'm finding this very frustrating for such a basic function.
I went to a lot of effort to get a logo I was happy with: I want it to look good!
It would be tremendous if you could filter by date with the newest first.
It was an already existing rule so I am going into edit rule and adding more lines to the conditions and putting in any text field contains and putting the different ways the client puts the CSA section of the description in ie.
csup, csupp, Csup, Csupp, C supp and putting all of these entries as a separate condition.
My question is (I am a newbie, sorry!
I am sure there is something very simple I am missing.
It's obviously a simple transaction.
It should be May 8th.
Instead it posted as August 5th.
We have a focus on bringing an integrated platform to professional service businesses - this forum is for advisors and their clients to discuss deploying the platform.
It also welcomes users seeking to discuss their specific needs in various professional services industries.
QBOnline users that deploy WFM and related technologies are of course, welcome as well.
For an invite to join, please feel free to email me at jszesq@abizinabox.
com, Twitter Direct Message me at @abizinabox, or send up smoke signals.
However, is there a clever work around whilst this important enhancement is being considered.
Why are manual journals not included in Activity Statement on Cash Basis?
it was one thing that really frustrated us about our old system, so i do hope so*works if i create a rule, but i would rather not have to create a rule for every expense*
I had issues with my feed not refreshing.
It would say it completed successfully but it did not.
This went on for 4-5 days, after being unable to get help via a support ticket I thought I would try stopping and restarting the feed.
Contradictory and unprofessional
except it appears to be a proper pain in the rear if you have more than a handful of fixed assets because1.
I cannot find a way to allocate accumulated depreciation to the asset on import.
I see in some posts that this is done automatically once the first asset is imported.
It appears that one has to manually register each asset.
Please can you make it A LOT easier to import a lot of fixed assets otherwise its an otherwise great feature that will not be used.
I've tried asking this question via support but despite getting a ticket number early yesterday I haven't received any reply as yet.
But now neither PayPal feed is updating.
and I have no idea what to do.
At the moment this is done manually on paper and then transferred to excel.
If this can be achieved with a barcode scanner that links wirelessly to an app on a tablet or phone it would be great.
It's been about 3 days since I set it up and it's still saying No transactions imported.
This is an easy fix and would be a great help.
I'm trying to set up quotes, so far I've managed to setup a DOCX template which works well.
Should it say more or is that it?
And you cannot cut and paste all items to move them down either.
Wondering if there is a better way.
I enter a lot of reciepts for small purcahses from mulitple businesses.
It's taking twice as long as my old system.
how long should it take to send?
where's the others?
*edit* i've figured out where to go to send a receipt.
20Buyer sends money to PayPalPayPal takes £1.
44We withdraw what's left and we get £33.
96 into the accountIf I reconcile the £33.
Is that OK?
Part 2:We sold another item on eBay for £8.
The money went to PayPalPayPal takes their cut of 49pI've read that as we are a limited company, we have to charge VAT when we sell old equipment.
33 of the money is made up of VAT - this is incorrect.
Shouldn't the VAT amount show as 20% of the £5.
au home page - or I could not find it.
for example, can we set a rule somewhere that lets us nominate which clients receive which email template?
In my rudimentary understanding it appears that the logic in browser to work out the GST is flawed.
Something along the lines of this:Starting Balance:      = $100.
I regularly have customers paying the incorrect amount because of what i have sent out as a month;ly statement.
Should i be getting my monthly statements from a certain place so they are correct?
For example instead of 1200.
00 it shows as 1200.
The Total column has two decimal points as required.
When reconciling transactions that have a "match" from outstanding bills it's not easy to see if the tax rate has been correctly entered or imported for that bill.
Would be very useful to show the tax rate underneath the transaction detail and provide a link to view/edit the bill if necessary.
This helpful feature seems to have fallen away.
there was also a spent item that needed to be matched in the amount but she hadn't created it yet.
I've reconciled other single transactions without problem.
As it is now there is absolutely none
qbw file, it has a conversion period of January 1st, 2013 to December 31, 2013.
The reports when saved as PDF and rounding option ticked, has a variance between the profit on the P&L and the equity and balance sheet pages.
I was wondering if there was a place to store this on the contact.
Has anybody encountered a similar situation and how have you resolved this?
I cannot see any field on the contact record for this kind of thing.
40 on each date.
If you try to print the search results from the invoicing screen it looks horrible and wastes lots of paper.
ZOHO has it included in their package, but no budgeting, etc.
Our gateway is Authorize.
I have created custom .
Please can you advise where I may have gone wrong?
I am somewhat confused as to how to fix this problem.
The file imports data going back years.
Is that all I have to do?
Don't want to screw up some other aspect of my books by doing this?
It will go onto a second line but the only way I found to do this is by pressing space multiple times and hoping it lands where we want, close enough.
Surely, earliest at top would be more appropriate or, at least, have the option to have one way or the other.
Have I missed a step?
in my credit card feed, I have one logical transaction (e. g. website hosting for US$10, say NZD$13.
20Currently I can reconcile each of these transactions individually, but I end up with three line items.
57, that is split into three payments.
Am I missing something, or has this feature not been implemented yet?
or could you make a way to save it.
The date picker fields in WorkflowMax are unlike any that I have ever encountered and are by far the worst.
They have no competition.
With every other date picker, you have the option of simply typing in the date, e. g. , 31/3/2015.
Not so with the WorkflowMax date picker.
Suppose that 10 Apr 2015 is showing.
You wish to enter 31 Mar 2015.
WorkflowMax changes this to 03.
So you have to change the month and then go back and fix the day.
This is ridiculously cumbersome way to achieve something that should be utterly trivial.
Another problem is that the date picker won't let you paste in a date.
It is especially annoying when data entry is as cumbersome as described above.
If these could be copied into the WorkflowMax code, that would do very nicely.
Getting back into the loop after a years mat.
Stumbled across this great service and looking forward to utilising it.
similar to Invoice2Go App
If the “Pending” transaction has a $0 value then it's not downloaded.
This type of charge will at  some point either fall off and never actually go through or it will change to a different value once the final charge amount has been determined.
For example I had two charges from “Adobe Systems” for $1.
So now I have these two transactions in my register even though they were removed from my credit card because they were never meant to be a “real” transaction.
In general, it would be great if all reports had functionality that allows for saving and modifying frequently used formats.
All I want to do is import my statements in order that I can generate my books so I can do my VAT return.
i found that theonly way to see my purchases was to fdo a much more long winded approach1.
approve the bill3.
Is there some setting I'm missing?
Is this because my user status is not advisor?
b) I have two lots of £10,000 of unreconciled transactions.
While grouping seems to be no problem, I am having issues with sorting.
For example, I can put all of my salaries, benefits and payroll taxes into a group I have created for employee compensation.
I am guessing there has to be a way to fix this.
Who would want their financials or GL to appear this way?
That's not what I expect to see.
I expect to see a total profit for *ALL QUANTITIES* sold.
For example, one lines item shows a unit cost of 0.
03, a sale price of 0.
08, and a QoH movement of 124.
That gives me a profit per item of $0.
I have done a google search without much luck.
5% to the amount being paid.
But I am not sure what I really should do after the budget has been set up?
Now, because they haven't been paid yet it won't show up as something that needs to be reconciled.
Therefore, am I right in thinking I apply the Reverse Charge?
To: Facebook Ireland LtdDate: 1/1/15Description: Facebook AdvertisingQuantity: 1Unit Price: £27.
45Account: Advertising & MarketingTax Rate: Reverse Charge Expenses (20%)Is that right?
The amount you so indicate is called the scheduled amount.
I hope someone here can help me!
One of them is the situation where only the person who set up the feed can refresh it.
Both my accountant and I would prefer it if I could refresh the feed.
If I am the only one who can refresh it, that is perfectly fine.
We have a supplier who is also a customer.
I am having a real issue processing payments our company has made when our goods enter the country.
I tried to see if there was a way of making the amount 100% VAT but this didn't work.
I then searched and searched the web for anyone else who had this issue and there seem to be very few which makes me think I am doing something really stupid.
I read one help discussion found here https://help.
com/uk/Q_TaxImports that discusses the "VAT on Imports" option.
However this only seems to be available as a liability.
Surely if the amount has been paid, it is an expense or an asset (because it can be claimed back from HMRC).
So as an additional check, I tried to do a VAT Return and the amount still did not show.
I have tried to give as much detail as possible to help good and detailed answers and I look forward to someone replying soon.
Small cost of $10.
i have setup my PayPal feed and it has imported all the transaction lines correctly.
So reconciliation is a tedious process of clicking OK for those that are matched correctly and clicking additional matches and selecting the proper one for those that don't match.
Basically, I'm overwhelmed by the volume and hoping someone here might have an idea.
If I let it go a few days or gasp, even a week, I'm stuck reconciling hundreds and even thousands of transactions by hand.
Although far from feature complete they should at least get you going in the right direction.
They may opt for a party at home instead of on a bot for example.
Since they are pre paid it is not a though we have to recover money for services provided that are unpaid for.
E. g. RECEIVE money transaction = $60 ($45 coffee & $15 food), but we will be paid $50 the next day from EFT settlement and $10 next week.
I've got the answer.
You know how it's such a pain in the bum to document our ledger review?
After that the balance is paid "after" the service date.
I've waited a few days, tried again and same result.
However as we grow it's proving to be more and more of a headache to manage.
We currently offer services either monthly, quarterly or yearly depending on the product.
Other products such as web hosting and domains are renewed in 1 and 2 year periods.
The main problems i have at present.
EG a customer orders a product for 12 months.
As we deal with so many different Distributors, vendors and others for buying the services i don't expect any kind of integration with their systems.
Look forward to your advice!
For example, reports are delivered to my board 6/15/15 on 6/20/15.
We had quite a few batch payments that were unreconciled.
After restoring them I could then Find & Match and reconcile.
At the moment, this function isn't set up and therefore provides an additional "unassigned" area on our P&L when comparing using our department function.
All costs should sit within a tracking option and therefore this needs to be improved.
Would be ideal to include a revaluation option to assign it to one tracking/department at tracking set up.
Have you changed the name to something opaque?
I am really getting weary of the thinking behind this system.
This could be the last straw.
Seems a bit silly to me.
Is there something I'm missing?
The Trial version is too limited for either of these purposes.
I'm not sure of the details, but is this a possibility?
Under options there is a button that says "Remove & Redo".
When you click remove & redo it throws an error asking you to contact support.
I ran a P&L last week and did some workings based on it (I didn't print or publish a copy).
When I run it today, it is slightly different.
I must have entered something else, of course, but I can't think what.
I've looked around the discussions but can't find an answer to this one so I'm hoping someone might have a solution.
Does anyone know a good way to combine reports such as this (we're currently exporting to Excel and combining that way but it's cumbersome)?
Example, water bill for $ 39.
My home office claim for the Inland Revenue is 21%.
go to the sent folderI had to email it to my self, any way around this?
How can I have my client's name and address details visible as well?
I want to start a Co from scratch for practice purposes but i don't have the required data.
Both of us have a company credit card.
I've paid the extra for the multi-currency features, but am a little confused by them.
-one would have to specify a date and a date range(up to 12 months) first to find the contact, then drill down from there.
The past 12 months?
I have found none of these satisfactory.
etc, and after 30 minutes or so I may get a fairly good picture of everything related to a contact.
However, I am still nervous about possibly missing out on some transactions as the information is all over the place and that I might have put in some inadequate search parameters.
98 accounting apps has it.
I would really appreciate it if  someone could shed some light and share their strategy in searching for transaction details regard a contact.
I'm writing from Poland, where the VAT law is very complicated and rules are restrictive.
There doesn't seem to be any pattern to this, most are there and working correctly but I have about 30-40 that are not showing up.
I have discovered 17 Hats www.
com and it is Quotient App on steroids.
It has a ton more functionality for the event industry and so many others.
People looking for quoting, contracts, upsetting in the contract (great feature), projects, questionaires, and so many other things.
It is a perfect solution and 17 hats would be a great partner.
Currently it seems you can only mark them paid one by one, which could be tedious.
Choose a pricing plan, then reference the  section in the lower left-hand corner and click  ( to see where it's located).
Enter the promo code and click .
The promo code will be applied and shown below the  section.
It's greyed out.
i could not upload a screen shot, so if you have any further questions please let me knowcould this be added.
WANT OPEN A COMPANY HERE?
Right now, we have to click on each transaction one by one and mark them as reconciled.
I cannot edit or void a wrongly approved expense claim.
Support or help is of no assistance.
I have an eCommerce store.
For example: I make a sale on my eCommerce store for $25.
This seems great because it's all automatic and has no manual entry.
Look forward to hearing from someoneThanksJames Cannon
There are rules set to cover all cases and i do not want to spend my day clicking the 'ok' button (and risk getting RSI !
Even on a per page basis?
I have read that Paypal is not designed to integrate with a high volume of transactions.
We will have a variety of products but mostly digital products and some higher priced services.
When sending debtor statements at the end of month is there a way I can show what is outstanding at the end of month rather then show all the activity within that month to?
I have wrongly classified receipts on several Expense claims, how can i correct that?
These expense claims have been paid and i cannot find how to edit the receipts.
when in the cashbook, you can not code mulitiple items quickly if they are allocated to a balance sheet item.
Please fix this, I have been waiting a year.
Why would we allow all staff to have access to the company's financials?
I then went to delete the bill.
I'm trying to transpose the text from an imported PDF bill in to the bill screen.
Sorry, I couldn't see a section in the forum for bugs.
None of the ones I have generated so far give the correct Closing Balance.
&#160;&#160;Registered Office: Attention: company name, address etc,All good except for the word Attention:I cannot find a way of removing this.
My company sells both products that we develop ourselves and services that we charge for by the hour.
I input all their transactions for a certain period.
We find a lot of government and education sector clients seem to track their projects exclusive of GST so when we send statements they can't quickly match the amounts with their records and the statement has the GST inclusive fee.
Heres a classic contractual statementThe Total Fee payable by *** under this Agreement is expressed exclusive of GST.
As I know there are no ways to create a payStub through API.
It reports to a standard Australian financial year ending 30 June.
This has not always happened its only in the last month.
I currently sell products and a monthly membership from my website.
It would be easy to program as well.
It would solve a ton of issues that I see in your forums.
Tracking and reporting are not OK as solutions for everyone.
Please have a serious think about it.
Lots of your customers want it and for those that don't, then no harm done.
you are going to make things a lot easier for a lot of people.
If I  put each of his companies on standard ($50 plan), can he get any discount for total monthly subscription fee?
what if one of his company is under $25 plan and the other two are under $50, any difference in discounts given?
Would it be possible to show customer payments as the amount paid.
I notice some people have had issues with duplicates appearing, but has anyone else had lines falsely flagged as duplicates?
Customer intelligence for retailers.
Understand customer spending and behavior, send targeted offers to get the best results, check out .
I have set up a rule to reconcile the fees and payments.
However, I cannot find anywhere that drills down to the description field?
First month "hire 5/10/14 - 4/11/14" second month "hire 5/11/14 - 4/12/14" and so on.
We regularly receive some big batches of bills from a few suppliers that the suppliers summarize for us in Excel.
I tend to do things backwards :-)  Am I missing something?
80) and found that the total amount i got was $1.
This has worked fine for me for well over year.
HelloI take the property on lease and sublets it.
I have a problem creating batch payments.
I tick the boxes on page !
, then go to page 2 on the Awaiting Payments listing, allpayments ticked on page 1 drop out.
How can I create a batch of creditors over more than 1 page?
Then when I have expenses for that project, I can spend from the $3,000 pool, and somewhere I can see how much I have left of the original $3,000.
HiI have an issue where the daily takings were stolen by a staff member.
We now find we are not covered for staff theft and have amended our insurance policy.
72 in GST)Amounts received through EFTPOS (-$2000)Leaving $2000 unbanked and stolenFor the $2000 that I am about to write off as stolen funds what do I do for GST on that ?
72  as this was on the June 2014 BAS.
When I select a date in September, or December it's fine.
For example, if I select 20/10/14 in the picker, the field will be populated with 19/10/14.
Transferring payments from joint acct to credit card acct.
This person was our bookkeeper but we're switching it to me.
I have a customer company set up with a primary contact and an additional person under heading 'people'.
I have ticked 'include in emails' next to the additional person.
Given this has been requested for over 2 years (by multiple respondents to the post "Share your thoughts on best practice for invoicing and payments") we won't hold our breath.
It would be useful if the customised dates chosen in Settings were picked up when generating statements.
(p. s. I'm using justworks for payroll payout currently, but doesn't include paying out expenses)
This has to be a most basic function.
I don't think you live in the real world.
but it is now 1 march - 30 april.
but we only changed in september this year.
Might be a prepayment then applied to several bills?
I searched around and I think preparing a "supplier statement" is not a function available yet.
00 on one line and an income of £11.
33 on another.
This is from a tool hire company who charge £60 initially and then refund £11.
00 and reconcile that and then a sale for £11.
33 and reconcile that.
Being a NZ company and established first in NZ why are we left behind on this?
It now asks for the customers address but the country defaults to blank and only shows American states.
Had this been set to the UK then the list of American states wouldn't have been listed.
It seems crazy that it should default to American states for a UK company.
This would be great in theory but I have found I am only being offered the tick box when there aren't any reconciled transactions on that statement.
therefore totally pointless having the tick box there?
The VAT Return up to April-14 was completed via their old accounting software.
If contact group is a contact attribute that is accessible via API, I can make my app do the work for me.
Is this the case?
Its confusing to clients when they're expecting a quote but the email attachment says InvoiceXXX.
Can we have more space to record (in the customer record) more than one email address in each customer entry.
Difference currency Conversion from AUD3.
Difference currency Conversion to USD4.
Only that one transaction is shown in the paypal transaction history, and all the sub-transactions are hidden from the feed/csv file.
I called paypal, and they said sorry for the inconvenience, but it wasn't their responsibility.
I am not sure what to do now.
With Sage Payroll I can export a csv file and import that into Bankline.
BACS payments seems to be something different.
At the moment I key payments individually into Bankline.
Note that the total awaiting paid is given as 35 in the tab but the table footer shows 36 items returned.
The total outstanding amount is correct.
These are credit card expenses and not income.
I want to enter the date in that format and have it come up with the correct date.
We can export as PDF and then email--but that is a hassle.
What would be great is is there was a user role that folks could see reports only.
Strict division 43 rules apply limiting the scope to adjust depreciation rates.
00 from day 1 so I used this for my opening balance.
I got paid &#163;200 from a client and put in the &#163;49.
Obviously I should of set the opening balance as 0 but is there a way in which I can change this or at least what is the correct way to correct this on the statement so it reflects correctly.
Shouldn't that be under 'equity' as it is owners (me) fund?
I have tried adjusting the header and cant seem to move things around.
I kept getting an error when click in save, it asks me to contact support.
To import multiple dates.
I'm also opened to suggestions!
I know it doesn't make a scrap of difference for the calculation, but it would look much nicer for the client.
HiWe have a problem with an amount showing on our Dashboard under "All current claims".
We only have 4 staff using the expense claim system and they have all checked their claims and advise that they have nothing showing in "Current Claims".
Generic transaction type data goes into the payee field.
Is it possible to alter the allocation of transaction data fields (as is possible in a csv or qif download)?
HiI have a client that has 2 companies and regularly moves money between the 2.
Sorry if being dim but can't see a shortcut!
1) The full dollar amount of the refund sent to the customer.
2) The PayPal fee reversal.
Some figures from my recent problem might help with the explanation:I had to refund a customer $45.
The PayPal fee reversal was worth $1.
So in this case the refund amount was $45.
90 but they don't take that full amount because they owe me $1.
That is great, but now I have a transaction of $44.
I have specified this as the default branding theme on the Contact Information window.
Isn't this supposed to happen automatically?
9% on to our customers; most of whom will have no issue with this.
I see some complaints about using Payee = Blank but even if I set the value, I don't get an automatic match.
Unfortunately, the 1406 value is a transaction id that changes on every entry.
If nothing springs to mind then it may be export everything to a CRM and start from there, but this seems a bit overkill.
At present the max is 200.
My average monthly lines total 450/480.
If the max could be increased to 250 or 300.
Would make my life a lot easier.
These are entries with similar Payee or Reference fields.
Combine company Excel Rule files to see inconsistencies between clients fast.
It takes less than 20 seconds to have 0CPAs start this, 40+ times faster than you can do it, for any combination of clients.
It will soon help research unknowns and follow up.
I have entered the details into the financial section.
I have searched the boards here for an answer and can't seem to find one.
Or give the choice to display a entity management dashboard (as is now) and a cash position dashboard across all entities on the screen (either all or the selected group.
Hello,I've got a bit of a head scratcher (for me at least!
I sometimes transfer money from Lloyds to PayPal.
The strange thing is, the transfer dates don't match.
i put all info in and when i get to the last part were u r meant to put an amount in it wont let me do it
Does functionality exist for this?
I made some purchases in the demo company and it changed the gross profit!
Unfortunately, the only way to select an Item Code is to view the drop down menu and select the appropriate code.
I have looked at all the possible field options and have not seen any way to get these fields to appear.
To set-up:1.
For search URL paste:  https://go.
For keyword select something you'll remember, I chose 'x'.
I'm hoping someone may spot this and have been in a similar fog and can help with a solution.
that I receive by email or scan in from paper.
Then every few days I go through the inbox to create transactions.
My workflow seems cumbersome.
Otherwise I open the file to take a look.
• Select action - 'Spend Money' for example.
• Repeat until the Inbox is empty.
So I have incoming payments to reconcile which include a charge.
All help is gratefully received.
Customer now wants to cancel the layby.
(keeping the payments as they are reconciled but getting rid of the exiting amount owing as it is no longer applicable? )
It's really confuse me.
I often will have this problem and I’m not sure of the best way to handle it.
In those situations, we’re not going to each write checks; them writing me a $200 check and me writing them a $400 check.
What’s going to happen is, I’m going to give them $200 and they’re going to give me nothing.
We raised a PO, paid and returned the item.
If someone could explain the process I would be most grateful!
The import file headings are:AssetNameAssetNumberCostAccountDepExpenseAccountPurchaseDatePurchasePricePriorAccumulatedDepDescriptionAssetTypeDepRateDepMethodTrackingName1TrackingOption1TrackingName2TrackingOption2Anyone know how to fix this/workaround?
One of these has now closed and we want to incorporate the General Ledger balances into one.
The help center (https://help.
htm - but I don't think it has all the fields.
Ultimately it would be ideal if we could widen the first column in the template by removing the unit amount and amount for the first line.
I de-activated the feed to start again.
I only want the customers to see the descriptionthanks
I thought - there has to be a better way!
Find out more information here: Feel free to email me on jeri at jerimurphy.
However, the GST reconciliation is still showing all these amounts as 'unfiled'.
Am I missing a step somewhere here?
I have my conversion date set as 1st April 2014.
I click on a date to select it, it is highlighted properly, but yet when the picker disappears a different date is shown in the field, normally a couple of days later than the one selected, but it's a bit random.
It's only happening in Safari - it's fine on Chrome.
Can't for the life of me work out why this is happening.
We currently receive price files from our supplier in CSV format.
I was going to look if I can set up an automator function (mac) that could pull the data from one CSV and create another.
OK, this may have already answered somewhere in the past.
Is there a look-up feature or some database?
Currently, I am using cash basis and I am planning to switch to accrual basis from the next financial year.
I have tried ticking the transaction in 'View Transactions' and  and clicking into the transaction and clicking .
I can't lodge my BAS until this is sorted.
Is there something I am doing wrong?
Nothing has changed and I have tested by logging in to my banking portal which is fine.
I have tried IE11 & Chrome.
I comenced importing transactions from Jan 1 and entered the bal brought forwards.
Yesterday imported to the 21st Jan and its out by over $600.
However, when I then go to reconcile my statements, the Tracking data on my transactions has disappeared - so I have to re-enter it manually.
I searched for his but couldn't find it mentioned anywhere.
The Asset can link back to a purchase record which can include attachments, sure.
(I've had to remove the square brackets from this post).
I'm finding it incredibly frustrating updating client email addresses.
I have had two customers disconnected their services because of this.
0000 and I only want two.
but I've run into a snag with payments.
In this case, I am importing a credit card statement.
(a silly mistake but one that occurred  in a moment of pressure)
How would you suggest this workflow and reconcillation to happen?
We have recently had clients wanting to move from .
There were a couple of hurdles along the way.
I've since tried to delete these but they remain greyed out.
The logic behind this is obvious but the problem is that the data remains visible to our staff.
If anybody has a more ingenious workaround for keeping salary data private I'd also love to hear it!
ThanksAaronNB: I am well aware of the accounting issue in removing this data and am comfortable with putting the necessary journals in manually to reconcile.
Help very much appreciated, many thanks,Angela
The changes you'll see on the Community:  Keep an eye on our blog for more detailed information about this upcoming change.
The IMPORTANT UPDATE says ".
Hello Xeroteers,I'm curious about the "Schedule of Planned Payments" functionality, but there doesn't seem to be much about it in the online help.
This makes it pretty useless from my point of view.
I consider myself to be a reasonbly strong computer user.
Further, I feel that I should not have to immediately be turning to third parties looking to charge an hourly rate for something that should be fairly straight forward.
Further, I should not have to be using qty and unit price fields for something of that nature.
Quick overview of where some of the team will be this coming year, we'll keep this page updated as we get more on the radar.
It says expense claims should be for reimbursement purposes.
I have paid for this performer's insurance with the agreement that any money she earns will offset that cost.
Hello all, first post here.
Steps to reproduce.
Click "Expenses" icon at the bottom3.
Enter a "From" name7.
00 Item in the expense)8.
Click to edit the 0.
Click to edit the 0.
Note the Quantity already shows "1"11.
Updating the Quantity in the app from "1" to "1" fixes it up but that is pretty unintuitive.
It will certainly make the app much less confusing for my staff who always seem to fall in to this trap.
docx template or successfully making other changes to the templates.
Is it possible?
We have lots of clients that, for one reason or another, do not want to move to any type of online banking so we continue to write up these clients using other general ledger software.
I would love to see a feature that allows fast entry of transactions.
This displays a column for a few jobs which no payments have occurred in this financial year.
I selected the "show date range" option, entered the range as 1st to 30th Nov, monthly period, compare with last 4 months.
I have found an entry I made that is called trial balance adjustment 12-31-12.
My conversion date is March 31, 2013 but this adjustment is dated 12-31-12.
This adjustment is messing up my income statement by tracking category as it doesn't tie to my income statement total.
why can't this part of the login be saved (as it is in so many other applications) and we only have to type in our individual password?
It means that when I'm typing in that last line item I have to be selective of where I click, otherwise it doesn't count my click as being on that line item.
I've also tested in IE and it appears to be ok there.
This will help in better cashflow planning and it will avoid a lot of excel sheets being created to keep track who is paying when and money coming in and out
So when we post discount amount it shows difference in fraction values.
By fixed amountwhen we post with method 1 then it works fine.
But in method 2 it does not.
ex-We have a product with price $90 and have $20 fixed amount discount.
So we calculate its discount percentage which is  22.
22% and show Final Amount $69.
We only have 4 active employees at the moment, why do I get this error message?
Oh, we had 6 active employees back in October, but at the moment, we only had 4 and we stay on the $50 plan.
but not for something that happened before the price change.
Can I have my problem resloved please?
This would save loading each document separately and could allow a faster reconciliation.
It allows me to choose which file to attach, I click open then nothing happens?
I run an IT consultancy with multiple clients.
I have several staff.
So I made one & now I have two "Customer" groups.
Unfortunately, I created a credit note for the wrong customer and the only option I have in the pull down is Edit.
I can assure you that in reality, that is not the case.
I've checked the conversion balance as of my start date.
I've undone the reconciliations and started over.
What's going on here?
Budgets and actuals2.
We want to go to a cloud based system.
This started to happen this month, till now everything was ok.
I've tried adding column headings to change the mapping but its having none of it.
The Company Logo is required to be 140 pix by 140 pix, and a lot of companies have logos that are not square.
The Chase card worked fine.
(I have restored one lot of these and then re-reconciled.
So far they've stayed reconciled and not greyed out.
How do I go about invoicing a client that I am trying to get reimbursed for?
Am I missing something or is this a limitation of using the csv upload approach?
how to solve it for beginner user ?
I hope i'm being stupid here and have missed something or a screen on the app?
For exampleบริษัท in Thai means company.
But it shows บรษท when print to pdf.
We want to keep track of income from customers (by customer).
I'm trying to work out why certain items are not being automatically reconciled from my CSV import.
Currently I have a template for printing, and another for when I email.
I know how overwhelming it can get because I have been there.
Have I missed something?
When I go to Feature Requests and select "In Next Release" there is nothing listed, I'm sure previously this has shown what was going to be updated.
Roadshow details, dates and registration here on our website: Let's keep the conversation going!
Roadshow details, dates and registration here on our website:
I am trying to import statement data and I'm getting the error above.
com) extensively for cloud based storage.
I have not been using tracking consistently before now.
Is there a way to select a whole lot of different transactions at once, and apply my tracker to them in one fell swoop?
)DateReferenceDescriptionContact codeAccount noDebit or creditAmountTax CodeHas anyone else had the same problem?
No formatting or anything that makes the site look nice.
I have deleted the history and cookies, which works for a while then it comes back.
I believe I can sort items, tick the top and bottom & all those captured in-between will also be reconciled.
So it now has a completely wrong balance.
Is there a way to do that?
I have written one field code to display "your Next Pick up date is:- <<InvoiceDate>> + 28 Days" on my template.
This code works fine when i check on my word template through excel database.
So if anybody knows how to display such message on my template then its really work for me.
Not sure if I'm doing something wrong, but our email template uses "Contact Name" but this pulls in the name of the company and not the name of the person at that company.
it pulls in:Dear Company xyz.
and NOTDear Bob, Is there another tag I should be using?
As you can imagine this is a huge problem for us as we are suddenly not getting paid.
I did some searching but could not find anything on it, so far.
We invoiced them $5000 at the begining of the month.
of days overdue'.
The idea being that once the onvoice gets to 7 days or more overdue it gets a chase.
I used to print out a simple list to give to our credit control lady, consisting of:Customer nameInvoice numberRefTotal amtDue date No.
There seems to be no way at all of showing 'no.
I have been advised by an accountant that I have been processing it wrong.
The client is non gst registered.
Eg: showing the gst portion.
CheersLooking forward to your response
I don't have the multiple currency subscription.
But this is more long winded and essentially I'd be making it up!
Which is best practice?
This is supported by your competitors, specifically Quickbooks.
My client's revenue figures are much higher than their receivables.
I mean the depreciation calculation.
I have an employee who doesn't have a superannuation fund.
What could be causing it?
Immediately upon sending, a spam email was sent from my email address to 137 recipients (my address was one of the recipients).
So my question is.
Our first  in the US is coming up - September 4th & 5th in San Francisco.
Plus pre-conference drinks and special activities surrounding the America's Cup.
Newbie Question.
If we put all of it in the reference line it gets a bit too much and possibly confusing for the other garages!
This is a much more accurate method of recording rejected payments than entering a credit and re-recording the bill, which is what I was told to do earlier in the year at the Roadshow.
aba file to BOQ.
How can I edit my custom docs so that full reference appears?
I run a consultancy whereby our standard agreements are prepaid - i. e. clients pre-purchase blocks of hours at the beginning of each month.
And how I should reconcile ?
Currently I can only find a field for 'Item'
Firstly, the error message.
eg 03123455 instead of 3123455.
What's that for?
Not sure if it should be ticked or not?
For better or worse (usually worse ;) I'm used to Quickbooks, and it would have included those doubled transactions in the statement balance, which would have made it wrong and alerted me to the problem.
My CPA will be doing her work off of reports, so having extra data there could be a bit of a problem.
But I cannot.
I have lost patience.
We have a small number of employees who have company credit cards.
For example, the GST amount in bills from Telstra is less than 10% (presumably because a component of their service is exempt); e. g. in a $99.
99 bill the GST stated on the bill is $6.
Unfortunately Telstra does not itemise the exempt/non-exempt components in their bills so they can't be easily entered as separate line items.
The simply state the GST amount.
I have put an inquiry in a couple of weeks ago and it's being looked into, but still haven't heard anything back.
Is there a way without manually doing it?
do you have any quick fix in the meantime?
I have trawled through the help centre, community forums, and online tutorials - 8 hours of research to no avail.
So today all my reconciliations disappeared.
Today nothing is reconciled past April.
It has me fairly freaked out.
If this detail is missing, what else is missing as well?
I was under the impression that one of the major benefits to a cloud solution was that you removed this risk.
Can anyone point me in the right direction, to view/edit/delete an Asset Types?
I have entered all the purchases for the last two months.
I now wish to allocate payments against them.
Hey guys, i know this has been mentioned before in here but is there any update if this issue with the PayPal refunds is going to be fixed?
I was pretty happy with it and started importing my entire paypal transactions from the last 12 months.
My automatic feed imported everything from 21st of April, and i manually imported the rest before that.
All the months where i have manually imported are spot on.
Another key feature that turned me off from QuickBooks is that I cannot delete someone from the current list of members I have, making it much more cluttered and confusing.
However, this feature isn't really required since I could find a way around it.
We have a member of staff that has been taking a lot of unpaid leave.
Both transactions have exactly the same code.
If you require further info (or screenshots) please let me know.
We're having an Opencart store set up (www.
co. uk) and we are on Amazon and ebay.
I have set up automatic feeds but they have missed 3 months worth of transactions.
We are currently using Accountants Office for our general ledgers and as such importing MYOB files is pretty straight forward.
I can't find any way of importing existing claims for staff (i. e. from our conversion date of 1/1/13 and now).
Here's a list of the reports now available for payroll:Payroll Activity SummaryPayroll Activity DetailsTransaction Listing Summary – NewTransaction Listing Detail – NewTimesheet Summary – NewTimesheet Details – NewSuperannuation AccrualSuperannuation PaymentLeave Balances – NewLeave TransactionsLeave Requests – NewPayment Summary Details – NewEmployee Remuneration – NewEmployee Contact DetailsTake a look at our , or the  for more information.
I'm attempting to organize my contact groups.
However, in my menu the Remove from Group and Move to Group buttons don't appear as they do in the Help Center.
It would be great to hear some advice.
I saw that there are plans to integrate with Authorize.
Can we assume that this integration will take advantage of Authorize.
I have a removals and storage firm and I am setting up the Inventory items.
This also goes for the ' Insurance' inventory item.
How do I assign an item purchase to a specific contact?
XXX for example not the address we log in with.
However, with this latest release, you seemed to have removed the delete transaction feed.
I have also seen no way to deal with batch payments.
I am pretty sure however all manual reconcilers understand the difference between deleting a transaction and unreconciling one, and we have now been dealt a pretty hard blow through you solving the problem for some of your users.
I am unaware of some of the options available.
We work on project basis.
We have 6 projects going on right now.
Hoping some one can help with a problem we've encountered when trying to reconcile transactions that have gone through the merchant machine.
After an hour of investigation, I can't seem to find the reason behind this.
This appeared to have been working fine in October and November but December and January's fee refunds haven't come across from PayPal.
The deposit has now matured and we have earned some interest.
This works really well and I'm very happy with one problem.
My login/email address is me@companyA.
Obviously this is great when they're for companyA but it looks very unprofessional when it comes from companyB.
Is this feature simply not available or am I missing something obvious?
One problem however - the resolution of receipts captured by the app is quite poor.
We have tested this on two phones and under different lighting conditions but still we have the same problem.
I am getting the message .
I try to run the return for the previous month but get the same message.
The other reason is because I'm hilariously pedantic so will triple-check things and make sure I'm 100% happy with everything.
But of course it isn't completely possible to have one's best-practice set from day 1 as things will grow and change.
I've tried searching for results, tried exploring the demo company plenty, and so on.
I searched but was unable to find an answer to my question.
)My question pertains to some deposits that were made that contained checks from multiple clients.
I want to split these deposits up and assign each amount to each client during reconciliation, but cannot figure out how to do this.
My wages and salaries are not showing up on the activity statement.
would it be .
This has now thrown the balancing out.
It's available today on the Android app and will be followed closely by the iPhone app (after it's gone through the App Store approval process).
Some of our customers have terms 'End of Next Month'.
I then added my actual trading address to the Physical Address section.
We have a few minor fixed-amount fees (such as $4.
In other words, it's an automatic draw against checking.
This graph (I assume that's what it is) never loads for me.
If I want to demonstrate the life of a Fixed Asset from start to finish it is easier to do it with no other data in the system.
I have a 50000 EUR bill, and I made a prepayment (overpayment) to my supplier in both EURO and USD currencies.
But I still select "OK".
In a nutshell:An employee travels for 3 months.
He has a fair amount of reimbursement claims (flights, lodging, meals).
I want to reimburse based on a per diem rate.
But if I have to enter all transactions the total won't match the per diem rate.
Maybe attach the Excel to that reimbursement transaction (if that is possible).
Is there a recommended workflow?
We are and Ad agency and act as an agent for media purchases.
We buy from the media at a net rate and bill the client with a 15% gross rate.
At the moment, I see I can forward post journals to do this, but using the copy function.
Anyone else think the same?
As the ATO doesn't send you a BAS bill per se.
I don't have anything in the system to reconcile it to.
However I can't find a similar functionality for line items on a receipt in an expense claim, how are VAT adjustments handled here?
The date on the voucher prints over the check number, the word Amount and each dollar amount is cutoff because they appear to be outside the margins.
Ultimately I'd want to reimport it after some alterations.
Have I missed something?
or is this part of the Reporting issues that are unavailable.
The other 320 contacts aren't even contacts.
Also, there are over a hundred reference numbers being listed as a 'contact' with no info related to it and I have no idea what it is and why they have been added as a contact.
I'm not sure if this is making sense, but if anyone can decipher what I'm trying to explain I would appreciate some help.
can we please have a VAT rate for purchases from suppliers which are taxable supplies but have not had VAT charged on them eg suppliers who are too small to be registered for VAT.
I have successfully imported an .
This does work but whereas the .
cant find any information in the help pages.
Customers have the possibility to subscribe to a service online for a year.
I'm getting stuck because I can't see a way to do that.
Are my only options to:a) upgrade at cost for this one paymentb) do a rough conversion to UK punds and enter that in the expense claim?
Check out the .
Trial Balance - No comparative Years (Up to six years would be helpful)2.
Exporting transactions and using pivot tables is not a valid work around.
We've imported a statement and there are hundreds of identical entries.
I have a small/medium size (Oil & Gas) company with a complex structure:    • One parent company with 3 subsidiary companies in different countries/currencies.
Do you have the ability to have 1 owner and 4 small companies?
I have been through the help pages on the system and followed instructions.
Is there a simpler way?
I'd love to hear how others handle this situation.
It will not save.
I have a total amount of 2093.
As an old systems engineer in SaaS development I know this is always something being worked on but I did want to bring it to the forefront.
Whether it's caching, rollover servers, distributed network, or a number of other things please continue efforts on shortening these page delays.
I have entered the opening balances.
Remittance Advice for Suppliers2.
Same as point 3, but for statements.
An help is greatly appreciated!
They are currently using Quickbooks and the file is incredibly slow due to the detail.
We have not modified this template in any way so I would have expected this to show up as a line item somewhere.
Discounts do show up on the regular (non .
docx documents to present discounting?
I'm coming over from producing financials in XPA.
I apologise in advance if this has already been answered elsewhere, i did conduct a search but couldn't find anything.
(i. e. to keep a record of the values from that sheet.
5% to 15%.
I've played in the Demo company but all I can see is the export of the entire customer list, and then once this is done, there's no field showing the group that each customer belonged to to allow a sort to be done in excel?
WQ - West Australian Spend and QAPE'bleWAS - WA Spend onlyNWQ - Not WA Spend and Not QAPE'bleQAPE - Qualifying Australian Expenditure Do you know if there is an easy way to do this?
Any ideas on a good way to code transactions based on a comment left by a client in the discuss field?
There does not seem to be a problem with our internet service but each week I have the same problem.
Everytime I enter receipts to the Expense Claims section, every single cafe/restaurant/store that I enter into the "Receipt From" box ends up being added as a Contact in my Contact List.
I now have a bunch of random stores overcrowding my contacts list.
It obviously depends on many factors and different reasons have been given to me for using the different approaches.
Interested to hear how you tell clients to treat their creditors expenses and the reasons why.
Anyone have any advice on making the move?
I expect it to be similar to migrating from MYOB, but haven't started yet.
Ideally ordered by date entered or transaction id?
If worest case senario happened and I want to run my own backups eg monthly, is this possible?
We'll also give an overview of our pricing structure and options for a complete solution for your practice including practice management via .
My PAYG tax figure is ~ $5,000But I received a GST refund/credit of ~ $500.
Great – if I’d known that on the 1st January, I would have started it on that day!
Since I did that on the 04/03, PayPal auto import has stopped working completely.
I have the same permissions on each.
I've been unable to find much guidance on this so if anyone has any suggestions or can point me in the right direction it would be much appreciated.
Have determined they have 3 likley options.
Each has merit, but they also have issues.
Cash Coding - seems to be only available once recieved and appears to be FA only2.
Our company has a number of loans in foreign currency.
For the monthly and annual reports we have to revalue the loans which adds up to our work.
I have checked the help guides and it says that it should have automatically updated.
Where should I be looking for an overview of our current financial position?
I would have expected this to be on the dashboard somewhere.
I've looked at the reports, but can't find one which fits the bill.
To be honest, I never pause my eye to look at them, but they do give the "impression" of something useful if you know what I mean.
Hello all,I had one of my employees enter several expense claims for other employees (personal mileage, meals, etc).
We both have the "financial advisor" role(permission) assigned.
We're unsure why we can't see the claims that we both have entered.
If there is greater demand and it looks easy enough for Yodlee to conquer then it might happen quicker.
For now they seem more concerned with larger markets such as the UK.
The last 2 days of the current payrun period requires several earnings rate changes.
We are subscribed to a British service that charges us £29.
Im after a system where i can control by debtors a bit better, send email reminders when not payed or email me when not payed.
Have found http://debtordaddy.
$29/month does seem a bit extreme for such a simple functionality.
at least if i had quickbooks locally installed i could work on it in my own pace without the pressure.
So they accumulate their money for extra garden work in winter.
My accountant then suggested that 70/30 would be a more realistic split.
what is server crashes and looses all info?
It seems to mostly happen on the dates between statements.
The award he is employed under states that the leave loading is to be calculated as 17.
I normally download my ABA files for payroll fine.
Today, it is not working.
Your advice is much appreciated!
The employee was notified of the change but that doesn't get through to admin.
My Payroll Activity Statement balances to my Wages payable transactions!
However it is then showing a negative in the Gross Amount section.
Can anyone tell me what to do to stop the negative amount showing under gross amount?
HiI have a client who has processed an employees wage in December 2016 & January 2017 with a pre-tax deduction that should have been a post tax deduction.
Annual leave is accrued correctly in our system as a 7.
48 hours per day and we must manually adjust the leave hours amount.
6 hours))Why would they be paid more for 20 days in July than in June?
(She's on XeroMe for iPhone)
PS: is there a way to search in the forums with "word AND word AND word"  - by default it uses "word OR word OR word" which is kinda useless.
We recently hired a 16 year old girl for a retail store which opened Mid May.
There's no super details on her previous payslips.
Also, how I can calculate how much super is owed to her since it's not on her past payslips?
Some of the things I'm wondering include:1) Assigning default earning rates (and allowances possibly).
I've noticed that when payroll was set up some employees were assigned leave types that they are not entitled to.
Also, some of those leave types were incorrectly set to accrue etc.
On July 1st all of our employee's will get a 3.
Not sure what to do.
One of which is the lack of employee numbers.
So at the moment employee number is more useful.
E. g. if agree and processed pre 30 June, however not paid till after?
We don't have timesheets.
HiI have an employee who has advised they have a HECS debt.
I have not processed a payroll for them yet.
It would be great if.
Particularly helpful if having to set up Long Service Leave for a number of staff  - would be far more efficient and no, I shouldn't have to keep an Excel spreadsheet to track this, it should be a default.
in my opinionCheers
Why is this - am I missing a point?
Since we did this, his leave isn't accruing.
Am I right in thinking that changing the name from 'Ordinary Hours' was the cause of this?
Hello,I have entered the hours worked for my employees and their rate but it is not calculating the annual salary correctly.
In the NT the LSL entitlement is 13 weeks after 10 years.
Broken down it equates to 1.
Based on a 40 hour working week that = 52 hours per year.
I know the daily rate of the accrual is 0.
Then Posted the Payrun.
Expense and liability balances look right.
W2 is correct amount.
How to fix ?
Nothing is in the earnings, PAYG, Superannuation etc.
and no employees are included.
The status says draft, not sure if that helps or not.
Calculation (ie reported as a negative reducing W1 total value)Does anyone know where I can change the Excluded from W1 to Included?
HiAny of your peeps out there have had to set up a complex payroll system.
Not sure whether unused annual leave falls under termination payments or not?
It only began happening while I was doing a payroll last week.
I've also had a problem while processing a payroll that when I try to save a payroll transaction I receive the "aw snap something's gone wrong" message.
It happens with almost every employee.
It only started for the last couple of payrolls.
I have set up payroll and it all seemed to be working well.
Can someone please tell me what I have set wrong so that I can get this fixed up.
I've been reviewing the dates of leave that have been inputted into our payroll and noticed that some of our entries have incorrect dates.
I have searched the support but some of the remedies are not available to me.
35% of ordinary earnings to MyLeave so that if the employee leaves the company he still has a long service leave balance.
It would be good if we could as it would reduce requirement for  a manual journal at end of each month.
- is there anything else I have to manually do?
How can I set this up so there is no PAYG involved.
In particular if the ATO issued SGC notice and you have to then try to prove who was paid.
This process involves a manual objection with manual proof to be provided.
I have input all employees and their details and wages amounts.
5 hours per week as per all other employees on file.
I've compared it against the other employees and cannot work out why.
I am trying to load the next fortnightly timesheet period but it is missing; the next available one is for 4 weeks away!
I also tried this with and without my employees name.
Click Super should definitely send out a quarterly statement showing this information, and frankly, I cannot believe it's not illegal to withold this information.
I have lodged a complaint with the Superannuation Ombudsman.
63 (which is excluding their Super)
I am trying to set up 2 PT employees (20 hrs pw ea) with their starting leave balance and weekly accrual.
53hrs accruing each, but it starts at 19.
98hrs for no reason.
There is no starting balance at this point.
Have I missed something glaringly obvious?
We currently have only salaried employees (in R&D and Office management) but are about to commence production and will be employing technicians on an hourly basis.
I've assigned 'default leave' for this staff with calculation method set as 'based on ordinary earnings.
Any one came across the same situation?
These sub contractors all trade through a company (ACN), they are not deemed employees and as such we are essentially paying a bill to a company for services rendered (i. e. no superannuation or PAYG implications).
In retail some work longer hours certain days but totalling 38 hours per week.
is that correct?
I paid $256 with no Super in January for work in December.
If I delete the line I get a message that 'Payslips for employees aged 18 years or over must include a Superannuation Guarantee Contribution line with a calculation rate of Percentage or Statutory Rate'.
hione of my employees bought a computer for work.
One of our employee ceases employment on April 2016, but has reportable fringe benefits.
She is not entitled to the Govt paid maternity leave.
When I look at my employee's payslips under the heading Salary/wages it has the wrong name EgShould say Robert Smith but another employee name will appear  John Black.
Trying to create a 'payrun' that reflects the pays reimbursed and the sick leave hours returned to employee.
The last couple of months we have had no work for the casuals.
Anyway to the point.
Sorry if this has been raised but couldn't find it.
I selected the wrong option - i selected Annual Leave - without Loading instead of Annual Leave - with Loading.
but i can not delete it.
What to do?
1. to multiply the normal casual rate by a number (eg 1.
Is there a reason why we can't edit this box?
(usually those that I have put in that I want to edit but cant change and so they are useless to me! )
698 hours in the leave balance.
Now my question is does this mean they have 56.
I did have a bookkeeper but they are no longer with me so I am on my own my personal records believe that they have used all their accured RDOS and shouldn't have such a large amount of hours left.
Ok. About to put my fist through the computer screen.
Does anybody know how to resolve this?
So even if I unreconciled it I can't fix it as it is the total amount of all the employees wages.
I don't want to set up a fixed rate accrual, but it appears that they may be my only option.
However, the SGC Super Statutory Rate calculation is incorrect.
The correct earnings figure x 9.
5% equates to a lesser figure than that shown under the Superannuation section.
Can I clarify which tax code I should be using for wages and salaries (i. e. gst free expenses, BAS excluded) and also which code I should be using for contractor payments.
Please note that some contractors are registered for GST and some are not.
Is there a facility or any suggestions on how we might import leave types and dates from our timesheet program (Harvest)?
I have one person working for me on a working holiday visa.
So I have withheld too much tax for those two.
HiDoes anyone know how to process superannuation for Employer Additional Contributions that are non-reportable - ie that are required as part of an industrial agreement?
I have already ticked the "show balance on payslip" under Payroll Settings.
I'm trying to work out how to zero out sick/carer's leave on the anniversary of their employment.
At present we have employees with sick/carer's leave balances of over 400 hours!
I've been told that on the anniversary of each employees start date, I should put the sick leave balance to 80 hours and then deduct over the year if they take sick leave.
Advice from Accountants is to keep a separate record of Directors wages from employees to assist with financial reporting and lending.
Have I missed something or is it in the pipeline?
Checking the Accue Leave boxes gave zeroes, so these had to remain unchecked.
Is there another way?
Could we put in the percentage tax EG.
some of our seasonal workers in Australia are on 15%- all seasonal  backpackers and Visa Number 403
5904What it the leave accrued?
where that number come from?
are these data related to each other or not?
I was going to then raise a bill for my outstanding wages but assume that would double up the oweing $$s.
not sure what to do to track unpaid wages to myself.
I have a client who has set up employees incorrectly and added an Accrual for Public Holidays.
I have removed the balance in a nil payrun, and stopped this leave from accruing, but is there any way I can delete it from the Leave Tab as it is still showing in the Leave Balances section (as nil).
Have I done something wrong?
I have published our latest Qtly BAS but have now noticed that I have entered a figure incorrectly.
I have not sent it to the ATO yet (I don't think!
I have all other options to choose from, Earnings Line, Deduction line, Super Line etc.
All employees are on fixed salaries and all work a five day, 38 hour week.
During the week ended January 6th, all staff were on annual leave for four days (3/1, 4/1, 5/1 and 6/1) and all were paid for the public holiday on 2/1.
The annual leave had been previously been entered and approved under the "leave" tab in each employee's file.
I would be interested to know if anyone has come across this problem before and would appreciate any advice on the matter.
HiHopefully a quick fix to this.
Some of our employees were loaded into the system as being paid fortnightly and should have been monthly.
These were processed in December period and the employees have been paid.
I have tried to set up payroll accordingly but cannot for the life of me figure out how to do that.
A payrun journal has a Super Expense of $1304.
32 (DR) and a Super Liability of $410.
I have narrowed it to 4 employees each with a different Super Fund (though others in the payrun have the same as the 4 that are allocated correctly).
The rest ($893.
I have successfully paid an Employee in several payruns recently.
I have a staff member that resigned and has departed two weeks prior to the full notice period had passed.
The other hours worked were ordinary hours and paid leave.
However we've noticed that the annual leave has been accrued at the full, normal amount of hours, rather than the pro-rated paid hours/total hours in the period.
Obviously we don't accrue annual leave on unpaid leave.
Does anyone have a fix for masking the payroll information?
5% loading orthe shift loadings including any weekend penalties the employee normally gets.
FYI the ATO website says it's the employers responsibility to determine if an employee is a backpacker.
I look forward to your replies.
When trying to do the export we were getting an error 500:Details from the API:2016 Dec 06 08:58	/payroll.
Also check the API Status page http://developer.
com/api-status/ for current service status.
</Message></ApiException>We checked the API status page and it said there were no issues.
As we could not export the data via the API we reverted to doing the payroll manually.
But the amount of tax calculated is way too much!
When on leave they will be paid 40 hours per week @ $27 per hour.
I have no idea how to set this up in payroll.
Is my understanding correct?
In the leave set up are do I putLeave calculation method - Based on ordinary earningsHours accrued annually - 160 hrs ( 4 weeks of annual leave .
Hello, I have been in discussion with REEF this morning regarding an issue with Annual Leave Loading and the Real Estate Award.
I note in my P&L that superannuation doesnt allocate into the tracking categories.
Is this a known problem or might I not be set up properly.
I cant find any reference to superannuation tracking in the help section.
In addition, our BAS has already been processed for the Jul-Spet quarter.
Do you know of any other places this could be set up incorrectly and overriding the coding e. g. somewhere in one of the employee set ups?
I am currently having trouble recording:1.
The overpayment of wages that was made ie.
At the moment the Annual Leave is going there but the LSL is going to the gross payments which is not correct.
I have one employee who earns less than $450.
They work a minimum of 25 hours a week right up to 38 hours a week.
Their employment contract allows for annual leave and sick leave to be calculated on a percentage of the total of hours worked.
MYOB allows you to calculate Annual leave at 7.
And Sick Leave at 3.
84% of gross hours .
I have a problem with the super setup.
I have signed up with ClickSuper.
Question 1.
Now under my Settings -> Superannuation, I got 2 super funds that I added in.
Namely ANZ and HOSTPLUS.
Question 2.
Question 3.
Hello XeroIt would be Super Awesome if you could arrange some sort of alert when an employee has a birthday coming up.
I do payroll for a cafe and most of the employees are under 21.
its good for PR and to know when to get a cake!
They have the fortnight set up as 80 hours (40 hour week) and all leave is accrued accordingly.
Is that possible?
The change is from a Monday to Friday.
Our employment contracts allow staff to accrue 10 days of personal leave in their first year of service then 12 days per year for each subsequent year.
They have been terminated and email address removed from their original employee record.
They have been deleted from employee access portal.
We have staff working 5 days a week from Tuesday to Saturday.
Upon looking into it, It shows the individual amount paid out to my 2 employees, and then also shows the total amount of the two payments including tax, again,  under the heading "PAYROLL EXPENSE JOURNAL" I have obviously done something wrong, and one of the amounts shouldnt be there - But i dont know what or how :(Any advice will be greatly appreciated.
I have tried clearing the cache and the same thing happens.
Our payrun works fine for all but one employee.
Is this something that will kick in at a minimum wage rate?
Is there site maintenance currently on?
every button under my payroll dropdown lands me on a "We're sorry, a problem has occurred. "
Employer is then required to reduce the PAYGW in accordance with the software formulas contained in NAT 1004.
But it is not uploading.
I have an employee who has recently started receiving a Car Allowance.
The problem is his Car Allowance value will change if he takes days off, plus tax is withheld from the allowance, so it doesn't seem correct I'd enter an actual amount here?
We have a team member who used to work for us a couple of years ago and has recently rejoined the company.
Or is it completely locked?
The award is $21.
We are going to have our first October Payroll very soon, but as it is a fortnightly payroll, it will cover days from September.
Please can I check my logic with this.
Is that correct?
Annual/personal leave is only accruing on one of them?
The situation is staff are salaried (annual amount/hours = hourly rate) however they are paid monthly in arrears (last day of the month) for the actual number of days worked and not simply Annual salary / 12 months.
This is clearly different between months January and February as an example.
The amount paid by Workcover is not ordinary hours nor a reimbursement.
This makes it ineligible for Super Guarentee pmts.
My concern is whether I have created a problem for myself somewhere I haven't thought of yet.
Sundays are coming through as ordinary hours and cannot work out how to correct this.
We have three types of leave that are cumulative with no maximum accrual (annual, sick + carer's, and long service) and two types of leave that are non-cumulative - they reset each year (compassionate and parental).
The amount is $229 and is from a payslip from the 2015/2016 financial year.
I have searched the help files but nothing on casual seems to come up.
I have had feedback from both a client and the ATO that this is causing a major problem.
This was quite difficult to resolve.
When the ATO receives the second file lodgement they have told me directly that they do NOT identify which records have been amended and they cannot “ignore” records that have already been lodged and have NOT been amended.
How have others completed the lodgement process to avoid this double up?
Hello,I think it would be great if we could assign a job code to wages in Payroll.
The Annual Entitlement was over stated.
I create the employee record and set the start date to 1/7/16.
There are no payruns on the system for July, Aug and Sept yet.
On the TFN declarations they have ticked the box to claim the tax-free threshold from us.
I think this will get us into trouble with the ATO.
I am obviously doing something incorrectly.
Is there something else I can check?
2 hours and start accruing again at the weekly rate of 1.
4615 until it again reaches 76 hours.
It's all very messy and could be easily fixed with a settable ceiling.
They have since taken leave.
Is there a way to stop the old leave type showing on the payslips (keeping in mind if we change the setting in Payroll settings to not show, this will effect all existing employees still under this method)?
newbie here.
I can see that If I allocate the 'Approve Leave' option against an employee record, a Team management tab appears.
I have a monthly calendar setup already.
I do not understand the difference.
As we have noticed the hourly rate changes monthly (due to the amount of hours/days worked).
So we are aware a 28 day month will be paid more per day than a 31 day month.
(Again with the 28 day month Vs. the 31 day month example; a person who takes 10 days off in the 28 day month will be getting paid more than the person who takes 10 days off in the 31 day month)
I'm having an issue with the timesheets for employees.
The employees had been previously set up before i begun with the company therefore i am learning as i go.
It's a variation calculated due to investments and other deductions.
Hican someone help me with steps to setup Salary Sacrifice for a laptop?
I would assume it was leave taken this financial year, but it doesn't calculate to that.
This was on the initial application form.
The usi is 40022701955001.
I have Two Casual Employees.
Both have been set up in Payroll the same way.
What or where have I gone wrong in setting up the second employee?
Would this have changed the tax calculations for some reason or is something else at work?
but we are not getting the texts.
We have checked our settings and ensured our mobile number is in the international format.
We have deleted our file and redone the process .
and nothing.
or where do i see the difference?
My annual and long service leave provisions are not correct.
How do I adjust them to reflect the true figures?
It was done well over a week ago and payments are due very soon.
I am preparing month-end reports for one of my clients.
For example, Last week of May 2016 has 2 days in May and rest of the days in June.
I have set up annual leave on the payslip template but it does not accrual and requires an amount to be entered into the field.
In addition on the draft payslip there are two tax deduction line when there should be one only.
But when i go back into the draft payslip two tax deduction lines.
I have an employee who has been terminated.
I have a staff member who the system is accruing Annual and Personal Leave incorrectly for.
They began in April 2016, and I set them up for Leave with 0 balance and accruing at:Annual Leave = 152h p. a. and 12.
67h p. c. m. Personal Leave = 76h p. a. and 6.
33h p. c. m. But after 3months they have accrued 121.
6h for each!
I have set up other employees the same way and it is working fine.
In the past, (prior to JULY 1 2016) each week I raised a "bill" to reconcile our weekly staff payments.
We have an employee that is starting with us on a yearly salary, she will be working a total of 41.
Can anyone give any advise on how to go about doing this the correct way?
It would be helpful if the employee start date was added to payroll reports.
This would be very helpful when calculating Long Service Leave accruals when the employee gets to 7 years.
At the moment she is manually writing out the payments summaries for all staff to get around this.
Doing my best to try to convince her otherwise that it's a good system, but am a bit stumped on this one unless she lodges them all and then lodges an amendment.
How do you get the PE journals to appear as an available match?
yes the HECS option is ticked.
I have someone one who used to be an employee and is returning.
Should I have cleared that at Termination?
It would be very helpfully if this information was shown as some funds have the same name for their product but different USI/ SPINS
Preferrably also where the sender is the Employing Company.
Everything I find is a bit vague.
I'm left always and only with an 'approve' option.
Across the company this self-approve behaviour is inconsistent with the various settings and flags that may be driving it.
That is, some people can select their authoriser, and others cannot.
This seems independent of their respective payroll admin or approve leave permissions.
I see that there has been a duplication of one employee, who was terminated and then restarted.
These transactions span several payruns, so I didnt want to go to each and every one (some are too long ago) and amend.
His allowances were put through incorrectly - should have been misc allowance.
Is there another way?
Hello,Our employees have leave loading on their annual leave at 17.
5% so Super is calculating on it.
5% onto of the 17.
So I know that employees get 10 days/year for 'sick/personal' leave but I didn't think this kept accruing?
Have mostly casual employees, so leave not normally an issue.
Have one permanent that works 6 day / 48 hour week.
The third step in the EOFY Payroll checklist is to reconcile the payroll totals to the GL, stating that these should match - https://help.
For example we accrue long service leave provisions against our salary & wage expense and so the GL will not match the payroll activity amounts.
I have set up auto super run and it has been approved.
Now it is saying that is pending processing.
Does this mean that there is a set timetable for all auto super runs?
My issue though is that when the employee completes their annual tax return they repay HELP based on their "Repayment Income",  which is their gross taxable income (here $1,200 x 52) plus any RFBA's (here $30,000).
In this situation the difference is substantial.
The weekly HELP repayment on $62,400 pa is $54,  or $2,808 pa.  Based on $92,400 the weekly HELP repayment is $124,  or $6,448.
So to my understanding this staff member may well face a real tax debt of $3,640 when they lodge their tax return for the year,  even though they completed their TFN Declaration accurately and stated they have a HELP debt and that more tax should be withheld from their pays.
My questions then are as follows:1.
For instance some extra calculations for each staff member who salary sacrifices and has a HELP debt to allow for likely additional tax withheld for the difference between the gross taxable income and their "Repayment Income"?
This could then be used to automatically adjust PAYGW for staff in such situations.
Thoughts and comments greatly appreciated.
I have gone through the payroll checklist for EOFY and physically approached staff who I knew had changed address over the year.
Could I suggest that the staff could perhaps email requests for change of address via a reply email on their payslips?
I have apprentices ranging from 1-4 years on various payscales and entitlements.
Each apprentice year is paid a different travel allowance rate.
Is there anything else i should be aware of?
I have a client who prefers to track Leave in days - but i can't figure out how to change the Unit that leave is recorded in.
The task involved has been reduced to minimum now.
However I wish to make an estimated June super contribution in order to ensure I receive a tax deduction this financial year.
I am trying to setup my Employee grouping from Settings, General Settings, Tracking which has both tracking job populated from the Old MYOB Jet Convert conversion.
If I try to delete one it warns that there are jobs attached to transactions so it will be archived.
RedundancyBonusFBTUnion Fees/SubscriptionsLease PaymentsOther Post Tax DeductionsOther Pre Tax DeductionsAllowances exempt from Tax withholding and SuperAllowances subject to Tax withholding and SuperThanks
I have repeatedly requested that they call me and they refuse.
Has anyone seen on their information that they provide internet support only and WILL NOT CALL or talk to people.
I have not!
Understandable it I demand a phone call daily.
But then again is it?
MYOB offer this service, admittedly this must be paid for but then it is up to the consumer.
I know that my accountant did warn me!
We have an employee who advised they have a HECS debt, so I ticked the HECS/HELP box when setting them up in payroll.
Is there something missing in my payroll set up that's causing this?
I have joined a company that has set up all its employees with a 40 hour week when in fact the employees only work 38.
If not, when will there be an update to correct this.
Is there super paid on IW payments etc.
During the 2015 year an employee was 'moved' from the payroll of one company to the other - or should I rather say, the employee was stopped being paid in one company, and started being paid in the other (no proper transfer was done).
The reason why I ask.
Does this mean their super is calculated incorrectly too?
Hello allA staff member is taking the 25th April to 9th May which is 64 hours, she only has 38.
7808 in annual leave the rest 25.
I have noticed that the Superannuation Payables hasnt been credited for payments made for 1 past employee.
5 x rate for first 2 hours, and 2x rate thereafter) be applied or is this a manual calculation.
But it does not accept goes to zero, why wont it accept 100% salary sacrifice.
I've had to close all other internet based applications/windows to see if this was the problem.
0000, although the employee worked morn than 40 odrinary hours.
Leave calculation method is based on ordinary earnings and it was all fine before.
I have no idea why it has problem now.
we cannot submit or approve leave requests today.
Where has the previous week gone and can I get it back?
My employee's are paid allowances based on km worked & hours.
I don't understand why the default uses Unpaid Leave.
Have I missed something?
Does this mean if it is ticked they are already claiming the threshold or they want to claim it?
A client has asked us to create ABA files for payroll and email to them so that they can upload into CBA Internet banking.
We are considering starting a voluntary charity deduction for those of our staff who wish to participate.
On termination of employees I've clicked on the 'leave' tab and selected 'unused annual leave on termination' and selected 'paid out'.
Can someone please tell me how to zero out all the leave balances for terminating employee's?
Should I set it up differently?
So my reconciliation is out by the reimbursement amount.
Spent ages looking online for help to no avail.
I chose to enter the transactions in a manual journal.
Does anyone have the same issue?
Can some please assist as it is frustrating.
All tax, super etc is accounted for on the full amount.
Previously we had multiple leave accrual types based on FT, PT, Salary, etc.
When processing a salary sacrifice I understand that I enter the transaction as a pre-tax deduction on the salary/payslip template for the appropriate employee.
He is on holidays.
Payroll Calendar may not be changed while an unprocessed timesheet exists for this employee.
All leave has been approved and nothing is outstanding.
The leave is from January.
I have looked at thier records and it appears to be the same as other employees who have had the sgc calculated.
and how?
Now today I cannot find it?
I can't figure out how to make it come up with the selection of approvers?
I've made sure I have the correct file type/format and size.
or even click on 'Delete note' in error.
I personally think there should be an option to edit note only by the user that's logged in - not for anyone else and no option to delete.
I'm trying to find a definitive answer but had no luck.
When setting up LSL in payroll for employees it asks for hours accrued annually.
8779 x completed years of service = weeks of LSL owed.
Now we want to start using it again from the most recent month.
We found that we cannot edit opening balance.
We also tried to delete all the record so we can start all over again from the most recent month, but we cannot delete employees card.
We process our payroll in weekly basis so entering half year would be a big job to us.
I generated my W2s but they say at the bottom that they can't be filed directly with the Social Security Administration.
We have an employee who is now on Maternity Leave.
I am going to set up a unpaid Maternity Leave type for her, but i was wondering if i should follow any particular guidelines for this please?
And how would I proceed with doing that?
I am trying to set-up leave for two employees.
For now I am having trouble setting up the ordinary earnings rate.
The calendar is set to fortnightly.
If not there tax is calculated as a Foreign resident.
Is it right to do so?
initial payslip, I entered -32hrs for annual leave.
this gave me a balance of -4.
7976revised payslip, I entered -24hrs for annual leave.
This still have me a balance of -4.
Could this be the cause?
It would be much better to simply enter the dates you want.
Also I was using a computer this week with a smaller screen and the annual leave box kept disappearing over the top of the screen and I couldn't drag it down.
But it worked out that he is only working on a casual basis.
So I have worked out how to reverse the incorrectly accrued leave types.
My issue is how do I UN - assign leave type, so that on his payslip, these leaves dont keep coming up, and accruing.
2 but no $$$ value.
The holidays were set up via a leave application form.
All employee details and super details added.
I don't want to have to change the hourly rate each month to get to whatever total that particular month will be, that's messy.
However Leave balance only shows 73hrs instead of 160.
I want to re-calculate each period, and process one adjustment.
When we started using zero we didn't set up long service leave.
Do i calculate the amount of long service leave as of today or from the date we started using zero to enter into my employees entitlements?
Unless someone out there knows of any other way and if they do I would appreciate the feedback.
Does anybody know of a work around rather than harassing clients to find hard copies?
We have clients who have accommodation cost deductions from staff who stay on their premises.
This is an income to the clients.
it needs to be look at promptly.
why have a sophisticated program that automates everything to be let down by simple coding.
I did not receive the payroll opening balances for beginning of last financial year until now and so have entered them, however, the current balances are now annual leave over 2000 hours in 12 months and over 1000 hours in personal leave over 12 months.
We have staff members who work a 10 hour day every Monday and they have been doing this for several years.
I have found very few solutions to this problem and all seem strange and complicated.
Below is my problem and my solution, but I'm hoping someone can confirm what I've done is correct.
one employee is bringing her partner.
I saw payroll liabilities as credits and reconciled pays as debits.
I also saw my deduction as a credit.
It all looks good to be, but I'm worried at how simple it was!
Does compassionate leave come out of personal/carers leave or annual leave?
I'm feeling way I over my head here!
The only option it will give me is for the following week!
Which when I look for does not exist.
There is not a "rejected" Timesheet nothing!
My calculation is that their hourly rate should be $25.
Does this mean that we have been under paying our staff or am I missing something?
Can I set up Long Service Leave where it is calculated by number of hours worked each week?
My staff are casual and their hours vary each week.
I am concerned about getting the payroll information correct.
I have searched the tutorials and online but I cannot seem to find information on setting up payroll templates.
I must keep track of hours worked.
If you click on Payroll->Employee->Individual Employee, you can see a dropdown list.
Now it includes terminated.
This is confusing because we sometimes have returning staff where we set up another profile - now the staff's name is showing up twice.
Would really love to see this functionality put into development!
Not entirely happy with upgrade in regards to adding part hours.
If standard day in firm is 7.
5 hours day why does the employee have to see 8 hours?
The application will feed into payroll with the correct 7.
5 hours or if the payroll administrator applies for leave under employee tab then correct 7.
I have been informed that the 8 hours has been chosen as the default as apparently most businesses work a 40 hour week.
For an employee to apply for leave with 8 hours showing up this is confusing and does not make sense.
When applying for consecutive leave days there is still no option for employee to enter hours and payroll administrator still needs to correct leave request for correct hours.
I'm sure this is to match having the Navigation - Buttons at the bottom of the page to navigate between pages of a list
How do I make "Ordinary Earnings Rate" field on the "Employees" > Employment Tab equal Ordinary Hours plus Ordinary Sat Hours?
To give a real quick run down of my position i recently purchased the company i worked for for 23 years.
The old owner had a casual book keeper and used an ancient version of MYOB.
The workshop generally shuts for around 2 weeks.
We have past approved employee leave and noticed that past leave status show Scheduled and some show complete.
We are presuming we have missed a step with the past leave applications showing scheduled, can you help?
I have a terminated employee.
It may even reduce future admin as they could retrieve payslip history etc.
au/it-pro/security-it/five-hundred-tax-file-numbers-hacked-every-day-20151028-gklcx7.
We therefore have two payroll records for him.
The old terminated record is visible in the history tab.
The first fortnight I used the incorrect rate and overpaid an employee an amount.
5%, and received the net of all these as cash.
Example:Employee's package is $12,000/Month inclusive of tax and super.
For the vast majority of functions it has been fantastic.
However, there are some really niggling issues that make using parts of it quite painful at times.
To clarify, I had an employee take 1 sick day last week and half of one yesterday, yet the entries show up separately on the payslip instead of a total.
So now I'm looking at 2 entries, one for 8 hours and the other for 4 hours instead of a nice tidy single entry for 12 hours.
The same issue shows up for any type of leave.
AND if I have to change things after the payrun has been scheduled then I can't delete the leave entry to fix it unless I delete my entire payrun first and then delete the leave application!
And, then to make matters even worse, when I delete a leave application, it doesn't delete, it stays there and says I have "rejected" it, when I have done no such thing!
It really needs to have 3 buttons at the bottom of a leave application window; Approve; Reject; and Delete.
One of my girls took 4 weeks of annual leave to have a jaw operation.
As she had used up her annual leave, I gave her 1 week extra (under the personal/carer's leave) to fully recover and rest.
So naturally, the annual leave under her Employee Name is 46.
BUT under leave balance, its 8.
58 hours of annual leave but on her payslip, it says 46.
This will be across the board with Super, earnings, deductions etc.
But, if I put the accruals in as at todays date of 13 October, then there will be no record from 1 July 2015.
Could someone point me in the right direction?
The employee is marked as in the appropriate state holiday group, Victoria.
My payroll settings have the Grand Final Friday listed in the public holidays.
Any advice would be appreciated, thanks.
In construction we are meant to show each payslip, monies that are going in to Incolink, Protect & Coinvest.
e. g. Gross wages for fortnight of $3,256.
00, when it should be $808.
Why did it happen?
HiHas there been a change to the payroll recently?
Now only see an the total earnings.
Can someone assist here.
Im paying a $70+ per month fee for software that doesn't work, a workaround since Dec 2013 isnt good enough.
His combined income with his wife puts him over the threshold and he is wishing to avoid the bill at the end of the financial year.
The "manager" they have selected to approve the leave has Payroll Manager rights, and received the email request to authorise the leave request, however, the leave request is not showing up for approval.
My manager has asked me numerous times for reporting on unpaid leave (e. g employees who are taking leave over their entitlement), which I have to create manually by trawling through everyone's leave records in their cards and manually entering it into a spreadsheet.
I have corrected this however his last 4 payslips are now incorrect.
The end result was double the hours works.
13 is not shown anywhere.
I would prefer the HELP component of her tax not to be shown on her fortnightly payslips, because its not finalised until the end of the FY.
She, quite understandably, thought she had paid that amount off her debt, and its hard trying to explain why that isn't the case.
Now it calculates as exclusive and only deducts tax from the payroll amount to be paid to the employeeThanks in advance
When we converted them over all of the carry over appears to be entered correctly, and when doing a payroll it appears to be adding it correctly as well.
Or am I looking in the totally wrong place.
I'm going to payroll and the employment tab an it has it listed at the top.
Also, I'm not sure where to see what sick leave workers have available.
We have a worker who has very little left and wanted to know what was available but I can't seem to find it anywhere in his details.
Sorry for what I'm sure are very simple questions.
I have another question that I'm hoping some of the accountants can answer,July 2015 was my first Installment activity statement and we have 1 employee and they were paid $10,000 for the month and $2,976 was withheld.
)In MYOB I could create a payrun for all staff, but then create two separate banking files to upload.
An amount was incorrectly included as an Allowance rather than Salary on a previous payslip - it is now on the Group Certificate as such and I am wondering is it ok to lodge as is?
Terminated employees still have sick (pesonal) leave and LSL balances.
Shouldn't these balances be cleared on termination?
We have employees with both before and after tax deductions.
The file size is not a correct multiple of the record length.
Does anyone know if this is possible or the best way to handle it.
We also have employees that work across different stores.
Is it correct that I lodge them all again?
I signed up for the free trial before end of FY.
One of my staff, (Simone) has gone for a surgery and has applied for 4 weeks of annual leave on the 17th of June till the 14th July.
(Annual Leave 20 days)She has taken another 5 days of personal leave from 15th July to the 21st July.
Playing email ping pong with your support team and it is so hard to explain over as its extremely technical and complicated and all they give are payroll links!
To be honest, i am loosing faith in your system and you are about to loose a client.
Please call me on my mobile +61 421 569 407 (I;m in Melbourne, Australia) to help me set up properly, so i don't have to go through this terrible experience again!
For example:Wages & Salaries - Management   Wages & Salaries - SalesWages & Salaries - Flight CrewWages & Salaries - Engineering PersonnelIdeally this should be available for both Wages & Salaries and Superannuation, so that management can carry out detailed cost-centre analysis on Wages & Salaries, and Super.
unless I've missed something here?
I am having issues with my aba files and there is no available support!
If I have paid superannuation, then it shouldn't have accrued.
So I've clearly done something wrong and not sure what.
I have also filed electronically with the ATO.
Hello Again,Now here is problem number 2.
(Perhaps I should go back and read-up on the Changes to Payroll update sent through in August.
)Put basically - If someone could inform my of the correct way to record my Superannuation Payments (see below) I would be most grateful.
This is the process I have been following - which is obviously incorrect.
with a lot to learn!
I have a series of questions for you.
Should I have placed them in Wages & Salaries (477) instead?
I'm in the process of doing the EOFY payroll summaries.
Also, does anyone have any further advice on what to keep in mind when employing somebody overseas?
Our old software handled this issue perfectly and sadly this is HUGE step backwards for us if we have to calculate tax manually.
Is there a way I can see a breakdown of super paid, outstanding or upcoming?
How is PAYG calculated?
I went to settings / payroll.
Across to the employee.
I then create the timesheet.
For example, you might have 'Allowances subject to tax withholding and super' measured in a fixed amount, and 'Ordinary Hours' measured in hours.
For example, you could change 'Allowances subject to tax withholding and super' so that it's measured in hours.
but it won't let me.
5% to 10%.
Instead of being applied against the wages expense (as the deduction related to a previously overpaid amount), these deductions were posted to 81550.
I have a client who doesn't carry forward personal/carers leave from one year to the next as part of their employment agreements.
I click on the Leave Type put no 'Calculate Leave Leave' rate comes up
Do I simply create a bill putting the details on it?
This will also be beneficial in relation to logging leave.
Secondly when it comes to processing their leave, they will still be paid as the same rate, but their accrual will go down.
I want to know how I assign Superannuation and Wages&Salaries to a specific Trading Name, as currently all these line items are 'unassigned' (i. e. not assigned to a specific trading name.
My payroll fortnight is due to finish on the 1st July and we want to process payroll a day earlier on the 30th June.
Anyone have any idea how to bring the fortnight forward a day?
on the right top corner it got ATO Online Lodgement Status - Not filed.
Could you explain to me why?
was there some kind of set up i have to do?
Is it because the financial year is not over yet?
I got my Auskey already.
Is it possible to change the payslip format for different employees?
The payslip format for an employee on a wage would show the number of hours/weeks times $ per hour.
We have an employee with an accrued annual leave balance of 32.
How do I process this so that a) the leave balance is adjusted down to 0 and b) I can include it in an unscheduled payroll run?
I thought that this would be accounted for within Pre Tax Deductions.
The company is not paying for her laptop.
I am looking for a way to email an advice slip to employees once their superannuation contribution has been paid to the fund.
Would be extremely useful if there was a description column on each line.
The only way I can do it is to put through the hours worked at category 1 first.
But I am not sure what exactly it should be?
I compared this run to previous weeks and nothing has changed.
4 hours is not paid, but instead accrues towards an RDO, which is then claimed as a paid 7.
Surely there must be an easier way?
Not Super on top.
My client is an employment agency.
When I try to change the super to '0' as a percentage or fixed amount etc it tells me I must have a super contribution and wont save.
So for example, employee Mr Smith has an Annual Leave balance of 48.
5 hours and an Annual Leave Loading balance of -8.
5 hours, as there is no Annual Leave Loading accruing, but leave was granted under that heading.
My understanding is it should have come from Annual Leave Loading.
Cheers for now,Mike Lockrey
We employ around 12 -15 employees depending on the season, trading hours 7am -10:30pm 7 days a week all year around.
Please suggest how can i find out on what basis did ATO charge FBT?
What is happening here?
We have had our first employee take a sick day.
I have checked and have set up in the system for 10 days personal leave to be accrued annually and not to be shown on payslips etc.
I'm not sure what I have done wrong.
They'll work say 5 hours on Mondays, 8 hours on Tuesdays, etc.
I think there should be a way to nominate how many hours they work on each given day.
This way, when authorising leave applications, I don't have to manually change the number of hours they have taken if they only work say 5 hours on that day.
I'm moving a client from myob.
The factory expenses get recorded as cost of sale.
I have tried entering the Fund Name and the USI?
Is it possible to adjust an employees timesheet after they have submitted it rather than rejecting the timesheet and getting the employee to resubmit again?
I think I can do this with tracking, but I'm not sure how exactly to do so.
The timesheet tracking help page isn't helping me very much unfortunately.
She took annual leave for a week I thought they were subject to leave loading (17.
So I entered a fake payrun in the Demo file for practise.
I read about the changes from 19th Aug 2014 with no draft bill to enter now.
Can someone please tell me why or have I missed a step?
I have already searched by date?
My employee work tues,wed,thurs,fri,sat regularly.
Friday was public hol and requested Saturday as A/L.
Can an employee enter an expense claim through the employee portal?
but I am all sorts of things except for a book keeper to be honest.
I accidentally paid the pre tax amount to one of my employees last month.
It only gives date options not hourly options?
I am not sure how to go about setting this up using Auto Super.
I was presented with this answer when clicking the date next to Opening Balances under Opening Balances Tab in Employee details.
I am experiencing some issues with the tracking categories vis a vis payroll.
Our payroll calendar is weekly.
I have a client which uses the calculated by ordinary hours.
We have several situations already of leave balances being incorrect due to this.
I have set up the accruals based on 148 hours so the weekly accrual should be 2.
For example, we have directors of a company set up with a salary of 100k.
We have three supervisors that run a work crew each.
Altogether, we have a pool of about 10 employees who rotate between the three work crews.
We want to give access to the the three supervisors to fill out timesheets for the workers in their work crew for that week.
Makes approving a staff members leave and paying if difficult!
I have around 20 Staff submitting requests for leave.
I thought it might be a coding issue but that seems to be fine.
It is really beginning to do my head in.
Hopefully someone here has had the same problem and has a fix for it.
2 - I deleted the employee from users and re-sent the invite through Payroll.
This did not work3 - I have tried entering my own email address and sending the invite to myself to set it up for him.
5 - His user permissions are set to none.
Obviously he is set up as a payroll user.
7 - I have checked all of his settings and compared them to other employees.
We're sorry, a problem has occurred.
Please try again It's possible the problem you have encountered is temporary.
We're on it If this is a problem you've encountered before, it's likely we're already fixing it.
We keep a record of every error that occurs and regularly review and set about fixing them so they don't happen again.
Including details such as the specific steps which lead up to the problem and the name of the organisation will help us identify the problem and resolve it.
Can you please advise why this is not showing?
But nothing with banking details.
history needs to be referred to at times.
That way the employee can verify and update were and when required, without individual reports and requests being sent to each employee.
Not looking to spend a lot though, as it really is a once of year check, with very stable staff of about 10.
For example 76 hours in the fortnight divided by 13.
035714 (Fair Work calculations for annual leave) = 5.
1370) is not calculating correctly when we go into his leave balance.
Why isn't available to select?
This seems rather odd to me as well and I am now trying to figure out if I have set something up incorrectly.
Any assistance would be greatly appreciated:In the payroll settings I have:Earnings Name: Ordinary HoursRate Type: Rate per unitType of units: HoursEach employee is employed based on an annual salary with 38hrs/week as their ordinary hours.
For the employee in questions his rate has been:Nov: $23.
5 hours of sick leave.
It won't let us hit 'yes' under "calculate leave accrual" which made me suspicious we are not doing it correctly.
Some categories appear to be mis allocated in the general ledger.
The Payroll Expense Journal - PD2 appears to be a link but nothing happens when clicked on.
hours of leave accrued per day worked.
* Every day they take leave, their leave balance is reduced by 7.
My view is that an employee should accrue based on how much they are working.
Hopefully it's me not the product who is a little broken :)
And I don't mean that rudely, I honestly want to know.
At the moment, it is calculating on months, which is very tricky.
Especially as I'm trying to enter an opening balance, but not sure how to calculate 7.
It will be done on the cents per kilometre method.
Allowances subject to super and PAYG?
(I wouldn't have thought so)Allowances exempt from super and PAYG?
It doesn't.
They have been working for over a month and I am not sure how to update what leave they have accrued.
Each leave period shows as a separate line on his payslip.
I am have been requested to print out a over 10 employees payslips which date back to 2013.
I've tried searching for a solution but nothing comes up that suggest this can be done.
5% in the first quarter and then continue making manual changes after that.
Is this the best way to deal with this issue?
I am processing the payroll for one of my clients and on one employee (out of 20) has the incorrect amount of superannuation being calculated on his payslip.
He is paid a gross amount of $863.
5% of this ($81.
99) but it gives me a value of $89.
64 which is 10.
If I change the super calculation type to percentage of earnings and manually put in 9.
5 it calculates it correctly.
Not really sure what I am missing, and I can manually adjust it every week, but I'd rather not as I will probably miss one week here or there.
We have built up a liability for annual leave on the balance sheet.
Our BAS settings are also on accrual basis.
Thanking you and Merry Xmas; in advance Nimish
Do I have to create two super items for this - one for the statutory 9.
But the Leave Used Section on the payslip comes up with a Zero.
Look forward to the response!
I have tried comparing their files to see what I have entered differently, but cannot see anything.
Currently, under the 'Leave' tab, it says that this employee has -6.
This can't be right, because as stated earlier the employee has been with us for nearly 12 months and has only taken 16hrs annual leave.
We have an employee who have submitted a Medicare levy variation declaration.
Why oh why can they choose their own rate for the timesheet?
I have set up an employee who is on a salary of $50k and is working 40 hours per week.
He is paid fortnightly, so 80 hours per fortnight.
By my calculations, 50k equals $1923.
08 per fortnight and $24.
03846 per hour - lets round to $24.
972603 which gives a fortnightly gross of $1917.
Why would it be doing this?
Should this leave be treated the same way as Annual Leave and Sick Leave taken possibly?
We thought this would be useful for noting if they are only wanting to take a couple of hours leave and between what times (since they can't adjust the hours themselves) or any other details that might be relevant.
I am paying weekly so this shouldn't be particularly complicated.
My client havent paid leave loading but they should have.
I was wondering if this is the correct and best way to make the adjustment.
However, I'm importing everything in from 1st of July to make things easier.
I nearly fell off my chair processing a payrun yesterday.
If I'm wrong and it can be generated from somewhere else please let me know.
Now I have nightmares!
Has anyone noticed that the latest Payroll Update changes to Employee Details - specifically Date of Birth has a bug?
You can only enter Day and Year?
Some employees have had opening leave balances entered.
As the option for auto super payments is unavailable with their current subscription.
HiI'm looking to find a way to show our SGC as a 'payable' in our daily reporting.
Or would this be the best solution.
I have also ticked the "Include self-balancing transaction in the ABA file" option and have included the "DE User ID" in the ABA file.
Record Number 3 Record type must be 1The odd thing is that the BSB is correct and the record number does start with 1.
5% of $500.
5% of $800.
I set up my first employee in payroll, including opening balances for earnings, PAYG, Super and Annual leave.
I've checked all the employees payroll summaries for this quarter and all but one are ok. Any ideas on where to start investigating the odd one out?
They appear underpaid for Super to date.
We have entered into a voluntary PAYG agreement so I take care of that.
We also deduct super automatically and for the purposes of work cover, he is considered to be an 'employee'.
However, I am wondering if this is what I should be doing?
I have come across an issue which relates to the recent payroll changes.
Is it best to do it via AU Payroll?
(We also want to top-up their super so that the salary packaging leaves then with the same super contribution. )
He is paying it off weekly through payroll.
We manually setup our other company & are backdating our transactions to 01/07/2014.
Please tell me how to fix it?
Tracking categories against Employee groups is no good as we have staff that work in multiple locations.
Hey guysI'm struggling to grasp the processes involved in payroll.
I've set up my casual staff and for the most part I think I have this running.
That date has come and gone.
Description: you may want to enter 'Leave payout on termination'.
And it doesn't make sense why you have to create leave application when you only want to convert unused leaves to cash.
so the employees cannot ad timesheets.
For example: 1.
I seem to have no problems at all when I fill in my employees ordinary hours of 38 hrs/week and super at 9.
5% seems to be calculated correctly.
5% is not calculated correctly.
So, Super should still  only be calculated on the ordinary 38 hrs worked not the overtime, but its not.
So I really have no idea how its being calculated.
Also, this employee earns more than the minimum $450 per month, so that's not the reason.
I'm not yet familiar with the ATO.
We overpaid our withholding tax and subsequently received a refund from the Tax office .
I have tried with the "Include self-balancing transaction in the ABA file" box ticked and unticked.
Not sure what else it could be.
This error notice came up so I have to every single payslip till I find the one that has the error.
I've "only" got 41 employees but what if I had 200?
This needs to be fixed!
i. e.  Auto super processing was first used in March 14 Qtr but this process missed the first week of Jan (super on last week of Dec processed in Jan but was left out of initial auto super processing.
However, the ordinary hours has not reduced to 30 hours and it will not allow me to change it.
Our employees now get taxed between $1 and $10 more than in June.
Has the tax calculation changed?
Any tips or tricks (using payroll deductions maybe? )
Hope that reassures you, stay tuned for the next release announcement where we will be providing more information on the changes for all our Australian payroll customers.
Hopefully simple answer - I have employees (casuals) wanting me to deduct extra PAYG each week.
They wish to have PAYG and SG taken out of each lump sum.
I'm hoping that this is the right avenue to go with?
It seems so complicated.
I have watched the videos and read the help to no avail.
I have multiple Auskeys on this computer for several businesses and when I have to select the Auskey, the current businesses key does not show up in the drop down menu.
This is the person that the ATO will contact if they have any queries.
Then I press the Browse button, locate and select my keystore on my computer and press ok.
Which is taking me a day instead of an hour or two.
I have convinced them to change their ways but they are sceptical about using other programs.
Employers with < 20 employees (most of your payroll customers I'm tipping) don't have to start complying until July 1st next year.
and probably or more relevance the ATO website lists employee email address as optional.
It should have been 9.
25 and 2.
I have tried to enter the ATO TFN exemption codes but this keeps rejecting with Not a Valid TFN.
Is there a code that I can enter to get these summaries lodged?
Nothing seems to work.
I have tried to change the calender year to 52 weeks.
It is still the same.
The difference is in the PAYG witholding amount every month.
Surely there is a better way?
Eg $55k pa would result in weekly earnings of $1,057.
alright in i came here from myob, hehe i heard it had better option and less buggy.
payroll setting  i have the standand setting.
I have processed a payrun and one employee took annual leave.
My system seems to be doubling up when I process the wages and showing a superannuation amount and a superannuation payable amount as being paid with each payrun which is not the case.
It seems to be something in the backend that I can't access and I have checked through the settings and can't find it.
We are using automatic super payments, and the payments keep defaulting to his old fund.
I can't delete the old fund because it has payments against it.
I have 2 employees (let's call them A and B) that I have converted from casual to permanent in January.
The annual leave was there, but not personal (sick) leave.
The problem has been with Payroll.
Is it 100 employees or 100 payments?
Generated the draft bill and approved it.
I've tried changing the employees settings, refreshing it, and matching the same settings up to other employees profiles.
I still can't get it to register to take the PAYG amount out (or list it on their payslip for that matter).
A client phoned and told me that when processing payroll, a particular employees "old" leave (Dating back to Nov/Dec) was being added to his current payroll.
By manually adjusting these figures it throws the payroll out even more.
I have 5 employees on the books.
00 and doesn't show up on the payslip.
I sound crazy but its confusing :)
Once has to browse down the list carefully trying to find the employee by first name or surname.
Again, when having a large number of employees this is rather painful.
Leave calculations (accrued and taken) for employees paid on a monthly basis are wrong.
I have tried review prior discussions but may have missed if this question was asked before.
Hope to hear your feedback soon.
CSV file to bulk upload timesheets for all employees?
I prefer that a face to face discussion with myself takes place in the future in regards putting in for leave.
Especially when I have employees who are due the same amount but paid on different days.
Is it because it shows pending?
I processed as 40 hours instead of 38.
If the leave code is ticked to show on the payslip, this balance should show in the Employee's Portal.
The balance is not shown on the employee portal.
(Can you believe IE is the one that works properly?
I have three employees who are paid individually, not in a batch, so when reconciling their transactions appear on the left hand side of the screen.
Our employees are paid inclusive of superannuation so if the salary is $40,000 it is $40,000 inclusive of super and tax.
I have two payruns missing from last financial year.
The payroll year is not closed.
They work different hours each week and accrue annual leave based on the hours.
Or is there a away an expense form can be added?
We have 100 staff.
Have checked his start date and other things suggested in the support forumsThanksLiam
92 AL hrs and 1.
Aren't wages suppose to appear in the BAS?
The Statutory Rate will work in a similar way to tax tables.
We'll have a specific Help Centre page up on the super changes and product updates on release.
Hey all,I have an interesting situation.
I have two employees who are married.
I wouldn't be opposed to this and have done it in the past.
Am I doing this correctly or should it be done another way so it goes to Wages Payable.
I have emailed support, but have heard nothing.
These two problems apply to three different Directors with three different start dates.
3) Do I have to create three different calendars?
In the future all Directors ought to be paid a full month's salary on the same date, i. e. 15 October for all of October, i. e. half in arrears and half in advance.
I have tried to work with the calendar function etc but whatever I do, I cannot get there.
Thanks for reading, any advice is appreciated.
Keen to learn though!
Trying to enter a employees payroll transaction to include a few special payments ie bonus etc that isn't included in the usual payrun.
I have drilled down and looked at the detail and I can not work out why the amounts are different.
Superannuation has not been paid, so that is one reason for the difference, as it is not on the P&L.
I have an interesting error.
When I go to create a payroll payrun, it leaves off one employee even though she has been added to the correct payrun calendar.
I'm not sure what I should select for that option.
An employee paid $5,000 in total each month might have $3,750 as taxable salary (with to keep it simple $750 as tax), and $1,250 as salary sacrificed untaxed through the third party.
Super is only paid on the $3,750 taxable salary.
Is that possible?
This adds at least an additional hour to the process.
Each employee's name should be categorized first name, last name with the last name being alphabetized.
Trying to set up payroll and am getting this message:"Additional Allowances is required.
Please enter and then try again.
"Is it a bug?
---- they want a state allowance, not the federal one.
I have employees and contractors.
I can see the the timesheet is in the Payroll page and I can't choose a vendor name.
Plus, in another state, all payments are locked - this is turning me into one cash reconciliation nightmare.
I am in Texas and what to run payroll.
I have went through all the tutorials and set up payroll, including all the starting balances since I moved over from Quickbooks mid-year.
And I have exited and re-entered the payroll tab multiple times to try to fix error #2.
I missed some payroll tax payments a while back (I know, I was a bad boy, please don't lecture me about it).
Although not an ideal situation, I have worked it out.
Would I bundle up the totals and treat it as a "loan" that I'm paying?
It's all a bit confusing.
When I go to run payroll I get the following error:There are multiple errors on the page that require your attention.
The Contact Name already exists.
I changed my contact information to avoid a duplication between my name in the contacts and my name as an employee.
But, it still gives me the same error.
I can get the employee to not to put any hours on their timesheet, but how would an employer know that they off sick and where would it be indicated for future reference?
Here is another one.
My accounting is on cash basis so this is kind of important.
We can not run it as a bonus every month because the tax deductions will be wrong.
The item has a deduction component and an employer contribution component.
I know I generated W-2 statements for my employees in 2016.
The work is done in California.
I have made many electronic payments to the IRS and the state of Texas.
My question involves the Federal Income Tax on our employee's W-4's.
One of our employees who would have only been with us not quite three months in January when she received her W-4, is now questioning why she had only $20-something in Federal Income Tax withheld.
She only made about $1300 from us for 2016 and she is filed as single with one allowance.
Is this because of how she listed her allowances and filing status, along with the small amount she made for 2016?
The Date under Payroll Settings > Payroll Tracking is locked and set to Oct 1, 2016.
When I go to enter Opening Balances, it asks for Jan 1-Sep 30, 2016.
We have no payroll to enter for Oct 1 - Dec 31, 2016 either.
I can't find a place to enter the payroll information for Jan 1, 2017 to current, which needs to be entered.
US User here.
I submitted electronically my federal 941 Monthly deposit early.
BTW: I attempted to reverse the paycheck, but I'm not sure what happened exactly.
Evidently it will back out the taxes but doesn't void the paycheck.
I think the moral of the story is WHATEVER YOU DO, DON'T FIND YOURSELF IN THE POSITION OF NEEDING TO REVERSE A PAYCHECK.
I am updating the DD details to direct to my personal checking, but wondering how to clean this up.
I reversed that payroll and entered an Unscheduled Payroll to record the correction.
The system has now locked that payroll run.
Cheque numbers should be between 000001 and 999999).
taxesThe Dividend Amount is taxable via FICU, State, Unemployment, etc.
I have used Quickbooks and have always run my payroll with these type of earnings.
My accountant had advised me to fun my payroll in this manner.
Recently changed OS from Windows 10 to iOS Mac.
Quickbooks for Mac doesn't have a payroll feature so it has to run online.
Decided to seek another alternative to Quickbooks.
I also considered their online service but the cost is higher.
This is a big downfall of the system for me.
I'm from California, btw.
I appreciate all the help.
and then ran an unscheduled payrun.
The original amount showed up under transactions as payroll but did not correct with the reversal.
1) Go to payroll-->Taxes and Filings2) If not already showing, choose "Current" from the tabs under the words "Taxes and Filings"3) Scroll down to where it says "Due Later" 4) You should see "W-2 Wage and Tax Statement", click on that5) You'll see the blue button that says "File Form"6) Above that, you see "W-2 Employer Copy" and "W-2 Employee Copy", click on those and download the PDF(s)7) This part can be a bit of a PITA.
The w-2's will download as all employees .
If you are manually printing and sending a copy to your employees, then this is easy.
It goes by threes, so if the first employee is John Smith, then pages 1-3 will be for him.
Go to print the PDF (even though we aren't actually printing).
Then choose to "print" the page range from 1 to 3.
Now instead of actually printing the doc, in the lower left click on the menu that says "PDF", then choose "save as PDF".
Save to wherever you want and name the doc accordingly.
Repeat this process for the next employee.
Now it will be pages 4-6 from the original PDF, etc, etc.
And luckily, you only have to do it once a year!
Or do I have to do it manually now?
This was due to a change in their system with S-corp benefit allocation.
The amount of hours I have spent on this easily justifies paying an alternative service or doing it all myself.
I am stuck now with having to correct the past two periods before processing today's payroll.
We owe the corp 50/50.
It appears that I can't set up a non-US employee?
And I can't set up an "unscheduled" salary?
I'm hitting the monthly payroll processing limit, because I'm running payroll twice this month because I was too late running payroll last month.
The error:"You currently have exceeded your monthly processing limit for electronic payments.
A simple Manual Journal would fix this, but Wages Payable is locked and I'm unable to change manual adjustments to it.
It will only allow me to set him if I assign him a work location that is in NC -- except we don't have a work location in that state.
This detail is not clear but it appears the interface is specifically excluding the locations not in the employees state.
It won't go down.
I'm assuming it's because I haven't set the regular earnings type.
I want my salaried employees to accrue PTO based on overtime hours worked.
However, this doesn't allow me to do a different PTO accrual rate for regular hours versus overtime hours, as far as I can tell.
All hours (Regular and OT) accrue PTO equally.
Holiday entitlement is in hours.
We don't do anything by the hour.
We also have a contractor who gets paid £100 per day.
Is it possibly to switch that somewhere?
So I look under "Deposit Requirement" and I see two deposit schedules: "Quarterly payments effective Apr 01, 2016" and "Monthly payments effective Jan 01, 2017".
I have payroll setup.
I did set up Forte (after a lot of hassle, but finally got it working.
but this setup is not reflected anywhere.
Payroll system is garbage.
Emailed suport they send you links to read things that dont work.
This system and lack of support is unacceptable.
We are a government agency and the County processes all of our checks.
We reconcile to the County's accounting records.
1) No Worker's Compensation codes for Workers Comp reporting.
This is strange because all payroll software should include Workers Comp.
Looking forward to hearing from you!
The tax is based on the employee's home location.
Fortunately we don't have the more complicated case, city taxes for both the work location and employee's home location.
The journals were created by the system.
However, we are having an issue with the payroll taxes.
I received a letter from the California EDD stating that they were changing banks for their ACH payments starting July 1, 2016.
Here is a scanned version with my details removed: .
I have two seeming serious issues with payroll.
First, I did my first payrun then voided it because I wanted to adjust the amount.
But I voided it  I approved the paymet to be made.
So I had to contact Payroll support to manually cancel the direct deposit.
If I go to Reports > Payroll > Payruns, it doesn't appear.
BUT, if I go to Payroll > Payruns, it  show up there (along with the voided payrun, which still says "paid. ")
But the "Current" tab does show the next scheduled Direct Deposit.
I have received a reply re the USA Taxes and in desperation contacted the response person who was very helpful in that area, to see if she can help me get USA support to answer my other emails.
The closest choice, at least in name, is SIMPLE IRA.
According to the IRS documents on  and , neither one requires employer contributions to be taxed or reported on a W2, though both require the "Retirement Plan" box to be checked.
Why isn't available to select?
17, and $895.
50, a sum of the two prior amounts.
They suggested I contact my CPA to fix the problem.
Right now it seems doing a manual entry each month would be easier compared to this automatic synchronisation.
The journal entry I would make (for simplicity leaving out individual lines for FICA/FUTA/SUTA): dt #668 Wages and Salariesdt #628 General Expenses (for reimbursements)dt #672 Payroll tax expensect #216 payroll wages payablect #230 employee taxes payableFollowed by reconciling the wages and tax payments generated by Gusto to #216 payroll wages payable and #230 employee taxes payable.
It would be really nice if it could be run with the payroll, since I already do that on a monthly basis.
The US payroll module only appears to offer monthly as a default frequency or 'unscheduled'.
Not sure if this is the right way to go.
I'm trying to decide on a payroll service.
We have multiple payroll problems and we have reached out to customer support on multiple occasions.
We have tried to resolve this now for 5 months with always gotten the same answer, that their team is working on it.
At one point, they divulged that they have the same problem with all of the their California clients.
They are reporting the correct taxable wages and taxes with-held on the 941, but the total number reported at the top is inaccurate.
Again, everytime we ask we are told they are working on it.
Now we have a problem (probably self induced) with our employee paystubs are not accurately reflecting the true year to date wages.
This is entering the third month of not being resolved.
Again, the response is that they are working on it, but it can't be done before the end of the month/end of the quarter.
Working thru an email only channel is not effective and certainly hasn't resolved anything.
Also, i'm trying to set up direct deposit - electronic payments for my contractors.
I started running payroll for 4 employees on May 18.
The Wisconsin-based employee is moving to CA and will start working from CA on Aug 1.
Today July 27, 2015 is Q3, so really not sure why Q2 was not available.
I figured the UI was correct so I put everything as 0.
When I looked at that record, it showed the filing partially paid but with an unpaid balance.
There is also Start Date.
This makes absolutely no sense to me, but 2 reps said the same thing.
I changed the start date to Aug 1 thinking that would fix the taxes issue, but it did not.
I used the benefits section, but it isn't adding that value to their paycheck.
This should be raised up in importance visibly and in the interface because it is a clear liability that needs to be tracked and properly accounted for.
I saw this issue mentioned in another thread in a  but it wasn't fully addressed.
They are also not personal exemptions for the boxes above so where do I do this?
Any help before the weekend would sure be appreciated!
I've used several different payroll services and have even performed my own calculations without any payroll service before.
I've gotten through most of the hurdles but I'm stuck on trying to enter payroll data from the current quarter.
These bills have been paid and are showing as such in "Taxes and Filings".
Next to each of these entries in the bills section is a "Lock" symbol and hovering over this states "Updates (disabled)".
Every state has extremely different calculation, tax and filing requirements.
Downloadable completed Federal and states forms or worksheets are also available.
At the moment we are using a third party company to process our payroll, which is expensive and seems to be very complex.
After an email, I have received two phone calls to help resolve my problem.
Firm has employees in California and NY.
When one company mentioned it we figured it was an isolated problem, but when four more companies reported it today I suspect it is a much larger problem.
Anybody else have this issue?
This makes filing the corporate tax return easy.
This may be a USA only feature as I'm not sure if this would be necessary to split out in other countries.
Payroll tax payments are set for manual.
That's ok, I know how to deal with payments.
Way past annoying.
That's as it should be.
HOWEVER, the liabilities are posted in detail, which is a big mess.
I see a lot of 401k and other retirement plans.
The application doesn't let me advance as unable to save this.
Is this simply broken, or am I missing something?
Revenue     $XXXXXXDirect Costs:   Wages     $XXXXX (e. g. wages to direct labor)Expenses:   Wages     $XXXXX (e. g. salary to CEO)I have learned about the concept of "Tracking Categories. "
ran our first payrun for a period after the initial setup date.
I had also input a "pending" unscheduled payrun for a recently hired employee that occured during a previous period.
Now the pending transaction is stuck.
"Fortunately we paid it manually but now we don't have it processed.
In the "Benefits" section of the paystub, the amounts shown do not reflect deductions from the employee's paycheck in the "Deductions" section.
I don't see any reports or transactions for payroll tax withholding.
I also expected to see reports for what was owed and some information about when it will be withdrawn/paid.
Any helpful hints would be appreciated, thanks!
I lodged a payroll query with support on 28 June (the software has calculated deductions incorrectly) and gave support access on 30 June and since then I have not had a response or acknowledgement of my 2 daily follow up emails.
Is there a long term problem with support?
I have been emailing uk.
OK, never have I swore so much in a two hour period.
Press save and I get a message saying it can't be saved as the amount is greater than the total annual deduction.
My entire payroll process is completely manual.
Then do the following for each employee:Step 3.
The OT hourly rate differs each month and is incorrect, so manually enter the correct rate.
Post Payslip (this is actually fairly painless).
As you can imagine lots of scope for mistakes and it should all be automatic.
In the previous tax year we were using HMRC's basic payroll tools.
I have checked our printer and its not that.
Is anybody else having the same trouble or am I the only one?
This results in two entries in the P&L.
Clearly we aren't doing things correctly.
I have never had this trouble before.
But it says 0.
How do I change to balance to what it should be?
They have opted in to the pension scheme but I cannot find how to set them up so they have 1% deducted and not 0.
Painful but maybe necessary.
)They also make pension contributions to a RAS scheme.
The employee pension contributions should be deducted on regular earnings less salary sacrifice deductions.
Employer pension contributions should be calculated on regular earnings (Before salary sacrifice deductions).
2 of my employees became employees towards the end of May.
There is no information regarding deduction.
They may be under a threshold however as they are on an annual salary should not something be deducted?
The most recent employee left in the prior month, and so they have no current employees.
Generally we would create a manual journal to show the salary breakdowns and expenses etc.
So now I'm stumped and don't know what to do.
I can't file my pensions with NEST as there are duplicate employees but it won't let me delete them either.
Has anyone else had the same problems before?
HiCan someone help - support haven't responded after almost a week of logging an help request.
So I have a few issues.
I'll try and break them down so it's clear.
• 2 employees, starting up, in frequent incoming money so we haven't always paid ourselves on the established PAYE date.
This resulted in a fine for 16-17.
Not worried about this fine at the moment - I can sort that out later.
• I made subsequent payments for April and May 2017• I then deleted these payments so I could make an EYU for us to update the last two months of 2017-18Unfortunately, after all this, I have a few problems.
• according to HMRC my EYU was incorrect as it didn't include any taxes in the update.
This is of course means we have a hefty NIC and PAYE contribution to make.
which is incorrect.
Any thoughts, or input on how top clean this all up and get back on track would be appreciated!
Is there a way I can update this so that it shows FY16-17?
I didn't really want to send the P60s out over email if I can help it.
I am trying to amend a pension file on my link to The People's Pension.
I have some months where staff are deducted days for no-show at work.
I also have to work out what hours were not added to the previous month's payroll because of the timing issue - which gets complicated.
I downloaded the basic Paye tool from HMRC and this lists no employee's either, have i missed something?
EXCEPT for one employee who joined in April.
Not sure if that's the reason.
One non-eligible is opting-in and another eligible is opting out.
- I've not raised with support as they never answered any previous queries and the only help is on here
HiI have noticed that on Payslips and P60s, our company address is not shown.
I have their salaries set which is fine.
I am getting the following notification I red and cannot understand why.
My log in details are correct.
for a one-off charge of &#163;150.
My employees have an annual salary and are paid one-twelfth of that each calendar month.
It is irrelevant how many hours there are in a particular month or which of those days are paid leave/holiday and which are days actually worked.
Sometimes, I want to deduct unpaid leave from the monthly salary.
I calculate that in working days, so if an employee's annual salary is &#163;30,000, a day's unpaid leave is &#163;30,000/260 = &#163;115.
This makes the treatment of paid leave and unpaid leave inconsistent.
I do not think paid leave should be shown separately from working days, but unpaid leave should be shown on a separate line as a deduction.
'Eligibility Status' should be 'Eligible Job Holder' set to 'Entitled Worker' and cannot change'Eligibility Status Date' should be 1st Feb but is set to 1st April All other employees details are correct in these Pension areas however all are also locked to editing.
She turned 21 in March so I have changed her national insurance code to A from M. The PAYE calculated on a gross salary of £1213.
35 is £603.
78 which seems a little excessive to me!
I am trying and failing to set up our workplace pension.
I see from reading around that this is the case for other users too.
But then it asks me for:Pension namePension provider idEmployer idNEST gives me an employer id and a delegate id.
However, it won't be 'alive' for RTI submissions until I get my activation pin and that could be another two weeks apparently.
The RTI will fail and then I will have to resubmit when I have an activated system?
Is it possible to set up employees so that their regular working patterns include Saturdays and Sundays.
the Friday and the Monday.
However, many of our staff work every weekend.
For them, Friday to Monday might mean four days off.
Now I know this can be over-ridden but it doesn't make the process of leave approval easy.
I managed to muddle through with no help - I emailed and was ignored for several days.
I had four staff members come to me with letters from HMRC saying their tax codes had changed from the general 1150L to OTw1/m1.
As far as I can tell, apart from printing out individual slips, I cant send anyone a payslip until the wages have been posted.
The only thing I could find was the P32, but this can only be done by the month.
The payroll reports that I have found cant be done per week.
Am I looking in the wrong place?
However in the Workplace Pension tab there is only the option of setting up EITHER % of gross OR fixed amount in the 'Employer's Contribution' setting.
I have also tried via the employee tab and clicking on Download payroll reports and again nothing comes up on the page.
(Tried contacting support but had no response at yet.
)The guide seems to indicate that if we are using salary sacrifice for auto-enrolment then the employer and employee contribuitions should both be entered as 1%.
Which is correct?
"I have no idea what this means.
Is it something to do with the contribuition %, the dates or something else?
Shall I cut my losses and go back to Sage Payroll before I'm too entrenched?
However, HMRC have now asked for EPS since October 1st 2016 to show periods of inactivity, ie they require my client to inform them that they haven't paid anyone.
I cannot process a payrun to submit the EPS from October to now.
Employees are paid in lieu, they work the week then get paid the following thursday, therefore my week 52 relating to the week worked 27/03/17 - 02/04/17 but paid on 06/04/17 has now pulled through to be my week 1 of 17/18.
My problem is that our staff have different hourly rates for the work they do, a weekday rate and a weekend rate.
But the journal is dated 13th April.
I set up a student loan salary sacrifice deduction for an employee for &#163;50 per month starting in Dec 2016.
Everything appeared to be working correctly and my journals were correctly coding the deduction to code 947.
I have no idea how this is possible because a pension hasn't even been set up!
I replied to the email asking the support person to try harder and actually read my email before sending me a generic unhelpful response.
Otherwise, I'm going to have to revert back to the HMRC system.
00 to &#163;21,477.
00 to &#163;26,823.
00 to &#163;47,845.
00 to &#163;70,630.
00 to &#163;111,376.
00 and over	          14.
Surely employee's should not be included if they have left in the previous financial year.
very stuck at the mo so some help would be great looked at all the vids can set all the stuff up but this is realy stumping me can anyone help pleeesssseee
I emailed the support team 5 days ago and have chased twice but still no response.
I have tried using Chrome and IE but both still very slow moving around the system.
My other cloud applications are working fine so not an internet connection issue.
ARK CLS is a UK company with its financial year end date 31 Dec, so out of sync with UK PAYE tax year.
Up until 5 Apr 2016 we used Sage Payroll (desktop software) for ARK CLS payroll.
Everything appeared to work fine (including RTI submissions) throughout the 2016/17 tax year.
We now are preparing to do the UK payroll year end reporting and have looked at the four videos.
In the very first video it talks about Opening Balances.
When we click on the "Opening Balance" tab in Payroll settings we see the message :Opening Balances are only required if you're paid employees since 06 Apr 2015I would have expected to see 06 Apr 2016 as in the video.
What I have done so far:-1.
The Yodlee feed exists4.
I did the payrun for March yesterday and it's all done finished and accepted by HMRC.
32 with a further employee NICs contribution of &#163;129.
It should be &#163;35.
88 employee with no employer, what's going on?
My question is, do we now have to change any of the payroll general settings now this is the case?
The client has approximately 50 employees and is about to start the staging process for Auto Enrollment.
Has anyone else experienced anything similar, as far as we are aware nothing has been changed within the auto-enrolment settings.
There is a £2k difference.
My issue at the moment is trying to do my second payroll run.
After enetering an Employees overtime I select Save & Next and get the following error£62.
50 is what the Company pays each month to this Employee, how do I resolve this issue?
Nothing has changed for this employee.
Sole Director of Limited Company, set up on Jun 6th.
I provide consulting services to organisations.
Currently it all looks good.
Relief at Source: Contributions paid Gross after taking Tax and NINEST uses the latter and explains that a 1% employee contribution is actually 0.
8% if the employee is eligible for tax relief.
I hope this makes some sort of sense and that someone can help!
Or do I calculate the pro rata amount and enter that as the salary with 18hrs week.
It's been sitting in RTI filings for a week, nothing in the manual and no reply from Support as yet.
Hello all,Hopefully you've ended up here because you've searched for a topic about Directorship Start Dates and the "Alternative" method.
It's bonkers.
Why it says "Directorship start date" at all is a mystery if it doesn't except real dates.
All down to one thing - the woeful implementation of Payroll for UK companies.
In my experience "Scheduled" means that something will happen at a defined date.
Once something is "Scheduled" there is nothing more to do.
Scheduled means conditional on something else.
In my case something that you can't now do because you've set an end date on your PAYE scheme.
I could send FPS when I ran payroll and I could run EPS independently.
And at EVERY stage I knew when I was doing something that it was happening.
Developers producing 'hung' systems and stati should be ashamed of themselves.
I couldn't find it and I'm not prepared to search through 29 pages to look for it.
They're contracted to 30 hours per week but 5 of those hours are at &#163;12 per hour and 25 are at &#163;5.
They work 5 days but they work different hours across those days (Mon = 8.
5, Sat = 1) so it's unfair and inaccurate for make her take annual leave in days.
5 hours holiday for that day?
And will the holiday balance show her remaining entitlement in hours?
For more information visit .
From this i have some idea of tax codes and how much each employee earns, hourly rate etc.
With my lack of experience of payroll I am worried this is something I am going to struggle with, has anybody else had any similar experience please.
HiDoes anyone know how you can create a detailed remittance which will show any credits raised and deducted which bills they have been deducted fromThanks in AdvanceBen
This is what I expect, say they earn 12000 a year and get &#163;10 an hour OT.
So in summary what I want is them to get paid their regular salary plus overtime at the hourly rate, not the whole lot at hourly rate.
If there is no other way .
I have followed what we normally do and in the guide and they are still not receiving them.
After running payroll yesterday I have received notification that the RTI submission has failed.
I’m entering the opening balances an employee and they have changed NI category part way through the year, after turning 21.
wont let me go past two weeks ago timesheet to enable me to do the wages.
What would be best way of correcting this without incurring a HMRC penalty?
Anny and all assistance gratefully received!
After spending hours last week trying to sort auto-enrollment, only to find I've got to spend more hours trying to fathom a basic payroll function, i'm seriously unimpressed.
86 however, rather than the expected £3,333.
It's also not using the previous salary by mistake.
I can manually tweak the rate to get the end result I want, but it would probably be good for me to fully understand what's going on before doing so.
I'm stumped at what I put in these and where I get the info fromPension Name (I'm guessing "Smart Pension")Pension Provider ID (Who's ID?
the company ID they've given me?
and what is "EMPLOYER PENSION ID" in this section?
I have two businesses, both completely different industries.
One is relatively small with only 2 employees (myself included!
), however the other is a bar with around 20 employees.
Is it possible to setup multiple payrolls/paye references and setup to run on separate dates etc?
November's payroll was run and filed to HMRC but our PAYE liability is showing around &#163;3.
5k more than it should.
Is such a think possible?
If someone could point me in the right direction it would be appreciated.
We expect balance to be shown: 8 hours2.
We expect balance to be shown: 38 hours (assuming 98 hours of entitlement calculated proportionally for the year)3.
For more information, check out .
uk/guidance/payrolling-tax-employees-benefits-and-expenses-through-your-payroll
HiI have a Director who currently isn't paid.
We are a software development company that work on a project basis.
We do around 70 - 90 projects per year, and several projects for the same client in the year.
Would this be the best way to do it?
The limitation of 100 options per category seems a bit restrictive for the volume of projects we do.
Today I can't click it, nothing happens.
Is this a bug or has the way to do this changed?
Or is it only available after a payrun has been completed with auto-enrollment enabled?
My pension provider agrees.
What are my options please?
Am I totally in the wrong section to do this?
We have received a statement from HMRC showing a PAYE underpayment.
Should I go back and try to resubmit?
I've been chasing my tail for days.
However I'm not set up on the Pension Regulators database yet as I've made no salary payments.
Answers, on a postcard.
and so have changed the tax code.
Our latest payslips seem to come with a change in font (a serif font with nasty &#163; symbol kerning).
It feels suddenly rather tacky and I've no idea why you would have done this.
Perhaps we can have the previous pretty font back?
We issue weekly timesheets that record the hours they work which come back into the front office system.
This is a real data protection issue!
I would of assumed that all details would be pre populated.
I have ended the employment and then clicked on download p45Any help would be appreciated!
For example, in the deduction type we have set the % pension contribution as 6%.
On an Earnings Type salary of total &#163;3,795.
Therefore I do not have their taxable amounts to date.
I can only think this is a bug on that particular page of settings.
Hello all,I am trying to work out how to refund an employees pension contribution if they have opted out of the scheme within the allowed timescale after being automatically enrolled.
They then have a set period, approx.
30 days to opt-out of the scheme.
In the meantime their contribution is held and not actually paid into the scheme in the event they do opt-out.
Another option would be to put it through as a Reimbursement, but by their very nature reimbursements are not taxed as they are reserved for when an employee has spend personal money for the company.
It is simply zero.
Does anyone have the same, or similar issue?
They are on service and product commission but get a guaranteed amount per period or commission (whichever is more).
Service Commission earned is &#163;800.
Retail Commission earned is &#163;150.
Company tops up commission to guaranteed amount @ &#163;250.
We have 3 staff who are part of a salary sacrifice scheme for cycle to work.
This has resulted in a small decrease in both employer and employee pension contributions for the 3 staff concerned.
Right now I'm working it out with a calculator!
What i want to do is ensure direct labour is reported in my direct costs within the P&L and the overheads wages reported under my overheads total.
I have a member of staff who has recently joined childcare scheme.
33, voucher is GBP243 per month.
However, I noticed that his YTD Payments is incorrect.
33 - it is only the YTD figure that is incorrect.
Am I missing something or should I approach this in a different way to ensure his P60 will be correct at the end of the year?
Payroll is paid once per month.
Why isn't available to select?
On doing my reconciliations I have stumbled across an automatic Payroll Expense Journal for Employment Allowance that makes no sense to me.
According to my tax code I should be paying zero PAYE tax.
20 (hence showing I am owed that amount).
Has anyone managed to set this up correctly with NEST as the pension provider?
If so, would be grateful if the following are known?
It is now Friday and it it still sitting there.
It is not showing as declined or accepted.
I have not got the bistro yet, but the day we get the keys she becomes our employee.
But it did not, it has added it as a second salary.
Again it did not cancel out the old ones, this employee now has three salaries!
They have the little lock icon to the right.
My client receives car benefit from his company.
Of course, it creates an unnecsaary expense and liability which needs to be reversed via a manual journal.
The following field in the NIC section of the submission:      <AtLELYTD>11648.
00</AtLELYTD>is rejected, reason being:<Text>Value '11648.
The LEL is &#163;112/week, so &#163;5,824/yr.
As this employee is a director, the NI calculation is not spread over the year, so the full &#163;5,824 was applied in month 1 last month.
However, they have had no reply so far.
The employee is due to start on the 14th of June.
I did phone HMRC - got in the automated queue -  then the automated voice told me 'they said they were cutting off the call'!
HiI have previously used some other software to run the payroll.
I Have already submitted the RTI so I do not want to submit RTI again.
I got this ltd and i am the only employee as a director.
As a company i have 2 contracts those 2 contracts are bring me a total revenue on 10000 per month , lets say.
40 and employee nino 33.
I got this ltd and i am the only employee as a director.
As a company i have 2 contracts those 2 contracts are bring me a total revenue on 10000 per month , lets say.
40 and employee nino 33.
It's the displaying of the information which is in correct.
I have 6 clients and 4 of them seem to have this message.
All have processed in the past, so I wonder what could be causing this?
It would be good to know I am not alone with this!
So if you have sent out P60's please check as these may be wrong.
They were on the payroll last month.
I have searched the help but can't see it anywhere.
Hicould anyone help me with the following?
One employee left end of the month so I put 30th April on their 'end employment' date and ran the P45.
5, 38, 40, etc) per week and so this is difficult to calculate.
Quite urgent now and may resort to simply adding a Deduction and doing it manually.
In Sage, I would have set these to 'On Hold' this week.
I am the only employee on the and when I look at my Earnings YTD it shows nil so I am assuming that I have performed the year end correctly.
Practice administrators should also have payroll access rights - when you can upgrade an organisation to include payroll, you should also have the access rights to view and manage payroll.
I understand that all standard tax codes of 1060L will automatically update to 1100L.
I have followed the following steps:1.
Enter the claim amount.
Click OK and click Save.
I have saved and saved again.
I have also clicked save and next until the end to see if it updates but it doesn't.
i'm not an accountant so hoping someone can explain the right steps here.
41 under the various employees as an opening balance of Employers NI.
In the Payroll settings I entered the balance of &#163;1220.
58 in the opening balance for Employment allowance.
This all seemed to work fine and correctly reduced our liability in May and June until the &#163;2,000 was used up.
The Employers NI doesn't seem to feature on P11 or P60 so assume thaose aren't affected.
Lots and lots of people saying that it is a beta product that is not fit for purpose.
Have most of the creases been ironed out now or is it still more hassle that it is worth?
Not especially pretty, but it gets the job done.
65 and updated individual employees with opening balances.
Today I received an email ("Action required: Check Director payroll settings"), prompting me to update the directorship start date before I run the final payroll.
My problem is that I have already run my final payroll (for 31st March).
I have "ended Employment" for an employee but they are staying on another 2 weeks.
I have not finalised the payroll so any changes will be in the same period.
I can see Earnings YTD for each employee at the top of their summary, but none of the other info seems to be available outside of the reports.
Maybe I'm missing something here but I feel the payroll balances should be a little celarer.
Is this the "Primary Threshold" gross amount (&#163;8060) of the differance between the LEL and the PT amount?
"Gross LEL to PT" as a label is not really that clear in my mind.
However after entering a lot of information, I find that its still broken from when I tried it a year ago.
I have entered a holiday accrual of every hour worked and tried it out on my Saturday girl.
that would be not in alignment with  their contracts, and I don't really want to change everyones' contracts because of a software bug.
I realise that some of them are address and contact details.
Do they refer to L&G?
Then looking at the sections afterwards starting with Pension Type.
I am getting very frustrated looking, as I haven't found it if it is there.
Will the payroll automatically store the last years figure my previous payroll provider sent out a detailed instructions and you could go back to the reports if needed.
I would have expected the information to be available long before now.
I seem to be caught between two system requirements.
We had a Staff party held in January, for 5 employees, which was for 912.
Trying to find some clarity on the HMRC website, I found this:http://www.
It is possible for a charge to arise on the employee even where the cost has been disallowed (in whole or in part) to the employer.
For instance, if the scale of the entertaining is excessive.
You should consider ‘excessive’ entertainment provided to employees in the same light as ‘excessive’ remuneration".
But what if the company has a Dispensation?
Will the system let me do RTI submissions with no employees?
Same goes for VAT and Corp tax payments?
My guess would be that if I was paying twice I'd notice the difference in how much Tax & NI I'd be paying, but that remains at zero (I earn within the tax free limit).
According to my businesses HMRC site I owe no tax or NI either.
If someone could clear this up for me, that would be great.
This means that whilst the whole year amount would be the same, each month is incorrect.
This would have a total at the bottom.
For example for a salary deduction of &#163;100Dr Wages payable 100Cr ?
I have set this up and the deduction shows correctly on the payslip.
If so what did you do to correct it?
Works, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Works is  A complete CRM, communications & engagement tool and fundraising platform Find out more about .
Have an employee on variable hours accruing holiday at a rate of 0.
So effectively it increased the holiday hours available by using holiday hours taken as hours worked.
I've used the PAYE references HMRC provided and have used our gateway details.
I've checked and retyped them over and over again.
Silly mistake and entered wrong opening balances for employees.
Reading the other posts on here I don't hold out much hope.
It seems there is no option to set your own schedule of accrual for your companies holiday year ?
- Perhaps the Payroll should not have been launched until glitches had been sorted.
I've processed my first payrun two days ago and all deductions together combine to &#163;261.
I know the balance due before this payrun was &#163;0.
A search shows that AU payroll has an "undo termination" option, but this option does not appear to be present for UK.
Employee's payslips show the amount of holiday taken/approved as a negative balance.
Is there anywhere in the system that you can enter the employee's annual entitlement and the  employee's payslip to indicate a holiday hours remaining balance too?
My mistake.
You did actually put it in the Calendar.
A little coloured dot that has to be clicked on and does not help as a reminder.
More to the point - if you can pull this data up and represent it as a dot.
why on earth cant you present it in a way that is useful!
Although I did notice the salary had been posted to nominal code 477 - salaries instead of 478 - Directors remuneration?
Anyway that is not my main concern.
His old accountant used sage payroll, so no problems there.
I have recently become an employer from a sole trader.
My accountant is handling wages/payslips etc, but should I be posting wage payments to direct wages or Payroll?
I assume posting to payroll is linked to the payroll in Xerox?
What's your experience and advice?
The Tax Due & Ers NIC due are correct, however the figures for Student Loans due and EEs NICs due have more than doubled.
They advised that I revert and submit a correction to HMRC so I have followed their advise however none of the figures on HMRC's side have been amended after doing that.
This would be ok, but under Operating expenses, it also shows Employer NI (479) and salaries (477) being taken off again, meaning that the net profit figure stated is too low.
I. e. if I remove from 320 and put onto 477, wouldn't that then overstate the 477 code?
I am still waiting for something back in the post from the HMRC, but they say it should still be ok?
"I am a bit confused as to what this means.
No function for ceasing a PAYE scheme and the advice from support is to telephone HMRC, when this is not possible.
)Then, I presume it gives me the option to re-submit the RTI and specify why it was late?
Good Morning, I have processed an employee as a leaver on 1st August.
However, the amount of tax deducted doesn't seem to be right.
Some of the issues have been addressed regarding the booking of holidays and how they are reflected on the payslip but still an issue that is annoying is the way the daily rate is calculated for salaried people.
The gross salary for the month will be the same but the breakdown between individual months will differ when holiday has been booked and that is not acceptable.
It obviously skews or P&L with literally double the wage costs that should be there.
Really disappointed that I moved from sage to this now.
Another example of Payroll's unexpected calculations.
13 and you get &#163;259.
How do you set up annual leave entitlements when staff have sacrificed salary in return for more leave?
It appears that I'm stuck with processing salary as a bill and generating my own payslips.
so please excuse my confusion.
I'm trying to agree the Trial Balances and I'm having trouble with a manual journal I have mirrored with Sage.
The journal entry is;DR National Insurance 747.
64 because we have paid them less what we are reclaiming.
I have tried raising a CR to HMRC for that amount and done a cash refund but then for some strange reason my VAT liability is out by 747.
64 on the TB's So so so confused.
Our payslips are giving an incorrect tax month and I'm struggling to find a solution to amend them.
The companies financial year ends 31st March to co-inside with the April tax year.
I am filling our first payrun from 1st May to 31st May but on the payslip it says Tax Month 3 but May is Tax month 2Does anyone know why this is?
FYI our employees started their employment on 1st May 2015Any help would be appreciated.
Net Salary is &#163;4,800.
If I adjust the Gross salary to &#163;4,800, all the calcs for tax and NI are correct but obviously it doesn't show the correct salary, and then the pension contribution is incorrect.
EE is &#163;372.
56 and should be &#163;368.
56ER is &#163;596.
71 and should be &#163;569.
11I must be missing something is set up but cannot find anything.
The most obvious place would be in employment, it could show past salary/wages as inactive?
HiI have an issue on a clients payroll.
Received this email this morning from support.
I cannot publish my response.
Although I have yet to see this in the forums, I am expecting this to be a major issue.
This meant that some employee's PAYE differed by more than 2p compared to the HMRC Tax Calculator.
We are emailing to let you know that this issue has now been resolved.
Nearly 48hrs after submitting a support ticket for this, I've received a response telling me they are receiving a high volume of customer tickets and suggest that I try finding the answer for myself.
When I save the Providers information I have entered, it does not hold the details.
The Xml file download is gobbledegook!
I would be nice to see a "submission certificate" with HMRC response as well as a PDF Doc detailing what has actually been submitted.
I am trying to process a payrun.
What login details am I using for RTI submission?
Is it my HMRC Online username (long number) and password?
Is the RTI filing functionality now working properly?
The relevant boxes have been ticked as required.
Have asked support for details.
Still doesn't seem to be working though so if anyone else is having RTI submissions not even appearing, this may be worth a try.
Has my RTI been submitted?
Since March when we began the migration it has been a nightmare.
See the many posts regarding this.
Our submission has been "pending" for 3 weeks now.
The buttons for download of XML and HMRC response are there but (at least for us) seems to do nothing.
I am waiting for the HMRC to contact me regarding a fine.
Lack of ability for managers to have their annual leave approved.
Not automatically calculating final salaries for leavers.
You have to manually enter the hours to override the salary.
This adds work and a source for errors.
Lack of human support.
And do NOT describe the deficiencies described above.
But has been stuck at pending ever since, almost 7 days.
Which should have been sent last week, which could cause us to be fined.
NIC's and the Employment Allowance have not been calculated properly.
My RTI submission failed, when I know all the log in details were correct.
I am unable to print a copy of the RTI submission and am unable to resend it.
Payments are made manually so I can deal with that separately,I had already made the individual a leaver and issued their P45.
In actual fact the RTI submission made on Monday still has a status "Pending".
This is the amount that appears on the draft payslipI can obviously manually override it and put in the correct rates and Salary but that kind of defeats the purpose.
I am at a loss to know how to proceed.
I have used another payroll program for the April payroll and FPS submission.
However I don't want to duplicate the FPS so can I disable it for April and start afresh in May?
I have asked for the RTI to be resubmitted but am yet to receive a response after emailing uk.
com on Friday.
I have followed this up today.
I did send an email to support on Friday about the issues but have had no response.
Is that going to be possible at all?
Do I have to do it manually as individual transactions?
And still not get payslips - rubbish!
I am experiencing technical problems setting up SMP for an employee with one of my clients.
I simply can't understand why you wouldn't have managers also select THEIR managers to approve the annual leave.
The employees have all moved from another company after 6 April and I have input their P45 details including tax codes.
Also, one employee is on an 0T code so there MUST be PAYE!
Nothing back from Support after a few hours.
At the moment I'm going to have to do a manual journal to split out directors, direct and non direct wages after the wages journal has been generated.
I want to set up a single director with a single annual salary.
Under the RTI filing tab we cannot check its status with HMRC until it shows as "Accepted" some hours later.
It would be good to see under the RTI tab.
Payrun- "Pending", "Rejected" and "Accepted"---
A useful facility is to automate the process of sending the employee their payslip to the email address on the employee record
It should be 1 April 2015 – 30 April 2015 but it won’t let me change it in the calendar.
of hours in month?
Any chance this is going to be an added feature in the future?
E. g. Say employee is paying for some goods he purchased from the company?
The response is Gateway1046fatalAuthentication Failure.
I have changed my user ID to my Agent as that is what I should have used for submission.
Is there a way that I can track each employees holidays.
A calendar function would also be useful here to see which employees are off on certain dates.
It has definitely worked and on the RTI details, it shows the charge being deducted via the EA, however the charge is there.
I have tried changing the calendar month in Payroll settings from 1st April and also 5th April and this doesn't make any difference.
On on two separate clients we have the employers name and the second address line truncated.
So, can someone please confirm if it can track holiday accrued, taken and outstanding with a variable holiday year (ours starts on 1st January.
Also, unless I am going totally mad (which is possible) where do you enter the tax and YTD gross on form P45?
When adding a Direct Earnings Attachment, where do you enter the protected earnings amount?
Um, payroll per employee the good old P11 - is this hidden?
if so its hidden well i've been looking for an hour?
What if you have some staff on a 6 day week and some on a 5 day week ?
with the weekly rate being &#163;88.
It would be great to a notification if the payroll submission is declined.
I have an employee who has a deduction for a childcare voucher, &#163;243/month, I have another who pays about &#163;30/month for the Cycle to Work scheme.
To quote from https://www.
"Qualifying earnings" are either:    the amount you earn before tax between &#163;5,772 and &#163;41,865 a year    your entire salary or wages before taxYour employer chooses how to work out your qualifying earnings.
In error, they were paid this week through Sage using 2014/15 tax codes, thresholds etc.
As i understand there is an employee NIC due at 12% on payments above the &#163;7956 primary threshold (i. e. a &#163;245 deduction is due).
I've set up the employee details to show that both a Director and that NIC calculation method should be 'cumulative' (although I also tried it non-cumulative and it made no difference).
A salaried person would not normally have their hours/hourly rate displayed on the payslip and in some circumstances we as an Agent would not normally know how many hours they worked unless they were an hourly paid monthly employee.
As far as I can tell all is set up.
We are in the UK.
(as of 4/3/2015).
Is there anyway we can get around this limit so we can ensure they get paid this week.
We do a payroll for a larger organisation and when we go to email the payslips the pop up box doesn't allow for scrolling up to select all.
You can't grab the box and drag it to another position on the screen, nor alt-tab to find the popup.
I have tried two different browsers and contacted support.
I understand the average earnings uses the days you enter in each payrun.
Most of our clients have hourly contracts, with minimum hours, days, and hours worked vary so it's important we understand all the parts.
Last week our Payroll Officer accidentally processed a payrun that included an ex employee (that hasn't been deleted out of our system).
This way employees who work at multiple sites can have their income allocated correctly.
40 and Public Holiday Taken $378.
I have been using the NCEA resources and they are great, but they don't include the Payroll.
It is included in salary of casual employee.
In employees tax details, I kept Employer Contribution as 0% and added the percentage in "Employer Contribution through salary sacrificed".
Workers pick between 4 and 6 bins per day but each are on site for different total work hours.
I think the reports would be misleading and present everything as if it was hours.
I have a staff member contract that ends say  May 30th, it is agreed that he may leave before that date with full "payout" to May 30th.
I adjust manually end of each month.
This seems prone to error when process payrolls for numerous clients with numerous employees.
Under taxes each employee have been set up with the correct ESCT rate of of 30%.
Yet when we go to do the taxes/filing it only shows it at 10.
Is there a step we have missed in setting this up?
No explanation is given.
How can I find out what is wrong?
It is urgent!
We have a client who entered the incorrect "Opening Balances Date" in payroll setup.
They have not processed any pays, but the date is greyed out and we are unable to change it.
How can we correct this date?
Using a hypothetical example as below:Homer has worked for Mr Burns for 3 years.
He decides to sell donuts for a living and his last day of work is Thursday 20/05/17.
On termination, he has 3.
Homer is employed on a salary.
He normally works Monday to Friday.
His average weekly earnings for the last 12 months is $1100.
His last date of annual leave entitlement was 20/12/16.
Homer has one alternative holiday owing from working on 2/01/17.
Also there is a public holiday on 5/06/17.
(let's assume this is $1500)c) public holiday on 5/06/17 (because if we notionally extended his termination date by his annual leave entitlement (20/05/17 + 3.
5 weeks = roughly around 15/06/17), the Queens birthday falls within that range = 1 x $300 = $300d) 8% of his gross earnings from his anniversary date (20/12/16) to termination date (20/05/17).
And this calculates to be:- 8% of his ordinary wages that he has earned between 20/12/16 - 20/05/17.
Assuming he has also received commission of $2,000 during the year, so it would be 0.
08 x ((1500 x 4 x 5) + 2000) = $2,560- 8% of his annual leave entitlement  at anniversary date = 0.
08 x $5,250 = $420- 8% of his alternative holiday  = 0.
08 x $300 = $24- 8% of his public holiday that falls within his notional extend of his 3.
To calculate the gross dollar amount, and hours etc.
Annual leave calculation continues to be a problem.
we are all so confused why this is so different.
I have a couple of staff in a similar position.
I was expecting the rates to be the same?
We thought that in July 2016 his one year anniversary that  his leave would then move over to show his 180 hours - his 92 hours of leave, however by Dec 2016 his Annual leave still shows -92 hours.
However, the next issue we have had occur (over the past month it has again been highlighted to us) is the following:Employee X's payslip didnt update from 4/12 with 72 hours of AL to 18/12 which again showed 72 hours of AL.
8% of $2,590.
In short it appears on his payslip that he is now 16 hours behind what he believes to be his AL balance.
It all makes sense to us pen pushers but for the general employee it is really confusing and they are left wondering why their payslip, which should be their go-to point, is always a little misleading.
For example I paid an employee $897.
75 gross and the payslip shows the annual leave accrued is $96.
I had been putting them under Wages Payable - Payroll but this is a Liability code.
Is this the easiest way?
50 @ 45 p/hAnnual leave taken: 88Public Holidays: 16Sick Leave taken: 8Using these totals I divided gross earnings by days worked (22 days per month x 5 months = 110 days) which gave me an ADP figure of $288.
I then divided the ADP figure by 8 (standard hours worked per day) to get an average hourly rate of $36.
Have I calculated this correctly?
He hours were set as 25 but then a few months ago I chanegd them to reflect 35 which is more realistic.
however her sick leave is still sitting at 25 hours .
I am looking for a way to track leave for all staff including ones overseas.
Staff are confused as to why this has not transferred into annual leave hours owing?
It appears that the balance has dropped?
48After the changeAnnual Leave 40 hoursHow has this been worked out?
Help so frustrating when we cant talk over phone !
Have another employee who had anniversary 01/06/16 that I have to do the same with.
We frequently have issues with discrepancies between the totals in the EMS and EDF output files that are uploaded to IRD.
This has happened to us frequently.
So in theory, a few days ago they should have been automatically allocated a bunch more annual leave hours (i. e. at their anniversary on 8th Sept 2016).
Is that correct, or am I missing something / doing something wrong?
Staff member works 4 days a week (monday to Thursday) at 7.
Have I missed a setup step somewhere?
We provide lunch (home cooked) when they are working here over the lunch period.
We estimate it would be $15-20 per person, per meal.
As this would affect the average daily hours worked calculation I want to get it right.
Final payslips have been processed but they are still there?
I have a casual employee who only works up to 24 hours during the week.
Clicking Proceed will cause a recalculation of the payslip.
Are you sure you want to continue? "
so I click on -  proceed.
Your payslip maybe out of sync.
Try again in a moment"I have gone away for an hour and come back, only to find, I still can't approve the timesheet.
This employee's times have never altered and I have not altered anything or done anything differently.
Your Payslip may be out of sync.
I have been re-trying for an hour now.
It would make it so much easier when scrolling through if some of these people who haven't worked for us for over a year weren't on the list.
I added all the employees and added their rates.
Several employees have two rates as the work overtime.
I added an overtime option and added overtime rates.
We currently have an employee who has been with us for 4 months.
I am paying fortnightly and if I take the salary fortnight amount (Gross) and multiply by 26.
Note; I have listed my salary staff as working 5 days a week, 8 hours a day.
I have two questions regarding alternative holiday and it would be great if you could help me out.
Recently I have found out that I did not type any hours in for alternative holiday when my staff had worked on public holiday.
This question also relates to alternative holiday.
We paid him out annual leave in advance in his first year.
This is showing as a negative balance.
I thought this would have changed now seeing as his anniversary has been.
Have I not set up the leave correctly?
I was assured in other Discussions I have had on this platform that the change over would happen automatically.
Can you please advise why this is not working?
Payroll is great for the PAYE employees.
"Payroll Calendar may not be changed while the employee has unprocessed leave.
"One employee has -14 Sick leave and the other has never taken any leave.
Looking to outsource?
Datacom can help, we offer a full payroll, self-service, and HR toolkit; with excellent support.
For more information visit .
When looking into annual leave available figures for our accountants I noticed an error on a previous employees annual leave balance.
What this means is now it shows they have 16 hours annual leave left.
As this was last year I am unable to change anything, is there anything I can do to get this back to zero which is the correct amount?
Maybe its something i'm doing wrong that's holding it up?
but it's not.
Also can  you allow notes in the annual leave tab for each employee to type in dates taken for annual leave.
is there anyway this can happen?
NZ law states the payout must be equal to the amount of a normal paid weeks holiday.
I have a shareholder-employee gets the same amount each week but wants a payslip sent to him.
This function was perfect for that, and he doesn't want to spend $120 a year on the full Payroll feature.
I am trying to set up my employees, they are all working hourly with irregular hours.
When I select Wages Type as "Hourly" there is an "Effective Date" field that I have to enter.
What is this and what should I enter here?
When I go to complete the IRD Employee Monthly Schedule (EMS/IR348) each month, I click on Payroll / Taxes and Filings and click on the relevant period/month which brings up a nice summary page.
Which is great.
An employee asked to send a personal item with our courier and have the cost deducted from his wage.
It gives me 4 options.
On anniversary date, annually after 6 months, % of gross earnings and no accruals.
Also for sick leave, it asks hours accrued annually and maximum to accrue and then the balance.
The 2 owners receive a salary and I receive wages based on my hours.
For more information, check out .
Or does it have to be emailed directly from the posted payrun?
Pretty important in terms of splitting out back office employees (overheads) from factory employees (direct costs).
With truely variable staff hours, this is a bit of a disaster.
We have gone back to 0 days/0 hours and are manually adjusting the starting balance and Annual Leave when leave is taken (If someone else has figured out a better way, let me know!
They are simple and effective, and reflect how people manage their payroll - in real life.
They allow some flexibility and accomodation.
I've worked with a number of companies.
Each one has a slighty different way of doing things, and with slightly different needs when it comes to payroll.
I would have thought that some people having truely variable hour (not casual) staff wasn't that unforseen by the software designers.
The first week I set up an employee to be on a salary, and added normal hours as 5 days, 10 hours per day.
They have a balance of $2574.
This is a combo of the opening balance of $2240 plus 4 weeks accrual which is correct.
Then I have a holiday leave balance of -0.
The difference being the amount of $62.
I have approved one day leave request.
If I have current leave balance as the following:Annual leave (hours) 73.
00 + 8% of the current week earnings?
Also paying 8 hours only of annual leave is not fair as our employee works a lot of overtime.
Or even showing average hourly rate (which should be higher)?
I know that when I hit the "end employment" button, that all relevant information will be lost.
The option to end employment/archive/restore could be a good solution?
The Status pages says problems were resolved, but it doesn't appear that they are.
Although we didn’t view this as a permanent solution.
Of course I don't know the week ahead hours yet.
I have set this up to make the deductions however it doesn't seem to calculate the rate correctly.
It appears to be from the student loan deductions and annual leave payments.
Wages are calculated daily (paid weekly) on the greater of the minimum hourly rate of $14.
This is a bit frustrating because I cannot tell whether my changes have taken effect.
I have a number of staff that start employment part way through the month (Anniversary date) e. g. 28th April 2014.
One staff member has an opening balance as at 31st March 2015 of $5,550.
28th April 2014 to 28th April 2015.
This is for the full 30 days of work (since it was all paid since his anniversary date).
Have they got this wrong?
Is this an option that will happen in the near future?
For more information visit .
one of the staff has been working with us since 16/09/2013.
We key in all data into Xerol manual in the past.
Mthly salary on first week of the following mth.
from 16/09/2013 to 15/09/2014  He got 14 days annual leaves left He used 8 days in Jan 15  .
from 16/09/2014 to 16/03/2015 he accrued 10 days 17/03/15 to 31/03/15 he accrued about 0.
Regarding about the sick leave.
- 17/03/2014from 17/03/2014 to 16/03/2015.
He got 5 days sick leave , but used only 1 day until 16/03/15He used 2 days from 22/04/15-2/06/15.
His sick leave balance is 2 days , right  ?
I tried to do a payroll for April 15 and paid in May 15 .
I only can see the balance and it is not different from the figure i booked manually.
Or may i call you to discuss about it  ?
I've also checked in Settings -Payroll Settings - Leave, though I have  a padlock on my annual leave, annual leave cashup.
I want to make sure everyone pays the correct tax, etc.
I previously had it set up as repeating bills and keep track of payroll data in Excell.
Heya,I have entered all of our employees but I am not sure if i have entered their annual and sick leave details properly.
Is the above correct?
Heya,A couple of our employees work Tuesday to Saturday.
They don't qualify for the Public Holiday for ANZAC day.
For example, this employee has been with us from 1st April 2012, and has used some annual leave, and also have some accrued and available.
I see there have been a few other posts on this topic, but I'm still at a loss as to how to do it, and what  Hours Accrued Annually and Balance should reflect.
Also if an employee has a day off (annual leave or sick) it doesn't show the date this was taken on their payslipSurely this would be an easy fix?
He has to their credit come back to us.
All be it late and we made our own interpretations.
We been me and our accountancy vCFO.
Finally getting last weeks payroll up to day (having to Process through the old system last week. )
We are told there was an update this morning after an issue fot more than 25 staff in payroll.
We have give Marc access.
please give me any tips you may have in regards to insert a deduction from employees wage at 3% which amounts to 12.
00 and employers 3% at total amount 12.
It's crazy.
Plus the pricing scheme is ridiculous for something that doesn't even really do much work and has this many problems.
We have had an employee leave during this current period.
Do I have to create a transaction?
I suspect it will make an allocation which is not required
We offer our employees a house as part of their employment package.
We have some staff who are paid for the hours they work.
I have tried several ideas for payroll.
It will make many people happier.
For more information, check out .
Apply online and receive funds of up to R500,000 within 24 hours.
For more information visit .
For more information visit .
For more information visit .
Vital cash flow management app for businesses, their accountants & bookkeepers.
For more information visit .
CapitalPitch is a lead investor in tech-enabled startups raising a Seed or Series A round.
For more information visit .
Cloud-based software for HR compliance.
Manage your policies, & leave, employee qualifications, procedures, and documentation.
For more information visit .
For web, iOS & Android.
For more information visit .
For more information visit .
For more information visit .
Apply online in minutes and get an instant decision.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
We build software that runs in the cloud.
As experts in the "nuts and bolts" of websites, we develop custom websites and web applications for businesses.
No sign in needed, works on all devices.
For more information, check out .
At Nobly, we have a real soft spot for small, independent businesses – we love to help them start-up and see them grow quicker than they ever thought possible.
For more information, check out .
For more information visit .
For more information, check out .
Providing a rich set of communication and collaboration features such as digital signatures, email marketing, smart checklists and appointments.
intelligentpos is a affordable, cloud based EPOS  solution for iPad tailored to hospitality and retail requirements.
It helps sell more, generate loyalty, increase profits and grow.
For more information, check out .
Membership Software for Chambers of Commerce, Trade Associations, Professional & Networking Groups, Societies, Non-profits and other membership groups.
For more information, check out .
Get up to 43% of your research & development costs back through the R&D Tax Incentive.
Check your eligibility for free and complete your claim online.
For more information, check out .
All of this inside Slack.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Best store for small businesses.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Fast, flexible credit facility of up to £100,000 to help small businesses grow.
Decision and funds within hours.
For more information, check out .
Streamlined course scheduling, resource management, CRM, reporting, marketing, elearning and more!
For more information, check out .
Your Expected Cash Flow, Daily on a Calendar!
For more information, check out .
Dentally is a healthcare technology company, offering cloud-based dental software that helps manage your dental practice and provide patient care.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Getting rid of paperwork is as simple as changing a light bulb!
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
es, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Create insightful reports and dashboards to track your key financial metrics.
For more information, check out .
5, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
For more information, check out .
AuditFile is a secure, cloud-based solution that helps CPA firms (and internal audit teams) perform dramatically more efficient audits.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Rezdy is a B2B Marketplace for tours and activities.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Accept cards today using your iPhone, iPad or Android device.
For more information, check out .
A scheduling and reservation system for appointments, classes, tours and escape rooms.
For more information, check out .
Manage everything from one central system.
For more information, check out .
Cash is king and we're on your side.
For more information, check out .
HR Easily is your all-in-one, cloud-based HR solution in Asia.
Automate Payroll, Staff and Leave Management processes.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Say goodbye to annoying paper and complicated software with our simple, smart online global solution to manage your workshop or car dealership anytime.
For more information, check out .
Web based Real Estate accounting and compliance platform built for Brokerages and loved by agents.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
A suite of tools to assist accountants with the administration, compliance and advisory areas of their practice.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Appointment scheduling for property photographers & other service suppliers.
For more information, check out .
If you are a user of Jet Convert, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
For more information, check out .
Sapaad is a powerful, cost-effective restaurant Cloud POS; inventory, call center, online ordering & more.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
End-to-end POS designed for hospitality with rostering, reporting, membership, delivery and inventory.
For more information, check out .
OfficeR&D is fully automated management platform for coworking and shared workspaces.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
The equity management software for private companies.
Issue securities, generate expense reports, and get 409A valuations all on one platform.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Rotessa makes it easy to collect ongoing payments from your customers and donors electronically through pre-authorized debits.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
travel, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
For more information, check out .
Know who’s working and where with GPS.
For more information, check out .
Commusoft is an all-in-one cloud based software for small and larger companies with multiple engineers in field service and utilities industry.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
The fashion industry's most popular total solution for apparel offers ERP, PLM, CRM, EDI, manufacturing and inventory features at affordable prices.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Learn how to boost cash flow.
Step by step coaching, easy to read dashboards & expert tips to help you & your clients make more $ doing what you love!
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Try it free!
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Expense your coffee while you wait for the beans to grind.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Making it simple for South African businesses to accept instant and secure payments online via Credit Card, Instant EFT, MasterPass, Bitcoin and more.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
PandaDoc is a simple way to create, send, track and eSign beautiful quotes, proposals, and contracts.
For more information, check out .
SAM is the Ultimate Automotive Workshop solution.
#1 in NZ for 25 years.
Sign up today and make your cash flow faster.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
MyWorkpapers Connect is a cloud based paperless workpaper solution to collaborate, manage documents, workflows and queries.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
White label desktop, reports and free mobile app prompt Advisor engagement to improve cash flow & KPI's.
For more information, check out .
ProfitCents is a web-based accounting solution designed to help firms be industry experts, differentiate and provide advisory services.
For more information, check out .
BUZ is a complete system!
From leads to quoting, ordering to manufacturing, installation to invoicing.
We make running an accommodation simple and rewarding, with 24/7 support by industry experts.
Revolving line of credit based on your outstanding receivables balance.
For more information, check out .
FoodStorm is web based catering software.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Try it free.
For more information, check out .
Covering the entire spectrum right from Recruitment to Separation, (also called Hire-to-Retire Processes).
For more information, check out .
Access over 60 Documents to implement strategies and advice for your clients.
All documents are offered with integrated client information for efficient administration.
For more information, check out .
Client records checking and correction software for accountants.
For more information, check out .
Sell and Reorder effortlessly.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Smart, sophisticated software for modeling and talent agencies.
For more information, check out .
Essential CRM and Marketing tools, built in a fresh web and mobile application.
Visualising and unifying the revenue generation process for growing businesses.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Simple, visual forecasting for freelancers, providing better insight into clients, projects, and income.
For more information, check out .
Want legally compliant HR policies, contracts and employee performance management?
You got it!
For more information, check out .
Cash flow management and financial forecasting.
Compare multiple scenarios to stress-test your decisions.
For more information, check out .
Get a decision in 60 seconds with no obligations and no fees attached.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Automatically sync customers, inventory and orders from Amazon, Amazon Europe, eBay, Infusionsoft, Magento, ShipStation, WooCommerce, and more!
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
ie, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Payroll software for Ireland that simply works.
Fully online and keeps you compliant with all the relevant legislation, now and in the future.
For more information, check out .
Startup reporting & portfolio tracking for startups and their investors.
For more information, check out .
It is lightweight and easy to setup, with mobile apps available.
For more information, check out .
Payoneer is a safe, simple and cost-effective way for businesses and professionals to get paid from international clients.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Leading web based equipment rental software used by B2B and B2C rentals.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
A complete web and mobile solution for property managers and landlords with apps for their tenants, contractors, agents and owners.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Extract line items, PO numbers and more.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Build beautiful updates, reports and dashboards for team members and investors.
For more information, check out .
Accept credit card and ACH payments.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Fuseboard simplifies managing projects, deals and customers.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
com, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
For more information, check out .
OzForex offers competitive exchange rates on a wide range of currencies and a speedy transfer service.
Trustworks has set out to resolve the major issue of non-compliant family trust administration.
Plus, we’re making trusts easier and more profitable to manage by bringing all the people involved and information together in the cloud.
For more information, check out .
Freshdesk’s customer support software makes it refreshingly easy for businesses to make their customers happy.
For more information, check out .
Streamline cost and revenue recognition, and life cycle management.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Its knowledge brought to you.
Sendle offers low, flat-rates, door-to-door delivery to 17,000 suburbs & easy online ordering and tracking.
The #1 online CRM & Project Management application for small and growing businesses.
For more information, check out .
Automate your client bookings, reminders & payments with one click using the world's sleekest online scheduling software.
For more information, check out .
Save hours of meetings, automate tax document collection and remove paper administration for individual tax returns.
Powerful data collection and automation for your practice.
For more information, check out .
All in one dashboard for $20/user/month.
For more information, check out .
Cloud estimating and job management software for builders and tradies.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Cloud Print Management and Web2Print solution.
For print, print management, signage and promotional products.
Includes job management, invoicing, warehouse and CRM.
For more information, check out .
If you are a user of FITmyBooks, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Run by qualified accountants and software experts.
Keep client details up to date and maintain visibility over your SMSF and investment portfolio workflow.
For more information, check out .
com, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Save money on international payments and always receive the mid-market rate.
For more information, check out .
Market leading Knowledge Management suite for Architects, Engineers and Consultant businesses across the globe providing full Project, Document, Email and Drawing management.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Farmflo is a farmer friendly system designed to improve the speed and accuracy of keeping farm records for compliance reporting and traceability.
For more information visit .
For more information visit .
For more information visit .
For more information visit .
For more information visit .
For more information visit .
For more information visit .
io, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
For more information visit .
Set up and accept payments within 24 hours.
With IntegraPay it’s even easier.
For more information visit .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
If you are a user of cloudconvert, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Lead the way.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Automatic logs your driving mileage and trip routes accurately and effortlessly.
For more information, check out .
PennyPipe will separate the fee automatically.
For more information, check out .
Simple but powerful ERP/MRP software that enable manufacturers to cut costs, improve processes, and increase revenue with no prior investment.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
iPad Point of Sale System crafted for Hospitality.
Run your cafe, bar & restaurant from the cloud.
A Posboss iPad & Eftpos takes orders from anywhere!
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Post your journals together with an attachment of your supporting calculations.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Smart, fast, mobile & the highest quality integration.
The expense reports businesses & accountants trust.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
A construction software suite for estimating, project management, cost control, scheduling and collaboration.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Your total solution for managing events, webinars, courses and elearning.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
PropertySuite is a fully integrated, comprehensive cloud based software application for the real estate sector.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Scheduling, Budgeting/PO, Bidding, Change Orders and many more!
For more information, check out .
Calendar-based timesheets for your team.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Sick of fiddling with spread sheets?
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Project insights that your team can act on.
Simple timesheets, expenses and approvals.
For more information, check out .
Zeald specialises in innovative website design and ecommerce web development.
For more information, check out .
Intellibook is a simple but powerful tour and event booking solution for travel agents.
For more information, check out .
Save up to 95% on international payments fees.
Kwanji gives access to the best deals from multiple forex brokers.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Say goodbye to manual data entry forever!
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Our approach to corporate travel management is innovative, proactive, cost-effective and technologically unique in our industry.
For more information, check out .
Get started for free.
For more information, check out .
A2X is recommended by e-commerce accountants for Amazon sellers large and small.
Multi-currency support for Amazon.
it, Amazon.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
POS software developed in retail stores for retailers: Tower Systems specialises in helping independent retail businesses achieve their goals soonerFor more information, check out .
Timesheets for the whole team using a drag-and-drop calendar.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
iAgri is a perfect match for farmers and their supporting professionals.
Performance is our aim, the profit is yours to gain.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
ClickDesk is a combo of Live chat, Helpdesk, Voice & Video chat.
For more information, check out .
One click to import profit share, transmit company expenses and much more.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
A simple and practical online transport management application that flows from data entry toreporting, to invoicing.
For more information, check out .
Native apps for all devices.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Our revolutionary cloud-based training management software offers an end-to-end solution for enterprises, RTOs and training businesses.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
A complete cloud based software solution designed for Real Estate Agencies and their Agents.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Improve customer satisfaction and decrease costs in your supply chain.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
The Service Manager handles job scheduling, asset maintenance, OH&S Checklists and awesome analytical reporting.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Online workshop management software designed to effortlessly manage automotive, marine, truck and other types of workshops.
Visit  for more details.
For more information, check out .
MarketInvoice provides cash flow solutions to help growing businesses.
For more information, check out .
Optimize costs, dispatch and scheduling of your mobile field workers with Synchroteam.
For more information, check out .
It does it in a beautiful user experience on one, simple, dashboard.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
No matter if you transact online or via mobile, Swipe has you covered, every step of the way.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Net, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Roll is simple yet smart workflow management software.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
au, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
A Student Management System designed to reform your RTO.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
If you're an accountant, let us help you change the conversation.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Helps custom home builders and remodelers sell more and run their projects more efficiently by bringing selections, change orders, scheduling, budgets, file sharing, jobsite logs, client communication, and more into one place.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Paperwork on auto-pilot.
For more information, check out .
Accept credit cards from an iPhone, iPad, or Android device.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Accept payments and capture signatures and photos.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
It's all online and is designed for small businesses.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Register and be processing today with a FREE Trial.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
A workflow tool to track and manage your legal spending.
See reports and set budgets.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Singaporean payroll - fully online & compliant with all the relevant legislation, now and in the future.
Support for IRAS, CPF and GIRO for easy payroll admin.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Secure funding for your company based off your financial data.
See the financial health of your company and gain necessary insight to grow.
For more information, check out .
Automate your receivables and get paid faster.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Variance reporting for performance management.
For more information, check out .
SmartBiz makes applying for an SBA-guaranteed, low interest loan easy.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Rerun is made for small businesses, organizations & associations that accept recurring, subscription or membership payments by credit card or eCheck.
For more information, check out .
Debtograph is the fun way to see who owes you money.
It's free.
For more information, check out .
Beautifully web and mobile, with advanced approvals, currencies and tax handling.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Imports CSV, XML, Excel, MYOB and more.
For more information, check out .
A genuinely free, full service, cloud based payroll solution for small to medium sized NZ businesses and not for profit organisations.
For more information, check out .
The world's fastest platform to provide capital to Small Businesses.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Simple cash flow forecasting and budgeting in the cloud.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
The Outlook Integration Tools gives you an array of productivity tools to help enhance your workflow and take advantage of the power of MS Outlook.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
The easy way for small businesses to create an online store.
Edit products quickly and easily.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Features include: automatic payments and automatic credit notes.
For more information, check out .
Monitor hundreds of KPIs 24/7 and be alerted if something goes wrong.
For more information, check out .
Features include: automatic payments and automatic credit notes.
For more information, check out .
Features include: automatic payments and automatic credit notes.
For more information, check out .
A leading project management software tool used around the world to solve collaboration issues.
Manage your Projects, People, and Profits with Copper.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For 2 to 200 employees, check out .
14 day free trial (and then from $16/month), check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Perfect for projects, invoicing and quoting, check out .
Your customer will love the one-click quote acceptance.
A complete cloud based property management software solution, designed for successful property owners and managers, check out .
Bookings, dispatch, track & trace and signature capture all online and mobile, check out .
RewardSuper's RSDataWeb is a web platform for Accounting and Advice firms that administer transaction rich clients structures such as SMSFs and Trusts, check out .
The easiest, fastest way to get any document filled out and signed.
For more information, check out .
Keep track of jobs and the work process from quote, scheduling, emails & texts to job completion and invoicing.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
About SmartTradeA comprehensive job management software system for trade & service businesses with a CRM module to build more information about your customers.
For more information, check out .
For general support, check out the  or this page for information on .
For more information, check out .
Comprehensive management for creative agencies and studios.
Manage everything from quoting, projects, workflow, right through to finances & billing.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
A project management tool made for humans, not robots.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out  .
For more information, check out  .
Online inventory and order management software for smart businesses.
Easily manage all your inventory, orders and customers online with TradeGecko.
For more information, check out  .
Multichannel e-commerce and fulfilment for retailers and online sellers.
For more information, check out  .
Project, team and client management.
For more information, check out  .
Custom software solutions for golf clubs.
Link by Xact Software, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
CRM - the world’s #1 selling contact manager.
Works with desktop and cloud versions of ACT!
com by Stitch Labs, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
For more information, check out .
Track your emails, social conversations, To-Dos, and contact details, all in one place, check out .
Job management software for creative businesses - manage activity, contacts, projects, quoting, estimating and billing all in one place, check out .
A complete system for CRM, lead management, telemarketing and email marketing, check out .
One-stop-shop for your reporting.
Automate your 3-way forecasts, budget preparation, KPIs, consolidations and financial statements.
Suits not-for-profits, accountants and small businesses.
A simple online CRM used by thousands of businesses worldwide.
All-in-one Inventory, POS, EDI and 3PL cloud software for both Retailers and Wholesalers, check out .
A seamless Point of Sale solution to complement Cin7’s powerful inventory and manufacturing engine.
If you are a user of Click 2 Convert, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Retail management and point of sale solutions.
If you are a user of Cloud Conversions, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Perfect for small and medium businesses.
For more information, check out .
ClubHub is an online registration and membership management system.
Fleetmatics WORK, formerly Connect2Field, allows you to schedule work and dispatch jobs to your field workers mobile phone.
If you are a user of ConvertworX, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Personalised conversion, hand-holding your clients through setup, training and support, and constantly updating you, check out .
The world's leading commercial open source CRM.
Offers expert payroll advice & makes it easy to move your old payroll data into a secure online system.
For more information, check out .
Simple, set & forget credit control for small businesses.
For more information, check out .
Point-of-sale, CRM & Event Management app for dive shops.
For more information, check out .
Complete employment management suite including contracts, policies, performance management and support from employment lawyers, payroll and HR experts.
For more information, check out .
Streamline workplace management - manage and record everyday Human Resource, Contractor and Work Health Safety compliance obligations.
For more information, check out .
A wireless job dispatch and work order management solution for mobile field service companies.
etz Technologies empowers the recruitment industry by providing cutting-edge technology solutions from timesheet management, to invoicing tools, and streamlining of back office processes, check out .
Enjoy instant payments and same day settlement to smash your receivables.
Take payments in person with the eWAY mPOS Card Reader.
ExpenseMagic is an iPhone app and cloud service that helps you capture receipts on the move and easily claim every expense, check out .
Manage and sell products on your website, eBay, Facebook and Wordpress.
A fully featured, web based veterinary practice management package - manage all aspects of your practice in the cloud, check out .
Management reporting and financial analysis tool which helps you to assess performance, monitor trends and identify improvement opportunities.
Intuitive job management software designed for tradesmen by tradesmen.
Prepare client workpapers with smart workpapers designed for Australian accounting practices.
Online job management for businesses with mobile workers.
With Zapier it's as easy as drag-and-drop, check out .
Information dashboard for your cloud apps.
Easy, simple and secure with expert local support.
For more information, check out .
Job scheduling and task management designed specifically for the service based industry.
Complete retail management solution for point of sale, inventory and customer management.
Simple & easy automation, taking the friction out of your B2B interactions, check out .
Perfect for small and medium businesses.
If you are a user of Jet Convert, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
For tradesman to move paper-based job cards online to speed up paperwork & invoicing.
A flexible and scalable cloud-based POS.
Send them by post, email or mobile and access securely online.
Try it Free, check out .
Powerful, cloud based payroll system for Australian employers, bookkeepers and accountants.
Great for large payrolls & specialist payroll needs.
For more information, check out .
Get credit scores for your customers and automatically monitor them.
For more information, check out .
Client records checking and correction software for accountants.
If you are a user of Movemybooks, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
For more information, check out .
Full tax support, automated payments and return , check out .
Get the most from your workforce.
For more information, check out .
You key hours, we run the payroll.
For more information, check out .
Simple, fast, accurate and includes an employee portal, T4s and ROEs.
For more information, check out .
PaySuite has been designed for the needs of small-medium businesses.
For more information, check out .
com, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
For more information, check out .
ca, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
0 specifically designed and priced for small / medium businesses and accounting professionals - 100% paperless.
For more information, check out .
I wish to contact these people yearly
co. za, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Fully online and keeps you compliant with all the relevant legislation, now and in the future.
For more information, check out .
Your comprehensive software tool for Electrical, Plumbing, Security, Heat Pump, HVAC, Service & Blue Collar Industrial Contracting Businesses: 1-100 staff, check out .
Instant financial dashboard, create budgets, monitor and share reports with KPI charts and comments.
Staff will love it!
Spotlight Reporting offers accountants the opportunity to create easy, great-looking performance reports and become a trusted advisor for clients.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
The Payroll Site is an online system to help small businesses take control of their wage calculations, produce payslips and file electronically.
For more information, check out .
Trineo's Dime product is the ultimate link between Salesforce.
Available as an out of the box solution and developer edition, check out .
For more information, check out  .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out  .
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Try it free !
For more information, check out .
All-in-one client management, billing & support solution for web hosting businesses.
For more information, check out .
For more information, check out .
Workforce Guardian is an inexpensive online employment relations tool allowing employers to manage staff + create compliant employment contracts 24x7.
For more information, check out .
Workpapers is an online tool that makes processing compliance faster & smarter than ever before.
Control your workflow and collaborate online.
If you are a user of XpressConvert, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Low cost and quick turnaround, check out .
All government payroll taxes, compliance, and filings taken care of automatically.
For more information, check out .
We're a fine art gallery based in London and Suffolk, England and operate on the 2nd hand Margin scheme for VAT.
My client sells pet foods so has different tax rates and needs to identify these for VAT purposes.
Currently my client has a POS system that scans the barcode of the goods and feeds these direct to sage.
They have no plans to offer full integration.
I have a lot of historical data in PocketSmith FWIW.
I have a lot of clients who still write checks.
Something that also allows for manual (not automated) credit control, as we talk to our clients first as a matter of culture and policy.
Though we are grateful for Chrometa help service sometimes its easier to have a discussion with someone in your own country.
Our clients love it.
2M for QBO.
However reconciling is a nightmare and I am hoping someone has solved this.
The bill comes to US$6.
32; the date is roughly right, the amount is close (but not the same so cannot search on amount to match) -- perhaps this is the matching transaction, perhaps not.
I try to reconcile it.
The only way to be sure is therefore to go one by one.
and a date which is similar (how similar?
then OPEN the transaction.
and only at this point can we establish whether or not the payee underlying the Expensify entry is, indeed, Starbucks.
We are currently managing this through a series of Excel spreadsheets but we are looking for a centralized data base.
I would greatly appreciate it!
I'm looking for barcode/scanning software.
Could this be done via manual journal to cancel it out?
Or if there is a work-around?
We are thinking about implementing Fathom but we have a very tight deadline for implementation.
If you have experience with this tool please share.
I am mainly concerned with how long it would take to setup the consolidation part.
The reports leave us wanting though.
I'm sure if you're an accountant or financial type then they are amazing.
Spoiler alert: no it doesn't.
Have GPs record of movements4.
Are there performance issues (as previously mentioned) or have these been rectified?
I am tired of sending separate emails to suppliers to check availability for projects.
They are listed on the Pensions Regulatory Website along with your other integrations of Peoples Pensions and NEST.
Can someone maybe assist with a video or document on what this integration entails?
I look forward to hopefully some constructive feedback.
And I've attached screenshot so hope it makes question clear.
Good morning,I wanted to give some feedback on one of the connected apps Veeqo.
This is an inventory management company and having investigated all of the apps this one came out the best for price and features.
Looking forward to hearing some responses guys !
Any assistance appreciated as we dont know where the date field is to enable us to specify it.
Have scoured previous discussions and have not found the same problem being mentioned.
I have been given access to the payroll as payroll administration.
We have only 12 consumable items.
We're using Tradegecko (TG) for logistics.
Each contract we win has a pre-agreed fee split between the individual principals managing the job.
What have your experiences been?
I signed up for this in 2017 and feel that it is really not much good!
They seem to be building this and amending as they go along.
Overall I would give this piece of kit a 1 star and I worry that I have been sold a (very expensive turkey)!
Keen to get your views.
Integration of benefits would be beneficial to small businesses.
Hello, We're a small dairy operating deliveries to over 200 cafes and restaurants nightly.
Focus is a local server based point of sale software.
My accountant has informed me this is a problem.
AaronTogether We Count
handles all of the issues that you usually find with a committee running an organisation.
keeping Finances is a major part of it.
We help them run their events, memberships, shop and much more and sync all of the information making for automatic reconciling of their finances.
Cheers, Isaak Dury CEO and Founder
I am looking for the best app , that can track my stock , send notifications when stock reaches a minimum etc .
Or what program they may have used to make it work ?
Hence cash flow forecasting in Float and Spotlight fails.
Hello,I'm a small ecommerce retailer currently selling on Amazon and Shopify website, and I'm using Amazon FBA to fulfill my orders.
Is there such a software out there?
We have two Shopify shops, is it possible to integrate the two feeds?
We are having problems in the set up.
We tried 24sevenoffice ERP, but some of their modules are useless outside of Norway and Sweden.
I have looked through the app's listed and can't see anything obvious that may help.
or link both of the above?
The app can currently:- schedule daily, weekly, monthly, and quarterly reports- distribute them to groups across organizations (over email & text messaging)- measure engagement and store historical reportsPlease contact us at hello@reportamigo.
com to give it a try and help us launch:Beta testing is free, and we'd be happy to give you a lifetime discount when we launch as a way to thank you for your feedback and help too.
I have a client, a wholesale florist, who takes orders from florists, then travels to market and purchases all the stock he needs to fulfill the orders.
Or could you point me in the right direction?
Cost of goods sold values in the profit and loss only updates if I manually create.
It should also allow the product to be assigned LOT / batch numbers at each step in the process.
and we carry a lot of stock eg.
p. s. we have shop and work with a tourism.
Do you guys know if their system allows automatic updates between more than one website from the accounting to keep inventory correct ?
Automation is preferred if the CMS can manage the smartlist internally.
Often they have people book on the same day also.
I was wondering if anyone may have come across a booking/inventory app that would facilitate the above?
He is a logistics company and has a fleet of self-employed sub-contracted workers.
At times their rates have increased without his knowledge or perhaps the sub contractor try to pull a fast one!
Continuaously have to check what has been uploaded and then re-upload and wait another week for it to be processed.
As well as selling goods in the shop, they hope to sell some higher value goods online.
We mostly order parts from Dell, Amazon and a handful of smaller vendors.
You can register for a free trial of the system at  and if you have any questions you can let us know by mailing us on info@payaway.
5% fee for paying by credit cards.
We look forward to hearing any feedback you have about the site as well as hearing about any other features or functionality you think would be useful to you.
We have a client who needs to track POs issued against projects.
It will enable them them to manage costs against budgets.
Is there an App that can be used for this?
I have a client who runs a Daycare centre for the elderly.
I have done more than a dozen manual imports and I haven't came across this problem before.
If I had hair I'd pull it out!
We go through sheets of material with no real controls.
Surely it can't be that hard?
End of Rant
I've noticed there is no 'stock alert' min order quantities etc though and I definitely overlooked this when I was comparing products.
IZettle seem unable to assist, saying only that someone will phone back, and they don't!
io and let me know what you think.
As I thought that I needed it.
I thought this would be an easy untick the button next to Disable EU Digital Goods VAT Tax rates.
But this is not the case.
The I click that and getThere were errors with your settings:Tax overrides VAT (Digital Goods) (20.
But have not been receiving emails since the 26/10/16.
The type of the receipt I choice "Receipt" and choice publish to "Expenses claims".
Hey,So I run a small Video Production Company and we're currently looking at improving our project management as our team of employees grow.
No easy way to attach notes to project.
No really dynamic project management and scheduling.
JOB CARD typical functionality - for an electrical (solar PV actually) type contracting company.
Or are there third party tools wich can realise this?
Also we run several vans so needs to have multi diary facility.
The client clicks on the link and is taken straight to the timesheet for the employee.
co. za/) which is old and outdated.
So I might have a deposit of $3000 that contains between five and ten different purchases.
I then have to work out what purchases make up the $3000 to properly reconcile it.
Would the eway feed solve this problem?
com and we can help you get started (we also have great discount possibilities) Kind regards,MohamedCEO - Co Founder.
I've recently switched over to Workflow Max, there is something that seems fairly easy but I don't think it exists.
On the left, a list of "My Jobs" appears.
By default It shows all the in progress jobs, and you can change setting to show estimated or completed if you wish.
My issue is the order in which it displays the jobs.
I might have 10 jobs open, and it sorts them by client name.
I'd love the option to sort by Job No.
(I am aware I can see it all by going to Jobs/Jobs, but this is less than ideal).
Is it possible to make that change in the future?
I am having massive issues with reconciliation efforts.
Are you working on, or do you have upcoming plans to integrate with RingCentral using the RingCentral Connect Platform?
Booking in these serial numbers from purchased inventory.
System remembering serial numbers allocated to particular customers, so date of original sale can be found for warranty/Return issues.
I dont have a warehouse or staff, i plan to contract out all logistics to a 3PL.
I have been looking at inventory apps such as Deer, Unleashed, Trade Gecko or Cin7.
However I can't reconcile against these transactions as they won't appear in search results (possibly because they already have payments against them).
Hello we run a heavy transport and machinery fleet.
Your help is very much appreciatedAdam
I don't see it in the App Marketplace?
I want to accuratley show my cost of good sold.
In woocommerce they are showing as taxed standard rate or Tax free (shipping only taxed) as they should beWhy is this?
If you think you have what it takes and you wish to learn more, then  and fill in the application form.
Of course, they will have signed a contract authorising such a transaction before.
We have been recommended bolt ons such as spotlight and fathom however we are after something a but more cost efficient if possible.
Is anyone aware of a package with similar features or at least does consolidated reporting that is a bit more cost efficient than the above named bolt ons.
My client delivers fuel to different customers.
He needs the ability to give the customer a Delivery Docket to say he has delivered X amount of Litres in fuel.
Restaurant Group of 4 entities•	Restaurant, $3.
The client doesn’t want any inventory control.
Does anyone have recommendations of apps that may be useful in building customised reports so I can manipulate them to look how I want them to?
against my clients and internal jobs within WorkflowMax.
I'm not looking to simply list assets for depreciation purposes, I'm looking to manage all aspects of maintaining that asset.
To give an example, let’s say I have 7 work vehicles in our fleet, 3 generators, 4 pumps, a compressor, etc, etc.
A CMMS would allow us to record each of these assets, track it's location, set up a schedule of periodic maintenance and inspection, auto generate work orders when that maintenance is due (and display in some sort of calendar), have a document storage facility for service manuals, warranties etc to be recorded against the asset, etc.
I have an existing Shopify store, as well as 2 brick-n-mortar stores.
We decided to migrate our POS system to Vend.
The integration also synchronizes Inventory and Customers.
Feel free to drop contact info if you are a freelancer or bookkeeper with experience setting up this type of scenario.
So a portal whereby a customer can login, make a service request (via a form of some description) and then this integrates directly with exo and create and order?
), then fields to input the site of job & job contact details if different from client's address, etc.
AND THEN.
So this is EXACTLY what I'm after.
Currently we are a husband and wife team, no staff.
No errors has been shown on the order detail page.
Is there such an app?
The area I am struggling with is cash payments.
If a supplier is paid cash on delivery from the till, the deducted cash is recorded as "cash out" showing the reduced cash in the till.
The majority of our placements are temporary workers so we want to record the number of days they work each month, against their rate and our billing, to track their days worked and our monthly gross profit.
And lastly phone numbers are overwritten with the whole phone number being put in the number field so you end up with two area codes eg.
The purchase order is linked to the customers order, so stock can be sent straight to the customer upon receival.
Or know of one that is that you may not be using?
We manufacture chilled goods and sell to supermarkets and foodservice customers.
I'm thinking about setting up to allow credit card payments from my clients.
I have a few concerns and questions that are holding me back.
3) Do sync'ed orders have the gross sale amount listed?
Do the related fees etc get sync'ed as expenses?
Surprisingly a number of duplicates (that I didn't know about) were removed in this process.
Then obviously reporting on the project.
Would be amazing if it was.
Looking forward to moving forward - Jonathan
So far I have found some options for Seller Central, but does anyone know of one that works for Vendor Central - US as well as European platforms?
I am subscribing to Salesforce.
Can anyone share with me the best way to integrate with either or both.
For example, we have a client pushing the "period" (e. g. April 2016) and the "type" (e. g. monthly subscription) to Stripe from their front-end API.
We have multiple clients with this type of problem.
I have Tradegecko, Dear and Unleashed as potential options, but I can't find much on the web that is up to date with a comparison.
I am also possibly looking to bring in some help for this project given it's size, so also looking for a recommendation for an addon expert in this area.
Its simple and easy to follow layout allows you to count and compare the delivery with what was invoiced.
I've used Successware for Photographers for over 8 years.
It is a studio management software.
I have a few company cards setup and when I view expenses in Expensify it also shows payments to the card as well as cash back credits.
I did, but haven't heard back from them yet.
These are charged monthly on a charge rate per day.
- Jobs/Projects to have tasks assigned to various staff (project management) including deadlines for various tasks.
- Users to view their current "tasks".
(trying to find a needle in a haystack).
Would love to hear other peoples thoughts/experiences?
I am sure I am missing something here, so apologies if it is an obvious fix.
HiI apologise in advance if my question seems vague.
It makes it rather difficult to reconcile transactions.
One of our local businesses has this with another accounting program and it is brilliant.
To say we're shocked and angry doesn't cover it as this is a client that took great persuasion to step away from an old system, and as such totally out of our control, our relationship is now jeopardised.
The previous monthly cost was around £20-£25 per month.
It appears the lines have somehow been 'flagged' so they do not import.
I am selling physical products exclusively on Amazon at the moment, and have only been doing so for less than a year.
My accounting for FY 2015 was kind of a hamfisted disaster, and I'm trying to get it set up better for 2016.
The problem is both (especially the selling price) fluctuates greatly from day to day and order to order.
We renew passports and want to contact those whose passports are about to expire.
Or recommend a CRM that has this ability to contact customers automatically.
Also to record who delivered, erected and picked up stock.
I have a separate spreadsheet that calculates the costs of each of these by item produced and calculates a minimum sell price based on my desired margin.
The remaining money would be credited to gross profit.
For example.
We supply and install fencing to order, hold some inventory, manufacture some components to order.
Have been recommended the following; Stripe, IntegraPay and eWay.
For example if we bill in February 2016  for one year, the service period may be covering March 2016 to Feb 2017.
We bill in multiple currencies.
We are currently looking at both Roster Elf and Deputy.
We have recently been moved up a 'tier' in their pricing structure and its a huge jump in cost.
I signed up for Stripe earlier today.
We successfully set up the credit card deposit integration which happens automatically each night.
Love to see an example of transaction to keep it clean.
2: support invoicing email out or export to pdf.
I have a potential client in the wholesale food markets industry that needs a system to manage daily orders before the stock arrives.
We have several warehouses to store the products, and we sell and lease them.
This means the countries has different taxation and currency, then the Consolidated financial statement is having different reporting currency.
Hearing from you is much appreciated.
We are a professional services company that deals with billable expenses, reimbursable expenses as well as company expenses.
As far as I can tell, this is not an unusual combination and yet it is causing problems on both sides and with integration.
Nearly every single expense comes from a different merchant and is often not repeated!
Does anyone have any experience of this in the UK?
I have a client that is an online store using shopify.
We receive batch deposits on a monthly basis (commissions under a Heads of Agreement arrangement).
Have had a look at DataDear but not sure if it could cater to all of the above.
Thus, essentially they will be living in the stone age!
•	Build Xact•	Co-construct•	Corecon technologies•	Tidy BuildAny input is greatly appreciated :)
We are wanting to produce job reports to show profits/losses for specific jobs.
We have many projects that we run simultaneously over many different cities.
Additionally we tour these shows within periods of 12 months.
Up until recently we were using:-	Act data base for client, contractor and employee and supplier records, order processing and document production (from templates stored in ACT)-	MYOB accounting software and -	Zimbra for emails.
We require the facility of receiving orders by internet portal and/or smart phone so that any of our clients, contractors or employees can place an order for a training program, consulting service or merchandising service.
We will require each order to:a.
Have an automatic Order Numberb.
Identify the client such as Van Heusen shirtsc.
Identify the service recipient eg Myer Adelaided.
The Service Dateg.
The service address (where it is different from the default)  i.
We have  used Salesforce previously but find it too complex and expensive for our needs.
The QuickBooks shipping manager allows freight cost calculation for invoicing, prints the shipping label, notifies carrier for pickup, provides tracking # to customer.
I've been researching these two inventory programs and I'm leaning towards Cin7 as my preference.
Before I go ahead with my recommendation, I was hoping someone may have some other suggestions or some advice?
That is all.
The company sub-lets buildings.
Ie, hires from Mrs Smith for &#163;100 per day, and charges Mr Jones &#163;120 to hire the building.
We have been using Sage, and their 'Projects' element has been invaluable.
It needs to be SIMPLE.
We're a clothing company, selling clothes to the public via website and to wholesales.
No problems here.
We have manufacturers producing the garments for us.
We have fabric suppliers, we purchase the materials from.
We would then have 70 meters delivered to the Manufacturer and then keep 30 meters in inventory.
I am looking for a way to record conversations / future commitment dates that have been promised by my customers.
Posting it here.
Here's how we used to do things in QB (and I believe this is how QB's Square integration works.
I already record the payments.
Even worse - and I don't get this at ALL.
WHY is it a debit?
75 goes from Square Clearing to Merchant Fees and the other $97.
Reverse for refunds, etc.
But sure would be nice for it ALL to be automated.
But 12 manual transactions a year won't kill me I guess.
Unfortunately iZettle and Square are not available.
Thanks in advanceMuch appreciated
I have multiple companies working on the same Tracking Projects.
Would appreciate a point in the right direction.
and start automating your store accounting.
I searched this forum and it appears that someone had the same issue and was told how to fix it several months ago, but they did not post the solution.
We  'customise' garments on the day with transfers, lettering etc.
, all tailored to individual  customer (B2C) requirements.
I am wondering if a coffee-shop system might be the best fit?
We are a very small start-up so cloud-based, low-cost and mobile would be key factors for us.
We currently utilize an excel file with an ODBC link to our QuickBooks desktop.
It is open source API.
It is basically XL on steroids.
com and smartsheet.
We have looked at zapier.
com, but do not feel it would be the best solution for us.
Does it already exist?
Whatever information you can send my way I would greatly appreciate it.
Some of you might find it a good learning session, so sharing the registration url here:
We have been looking at workflow and have also been pointed towards Tidywork.
Accept credit card and ACH payments.
Testing period is 4 weeks and free obviously.
Roster Planet is an online roster application where managers can set and publish a weekly roster.
We are a Not for Profit Religious organisation based in Australia.
Each of these centers have Income coming in in the way of Donations and expenses being paid out.
90 - this shows as money spent in my statement line ▪	I get a refund from TW on 07/10 of &#163;9.
55 - this shows as money received in my statement lineI can ▪	I raise a credit note for the TW refund for &#163;9.
55▪	I receive it as a cash refund for &#163;9.
55▪	This then reconciles the statement line &#163;9.
22	⁃	which is made up of &#163;9.
55 - fee (already reconciled above)	⁃	and -&#163;0.
We're going bananas with this.
We are an IT consultancy company.
We will be bringing out a streamlined service that needs more automation to keep costs low.
(Signup software) Every month, (3) and (4) happen again6.
(Our software) Uses an the signup software's API to determine if a subscription is active or not and provide services accordingly.
items we buy and don't sell).
An example of this type of inventory is: gloves, raw materials, cleaning products, office supplies, one off equipment, etc.
We are purchasing roughly 500 SKUs that are placed in a storage where the production staff grab them as required.
The software should meet the following criteria:-Uses bar code scanners to track transaction in and out of the inventory location.
If we could schedule a call to discuss a potential software that would be greatly appreciated.
The cost of supplies to make the products fluctuates with seasons.
Selling channels will be eCommerce, we have a selling website, in Magento.
Additionally, we will be selling via agents & distributors and setting up legal entities in various territories in the future.
I am particularly interested in Moving Annual Averages to provide a normalised view of activity as I operate in the highly seasonal tourist arena.
I'm from a company called JobsDun.
In a nutshell it;- Stores your client's details.
- Books jobs and quotes in a simple drop and drag style calendar.
- Takes and stores photos and other files on jobs.
- Takes credit card payments on site.
Most of our customers are small to medium trade and service companies.
The sewing room generally gets the product supplied and then it goes through several stations before being finalised.
Work stations include cutting, sewing, ironing and finalising.
We initially looked at the likes of Timely and Kliniko, however these do not appear to go far enough in terms of patient recall requirements so on that basis the client is happy to continue with their own diary and patient management/recall system which is Optical-based and covers that side of things quite well.
The client will require recording of goods and services.
Looking at Vend it appears very retail/product based, as well as not getting great reviews in the UK.
I then tried Zapier, but the sync was a mess, with data missing or data being garbled.
It wasn't true two way sync either, and couldn't detect changes on either end.
We have implemented Vend for retail clients but it is missing some functionality needed for a restaurant such as table layouts.
Vend themselves even state that it is not really suitable for a bar/restaurant.
We have a system by which a member of the public who recommended us a customer is entitled to 10% of that customer's monthly fee for as long as they remain a customer.
They work in multicurrencies, and want an inventory system that tracks individual serial numbers, allows assembly of parts and separate billing and delivery dockets for third party sellers.
She currently uses Square POS in her cafe and is accounting with MYOB.
They wish this to be allocated to a future date and not show up in overdue payments.
I don't believe this is possible but a bit of clarification may help.
and be easy to change purchase order is ordering differently for each location.
My attempt is to share personal and our practice experiences.
Feel free to take you wish and leave the rest.
but will highlightWe run our practice on an Enterprise Edition of .
We have been a salesforce partner for > 10 years and have deep experience with the platform.
We have the Service Cloud fully integrated with an  using there exceptionally deep integration.
We have been a box partner since they were formed, and have particular experience with their integration.
We have a five year history as a partner with  and have experience with salesforce integration.
Our experience is that bill.
We have been a partner with  since they launched.
We have built out a functional  integration.
One of the road blocks preventing this is reporting.
We currently run a lot of reports using key words in Transaction Descriptions, Eg looking for somebodies initials when reviewing travel.
Check out the youtube video to see how it all works -
I have talked to Rerun but they admitted they are not setup for our needs.
I have a client who has recently started using Austral CCMS for her childcare centre.
I'm after feedback from other members who have experience with this product ie any problems who have had or who have had experience with the company ie trust worthiness.
We would also require more inventory tools and Wondered about Dear Inventory or Unleashed.
The client also required a production scheduling system to compliment WorkflowMax, we used TRAV for this purpose.
com/questions/can-i-save-a-card-and-charge-it-later
We used Shipgear right now for that integration with Quickbooks Enterprise.
I have a client who are currently using Code House Integrated Payroll (CHIP) to manage their database and do the weekly payroll.
It would also be great if it could show us order schedule reminders.
It must be compatible with Woo Commerce shopping cart.
We want to easily compare actual costs to what we are currently estimating and quoting.
We're only a small 3 person team so it doesn't have to be anything too complex.
You can send out one letter or perform a mail merge and send thousands.
We convert your Word document to a pdf and attach it to the email.
3) Fax anywhere in the world to one or many recipients.
All we want is your feedback afterwards.
Is there anything out there that does this?
Hope that is enough information?
<-- well maybe not, payments thing this is a real problem.
Copied from the 'review' discussion: https://community.
542 product items, and conversion balances, and devised a way to deal with 'Sale or Return' (using Purchase Orders, etc.
iZettle interface has been activated again - as I had used it during the trial.
____iZettle is used as PoS (Cash and credit card - using the card reader).
During the trial period, this connection was switched on, with request to process info for last month as well as going forward.
We would love to hear how you are getting on.
They have a very industry-specific POS program with no GL function.
We are looking for the right platform to manage KPI / Target / Bonus / Commissionwhich integrated product do you suggest ?
We are using StitchLabs for our inventory management.
The charges will be based on truck size i. e. 4 wheeler, 6 wheeler etc, not on weight.
We cater to all sole traders, PT's, studios and gyms.
Easy Trace offers great value for businesses who want technology to help them work efficiently.
Please feel free to sign up for a free trial and drop us an email us at helpdesk@easytrace.
We look forward to hearing from you.
We are offering 12 months free us of the software for the first 5 beta users simple email us at info@cattech.
au to get on board.
EASEEsell is an online B2B catalogue that supports Punch-Out electronic procurement from a large array of procurement systems from SAP, Oracle, Ariba, Coupa and others.
A system that gives us a view of equipment available/on-hire/booked as well as the service history linked to each piece of plant.
I have tried both through mobile phones & my computer .
This way we end up spending 3 lots of license fees.
Perhaps one of the options available from Constant Contact will fit the bill.
but I would be very interested to read views from others who have already looked into this area?
Is there a way to run a manual 'synching' of the data with Unleashed so that all of the applicable Unleashed data is pushed down?
How does it compare to WorkflowMax?
Is there anything it is missing?
Anyway, there is a chance that there are some missing areas.
What you guys think, is there something that ?
(yes, we have also integrations with Quickbooks, MYOB, and several others).
must have a solid mobile app/pageI'm looking currently at using minutedock or simpro, I've trialled both extensively.
I'm leaning towards Simpro as it has a great app and customer/job tracking features.
mobile invoicing isn't essential I can continue to do that from the mobile app.
SimPro isn't designed for ICT service providers but meets my needs.
System Ensure is a complete policy and claims management system.
We are looking for Insurance brokers, agents and small to medium insurers who are interested in become a beta tester.
As a beta tester we will setup a number of test policy classes and documents and provide online training.
Looking forward to hear from you and build the best integration.
I have about 20 that I know of that didn't make it over.
Is it a known bug?
Is it being fixed?
Please advise a contact person so that we can start our API integration soon.
Our code base is  : Java.
I have already raised a ticket    : 1913083.
To keep things simple, it doesn't have complex job tracking or project management features the other systems have.
IT is criticle for us that the CRM can create quotes using the inventory so we can track all comms associated with the opportunity.
More information on our app is at: www.
We are looking for something a bit more modern on a monthly basis.
Then manually re-enter the entire sale into ShipStation to produce the label.
This is laborious, tedious and error prone, all solvable with a direct sync.
There have been growing pains but overall it has been a good experience.
Lately we receive the error regarding API limits every day.
After 8 months we have encountered every hurdle imaginable and now have a process that works very well for us.
I'm looking to build something that deals with Investments/holdings.
The advantage would be that it would be offered at a fraction of the cost given it's much more limited scope.
At ezyCollect, we know this is easier said than done.
au/blog/infographic-the-cash-flow-crisis-today/#ixzz3SSZ4yCPn
However the 6 month planing has paid off and we went live 1st of Feb 2015 and to date our staff are very positive about the changes and can see the benefits of cin7 managing our stock which has long lead times and comes from several different countries in different currencies.
And if so which one?
We have a client who runs a smallish winery in NZ.
You can check us out on www.
Basically a ton of info, with one product per row.
This is clunky to maintain and obviously does not integrate with Quickbooks.
I am not sure if our needs would be labeled under inventory management because technically it's more in the manufacturing process than inventory.
That being said, I have reviewed the forums and looked at the inventory management recommendations such as Stichlab, TradeGecko, etc.
and none of those solutions seem to really cover our needs.
Does anyone have any suggestions to point me in the right direction?
For a complete list of our plans please visit our website .
Users willing to join this pilot will receive a free 6 months subscription of Kagazz.
Looking forward to hearing from you.
Have you come across this before?
Hopefully there is such a product or something similar.
What experiences have others in similar positions had?
We run about 20-30 projects a year, each with its own detailed budget.
Update Inventory items on each line item manually (means manually redoing the ENTIRE line)Are there any other good options?
but the customer data doesn't easily allow for parent/students to be set up.
You also get better exchange rates and lower fees than the banks charge.
Its a great addon and 100% free to download and compare with your bankwww.
Looking forward to hear from you and build the best integration.
HiI have a client who is starting a gym.
There are lots of project management apps out there but not many seem to mention inventory management.
and nothing else.
I run a tourist attraction where cards are issued for entry.
There appear to be many membership systems for clubs and non profits but nothing is suitable for attractions.
See screenshot here: http://ctrlv.
Not only did we improve the "look & feel" of DEAR, we also made the interface more responsive and intuitive.
Fonts, colour schemes and consistent layout changes to the User Interface have been implemented for better readability and more intuitive navigation.
Customisable table views have been added to most tables giving you the ability to control data on your screen.
•Currency selection for certain reports has been added.
•Price List printing function now allows to filter products by Category and tags, as well as produce price lists grouped by category.
•Improved export to PDF option for reports will auto-fit entire grid into landscape page layout.
•For Customers and Suppliers added Purchase/Sell history by document.
•For Customers and Suppliers added SKU field for Purchase/Sell history by product.
•Added Stock transfer effective date, Finished Goods Work in Progress date and Completion date, Issue to Production Effective Date.
•Added import/export of Supplier-Product list from/to csv files.
Allows to load fixed/latest supplier prices and additional supplier-related information about a product.
•Contacts import/export has been split now into two formats: for addresses and for contacts.
•Unit cost field has been added to Finished Goods list.
Although we are settling in GBP there should not be a problem accepting USD through stripe and converting to GBP.
How are your experiences with xocashflow for non- english-speaking companies and customers?
Are the email-templates managable in other languages, have you had troubles with currencies, decimal commas, tax display and whatnot?
Do you have the option of printing out the reminders and sending them via letter?
Ive submitted the question to pocketrent but perhaps someone can help.
Appreciate the feedback.
Com, you can order a backup CD for ~$75 that has all the docs ever uploaded to Bill.
- Most options seem to be about short term cash flow planning rather than longer term budgeting.
You can also find it herewww.
Looking forward to hearing from you!
Our month end process is relatively straight forward.
Fathom and Spotlight appear to be the most popular.
The reports which we require include P&L, balance sheet, cashflow forecast and a KPI dashboard.
My client is using Ozbiz at present and it works very well except for the importing of charge card transactions.
We are looking to change from Abtrac to Workflow Max.
Does anyone know if we can export the Abtrac data in CSV format and import to Workflow Max?
Or any other ways of moving the data from one system to another?
Currently, we are having to enter both sides of these kinds of transactions manually.
Then I when we have the actual cost I also want this feeding upwards to compare actual v estimates.
The access to the tool will be restricted to beta users for a couple of months and during this period access will remain free.
As a gesture of appreciation from our end, ALL the beta testers who successfully enroll during this phase AND provide us with helpful feedback will be getting a generous extended free period, beyond the beta phase.
more of this later!
Looking forward to hearing from you Mark RobertsonCEOhttp://www.
If so, which one is best.
We are now looking at upgrading our membership database that is currently an excel spreadsheets with loads of sheets.
I've read through many of the posts regarding Vend Integration and can't find what I'm specifically after.
Vend will be used as my Inventory Control and POS system.
The bill we paid twice was over $3000.
Clearly this needs to be looked into.
Your recommendation is much appreciated.
co. uk/ or visit http://www.
If you have any particular currency requirements please do let me know so we can make sure they are on our development roadmap.
Looking forward to hearing from you Mark RobertsonCEOhttp://www.
Presently using Adobe Bus Catalyst to run web page shopping cart - but am constantly having difficutlies.
It now appears that it is QucikBooks under another name.
co. uk I look forward to hearing from you.
The access to the tool will be restricted to beta users for a couple of months and during this period access will remain free.
As a gesture of appreciation from our end, ALL the beta testers who successfully enroll during this phase AND provide us with helpful feedback will be getting a generous extended free period, beyond the beta phase.
more of this later!
I have tried minute dock but Im yet to find out if it does incidentals etc.
We are a UK based accountancy firm and have a client who is considering using Manu online for stock control.
I thought this was fine but when I go to file my VAT return the "VAT Return" tab doesn't include these in it's "VAT Reclaim.
I am looking for a very similar app to geotimes miles for android.
This app is directly integrated with zero.
Or for VAT, can we put in the first quarterly VAT return due and then have it recurring every three months thereafter?
Hello,Maybe I'm asking the question wrong, because I can't find this answered anywhere.
Is that the only way?
My problem is that there seems to be too many steps.
How do I change that to go into my expense claims please?
Would be interested to hear of what users in the US have to say also.
hello I have a problem.
The first month went smoothly aside from some operator error issues.
The company is a small scale metal working factory.
We have over 300 items that we currently sell and store at our different locations.
I would appreciate any suggestions other than these above systems that could be of better assistance.
or is there a stripe setting?
want to make sure before i commit using Xerothanks
Does anyone have experience in integrating the two systems with an outcome being a cash flow forecast?
Kounta is committed to creating an open platform, with integrations into a range of third party tools and services.
what might have cause this issue ?
Apple no longer supports Bento, and we now have remote workers.
what the pros v cons of each have you found?
I'm overwhelmed with the choice and easily confused by all the features.
SimPro looks good but I have heard mixed reports about their tech support.
I'm very open to comments and suggestions ….
In Japan, It has over 65 positive reviews (4.
5 stars average) since it's released 3 months ago.
In the quiet times 0-9 months of the year they will have <50 employees whereas in peak season over 500.
I have a client with a wholesale nursery who uses spreadsheets to manage their production timetabling.
For eg.
Simpro seems tailored towards trade and service contractors.
I have suggested Harvest to the client however I don?
I still have to fix a few UNKNOWN transactions and assign it to FOOD or whatever seems correct to me.
This is preventing me from getting started!
So SOH started at a zero balance and has gone further and further into negative ever since.
I now want to correct this problem.
We have a few clients in the Building/ Construction industry.
At present we manage our jobs through a bespoke CMS system which can be problematic.
We are looking at the possibility of moving our job management to an already built system that gives us the flexibility to customise.
I am on the $30 per month plan.
Zen saves me $11 a month this way.
I only have a CPA for end of the year stuff.
auHave a client who runs training for his staff and also paying clients.
I want to allocate a different discount % to each customer per catagory.
I have the option to edit transactions that I have reconciled, however I cannot seem to edit expense claims that I have made.
Please could someone help me to figure out a solution to this problem.
Very grateful for your help.
Does either have a 'killer feature' that distinguishes it from the competition ?
Would love to get this sorted.
So when we heard about Vend HQ, we thought this was the perfect fix.
However after hearing mixed reviews, normally based on location, we are now slightly sceptical.
Has anyone used Vend successfully in the UK?
How was training, set-up and so on?
and packing slip (product #s, # of cases, size, weight, total weight, etc.
I offer prepaid hourly packages to my clients.
We wanted to get some feedback?
That is, services such as Rerun and Bill.
9% or similar on a $5,000 - $10,000 transaction is very cost-prohibitive.
Anyone else seeing this hole in the ecosystem?
I am using PayPal, Stripe and Square now for different engagements.
We are US based company that resells drug testing kits and supplies to employers and non-profit agencies.
And of course, as inexpensive as possible.
The client is in the Manufacturing industry and they are working with liquids for example they make body wash.
These raw materials are then used to make the body wash and the components used to make the BULK as it is called needs to be taken out of raw materials and quantity used shows in stock as a different stock item with the associated costs of Raw materials, labour, etc.
Then the body wash is pumped into bottles as a finished good which is another level of stock.
This is a basic description of the needs however raw materials would have to be stored as Kilos or Litres but when taken out of stock for the BULK it would only be taken out as portions of Kg or Litres.
The BULK will obviously be in Litres.
I am now trying to integrate with Capsule.
It is not exporting the data correctly.
The web store side is issuing and calculating the taxes correcting - for across Canada and the US.
Each item may be sold across many different provinces, so depending on the address of the customer, the webstore selects the correct tax to charge.
I expect a maximum of around 20 transactions per month.
IE Called for broken printer, fixed problems and took 15 minutes.
80 that Sage want for Sage 50 Forecasting.
My contact information can be found at www.
We are importing our goods directly form the overseas manufacturers.
All the rest is open for suggestions.
When we enter a negative purchase order for.
25 refundable pallets which are being returned to our supplier.
This will generate an negative purchase order and in Vend it all looks fine.
I am a small import company, selling direct to  retailers.
Our current accounting system is integrated with Avatax, and we don't want to go back to a manual system.
I've looked around but can't really find anything?
I sell beer to pubs.
It is thid reporting element that i am struggling to find.
We are entering American orders on Stitch in GBP as Stitch is not dual currency.
All credit to the team at Quotient!
I love the way the team listens to us.
Its a virtual world out there, but that doesn't seem to matter with these guys, they get back to me almost immediately whenever I contact them.
Get to it.
95 per month for 100 items, $49.
95 per month for 500 items and $69.
95 per month for unlimited items.
All hosting is included in these prices.
We have sites running on Wordpress, Joomla, Facebook pages, Adobe BC, a whole range of custom built sites and more.
We have about 200 projects (jobs) per year.
He generally buys product in batches and it is possible for one batch of products to be sold to multiple customers.
We're looking to streamline our event invoicing process with www.
I am trying to assist an Arts based company that puts on several shows and programs throughout the year.
Have looked at Procision + but not sure that it has all the features we are looking for - any suggestions?
"My client manufacturers fasteners and is looking for a program that will 'build an item' from smaller inventoried items.
Apologies again if this is a very basic question.
He is using excel to produce a kind of manual consignment note at the moment.
This must also then reschedule the next inspection.
Expiry dates which will allow users to assign expiration dates to items.
Items with expiration dates can be sold randomly if costing method is Special-Batch or sequentially if costing method is  FIFO – Batch.
Auto-generated lot numbers and serial numbers for finished goods.
Adding multiple suppliers to the product, adding supplier fixed price vs latest purchase price.
Importers have an option to specify supplier product name along with their own name.
It might be useful if rebranding or relabelling is involved.
Open settings tab and select ‘Skip’ option for irrelevant steps.
We trade through a network of wholesallers, retailers, direct to the end user both online and offline.
We do this in the UK and we starting to also work overseas.
We are looking to supplement this with a full stock/ inventory system to remove a tonne of duplication and manual spreadsheet nonsense that has evolved.
I guess my question would be .
P. s. Prefer something open source or certainly properly cross platform.
Download products from Shopify into your DEAR Inventory.
DEAR Inventory acts as a master inventory that tracks orders, adjusts product levels, and updates the inventory within all of your storefronts.
Create and maintain product families, auto-generate SKUs for variations, buy and sell using product families for similar products applying bulk select/update operations.
Check product availability while your customer on the phone, see when the product has been ordered or allocated for sale.
Tell your customer or supplier what and when item has been purchased.
Additional enhancement to our job costing module.
Track direct materials, labour, subcontract costs, equipment, other direct costs and overhead at their actual values for every job.
Come on….
It's ready for beta testing; hoping to find some good beta testers.
For more info you can check our web site at www.
com and I’ll get you set up.
And looking forward to seeing you at XeroCon in SF!
HiWe produce one of NZ’s best olive oils and balsamic products and sell online by the bottle or directly into Gourmet food shops around the country by the case.
We want the CRM to do        a.
Calendar /Events/Facebook        c. 	To do List       d. 	Email Marketing of our different group databases       e. 	Prospects        f. 	Social?
For detailed info please visit our site at  and sign up.
com/integrate/WHMCSI'm keen to hear from others in terms of using either, e. g. pros/cons, etc.
I'm leaning towards the Edge Hosting as it appears to focused/specialised relative to the more generic OneSaas solution.
We are considering Unleashed and TradeGecko.
Stitch labs looks good, but it doesn't seem to be shopping cart, but more of an inventory tracking app.
as long as it works!
(I'm looking on behalf of a seller small B2B parts if that matters!
I am currently using MYOB Enterprise and it is costing me money as it is sooo slow.
I could not find a way to do a straight export to Highrise.
It appears it can be done on the Ostendo website but would love to hear from anyone.
I have a small legal firm current using LEAP legal with LEAP Accounting integrated.
If so, on a scale of 1-10 how would you rate their cloud app?
Users have the ability to discount and mark up prices by amount, percentages, price override and flat amount (for services).
The sequence of discounts that can be applied is:1.
Please have a look at  dearsystems.
Meaning FGs can be subcomponents of a another FG?
We developed an app called Late Fee Manager www.
com currently only works with Intuits QuickBooks desktop and online.
We are excited to let you know about our most recent release.
Similar to serialised inventory, except a batch represents a group of items instead of an individual unit.
A batch number is assigned to each batch of items, and the number stays with the batch as it goes through the system.
You can track when each batch was received, shipped, built, and so on.
DEAR dashboard has been improved to display a snapshot of your organisation’s financial position based on transactions entered into DEAR Inventory.
com or contact our support team at support@dearsystems.
com for more information.
Have a client who is a naturopath - needs Inventory control and CRM that includes a diary/appointments feature.
Ability to email reminders about appointments and set up custom fields for the customers.
We are in early development and will offer free useage of this system, with a beta tester willing to start the service, and giving constant feedback.
For example the table would have columns Monday to Friday and then rows of 'Full Day', 'Morning', 'Afternoon', which would have an 'x' in the appropriate cells for that week/month.
A huge amount to ask I know!
It mentions http://safeguardmy.
I run a small technology consulting firm in the United States.
How does it compare to WFM?
I'm interested what other small businesses are using to manage their inventory with.
May order from one supplier to go to another supplier or to a client or whatever.
So it all has to be entered again.
But they cannot be entered into the PO as a custom field.
DELETE A JOB STATEUnless I'm missing something, but I cannot find a way to delete a job state.
There is a little flaw which they can still see jobs if go through to assign job staff or managers everything in system.
Job schedule, staff schedule, etc, etc, only for assigned jobs.
I had no reply back on this matter.
REPORTSOverall excellent - but wondering how to get a WIP generated where it tabs to spreadsheet for the dates, tasks and milestones into separate columns or rows.
Everything should be in it's own area.
SUB JOBSSomething to think about that no other system I know of offers.
-      Purchase Orders – enabling authorisation and the option to process it partially as the work is completed.
-	Job Costing including costing of payroll down to the detail of allocating superannuation to jobs.
Please drop in your ideas and answer.
at the moment we dont have a decent CRM in place because of this!
HiI'm currently trying to integrate all 3 programmes but I'm having a slight issue with contacts.
We don't wat suppliers going onto the Capsule CRM (which is working fine).
Also would anyone know which is the best way round to operate.
I did try to contact the makers of the application about a month ago, but didn't get a response.
We conduct R&D project that are not invoiced to external parties.
We are also looking for inventory management system again with multi currency and multi location capabilities.
We currently serve more than 1000 businesses with their EDI messaging needs.
I see that there is version for prestashop 1.
4, but my experience says that prestashop versions 1.
4 and 1.
Feedback can be posted on http://dearsystems.
Below are DEAR Inventory features:•	Purchase orders, Credit Notes, Stock, Return to Supplier, Un-stock.
•	Stock adjustments, Stocktaking, Stock Transfers, Finished Goods, Stock reordering•	Reporting on Inventory Movement, Stock on Hand, Cost Analysis, Compare Goods Received vs Ordered, Profit Summary and much more.
They then convert the same to a PDF before submitting to their clients.
I should have added currently we are only using WFM for invoicing and raising POs against a job.
Are you heading to Xerocon next week in Auckland?
We'd really love to meet you and buy you a drink!
Am I missing a product that is out there?
Also, company is in Washington state and has L & I and other reports.
Please reply here if you have been looking for this.
We require to put the following in our system* Multiple styles / with multiple colours / with multiple sizesSo we may have 30 styles each in 4 different sizes in four different colourways.
If you haven't heard of LedgerLive already, it's a .
csv file and bring them in periodically?
WooCommerce is one of the leading e-commerce plugins for Wordpress.
We are running a small travel agency and working very manually with our systems currently as we only have a few clients.
They have 10 people in the field, so lots of access required.
So we are looking to completely replace MYOB RM in the same process.
And also recommendation for a simple loyalty program.
Is there already a way of doing this that I've missed?
The difference would be the cash in hand.
No changes to the settings have been made.
After doing some research I have found that there is an API call limit.
How can we check if this has been reached?
“Error exporting contact”Existing linked contacts show the following message.
I have a client that is a letting agent, collecting rent on behalf of landlords.
Now they have Standard and Pro.
Finally I want me telesales people to enter orders on behalf of the salesmen.
I think these are very simple requirements, but cannot find a system, unless you sign up and all that, which highlights these as features.
Projects may have goods in USD but all shipping and local costs become AUD.
Where you can turn it all off so it does not show at all.
I work for a technology company and we sell access to services on a rolling monthly basis that starts as soon as the order is put in however we bill once per month at the start of the month.
This should have some form of plan drafting or design software as well if possible.
Signup for the beta at If this is something you're interested in - we'd love to hear from you.
All the bestColin Float.
We require job scheduling,  job management, mobile workforce for smart phone with photo function, performance reports, client login.
We work within the public and private sectors and require a system the manage to core area of operations.
My client has around 4000 very small transactions per month - £1 to £4 usually.
I'm starting to think it might be better to import consolidated data.
Will the cost of OneSaas be prohibitive?
I tried a couple but couldn't find this functionality.
I have a client who deals with Centrelink Centrepay.
comThey claim on their website that they integrate with XeroCan I get peoples experiences.
My client had MYOB and Sugar CRM online in seperate silos.
My client is frustrated.
Hello, I havent seen any guidelines about the integration with Vend.
Please provide guidelines on this please.
I am sure I am  not the only one out there.
I would appreciate any feedback on whether you set Jobs up using Milestones as your Iris job stages equivalent or Tasks as the Iris job stages.
Any help or advice greatly apreciated as starting to regret the decision.
I want to send them automatically once they are created and approved, and they should be personalized,Using DebtorDaddy's pre-due reminder, could one set this to -30.
What are your views on this?
HowdyHoping to tap into an existing WFM user.
Whats the best strategy you have found for getting this in place?
Sign up is open and free so we'd love your comments and feedback.
I believe there is a Fooman connector and also One-saas.
My Client is an IT Service desk and has his process well integrated in Commit.
Wondering if anyone has tips and tricks they've learned along the way?
Emails were sent to the correct departments but no one can help.
Do you have tips & tricks to increase efficiency for it?
Workflowmax to complex.
In fact I am impressed with all the Consultants I've encountered so far.
It shows empty.
The service is unavailable.
I have been browsing through posts on this community forum and I'm seeing an increasing number of posts and replies with no date stamp on them.
I noticed that shortly after I posted that reply, all the timestamps had been removed from all the replies and the original request.
I have repeatedly followed up on it for several weeks, but all I could get back is an answer of the kind of: " we are working on it".
They are probably still "working on it" and I received no communication since November.
Too bad that the competition is not good enough.
There isn't a timeline on when it will be fixed.
I am finding this annoying, confusing and easy for employees to accept the prefilled code instead of thinking about where it should really be allocated.
Access was granted and that's the last I ever heard!
This has happened on at least three occasions before.
I have followed all the instructions many , many times.
I always get the activation emails through .
but I get no Feeds.
I am a developer and I have even given you ideas.
We only really shifted from MYOB because of that feature.
It WAS working up until May 27th 2017HEEEEEELP!
Most nearly everything from tax to super requires it to be sorted in order of SURNAME.
I don't reckon there would be any payroll system on the market that sorts in first name order.
We have employees that are both entitled, eligible and non-eligible.
The reference is CX0005035197.
It makes difficult to figure out what has cleared and what hasn't.
Here's an example.
Nothing has changed on our end.
Perhaps a bug with the latest release?
I changed browser as suggested but the problem remained.
and the individual had no intention of facilitating any sort of action.
I was told to find a link to the correct department (billing was his suggestion for a technical error, what a multi talented team.
and go through the whole process again.
Couldn't find an existing topic so I want to vent here.
Might only be an extra 30 seconds yes, but multiply that with all the others you have to do and it really adds up.
Such a pain in the backside.
I usually find other suppliers that email PDF's directly rather than give retrieval links but I guess in this situation I'm stuck.
I am partially sighted and am having great difficulty in seeing the text on all pages the colours are simply too pale and too close togetherwho though grey on white would be good to read ?
My adviser says this cannot be altered If that's the case then unfortunately you will be loosing a newly signed up customer after all it is a form of discrimination against the disabledSo your'e feedback here is a resounding Terrible !
If I select for eg.
why enter a default code in settings if it is not used?
Raised a query 48 hours ago relating to auto enrolment asking for someone to contact me as your help guides online are really unhelpful, I have numerours questions to ask and nobody to contact, after nearly 48 hours I am still waiting for a reply.
I raised my issue on 28th April and e-mailed again this morning and I haven't heard anything from the 24 hour support team.
The company is a joke.
Take your money for an accounting system then take your information.
All the phone calls do is go to a ladies voice mail and she never ever returns the calls.
Been waiting for 2 weeks.
I posted this on Facebook also.
for example all the BAS payments, and asic payments?
Apart from the automated responses that tell me I should hear back in 24 hours I'm hearing nothing.
I have submitted 2 queries that are quite urgent.
These are up to 5 days ago!
I can't click this button because it's throwing a javaScript error.
com" from accessing a cross-origin frame.
Making it hard to find how to contact support  to be purposeful.
Then I went to your website and clicked on Support.
I did a search thinking maybe that would take me to an "if your answer is not here contact support".
But hiding it altogether and putting it where no one would expect to find it is another matter.
Its now been almost 3 hours and I'm still waiting and unable to speak to someone to check on progress.
I keep receiving an error message when I try to approve the CN saying I dont have enough items to receive?
I raise my queries in March and the responses have been either poor or slow.
When I asked for 'Tax return 2016' migration, I and most people understand this as the financial year ended in 30/06/2016.
Please refer to ticket CX0004681910
What exactly are you working on it appears to be your typical response "Its on the list to do or not far enough up the list at all".
I have sent another email this morning to support@support.
com marking this as URGENT, let's see how long it takes to obtain a response on a query that is now 2 days old!
Such as, restriction on editing the general setting.
It will be very helpful.
As I am going on a holiday, I am planning ahead on the payables.
My and my team's emails to your support email address go ignored and unanswered, and there is no telephone support which means that we can't even call in and get someone on the other end of the line to assist us.
Then about a month ago, the person dealing with the query seemed to switch and we've not had a response to REPEATED requests for assistance.
Hello,I would love to hear thoughts on this.
My concerns are:- accessing documents.
Is it worth storing the paper for future convenience?
Is there a cost?
Then,2) Various option buttons don't seem to be working.
Again this works perfectly in Safari (with the same user and same access permissions).
I have checked that I am running the most up to date version of Chrome and I can confirm that no changes have been applied to the general Chrome settings.
I then have to click on the drop down menu arrow, and then start typing, and hey presto it then works.
I am wondering how to look at the last years Profit and Loss.
A customer paid 2000 but only owed 1500.
Takes painful seconds to load after every typed letter.
I tried generating other balance sheet or profit and loss reports but also encountered the same message.
My colleague have checked the javascript on the Mac settings and it is an updated version.
Regards,Michael Lee of UFIT
More frustrating when you can not speak with someone directly and have to wait 5 days plus to receive a response!
No one can help me except to say that the product team is "researching" the problem and will get back to me by "end of February. "
This has been the status since January.
I have asked to know what is going on, and no one will respond to explain.
It is bad enough to have the problem go on for weeks, but the lack of communication is even worse.
I am still stuck after over half an hour trying to make this work.
I now have something which shows 12 months but has given me a complete and utter nonsense load of figures - I will email it to support.
The worlds most beautiful accounting software?
The functionality of check printing in your system is ridiculous.
Seriously, get it together.
Now the columns have gone and all these details are collapsed.
All I want to do is see my billing history.
I have tried everything.
So then I see at the bottom it says contact us, so I try that.
It asked me to log in, even though I was logged in, it then directs me back to my dashboard, and the cycle continues.
I have attached screenshots OH WAIT I CAN"T because your review here won't let me.
Why the labryth to get help?
I am going to go back to Quickbooks.
No P&L and HORRIBLE customer servie.
NICEEEEGet me my receipts ASAP.
I may switch back to MYOB at this rate.
The reconciliation stays loading and actually shows the wrong details.
There are two screenshots I have taken showing this bug.
jpgTHis is after an f5 refresh: http://i61.
Unfortunately, we cannot see for whom this error applies.
I hope you can help as this is driving me crazy.
I have added item codes and item names via the upload template.
How can I stop this from happening?
Of all the feature requests I have seen  and been part of discussions about, this feature should have been so far down the list.
Look at the requests for Sent email reports and for payroll features which should be far more important than this one.
I have logged in and found out I can't access my data.
Contact through email is too slow.
999999% of it's budget on expanding it's customer base and not a great deal back into the product itself.
I appreciate the help I did get and I appreciate your effort to make exporting data from the app possible and portable.
FWIW, I am moving to Zoho Books.
Good luck and keep plugging away.
It has been over a month now.
(I assume many other businesses do the same).
I’ve putting it on here as it will have affected many companies without them even realizing it.
but that never came.
At one point they said it was because there wasn't a lot of requests for it.
but I think my feedback didn't make it up – which was that BB has all of their partner cards listed as different cards vs. Chase or American Express (which house all their partner cards under one backend login).
com - Not the Citi version)Granted.
We have to download around 10,000 rows per month and increasingly this is becoming problematic.
For example - CX0004259912:- I have listed my question from my email, they seem never read it.
One email (CX0004259912) have involved few persons (e. g Melissa, Brent, Aashin & Zoe).
I can't constantly communicate with my one person.
I have replied her email immediate with my comments (19:15HKT@10Jan).
But she didn't reply me during her working hour and no one response me as well until (12:15 HKT@11Jan).
I have already spent 5-6 working for solve the issues on Upload statement and Reconciliation in PayPal USD.
We were assured that someone was working on this issue, only to find that nothing has happened to rectify the situation.
Looking online on your community chats, I can see we are not the only ones having this issue and in fact this issue was raised in Feb 2012 … 4 years and 11 months ago and it still has not been fixed.
This needs to happen.
For the most part, I am one of those happy customers.
Unfortunately, this issue has tarnished my experience.
##Please kindly give me a clear instruction and Help.
For example, I have an employee who worked for me for 5 weeks.
I entered 0 as the Opening Leave balance, 5.
77 hours as the accruals each fortnight and 150 hours accrued over a year.
762 hours (when it should actually be about 14.
Trying to process some Leave requests.
The Payroll | Leave page comes up with {{ i18n.
t('disp_entitlements') }} as the title, and the list isn't populating.
Something is seriously broken!
My impression was not.
They are not knowledgeable or responsive and are apathetic when they can't figure it out.
You have no accountability for the reps to appropriately triage or resolve issues.
No phone number is a clear indicator it is not a priority.
You have decided saving money is more important than serving customers which says a lot.
Furthermore, your email support is so poor and so poorly monitored that the issue becomes compounded.
Of course the questions I can't answer as they asked for street names etc which I can remember but could be spelt 1 of many different ways i. e. crescent, cres Cres etc with a 2 hour lockout in between.
com) over the course of a month and have never had a reply.
The most recent email was this Monday 5th December at 4:35pm.
on the main page after choosing a photo, uploading it and clicking Done.
Please bring back this feature as my reporting now takes even longer.
I reported this on 11th November, chased it up today only to be told the following.
Glad it has been 'prioritised accordingly'!
Your issue had been escalated on to our Product Team for resolution.
As you can imagine our developers are very busy at the moment, but your issue is with them and has been prioritised accordingly.
As soon as we have another update we'll be back in touch.
It's unfortunate that we've seen no progress on this in 6 weeks.
In the Dashboard, I have $4.
00 showing in the Expense Claims box under both Your current claim and Total of current claims.
Except that the claim is actually for $4.
It's great for the software to assist in reduced keying of common items, but I suggest your logic needs to be exactly the opposite of your implementation.
Rather than opt out, it's opt in.
Don't assume we all want it and then burden those that don't with the task of removing it.
Been getting this for two days now.
"We're having trouble connecting to our banking services.
Some functionality may be limited as a result of this.
We should be back up and running shortly.
I get this message despite the banks not being listed as problematic inhttps://www.
It's severely affecting my productivity.
Now we're looking at ~4 hours to earn 40 points.
Sage are making on their cloud offering.
If my customer replies directly to the quote, the reply comes back to me.
Despite adding a note in my quote template, I have missed jobs in the past due to this and now a customer.
The first response that I received was over the 24 hour turnaround the automated email promised and then the response was to say sorry you want to cancel the subscription, find out who your subscriber is and then here is the link so you can cancel the subscription.
I have received a further response today after sending off several other emails regarding this asking for more details.
I sent those through immediately and have been waiting ever since.
One of the selling points for us was the previous quick turn around from contacting support to getting a response - we thought it was great.
Lately we get an email stating they will be in touch within 24 hours, at times it has been longer than this, and then the response has been an auto generated link to a site that usually doesn't answer the question.
Personal service is really, really important.
The conversation started 3 years ago and in May 16 you said that you had started to work on it.
I have not found any progress reports as you mentioned but also feel that 3 years later we do not know where we stand.
I feel that if you undertake a task then we should know when you expect to complete.
The request has been terminated.
I have watched the video, but can't see what I am doing wrong.
I have problem log in and connecting is till pending, I have tried clearing my cookies and also I tried to log in via Safari, Chrome and Mozilla.
Do you have any suggestions what the problem could be?
I sent through my files for conversion nearly two weeks ago.
I have received absolutely no communication back.
How long should I expect to wait for?
com/questions/23881754/how-to-move-next-input-tab-after-fill-4-characters$(".
Try again by going back to your previous page.
If the issue continues, check out the Help Center.
Previously I had been quite happy with the service but these two interactions have made me question whether the advisers actually read my emails or could be bothered to look into the problem.
type of response.
The support answers go unanswered and my accountant, who has let the subscription lapse and then has gone on leave and is uncontactable.
I sat down and entered repeating bills.
The % calculation is most useful, but is not available should I enter a repeating bill.
Streamtime allowed you to put in your cost price and apply a mark-up.
It is only visible in the quotation window.
Today, I even received an email (addressed to former employee) to transfer the subscription to the me if they they were agreeable.
Very frustrating as needing to send urgent Purchase Orders etc
I have used about 5 accounting programs over the years.
It is slightly above or below, and therefore it is hard determine which OK to click on.
This has only been happening in the last couple of weeks.
We spend half our life on the phone to our IT support, who often reboot the server.
the problem goes away for maybe half a day and then it dumps us out.
Our productivity has gone out the Window and we have had several IT support people trying to fix it for us.
Has anyone experienced this and can you tell me the solution to pass on to the IT support people?
My first email I had clearly indicated that I had downloaded transactions from American Express in OFX format for a period of several months and that only the latest transactions were imported.
100 percent there were transactions for every month since I have multiple transactions per day.
I clearly indicated that it was download from American Express directly.
Think about that for a second.
Furthermore, based on the responses to my questions from your team I don't think they are taking the issue seriously or listening to my questions and detailed information before crafting a response back to me.
com since 10Aug, 12Aug and today and no replies.
I simply want to buy the software and I am worried now.
my email sent from is edamelchua@bced.
In particular:I make the changes.
I have screen shots of all of these scenarios.
Having to muck about with the invoicing this month has really impacted on my productivity.
I have checked every contact to see what their default settings are and they are either blank or 'Tax Exclusive'.
The slowest part of the process is adding in the date.
Even an option to type in the date would be nice.
Such drama - put this in the wrong dicussion forum - so have to copy and paste here.
Reports are no good for bookkeepers.
Who is doing your R&D ?
Certainly not someone with who is a bookkeeper user.
Cant talk for accountants.
It was a big drama to reconcile.
And I do A LOT of books for A LOT of clients and I have to manipulate the reports to get what I want.
Sending out bulk emails with letters for debt collection - come on - you are no where near what is required.
Why have an accounting product that does not cover everything.
Debt collecting is standard bookkeeping stuff.
And dont get me started on the payroll reports - ugh.
You really are going from extremely bad to completely hopeless.
We have an ex employee who had entered expenses in error.
Back to the actual problem.
Our book-keeper has been chasing and chasing you.
Our Technical Team are still looking into this, and we'll be in touch with you once these claims have been removed.
We apologise for the inconvenience.
The ticket .
You increased price but added nothing
We are experiencing an unusually high number of queries at the moment. "
I asked if somebody trying to solve problem but did not receive answer.
I cannot email payroll employee summaries and I lost term.
That was due on 14/07/16.
The quality of  support is absolutely unacceptable.
If anybody can answer my enquiries and solve problem finally?
In our specific case it turned out to be a 2 cents difference which I know is minor but WRONG none the less.
I was also sent to an 4 year old thread to put my name to the list of requesters.
Adding up line items correctly and calculating the correct VAT amount shouldn't even be a request!
Most definately it shouldn't be a request that is being ignored for 4+ years.
I think I will post this to all appropiate threads.
I had a question answered almost immediately from one of your agents.
I was having issue understanding how to process a refund and they called me directly to walk me through the process.
OK I have watched things get posted on these boards for the last 3-4 years.
MOST of them have never been actioned, and we get the same responses constantly.
My gosh it should be a simple quick task.
Upgrading to the paid version of entryless has made a huge difference to our wait times and I can't do my job without it.
Is there a scheduled or unscheduled outage?
They don't know and I should speak with an accountant.
And also direct me to Payroll.
If this was a more general contact update, this would have been a serious issue.
I have found that some funds have been paid and some not, by me having to access all the super funds  manually to see if they had been paid the Mar Qtr Super.
This lack of transparency by Click Super is a great cause of concern
The columns are so wide that the data is much harder to see easily and very little fits on the screen.
Previously all of the columns fitted neatly under the main menu headers in the centre of the screen.
Is there a status site I could be checking, that I don't know about?
And now I'm 5 hours behind because I have to redo everything I've done today.
You are better off using a browser but then that has issues to.
Last week one of our users experience a blank screen when trying to going into Customers.
This morning I have had the same issue.
How are we supposed to work with this?
Hugely important for a users confidence, but somehow someone has lost the plot, and it is not this user!
Complete all fields, and upload a scan of the receipt, but do not press "Save"2.
Check all fields against the receipt, and check the uploaded scanned receipt to make sure it is the one I intended to upload3.
Press "Save"Now I tend to make my scanned receipts be fairly small files, say 50KB to 150KB in sizeand I have a 75 Mbit/s downstream connection --- 7.
Taking an average 100KB receipt, that should download in 100,000 / 7,500,000 second or 1/75 of a second.
We're looking at 1 to 5 seconds to download the image.
Can you look into what might be causing slow download of attachments?
I've implemented and used NetSuite in the past and it is a solid choice, no doubt.
Now working with Unleashed it has supported our inventory needs which our company needed.
I have waited a whole day and still no response to a query even after two further reminders.
is it an antipodean thing ?
Thankfully she works remotely for me and is superb.
I asked about tutorials and was sent here:https://www.
Oh, only available to partner edition.
He said "all the content".
The.
Yet over many tweets they continue to dispute what they actually said.
Your CSR advised me that all content was available to me.
It's as simple as this: Please provide it.
is correct.
I have asked for advice from support team and have received email reply of, within in the next 24 hours unless they notice it is urgent.
As I was planning on doing quite a lot of work!
I sent an email asking for help at 9.
55am yesterday morning and received the promise of an email within 24 hours.
I have heard nothing and I did say it was urgent.
The content of the email is belowI am trying to generate a BACS file for HSBC but I am having problems with the OwnerID.
Export error: OwnerId is not a valid long integerCan you help please?
Fix it now!
FIx it now!
FIx it now!
I am not going to download and distribute individual payslips for 25 staff.
With super and paid leave being unassigned it creates a lot of extra work for me to get the numbers right.
Is there an ETA on when this will be completed if at all started?
You seldom reply to my emails with vague excuses and asking me to keep trying to log in while you try to sort it out.
I now have to continue begging you to do something about your lack of service while you receive my payments for a service that you obviously are not providing.
that you may finally start providing the service I am paying you to provide.
I sent an email to Billing - you'll hear back within 24 hours the helpful automated email reply said.
It took more than 5 days and required another email to hear anything.
Anyway I followed the helpful instructions but to no surprise.
it didn't work.
Of course if we could, you know, talk to somebody.
This is one of your customers statements which nails your attitude to fixing this issue on the head.
"it’s not in our short-term plans.
> Ignore for two years> TWO YEARS> Comment every now and again in non-committal way.
they exist in the default option.
this really shouldn't' have been an oversight via developers.
Or go back to manually importing our statements!
I've been struggling with it for days on end.
came over from Quickbooks trying to keep accounting from an ecommerce store.
The refund process makes no sense and is doing the most damage.
Never expected it to be harder than QB.
Whenever I enter my card details, I get the message "unable to validate card details.
Unfortunately, after several attempts with your support team, they have not helped me on that matter and that is why I have been strongly considering to go to Quikbooks and take my one and counting client with me.
I have now sent over 5 messages with only getting an automated reply.
Iam very seriously annoyed with your lack of response.
I dont want an email sent to me with links to click on i want a person to ring me asap on 03 50 211129"
I have been having issues with my software creating conversion balances on it's own in several different places.
I have emailed customer service twice.
If someone doesn't get back to me soon I will be switching to QuickBooks after tax season.
Yes there are search option, but not the most basic one.
I have also sent three emails and still have not had a response.
Search is terrible.
We have lots of customers with similar names, e. g. Some Company Name Here London, Some Company Name Here Manchester.
So I have to save the quote, then go and find the customer.
That's all I see on each item and have to click on "More" for each one to see the actual information.
If it used the full real estate on my screen, I could see the full text on each transaction.
Yes I have contacted support (and the developers) about these issues, however the response is usually to suggest it as an idea.
The PO is then moved to the 'billed' list.
So I returned to the PO, edited the PO to 'unmark as billed', and started again with 2 POs.
Now one of them has appeared on the bill list, but the other has not.
This seems to be a bug, and has not happened until today.
I have raised it with support - Maybe it can be added to the pre-release tests post any change?
My clients aren't impressed either.
You still have more work to do before you can compete at the same price.
I contacted customer support 2 days ago and have not received a response.
Grief from HMRC wrt missed RTI - looming.
2 companies and 1 trust.
Why would each company not receive the same pricing when they were setup together?
Kind regardsSam "That's it !
No other explanation telling us about the "specific set up's".
Telling us what may have been the difference !
Two things that would improve the usability of the product.
The number is partially visible.
can someone please explain what is going on.
Our Citibank feed(s) have been broken for months.
We have found the system to be a perfect fit from an accounting/reporting perspective to enable us to keep track of our financials.
Please contact me via this group or feel free to contact me via M_archdeacon@yahoo.
See an image in my bio pic.
On a macbook pro, 10.
This has been for about 2 weeks.
The quick search box appears to be non-functional.
No matter what I type in there, known amounts, known contact names, I keep getting "No results for  found.
We used to have blank date field when the 'copied' bill screen pops up, which was great because we had to enter correct date.
Recently, the copy option pre-populates the date field with 'today's date' which is  as the date field is already there.
Why are you insisting on making a perfectly looking and perfectly usable design into a design that's almost impossible to work with (especially on large screens)?
Why are expenses shown in reverse date order on the approval screen?
Takes too long.
Seriously unimpressed and frustrated.
If you list a number you would find many complaints offering to make your service better.
You arnt very good at reading as they send me the same thing and ask if theres anything more they can be helpful with.
I'm pretty certain that didn't used to happen.
Over the last year the Canadian dollar has been in free fall against the US dollar and we are paying significantly more for subscriptions.
Last January the exchange rate was around 1.
14 CAD to USD.
Today it is 1.
44  CAD to USD.
I did post this on Support yesterday but have yet to receive a ticket number or acknowledgement.
Before storing any of my firm's financial data I must be assured that the data are secure but I do not see any assurances.
You claim that my company's data are encrypted at rest but I could not find an interface for setting up my encryption keys.
I am suspicious though of hosted solutions for my company's financial data and I see nothing on this site to reassure me.
I lodged a ticket on 31/12 which was incorrectly answered on 01/01 (I can't even explain how much it missed the mark by, it's astounding) and despite numerous follow up emails from me since, I've heard nothing.
AU Payroll has 15 payroll reports, so why is NZ lacking behind?
Thinking of asking for a refund.
Looking forward to your replyRen
I've used it happily for many years since it first broke on the scene.
But in my case it is a great example of the perils of vendor lock in for cloud services.
That's half of it.
Previously, support could not explain to me why I had multi-currency on the Med plan so it was worth a test to see if I still had it on the Starter plan.
Some missing support emails and two weeks of waiting, the faceless voiceless support team is telling me there is no way to roll back after my short lived experiment.
Help us out by commenting below your answers to the following questions.
Up till now we always inventoried all the Food and Bev , did a stock take at the end of the month and adjusted it.
Oh no lets make it all single line and totally unnecessary.
I know it has been around a while but please start applying some common sense.
Bring it back to simple.
BizarreI am receiving a monthly billing of $131 on top of the normal fees.
No idea where this billing has come from and I have been paying it for last 12 months plus.
It is going against my credit.
Is it possible to subscribe to an existing forum thread so it shows up under "community activity" under my profile?
I'm not asking about requesting to receive email updates when someone replies.
Have left 3 requests for call back dating back to end of last week.
I have agreed to sign up clients in the space of two months to obtain practice manager.
Hey GuysI'm afraid I'm going to keep asking this until you submit!
Can't be too difficult?
Give us a phone number to ring support - it's not that difficult.
The email system is far too slow to resolve real-world problems.
Where's the drag and drop interface that's available in most SAAS platforms?
When I inquired about this, the reply was, "Well, you can't have it all. "
The reply I got on this was I had to email in and request copies.
I disagree.
I have asked 3 times now, and you will not.
Please call 07740306490 and help my bookkeeper.
I have been waiting for a urgent response since Monday, why is no one responding and why is there no contact number to call and discuss?
Why is there no 2 factor authentication option3.
You either have our best interests and take security seriously or you don't !
This might be silly, but.
That's it.
I selected a group of customers to email statements to.
Now, any emails to these same companies are automatically rejected as it appears the sending address is black-listed.
Huge confusion with out first client because they couldn't figure out how to access a file we'd attached with a quote.
We've contacted support but they're telling us it's not even possible for them to unvoid them.
It is particularly having an impact on Payroll.
Thus, even payments made AFTER the "as of" date are reflected (reduce the outstanding balance) in what should be a correct historical snapshot of the A/P status on the "as of" date.
I sit here and wonder .
But only during work hours!
Security Hole that needs to be filled.
Bleet complete, living in hope that I am not the only subscriber who feels this way.
Please fix as it is very annoying and defeats the drag and drop feature existing.
Its a shame that an upgrade may in fact affect other features that we have come to reply on.
These were handy features that have simply been removed.
This has happened to Land & Buildings with 0% depreciation rate.
Have had to set up the asset type again to bring it up.
It says 'loading.
powered by white pages' for about 3 seconds and then disappears and nothing else happens.
I have sent an email and left 3 messages on the mobile phone number I've been given.
So i followed the instruction emailed my request only to get automated responses back.
Sad to say it but there are other products on the market that you can actually contact by phone.
The description box only offers a tiny text entry box?
it also shows the description box as a quite narrow column, making each line huge and unfriendly to work with as each line is only about 5 words wide?
Im sure this would not only be frustrating for myself?
The guys handle the requirements are pretty well and our single point of contact has been very helpful and supportive to customise our needs in particular.
For us it would be extremely beneficial to have more options for user access for example.
That is it for my first post.
Previously we've been using Quickbooks.
It is still very early days but I wanted to say that so far we are really impressed and happy!
(after having pretty terrible customer support from the previous system) I've also been really happy with the support/responses I've gotten in this community so far!
com/postoffice is very latent.
I'm getting a common error message while trying to email out a quote.
I type out a detailed quote, then try to hit 'send' to the client.
The email address is 100% correct - double checked, typed in, copied and pasted, you name it.
While trying to sort this out, as the system won't let me save the quote I have to start all over again, several times, before it finally realises the email address is in fact correct.
Error trying to connect.
Says proxy server is down.
I've had a quick look but couldn't find anything.
"The online help was not of much help.
I've done a whole lot of refreshing and reactivating of the feed over the last couple of weeks and was told that Yodlee were investigating the issue on the 31st of May.
We are not really prepared to wait until Friday to see if this issue may or may not actually be sorted.
This system is far too underdeveloped and their customer service team have not had sufficient training (nor are accessible during times of urgency).
I tried to update this and they said that only the subscriber could do so.
for whatever reason.
Lauren tells us that we have to log in as the subscriber and update the details.
We are then asked to login as subscriber - impossible - no one has the logins.
2-6 We attempt to reset the password for the subscriber however none of the resets are received at the email address specified.
We attempt this over 2 days at least 20 times from various PC terminals.
Subscriber has been CC'd in on this email.
To which I respond that Rochelle is clearly an idiot and again, has not read a single thing that was emailed to her.
You couldn't find a better demonstration of stupidity.
They may as well all be auto-responders because their staff have zero (how ironic) training in customer service, nor actually have any useful information.
i can appreciate not having a call centre, but not prioritising already open issues is plain foolish.
all i was offered was a month free compensation, which has now been increased, still quite an insult to injury.
then i get an email some 20 minutes later, saying 'i tried to email you but you were busy' had the system been designed properly, then i would have been emailed straight away and i would have replied, having been at my desk and asked to be called back immediately, or a good idea would have been to pre-arrange a call, rather than out of the blue calling from an anonymous number.
the system says its updated, but not, then i get a message appearing saying, 'problem connecting'.
in total i have wasted approximately 1 week of my life because of the faults of the system, backed up by less than mediocre support.
I've made lots of mistakes and had lots of areas I haven't understood the process.
if you still don't understand they will persist until your problem is resolved.
I haven't come across this dedication to top customer support anywhere EVER!
Oh and it is an unbelievable system for functionality!
I'm now using it for 3 companies
The "Recode Summary" page has a timezone display issue or storage defect.
Viewing a "Recode Summary" the breadcrumb at the top displays "Recode History > Find & Recode >".
The 'Amount' input box seems to be misaligned so when you enter a value you can't see it.
I have tried to log out and log back in.
I found the webinar "GST Best Practice" on your web site at https://www.
com/nz/training/691-accountants-bookkeepers/692-bookkeepers/3092-gst-best-practice/ packed full of useful information.
No response to two support topics, no email acknowledgement.
However there is then now record of this Quote unless I go the the Dashboard  AND no listing of the quote on the Contact Details screen from where I created the Quote in the first place.
I'm happy to see the update of Inventory tracking feature.
Stored and displayed in the browser, so you don't have to retype references.
I would find it extremely helpful if you actually had people working for you, so that I could talk to them instead of emailing backwards and forwards for days on end.
When I have a client query and I have to chase you for days it makes us both look inefficient.
A simple phone call would have fixed the issue in five minutes.
This may be a problem with the server or it may be requiring a client authentication certificate that you don't have.
On April 20th Oauth is gone which will break support for export to Google Docs.
In today's release the tab order of Bills Data Entry went awry!
This is crazy and really should be fixed pronto.
Since then we have noticed that several users are complaining of issues.
First Phar Lap and now this!
When will it end?
Now I have to go through and count how many reconciled transactions I have already had for the month.
If the supplier is - for example - a third party supplying rebates as part of a reward scheme, such that their only bills are credit notes*, then the View Recent Bills link is not even shown!
It wouldn't be hard to fix.
It's driving me crazy.
Either way, there was no notification that something had changed.
The advice was seemingly rushed and was inaccurate.
the customers.
We all have problems.
I'm posting this to try and a) be helpful to those searching for a solution and b) to encourage some improvement in future.
This page will now hang, will not change so it will be useless.
4. close the previous two, 'hung' windows.
If the contacts name is short, you can normally get it in quick enough to avoid the auto-population clearing the name box.
Often I'm left with half a name in the box, or only even 3-4 letters.
Shouldn't the quote reference be in a completely different field?
I would love it even more if you could design the window to be bigger.
It would make reading the content of the message easier.
If you could design it to be bigger, that would be appreciated.
You would think this would be one of the first reports designed!
BUT….
Hovering over a pretty green folder is lovely but really not good enough.
Also a bit surprised in the lack of freedom of speech.
I feel sad that I cannot express this on your blog without it being deleted.
We sell via Amazon & FBA, Squarespace, Sears, Commercial/Wholesale - Paypal, & Ebay.
My inventory list states I have 1880 item numbers - 1550 are Duplicates.
Each Duplicate SKU has either a sale or some sort of activity attached to it.
I have a core Inventory of about 120 Items.
However different SKU #s for Amazon and Ebay and Squarespace.
Part of my inventory is considered light discrete manufacturing.
I have read that DEAR has that planned but when?
Yes there are a few bugs but I have always managed to work around them I have not yet lost half a years work because of programme problems !
I am a design and advertising professional.
I came over from QB desktop.
Our company is loosing clients and money through this.
We’ve heard a bit of feedback that 5 votes in Community aren’t enough, so we’ve changed that!
To see what you’ve already voted on click into your Public Profile (top right), and log in.
Here you can check out where your votes have been used.
Be sure to have a look through  that you want to support - we want to see all the smaller pain points highlighted.
Of course we’re keen to hear feedback on this too.
So far I have found the software a real pleasure compared to others I've tried.
Would be great if you could speak to someone instead of leaving messages or sending emails.
It seems to me to be missing some really basic features - and my experience has been that it's not a company that's putting its customers and users first.
I personally don't think it's reasonable to ask my customer to do that.
Reporting is woefully bad - simple to the point of being useless to me.
Imagine if your mobile phone or internet provider said this!
I think companies should give their customers choice so they can engage with them in the way that suits the customer - and phone is one of the main ways people might want to do this!
Sure, we can set up a call back but again, that drags things out.
com/seths_blog/2012/10/the-only-purpose-of-customer-service.
When we can expect proper quotation  module?
But it isn't and mentioned previously profit summary would be required in it too.
Since you got $150M this last year in seed money, you should have paid someone to fix this or bought a company that had a solution that would have worked and integrated it.
Needless to say, this defeats the point of integration or your service.
All I can say is WTF were you thinking?
It has  been a value added service.
Why is it always so difficult to locate the latest promo code.
For heavens sake its not a trade secret.
Have used the PayPal link now I have $4500 locked up by PayPal.
I asked yesterday on here why my question about the NatWest Yodlee feed.
50 a month from August 2015.
The email was ignored.
It didn't bounce so i assume it went somewhere.
I know the feeds will not be turned off, you have told us this already.
Bit annoyed that I have to follow up support requests with a discussion in the hope to get responses to my emails.
Please let me know what is going on
Thereafter there would be a charge of £3.
I asked whether the switch was mandatory or if we could choose whether to adopt for a paid service or not.
com but thee have been completely ignored.
I predict that any problems will be met with a stock answer along the lines of "well we have given you the choice to have a direct feed, and you haven't taken it".
And stop ignoring support emails?
Truly, your condescension towards your customers reaches greater heights by the day.
This is a major deficiency and needs to be fixed immediately.
Today, at long last the remittance advice has been fixed, plus  the facility to re-order manual journals, and the auto selection of the the first auto match in reconciliation.
Three issues which affect day to day usability.
I was have way through a transaction this morning and it went down.
I't back now, been off line for about 5 minutes.
I seem to hit this about once every 2 weeks.
It's not my internet connection, as every other site is working fine.
Is something broken?
The Community Manager agreed that this was a good idea.
I've seen a lot of people work around one of these contact flaws by entering a period instead of a contact name to suppliers.
I'm not crazy about the pricing scheme.
I easily fall under the "freelancer" category minus the 20 transaction reconciliation.
I've always been leery about companies that depend firstly on making the investors happy rather than their customers.
Keep up the good work and continue pushing the advancements of your iOS app.
Currently it's rather useless.
The date should be 22nd March and instead shows 24th March which is a Monday.
The release window is scheduled to begin 6.
00am on 24 Mar 2014 NZDT / 5.
00pm on Sun 23 Mar GMT.
01 which is obviously incorrect.
This link is shown when reconciling and a transaction matches a rule.
I've tried with both Chrome and IE9, and had another user try.
It doesn't work.
One sheepish, but very happy client.
It also creates a security issue for client sensitive information.
Thoughts and comments please.
I am happy with most of the functionality so far, except for purchase orders.
For example you may have a budget against a supplier for $44K comprising of a few line items that matches your budget and a contract to supply for that amount.
Unless you are diligent, it would be very easy to overspend on the PO.
By the way, I'm using version 1.
When I enter a receipt in for an expense claim, the date keeps automatically changing itself to a few days later.
If I entered a date in September it was ok.
When I went to run my BAS there were no GST credits.
I thought I'd done something wrong and when I went back to my expense items they were all showing as GST exclusive.
So I deleted the expense claim and did it again.
Making sure I was ticking the right buttons.
Can' submit my BAS.
Tried getting help via support contact form a week or so ago and have got no reply.
I have this problem so many times I've lost count now.
So, whats the solution?
Have your say people!
- days between trivial email replies that have not much to do with my support request / and even finally scheduling a call to assist and they don't even show up.
45am GMT 23rd October in the UK that the last feed was only until the 21st October.
I do not have a lot of inventory products so was not particularly concerned however it does seem ludicrous that you have the framework there to not include a simple FIFO system for those with few items?
A subsequent data entry page asked if I was using Pin Sentry (Y/N) and either answer here took me to another page where I was asked to input my Pin Sentry code.
In essence, what is being created here is a proxy user connection which is a *massive* security risk and should be used with extreme caution.
If you want to know more about this, then contact me directly.
I have flagged this issue now and hope that you take action.
Ignorance of this security risk is no longer an excuse.
I know the app pretty well and have had good results with it.
I was not dissatisfied and actively looking to change my accounting software.
On 1/1/14 we pulled the trigger and I've been VERY pleased that we did so.
One other thing that has helped immensely was that I didn't want to navigate these waters on my own.
I posted some questions on the user forum and one of the more experienced people there, Cassandra Scott, was terrific in answering my questions.
Her fees are very reasonable and she has been a terrific help to us.
Make the move, you'll be very glad you did.
It looks to be as if the 'Payee' has been moved to the 'Reference' field and then concatenated with the 'Reference'.
I appreciate that this may be a problem with HSBC's feed but some insight would help!
If this is something that HSBC are doing can you please find a way to split the current 'Reference' field by looking at what is in the 'Description' field and then moving them all around accordingly?
Such a fantastic job all around, especially for such a young company!
I know I have fought with other programs on these issues and struggled to get help when I'm stuck, being placed in an automated call que or never having my emails responded to!
Since a lot of transactions come from ASB with Payee = "DEBIT", this gets frustrating and makes it easy to reconcile incorrectly.
The field is visible on the video tutorial but not in the application.
I imagine it would populate from the supplier details but that does not happen either.
I love that you can see a list of all attachments in one place.
As the accountant, I'm not liking this change.
Also tried in chrome and nothing.
Scary.
Today had issue with uploading PDF's, accountant and other "Super Users" could not help, submitted Help Ticket and got this response.
Then, when you want assistance, it doesn't seem to live anywhere.
HOW TO RECORD AND RECONCILE REFUNDS.
Now the entire amount is being refunded to you.
How do you directly "connect" that purchase to that refund. "
HOW TO RECONCILE DEPOSITS WHEN YOU MAKE A CASH WITHDRAWAL AGAINST THE DEPOSIT.
Scenario: You deposit 5 checks for a total of $2000﻿ and you make a withdrawal of $500 against that deposit.
33 plus interest of $5.
Video illustration could go a long way in helping me and others.
Knowing we have multiple companies and we were splitting some off we were a little comforted by the 25% discount offered.
(thats with the 25% discount).
Several clients have asked to retain some accounting activities in-house, such as billing their customers.
Could you make the import of data anymore difficult ?
They are nowhere to be found in your help section.
Certificates of Credit or Receive money transaction are unwieldy and unnecessary when I can clear match a debit to a credit on the transaction list.
I am still aggravating about how I had to ASK A CUSTOMER SERVICE REP !
Thats so crappy and second rate.
You guys got a lot of work to do.
The only way I can get the site to work correctly is to switch the browser to IE9 mode.
HSBC (UK) is a multi-national one-stop-financial-shop.
You will have to provide us with a solution – if you cannot do it yourselves then tell us how we can achieve this.
If not then unfortunately we will have to go shopping for another Cloud based accounting system.
I now read on the community that this has been going on for 4 days.
I bet that could even be plotted against positive and negative sentimentality index with some interesting results.
Now I can check if we had their correct address, what day(s)  etc.
The change with the unreconcile/redo buttons seems to have annoyed a few people, but to be honest I'm not fussed either way.
Hello,Over the last day or two we are have started seeing quite intermittent connectivity issues - has anyone else experienced this?
"Something is Broken.
I. e. if the servers do not slow down and not end up responding.
I am sure I am not the only one complaining about the level of service being nothing short of disgusting.
I do get the green success bar.
Also why are some green ticks dark and some light?
The word "sale" has too many meanings to be useful in a professional accounting system.
- Do I mean that I'm lowering the price to increase volume?
All of these could be correct.
Please allow me to revert back to well defined terminology that I find vital to being efficient in an accounting system.
i emailed help and recieved no help on my question or solution.
i have read all the info from users having reporting problems and issues regarding simple busness practice .
but ss stated above what made my heart sink was the marketing teams dribble and avoidance tactics.
if supplied a product that did not work as intended i would have to refund money or fix it for free.
isnt this a product that is being sold tobe used for a purpose of accounting?
I will delete my other comments then logout.
What is actually being developed and worked on right now?
Why does it take so long?
This would ease frustration in forums and from users who may not have commented about their frustration.
frustrated and disappointed.
We've invested to much in the change over and feel it would be too hard to now go back.
The recent update was appalling with very little real progress.
Even writing this comment is difficult as the text box is only 2.
A lot of which comes at a cost.
It used to be 2 clicks and Hey Presto .
And I never really thought about it until the end of the month when I would invariably go.
Since I upgraded to version 1.
2 a month ago it has stopped remembering my passcode for a quick login.
1 always remembered my passcode so logging in to the app was a dream.
I went along to theGold Awards hoping that the NZ Art Show would win their category.
They didn't, but it was great that my fav accounting system not only won the Global Gold category at the Wellington Gold Awards, but they also took out the Supreme Award.
Do you have any promo codes available at the moment?
how about some genuine respect and action on feedback!
The current process is to o ad-hoc.
I think for a practice and bookkeepers it is one of the best approaches I have seen.
That might be intentional as the roadshow suggested your strategy is to compete at the smaller end of the market i. e. hit the many for a lower fee is better than try the few at a higher fee.
##### CLUSTER 1 #####
I would like to know if there some french users to discuss the way they use the tool.
However, we've been asked by our clients to recommend a good system to use for billing and tracking things like part-payments and deposits.
We are in Auckland this week and next week and looking to meet accountants to hear how you would like to use our API.
I would like them to use their iPhone to scan receipts and send it back to head office – so they are recorded on a timely basis and hopefully reduces lost receipts.
I appreciate they like the at-a-glance running total of expense per van, but would it not be easier to use tracking for splitting the expenses to each van?
I wanted to use a link like www.
I would like to use the system to go back to April 2012 and start my full tax year which is due in a couple of months.
(We use a desktop system that looks like this and my team love it but it won't integrate with WFM.
However, we would like to gauge demand for sending reminders on Statements - as it's been mentioned a few times on this thread: It would be great to get your insight/thoughts into how you'd use a statement reminder functionality, and what kind of industry you're in.
We like to use a standard font type and size on all of our reports / letter / etc for the firm and it would be great to have the ability to do it here as well.
Like many of my colleagues I use a scanner app to capture receipts on the go (Scanbot, if you’re interested).
As we have to use the 'Overpayment' feature for prepayments on non base currency payments, it would be good if we could export this as a PDF like a prepayment or credit note so that we can at least give a copy of this to the client.
I must admit, I've been spoiled by a lot of US-based companies I use for things like email marketing + hosting, where they have Livechat support.
How can we help him as he wants to use this facility and he does not like the suggestion of have to do transfers.
I would like to use Inventory tracking, but I wonder if the following is possible.
It looks like when I use the 'copy to' function it automatically populates the tax rate column on rows that are only descriptions.
My client does not use Purchases - but would like to know (and Print) what payments have been made to a suppliers between certain dates.
I know that I can use tracking to record all the related expenses for the project (which may be more than the $3,000), but I'd like to come at this from the angle of preserving the $3,000 for the project, since that amount is not to be used for other things.
They use a template from their supplier to order lots of widgets etc - and would like to simply attach a copy with the official order.
We would like to use the My Payroll for our employees to fill in there own timesheet.
Seems like once I use 'Has Approved Withholding Variation', it applies to base salary as well.
We would like to make contact with you for discussions about how to use it more effectively.
For marketing and other activities, we would like to use Mailchimp, but if there is in-built email campaign functionality, great.
Would like to know why when I am trying to use calendar for payments in Bills, it glitches and I cannot select todays date.
I really would like a web app that is pleasant to use, since after all there's little that's pleasant for me when it comes to accounting.
We only use Macs and that seemed like the best option available.
##### CLUSTER 2 #####
I have Owner's draw to track payment or withdrawal of the owner.
(in settings option) Sometimes there is other vendors payment.
Shall I create GL payment then debit the employee?
When we make payment  we DR. Acc.
Then I reconciled the actual $100 PAYE payment transaction against this bill.
Sometimes it is required to pay through a faster payment service rather through a normal three day acl/baccs payment could this be selectable please.
I cant remember how to send a remittance for a cheque payment.
On a few occasions we've had to transfer a part of that payment back so she could repay it out of a different account.
As an example there's been a batch payment for $255.
They paid on behalf of us and we did not made payment again to client & supplier.
Himy first question is that if from my AUD account i convert 100$ into USD, how to treat this payment?
I want to reissue the payment to them, but the original payment is still technically paid and reconciled.
com" email for late payment reminders.
If I process the payroll and select "check" as the method of payment, there will not be a cash withdrawal that will show up in the reconciliation as she is not taking the money out.
Hello XeroI am getting error messages when trying to import a batch payment file to Santander.
Also, it's a negative payment.
00I can see no way to delete this payment, I can't find it in my transactions and very oddly it's a negative value so this phantom 'payment' has doubled the amount owing.
I entered an expense claim for the payment I made to my vendor of $69.
I am looking to reconcile the credit card processor's bulk payment.
The write offs relate to invoices where part payment has been received or no payment will be received, the write down relates to an agreement to reduce the payment balance required.
Now for the specifics…My client forwarded $2,500 USD (an advance against a future bonus payment at the end of the job) to cover the costs of setting up the entity and covering any startup costs.
Payment amount gets charged direct to the P&L.
The transaction type of this payment for example is credit.
Multiple payments (2) were made to a supplier for a number of products (3) received, because a 'difference' payment had to be made a few days later (but before I was invoiced) to account for a change to a superior product.
On the balance sheet however the current years earnings is showing at twice that of the late payment penalties?
I am trying to create a batch payment to import into my bank for payment of suppliers.
We have received the payment from our insurance company for $3887.
We apply a fee on top of the cleaner's hourly rate (for customer service and payment handling) upon which we charge VAT.
Stripe remits the cleaner's (non VAT payment) directly to their account, and our fee to us (less Stripes fees).
This is perhaps because such a transfer is essentially a payment or a deposit, not a transfer in Xero sense.
I am acting as an agent for some manufacturers, but becoming the importer of record to allow payment and recuperation of VAT.
So, we paid a bill and it was part of our weekly payment run paid via batch.
To treat the deferred revenue, I feel the Pre-payment option in Receive money transaction a suitable measure to address my issue.
We have a oversea PO that has over 20 items on one Purchase Order, so I had to split the PO to 4 payment vendors, 1).
Custom Broker, then apply bill payment for each of them.
However, my problem is that I then also receive a payment coming through my Paypal account.
Is it somehow possible to log this whereby the payment method is into my directors loan account?
I ordered a tablet from China and received a separate payment confirmation from DHL to cover Customs fee.
We generate a client, know the payment details (not the same for each client) In most cases our clients payment is split over 3 payments, 20%, 40% and 40% averaged over 14 weeks some 52 weeks.
"Payment - Completed" and spent $8.
In matching the payment I split it, leaving $18.
So, I created a bill, approved it and entered the payment date and account and saved it.
The only problem is that I accidentally entered the wrong account from which the payment was made.
Should I "remove & redo" every transaction (these have been reconciled to the Cheque account) included in the multiple-item batch payment or is there another way which is more efficient?
I'm selling bus tickets online and directing receipts via a payment gateway to my company's bank account.
60 and I've created a Direct Payment entry in Xero.
Once a month I withdraw all the funds as a bulk payment into my bank account.
One of these invoices is a recurring payment and when the client paid for 2016, I accidentally reconciled the payment against the old (and to be ignored) 2015 invoice.
Even though they came as an over payment for these two invoices, I cannot do an over payment as it is not to be refunded or allocated against any future invoice.
Whilst I know the references might contain placeholders every other tab (Drafts, Awaiting Approval, Awaiting Payment and Paid) shows the full Reference.
I've made a Terminal Tax payment to Inland Revenue (IRD).
I received payment from my customer.
So now, I sell some goods to my customer and I have to recognize my revenue and deduct it from the Advance Payment from XXX.
While reconciling these transactions I realized that our office rent payment for January 2016 has a unique situation and I'm not sure how to proceed from an accounting standpoint.
I was previously using QB and had the rent payment set up as a memorized expense, but it didn't record (in QB) until January 1st, 2016.
Do I receive the payment through Find & Match or apply payment directly through invoice?
I'm in the UK and trying to reconcile my self assessment payment that has been made to HMRC.
Invoice generated to reflect Sales, with payment components made up to reflect payment from Visa, Amex and Cash on hand.
We received a batch payment each day for our EFTPOS transactions from TYRO.
I have tried to apply payment to the credit note thinking that would help.
Consider the expenses paid, as capital contributions, in which case record a payment manually to your "capital introduced account".
1, Reimburse yourself, in which case simply wait for the payment to appear in your reconciliation page, and find and match your bill.
Consider the expenses paid, as capital contributions, in which case record a payment manually to your "capital introduced account".
The issue with this is that Xero uses the XE exchange rate for the day the payment was dated, which is very different to the rate we were charged by the credit card company, and there doesn't seem to be anyway to change this rate?
We then prepare a separate VAT return for the German fiscal authorities, followed by payment of the German VAT.
2.  to separate suppliers by payment method (ie: BACS, or Direct Debit)3  to separate suppliers by groupOn any other system, this is done by simply having a payment method field in the supplier detail, which is them an option for selection when creating a payment batch.
The Gocardless integration doesnt help us since our customers authorise a payment plan directly from our website and so we have to create the invoice after the customer has authorised the payment plan and import csv files from Gocardles to reconcile the payments.
These intermediary banks take an additional charge for the wire, this amount varies depending on which client I am receiving payment from.
A recurring charge is set up to account for these monthly payments and now awaiting for payment.
For example:I charge client $150 for Job 1234Sub-contractor 1 charges me $100Sub-contractor 2 charges me $25Stripe takes a 3% fee for processing the credit card payment $4.
So my transaction list ends up showing payment twice for the same bill.
Can I do a journal to Debit the Expense and GST, and credit drawings account to show payment for these?
We are in the process of setting up Xero and entering some historical expenses to match an expenses payment that was made within a couple of months of the start of the tax year.
I received a payment into my bank account which I realized was a double payment To allocate the payment  - I transferred it to my Misc Income account (to hold the payment).
Make Payment for $101.
Make a payment for $100 (to tax liability account).
All of my services are payment on delivery, my idea was to select checkout in Timely once the service was finished, select PayPal Here as the payment method, process the transaction using PayPal here, and once approved I would select paid in Timely.
I am trying to enter contact notes with a customer such as chasing payment.
I have a client using Moneris, which is the leader in Canada for payment processing.
I have checked our settings for this and the relevant bank account is quoted against Go Cardless in the Active Payment Services list.
I would assume based on cash accounting GST method only payment amount should be showing on GST return ?
00 One part payment will be made now and the remainder in instalments over the next three years.
After some research, it appears as though these transactions do no meet the definition of "purchase card transaction" and as such would not be reported by the PSE (Payment Settlement Entity i. e. the credit card company) on a form 1099-K.
So I buy a lot of inventory on eBay which requires me to make the payment before I receive the items.
A Customer made a cash payment "on account" which was not banked.
Stripe transfers this payment to the bank account post-fees, at $970.
I have worked out that, the payment was received by me but, was meant for one of my other offices.
In MYOB I would record into a Misc Income account as a "receive money transaction" and then out again as a "spend money transaction" after making the payment from my bank.
He has had to pay a deposit of £25k and all of the VAT element up front (£17k) so a total payment of £42k.
Received a cash refund from the supplier to refund the payment that needs to be refunded - very nice supplier.
But if I undo the payment and then void the bill I will still have two transactions to reconcile.
The original payment out of the bank account AND the refund of the payment into the bank account.
ex: i ordered the item on 2 sept,2015 and paid 70% of the amountand 20 sept 2015 supplier is ready to ship the item and i have to pay remaining 30% payment.
We have paid back &#163;5000 of this loan in a one off payment.
Later on a payment went through paypal and it used the credit then only charged us for the difference.
Each property has a monthly payment to its mortgage.
One day of the week income will be utilised to make wages payment for that week, as such there wont be any deposit for that day.
I then reconciled a part payment.
Is it possible to show the individual payments through custom branding - e. g:Invoice Total:  £££Payment made: £££Payment made: £££Credit note: £££Amount outstanding: £££This is possible using the standard template, but doesn't seem so when using a customised docx branding template.
When completing our first supplier EFT payment run, we prepared our batch payment (about 100 supplier invoices).
We are selling tours in South Florida and receive 50% as down payment and the remainder on the date of the tour.
I've transferred $200 to my subcontractor payment account so I'm covered, but I have no way to be sure that $200 will not be spent on something else.
How can there be no way to select multiple expenses to an individual person, and make 1 payment for their month's expenses.
Currently, when I get an order for say $100, shopify takes a $2 fee and the payment will be for $98.
I have to send the state of NJ a tax payment on April 15 for taxes owed by the company.
95 as payment to Computer Equipment Asset (710);&#163;10.
We don't require deposits and we don't expect payment until we are ready to ship.
Actual payment might come in the next period.
Last year I sold a well-established apparel website to a company in Arizona who made a down payment and has continued to make monthly payments of about $1000 for the past 12 months, directly to me as an individual in florida.
I did a "Receive money" on the bank account that payment was cashed in.
We have paid for services provided by a client by giving her a piece of equipment instead of a monetary payment.
Then a day later a supplier rang up and advised they had recieved mmy payment , however that was the wrong supplier.
Hello there,We have internet merchant account is in Singapore Dollars (SGD), which is accepting payment from our Indonesian customers via our website (online payment).
As it is allocated as a bulk payment I am unable to reverse the payment to decline.
I put in the same payment in two purchases, one was an expenses reimbursement to an employee (therefore overpaying them) and reconciled both payments to the amount's shown in the current account (both payments had already been made).
I have already paid them via personal check, that I have signed and voided as proof of payment.
Amazon deposits payment less fees and commissions into our account fortnightly.
So I have a loan payment and a loan drawdown.
This seems odd since it is an integreated payment service.
My customer made a payment directly to my supplier.
Wouldn't it be great if Xero could develop an online statement payment option or a multiple invoice payment option so that payment details are input once for all invoices or for a selected number of invoices?
But, if I open Expense Claims that transaction still awaiting payment.
The dates shown as outstanding in the Superannuation Payment Details relate back to the 2013 year - they have definitely been paid and the balance shown in the superannuation payable account in the balance sheet is correct.
Plus a contra payment of $300.
A wire payment to my supplier was rejected and returned to my account.
I'm a bit confused about how to enter a reference number that can be used in the payment of a bill.
A KID is a string that can be sent alongside the payment to the receiver and it allows the receiver to identify the payee.
Currently when I go to 'Account Transactions' it displays as 'Payment: Multiple Items'.
I have made a payment to one of my employees to reimburse him for travel expenses he incurred and supplies he purchased (say $30 for travel and $70 for supplies).
A remittance file is a CSV file that cointains these three columns:|account-number|KID|amountThe customer ID (KID) is transferred to the recipient along with the payment and allows the recipient to establish who paid the bills.
I made a payment against a bill via BACs, however for some reason the payment has been returned.
We are facing the problem in the batch payment.
00 of it was the tax payment.
08 of it was interest for the late payment.
Hello,I some how managed to pay a batch payment twice with about 10 suppliers in it.
However, the NIC payment still shows up in Xero and i don't know how to waive this for this month?
The tax man was paid more than he should have been and I am trying to reflect this by recording a payment amount that is higher than was due.
Make a payment in the usual way.
After looking through these forums, it seems others have used the 'VAT on imports' option to charge the payment directly to the VAT account.
The problem I have is that the 2013/14 year-end P&L includes this 10k CT payment as an expense and it depresses the profits.
A week later we chase payment and the customer gives us their Amex details3.
We take payment from Amex.
Recently I have stumbled onto an issue: How to deal with exchange rate discrepancy, for instance I order goods from overseas, and create a bill and make a payment from USD to EUR with an exchange rate on a given date, however, when the shipment is delivered, the customs apply VAT on the consignment with a different exchange rate on EUR.
5) Create a 1k payment for each and code it to "Adjustment for instalments".
30 (which obviously is the fee attached to the 2nd payment received.
If you change this to $10,295 it warns you are about to make an over payment.
So it would be a massive benefit to filter the "awaiting payment" tab according to some sort of reference to this.
01- Downpayment - paid thru Debit Card on 1st of May02- 1st partial payment - paid thru Credit Card on 15th of May03- Final payment - paid thru EFT on 20th of MayUnder fixed assets these three transactions are appearing as 03 different assets.
I want to debit my travel expense account on the day of travel (Q3) and not the day that the payment for the ticket was made (Q2).
The problem is that we can find no record of the payment anywhere in the system (although we know it has been previously entered and, we believe, backed out, which is confirmed by looking at the "History & Notes").
However, we have two invoices where there are no payment amounts below the total shown for the bill, yet Xero shows a part payment in the "Paid" column if we view bills that are "Awaiting Payment" and, furthermore, the default amount in the "Make a payment" section is the difference between what is shown in "Awaiting Payment" list and the invoice total!
I want to record a payment/deposit of $250 for that order.
I am using custom payment url for the payment option.
I don't think the payment is tax deductible, but needs to be reflected in the cost base of the asset purchase somehow?
It isn't a currency gain because I paid a deposit, the dollar changed and the final payment became cheaper.
Xero allocates the payment received to each of the lines in proportion.
The payment is for one of the line items only and payment will be made for the other line items later.
We don't get to negotiate the payment terms or anything else.
Roughly thirty days after delivery, we get a payment.
Also I have made a number or purchases on my credit card, and recently transferred money from the transaction account to the credit card as payment, what do I list this as ?
Do I have to delete every payment made by the wrong bank account and reenter to correct account or is the way to edit the payment?
Many of our customers pay for our workshops on a payment plan, i. e. , over 9, 12, 15 months etc.
These payment plans can be very variable and a standard item may essentially be paid for in many ways and over a variable number of months.
Quickbooks zeroes out the VAT control to AR or AP so that when the payment is made or received it is dealt with outside of the VAT Control and the VAT Control therefore always agrees to the VAT Reports
55, and a payment of $523.
I normally do a monthly PAYE payment to myself.
I want to clear my "Awaiting Payment" tab as i have a number of little jobs that have been not been paid or the people never came back to pick up the item so its un paid.
it seems that I should have withheld some of the Employer contribution in my last payment.
This is a 'procurement-to-payment' app that not only streamlines existing work processes; it enhances them too.
Can someone tell me how to delete these out so im not scrolling past them everytime when trying to find a match for a payment.
I finally received card this afternoon and updated payment details and still no access.
30  I made a test payment of £4.
00 they supplied there BACS details so I sent them a test payment of £1.
Until I reached the payment above.
It is possible to record either a manual pay with no payment through the payroll system.
However, since clients still have to click the "Pay" button to make payment, which some of my clients may find it a chore, I'm thinking of using PayPal or Stripe's Subscription function to collect payment from my clients automatically.
If I have these entered automatically, such as 'memorised transactions' in my old accounting software, a missed payment is easily identified during reconciliation.
I have a refund from a supplier that I wish to reconcile to a credit note for returned goods from that supplier and also a payment to that supplier made in error.
I went through all the steps of entering claim, authorising and what I thought was making the payment, however it never gave me the option to choose payment type, (should it? )
So, at the end of the day, all payments processed through eway that day come into Xero as one bulk payment.
but no payment is accepted & my access is still limited .
77 (Royal Mail) for the 30 June and then allocated a payment against that balance on the 4 July, I'm not sure if that is the problem.
Am i correct that I will have to post the transaction manually for each weeks payment.
Then I found out it was for a subscription service (over 12 months) and now I have the full payment amount waiting to be reconciled (funds were direct deposited).
Example0-7 days: $normal price (which is labelled as $15 reward discount)7-14 days: $normal price+$5 added to the total (which is labelled as $10 reward discount)14-21 days: $normal price+$10 added to the total (which is labelled as $5 reward discount)21-30 days: $normal price+$15 added to the total (which is labelled as no discount)I seen this scenario done back in the 90s when paper invoicing was around which is way better than adding line items called late payment fee which honestly no customer ever pays and only causes friction.
I'm really struggling to understand how you actually make a dividend payment so that it is recorded correctly.
We know the interest rate of the loan, the outstanding principal, the monthly payment amount and the accumulated depreciation as of December 31st 2015.
Good news, hopefully this solves the problem we have had where you can't synch the VISA payment account properly.
When we received a payment in this account that was other company's service we did a receive money and decrease the balance.
So each month we will usually receive one payment into the bank account from each of our suppliers that will represent payments in respect of numerous clients and we get a statement from the supplier informing us of how the payment is comprised (client & amount).
Then they check out and pay, via paypal or other payment gateway.
This way I can balance the books in Xero, and have instant payment facility for students.
Also we are extremely frustrated that we can't save payment details on each client.
Then a payment is returned.
Buyers pay for these in either card, cash or cheque (a single payment could be for a mixture of the item types or a single item could be purchased with a mixture of payment types.
But what I'm having trouble getting my head around is how to handle the payment side of things.
I then allocate this payment into the suspense account (temporary).
The payment feed is hooked to the master account and the two cards each have their own feed.
But now I've tried to create an overpayment that has come in, from our first member, via the bank reconciliation page and I can't change the account the payment will be posted to (trade debtors).
So for example when the payment comes through on xero it won't be for $1000 it will be for $950.
Where on the COA would a credit card payment be reconciled to?
One is payment for share capital, the other is an interest free shareholder loan.
I tried the expense claim but it wants a payment date etc.
Sagepay is one of the most popular payment gateways in the uK and it would be a huge benefit to many many users to have sagepay as an invoice payment method option in xero .
They are given an advance (check) payment from which they are required to make payments and account for such payments when they return.
The issue is with 'usual payment' types to my suppliers.
I would expect that I would be seeing a current liability there for $10,000 (as this was what I owed the tax office) then when I reconciled my recent payment of $10,000 with this debit, it would cancel out.
Editing the account detail shows the Enable Payment option is unchecked.
Considering I am on the CASH basis accounting method, if I select both these dates to be now, in 2012, but only initiate the payment in January, will that expense be recognized in 2012 or 2013?
Payment is rendered immediately.
Is there anyway of journalling the credit difference in order to reconcile the credit payment against the statement transactions and subsequently crediting the difference against a future statement?
It does not appear to be in "awaiting payment" list.
A Direct payment doesnt show up on their statement at all.
The batch file created fine and exported and appears as a Payment: multiple in the transactions list.
I have to manually go through all of the bills awaiting payment and mark the ones related to this particular vendor.
When making a payment from the "Awaiting Payment" screen in "Purchases", if you make a single invoice payment you are returned to continue making further payments.
Secondly, when you make a Batch Payment there is a box to enter your payment reference into but this reference does not display in the Banking Account records rather it displays, "Batch Payment" but no "Payment Reference".
At this point I have double counted the payment and the bill.
When allocating a payment against the bill, it would be nice if I could match it to a payment that has already been made.
A 'Payment Options' feature in which you record what Payment Options a Supplier accepts, e. g. OnlineEFT-POSCredit CardCashChequeShellsYou get the idea.
It would be very useful to have the "planned date" field also in the payment reconciliation dialog.
It would be really useful to have the possibility to search or sort purchases awaiting payment by currency.
However, it doesn't have the Pay Now button that pops-up the UI to take card details and a payment.
There is a software call Panda provides sign and payment facility together, We are using it, Clients can sign and have to make a payments to finalise it.
I don't see why it won't allow a batch payment with the exchange rate added once.
They do not have access to the bank account to confirm if a payment has been received and cleared, only the client's verbal that they have made payment.
It's linked directly to a payment gateway and approval takes 2-3 seconds.
With Xero, we now have to go to a separate payment virtual terminal and enter the customer's details again!
It would be great to have a listing of batch payments somewhere in Purchases rather than having to click through the invoice payment to find the batch payment it was included in.
So it's great you can setup a payment service using a Custom URL.
When these viewed via a PC there is no option to group them together for processing as a single payment.
I believe an added button to send remittance when making or recieving payment will be hugely beneficial.
For payment due date options.
The payslip shows the date range (period) to which the payment relates - followed by "month #" (being the tax period according to the tax year).
Currently when you create a batch payment to a supplier with multiple bills, it shows multiple lines.
The receipt would then be included in the Xero File Payment history.
Or fortnightly, or whatever the payment pattern was.
Is there or can there be a function where if you have reconciled several invoices against the one payment, and you have reconciled one in error, can there be a way of only unreconciling that incorrectly matched invoice and not the whole batch payment?
Client with only a withholding payer number and no ABN cannot lodge tax declarations or payment summaries.
This also adds in some duplication as they then have to process the client payment on Xero separately also.
By doing so, the contact's banking details where overwritten by the system and payment was made incorrectly.
___________________________________________________Change done by the system:Edited By Heather Donnelly  11 May 2016 Today at 12:15 PM Bank account number changed from xxxx to xxxx to match a batch payment edit.
As they are donations, they aren't always paid, and payment can't be enforced.
Under purchase  - bills - where it shows a list of bill waiting for payment.
In most cases there are two amounts payable; one above the other being 'Amount you owe the ATO' and 'Your payment amount'.
Could the 'Your payment amount' be separated away from the summary and made to stand out for our clients (maybe making it larger or with a different background colour).
Processing a payment once is so much more efficient than 12 times!
We deal with these receivables in a slightly different way compared with receivables where no payment has been received by the due date.
In short, if the customer has made some effort to pay, we're likely to be a bit more flexible in agreeing on the balance payment with the customer.
Many date fields seem to exhibit this unexpected behavior, such as for example the "Payment Due Date" and "Reporting Date" fields of the Expense Claim approval screen - although this has been observed in multiple other date fields so far (with no attempt made at tracking which ones).
as this is also needed to be added the batch payment too.
this is in both the payment advice and the receipt advice.
I have lodged my first activity statement using Xero Tax and notice that the Lodgment Due Date, Payment Due Date, Date Lodged and Lodgment Receipt Number do not appear on the filed BAS.
Create ability to initiate immediately or schedule invoice payment(s) directly from Xero using an already connected Payment Service.
This way the document is easily accessible with every payment.
"Old reports" have option for Draft, Paid, Awaiting Payment.
Would be handy for times when a regular payment needs to be billed across to associated entities for example in addition to billing clients.
It is possible to set up default tax rates for clients, default payment terms, chart of account codes, etc.
We have created contact groups for suppliers that are paid using the same payment frequency.
So, I have to create a manual payment for each currency which transfers that balance into a currency holding account which I've created.
Within the Aged Receivables Reports include a column which details the date of the last payment received by the customer (contact).
Using their "work around" I get a credit for the payment, then debits for :-1.
Any part paid bills will then still have the scheduled payment date and we have to manually delete this on all of them one by one.
Currently when I reconcile using "Find and Match" it is a five click process for each payment I receive.
It would be great if we could attach a copy of a contract in our Contact Information, especially if we are direct debited for payment.
carrying the link to the payment page.
When a Batch Payment file is created in Xero, payments for multiple bills to a single supplier are combined in to a single transaction.
Then you could make the drop down choices the different areas ie draft, awaiting approval, awaiting payment, overdue.
However, unless I convert the P/O to a bill, I cannot allocate this payment to the specific Purchase Order.
This cannot be added after payment is applied.
So converting P/O to bill, then allocating payment does not work for us.
We track and schedule our payables outside of Xero in order to model cash flow, assign planned payment types, and quickly pull up payment history/clear dates etc.
Customer pays deposit and payment allocated3.
They all require their individual account numbers to be referenced on the BACS payment.
When entering an AU$ payment for a US$ purchase, Xero allows us to chose the exchange rate applicable on the day we paid it and automatically adjusts any balance to foreign currency gains/losses.
This could be alleviated by, secondly, displaying the converted AU$ amount alongside the manually entered exchange rate allowing you to adjust the last 1 or 2 decimal places "on the fly" to make the AU$ amount match the actual payment.
Within the contacts section, I organize clients invoicing preferences and payment preferences by Groups.
We are frequently required to send multiple receipts to the same customer for different payments for different tours (we're a travel company) and I'm wondering if there is a way of automatically including the description of the payment in the subject line, so it clearly shows up in the customer's inbox and can easily be identified what the receipt is for.
One extra column on that batch payment for GST would be great please!
Is there a way I can put an employees payment "on hold"?
So in addition to Direct payment (paying direct to Nominal Ledger), Prepayment and overpayment (supplier payment in advance).
It would be nice to have the payment notes indicate the date paid, check number and the amount of payment when viewing the invoice.
Is there a way of naming a Batch Payment?
It would be good to give the Batch Payment a name, ie Bill Payment 17Feb15.
Similar to “Approve for payment”; if an invoice has been approved for payment, it does not mean it’s also been paid – it’s just been approved (for payment).
"in the case of an exemption or where the customer is liable for payment of VAT, reference to the applicable provision of this Directive, or to the corresponding national provision, or any other reference indicating that the supply of goods or services is exempt or subject to the reverse charge procedure;"At the moment there is no way to do this in Xero.
After aligning my check so that the date, payee name, and payment amount fit in their place, the payee address is too high and close to the payment amount line.
for exactly that purpose, reminding them that we expect prompt payment or that their account is overdue.
My card expired so Xero emailed me to say the payment collection failed.
We have recently found that we can print a PDF version of the receipt of each payment transaction.
At the moment, the reconcile feature apportions pro-rata the payment across all line items.
Additionally, it would be useful to then have the sort code field pull through to the batch payment screen, to allow viewing and exporting into .
Would be good if some of those smarts can be built into other timed areas such as payment summaries.
Now that we're int he 2015 FY, when clicking on payment summaries, it default to payment summaries for 2015?
Not sure who forgot to implement that same functionality in payment summaries.
Occasionally, for whatever reason, a customer makes a double payment  and we track this in Xero as an overpayment.
This function really helps in terms of tracking and chasing up payments; otherwise, we can only find one's expected payment date when we click into the particular contact to look for the expected payment date.
I am finding it very frustrating that when a customer has multiple invoices owing and they make a payment, Xero is not automatically allocating the payment to the oldest invoicing owing.
(If there is no prior payment history for the Customer then set the Expected Payment Date to the Due Date.
There should be some sort of document to verify that the payment has been received by the supplier .
Some payment receipts I receive do not have an attachment and all the info is in the message body.
Other products have dividend vouchers aviaible for comapanies ie a template to be completed on payment.
Often this error will go unnoticed until certain reports pick up expenses posted way in the future or the receipt of payment pop-up says "are you sure the payment is for a future invoice? "
It is highly desirable to show the original payment and the reversal on the debtors statement and still have an amount outstanding.
There is currently no way of doing this without making it messy (apply payment against invoice, create credit note for bounced payment, create cash refund for credit note, apply bounced payment against cash refund, create new invoice to reflect the outstanding amount = 5 transactions when there should only be 3).
One example of this feature being useful is for PayPal transactions where the same Reference is used by PayPal for the payment as well as for the transaction fee – so the two are easily recognised as being linked.
We have interest payment on loans at the end of each month.
Some businesses/ retailers require 100% payment for products/ materials purchased, with the balances to be paid over credit terms agreed upon.
Take another example, builders or project managers, or even IT design companies, often charge 100% payment for materials they have to purchase upfront before starting work, with labour charges being spread out, 50% over 30 days, balance after completion etc.
:-) I’m sure you’ll get lots of requests now for payment integrations with services your customers are already signed up for.
When we log a mileage expense claim, we have no visibility of if we're near/breaching the 10k mileage limit for payment at the higher rate.
This could coincide with a date to send the payslip as many companies prepare their payroll a couple of days in advance of payment and do not wish to send the payslips on the day it is prepared but the day it is paid.
If matched then create a batch payment from matched invoices to export - change payment status to paid.
After adding a bill, a "Make a payment" box appears on screen.
If that were possible, you could accept the payment via your phone, and then record the payment on the outstanding invoice in Xero Touch.
I could enter each payment type as a separate entry, but it would be much more efficient to put them in one entry.
Currently if a batch payment is made, only the 'payment:multiple items', 'date' and 'amount' fields are shown (in the global version at least).
I know this isn't "proper" AP practice but it happens a lot, especially in smaller businesses where bills go directly to a director for payment, plus those that are paid by direct debit or payment card.
Method of payment within PayPal is selected as checking account.
Customer contact ( in fact all contacts) to have a payment term field which will then automatically pull through to the invoicing.
Now, because of a dispute, I wish to remove the planned payment date - but I can't.
It will be amazing to have the feature of emailing the remmitance advice for single payment (not batch)
You can also toggle the late payment fees off for specific clients, as you wish.
This would allow us to at a glance keep the "Bad debts" in view and managed (via debt collection, or other opportunities to gain payment).
If you made an integration to make payment through Authorize.
net or another payment gateway we could move to using xero exclusively and cut out one more step for our employees.
Can anyone help with the process of doing a redundancy payment of 2 weeks annual leave, RDO's and unused Annual Leave?
I have had a case where a client has posted the payroll and then used the ABA file to make the payment, the employee has ended up not been paid.
From Timesheet to Payment of Salary and Super.
Each of these could then have their own dashboard so you could understand where each payment was in the cycle.
It would be great if a Draft option could be added to the AutoSuper payment function.
It is the Payment Date which affects what period the Superannuation liability is included, not the 'Period' of the Pay Run.
The Period is a nice to have column but it is misleading, if payment date is not the same date as the week ending date, you may miss paying the superannuation.
Currently it needs to be entered as a payroll deduction and then the super contribution form and payment lodged manually.
At the moment it is horrendous as we have to enter in in gross wages and then make a deduction also and then at the end of the year we have to do a payroll for zero dollars for each individual employee to zero out the amount so it doesn't show up on their payment summaries.
When posting payment summaries to employees, the name & address isn't formatted to print on the paper in the right spot to fit a window face envelope.
That would be a useful addition to the super payment process and much appreciated by the staff.
A seperate payment needs to be done to pay the statutory deducitons.
I receive the information by the 10th of the following month and the payment is made to the employees on the 15th.
At present the payroll jnl is posting to the P&L, wages payable and PAYE on the 15th of the month being the payment date.
The NET payment summary would obviously be the sum total of all NET payments to be made to employees.
The year to date figures in the payment section of the payslip only show the earning lines currently being used.
The date the payment is being made5.
The gross and net payment amounts6.
Payroll Employee Summary & Payroll Activity Details Reports show the date of payment rather than the actual pay period.
This is the last payment (settlement of opening balance) before converting to Xero & automatic settlements.
All it needs is the 801 account to be enabled for payment, right ?
Request the ability to print or email remittance advice for individual suppliers paid as part of a batch payment.
The income line doesn't;t tell me the date of the payment transactions and there doesn't;t seem to be a reference to the transactions.
Hence to reconcile I have to login to stripe, match the amount to the payment and then reconcile manually.
Should I set it up as a payment service instead or as well as.
But I couldn't see any allocate payment or credit button in over payment options, I could see only edit button in Over payment option button.
net payment service activated on our account.
This bug only manifests itself if you've had to credit off some of the invoice or receive a partial payment (before receiving payment in full).
Evidently Xero is using the date of the last payment applied as the “FullyPaidOnDate”, whereas this should be the maximum payment (or credit) date.
bamboozled  Trying to reconcile a refund for a bill payment.
1: Remove and redo payment from reconciled bill.
For example, I might get a $10,000 payment from a customer one month, but then go 2 months without invoicing.
This will then allow them to pay the correct amount and I then have to remove the fake payment.
Wondered if it was possible to let strip take a 50% payment.
I enter payments in my invoicing software, and that software then pushes the payment into Xero.
(Entering the payment twice - once in the invoicing software and again in Xero - isn't practical.
Should I have done that as a pre-payment instead?
Then set up a salaries payment and code it to the Shareholders Current Account?
On my checking account side I reconcile them as credit card payment, and in the credit card feed I itemize all the individual charges (mouse is computer equipment, etc).
)The payment is for the previous tax year so does that mean it could even be ?
Do I have to contact xero and arrange payment?
We have always exported the payment batch file using the BACS file type.
50 payment is there and Xero wants me to reconcile it.
i. e. if payment has already been received can you note on the CSV that payment has been received and then Xero will mark it paid?
(Note, I have not used Square yet to do a payment so I am not totally sure how it works, but this question is based on what I have read. )
I have entered the payment as per normal.
I can't see a "split payment" type option for a bill.
Invoiced $10k, took $4k as cash payment and the other $7k was taken as investment .
After processing the payment, I realised that this had already been paid previously.
The 1 years interest needs to be listed as a current asset and I want this to be reduced every month with the respective amount of interest payment that would then effectively be used up.
We invoiced the customer in USD and received payment in USD into our USD bank account.
Their bill is entered in Euros and of course the payment is in USD from the USD account.
I'm guessing this is because this is a transaction involving two currencies that aren't our base currency but at present can't see any obvious way of handling the reconciliation to match the payment and the bill.
We recently made a payment against a bill in Xero to a vendor for $2182.
Auto payment is going through one of the cardholders and shows separately and not in the main account, Don't know why and what the client did during the initial set up.
Its easy enough to tick them all and approve, so that they are then "awaiting payment", but thats not good for checking them before approving.
Why is it showing up twice since it was only one payment?
I have set up a payment plan and am wanting to know how to credit the amount to an income tax payable liability account.
I get a payment from Amazon every 2 weeks.
aba payment file and I get the following message.
When we receive a payment, we transfer 20% to a savings account we have opened to put the VAT money in.
My client was previously using a spreadsheet for expenses and calculated these incorrectly resulting in an over payment from the bank account of £43.
have a few questions here: - 1 - Placed a cheque payment, realised it was an error so I reversed it.
I entered a bill and paid it however I wanted to pay online via a ABA file can I still do this or is there a way I can delete the bill payment and start again.
I would have thought that having a "how paid" or "payment type" to track EFTPOS and cash payments would allow me to group those payments easily and reconcile automatically.
Most of it are already paid (cash+CC) but still shown as unpaid until they are reconciled (to an expense claim payment or to a CC card transaction).
Filter based on payment method?
We have recently switched from DPS to eWay as our payment service.
And even if no payment was actually made?
For instance bills that have been paid are reflecting as 'awaiting payment'.
In my haste I think I have made a slight error - I have input bill payments as 'I purchased this item' and allocated payment/reconciled.
Does anyone have experience of exporting batch payment file for upload to Barclays, either as csv or BACS file?
23Now this payment was made up of 8 payments to different suppliers so when you go into the bank account you think that the one supplier has been paid the 4,597.
At present we run 3 payment gateways - credit cards and direct debit which are transferred into our bank account on a daily basis.
On any given day, different clients will make full payment on multiple invoices by visiting my company's website and submitting payment via credit card.
Payment gateway is Authorize.
We have established a protocol in our Xero books to tag vendor names with a suffix code to designate the payment method.
)^^ credit card payment initiated by our AP departmentno suffix = payment by bank cheque initiated by our AP departmentWe can create a list of ACH vendors quickly by searching for the term @@ in the bills list.
After authorising it the first payment then went through, but the second payment did not (thank goodness) due to insufficient funds, but the problem I've got is that the second payment that didn't go through still shows up on the bank statement.
It is so annoying having to unreconcile the payment and then reconcile it again.
2, Company made a payment of amount $ 5000. the payment made was made to a wrong account and money received back was $ 4,985.
Company again made a payment to correct account of amount $ 5,000.
I reallocated the payment to the old supplier plus an overpayment.
When chasing a payment from a customer, I am often only know by their SAP or Vendor id number.
We overpaid a supplier and agreed to settle a couple of expenses with the over payment and have the remainder credited back.
I created a credit note for a return made by a customer and apply payment to it using my Paypal account.
Or will Xero recognize the date of payment as the accounting periodAll answers are appreciated and thanks in advance.
82, I have to create a payment whereby the customer only paid $58.
Afternoon all,I have eWay set up as a Payment Service on my account.
My question is how on earth do I show this in Xero as currently I have all my aged receivables showing as owing, a payment of XYZ showing as being received from Metro and don't know how to make them tally up!
Right now, if I apply the payment to the customer's invoice (making a note that it is a CC payment) before the payment comes through on the checking account's bank feed, there is no way to then reconcile it - even though the same amount on the checking account page shows as an 'unreconciled' 'receive money' deposit under the Xero account transaction tab.
A payment line item on the activity represents one line item on a batch payment rather than the batch payment itself.
The customer has since made a part payment of $2,000, by cheque.
Because first they ask for £200 first payment, then after one month they asked me to pay the final amount.
Since it is a part payment for a project to be completed (a few months in the future).
Also, I recently made a tax payment through EFTPS to cover those liabilities.
I simply get CARD PAYMENT TO with the date.
I made 1 $500 dollar payment to the credit card from my checking account.
Hey everyone,I ran into a problem last night, when I was making a payment online and tried to record it in Xero.
E. g. : one of our staff members paid a taxi driver using cash, uses Xero touch to document the payment.
There has been discussion on this but nothing recent I run a camping site, and we sell pitches through 3rd party websites- payment is made via their website say &#163;50 - they take &#163;7.
How do I generate a payment to my state for these items so that it clears the Liability balance?
I am trying to train our bookkeeper in Xero reconciliation and we want to split a transaction from the cash coding screen, all working great - I split a single payment out over two lines - HP Loan capital and HP Loan interest (as you do) and reconcile the transaction.
Customer pays £30 by PayPalPayPal payment transaction of £30PayPal fee transaction of £1.
26 by PayPal (customer covering fees)PayPal payment transaction of £31.
I have two bills which I have added from Ebay all-in-one however ebay has broken the payment down and taken individual paypal payments out to all of the different users.
He has made 1 payment to my back account.
Allow a part payment option in the reconciliation page to tag a deposit as part payment of an nvoice instead of having to leave reconciliation and open the invoice separately.
HiWe have a credit card machine that comes in as one payment each day.
We cannot cancel the previous days payment as it has already been reconciled so it is added as a credit note.
Then of course when that days payment comes in, we cannot reconcile it.
So for example today's payment has come in at &#163;325.
The 1 payment applies to 3 account entries.
In our previous system, we invoiced a client and they made payment.
These charges were likely to verify my newly added credit card for their payment system.
Under the Act, the person who has served the payment claim is called the payee.
If you do not respond to the payment claim promptly, you may lose your right to object to the payment claim.
If the scheduled amount is less than the claimed amount, the payment schedule must indicate—(a) how you calculated the scheduled amount; and(b) your reason or reasons for the difference between the scheduled amount and the claimed amount; and(c) in a case where the difference is because you are withholding payment on any basis, your reason or reasons for withholding payment.
Consequences of not responding to payment claimIf you do not respond to the payment claim by paying the claimed amount in full or providing a payment schedule that sets out the amount you are prepared to pay, then you will become liable to pay the claimed amount and the payee may recover from you, as a debt due, in the appropriate court, the unpaid portion of the claimed amount and the actual and reasonable costs of recovery awarded against you by the court.
Consequences of not paying scheduled amount in manner indicated by payment scheduleIf you do respond to the payment claim by providing a payment schedule but do not pay the scheduled amount on or before the due date for the progress payment to which the payment claim relates, the payee may recover from you, as a debt due, in the appropriate court, the unpaid portion of the scheduled amount and the actual and reasonable costs of recovery awarded against you by the court.
If the last day for making a payment or providing a payment schedule falls on a day that is not a working day, you may do so on the next working day after that day.
Once they make payment the date is secured.
My question is, can that first payment be added to a batch somehow?
The problem is:  There is one batch payment which shows the right amount but I am short one paid invoice amount to make up the complete payment.
There's no way to change the tax rate unless you completely delete the batch payment and then redo it.
Reconciling the batch payment isn't enough.
I am searching for the payment reference but it is not listed?
We have three separate sums coming into our bank account everyday for EFTPOS/Visa/Mastercard, for cash deposits and for AMEX (which charges a % fee, so will not match the amount in the Payment Summary from our POS system).
I know about setting up Stripe as a payment processor and adding a payment link on to my invoice but that is not what I am trying to do.
After a few days, all the recent transactions are bundled together and a payment is sent from Stripe to my Bank account.
In Purchases / Awaiting Payment - I have > 200 paymentsat end of month.
Reconcile payment transfer on credit card account and that works.
then look at account transactions tab one line of this payment transfer says reconciled, another line says unreconciled - however not coming up as an item to reconcile - so do I reconcile this and how?
In joint account have already reconciled this transfer payment.
Each month we get a bulk payment from each social services provider for multiple customers.
I wonder if I should create a payment for £60.
My customer couldn't change this and so couldn't make payment.
- The next day, when my payment processor runs the transaction, my software creates a payment on the invoice via the xero API.
- My payment processor will batch deposit these transactions to my bank account.
It would be much better moving forward if a customer pays more than one invoice in one payment if there was, similar to purchases, a batch payment type facility in Sales Awaiting Payment, to enter the payment amount and apply it to that customers outstanding invoices, if more than one invoice is being paid.
On 31st March 2014 I had a direct debit credit card payment.
Clients pay a deposit and a final payment before arrival.
This payment is still showing in the statements but I can't find it in Account Transactions or the Reconcile tab!
It would be great if my payment schedule could reflect this.
In MYOB Premier I would prepare multiple electronic payments for smaller amount as they were approved by management which also allowed up to juggle payment dates depending on cash flow.
Having looked at one of these columns it's adding a value to the foreign currency gains and losses for a payment made in Euros during the last financial year (our base currency of GBP).
100+ to a single check payment.
Is it possible that if I agree with a client that he will give me 2000€ next week I can enter the expected date of payment and the value as he will not be paying the full ammount.
Can this receipt also confirm that due date for lodgement and payment based on the BAS/Tax Agent extension.
What's the best way to split the transfer across both credit cards while taking care of the lump payment that shows up on my credit card?
This is the first month that I am using Xero, and after importing the bank statements, I've struggled to reconcile the salary payment, and the PAYE/NI payment.
Essentially, I want to have a list of current members in the organization, along with their current balance, as well as a place to track their methods of payment (check, card, cash, etc).
The "repeating bill" feature will only create approved bills, at best, and I still have to enter a payment against it.
Then match the total payment (over payment) minus the refund to the invoice total?
Payee Payment End Date must be within Payer Financial Year reported in Payer recordNone of the employees who have a payment summary have a termination date outside of the financial year.
we made a lump sum payment to an employee who was made redundant on July 3rd 2017 however when we went to process payment summaries for EOFY it is showing up on his payment summary for last year as well  It also shows up on the payment summary for the next financial year?
He has an ordinary rate of pay as per award and will receive an over-award payment to bring up his hourly rate to a negotiated figure.
One is 'Ordinary Hours', the other 'Over-Award Payment'.
This has shown up when I have come in to run the payment summaries & the gross earnings for the employee don't match.
2- Also the government is going to be paying the employer Jessica's maternity leave, the employer then has to forward this payment to Jessica.
I have a number of clients using the super stream compliant Click Super payment system.
An employee requested part payment of their weekly wage in cash and I transferred the remainder to their account.
But when it comes to completing online registration form for auto super payment, it said that ABN already registered with auto super.
I lodge my clients Annual Payment Summary Reports through Xero.
We submitted a super payment yesterday which ended up failing.
I think I can do a correction somehow, but how to make it so I get the two seperate payment summaries?
I am a newbie in Xero and wants to understand how to manage his payroll and the details of payment and payslips also to understand it with Fairwork Australia.
However, it merely added the extra hours to the leave already recorded, resulting in an over payment to each employee.
The only way I currently can see to do a bonus payment during the month (employee is paid monthly on the 1st of each month) is to delete monthly salary information in the pay template, put the bonus payment in then delete that bonus information and put the normal monthly salary figures back in.
So far I’m thinking the best way to get around this is to create another account called “pre-paid superannuation” and reconcile the advanced super payment to there.
Or is there a better way achieve a pre-payment of an employee’s annual super?
Has anyone successfully issued an Amended Payment Summary for an Individual (created Amended Payment summary OK) and successfully uploaded the AMENDED file to the ATO?
If this linkage has not updated then would be a reason for payment bouncing First State Super details as below                    Name: First State Superannuation - Accumulation (First State Superannuation Scheme)                        USI: 53226460365001Looking forward your reply Ada WangLand & Homes Group Limited
This company has weekly payrun (Monday to Friday, payment every Friday), usually last week of every month falls into two months.
It shows as an allowance on the Payment summary which is incorrect.
However, my payment summaries now show both a positive and a negative allowance.
I've had a tax agent who hates using Xero ask me if there's a way of lodging only some of the payment summaries to the ATO until later.
Trying to finalise payment summaries, one employee has a lump sum payment (code A type R) which shouldn't be showing as a lump sum, as it is part of a normal pay (ordinary hours).
Some allowances had been entered in payroll as Earnings not as reimbursements, can I run a dummy payroll dated June 30th for the individuals affected to correct their payment summaries.
I am thinking that I can do a journal entry for that date to show the payment, however not sure where to balance with.
And its now showing on his payment summary incorrect.
We’ve reconciled the amounts and there are no incorrect amounts on the payment summaries so would we be okay to finalise, publish and lodge the payment summaries, or would there be problems in future payroll years or the GL as a result of the amounts not matching?
This means that many of these staff will have Reportable Fringe Benefit Amounts (RFBA's) of $30,000 reported on their annual Payment Summaries.
Therefore the key question I have is can I delete a payrun after is has been used to provide information for a superannuation batch payment?
I have a casual staff member who sends us their timesheet around every 3 weeks and I've been paying them in the same weekly pay run as the rest of our staff (one payment for 3 weeks work).
We have an employee who is applying for the Dad and Partner Payment, we have offered to him to make a top up payment to cover the gap from the DPP payment and his normal wage.
I am not sure how to process the top up payment through payroll as it needs to not be a paid leave payment.
Can xero run or send us a super stream payment confirmation or receipt with no employees details involved?
Is it possible to issue individual employees an early payment summary without locking down the whole system for the rest of my employees?
I have an employee that is leaving the country and wants to submit an early tax return, and they say the ATO requires a payment summary.
Created a pay item - deduction 'Motor Vehicle Lease payment' and have selected reduce PAYGW, do not reduce superannuation.
Will my payment summary be accurate?
I have an opening Balance date as 30 June 15, which I can't change either as it tells me that " The opening balance date can't be changed because this employee has a published payment summary.
How can I set up in pay run, because it is Irregular payment.
I have two questions: Do I see this payment to the leasing company as salary sacrificy before tax (set up as deduction ) and how do I code the payment to the leasing company once it hits the bank account?
How can I get this resolved without having to unpublish the payment summaries given they have already been submitted?
I have processed by Payment summaries and issued them to my employees.
However we have noticed a discrepancy - The opening balance 'previous other deductions' value has been deducted off the Gross Payment reported to the ATO.
I have several employees that are not being included in the Payment Summary function.
Why are some employees not getting a payment summary produced for them?
Therefore his Payment summary for 2015 has his termination date of 30/06/14 on it, which is incorrect an the reason why it is being rejected by the ATO upload.
On filing Payment Summaries to ATO through Xero I received the following messages - has anyone else experienced this difficulty?
The payment was part of a bulk payment (more than 1 employee).
I then made the correct payment seperately.
All payment summaries were done at the end of the 2014 financial year (the employee got one).
I set the payment up automatically in my bank account so it was paid over the holidays.
The payment amount is still the same as the staff members normal pay.
My question is: which payment category is used in Payroll?
Then, once the payment has been made to the employee super funds, the bill is marked as paid, and the Superannuation Liability account is updated via the bill.
I have a guy who has a regular salary sacrifice payment deducted from his pay.
I have been to payment settings and I can see it however, it is locked and I cannot delete it.
Does Xero not automatically assume payment has been made?
We are paying one employees' termination payment before the next Payrun by manual payment.
NoA valid AUSKey is required to lodge your Payment Summaries to the ATO.
I am trying to lodge 2014 payment summaries on behalf of my client.
I am currently processing our staff super payments manually at the end of each quarter and not using the Auto Super payment function.
But for employee "A", the opening balances tab doesn't allow any options to set the leave, and a popup window says "The opening balance date can't be changed because this employee has a published payment summary".
The 'super payable' account is showing the payment.
We will store the superannuation rates behind the scenes and retrieve the right percentage based on the payment date of your pay runs.
This means I want to apportion the August payment.
There is no one-off payment option.
These amounts were salary sacrificed and they are not showing up on the Payment Summaries.
50It's important that the salary sacrifice portion goes on the payslip and gets added up for the annual payment summary to be shown as Reportable Fringe Benefits.
Talked to the IRS and worked out a payment plan.
I know there is the option to mark paid manually, but since they aren't technically paid (they are rolled into my payment plan) what is a way that I can mark them paid without screwing up my books?
I am confused as to whether this also applies to the annual filing and payment of form 944 and the employer W2s.
There's an information symbol next to the quarterly payment schedule, and when the cursor hovers over it, I get the message: "This deposit frequency is associated with a Tax Payment and cannot be edited or deleted. "
Federal electronic filing and payment of taxes is now available to all customers on a standard or premium pricing plan.
I have found that when recording a manual payment Xero will not allow me to backdate the payment.
For a weekly payroll with a quarterly tax payment that's a minimum of 13 lines.
i. e. create a 477 transaction for each gross salary payment, a 479 transaction for the employer's NI amounts, then a set of transactions to 814, 825, 826 and 947 for the wages, PAYE deduction, NI deduction, and student loan deductions?
We've noticed that our P&L is showing two line items for each salary payment, one from the Payroll feature, and then another from the reconciliation.
• For Feb and March of 2017, I entered payroll in April (2017-18)• This was a mistake - HMRC recognised these as payment made in the year 17-18.
• Xero is currently listing my next payment as Feb 2017 - this kind of makes sense as I have deleted all payroll payments after that date.
The reason I prefer to delay posting is becuase sometimes the actual net pay paid to some employees change due to further adjustment before the payment is processed by electionic transfer.
Trying to give myself an annual salary of £8112 in one payment.
Automates tax preparation and facilitates electronic filing and payment Philippine businesses - because next to Xero, is Juan (one).
However the Pensions Regulator said it's standard practice to only set up companies after their first salary payment, and as such they can't give me any further information.
I have worked out what her redundancy payment will be, but the UK version of Xero does not seem to have the redundancy option.
With the current setting (as payment date 5th of the month) Xero is posting the payroll journal into a wrong month.
My month 12 run has an NIC deduction; and to handle this I have had to record two separate transactions, one for the PAYE run with the NIC deduction baked in, and an NIC payment separately.
The date should be after the payment date, or the period end date that is linked to the last pay run the employee is included in.
I can't remember what I am supposed to do with reconciling a monthly payment to HMRC.
Firstly, I was unable to set up a salary payment which did not show as hours worked and an hourly rate on the payslip - support advised that this was not possible at the moment.
When I look on line it talks about clicking on employee batch payment tab to generate a payment but I do not have that anywhere so left feeling very confused.
But then I get an error saying: ‘Payment Date must be within 90 days of End Date for the Pay Period.
The first payment period for monthly is 1st to 31st May (it should be April)The first payment period for weekly is 7th to 13th April (it should be the week ending 7th April)Is it because both periods start before 5th April?
In order to reconcile the payment to him, I 'Split' the bill so it now shows an amount due to him.
You are correct in saying that the IRD amount would not be due to the IRD in the August period (as this is based on payment date) but this does not affect that there is a liability.
The only thing the payment date should affect is the reports that are generated for the IRD.
Often a payrun is for a month with the payment being on the first day of the following month.
00After one day of Annual Leave payment, I have the balance as the following:Annual leave (hours) 65.
So from what we have observed, we conclude the ASB either requires the correct account number in the CSV Payment File (not one with a preceding zero in the suffix), or if there is to be a preceding zero then it requires dashes between the fields.
99-9999-9999999-999999999999999099 = Error with ASB999999999999999 = OK99-9999-9999999-099 = OKIs anyone else having issues with the Xero Payment Files and ASB online banking?
I  posted it  and reconciled with the actually payment .
Recurring payments, payment reminders and much more.
com for Xero is a magically simple bill payment solution that eliminates double data entry and provides paperless A/P and A/R.
Take control of your cash flow with CheckVault's unique quoting system that offers your clients easy escrow payment options.
It’s seamless and easy and updates Xero as soon as the payment is made.
Populates the payment details and updates Xero as soon as the payment is complete.
Automatically charge and send Late Fees, Service Charges, Payment Reminders and more.
Sell products online and receive payment, seamlessly integrated with Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and DPS Payment Express, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Payment Evolution, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
A lot of providers on Service Seeking are asking for zipMoney payment option as they give longer terms and pay everything upfront for youCheers
You could incentivise payment by direct debit and debit card by making them free and charge a 2.
When we receive a cheque as payment for an invoice, i mark it as payment received in ServiceM8 which then tells xero the payment has been received.
If a part payment is put through on xero and a payment is put through on workshop software it shows as two payments as you cannot reconcile workshop software payments.
Daily Vend closure creates a new Invoice in Xero and each mean of payment (CC/Cash) creates a "payment" under this invoice.
Based in Australia and require an online payment solution for customers based overseas to pay by credit card.
Not only is the Square integration useless because I'm forced to accept daily 'Catch All' invoicing vs per customer invoicing, with no ability to 'tweak' the operation/flow of the integration, I can't even get a payment to an Asset account to show up right.
We are looking forward to having payment approval workflow in Xero, where: 1.
HiI've added Stripe as a payment service and its working fine.
We are currently using Stripe as a payment service, but find that it doesn't provide a mechanism for doing part payments.
Do any of the payment service options within Xero have a way to do part payments?
After export my payroll info from payment evolution to xero.
I am looking for some software that will integrate with xero and which will manage internal shareholders (effectively a Maori Trust) including declaring & payment of dividends and associated records, IRD compliance, tracking unclaimed monies etc.
EASEEsell can also be used for you standard SME users to purchase on account and will also support consumer purchasing with interface to all bank payment gateways for credit card processing.
Which must be manually cleared when payment is received.
My client requires an e-commerce system, a payment handling system and an inventory system.
But payment processing at 2.
Does anybody have a good payment processing solution?
Import payment transactions from XERO.
This enables you to see credit scores, payment metrics and risk exposure across your customer base and automatically alerts you to any changes.
Xero will then maintain payment details, statement issue and full accounting.
Upon payment we received an email stating that the file would be available in up to an hour.
But if I sent remittance out to my suppliers now, they would expect payment to be in their account now rather than on my schedule.
The only message we have from Xero is:This payslip has a negative net payment value.
You take too long to process my payment.
I have had some response from Xero of a way to deal with this but it was very confusing and didn't allow for the VAT to be claimed in one payment at the purchase date.
My Bills Screen (the one with the All, Draft, Awaiting Approval, Awaiting Payment, Paid, & Repeating Tabs) is now spread right across my screen (as is each screen under these tabs).
Well that was 7 days and three payment attempts ago.
Another 24 hours has gone on with NO response and another failed payment attempt.
I contacted Payment Express, and they dont have any record of the transaction i. e. my attempt to make payment.
22-5 - we first submitted a support ticket as we were required to update payment information so billing could be processed.
23-5 our accountant attempts to contact Xero, they advise that only the subscriber can update the payment details, but give no advice on if the subscriber is.
Xero claim that the payment details have been updated (he provides these over the phone) and that access will be restored.
The Subscriber, has the ability to update the payment details of a billing account.
As soon as the payment details have been updated and payment processed, access will be restored.
Don’t you think there should be one for Payment Summaries?
The system don't let you apply credit notes to a payment if the credit note is before the "lock date".
Therefore customers that is on Standard user cannot apply a payment to credit note dated before conversion date or lock date.
##### CLUSTER 3 #####
Hi AllIs it possible to design the statement template to remove the due date column?
Hi.
Hi - Our storefront marketplace solution is Volusion.
Hi All,i have something to discuss, in my previous company we did a conversion debt into equity since the amount due to HQ is quite big and the share capital is already fully paid.
Hi forumNewbie here.
Hi folksTearing my hair out here.
Hi!
Hi there.
Hi all, I have tried everything but cannot find a solution.
Hi, I have probably a silly question, we are trying to create Annual reports Pack, we've done it for about 6 years with no problems at all.
Hi all,My client's company bond has grown in the past year.
Hi guysIm a little confused on how to handle my credit card transactions.
Hi all,We place orders for stock to our suppliers.
Hi All, So I'm not that great at accounting at all and managed to upload the wrong column into my opening stock balance for tracked inventory.
Hi there,I'm totally lost here.
Hi there,I have a couple of large purchase orders which I make payments for yearly.
Hi there,please could anyone advise me regarding year end stock journals?
Hi all,We've changed hands in management recently, the previous manager was attached to the "invoicereminders@post.
Hi,I have recently sent through a commbank pdf form by post.
Hi,I recently entered a conversion balance on April 30.
Hi,I have another question.
Hi, There may be other discussions on here about this subject, but I can't find them.
Hi.
Hi ThereWe are using custom docx templates.
Hi there,Wondering if someone can help me please.
Hi there,Would really appreciate some guidance on how to handle the scenario illustrated below.
Hi,I have a situation where my banks will generate 3 lines of transactions whenever I made an interbank transfer or cheque clearance activity.
Hi Guys,I'm looking to import monthly disbursements from multiple clients from Banklink into Workflow Max (PM) but seem at loss where to start?
Hi All - reaching out for help.
Hi all,Wondering how you are classifying your international expenses from a GST perspective?
Hi, please could somebody let me know how to do the following.
Hi all, I have two basic questions that I was unable to locate in a search:1. )
Hi!
Hi everyoneI appreciate that this basic question might be beyond the scope of the forum, but I'm trying to inform HMRC of the fact that this is the end of year PAYE submission.
Hi!
Hi.
Hi there.
Hi, Im hoping someone can help please.
hi all,apologies if this has been asked before.
Hi i wonder if someone can help.
Hi there, Can someone help please with this annoying and persisten problem?
Hi All,I'm interested in your opinions on online security for Windows.
Hi,From 1st April we will be changing from the flat VAT rate to standard VAT scheme.
Hi everyone.
Hi thereWe have duplicate clients on our workflowmax system, both have different Work In Progress.
Hi,I'm hoping someone can help me please.
Hi,  I have an issue which I cannot solve.
Hi guys,I know this topic has kind of been addressed in other posts, but none seems to reflect quite precisely my situation.
Hi All, Does anyone have any suggestions for how to improve the sending out of Notices of assessment (NOA's).
Hi,I am hoping someone can help please.
Hi guys.
Hi.
Hi there,I am managing a property that I collect rent for, and pass on to my landlord.
HI,I am trying to enter 2015 conversion balances but only for the purpose of entering a Trial Balance and preparing EOY financials.
Hi.
Hi,A client overpaid us, depositing $2,305.
Hi,Ive been looking around to try and find the correct way of reporting this, hopefully someone knows the answer!
Hi,our year end was 31st December 2016.
Hi,I'm sure this is a very basic question but.
Hi,We are trying to import our transactions from a POS system.
Hi all, doing my first VAT return.
Hi.
Hi,We became VAT registered on 1st July and have a year end of 31st March '16.
Hi all,We rent cars and have recently become authorised to broke insurance.
Hi.
Hi there,Recently, one of our staff members purchased $74.
Hi there!
Hi.
Hi,We are a startup restaurant not yet in operation.
Hi,I have recently been engaged by a client who has an issue with their previous VAT Return.
Hi allI have been trading forex with an online broker and made an overall loss of $11K for the lastfinancial year.
Hi folks.
Hi allTotal newbie question and more of a sanity check than a question even.
Hi,Hope you guys are doing well.
Hi there.
Hi,Currently the only option to show detail on the check remittance stub is to show the description.
Hi Everyone,I'm an independent contractor and recently started bookkeeping.
Hi.
Hi,I am trying to adjust a submitted expense claim that went through with 15% GST when it should have been no GST as it was an overseas transaction.
Hi,I wanted to change the depreciation method for all assets from a historic choice of reducing balance to straight line as it's now deemed more appropriate.
Hi,I was wondering if someone could help me with this.
Hi all,I have a customer who has purchased an item through paypal.
Hi,I'm registering for GST starting this financial year.
Hi.
Hi All, I have made some donations that were made to a charity that is DGR registered.
Hi,We are currently in the process of changing our company structure from a Trustee Company of a Trust to a Pty Ltd Company scenario.
Hi there, we have purchased an asset that is going to be invoiced to us in quarter payments over four months.
Hi,We recently received money from an insurance claim for a damaged laptop.
Hi All,1.
Hi everyone,I submitted my first BAS for Jan/Feb/Mar Quarter and received a cheque back from the ATO.
Hi,For a period of 2 weeks in June I had a whole lot of transactions show up on my company credit card, all labelled as "balance segment transfer".
Hi - I'm having issues with BAS and GST On Imports.
Hi.
Hi all,I have an EFTPOS terminal and get charged monthly for it - $60 inc GST.
Hi,Please help, I paid $1,419.
Hi!
Hi,I'm hoping someone can help me.
Hi,I'm sorry if this is a silly question- we are booked into see the accountant on the 26th of this month.
Hi All,Suppose two free Denim Jackets were given to the models for photo shoots.
Hi.
Hi!
Hi,I run a restaurant who's period 3 ended 03/27/2016.
Hi there.
Hi everyone,My company is acting as a third party courier, delivering the goods of a retailer to their customers.
Hi There,We have a small company which holds a house as its main asset.
Hi, I hope I have come to the right place to ask this question.
Hi There,I accidentally Published my Activity Statement for this period.
Hi,I'm curious about subscriptions.
Hi,Illustration1.
Hi guys, really hope you can help.
Hi there:Our company locates in NZ, has some Trademarks, recorded under "Intangible Asset".
Hi there,I have recently purchased a house (to live in) which I also work from.
Hi Everyone,1.
Hi We are a manufacturing company in the building industry.
Hi all,Require your help here.
Hi Guys,I am posting here hoping someone can guide me in the right direction to find a solution.
Hi Does anyone know if 'Cloud Convert' converts all Sage Pastel packages?
Hi ladies and gents!
Hi everyone.
Hi guys,We have  that are owned by the  company.
Hi all,My company in importing the goods and then sale the goods in Local Market.
Hi there,Lets say I want to record the costs of a meal with a potential client.
Hi there,I run three different trading names under the one group company umbrella.
Hi there.
Hi there.
Hi, I have a client who has a finance agreement.
Hi, hoping that someone has some recommendations here as Im sure this is a pretty normal occurrence.
Hi,Apologies if this is covered elsewhere.
Hi there,I hope I can explain this properly.
Hi,I took out a loan of 20,000 against a property.
Hi hoping someone can help me.
Hi All,I receive a credit from the ATM every month however dont know how to enter it or what to do with it.
Hi ,We are small recruiting company in NSW Australia.
Hi!
Hi All!
Hi there,All of our fixed assets are registered but we have a few to dispose of.
Hi,I have a client and I've agreed they can settle a bill within an 18 month period with installments.
Hi .
Hi Everyone!
Hi.
Hi,We have been operating various spread sheets over the last few years to manage our scout groups finances.
Hi Everyone,   Our company offers a 401k plan to our employees in the US and have a monthly deduction taken from their paycheck along with an employer match.
Hi,I'm looking for some advice.
Hi folks,I have been doing  end of period journals for my inventory and was happy with the figures showing on P&L and Balance sheet.
Hi all,I realise that there are a number of apps out there that will record your receipts and track your expenses, however none of these seem to have a 'person breakdown', ie - the person that actually purchased the item.
Hi, hope someone can help.
Hi.
Hi there.
Hi,I have an accounting question.
Hi.
Hi there,I understand that the VAT can only go onto my VAT return once I am in possession of a C79 from HMRC.
Hi - I was hoping you good folks could help this complete newbie with 3 questions:1).
Hi Guys.
Hi there,I'm trying to get my VAT returns to more accurately reflect my stock purchases.
Hi EveryoneWe have a client who sells product.
Hi there, I run a large events venue.
Hi,Basically, a customer wants a refund for an order they made on my online store.
Hi Community!
Hi,I recently linked my HSBC Credit Card with HSBC Online Banking.
Hi, two questions.
Hi Everyone,Is anyone else experiencing this issue please?
Hi there!
Hi there,Hoping someone can clear something up for me.
Hi thereI am trying to journal against unpaid expense claims which is 801 this needs to be a debit entry from end of year adjustments.
Hi all,We run a Dance School and receive money from customers for exam fees and uniforms.
Hi there, I've tried searching the forums but not having any luck tracking down an answer.
Hi PeopleHoping can someone help me with what is probably a relative "dumb" question !
Hi all!
Hi all,Looking into the best practice for booking costs related to a longer period (year, semester).
Hi there, our company rents an office (an apartment).
Hi, I have looked at other feeds that explain how to reconcile bills paid by cash.
Hi we are a small finance company.
Hi AllWondering how people tackle this.
Hi guys!
Hi all,I've moved office and paid a deposit for the rent, which I will hopefully get back when I leave, possibly years from now.
Hi There,We sell in two ways: a) direct to customers on our website, and b) wholesale to retailers.
Hi,Could anyone help me?
Hi there,We have recently employed a factoring company and have found that Kirsten's advice is very helpful.
Hi there,Quick 101 question.
Hi I have sold some old Holding Stock.
Hi Everyone,I am struggling with the proper way to get Historical Adjustment off my balance sheet.
Hi.
Hi, we hire a venue and we require a deposit before the event date.
Hi,We get paid largely in cash.
Hi,I have a budget month that runs from, for example, 9 May to 8 June.
Hi, I am currently entering in my client's transactions.
Hi everyone,I'm a tax accountant who's trying to help a client with an audit.
Hi,I hope this isn' too dumb a question.
Hi .
Hi .
Hi all.
Hi.
Hi!
Hi I am looking for someone using the system in Sweden?
Hi,We have a client who sells "pre-loved" items.
Hi, I write as an owner/manager not an accountant.
Hi everyone, I have an issue with my FAR showing unwanted codes from my conversion balances.
Hi All, I've been manually importing Paypal statements month by month by following instructions here:http://help.
Hi Folks,I wonder if anyone can advise me best practice to fix up a mistake.
Hi,I purchased a flight ticket but missed the flight.
Hi - we are on the flat rate scheme and have been uploading all our expenses with 20% VAT.
Hi, I have a large client whom we have invoiced several times between May and August this year.
Hi everyone,I have a quick question.
Hi, I'm looking for instructions on how I should record a shareholder's loan.
Hi All, sorry if this has been discussed elsewhere I couldn't see that it had been.
Hi,When renting our office we paid a security deposit.
Hi there,I wonder if anyone could best advise me on if I am doing this correctly.
Hi I was wondering if anyone can give me some advice on the most efficient way to track purchases and or expenses using tracking or another method which could work equally as well.
Hi there.
Hi everyone,I generally understand (well, hopefully! )
Hi!
Hi All,Very sorry in advance if this is answered elsewhere.
Hi,We have a client who we billed several times over the course of a month.
Hi!
Hi all,This one has me stumped.
Hi, I'm facing a problem I gather thousands of small businesses are struggling with.
Hi thereI have a question and a complaint.
Hi there.
HiRegarding, reverse charge VAT accounting, I have been posting purchases with a EC Purchase VAT code of 20%, and on the bottom line posting a negative VAT reverse charge to the VAT code, per the instructions for Reverse Charges so that it then appears correctly on the VAT return boxes.
Hi all, this should be a easy fix but i dont know how.
hi folks, maybe you can help me ?
Hi there.
Hi.
Hi, i am closing the first year for my company & we have invoiced customers for goods they will not receive for some while and that we have not yet been invoiced for by our suppliers.
Hi All,Great software.
Hi everyone, I know this will undoubtedly be me once again but hopefully someone can point me in the right direction.
Hi I am trying to import a csv file (using the template) into the acs receivable module to bring in the opening balances and no matter what I do it will only import the first line, and come up with the error after the first line of (no matter what is in the second line):The imported file tstimport.
Hi,I live in Sydney, Australia.
Hi Everyone, I have ATO debt from a previous tax return year.
Hi All,This should be nice and easy to answer.
Hi.
Hi,I've reluctantly signed an agreement to follow the self billing process here in the UK with a client of mine.
Hi All.
Hi, could anyone to confirm that I am on the right track to process customer prepayment?
Hi,I have received a notification from the ATO suggesting that they are introducing 'Simpler BAS' for newly registered businesses.
Hi!
Hi Guys,As you know from 1st of April 2017 the government has change the flat rate fro 10% to 16.
Hi, I am trying to fix a mistake I made back in July.
Hi y'all!
Hi.
Hi there,I currently have an accountant to prepare and file my GST on my behalf.
Hi.
Hi all,I have a problem with my layouts.
Hi Everyone.
Hi everyone, I'm on the FRS and struggling with my first VAT return.
Hi all,I would love to get your opinion on the best best way to move my cash?
Hi :I have consulted this link  https://help.
Hi All,I am a sole trader trying to draw a weekly wage.
Hi I am doing some customer research trying to understand the key financial pain points for small businesses and start-ups.
Hi, I have a small lounge bar and want to start recording all drinks given away for promotional purposes (staff, entertainers' customers) plus wasteage.
Hi,I have set up a client and added 3 contacts for the different departments I work with.
Hi,I can't seem to figure out how I should be processing refunds to Cash sale customers via our Eftpos.
Hi, I have a Prestashop 1.
Hi Community!
Hi!
Hi,My client has a shopify website selling maternity wear online.
Hi!
Hi,I am trying to manage my inventory and tax calculated on it for different customers and tax rates.
Hi - I am running the finances for my son's rugby tour to Australia later this year and was wondering whether as we are a non-profit organisation whether we can claim/refund the GST on some of our large ticket items such as tour uniforms and flights/accommodation?
Hi There, I hire out a photo booth and I'm doing a bit of re-search as to how to handle refundable security bonds.
Hi All,What advice would you have on my following scenario?
Hi there.
Hi there, We have only been trading a few months.
Hi All, First post on here, so forgive me if it is an often asked question.
HI, im a little confused so hopefully I can get some help!
Hi,Saying I am a newbie in doing my bookkeeping is an overstatement.
Hi, There are no silly questions but this may be close.
Hi,I work with the front-end operation of a small database for daily record keeping for a company.
Hi All,Has anyone seen this feature for Odoo?
hi i run a construction company and using the trial for now.
Hi all,Complete novice here, I hope you can point me in the right direction here!
Hi,Not sure if this is answered elsewhere but I couldn't find any similar thread by searching keywords.
Hi, I sell food and have to write off stock that has reached it's used by date.
Hi,We are charging an all inclusive rate of VAT on our products with VAT to be paid depending on the EU jurisdiction rate on.
Hi .
Hi everyone.
Hi!
Hi allThis is probably a common question but after searching the 'help' and the community I can't seem to find an answer that helps me.
Hi All,Sorry if this is the wrong section.
Hi everyone, my name is Michael and I am one of the co-founders of Timestamp (http://www.
Hi,I wonder if anyone can help me?
Hi, I have received a refund from the ATO on my WET and GST purchases for my stock purchases of wine.
Hi all!
Hi,I am about to open my second espresso bar.
Hi everyone.
Hi there, hoping someone could share their thoughts on this.
Hi GuysCan't figure this one out.
Hi, We have had to make a claim on insurance for replacement of damaged equipment.
Hi all!
Hi.
Hi I am in the process of creating a custom statement for sending to clients.
Hi,I sell my products with different discount rates, according to my customers.
Hi All,I invoiced a client for $660 (inc GST) which they paid in advanced and I reconciled.
Hi,We are a high volume store that processes over a hundred transactions per day.
Hi,I have had several orders for products sent to the border for free or reduced rate shipping, which I have gone to pick up and import.
Hi everyone.
Hi Folks,HMRC recently wrote to me that I had made an error with some 2011 and 2012 returns.
Hi,Hope I've posted this in the right thread.
Hi,Not sure if this is possible but thought I should ask.
Hi.
Hi everyone, I had been successfully importing QIF transactions from St George (in Australia) and suddenly started getting errors saying:"The statement was either empty, only contained $0 lines, or has already been imported. "
Hi, A couple of questions: 1.
Hi GuysI drive a 2005 BMW 745i.
Hi GuysThis is my first year of self employment (I'm in IL, USA BTW).
Hi,I've looked around the community and also asked the help centre but cant find the right answerr.
Hi ,I run a startup .
Hi, I was doing some work for a man who runs the local networking group here.
Hi Everyone,I'm interested in people's processes for purchasing.
Hi all.
Hi Y'all, Was cool to see Xerome put payroll leaver requests and so on on to a simple dedicated app.
Hi would love to have a simple task reminder function.
Hi,For example in our system we have a client group that has around 30 entities where the CFO (who is not a client) is the main contact.
Hi,I have different funds to follow and I am using the tracking category to do it.
At the moment I cannot reply to the email and all I get is this:Hi Daniel,The following message was sent regarding QU-2016-0275:----------------------------------------Sample question?
Hi,I work for contractors and we have lots of members of stafff working on a job/task at different billing rates.
Hi When working in your contacts list to create groups, Archive and merge contacts etc.
Hi,Currently there is fields for Partner and Manager.
Hi there I have an idea with the development of recurring jobs.
Hi AllMy feature request here is to do with the "All Reports" page.
Hi, will (is? )
Hi,Plaid is a newer service offered in conjunction with Stripe.
Hi.
HI MY BOSS RECENTLY ASKED ME TO GIVE HIM A LIST OF ITEMS FOR ONE PARTICULARLY CUSTOMER WITH PRICING ETC.
Hi There,Is it possible to sort employee reports by first and last name?
HI Development TeamWe have multiply Entities with different managers approving leave who have my payroll access only and do not require other access.
Hi Support,Can I create prefix of fixed asset more than one type?
Hi there,Our clients include a lot of touring musicians.
Hi There,I dont think I will be the only one wanting this feature.
Hi, you don't seem to support Coles Reloadable MasterCard debit cards.
Hi there,Yesterday I attended the Road Show in Canberra and it was really really good.
Hi.
Hi allHaving the ability to run payables / receivables reports on a particular contact group subset would be invaluable.
Hi, I've noticed that the Advisor Directory only lists Bookkeepers within a 6km radius of my address,myself and one other.
Hi There!
Hi Team, This is not a deal breaker, nor of any priority, but there are some clients, here in sunny South Africa, who would rather have different headings on their reports.
Hi,I feel more flexibility needs to be incorporated with the tracking category.
Hi,One of our clients is a development of 150 properties.
Hi.
Hi!
Hi There!
Hi,I'm pretty sure that this is not available.
Hi!
Hi XeroWhen editing reports at both template and client level, it would be great if the "Done Cancel' Button was a floating feature.
Hi there, I have it setup in my company that staff have access at the draft only level of invoicing.
Hi ThereI have had a look at the find and recode feature that you released awhile ago and while I think it is a great idea I feel that it has not lived up to the potential that it had.
Hi.
Hi, hopefully a simple request.
Hi.
Hi Guys,Hope all is well.
Hi All,It would be nice to have a way of creating Item Groups or Types which would facilitate running Inventory reports for certain type of Items, or viewing Items that are of a certain type.
Hi I'm trying to create a receipt template for sending out to our customers.
Hi there.
Hi.
Hi All.
Hi thereWe bill to multiple contacts within one organisation (this happens for many organisations that are our customers).
Hi.
Hi All, you know when we used to send statements out via post and those that were overdue had little "friendly reminder" stickers on them and we had to fold them by hand!
Hi All!
Hi I don't see the option to Move Contacts.
Hi, I have set my exchange rate at conversion date 31/03/14.
Hi,I might be lazy and maybe forgetful too.
Hi.
Hi.
Hi Guys, Have an idea for you to consider!
Hi,Does anyone know if there is a way to distable 'items' as we wont be using it?
Hi there.
Hi,The drag and drop function is a great improvement, very useful.
Hi,We currently have the situation where our client pays commissions based on the type and quantity of products sold.
Hi Team, great upgrade again.
Hi,I often receive purchase orders from Customers via email.
Hi, we are a travel agency and base our PL etc.
Hi,This is a small humble but useful request.
Hi, my client has migrated across from quickbooks.
Hi,As a gardening contractor I occasionally undertake work a day or two early if a monthly contact falls on a weekend.
Hi,I currently found out that we can't put in opening quantity for stock (as conversion quantity).
Hi TeamLets make existing transactions as simple as dropbox.
Hi,Can we have a developer and/or API discussion sub-forum here in the community board?
Hi.
Hi to you allHas anyone had any luck with getting around the lack of export to excel tab within payroll?
Hi,We have situations where all our employees are off at once i. e.  RDO's and Christmas shut down.
Hi Could we change a leave request to include different Leave Types.
Hi,Can we set up a warning when leave accruals are insufficient so leave is not paid into a minus figure.
Hi,1.
Hi, apologies if this has been bought up before.
Hi It would be great if there was a employee number identifier for each employee profile.
Hi - I have set up a number of budgets in the budget manager.
Hi Team,It has been a few days.
Hi.
Hi there,I wonder if I could remove and redo a multiple transactions I have with one contact.
Hi Could anyone tell me how I can restrict staff access to a specific client.
Hi.
Hi,Is MS Edge fully supported?
Hi Wonder if anyone can help with this.
Hi when i try to export an .
Hi,I have many transactions that have 2 tracking group assigned to.
Hi there.
Hi.
HI,Could I please put an example of what has happened to me so that I can see what I should have done / should be doing?
Hi,please help.
Hi,Apologies if this has been answered elsewhere, I did try to search for it but gave up after page 4 of +3,000 results.
Hi.
Hi everyone.
Hi, I hope someone can assist please.
Hi,Hoping someone has done this before and can help.
Hi, We regularly hire items to people for 1,2 or 3 days or a number of weeks.
Hi - simple question from a newbie.
Hi - i have been entering in expenses such as mileage and various other receipts.
Hi folks,Wondering if someone can help me with a query.
Hi all, I'm wondering if you could offer some advice on how you manage your quote approvals with customers.
Hi.
Hi - quick question for anyone else submitting their VAT returns to HMRC at the end of January.
Hi,Our company sells franchises across the world.
Hi.
Hi Team, I have a problem on USD PayPal reconciliation.
Hi.
Hi My client has matched up payments made to a supplier - but has done it wrong.
Hi!
Hi XeroI've been helping people out lately with their queries on the community page.
Hi,Our club accepts member payments which are all paid generally on the same day each month for the same amount.
Hi there.
Hi allDoes anyone know how to remove the bold highlighting that is put on to formula rows in reports?
Hi!
Hi.
Hi!
Hi,I'm having trouble joining an organisation, for which my colleague sent me an invite.
Hi there.
Hi expertsSo i am about to file my first VAT.
Hi there,I was wondering if anyone can help.
Hi,We are trying to enter 2 years worth of historical info for comparison purpose.
Hi Guys.
Hi!
Hi.
Hi,I have company income tax owed to the ATO.
Hi,I'm a sole trader and I buy and sell stuff on eBay, so I quite often pick up bits and pieces at 2nd hand shops.
Hi,We have started a cycle to work scheme and I want to make sure I am setting up correctly.
Hi,We have some question here We have input all the receipt on the expenses claim, and we do put the Company/Contact name,reference number, and date on it.
Hi AllCan someone please confirm for me.
Hi, please help !
Hi,I have a situation that I was wondering if anyone had a good solution too.
Hi All,We are service based company and organise Qualification for our clients from different colleges.
Hi guys!
Hi.
Hi all, sorry if this has been asked and answered a million times.
Hi.
Hi All, If someone could please help me that would be great.
Hi everyone.
Hi,I want to make the "Reference" field bigger.
Hi,I have a water bill and I dont know where to put it in.
Hi,Is it possible to get a repport of the items each contact havec purchased?
Hi there,Was wondering if you can help.
Hi,Im really after some help, I have spent hours upon hours and I am becoming so frustrated that I cant find answers or more so I cant fix my issue.
Hi,I have a customised layout for my profit and loss.
Hi, when we try exporting general ledger details to excel for the whole 2015 we get the following error:-------------Gateway TimeoutThe proxy server did not receive a timely response from the upstream server.
Hi I'm hoping someone can offer some advice please.
Hi, Hoping someone can help!
Hi thereI am unsure how to reconcile a transaction.
Hi ThereI am a newbie and have a question: We were claiming GST during a period we were not supoosed to be.
Hi AllWe have lots of suppliers with small foreign currency bills.
Hi,Only one or two posts on this in these forums, and no definite answers.
Hi all.
Hi,I have a couple of bills from a supplier that were due to be paid.
Hi!
Hi folks,Hoping someone can offer me some guidance.
Hi, This is probably has an easy answer but I cannot find it.
Hi all.
Hi GuysWhen I checked the Contacts Tab and choose a Supplier/Customer, scroll the screen down and in the tab Activity there is a list of things I have done with that contact (Bills, Spend Money .
Hi AllI am trying to reconcile my VAT return.
Hi!
Hi,Can i redo or delete or edit the stock adjustment once posted?
Hi,Lately, we have discovered odd or duplicate transactions popping up in our feed from Citibank.
Hi,I have noticed that a couple of logged purchases/receipts have sometimes not been allocated a job code / project code, by mistake.
Hi,My company receives a commission / affiliate bonuses from various companies we deal with.
Hi.
Hi,Has anyone experienced this?
Hi, I'm trying to find the login history for a particular user.
Hi All,Can you help me?
Hi!
Hi, hopefully I'm in the right section here ?
Hi EveryoneLooking for some help here.
HI, Community.
Hi,Total newbie here.
Hi,I have a single magneto installation and inventory running through Dear.
Hi, I love the iPhone app and find it very useful.
Hi,I have an issue I cannot work out, however suspect it is a simple solution!
Hi everybody.
HI, allI have a problem on two un-reconciled cheques.
Hi all,We have transferred all our inventory items and been using them for six months.
Hi All - I'm coming from QB where I was zeroing out owners draws by debit/credit into Retained Earnings at the year end.
Hi.
Hi,I'm having a recurring problem.
Hi-I have entered a few large bills, which as a company, we have paid in increments.
Hi,I have recently set-up eWay service to receive card payments.
Hi, this has been asked a number of different ways and I haven't found a good answer to suit my needs yet.
Hi, I added a billable expense by accident.
Hi Everyone!
hi,I thought I had this figured out but it seems I'm wrong.
Hi allI have a client who has a GST Tax rate set up, under General Settings, Tax Rates.
Hi,I have searched for how to change the date on transactions but can't find anything.
Hi I have a weird one.
Hi, I'm not using Payroll because I am the only employee, so I thought I would keep it simple.
Hi there!
Hi.
Hi.
Hi allI have a client who hires furniture out to agents for when they have home opens.
Hi.
Hi,I'd really appreciate it if someone could help.
Hi,I'm hoping someone can help me.
Hi there!
Hi,We connected our Paypal feed yesterday, and everything seemed correct.
Hi I have recently moved from MYOB.
HI AllI mustn't have my brain in gear today.
Hi there - can anyone help me?
Hi I made a prepayment of $600 to a supplier for general expenses for example.
Hi.
Hi .
Hi, I'm getting an error message.
Hi all,I seem to have a duplicate deposit in my PayPal accountI invoiced my client $407.
Hi all, Apologies if this has been asked before/is a stupid question.
Hi there,I have the following situation.
Hi,I sent this question into support a week ago, and still have not gotten a response.
Hi Guys.
Hi!
Hi All,We have been offering a range of "products" which are subscription based for a while now.
Hi AllI have a problem during reconciliation.
Hi All,The company I work for has recently set up a sister company in Lisbon and to date they have been using an accountancy firm that provides very little for their fee.
Hi, I have previously requested this.
Hi,I am trying to reconcile paypal transactions of which I have several thousand transactions.
Hi!
Hi everyone.
Hi there,Apologies if someone has asked this before - I've tried to look but cannot seem to find it!
Hi all.
'Hi Davidand Jodie'.
Hi allApologies for my lack of knowledge!
Hi, We are finding that our feed from Natwest remains a day or two behind what we can see if we actually log into Natwest Directly.
Hi, has anyone had any issue with inventory pricing mysteriously adjusting by the GST amount?
Hi all.
Hi there,I'm a freelance copywriter, and for a lot of jobs I charge by the hour (in 15-minute increments).
Hi.
Hi all.
Hi,I have sent 2 emails now with no reply to my question about partner feeds.
Hi Guys,My GST returns for the last year or so have been published and paid.
Hi,I have been searching for an answer on this great forum but can't find it :( I hope it is not covered and I have missed it!
HI folks,we have cash registers with daily till receipts.
Hi All.
Hi.
Hi there.
Hi, does anyone know how to export customer history/note to csv file with customer list?
Hi, I have a problem someone can hopefully help me with.
Hi All,The Due Date calculation seems to be lacking the ability to calculate the due date based on end of Months.
Hi there,How do I stop certain transactions adding themselves automatically to the CONTACTS.
Hi All,I have a company set up using UK GBP as the main currency and I don't have the multi-currency option unlocked.
Hi, I am trying to enter a manual journal, am having a little difficulty and was hoping someone could point me in the right direction.
Hi.
Hi there.
Hi there, apologies if this has been covered elsewhere but I can't find anything on the search results.
Hi.
Hi guys, I am trying to set my payslips up so that I can have the description as paid on a Day Rate, and then have the number of days worked in a 7 day period, with a set day rate that automatically calculates eg.
Hi All,  Hoping someone can help me.
Hi everyone,I had a staff member say she forgot her password for XeroMe so I had to delete her access to "My Payroll" and re-send the invite.
Hi there, I was wondering if there was a comprehensive guide (possibly a video tutorial) for using the My Payroll functionality.
Hi, does anyone know, if there is an option how to display middle name on payslips?
Hi there, hoping someone can help me here, I'm in a pickle for eom paydayAn employee (Jessica) has left for maternity leave on 13th April.
Hi All,I have some contractors working for me for $x.
Hi, We are a manufacturing startup in Victoria, Australia.
Hi everyone.
Hi, We run a transport/logistics company, that have various contractors (labour hire) that bring with them a truck/vehicle and sub contract to our company.
Hi everyoneI have a client who has an employee going on maternity leave.
Hi there.
Hi All,Does anyone know if you can delete a Leave Balance - We have some people that are on annual leave loading and some that are not.
Hi,We want to make some top-up super payments to our old employees who worked with us.
Hi,We have one employee who has stopped accruing leave.
Hi, I'm based from the Philippines and was hired as a Virtual Bookkeeper to an employer in Australia where I was assigned to manage the payroll of his employee.
Hi,I'm working through a client's payroll and they informed me that some of their staff have taken unpaid leave in the fortnight, which is fine and entered as normal.
Hi Everyone,I have a client who had payroll set up since before I started with them.
Hi,I have 2 employees who have left and returned to our empoyment.
Hi forumNewbie here.
Hi AllI was wondering if anyone has setup Workers Compensation payments in Payroll Settings.
Hi,It seemed a simple question, how many ordinary and overtime hours were worked last month.
Hi,I have an employee whose Annual Leave was entered incorrectly and there has been an over calculation.
Hi,I'm a little confused with adding timesheets.
Hi there.
Hi.
HI everyoneI know this has been asked a few times, but 477 vs 804. .
Hi there,As the subject title states, we have recently changed from weekly payroll to monthly.
Hi All !
Hi.
Hi, I may sound stupid asking this question in the forum.
Hi,We have a client who has included long service leave (COINVEST) as an allowance then removed it as a deduction on each payslip.
Hi there.
Hi,I have an employee who has been with us for nearly 3 years now.
Hi.
Hi,I have an employee who has been taking unpaid leave instead of annual leave.
HI I'm trying to set up various employees in the "Employment" tab.
Hi Guys,I have had this problem off & on for a couple of weeks now.
Hi group members,I have come cross a problem that annual leave and personal leave don't accrue automatically as they used to do.
Hi XeroI have been paying myself random amounts, as needed.
Hi all, I have an apprentice  who has gone from 3rd yr to 4th yr at 1st jan.
Hi,One of our employees for some reason when she submits her timesheet it auto approves.
Hi everyone!
Hi.
Hi everyoneI have a query with relating to Payroll.
Hi All,So I have a client who is employing his teenage son.
Hi EveryoneOne of my staff has gone for Jury duty.
Hi,Please can someone help!
Hi,We are trying to understand leave status.
Hi,There's an employee in Victoria that took leave over the Grand Final Friday weekend.
Hi,I have an employee who has already been paid for August and has taken annual leave today (31st).
Hi, we have the following error and cant seem to find a fix for this.
Hi there!
Hi Guys,I am a self taught book keeper.
Hi, the organisations physical address is generating on our payslips, we want the postal address to appear, is there a way to make this happen?
Hi thereI have a terminated employee that still shows on my current employee list.
Hi,Does anyone know of a way to separate out different wage categories in payroll and, subsequently, P&L.
Hi, I wonder if someone can help me.
Hi.
Hi all I have a client who's employee has bought a laptop and has salary sacrificed it.
Hi.
Hi,I can see similar discussion but not quite what I was looking for.
Hi.
Hi,  Last week when we did wages, we did a multiple transfer.
Hi,Our normal work week runs Tuesday to Saturday.
Hi,Why is it the only leave I can approve is Parental Leave, I'm only given those four options to approve.
Hi there,I've successfully been doing payroll for a couple of months, but in December I have a strange occurrence.
Hi, I have AL & Sick Leave ticked to be displayed on payslips but when I view the payslips, only RDO's accrued are displayed.
Hi, I have an employee who is on a fixed monthly salary rate, which I have set up and works fine.
Hi,I have done the invites, the users accept them , but they can't see my payroll.
Hi there,We have some staff paid monthly and one staff member in particular has a few leave requests throughout the month.
Hi Everyone.
HI I have done my first Payrun.
Hi,I have been trying to update the current SPIN in the superannuation funds to be a USI.
Hi there,I've been trying to set up a travel allowance for my employees.
Hi all.
Hi,Can anyone help me with Annual Leave loading 17.
Hi,looking for advice on Australian State Payroll Tax.
Hi ,Has anyone come up with a good process for dealing with payroll tax that they are happy to share?
Hi allAfter some help.
Hi everyone.
Hi,We have a question and looking for a solution to this potential problem.
Hi there.
Hi All,I'm having a bit of an anomaly occur on my work PC in Chrome and Firefox where the Employees Screen is blank and the buttons non-functional.
Hi ThereCould someone please help me with entering correct timesheet dates?
Hi there.
Hi,My husband has a Florida S corp (And I deal with his bookkeeping.
Hi.
Hi,The NY Department of Labor requires office workers to be paid at least bi-monthly (and for some categories of workers to be paid more often than fortnightly) - see https://www.
Hi ThereI own and operation an Australian Company working in the wine industry.
Hi, I am looking at issuing P60s to employees Our employees are signed up to My Payroll to see their payslips.
Hi,I am trying to run April's payroll.
Hi thereMy client registered as an employer from 1st October 2016, the date he incorporated and the start of his financial year.
Hi!
Hi there I am trying to set up my GP practice on payroll and I am having issues with the NHS pension scheme.
Hi all, I think this has come up before, but can't find a recent thread on it.
Hi, I have a limited company, with myself as the only contractor.
Hi, I have an employee who is terminating her employment with us this week.
Hi,My apologies if this question already exists.
Hi,I've set up a monthly calendar.
Hi We are unable to send payslips to our employees.
Hi!
Hi I have processed an employees leaving date as 21st rather than 31st.
Hi,We have a mix of PAYE, UK subcontractors and foreign subcontractors.
Hi all,We've been late in setting up payrole.
Hi.
Hi Everyone.
Hi There - I scheduled an EPs on Monday.
Hi, I've had by RTI filing rejected by HMRC.
Hi, We have a student who worked for us last summer while home from University.
Hi.
Hi,A client needs to make deduction for staff loans.
Hi I have had issues with an former employees p45 as he did not appear in the FPS as a leaver after it had been processed.
Hi All.
Hi I'm currently setting up payroll with salary sacrifice for a stakeholder pension.
Hi,My RTI Submission is showing as pending.
Hi,We have had our employee since July 2015 - in Dec 2015 we gave him annual leave (we were not  told that he wasn't entitled to annual leave) he received 92 hours of annual leave.
Hi,I have an employee who's start date was 8th September 2014.
Hi, Our employees are on permanent variable hour contracts with 35 hours.
Hi,I am doing my first IRD monthly schedules.
Hi AllLeave has been set up incorrectlySick leave was given the schedule of annuallyAnnual leave was given the schedule of annually after 6 months.
Hi One of our employees has started and finished in the same week.
Hi all,I am doing the 2nd week of payroll.
Hi Everyone,I looked around the forum and didn't see anything on this (surprisingly!
Hi AllI work for a small charity and we hire out a couple of meeting rooms here at our offices and we currently manage the bookings via outlook and spreadsheets.
Hi, We are currently using WooCommerce as our Ecommerce website platform, however our developer has suggested that we switch to a different provider.
Hi,I run a staff temping agency and hire out my staff to other businesses.
Hi,I'm looking for an app for managing large numbers of inventory items but unsure as to which app would meet this requirementWe sell from a catalog of some 8000 items, most of which will never be sold and maybe 1000 other items  I'm looking for an app to manage bulk import items from csv, and the ability to delete items not sold for a specific period of timeDoes anyone have any suggestions?
Hi there!
Hi.
Hi,Since late November this year, I have experience difficulty importing paypal's CSV file.
Hi.
Hi,My client does quarterly services on septic tanks.
Hi there,I have a firewood buiness.
Hi everyone!
Hi.
Hi there.
Hi,I have a client in the fuel distribution industry.
Hi all,  Simple question .
Hi there,One of my clients buys and sells second hand cars and has always manually recorded this in a little duplex book.
Hi.
Hi,I’m an Amazon & Ebay seller.
Hi there,I run an entertainment company.
Hi,I have a client who needs a system to help her cost the homemade beauty products she makes.
Hi everyone,According to the local Canadian rules, the dates must be showed on cheques body in a NUMERIC format.
Hi, My names Brett.
Hi all,I realise that there are a number of apps out there that will record your receipts and track your expenses, however none of these seem to have a 'person breakdown', ie - the person that actually purchased the item.
Hi there.
Hi all,I've a potential client who is in the manufacturing industry.
Hi,1.
Hi everybody (reading this!
Hi guys,Searched everywhere, but still can find an answer for this.
Hi.
Hi,Does anyone know how to input returned stock in Vend.
Hi Everyone.
Hi everyone,I'm currently working with a Not for Profit that uses MYOB Accountright Standard and uses MYOB retailer for their inventory.
Hi there.
Hi There.
Hi,I have 4 houses with a total of 25 tennants all individually renting rooms in the 4 rooming houses.
HI people.
Hi Guys,I have 35 catagories of products each with appro 250 items per catagory.
Hi guys,First of all, love the system - it has revolutionized my accounting, keep it up!
Hi All,One of my customers has a webstore using the above integration.
Hi there,Can anyone recommend a Forecasting Tool that will enable me to produce not only Cash Flow but P&L and Balance Sheet too (UK format).
Hi,I'm playing around with TradeGecko and was wondering if anyone else has or is currently using it.
Hi allWe have 2 websites shop in Great Britain using the OSCommerce system .
Hi all.
Hi Y'all!
Hi Guys!
Hi, I have a client that is a grain trader and needs to track loads, deliveries, levies etc.
Hi,I have a client who uses worldpay to collect credit card payments and EaziPay to collect BACS payments from their customers.
Hi TeamCould anybody suggest an efficient document management system for my practice & other clients.
Hi everyone.
Hi I was wondering if anyone has made the move from Iris Practice Management to Workflow Max.
com> wrote: Hi Oren The Product Team is still working on this.
Hi, How do I receive inventory that has been returned back to me to which I am crediting the customer for?
Hi,Previously you could drill down to the individual supplier's details from the Aged Payables Summary.
hi Brittany.
Hi, my problem was not resolved for 3 weeks now and I every week now customer support officer starts with the same questions.
Hi guys,When I enter expense claims I have worked up a procedure to minimise errors:1.
Hi,How does one lodge a complaint?
Hi,For the last two days, I have been trying to print a pdf of my quotes.
Hi.
Hi you have been spammer a lot lately maybe you should consider captha when posting.
Hi there!
Hi everyoneI have a client that spend circa 400k with my company.
##### CLUSTER 4 #####
xero.
com) on the My Xero Dashboard.
I'm so frustrated because I cannot import my contacts out of my old system into Xero and I don't know how to fix the information so it is successfully imported.
I have a US client wanting to convert desktop MYOB to Xero, can anyone point me to a solution or discussion of doing this conversion?
HiI was wondering if Xero allows you to control what can be included and excluded from the payslips?
As Xero have no intention of adding bitcoin support, I'm interested to hear about workarounds anyone in the community is using.
How about Xero marketing itself to "Joe & Jane Public" in order keep track of household expenditure?
I am wondering if anyone has come across some sort of software or app that is compatible with Xero, which could help speed up this process?
I'm having problems understanding the Xero Help pages on this.
My Xero knowledge is not advanced.
I understand that using Xero you should file each BAS once you've finalised it for a period.
I've got a rather unique situation and I'm unsure how to handle it in Xero.
xero.
I'm trying to get xero to calculate PAYGW correctly from payroll.
I test the tax calculated in xero against ATO calculator, and xero is incorrectly including the ML.
My first page summary looks as follows:Opening Balance+ Charges- Payments and Credits= Balance DueNow Xero provides fields for Opening Balance and Balance Due amounts, but not for total debits or credits, meaning there's no easy way to show these totals on my statement.
I had Workflow prior to trying Xero.
I have paid three people and this went in one batch on Xero.
Hello All,I would to know about how xero processing on run depreciation and setting of depreciation  rate?
It is a common requirement to import line items etc into software such as XERO  and,  for instance, CSV import works fine with XERO .
I find myself looking at a potential scenario of having to retrieve Prices from Xero in order to re-enter them in CSV files.
I asked an accountant who told me to simply put it on my VAT return,but he had no idea how to convince Xero to do that and I think it's not allowable that way, or is it?
xero.
xero.
I have set up the USD currency in Xero.
Not a Xero user.
One of the big, big advantages of migrating to a cloud-based solution such as Xero is that it would allow me to access and work with accounting data from home on evenings and weekends. )
HelloI used the tracking facility to create various departments in Xero.
The GST return was generated in Xero, so I'm assuming it would register as not being paid.
I have recorded all transactions back to August 2016 in Xero yet my first return period is December 2016 - January 2017, and second period Feb - March.
I currently have Square and Xero linked up.
I've not linked Paypal into Xero either, as it would become far too complicated of a feed.
xero.
It seems that Xero does not balance to itself.
Going into Xero from QBs.
however Xero does allow making a manual journal entry into cash.
Now I have to reconcile the payments and refunds in Xero.
How would I go about adding this to Xero as something that is recurring each month?
Any help would be appreciated as I want to chuck the computer and Xero out of the window right now - I have about 20 productions worth of receipts to deal with.
Dear Xero community,I'm currently looking into invoicing one of our clients with (direct) expenses for services we paid for on behalf of them over the last year.
They all come through to Xero as seperate feeds.
xero.
I've discovered that "trial and error" is not a very good strategy with Xero because it doesn't seem to be very flexible in allowing you to tidy up errors.
Hello there, I have started using Xero for our e-commerce start-up properly last month and am in love with the many features it provides!
Dear Xero CommunityJust had a question in regards to using Xero,We have a relationship with one of our suppliers where we purchase from them and in turn we supply them goods.
At the end of the day, the summary gets sent to Xero.
How do we send it to Xero?
Is there a way I can track when these sessions are used and how many are remaining with Xero?
Is there a way to automatically link that these are 0% in Xero?
)So I contact XERO, they adviced me everything that have been said in the past( I have been through that 3 times.
or I am asking Xero to fix their bug?
What we asking an accounting software is RELIABLE, Xero can't offer that?
I have 3 companies with Xero.
In Xero, this traansaction is only represented with a single line.
Question to anyone using Squareup or to the Xero team.
I understand "tracking" in Xero and think that would work if I set up a category for (1) and (2).
xero.
I had man aged to get all of mh previous transactions into Xero and everything was balances according to my calculations.
com and move over to Xero.
What are some methods of confirming that all Xero transactions have a receipt or bill attached?
I think they came in during my conversion from QB to Xero.
In Xero, I see the opening balance as unreconciled.
I have been told that in Xero they should be going down as capital and not an expense?
I've done my PAYE reconciling and worked through the list of check points in the Xero article.
Is that the sensible way of using xero (and it's links to Active Campaign too)2.
I have changed my current FY in Xero to be 30/4 from previous 31/1.
Good morning,We had another system and we opted for XERO.
I think everyone that uses Xero needs to know about this issue.
There are only 3 banks that Xero talks to directly.
Xero doesn't post all of the banks on their site who's feeds are not working, because its probably a massive number.
In my case you get double trapped, because if you want to leave Xero none of the files i. e. .
Xero team, any chance of this being automatically downloaded directly from the ATO?
Next to each item I choose Create, I type in the 'WHO' and the 'WHAT' and then i click OK. Now, the Balance in Xero says 0, the statement balance say (1600).
On top of that we sell a small number of course ralated items to students for which Xero's inventory is perfect.
I've contacted Xero Support but they advise they are unable to help.
I feel as if I'm not getting off to a great start with Xero!
Xero Support simply advise that they cannot provide accounting advice!
I have tried looking everywhere for the answer in xero help as well as trying to look up youtube videos.
Our PO are been pushed from TradeGecko to Xero.
We have recently switched from Quickbooks to Xero.
We started with Xero in March 2016, and after seeing the conversion balance message for months, I decided to give it a try with a date of March 1.
xero.
We have raised this with xero and it has been recognised as something that needs to be looked into and fixed but with no estimated timeframe.
Users of the uncoded lines reports should be aware of this - and if XERO can give us all an indication of a resolution it would be great.
We have raised this with xero support, and their advice to clear cookies and the cache makes no difference.
However, after doing this I noticed I was incorrect and that the way it was originally reconciled on Xero was the way it should have been reconciled.
Our Xero certified consultant set up our system.
Unfortunately, Xero doesn’t have the feature to set up repeating payments to be matched with the annual bill for insurance.
Sadly after the weekend so called upgrade by NZ IRD, also known as an alternate fact, Xero's Workflow software no longer receives the assessment data from NZ IRD.
I wanted to start using the Fixed Assets functionality from Xero this year, so following the instructions from the guide, I have set up the Depreciation Start Date for my fixed assets to 01.
I have an ongoing issue with PayPal and Xero.
54The issue is that Xero records this as:https://www.
They are entered on Xero as a supplier with 0% VAT and paid accordingly.
My accountant is not XERO savvy and has been involved in this process.
So how should I enter and reconcile this information in Xero?
I'm a bit confused with how to handle this in Xero.
However, when I hit "Save" Xero produces an error message: "Sorry!
PS I have contacted Xero over 1 year ago and still no resolution on this matter.
Xero told me that currently Xero isn't possible to set a start and end date for a contact.
I'm carrying out work for a customer who has several companies all running through Xero.
I've been trying out Xero and I've been spending upwards of 10 hours per day so far and I've gotten pretty much nowhere.
It's as if Xero was designed for the get go to absolutely HATE property managers.
When I'm inputting my Bills in XERO I have the option to select No Tax or 20%VAT.
84    should i subscribe to Xero payroll?
59 Xero thinks I'm still to receive.
However, I have noticed that there does not appear to be a way of adjusting the VAT amount for a receipt (although this can be done elsewhere in Xero).
Appreciate some help clarifying how Xero is calculating this.
I'm noticing that Xero doesn't track purchases made with my PayPal balance.
They deduction $1000 for a slotting fee and $1000 for damaged packaging so the net of the check is $3000How do I record that in Xero?
Would it be worth using Xero's inventory feature for this, perhaps untracked - we buy but don't sell stock so may have to alter the records manually.
Hello allPlease forgive a Xero newbie for asking a silly question but I have one!
She uses Xero and has now "enrolled" me as an Adviser.
HiI recently started using Xero, and I'm having some issues with the reconciling.
I recently converted a file from Sage to Xero and used both of them for a two month period to ensure continuity.
Good Afternoon Xero community!
xero.
The paypal setup still matches that of the help files with the API Xero address being correct with the right permissions.
Xero will only let me me run a deprecation from a fixed start date of 1 July 2015 to a maximum date of 30 June 2015, but as there are no assets it returns a message "there are no depreciable assets in this range.
xero.
Although I submit our VAT return to HMRC directly, I have used the Xero VAT return to help me get figures together and published it so I can move on to the next quarter.
The VAT return on Xero shows that we owe the retail Vat figure of &#163;4891.
It would be great to hear from a XERO Tax practitioner who prepares and lodges trustee returns (specifically where they are distributing to a minor).
In XERO, is creating a credit note the only way to make this adjustment?
Hello, I am looking for a a consultant to help a client using Xero and Dear.
The client converted from MYOB to Xero/Dear and is having problems using the file and basically needing some training.
HiI have a client who currently is running 5 companies through Xero.
Also note the word 'deductible' is currently spelt incorrectly on Xero's GST Calc W'sheet!
Others I am paying off against bills, ie Xero subscription bill.
Xero generates 3 POs.
Example:Total bill was USD 213Entered prior to conversion to XERO as AUD 280.
On Sage I would have manually adjusted the VAT Return, but this isn't possible on Xero .
A client's data was converted from Sage ad imported into Xero.
How do I get Xero to post all VAT to the VAT liability nominal?
Good Morning,I recently migrated to Xero and imported all of our transactions beginning on 1/01/2016.
xero.
I have the highest level of control in Xero so I can process a Manual Journal.
I have been approached by client interested in using Xero for its Hong Kong and Swiss registered companies.
Would Xero be suitable?
I find Xero impossible when it comes to getting an answer!
Xero has "Less Operating Expenses" by default as a subheading, can I change this to "Less Expenses" ?
We have some unreconciled credit card lines dating back May and June  sitting on the Xero.
Xero Support can't seem to give me a response to this and suggested that I refer to the Tax Accountant for advice.
Does anyone know how to get Xero to net out the following lines into a single, net "Retained Earnings" line?
I am currently stuck with trying to reconcile a credit card batch brought into Xero.
I have recently been told about Xero HQ, from what i have been told this is more of an integrated practice management suite and will pull data from Xero client manager?
Is there a way to post manual depreciation in Xero and assign this to the fixed asset register - I could post a journal put this would then put the register and general ledger out of balance.
Only current and future depreciation expenses should be affected, but Xero is rolling back depreciation to the date of calculation and re-calculating.
HiHas anyone transferred the general ledger from Xero to APS.
Now, all of this seems super standard stuff, but i'm at a loss as to how to note it all in Xero.
it would be great if xero had an ap for employees to log into for timesheets etc.
Wow reconciling refunds in Xero is pretty darn difficult, spent hours googling and reading the guides still can't work it out.
Changed the year end on Xero and we could still run the depreciation.
I assume there are many Xero users who have residential investment properties and I wonder how they have handled these input taxed capital purchases.
I am currently setting up Xero ledgers for clients manually, but will have Xero hopefully set them up in bulk when i get a handle on the process, and then we are dumping a trial balance from MAS into a spreadsheet and manipulating the data so that it can be imported into Xero.
When I register the asset I input purchase price and any opening balance accumulated depreciation before Xero start date.
However his VAT return was is ending April and filed on HMRC direct so how do I process Aprils VAT return on Xero to then start the return and liability from May?
Xero's non-profit discount is 25% off the full $50 price, making it $37.
I know I can file it manually but can I get assurances that the one I tried to send through Xero won't create a duplicate?
Does xero has this option ?
Big construction companies hold this ledger, and I will be surprised if Xero doesn't have it.
I have also emailed Xero Support but knowing how they operate, I am not expecting a reply for a while!
What we found going through the transactions was sometimes transactions were reported on the day after in Xero.
It's really frustrating when I have to prepare reports to our board and I can't trust the cash figures in Xero due to Paypal.
In relation to the advertising funds and how it should be treated on Xero, we beleive that this is what we should do:1.
We have built an App that integrates with Xero and our Online inventory and orders management platform (www.
I've cut my first purchase order in Xero and it's in "awaiting approval" state.
Does anybody know if Xero can facilitate this, as my searches have not uncovered anything as yet.
Hello,Loving Xero so far, but there's something i'm trying to figure out and I think i'm missing something obvious.
I'm trying to work out the best way of recording this on Xero.
How does Xero inventory handle this scenario?
Xero doesn't.
The closest I could see was Workflow Max which would allow profitability to be recorded by job, however I couldn't see how it would integrate with Xero to handle the stock control aspect.
Is there a concept of estimates and opportunities against actuals in Xero?
Hey guys,Started using Xero and going to be making my first purchase order for printing services for my customer.
Is anyone else accounting for the forward purchase of Foreign Currencies in Xero?
The client uses Xero well and is very happy with it.
Hello fellow Xero users,I have been using Xero for a little over an year now.
Hello,I have a situation using Xero.
Actually we started using Xero from January 2016 and now we have some return of products that were purchased or sell in 2015.
I'm not entering my purchase orders or bills into Xero.
What ist he best way to switch over an Irish client currently using sage into Xero?
I  am looking to setup Xero for an Not for profit that makes loans to people Interest Free that are repaid weekly.
Would Xero handle this ?
Hello,I am looking for a US-based bookkeeper with Xero experience.
I couldn't find the place to do this for Xero.
Hello Xero community!
Is there a way to file that "properly" in Xero as a single return?
Timely has integration with Xero.
I've looked at exporting reports into excel and setting up my own database (Seems ridiculous since we are using xero--but it doesn't "quite" do this for us).
Setting up Xero for a Law Firm.
Hello Xero Expert.
I cant locate the option in Xero where is that setting, please help.
The second issue is that Xero only allows us to enter up to 9 decimal points (.
Hello, hope someone can help :-)I had some training from a great Xero lady who told me about rules.
One idea I have is to compute the exchange rate based on all the collected transactions, tell xero that rate (first subscribing to the multi-currency plan!
Xero excludes ALL credit card transactions and PayPal transactions.
One of the things that appealed to me the most about Xero is the integrated quote and invoicing functionality.
This is a costly issue and an embarrassing one and needs to be looked at by XERO as a matter of priority if they take their quotation functionality seriously.
As a plus it would be nice if Xero could help me track which ones have and haven't been received.
I'm not sure if I'm misunderstanding something but it seems wrong to me how Xero deals with this.
I'm setting up Xero from my previous accounting system.
I have entered all of the beginning balances from my previous accounting system including AR into the xero conversion table.
I sell coffee using Squarespace (that's why I'm using Xero)Xero's inventory seems to require entering ONE product in ONE size.
I set up Xero recently and connected Stripe.
I emailed Xero Support but still waiting for the reply.
I am setting up a Xero system as from 1.
xero.
Are there any other owners of a weekly (or even a daily) newspaper out there who are using Xero accounting software?
My point is, even if you didn't have the last few months fully reconciled why would there be any problem doing it after importing into Xero?
I keep reading accountants and have also seen some sites talking about "cleaning up your data for import into Xero".
Xero instructions point to Settings >>> General Settings >>> Features >>> Fixed Assets.
xero.
xero.
xero.
xero.
HiWe are converting two small companies from Quickbooks to Xero.
Unfortunately (unless I missed it) Xero doesn't have a way to mark the "status" of an order.
I'm trying to get myself set up and reconciled on Xero, and one of the things I did on another system was run payroll.
Until now the warehouse has been treated as a cost centre in Xero and we have accurate monthly reporting.
We have a current asset listing for bad debt provision, created automatically when we started Xero about 18 months ago.
However, Xero doesn't work similarly to QB, where you can download a copy of the database and store.
I have two companies both running xero.
Xero is incapable of correctly reporting the VAT in your VAT return.
)I have only had Xero since late 16 Oct 2015, and no doubt there will be tweeks needed.
How this money TRF process can be captured into xero?
I'm having difficulty in understanding how to record in Xero that I have taken up these unfiled amounts.
Follow up question would be if determining the MACRS depreciation values is even possible in Xero.
I cannot understand why Xero would retrospectively change the exchange rate it used on 31st March 2015.
Firstly, I don't know how to enter in samples and errors into Workflowmax and Xero.
So I still don't know much how Xero works.
Cash                                                                        8Does any one know how to adjust the Xero auto recorded journal to make it correct?
or could provide me the contact details for Xero?
I would be interested to hear what people think would be a neat way of recording and reporting this in Xero.
Our Xero file has been running as a Sole Trader.
I have asked Xero support but haven't had a clear answer - hopefully someone will have an answer!
I did search the relevant information on google and xero but i cant find out the answer, hope anyone here can help me out this problem.
xero.
I have somehow managed to enter a sale into XERO but with the wrong GST (Tax Rate).
Hey, Still learning Xero but picking it up pretty quickly.
Still learning Xero.
I see that Xero calls it a credit note (which I think is a good idea for the avg.
I entered these on both Sage, and Xero.
Hello Xero Community, I'm hoping you can help me out.
We input it in the currencies correctly to override Xero's automatic pickup from XE.
Tiered PricingIf the above features could be implemented into Xero soon that would be so helpful for our clients who have been asking about these features.
The answer on Xero doesn't really explain it for my situation.
Still learning about accounting best practices, and something doesn't seem right with what I'm doing, because Xero kind of makes it hard to do it.
We have developed THE solution for Quickbooks to Xero conversion.
I've looked at some videos and seem to be processing the basic transactions ok but I am absolute novice on Xero.
I totally love xero, but their paypal issues is a nightmare, however having said that I don't know of any other software that works with paypal quite as well, so i guess we're going to have to wait on Xero working something out.
xero.
We would keep paper/spreadsheet records for the first quarter and then switch over to Xero for the remainder.
also, will there be an entry generated automatically by Xero (ie there will be a 'match' in the reconciliation screen) or do I create the entry?
I have asked Xero support but as yet had no reply.
I am wondering if I can get the same/similar functionality from Xero that we currently have.
Currently Xero see's me buy 50 items (at 17m2 each) and sell 850 items (at 1m2 each).
I can't see this very useful audit function on XERO and wondered how others dealt with this.
I work with an accounting firm and our client is changing to Xero.
and I wanted to go through the certification program so I understood Xero better.
We are currently experiencing difficulties with our PayPal Acct (Not Xero related issues).
xero.
com/uk/InvestmentProperty) in Xero, and cannot understand what it is trying to say.
Been wrestling with the concepts of accounting and xero for several days, and finally at my breaking point lol.
When I click approve, Xero is giving me an error message saying: "Asset Number must be unique".
It lets me do this however, it goes straight to "Done" and I cannot find the receipts when I look in Xero on my computer?
We have completed conversion file from MYOB to Xero and all looks good.
I'm not sure how to track this in Xero.
Hello Xero community.
Also, can Xero email me in the morning if there are bills that are due to be paid today?
We are downloading the transactions and have a CSV spreadsheet to import into Xero after cleaning up the data.
How to I reconcile this in Xero?
When we moved from VT+ to Xero (wish I'd done it years ago! )
So today I'm trying to link a Paypal to Xero, and following the steps all the way through, I run into a wall, where there is the part telling you to click "My Selling Tools" No such link exists.
Any ideas, I have double checked and the entries have been posted in xero and are showing u reconciled.
Then in expense claims in Xero, i have a list of claims to approve.
Does Xero handle such a change?
I'm selling on shopify using shopify payments and Carry The One to integrate with Xero.
I have recently converted over to Xero from MYOB in the middle of a BAS period.
I am currently evaluating Xero, and am comparing it with personal products such as Pocketbook and Pocketsmith.
Is there a way I can do it without upgrading my Xero subscription to enable multiple currencies?
because that kind of ruins this whole automated Xero software.
Xero states: "If you haven't already enabled the Mark as Reconciled button, go to Help > Enable Mark as Reconciled. "
There are MANY very frustrating parts to Xero for accountants.
Xero allowed me to enter a purchase in a locked accounting period, should this happen as it effects P&L on a close period
06Ive been researching on how to split the payments and tried a few things in XERO to get this done, but failed.
So my employee did the conversion balances for our first conversion from MYOB to Xero.
So Xero does a great job at keeping track of incoming and outgoing.
My question is, can Xero support this uploading / downloading of information?
xero.
xero.
In my emails I have repeatedly requested information from Xero Customer Care on how to escalate this issue and a timeframe for correction.
I have had a client enter transactions (unpaid) under spend money instead of under entering the Bills into Xero.
So, the loan balance in Xero is off from the actual balance with the creditor.
I withdrew $200 from checking to put it into the physical cash drawer in Xero.
Hello everyone,I am transferring an existing company to Xero.
We jsut converted to Xero last month.
We have decided to utilize Checkfront with the Xero integration.
User will integrate Xero by OAuth authentication for their public applications.
My issue is how can i authenticate and call Xero API from background service.
I have been using Xero for only a few weeks.
I've started using Xero to manage my books starting January 01.
I want to know how to record this in Xero.
So far, I've done absolutely nothing to record the refund in Xero.
However my balance date for Year end is 31st Oct. Xero seems to think that mean I can only have a GST filing period of 1 Nov to 31st Dec - how can I change it to allow me to do GST out of sync with the Balance date?
I know standard advice is to go to an accountant (and that Chattel might not have been best financing) however I am behind on lodging and have managed to get this far after much investigation into both accounting for the Chattel Mortgage and Fringe Benefits Tax implications, and would be very grateful for any feedback, advice or help from professionals in the Xero community (especially on FBT!
We're attempting to move from our current accounting software, 'Big Red Cloud', to Xero.
xero.
country=int&service=accountant&region=IDIs there other feature in Xero so that the user / client can find our name based on their country?
Hello,Still getting to grips with Xero.
I am so frustrated with Xero unstable data management.
Xero allows the contractor to edit ONLY their financial detailsQuickbooks has a similar feature as I understand it.
Does Xero have this ability?
At this point the Live Feed feature in Xero stopped working.
My question is, does Xero currently support accessing feeds from within HSBC Internet Banking and if so how?
I'd much rather stay with Xero.
Having said that,  I could not do it in Xero, as by manual journal the asset will not go to the fixed asset register.
My understanding is Xero automatically calculated RE at the end of the year.
Will Xero help me with this?
My Xero reconciliation is way out!
The alternative it is to key in the purchase as standard rated item but NIL value the VAT - can you do this on XERO?
Hello Xero Community!
We are doing a transaction in Canadian dollars, but all of our accounting (as far as Xero is concerned) is strictly US dollars.
We end up with fractional unit pricing but Xero is calculating line amounts and totals with inconsistent rounding rules.
If we enter four Qty 1 lines (which we would normally do to record VINs on each Description line), Xero rounds up each line in the Amount column ($41,028.
jpgIf we enter a single line and specify Qty 4, it appears Xero performs the multiplication without rounding up, and both the Amount and Total values are correct ($164,114.
In Xero I have 2 transactions, one that pays off the loan and the other reapplying a larger amount.
This has only become an issue when Xero changed the search facility to being more intuitive.
I'm trying to get Xero up and running and I am running in to an issue.
xero.
I have tried loging in and out of Xero, but this has had no effect.
Im looking for advice on how best to make the change from 1 location to multiple in Xero.
Anyway, Xero had a pop up giving me the option to reactivate the feeds.
Now I have duplicates in Xero for the 9th, which I have already reconciled.
I have no idea how to treat this in Xero - I can see the amount of $500 needs to be reconciled against something, but if the employee enters the receipts under Expense Claims, there will be an amount of $150 left outstanding.
I recently converted from QB's to Xero.
The Xero Guide is super helpful and detailed, but I still am unable to fix the issue.
HiMy credit card number has changed and wondered how I go about updating it in Xero.
Our Xero looks totally weird and it seems what we can access is not an admin access rather a very limited access.
Stitch Labs also has eBay/Xero/Woo (woo soon) compatibility so we thought that would be a great way to keep inventory levels accurate across the board.
xero.
in/ - Xero can be integrated with that by using app and that name is "CarryTheOne" and there is free trail of this and after that charges for this app is $31.
My accountant is logging into Xero and then prints out my bills; yeah, the old fashioned way.
Where can I order paper printable checks that are used specifically for Xero?
So we are still lodging through Sage Handisoft until Xero releases the full tax suite.
When I sync Invitbox with Xero, this remittance information is not transferred, because Xero does not support it.
Newbie Xero person here.
But Xero shares  the sequence numbering.
00is not a useful formatMuch better is "Supplier Name", "Reference","Date", "Due Date", "Amount"Xero,01/07/2014,30/07/2014,10,000.
I have been using Xero for several years now and I love it!
Everything in Xero appears to be setup correctly (ie the VAT rates within the COA etc).
I refunded the customer and a credit note was automatically created for me in Xero by my inventory system.
Any thoughts on the process, within Xero, for changing a balance date for a company already using Xero - where current financial year end is set for Dec 14 and been trading for 5 months now wanting to change their balance date to 31 March?
I'm looking to set up a basketball club on Xero.
- Thirdly I see that there is a tracking feature available in Xero.
Also if you have successfully set up a sports club on Xero and have some advice to share please let me know as it would be much appreciated.
Morning,  I am changing over from MYOB to Xero.
My American Express card with whatever the balance owed was on Dec 31 2013, entered into the credit column (I started using Xero Jan 1 this year).
However, my accountant (who is not very familiar with Xero) said that he would have thought that option 1 would have been better.
14, so have been happily using Xero for the past 15 months.
20and, of course, Xero calculates the total as 109.
I am having an issue with Xero’s frustrating .
There is a useful Xero guide here.
xero.
my balance on statement and balance on xero doesn't match?
I calculate the amount outside of Xero, but wondering .
Was curious to see how others are handling it in Xero?
Possible to do in Xero?
Xero customer care could not help me there.
I have a prospect that wants to get started with xero to manage the books.
Hey guys, we are a group of engineers who are looking to build apps for the Xero community.
I expect Xero to ultimately take the closing balance in foreign currency at end Dec and revalue based on December's closing rate, then post an unrealised gain/loss by comparing with the GBP value held on xero of transactions making up the balance.
How can I quickly see how Xero has derived this huge loss?
I read everything I could online both from Xero's help docs and other websites.
I’m currently testing out Xero as a replacement for the desktop version of Quicbooks Pro.
I am looking at Xero as a possible replacement for Iris Exchequer.
I am not an accountant, and I get confused over the advice given in Xero help guides on accounting for shareholder dividends.
After working for about two years with Xero there are some banks that connect well and hassle free and there are some that don't.
I'm keen to migrate my accounting service from MYOB to Xero but want to keep MYOB Payroll for now.
xero.
I let my books go for a number of months and I've got to start lodging overdue BAS's so I jumped back into Xero and started reconciling.
I raised the problem with Xero support - who advised me to check with St George.
Ive checked with St George and they blame Xero.
Unhelpful response from Xero.
I have found no references to this term anywhere but on Xero.
Xero gives me this:Before tax: 5.
Is there a way of exporting this data out of Xero?
Xero for Dummies is an excellent resource and well written.
One month into using Xero.
One of the reasons we've chosen Xero is that we work as a remote team.
I have a client who is preparing to move to Xero and there are a few queries on supplier payments which I would appreciate clarification on.
Xero rocks btw
I have a Cafe and we have converted to Xero as of July 1.
I now realize that with items that I cannot claim VAT back on I shouldn't record the VAT on that item in Xero because it will put it in the VAT return.
I'm trying to figure out the best way to record this in Xero.
We have two companies in the UK in two different sectors/industries, we have now setup both companies setup on Xero.
We are looking for an accountant that supports xero and understands the system to take on both clients as our accountant.
Defeats the purpose of having a reporting function in Xero if not possible.
1st question- I am importing several years of my bak trasactions into xero from excel.
Experience of Xero would be ideal but we could give remote training.
Experience of Xero would be ideal but we could give remote training.
Would I be correct in assuming that Xero is listing my stock purchases in the original exchange rate, yet adds the gain in the operating expenses?
After 9months or so of running Xero in parallel with my Quickbooks (Online version) I have decided to finally ditch quickbooks and run soley on Xero.
HelloI am trying Xero out to replace our current spreadsheet based system.
Ahoy hoy Xero users,wondering if anyone can offer an easy way for me to get rid of Historical Adjustments off my balance sheets.
One guy managed, by the sound of things, but he mentioned an accountant who had Xero experience sorted it for him.
I am changing from Sage to Xero with effect from 1 April 2013.
I am wondering how to set this up in Xero.
I cannot find a way within Xero to pull out the itemized or line itemed taxes entered under Expense Claims.
I am pretty useless when it comes to accounting software and had heard so many good things about Xero that I said id give it a proper go.
They will give themselves full functionality and read only access to some elements and some functions such as invoicingI'm thinking of employing an inhouse bookkeeper with Xero experience.
I have asked Xero to contact me about this but have heard nothing back from them.
I have been trying out Xero on the buckshee version and I think I have found a way of doing this but it is a little long-winded.
My client asked me to set up xero and enter 6 months worth of data so that all info will show for the full financial year.
I am wondering how to put the equity and loan in to xero.
co. uk/xero.
I've calculated the 12/31/12 balances in my old system and have completed the Xero set up guide.
So my question is this: if I officially launch Xero and subsequently find that one of the balances needs to be changed, can I easily make changes in Xero to update what the balance should be?
So I don't know if these 2012 EOY balances will be "locked" when I launch Xero.
I have been using Xero for a couple of years and absolutely love it.
I converted to Xero at the start of November, however my PAYG Instalment Activity Statement includes the whole year to date.
A tax accountant asked me to give him some guidance exporting from Xero to Sage HandiLedger.
xero.
There is no function in Xero to show the company as being based in the UK, whilst choosing a foreign currency (Euros) as the company’s ‘home currency’.
Hopefully this issue will be addressed but in the meantime I am hoping others can share their experiences to highlight this problem to Xero.
I am thinking about using Xero instead of my old QB 6.
In Xero we can import customers and suppliers when import, however not employees.
We are talking to implement Xero to one of clients who has more than 20 employees.
Hey GuysI am seriously experiencing slow server responses from XERO's servers.
Rather than sending quotes from Xero I might want to attach a PDF to another email for example a conversation.
(This seems to duplicate what Recurly does for us, and swamp me and Xero).
5) Can Xero cope with high volumes?
The Xero team have proposed the following, but I'm not sure if that's the best approach.
I feel this approach is awkward and I can't model it well in Xero.
Is it normal in Xero?
The rest of the loans personal and private we setup prior to moving to Xero so the conversion balance took care of the starter work.
I'm interested in hearing from other accounting practices that take their fees from their clients refunds and what they think is the best way to manage this within Xero?
Does anyone know how to record a GST refund received from the ATO in Xero?
HiI have a question regarding using Xero for the purposes of tracking lay-by orders & payments.
This should be a very simple calculation by Xero.
I've come across a problem while trying to import my Fixed Asset register from MYOB AO to Xero.
When trying to import this into Xero it won't let me because the price cannot be negative.
xero.
is there a way for xero to track and associate inventory sub-items with final assembled items?
I went through and added all our fixed assets to Xero.
Most of these assets have purchase dates before our Xero conversion date.
Im hoping xero will be easier.
My Xero now only includes the demo company…Seriously - this is urgent as I have to process the data on a continuous basis.
A potential Xero client yesterday asked several questions that i couldnt answer adequately - perhaps someone out there can.
- Can i store a backup of my Xero data locally?
xero shows an opening balance which we have no idea where it came form as the conversion balance is totally different.
I was thinking I may play around on the demo version of xero before tackling my client's real data.
I had no idea Xero could muck it up further.
I have tried contacting both Xero and iZettle and neither can offer me a solution and say they will refer it to the Development Team.
Xero's community is growing and I am sure that the other members will be interested in such opportunities, too.
Will Xero be a partner with the ATO in this trial?
Also, will Xero bring in these changes to their software?
I am preparing quotes in xero and am experiencing some difficulty.
We're in our first month of using Xero and already we have 55 unreconciled small individual paypal fee entries cluttering up the reconciliation feed.
xero.
xero.
Our product team & developers are now working on syncing our app and receipt data with your Xero and Intuit solutions so that your accounting/bookkeeping suite is SEAMLESS with NO EXTRA EFFORT on your part.
Especially when they are moving from competitors to Xero!
But I understand it might not be Xero's fault.
I'm not sure if it's something I have done when I started as not too smart with the Xero software.
Xero is clearly not showing withdrawals.
Our accountant wants us to move from Sage (which I have been using for over 6 years) to Xero and I am in the middle of a month long free trial on Xero and to be honest I am hating everything about it.
As a Sage user, Xero makes Zero sense to me.
I understand I can file my GST directly from within Xero myself.
I've clearly messed up here, or does Xero send my details separately?
How well does xero fit a self managed super fund where most investments are ASX listed and such things as investment performance reports are needed?
I am a huge fan of Xero and recommend it to all businesses starting up.
I know Xero is focused on small firms and also accounting practices, but would appreciate some love, albeit medium from Xero HQ for us not quite small businesses.
Hello,I have the xero plugin for woocommerce, and it has been working fine until recently.
I am entering my first bill into Xero, and its for insurance.
I am using Xero with a direct sync from my epos system.
I have since requested help via Xero to reverse the tracked inventory and frankly, the advice given, was far from helpful and involved many hours of work.
How do we set up Xero to make the reconciliation easier?
Xero is calculating the VAT on income only and ignoring where I have charged the client for expenses (and charged VAT on them).
They're coming up as '20% on Expenses' and therefore Xero is ignoring them.
I have been with Xero since February 2014 and in the main I am pleased with the system.
I am paying Xero enough.
I am finding  Xero customer service very cumbersome, tiresome and frustrating.
xero.
I am looking to run some MI from data available from Xero in relation to Revenue.
Where do I go into Xero to edit the value of the opening balance so that my figures agree?
We all know that Xero doesn't care about fixing this issue.
My computer hasn't changed, my printer hasn't changed but apparently, Xero and the settings changed.
At the moment Xero only allows me to reprint showing the paid details.
Have been using Xero for all my accounting needs but until recently have used Freshbooks to actually manage invoicing.
Xero suggests matches primarily based on amount so when you have regular transfers of the same amount it is very easy to match with a transfer that has the wrong date.
Since the correct match is no longer available Xero will suggest another incorrect match and so on and so on.
Receipt recorded in Xero from Event A = £90 and Event B £110.
systems+44 (0)3 004 004 004Certified Xero developers
So where do I find my petty cash receipts I upload through the Xero app
so not only Xero ignoring my emails to support team.
Xero has been unable to help us.
We additionally have our fixed assets scheduled updated into Xero.
Apart from the year end tax return, what other tasks Xero could help us in terms of compliance that we can do possibility without engaging an external chartered accounting firm?
It worries me that I maybe making a mistake moving to xero and eliminating my database.
I am looking for software that will allow us to view the scheduled recurring work on a calendar to help us manage our workflow and also ties in with the inventory from Xero.
HiI am using the demo of Xero, but seems to be quite involved.
Is there a way to create 'recurring receipts' in Xero that can be collated into a monthly expense claim?
Another example of Xero having Zero clue as to how to manage levels of access.
If it is not directly available through Xero is it available through a 3rd party application?
I created a Manual Journal Entry for a Trust Distribution (money spent) as per Xero’s own tutorial: https://www.
xero.
I have Xero set up with invoicing.
Could it be a setting within Xero or a possibility that the vendor has the emails going to their spam?
I am no accountant and have only been using Xero for the past 9 months or so.
Consequently my balance in Xero is way WAY off.
I've been using Xero half-assed - only for invoicing and such .
so my Xero books are a bit of a mess.
I'm curious on the general consensus of Xero's customer service and support.
Xero has not been prompting for any payroll tax because my s-corp has not paid any payroll this year (yet) to its employee (myself self employed).
Love Xero Paul
If you've ever wanted to keep a close eye on your Xero cash balance without having to login to Xero:
We have about 15 staff and integrate with Xero.
Hey Xero people!
The order details and financials would stay in 'the system', the money would post to Xero.
Is there a feature of Xero that adds revision numbers to quotes?
We currently have an online platform with westpac called payway but as far as I know this does not integrate with Xero.
Xero now shows that I owe $210 and that's what Verizon's system says as well.
What do I code purchases such as construction tools to in Xero?
Im finding it very hard to get my head around the set up and surprised handling cash in xero is so messy.
I have lost half my hair over this, I know xero must be easier than I think, but I simply cannot get me head around it.
I love the idea of xero but.
I still have two weeks until my start date, can anyone point me in the direction of any great resources to get up to speed with xero, and bookkeeping in general?
I'm a freelancer and I started with Xero from scratch in June last year, and I've used it diligently to enter all my receipts and all my invoicing since then.
Hello there,I wondered if you could hold my hand and talk me through the process as I know Xero offer various different routes and I'm not sure which one is correct.
I will begin using Xero soon for our youth football club.
So everything is showing that it appeared in Xero from Workflow Max, was sent via email within Xero and then was approved by me.
Hello,We have begun using Xero as of January 1st, 2016.
Hello We're moving over to Xero from spreadsheets and I hope to have all the information imported and Xero systems up and running by April 2016.
(Xero inventory and inventory tracking doesn't seem appropriate as domains vary so greatly in price).
Hello all,I'm trying to prepare my UK Income tax return for 2014/2015 in Xero.
Now, In Xero we have the remaining outstanding $300 for the hire Bill.
Would Xero work for me easily for tracking income/expenses and can I complete my Qtrly BAS through Xero?
#1 Should I or should I not link my personal paypal to my xero?
The GUI looks the same as XERO.
I am using Xero as an individual with salary, sole trader and rental properties.
I am trying to best set up Xero to help prepare my tax returns.
It would be nice to automate the xero user details  merge in the template and have single templateThanks in advance
Why is seller fees not considered as a cost of sale in xero?
xero.
How do i record repayments to him in Xero?
Xero calculates the VAT as €6.
I think that I've seen some posts to this forum along these same lines when I was first looking at Xero a few months ago but I can't find them now.
I am self taught on Xero and am learning as I go :0 Can someone give me some advice on how I enter payments I have made for renting trucks into xero.
Also looking for someone to help educate me on xero and some of the processes I don't know how to do yet.
I've looked at the feature request pages in relation to this and to adding signatures, and  HTML emails and the official line from xero appears to be:Naff off.
I'm stuck on how to merge them in Xero.
Is automatic invoicing a feature that Xero offers?
Hello,We started into looking at integrating our inventory solution with Xero.
We have developed THE solution for Quickbooks to Xero conversion.
Im going to send this to Xero support to.
We are considering using Xero as a replacement for our existing bespoke system.
My xero is saying positive balance what it means .
Xero is down.
I've not had a lot of experience with Xero before and I'm not sure where to start.
We are currently using the inventory feature in Xero to manage a small amount of stock.
Trying to decide between Xero and Quickbooks.
Comparing Quickbooks and Xero, one thing that I see lacking features (maybe I have missed it) is the reporting side of finances.
I looked up google images "xero reports" and did not find much either.
au/Creating-and-Managing-Quotes-in-Xero/Your feedback is super welcome :-)
xero.
not cost anywhere near our Xero monlthly access cost as Xero would be doing heaps more than the basic functions we require from this solution.
Fassett’s Bookkeeping Services are experts using Xero accounting software.
We are having problems importing the BACs file from Xero into NatWest.
To date we have established that the BACS file option in Xero won't work.
I am looking to speak to some regular day to day users of XERO in Ireland.
From looking through xero I don't think that this can be done.
As an aside, I really really think that this should be much clearer in Xero that selecting the none VAT scheme option would still affect expenses, or that it records expenses differently.
I have to figure out my COGS outside of xero, so lets say that figure for January is $1000.
I originally had a book keeper doing the xero stuff and I asked about it but it never got resolved.
When I create an overpayment, do this tell Xero that I have been paid some additional money I should not have and would I not be accounting for revenue twice?
Hey Xero community,I'm hoping to find some friendly advice on which accounting software to choose.
It's simple and I would know what to do in MYOB but not sure what to do in Xero.
I am very comfortable with online and virtual, so I am drawn to Xero.
I can understand doing it on Excel but, take Xero for instance, what if I am doing AR, AP, Recons, and maybe even tax or payroll for 5 or 7 companies?
I've recently discovered both Purchase Orders and Inventory Items as a possible improvement to current precarious Xero method.
Not sure if Xero are aware of this?
My accountant has recommended changing to Xero.
Does Xero have the same capability?
xero.
We're looking at the way Xero multi-currency support works to help us with the bookkeeping side of things (I was pretty happy to see you support rate locks).
Hello,We are a small UK start-up using Xero as our accounting software.
Obviously Xero doesn't as yet support a UK PAYE / RTI system, so I'm looking at Sage One Payroll, Kashflow Payroll and Clear Books Open Payroll.
I'm also only looking for a stop-gap solution until Xero bring out their UK payroll system (pretty happy with Xero for everything else).
I have noticed that the option to override the Tax Amount on Spend Money transactions has disappeared - this definitely used to be a feature on Xero as it stopped working a few months ago and I had a client query this.
I finally started trading in Xero on the 23rd of July.
I have looked at my profit and loss statement and that is accurate in xero.
I am not an accountant and am trying to figure out how to record the purchase in Xero, and depreciate it, which I believe I can do.
I am wanting to record the receipts somewhere in XERO.
Especially as Xero hasn't returned the message we left 3 days ago.
xero.
Has anybody worked out a way to pull out your weekly cash flow from Xero?
I'm not sure how to deal with this in Xero?
If I can do the above mentioned updates, can Xero handle my GST changes which happened a month ago?
But a few scenarios have all but been ignored by xero developers/designers.
I've listed a proposed enhancement to xero herehttps://community.
xero.
I have been using xero for a year now and I am quite conversant with it, but my husband and my workplace had money to start with!
We then email them to the clients and import them into Xero.
Hello,I have xero set up and working ok but I have noticed that I have issues with GBP payments.
We currently operate off Sage Handisoft in our firm and I run the books for a few clients and have switched them over to Xero so we can be as up to date as possible with our knowledge of Cloud based accounting, However when trying to import from Xero to Handisoft there is only 1 major problem.
I am experimenting with xero and may switch from first books.
I want to try using Xero before deciding to buy.
Looking at Xero as a possible alternative to Sage.
I have been using Xero for my own small company for 2 years and its fantastic.
I am wondering the best way to record this in Xero.
Hello everyone, I am considering Xero for my accounting needs.
I've been using Xero for almost a year and find it absolutely brilliant!
I have a few different websites and have it set up that orders are automatically pulled into Xero when placed .
Sage is the only other one I've heard of and they seem to be more of replacement for Xero than stand-alone app for HMRC online filing.
I am wanting to track the marketing expense, and also adjust the associated stock line so that my inventory levels (so far as they exist in Xero) remain correct.
Dear Xero CommunityGreetings.
We have had our annual insurance funded by a third party financier and was wondering the best way to do it in Xero.
It is wearing very thin and appears Xero are struggling with it.
I have set up the conversion balance date as 1-7-2013 and I want to input all July to Nov transactions into Xero.
I got a prompt reply but was disappointed in Xero's lack of functionality with respect to this issue and wanted to see how real world businesses handle it.
Xero, not so much.
I was really excited about moving us to Xero, but am definitely having second thoughts now.
I was wondering if there is this functionality on Xero?
I have heard that Xero the accounting system can integrate with a retail point of sale system.
I think the problem stems from the fact that PayPal/Xero auto-setup only handles transactions between PayPal and vendors.
I have a client who would love to switch to Xero and wondering how we would handle her situation.
Xero does not handle this well at all.
Without sensible reports or access to this data, Xero's budgeting tools are pretty much pointless for me.
As far as I can see, you cannot currently import Workflowmax payrolls into Xero Payroll.
As Xero now own Workflowmax wouldn't this be a priority feature for better integration of their family of products?
Therefore two statement lines for my wage will come up in Xero when I import the statement.
Hello *newbie alert*I run a small tour operating company and am in the process of moving over to xero (yay!
We are looking to start using Ability software for our billing and wondered if anyone was already using Ability and Xero alongside each other?
We are looking to start using Ability software for our billing and wondered if anyone was already using Ability and Xero alongside each other?
These addons are currently going through Xero certification and are not currently certified addons.
They are to be considered in beta until certified by Xero.
I have used Jet Convert on the Sunshine Coast to do a full conversion for me from MYOB into Xero.
Could anyone tell me if their is a way of restoring Xero back to where it was before I made this mistake or will I have to reconcile everything all over again?
- I then enter wages (net) manually into Xero as 1 transaction.
- And then enter a second transaction into Xero for PAYE paid to Inland Revenue.
)Satisfying HMRC RTI requirements has been enormously confusing to me, but I think I've figured out how to do it now (using another web app called Phroot, since Xero does not support RTI).
I am looking to share stories when transitioning my clients to Xero.
and their respective integrations with Xero?
xero.
My question is about car usage and splitting it up in Xero.
I assume it's how we Xero handles reconciliation.
I’m using the basic Xero version for professional services.
Can Xero come up with a pricing plan for multi-currency that accommodates such small-scale needs?
xero.
Along with his XERO consulting he enticed us into an interesting pricing scheme for licencing, apparently lower than that quoted for customers on the XERO website (this we learnt later was untrue).
Your adviser has financial difficulties and stops paying the bills to XERO    b.
Our Adviser left for Myanmar and was incommunicado for months during a critical go-live period involving 6 XERO installations in 4 different countries.
Philip Fraser was farming out our XERO accounting work to a third party in the Philippines while telling us that the person was one of his employees (untrue statement).
Our learning experience from this is: When working with XERO, DO NOT let non-employees have control of your XERO Subscriptions – this must all be done internally.
xero.
I love Xero, but Yodlee scare me.
QIF file coded DEBIT received by Xero as type=creditCREDITS are OK.
I have read on here that you cant setup contacts on the Xero ipad app, is this correct and how do people get around this?
I love Xero but it is hard to get people to change without the ROS integration.
I presume internally Xero uses Xero (!
I'm an ex IT bod and looked at the API's but I can't see how to pull repeats from Xero.
Created with the help of the Xero community who shared their experiences with invoicing.
Because I can't find anywhere in Xero where I can export LAST year's summaries only the 2013 ones.
Today, we're pleased to announce the much-anticpated release of Xero Touch for Android devices.
Given Xero uses the amount and the date to match payments, both of which is the same for all my transations.
I was moving his finances from a word document to Xero.
We spoke of the ongoing cost of Xero but not of my charges on our first appointment (free, right! )
I've searched threads and found a few others looking for enhancements to Xero reporting, but wondering if I'm missing something that already exists.
I thought, why not ask what other Xero users are using, maybe there's something that I haven't found--and maybe I can share something others might find, and thus we have a good exchange and benefit to all our businesses.
We've double checked that the text is identical to the tracking names used in Xero, and they are, so we're a bit stuck.
As we settle into Xero I'm now looking at all the things we didn't normally do with QBO.
I am an online seller only (ebay and my own webstore) and have a bit of troubling moving from my spreadsheet to xero.
He wants to stick with the POS software, so has asked if it's possible to import this to Xero.
We have started using the Xero app for our expenses.
Sorry for the long postPPs I have only a basic understanding of accountingPPPs I have had Xero for 3 years now, still havent sorted this out!
Now with Xero.
Originally we were on VAT cash accounting, and therefore the saved published VAT returns in Xero (under cash accounting) matched the VAT returns submitted to HRMC, However, on changing to the accruals method on Xero, the previous figures have been cleared in Xero, and do not reconcile to that submitted to HMRC, and show a huge liability outstanding!
Is there a timesheeting system in Xero?
The Xero marketing team often get asked marketing-related questions when we’re out and about so we thought we’d capture some ideas and share them with everyone in a little web series.
Upon setting up Xero i had a stack of payments (accs payable) all made on the same day.
- "" — Xero imports duplicate line items, and sometimes gets debit/credit backwards.
- "" — Xero goes weeks without refreshing the feed, but after doing a manual refresh, it works with Xero.
- "" — Works perfectly with Xero.
Xero works with some versions of Capital One, but does not currently work with the Spark Credit Card line.
Recently transitioned from Cheeckeper to the Xero printed checks.
When done through Xero now, it does not offer this convenient feature.
At the moment, Xero has a feature whereby you can see the overall balance of an individual contact that is both a supplier and a customer.
Can we have the ability to enter an ABN in contacts in the Xero app.
I think Xero is a great product.
Have had instances where staff are interrupted from their work and then their Xero login times out and their coded data is lost because the save and reconcile button wasn't clicked.
If this feature was put right (and it must be a simple update) then in my view Xero would be nearly perfect.
I had to search Xero for these.
This feature should enhance the customer experiences on Xero, make it more beautiful.
If Xero could have the ability to automatically select a specific printer/paper tray whenever the check printing feature is activated (without changing the default printer), this would be perfect!
When attempting to approve the credit note, Xero gives an error indicating that it cannot proceed because an attempt is being made to reduce the quantity to zero, but the value will not be zero.
CorePlus and Xero work well together, and we are pleased with the integration of systems.
One feature that we would really appreciate Coreplus and Xero developing is the ability for the data import from Coreplus to Xero to be "by Site" from Coreplus.
It would be great to only see the default Xero autocomplete, as that's the helpful one.
Still road-testing Xero and feeling my way around.
Our practice would love to see this in Xero Tax!
Xero.
I started with XERO & moved on to NETSUITE from Oracle.
I was very happy with XERO except 3 things:1.
why does xero make everything so hard?
Regardless of whether I'm using Xero at my PC or on the job with my smart phone.
Currently you can only do this for assets with a purchase date prior to the Xero start date.
Currently we have to send them via a separate email outside of Xero Tax.
If its really important at present we have to send that email again from outside xero tax.
Would be great if Xero could fix the spacing issue with clients on Xero Green having spaces in their surname.
This has been going on for years and it would be greatly appreciated if Xero can fix this
Xero has the capability of exporting MYE files for import into MYOB AE.
We recently moved our ledger clients from MYOB AE to Xero.
What would be a really great function is for Xero to allow an MYE file created in MYOB AccountRight to be imported.
This would mean that it is a easier choice for practices to go 100% Xero.
So Xero when will this be available?
I got around this by opening xero in another Browser, so I wasn't logged in to the IRD site from my first gst return to file.
Now after pushing to Xero you have to edit AGAIN to change the bill to Item = 440 Litres.
Checkboxes under each person to choose who gets the different types of emails that xero might send.
If the asset depreciation start date could be set to July 1 regardless of purchase date (before or after), then depreciation in Xero would match that following the IRS MACRS "half-year convention", which happens to be the default method in TurboTax.
Can we lodge via Xero?
Entering a physical check that we write into Xero is a confusing and tedious process.
It took two of us 15 minutes today to write down a 10-step process as to how to enter a check that one writes into Xero.
As an advisor it would be great to access a list of all our Xero organisations that are setup and using the auto super function.
Set up a workflow in Approvalmax that requests the PO and then imports it into Xero.
This could be solved if Xero added these email addresses as a drop down box where the correct email address could be selected.
It would also be appreciated if you're not going to implement bulk inventory actons or easier inventoy system to at least give us quantities section in downloadable inventory CVS file so we can adjust quantities manually in google sheets or excel and upload them back to xero.
I don't want clients being shown by Xero level (Gold, Silver) and a snippet of my Xero profile.
It would be helpful if the Admin can see the location of the users who are logged in to Xero.
----------------------------------------This message has been added to the History & Notes for QU-2016-0275 in Xero.
But Xero doesn't support that either.
Every system i have used since 1998 does it that way, and while i xecept xero is trying to do things differently, this is not one of things you should do differently.
A good process (which applies to almost everything else in Xero), is that an item should move from one state to another.
Currently I email in all bills to xero as a way of consolidating bills to be paid.
I maintain a customer database in excel and export contacts from Xero to populate this database.
I also requested an assistance through Xero Help on the 7th Mar.
Xero's out-of-the-box depreciation methods fall short because taxpayers using the declining balance change to the straight line method at the point at which depreciation deductions are optimized.
I can't tell you how annoying this is and how inefficient it is to enter in receipts into Xero via mobile.
Xero appear to have changed the opening screen.
I recently got certified and started working with Xero.
This type of analytics would give Xero a huge competitive positioning advantage over QuickBooks.
I would be nice if all the information from XPM would flow through to Xero Reports.
If you have a membership base of at least a hundred, this is a very long tedious process of manually preparing this receipt which otherwise can be remedied by having a template available in xero that contains the following features at the very least:1.
My answer is YES if XERO and partners Agree.
Because it is a third party app It can not update status in Xero tax.
If my organisation has 40 widgets in stock, and sends these to another organisation in exchange for 50 gadgets, this is difficult to represent in Xero.
Our Financial Year End in 2016 was 29 February and Xero was set accordingly.
Xero will now not accept 29 February as Financial Year End.
However, it does not with Xero.
Dear Xero,A future option could be for "Offline Invoicing" through the mobile app ONLY.
xero.
However, if a docx template is being used rather than the Xero standard template, the online invoicing picks up the postal address and so the company registered office shows at the top of the online document.
I think it would be useful if there was a link to "Find Accountants and Bookkeepers" available to Xero users from within their own accounting system.
At present it is located within the main Xero website.
Clients as we all know log into their own Xero.
Staff enter their expenses into Xero.
Is there anyway that Xero could create reporting on Annual leave and sick leave owing for each employee for each financial year?
Note the ideal scenario is that Xero imports the HMRC exchange rates or at a minimum lets us set a VAT exchange rate for a given currency for each month.
So firstly, I want to warn people of another weakness in the VAT processing in Xero.
Would it be possible for this feature to be developed into Xero so that these jobs do in turn allow themselves to be viewed "next week" "next month" "next quarter" so that staffing work flow levels can be appropriately managed?
This means Xero has a character limit.
This means you have to remember to go into Xero HQ and change the organisation name in there too.
We have multiple email forwards set up that populate our Xero Files inbox.
Xero page loads aren't the quickest for us (a UK thing? )
Xero has so many great articles in the Help Center, but there are many, many articles on the same topic and they are all slightly different.
could make things a lot smoother for many bookkeepers, and would give Xero another leg up on Quickbooks.
I run an accountancy practice and am trying to get all my clients on the one software package - Xero.
Currently Andriod Xero App invoicing has the ability to enter a negative amount.
But Xero doesn't allow me to enter it that way.
Currently in Xero HQ, there aren't notifications or an area to see if comments have been left in the Discuss tab within client organisations.
I hope this is coming as part Xero HQ development.
Hello,I think it would be nice if it was possible to track what users are doing in Xero via e-mail.
I realise it's already possible to track activity in Xero, but it's a bit tedious.
I'm sure there's scope for Xero to pick up a lot more clients here.
Well done Xero.
xero.
HiAs an avid Xero user in practice , it would be great to have a shortcut to the draft reports to enter in the financial statements we are processing.
I recently used Xero workpapers and posted some journals via workpapers.
Normally when I post a journal straight from Xero, I can see on the journal it says "Edited by John Citizen on 1 December 2016 at 7.
However, when I post the journal through Xero workpapers, I can see on the journal when I open it in Xero it says "Approved by System Generated' on 1 December 2016 at 7.
xero.
The ability to issue a "Request For Quote" to multiple suppliers simultaneously, whereby upon receipt of quotes from suppliers Xero users can quickly and easily convert their Request For Quote (RFQ) into a Purchase Order (PO).
It would be useful to have our practice name attached to our accounting staff when they are added as a user on a client's Xero.
I'm importing expenses from another system into Xero as bills.
Xero is so advanced and beyond QB in many ways - surprised not this one, yet.
We attend allot of networking and the most common answer we get after we have describedthe beauty of Xero is: We never heard of it.
xero.
However when I  my income and expenses, Xero does not prompt me to select a department, so I nearly always forget to select one.
xero.
My client has tried out the xero app.
It would be extremely helpful if we could make changes to files and save them while working in Xero.
Is this something that Xero is looking into?
IF you didn't want people to hack the xero cloud you shouldn't be a cloud based software.
I would think that anyone who uses Xero and works for local authority, educational establishment or certain types of charity would find this very useful.
I assumed that Xero would offer this in reports (using historical currency conversion rates) to show profits and losses in USD as well as the currency of my company which is EU.
99&reference=123456&item_name=LaptopProblem is xero has no placeholder for the REFERENCE field.
It is infuriating that Xero does not make such a simple feature available to their users.
Xero needs to let me capture those variable amounts from the description, and create both types of transaction.
As a Bookkeeper I am using the excellent Xero tax feature, it would also run more smoothlyif the email address of the client (from their contact details) populated onto the Coverletter automatically.
net feed available for Xero?
We chose XERO because it offered multi currency functionality, and think that were this feature enabled for non-default currencies would be an absolute must.
We can currently connect office 365 and gmail to xero but for me i have a email which is via my domain name so can we make it so this can be connected to xero in the same way
We strongly recommend Xero implements this feature as soon as possible and request all Xero users vote for the change by giving a positive feedback to this post.
I want Xero to offer a Home version for < £5 month.
Xero lets you update the depreciation rate in the next financial year.
However, if you chose xero to auto calculate depreciation rate base on effective life box.
Xero would not let you change the effective life in the next financial year. '
Hello there Xero team!
Allow dividend & interest schedule in a company to be linked to the trust or individual if they are on Xero Tax.
It would be great if the Xero U profile and the My Xero profile were linked/the same.
This needs added to Xero as it affects VAT return.
Does Xero integrate with Invoice2go?
AND WENT TO EXPORT THEM FROM XERO VIA A PDF.
At the moment, Xero doesn't allow me to do that.
At the moment they have disappeared - unless they have arrived through the in-box and been moved to another file (an option you don't get if using Xero App).
Completing this feature will bring Xero one step closer to machine learning.
It would be handy to have a global tracking system to see what information has been inputted by each user for each company within Xero.
Would be great if Xero could recognise different products and their codes from Unleashed.
I have spoken to our Xero representative and he's suggested I contact you with my idea.
At the moment we have to print the Xero quote and enter the figures into the word document.
To whom it may concern,Xero should have the option to close VAT periods to make it easy to identify prior periods differences when doing a VAT recon.
The ability to upload an excel based quote directly into Xero
Xero should allow printing on checks printed 3 to a page.
It seems that Xero does not have Indian tax systems incorporated.
"Xero doesn't work this way.
It would be fantastic if Xero could be expanded to cover this.
You could also record the corporate key and then get approval from ASIC as a software provider to make the changes online from Xero to ASIC.
This may require extra data being held in Xero including net mass to help complete this HMRC return.
My users have access to multiple Xero companies under a single login, and we share a lot of links to documents or lists in Xero.
It would be great if the Xero URL path could include a company ID number that switched you to the correct company to view the document or list.
xero.
According to the recommended SPFR framework, we are required to disclose much more info than the basic Xero Notes.
xero.
xero.
The ability to copy a staff remembers level of permissions on all practice xero files to other staff members.
I was advised by Xero Tax Support that "quite a fair number of accountants have requested this feature" but I can not locate this request here so I decided to create this today.
Xero needs to improve its connection with that vendor.
I request Xero to send a copy of this request to their CEO so that some necessary action is cordially taken.
This is a deal breaker on Xero for me and my clients.
Currently Xero only allows you to edit one of the tracking categories during timesheet entry, the other is set as a default in the employee settings.
Many accounting software programs provide a Working Trial Balance so that we can see the effect on the GL next to our manual entries to eliminate all the back and forth that presently exists in Xero.
So the Read Only user doesn't work for us to allow staff to access information directly in Xero.
Currently no feature to adjust leave hours through My Xero if leave over 2 days period.
However, if a tax agent files the GST return on the clients behalf using Xero practice manager (Workflowmax) then the "Ready to file now" button in Xero could potentially cause issues (ie.
Some internal admin have too much access to change settings or make prior period adjustments jeopardising the integrity of historical figures in Xero.
HELP US KEEP USING XERO, and make it more and more efficient!
Why does Xero follow everyone else by using mobile phone codes?
It would be great to have a section in My Training / Xero U for all the webinars we've registered for that are upcoming, with links to the webinar.
This would have been useful yesterday when we didn't get the Xero Now link until 15 mins after it was supposed to start.
However when sending direct from Xero with a receipt we can only copy and paste the link which is very long and can look a little bit spammy.
My clients love the freedom in Xero to not have to constantly meet with their bookkeeper and I love that they don't have to either.
Hope Xero App production team can consider this.
This would then automatically appear in the xero database.
We are big fans of Xero, having come from Microsoft Dynamics GP we love the simplicity and the fact that's its cloud based.
Additionally our company also uses WorkFlowMax (another awesome Xero product) to run our residential construction / service company.
Prior to Xero our company spent lots of money trying to build a cloud based property management software solution to manage our large portfolio of houses for our clients.
But we lacked the true art of what Xero makes look easy!
There are a few snap on options in the Xero marketplace, they fall very short of being remotely good or useful.
I hope others on this forum would consider voting to have Xero build a rental management platform, which could also be used in a variety of industries worldwide.
We saw the mega potential, now we hope Xero and its users see it.
It would be fantastic if this could be directly fed into Xero!
The Xero at present do not allow to make an inventory adjustment as void or edit it.
Xero has recently added Gmail integration into Xero Blue.
I would find it very useful if we could search within our xero using 2 references, ie supplier & contact.
If I've incorrectly entered a customer's email address, I will get a bounce-back notification from Xero.
The message that Xero's mail server sends me contains the header fields of my original message.
I cant seem to see anywhere in Xero, where you can look up your top 20 clients ( say ) spendin the current monthyear to dateagainst budget against prior year etcIts kind of frustrating.
The proliferation of Contacts in Xero from Payments, Receipts, Customers and Suppliers means that the integrity of this data is only as good as the human manually managing it.
It would be incredible helpful if Xero could have an seamless integration with saasoptics ( http://saasoptics.
Seems crazy to have separate invoicing and revenue recognition outside of Xero.
They have an integration with Quickbook but not Xero?
It would be brilliant if Xero could implement this as well as a column for sorting by posting date.
I simply can't change to Xero based on this one factor alone - it would drive me crazy to untrain 20 years of looking at QB-styled reports.
The ability within Xero Practice Manager to search email addresses via clients and the general search button to show emails addresses used across multiple clients.
As such, we have floated the idea of using the Xero contacts table as our source of truth for customer data.
They have reached out to Xero to begin integration, but so far Xero has not taken any further action.
I am generally a fan of Xero, however, many improvements could be made to the multi-currency functionality of the software.
Hello Xero Team,We are company based on Singapore, while our reporting currency is in .
If users create contacts in the Xero backend, very often they already have the same contacts in Google, etc.
Would be great to have an active sync between contacts entered in Google and/or Xero.
Could be an option which allows to choose contacts for syncing with Google by clicking a checkbox in Xero for each contact that shall also be synced with Google.
Xero will have more information of this contact (Financial Information etc. )
This is very, very frustrating and is a big black mark on Xero as an application.
While hardly the end of the world, i think intergrating google maps into xero could be a "nice to have" feature.
Why doesn't Xero?
Currently I find issuing receipts in Xero a pain and long winded.
I am looking to migrate another organisation to Xero however there they can easily send 100+ receipts a day - so a simpler way of doing this would be great.
If I leave Xero sitting for a few hours I come back and it has a prompt for me to put in my password.
For example, if "Create Inventory"  processing type was chosen, then Xero would transfer Raw Materials to Finished Goods.
If "Sold Inventory" processing type was chosen, then Xero would transfer Finished Goods to COGS.
I LOVE Xero but the payments screen needs help.
Xero Tax/XPM is fantastic!
It would be useful if Xero saved these fields.
Also It would be great if I can send a message to the staff by using email or text messaging system through Xero.
com/s/btqv6q1ia4asod8/xero%20transaction%20view%20limited.
com/s/nougl1a39amsezj/xero%20editing%20deep%20inside%20transaction.
Xero makes filing most tax forms pretty seamless, but for whatever reason, corporate returns don't seem to be supported.
Loving Xero as a product.
Due to significant errors on Xero payroll I am having to move a large firm's payroll to another programme.
I upgraded to Windows 10 yesterday and could see the whole number previously (although I had to shorten our references to fit Xero's pre-defined field).
We have only been using Xero for 2 months, but already this facility would prove useful.
The 'global' search function in Xero is great (magnifying glass in top RH corner).
It will be great if xero can create a field for commence date in the contact's details section.
So I want Xero to develop an area in My Xero - for Accountants and Bookkeepers - for all current promo codes, with easy location check boxes / search by location capability with these promo codes.
I propose that Xero incorporates a simple notification to let a user know who else is working on the same org.
I've been advised by Xero team that this is not possible and they suggested adding a tracking category called "None" and then choose this when recoding for the transactions we want to remove the tracking category from.
Would be great if they worked with Xero!
Xero is fantastic software.
As I am a partner and offer my clients tax return preparation services, I envy the Aussie Xero users their ability to prepare returns within Xero.
He is an infrequent user of Xero (at most, once monthly) and has to re-familiarise himself with the environment each month to find where he needs to go to authorise super.
I am an accountant that woks on may different cloud based systems nameley , Kashflow, QuickBooks, Sageone and Xero and I find that Xero's is the slowest to navigate.
The categories are not necessarily created on Xero in date order.
I suspect the very easiest solution might be to make the xero app available as one of the 'share' options available to the camera scanner apps - though ?
We are better utilising our team across WFM and Xero to ensure we remain at the front of our competitors""We understand most users are real users, across owners and managers and employees.
xero.
xero.
xero.
xero.
xero.
xero.
xero.
xero.
xero.
xero.
I am surprised Xero has missed this trick.
However on Xero Touch this is not shown properly at all.
I frequently come across paper receipts in the office where I'm not sure if they have been submitted into Xero yet.
Opened Xero on my Samsung note 4 and looked all over the place before I could find where to do it.
I signed up for Xero because of "Square integration".
Create an integration between Nimble CRM and Xero
Perhaps if Xero provided second reference fields  then both methods could be employed; i. e:Quote Reference => Purchase Order Reference #1 => Bill Reference #1Quote Number => Purchase Order Reference #2Purchase Order Number => Bill Reference #2  Ideally, the reference fields could be mapped by the user to suit their requirements.
Is it possible to change the BAS Approval process in XERO TAX to match that of Tax Returns.
We have been reviewing our document management system recently and the one complaint and limitation all suppliers have made is that Xero Tax in Australia does not have an API.
xero.
Xero needs to widen access and ALLOW the SUBSCRIBER / ADMIN to control users as they deem fit.
At last we have Two Step Authentication for Xero.
WFM, Chaser, Xero Gold Accounting, Xero Cloud Integrator15.
How does Xero assess its penetration and presence in particular professional organization or which apps tend to be selected as a basket.
A senior executive within Xero needs to own this concept.
~ Click 'Approve' (At least the final click is in a green box :-))Come on Xero ~ you can let everyone click the lovely green 'Mark as Billed' button and create intuitive choices after that.
We love working with Xero but cannot understand that a basic missing relationship is for "siblings" where this is so commonly used in our practice.
Ability to get up a group / groups for the Staff page - to group by office, by power Xero users.
Xero uses a CSV file for importing.
This is especially valuable given that Xero have not done anything to properly implement recurring billing/charges via Stripe.
There are tons of Xero users requesting very slightly different User permissions as feature requests.
I am happy for you to post serious warning signs, (in red rather than different shade of blue would be good), about taking this action, or perhaps even restrict this function to Xero partners only.
If there is a feature at present in xero that does this please disregard  above and let me know how.
xero.
Then you have to wait for 2 minutes for xero to send the receipt, then check your email and then print it.
Xero makes customer checkout take way longer than it needs to be, and way longer than our previous qb desktop.
xero.
xero.
xero.
Export is increasingly important to us and Xero's ability to work in multiple currencies is a very useful feature.
We have an Incorporated Society that has moved to Xero and are unhappy that additional work is required to generate reports to meet their needs.
I think Xero (yodlee?
This way Xero can offer some client's a flat discounted annual fee paid once a year in advance, instead of having to collect the fee monthly.
Xero needs to support all valid email addresses for payroll direct deposit setup.
Is it possible for this to be added to the Xero to Xero functionality please?
As we are migrating all of our financial operations into Xero, it would be amazing if there was a space available as a Dashboard item where I (or any other manager with certain access rights) could post communication items to the other members of my office for quick reference and/or reminders.
Hey Xero!
(We've tested Capsule, Sugar, Agile, and Insightly and all would create issues for us in handling duplicates and syncing data between and back to Xero. )
As I am demonstrating Xero to clients I am being asked to print a general ledger.
It would be useful when using the email to adviser function in  Xero if it bookmarked the page you are on so your accountant can see what you are referring to.
It would be much more efficient if a user could take a photo later, using touch and then have touch sync with Xero and upload any newly added photos to the correct files automatically.
It is a pretty common user interface paradigm that clicking on any column header in a read-only grid view will sort by that column -- perhaps this could be done across the board for reports in Xero?
It would be nice if there could be, or if there is some thought around creating a more economical plan for Sole Proprietors who simply want the power of Xero for invoicing, financial tracking etc, but without any Payroll functionality.
If there was an option to insert period dates (not mandatory), then Xero could automatically calculate accruals and prepayments.
I've recently come up with the necessity to test a few of my planned actions in Xero.
Xero has really allowed our clients to get a better understanding of their aged payables balances.
Could you consider building into a contact side of Xero some form of reconciliation field?
I'm using Xero work papers to process journals and i'm finding that the Journal Debit & Credit Columns do not do an automatic calculation if i attempt to type in a couple of numbers.
If i typed 100 + 10 into Xero manual journals it would auto calc and equal 110.
For me, and I'm sure other users will agree, this would be a very nice refinement to see added into Xero.
I recently transferred Debtors between 2 Xero files.
When I log into our Xero.
Because I called Xero.
Dear Xero,It would be great if actual Xero bills could be accessed through the Subscriptions & Billing tab in the MyXero screen.
I've have seen in other threads there have been requests to put the Practice logos on the Front Cover of the reports and I have even seen Xero replies to these feature requests that this has now been added as a feature.
All the cheaper partner Xero versions have cash coding and so do the more expensive versions.
Xero is unable to match this so I have to Find & Match and manually type in the customers name, for 100s of transactions from 100s of people.
Xero enforces a workflow for customer payments from a quote that adds lots of unnecessary steps to our getting paid.
We much prefer Xero but unless we can find a solution to our problem we may have go backwards and return to Quickbooks  :-(
It would be great to have the entities most used 'favourited' on the My Xero page so that you don't have to search or sift through all the entities you have access for.
Even better if Xero could recognise it was loaded and automatically show as an attachment when reconciliations are done to this contact.
If you have a bunch of companies adding Xero Keys manually is a pain in the ass.
Very keen to see this happening so that we may push POs from 3rd party apps up to Xero to better integrate our systems.
xero.
xero.
Xero limit the item name no longer than 50 characters.
Per Xero customer support the solution is to download the CSV files and complete the  manual forms to lodge with the ATO, I find this completing inadequate and frustrating that I have to fill in manual forms.
Hello Xero!
I searched high and low for 'bankfeeds@xero.
Xero will not allow us to create a rule to assign standing order payments received to the relevant contact each month, meaning the manual processing of many receipts each month.
This is a simple feature and given the number of Xero users I'm surprised this hasn't been implemented yet.
Has something changed in the way that Xero calculates months?
xero.
Chrome Network tab, examples of download speeds:* 2MB jpeg from xero files: http://1drv.
That way Xero can quickly identify what transactions have been posted to that Tracking Category and allowe the User to go and find transactions that may have been missed or amend ones that were tracked incorrectly etc.
co/1I96AeOCould Xero implement this in the future?
It takes around 1 hour to dissect a list of 7,000+ items into 7 different CSV files and then input each CSV file into Xero.
This is especially important as Xero does not round numbers correctly in these reports.
We did have this option when using Automate before switching to Xero.
It would be great if Xero had a year end rollover function (only available to those with Advisor permissions) that would do these automatically!
Could a video series be created to demonstrate how to start from scratch, a property portfolio consisting of about three properties, in Xero.
docx* templates these don't appear in the link included in the email to customers and it would be useful if Xero had a way of including some of this information.
It has a nifty integration to Xero but we notices some quirks.
When we contacted them we found out it was because of the nature of the Xero file structure and the API.
I'm sure that Xero developers could code an auto response to Date of input.
This relates to suppliers who do not receive the xero generated purchase orders.
Currently I have Xero in a pinned tab and therefore always open.
I am slowly transferring from Freshbooks to Xero but there seems to be one feature missing from Xero that is preventing me from transferring completely.
Given xero can already calculate the AL entitlement, it would be helpful if it had an option to automatically expense this to the P&L and BS, and subsequently reverse it out when the employee takes leave.
I feel that adding a {description} placeholder would be the ideal solution, but Xero doesn't recognise that placeholder, and I'm a little bit sick of retyping the description in each subject heading.
I'm exporting a whole vat Quarter of transactions from Paypal and importing in Xero.
Xero could help make it better and easier by:1.
Also be easier if Xero kept the vat rates up to date rather than hundreds of us having to edit the vat rates as they change!
So if we had a zoomable global map with a pin per member at least I knew there was a slim chance of meeting a fellow Xero user or even an accountant that was 'Xero happy'What do others think?
LeePS It would be a powerful global infographic for Xero too
It would be great if Xero will look at adding this feature in the future to avoid organisations from being exposed to possible risks.
Find & Recode is a terrific Xero advance.
I really wish Xero would improve this annoying issue.
If not is it something that Xero can address please ?
It would be great if Xero did not separate paypal fees and gross transaction.
Any chance of Xero having an integrated Point of Sale module, preferably that will work with Tyro eftpos payments?
You currently have 2 of the "branches" of the Banque Popualaire in France connected/integrated with Xero.
Sorry if this is an obvious thing, I did have a look in xero and in other discussions before I posted!
e. g. credit card transactionsInternational internet purchases dont always includes tax and it it is easy to overlook that when reconciling transactions in Xero.
Xero is great but it lacks the ability to set specific permissions based on each company needs.
This means we have to step outside the Xero functionality which does mean more likelihood for errors.
Would really love if we could have the ability to create folder names within the Xero files area.
I thought Xero had added a feature that stores the reference details in the database or browser.
I would suggest an actual charity mode in Xero that allows all transactions to be flagged as Restricted, or if no flag is in place then they are considered Unrestricted.
It is great that you have now introduced Inventory Tracking into Xero, very useful.
User Controls are very limited in Xero and should be more flexible to enable you to pick and choose who can see/do what to ensure authorised people only are allowed to see the financials.
In recent Xero website changes, the pages have grown too wide.
But Xero pages are too wide and require left & right scrolling to view entirely.
xero.
Now that Xero has updated inventory to allow tracked and non-tracked items will this flow through to an extension of the Xero Mobile app?
It seems Xero inventory currently only supports inventorying items that are sold.
Due to a strict signature process within the company I feel if Xero added a "Payments awaiting approval" tab/section it would save me hours in my day and I would be more productive within the company.
Xero could then automatically reconcile these transactions as well.
xero.
This means we have to create the budget for 1 year outside of Xero and then import it into Xero at a later date.
A xero diary to record hours worked .
I think it'd be useful and easy enough to implement for the team at Xero.
Happily, Xero allows you to "roll your own" schedules.
XERO have included all the other fields except PAYEE?
This functionality is in Phreebooks and worked great, but their product is aging and lacking functionality so I moved to Xero.
With our team now using Xero Practice Manager for job management, it would make sense to have a social feed for communication within XPM.
Xero logs you out quickly for security (which is good), but it always logs you into the Dashboard, which contains sensitive data.
com is not a HMRC approved exchange rate for VAT purposes therefore it would be beneficial to have a choice of exchange websites we could link with Xero, so we don't have to manually input an exchange rate from an approved website.
Please -  WE WANT XERO TO WORK!
Is it possible to send an e mail (as well as a message on Xero) if the vat submission fails?
It would be very handy if they could send supplier's credit note straight from Xero and this action to appear in the history as "sent credit note by email".
It would then kick back to Xero and notify me (the user) that the customer is happy with the deal set out and the pricing etc.
It would allow me to get rid of hundreds of signed documents as it would be with Xero all together :)Andy
The complete sequence isn't visible from within Xero.
Xero should require a minimum password for EVERYONE REGARDLESS.
Once XERO has been breached and makes FOX News and CNN it will wish they had taken security seriously.
HiAs Xero Partners, we think that it would be a great idea if we could log onto our Xero home screen and next to the list of our clients we could have KPI reporting.
I appreciate that Xero finally offers a receipt, but it should be a true one by reflecting how much was, well .
If you're already logged in and you click the link to Xero U, why take the user to a screen where they're required to log in again?
I'm surprised that in more than 2 years Xero didn't take care of this feature which is required by law!
This facility in Xero would be quite helpful to us.
xero.
I hope there is a built-in complete Xero CRM.
Xero prides itself on removing data entry, but then it forces you to reach for the mouse.
It would benefit me and i believe other users of xero if the following features could be included in the fixed assets page of zero.
It would benefit me and i believe other users of xero if the following features could be included in the fixed assets page of zero.
- It would be great to see an icon next to transactions with a file attached in Xero.
But I checked with Xero support and they said line numbers were not possible using stock templates or even with custom .
xero.
I've done this kind of thing in Moneydance and Quickbooks before, is it possible in Xero?
There seems to be numerous requests on this site for different facilities in xero to include gst.
This is a common reporting format requested by banks but is not currently available in Xero.
The files library is therefore where most of the bills arrive and we create bills in Xero from the library.
I love Xero, but here's something that would be of benefit to me, and maybe others.
(I know Xero is designed as a live system and that the idea is that all adjustments are made to the client data, but if you see some of the things our junior staff do you would understand why we can not let our clients see until we have the final results).
Having transitioned all my clients (very small client base) to xero, I now have no tax software.
How long before Xero will have tax returns?
Can Xero please remember when I have ticked awaiting payments on page 1 when I go to page 2 to choose more awaiting payments.
Provide the ability to share contacts between Xero entities or companies.
Sometimes we make a mistake, even though Xero is so user friendly.
Xero,Instead of emails being sent from message-service@post.
xero.
I know you'll say it's because of deliverability, but with a small amount of work on your side, we could set our own domain name up in Xero and configure our SPF records to allow Xero's servers to send mail from our domain.
xero.
xero.
Some clients raised this concern with me & would prefer this method rather than having to deal with multiple contacts in xero for one customer/supplier.
I am using Xero in a medical clinic and date of birth is sometimes the only way we can distinguish between two people with the same name.
Would be great to attach these to the leave applications when we schedule them in xero
xero.
There are many issues related to the Fixed Assets, we would request XERO to come up with the solution for the same ASAP.
We would LOVE a feature in xero to help automate the gift aid claims.
Having Xero change the default option would make it very easy to click through.
I cannot see that these templates can be edited within Xero?
We now have an infield calculator in all areas of Xero, EXCEPT the conversion balances screen?
It would be great if it was possible to attach a file to any costs within the Costs screen on a job in Practice Manager, similar to how it works with bills in Xero.
Unfortunately with XERO you can only see one or the other  Tech support has said that this cannot be done and I will have to resort to using their API to develop such a feature Has anyone already done this?
Xero is a great program and what i have been looking for for quite a few years but spoilt by this missing feature.
Love the auto superannuation feature, would also be great if xero gave a friendly email reminder if auto superannuation payments are late (wouldn't of thought this would be to hard given the due date is on there).
This would give Xero users a better indication of their liabilities on a day-to-day basis, as well as aid the accountant in year-end compliance.
We have had a client request that there be an option to set a particular tracking category as the default across all aspects of a Xero ledger.
To,Xero TeamI am working as book keeper in Xero for Berley.
And we have quite a few paper receipts, so I take a pic with my smartphone (using Microsoft Office Lens which crops the image to border the receipt automatically  :-)) and then email to my xero files inbox.
Will XERO implement ABN Lookup facility within the software?
it would help if xero remembered the gateway id and password!
An option to negate the numbers (very useful when credit card companies export charges as positive numbers instead of negative ones expected by Xero).
An easy option to delete previous CSV import options (right now Xero remembers the last import settings and if the file format changes you have to jump through hoops to get Xero to start again).
I support  with professional accounting services and offer paid Xero support and implementation advice to clients all over the globe.
It will be very helpful and a basic function if Xero would allow us to print MICR information on blank check stock.
It appears XERO does not allow tax rate percentages to change.
Up until recently I was strictly MYOB and to be honest I am coming around to Xero as resistance is probably useless.
What would be great if Xero had a small project management system.
It is difficult as an accountant to review the customer's bookkeeping in Xero or even another accountant's work.
Therefore could Xero please provide what Myob and other accounting softwares have done before.
I'm still trialing Xero and I'm up to the FAR and the subsequent sale of assets.
Unless I'm missing something Xero completely ignores GST in the sale of assets, leaving it up to us accountants to compensate.
It begs the question however as to WHY Xero can't handle all this through the FAR?
Great ideas were implemented in the early days of Xero with some great smarts such as that BAS period rolling forward.
When a Name or Town is entered and accidentally entered in the incorrect case e. g. "vICTORIA"OR "bILL sMITH"  it would be great if Xero can automatically correct this as Excel does and defaults to "Victoria" and "Bill Smith"
Xero recently added the ability to tag customers and suppliers with default G/L codes.
5% GST tax rates from the default NZ Xero set up.
Therefore, I most respectively submit that not doing this shows that Xero is engaging in deliberate censorship, contrary to its commitment to openness.
I have a client who uses Xero Touch to provide on the spot Quotations to customers.
"It seems to only thing missing in Xero Touch to allow quotations to be produced automatically, or am I missing a trick within Xero Touch?
Does Xero plan to have this happen automaticlly at some point?
Has Xero looked at the competitor purchase order systems, in order to make their product as "beautiful" as the competition?
It would be great to had a section for customer code so unleashed customer code can feed through to xero.
Once you have done this, logout of your online banking, return to Xero and try refreshing the feed.
This will also take Xero one step closer to becoming
The Xero Depreciation Schedule and Fixed Asset reconciliation reports only include the Asset name.
Xero doesn't seem to link the buying and selling.
Xero should have the smarts to know you want to know about the previous period if the current date is the first few days of the month.
This would be useful when a clients husband or wife calls me (when they have a different surname) so that I can search for them on Xero without having to ask their partners name.
Selling buttons is our primary activity and having a photo library in place within Xero would be very helpful to us as we have literally hundreds of different articles.
I know, a malicious staff member probably wouldn't throw out a folder of receipts, so why would they bother deleting documents from Xero Files?
Why do I have to complete 3 mouse clicks to log out of Xero?
I currently have an electrical contractor client that heavily uses this feature in QuickBooks, yet we have a workaround in Xero which allows him to create "Estimates" but is not very efficient.
i sure this could be solved VERY EASILY by you XERO wizards.
It would be helpful if Xero could pop up warnings in the date field.
First off, many hanks to Xero for always answering my questions and helping me out with problems in a timely manner.
Would appreciate Xero adding this option to the list under 'show asset'.
Could xero offer the option to print or print double sided?
xero.
I've found that audit clients using xero tend to send a standard user request to the audit staff member that they deal with rather than adding the audit firm as a second 'adviser'.
Suggest changing this label to "" to be consistent with the nomenclature in the Xero web site Contacts screen.
IE and other browsers now ignore the autocomplete=off attribute on passwords so Xero logins are arguably less secure than before.
The customer is not very familiar with Xero and doesn't have the training or knowledge to navigate the site very easily.
Facebook uses this option more for security purposes but I think it would be useful in Xero as it would help in walking a customer through the site when we are not with them in person.
It would be great if Xero had an easy way to search for files.
But Xero (and old school systems) defaults to 31 Dec 2014.
Why can't we have it that once our GST return has been finalised a Bill is automatically loaded into the Xero Systems?
It will ESPECIALLY HURT THE CPAs AND CHARTERED ACCOUNTANTS XERO WANTS MOST.
The XERO STOPPED CLOCK PRICES make 11 employees for $90 and 21 employees for $180 EQUALLY RIDICULOUS!
This functionality exists currently in Freshbooks, would love to see it in Xero!
You then have the choice of attaching documents from Xero files or from your machine.
Match internally to find a Xero Network key & in-turn auto populate contact details.
Yes I'm lazy and that is why I love Xero.
The multi-currency version of Xero is currently targeted at larger businesses that deal in multiple currencies.
As book-keepers we do a number of updates to Xero for clients from the EOY Trial BALs provided by their accountants (NOT all you qualified folk part of the Xero revolution yet so we have to convert financial info from various systems).
If users create contacts in the Xero backend, very often they already have the same contacts in Outlook / Google, etc.
Would be great to have an active sync between contacts entered in Outlook/Google and/or Xero.
Could be an Outlook plugin which allows to choose contacts for syncing with Xero by clicking a checkbox in the application for each contact that shall also be assigned to Xero.
Xero will have more information of this contact (Financial Information etc. )
I have the xero app and while it looks very good, i found a major problem.
xero.
I love gocardless and how it integrates with Xero.
For those of us using the Xero Touch app on Android that are partners, having lots of clients and having to sit there and scroll through them all until we find the one we want is painful!
And when Xero does not talk to WFM to pull job numbers generated there, it is not a very nice system to be working in.
In fact, make the user roles more defined by us, not Xero.
When  will Xero work on developing their software for the Singaporean Market?
The Xero standard response seems to be "10% of volume, too bad, delete transactions, screen scraping and we can't do anything about it".
Dear Xero,SEPA will standardise euro electronic payments across Europe.
I encourage partners to vote for this change - Xero may then provide us with this functionality.
xero.
com or expenses@xero.
I have 3000 customers and it is impossible to find them in Xero without clicking on each one to check the correct address?
Every day I am exporting to Excel and then creating my own running balance column - its so basic, yet Xero doesn't do it.
MYOB allows adjusting entries to be input in the 13th period meaning that the accountants end of year (or end of month) journals can be effectively separated from the clients management figures - it would be great if Xero could do this too.
Xero to Xero is a great feature and certainly helps with on-charging between related entities etc.
When I'm entering details of bills and other line items in Xero, I'm always having to enter a quantity of '1'.
However, we do have a possible way for you to enter these in Xero.
Currently Xero only supports 12 month financial years.
It would be soooo good if we could contact Xero to restore the file back to a previous date!
HiI'm an accountant who uses Xero Partner Edition.
Without this, I must create an expense claim manually each month because the I'm paying by a credit card not watched by Xero.
I have had one of my clients request the limit of 5 organisations shown in the 'my xero' drop down list be increased.
xero.
Pre-payments are handled a bit strangely within Xero.
and submit the receipt directly to Xero.
For clients that sell businesses or wind up entities but are require to maintain records for five years and longer for legal reasons Xero needs a read only option.
I think that Xero is a powerfull to manage bussiness.
It would be awesome if SecurePay was integrated into Xero, I'm sure there are many users of this gateway who are also using xero!
Since WorkflowMax is Xero owned, this should be quite simple ?
We've had to go schedule these things in an external calendar (Basecamp) so we can get a snapshot view of financial activities and deadlines related to Xero reports.
Ideally a calendar widget could be added to the Xero calendar.
xero.
xero.
xero.
If Xero could resolve this by then that would be fantastic.
I have a Xero customer whose main own customer  uses SAP.
from my XERO customer contain a “Vendor number”.
A few weeks ago I wrote a blog post related to common size financials and why it is important, hopefully this can bring some ideas of the Xero developers.
If necessary, Xero could calculate the percentage from the amount entered and populate the discount column accordingly.
I love the expense claim feature in Xero Touch, which allows our travelling staff to submit their individual expense claims on the go, rather than dumping a big pile of paper-receipts on our bookkeeper's desk on return.
In the USA, Xero "Check Styles" only supports vertical and horizontal alignment adjustments.
With my manual journals, I simply make the journal which will also creates the file in another tab and its ready to be uploaded to Xero.
I realise foreign currency is really complex, and I can see why Xero uses a base currency.
When dissecting it would be handy if Xero automatically calculated the amount left and allocated it to the next expense item eg 100 spent 50 on one expense then 50 automatically prefills to the next expense when entered and If there was a third it would allocate the remaining amount to that expense
It would be great if you could enter your every day out of pocket expenses into Xero while you are OFF LINE.
co. za/ who can make sure SA hears about XERO and us Partners here.
While I love Xero, as it's footprint becomes larger and larger, security could become an issue.
There's no way to attach documents to the employee record, which would allow the payroll component of Xero to function as a basic (yet suitable) HR system.
Because of this, I would really appreciate having a refresh button for the credit card feed in the Xero Touch iPhone app urgently as I prefer using that app to access my transactions quickly and easily.
The fact that the previous request was implemented also raises questions regarding Xero's impact assessment process prior to implementing changes.
I love the expense claim feature in Xero touch except that the users cannot submit a claim.
This could be done either by having a central set of rules stored in Xero for the practice which you could choose to apply or a CSV file that can be exported and then imported for each client as appropriate.
It would be nice if landscape mode was available for Xero touch.
The accounting system we migrated from to Xero used to allow this function.
I can't imagine it would take but a day for a single Xero staff member to whip up the appropriate template.
Since tax rates are assigned to one specific VAT registration only it is simple for Xero to keep track what belongs to what VAT registration.
It would be really good if Xero could provide some settings regarding the tracking catagories.
I want Xero to be my single point of reference for key financial metrics.
With Xero at moment do not exist a margefiled to apply into the document.
When posting manual journals, why can't Xero autofill latest line with the balancing figure?
I understand in Xero I can create rules based upon Groups (but have to first create at least one of your own groups.
As a Xero partner I would love to have a client notification system for all the clients we act for.
For those of us that have been using Xero across more than one financial year, we are often wanting to archive previous financial year reports.
I would love Xero to implement the ability to run their Trial Balance with a "from" and "to" date.
I have set the autosave features on MS Office to avoid this situation, but it would be great if this function was available on Xero.
It would be great if xero could integrate with http://gocardless.
There is however one issue that bothers me and that Xero have not fixed yet.
And this does not work with Xero.
Xero should indicate what actually occurred.
It would be great if when searching from My Xero and where there are a large volume of entities the search included the Legal / Trading Name of the entity as well as the Display name.
xero.
Is this being worked on already perhaps by Xero?
until comapatible with Xero import requirements, import, then assign to category (within Xero/PayPal) as required.
I believe that this added feature would also enhance the payroll function of Xero
Ok Xero, some serious design flaws1.
As a bookeeper, I share a number of Xero clients with accountants.
If you are a user of Xero and JobAdder, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
For vat returns that deal with international trade the descriptions in xero and where they are then posted to on the vat return is not always correct.
Without it they will not move to Xero.
Xero already has an Asset Register which takes control of buying and selling Assets.
Wouldn't it be great if we could lodge our activity statements with the ATO directly from Xero?
xero.
xero.
xero.
I am an ardent fan of Xero and have been using it for many years.
I genuinely hope that Xero goes on to  becomes the worlds pre-eminent accounting platform.
We are not in a partnership with Xero, we are clients of Xero and we would prefer to keep our relationship with our own clients separate.
When will Xero release integration with Bartercard Australia?
Is this something that needs to initiate from Bartercard NZ, Bartercard Australia or Xero.
I have been using Xero on Ipad recently and I would love to see a similar app for Blackberry smartphones.
We love the tracking codes feature of Xero (indeed the main reason why we moved from QuickBooks Online).
I quickly discovered that that Xero's import CSV system is *really* picky.
I encourage Xero to adopt this principle:Cheers,Tim
After finally moving from another cloud accounting system to Xero so far everything has been great.
It is the same with the screenshots from this Xero help page: http://help.
xero.
They might also leave it to an accountant to enter closing stock to Xero with manual journals.
The issue with setting up a eCommerce shop is creating and managing a 'product', If I have sold a service and want a easy credit card facility, I think Xero can take all the existing work placed into invoicing and make this happen.
xero.
Its a bit of a pain when I get interupted from Xero (by customers & staff) & when I come back I find I have to login again.
http://xero.
com/forums/5528-xero-api/suggestions/2409072-api-overpayments-prepayments-  Aaron
I'm generally VERY HAPPY with Xero's functionality but I'm equally DISTURBED to find that there's no built-in facility to export/backup my data.
I appreciate that Xero take justifiable pride in the knowledge that they've designed their infrastructure to be resilient and as bullet-proof as possible .
Since we are in the cloud and not exactly in the loop of the operations, I think it will be best to have push notifications for some features of Xero.
You may have other examples that will help Xero take notice of this.
Xero currently does not support this.
I'm enjoying using Xero, but I have to be honest, I find support via email frustrating.
It took me hours to enter the opening balances into the Xero opening balances screen.
On a couple of the contacts, the name was spelled a little different (a period at the end of Ltd in Xero and not in the CRM).
I can accrue it in Xero, and I can calculate it manually, but I think it would be more useful to the client if it were in the reports already.
Xero has a TERRIBLE help search.
com to a Google search, instead of using the terrible Xero help search.
I hope this helps and remain a huge fan of Xero.
After all, speed is what Xero is all about.
This also will save considerable computer resources for Xero.
I am very wary of using the statement function, and it is another thing on Xero which needs too many more clicks than should be necessary.
I am yet to sign up for Xero and am going through a bit of research to see if it suits my needs before doing so - so please excuse this if it is already an obvious feature.
Have Xero thought about utilising the BPay reference fields?
I would love to see either integration with a third-party recurring billing system, or the addition of a recurring billing function in Xero itself.
When will Xero have a proper stock control system with purchase orders and tracking of stock quantities by each SKU (for each colour and size of each item)?
Also having everything work inside Xero is simply a better user experience than using a different software product for inventory.
I have looked at controlling inventory in Big Commerce (our e-commerce solution, which has an integration with Xero via OneSaas), but this has several major bugs (such as preventing customers from buying out of stock products).
Ultimately something built into Xero would be the best system and certainly a more elegant option than working with multiple programs.
It doesn't have to be an advanced multi-warehouse system, but something that will allow me to keep tabs of my stock from within Xero.
Does Xero know about this setback?
HiI want to start using expense claims to automate the process - removing the type it into excel, print it or email to finance, finance enter into xero.
xero.
com/2012/01/xero-developer-workshop/#more-23347
It would be great if XERO remembered all my preferences all throughout the system.
Don't get me wrong I love Xero but come on guys when is it coming?
This is really convenient as the purchase prices and descriptions are in the inventory items on Xero already.
As Xero is written in .
I've asked this directly of Xero, and been told the request will be passed to product management for consideration.
Xero stores cash and accrual entries: https://help.
xero.
Or is this already in Xero because i could not find it.
At the moment clients may inadvertently think the PSAR has not been lodged (even though it has been lodged through Practice Manager) and may resubmit directly in Xero.
This may cause issues particularly when there are ETPs that can not currently be lodged through Xero.
My employees aren't allocated to holiday groups, but if I record holiday they've taken in Xero, Xero shows separate lines for holiday days and working days on their payslips.
We aren't currently using the timesheet functionality in Xero payroll.
I was not aware that this should be the remaining balance, not the full amount for the year, and in my first payroll after I set up, Xero deducted &#163;3000 from my PAYE/NI due to HMRC.
For some reason Xero calculates the daily rate using 252 days.
Adding this feature would make Xero more appealing to those small to medium construction/labour hire companies also.
It has come to my attention that Xero is not handling payroll properly on tipped employees.
Xero ends up displaying a negative check amount.
After Xero reaches a zero amount to pull from  it needs to stop trying to fulfill the tax obligation and issue a check for an amount of Zero.
Does Xero have a Payroll update coming to include Single Touch Payroll ATO requirements?
It would be good to have this feature available through the payroll functionality in Xero.
It would be extremely helpful if Xero would support paying employees that live in a different state than the state they live in.
Stillwater has a lot of small businesses that could really benefit from using Xero, but then they would have to go a different route for payroll.
Xero does not have the ability to have two anniversary dates for calculating leave.
It would be very helpful if Xero would provide individual W-2 forms this year rather than a single file.
We have liaised with Xero support and can not come up with a useable solution.
I'm asking for this feature, so I can give my clients an excel document, where they can input the data and import it to xero.
Currently when reporting Washington state workers compensation in Xero I have to first enter in all the hours workers worked and then go to an external spreadsheet program to calculate workers compensation.
This feature would allow us to offer Xero Payroll as a viable option for our farming clients.
I think Xero should really look into setting that up.
I have discovered a problem today with my Payroll and the Employee Contribution for Auto-Enrolment using Xero payroll.
Enable exporting of payroll items from one Xero file into another Xero file
I searched far and wide for the functionality within Xero Payroll to compensate owners via an owner's draw without any withholding.
One of my clients has recently completed their first payroll run since auto-enrollment and wished to show this information on their employees payslips, but alas Xero cannot/does not allow this information to be shown with out a workaround.
xero.
The folder icon linked to each employee if an EMPDUPE is downloaded for lodgement outside of Xero, as a record that the employee has been included in the EMPDUPE.
Xero defaults to the standard amount.
Xero subscription levels are generally linked to payroll numbers.
But so so happy timesheets are now part of Xero Me!
It would be really handy if the payroll records could be exported from Xero so that they can be imported into another Xero file
I asked my bookkeeper to see if Xero had this capability.
To download P9X codes from HMRC through government gateway to Xero Payroll.
I'm a great believer of Xero however if you let one of my clients down you let me down as well as a "Partner".
I would find it extremely useful if there was a Delete function within the Xero Superannuation section.
Ensuring that drivers hold current licences would be significantly easier if this informaiton is incorporated into the employee details section in Xero Payroll and tracked for expiry.
would be great if xero could have this feature with their payroll as well.
I don't know if Xero as it as 1st January, 6th April (start of tax year) or 1st July (our accounting date).
We currently are allowed 1 tracking category for timesheets, where as two categories are allowed in the rest of xero.
Right now we would have no way to track this information in Xero.
The only wish I have is that Xero could handle the Financial Reporting.
I'll go back and revisit and think about it a bit more but for something so simple it would be nice if Xero could handle it.
Xero is a beautiful accounting system but it really lacks here having to double enter each employee's hours in lieu, which makes the whole process rather inefficient mundane and tedious.
I have not used Xero payroll yet so I apologise if this topic has already been covered.
It would be great to have a TEC amount display on the payrun screen when preparing payruns in xero.
When entering fractions into payslips Xero treats this as whole dollars.
5 hours worked Xero converts it to 5 hours.
Xero requires that I enter 0.
This is not consistent with Xero accounting that allows .
Can Xero send an email to admin on the first day of an approved employee leave application to remind us they're on leave on that day?
The feature that already exists on Xero in other countries, it would be great if Timesheets came to UK Payroll on Xero.
Given Xero has already done this with Bills, surely it is simple to port this functionality across to payroll as well?
MYOB had a similar feature built into their software so it would be helpful if Xero had the same.
Most payroll software systems I have used allow rollback before submission of RTIIs this something that Xero are going to introduce?
We have started using Xero payroll for a client.
xero.
It was easily drilled down to find this information in MYOB, but seems not so in Xero.
We have recently started trialling the timesheet entry facility in Xero.
I have been told by Xero, two run separate payrolls for the two branches I must run separate Xero ledgers.
I'm using deputy and to sync with Xero it requires large Syntax behind each Earning name.
These entries are also locked in Xero and no details would be changed.
No cloud offering can match xero's service, but xero cant deal with such a large number of employees.
HiWe LOVE Xero!
We recommend Xero.
We can't live without Xero.
Client who uses many casuals have huge turnover of staff so employee list in Xero is very long.
page=21)Xero currently keeps on paying superannuation no matter how much an employee earns and this can cause big problems.
Current work around presented by Xero support is messy and easy to make an error in either the PAYG or SGC calculations.
xero.
Currently if admin creates a times sheet for a staff member, that staff member cannot log into xero and see that timesheet.
xero.
I have raised this issue with support since payroll was released in xero and they say they are still working on it.
It would be handy if Xero could provide an interface or mechanism for this.
Another option would be for Xero to load public holidays based on country and region.
I have asked Xero before and had a totally useless response - after several days and several messages.
I find payroll SO slow to load and when I click on Payruns for example, it crashes and gives me a Xero error message - it makes it real tedious when you have eight companies and only 3-5 employees on each .
After emailing support back and forth, I get the impression that Xero has not thought through backup withholding for independent contractors when designing its 1099 reporting.
I have seen xero has an import feature.
I have Square and Xero linked up together.
XERO.
Xero - why have you taken of my discussion, the matter has not been resolved.
Then I thought "there must be some way I can enter this monthly income total into Xero, even though there's no data feed for it".
This would massively increase my productivity and thus my satisfaction with Xero as a whole.
Xero tax used on Chrome and Mozilla was painfully slow and now I can no longer accessI did manage to log in today on IE, which was fine at first, but gradually became slower and other apps such as word, excel and office became non responsive while Xero tax open.
These two major problems with Xero how I already said could save us lot of research, checking and errorsPlease Xero People take this for you and make your product better.
I have one client that has used xero fixed assets since 1/7/14.
PS I asked xero support to help me with this but they said they couldn't.
We are looking to integrate Xero with our EDI solution.
Our provider has asked what EDI Message format can be produced by Xero For example – CSV; XML; ASCii, etcDoes anyone happen to know?
I want to test Xero and Unleashed integration.
I am concerned that I cannot 'undo' the test cases in Xero.
xero.
I am an accountant whose client uses Xero.
Also wanted to become certified as more clients are switching to Xero but am unable to that as well.
xls file from the P&L in xero a box pops ups and says a program is not associated with it.
Im using windows 10 but dont know how to associate a program to xero to it.
I am trying to link this USD CC to Xero.
I have received help from Xero in setting up my Dashboard and they were very good about it.
Previous to Xero we used QuickBooks Enterprise and I can count the number of errors over the last 5 years where vendors accidentally shipped items to our address instead of the drop ship address on one hand.
But within the first couple of weeks of using Xero we've had vendors wrongly shipping items to our offices instead of the drop ship address.
Xero lists the company address at the top, all the items in the middle, and the shipping address way at the bottom where it's easy to miss.
Xero lists the shipping address at the bottom as the "delivery details" instead of "ship to address".
I assume all that is necessary is a confirmed email address rather than details of a Xero Organisation etc?
As per the Xero guide, I have followed the following steps:1.
What are Xero's plans in regards to this?
</Id>  <Status>OK</Status>  <ProviderName>Xero API Previewer</ProviderName>  <DateTimeUTC>2017-04-10T05:27:04.
2 years on and Xero still seems to fail at allowing us to import Paypal transactions simply.
Due to Xero not importing all the needed Paypal info automatically I have to imort it manually.
Very frustrating that one fo the key areas of Zero I tackle on a monthly basis still seems to prone to human error and is far from as simple as Xero has made the rest of the process.
Searched and tried several methods from the Xero forums with no luck.
xero.
xero.
xero.
Xero can you enlighten me?
And would this appear ok in Xero?
xero.
I have recently converted to xero from MYOB.
Currently I have all the receipts for the year and I wish to upload it to Xero.
I have recently started with Xero, and I am so confused!
When a customer record is created, Xero allows adding a few contact names.
This Xero  shows the process of entering receipts.
I'm thinking of encouraging my charity clients to move over to Xero.
There are various 3rd party portals and apps available that integrate with Xero.
As there are limitations as to what can be accessed via the Xero API and also what functionality 3rd party product offers (i. e. box.
Xero themselves offer a number of products that act as modules and offer specific functionality and integrate with the Xero core:https://www.
xero.
There is no information for how long, there is no information that Xero is even aware of it, let alone that they are working on restoring it.
I'm not sure how to reflect those payments in Xero on the credit card side.
I hope Xero looks into this in the near future.
Apologise as I have only audited clients on Xero before not actually prepared the BAS etc using Xero.
Would you recommend we import our company data to get used to Xero with (from Sage line 50), and then 'reset' before going live?
xero.
I tried transferring the transactions from USER2 to USER1 but Xero won't match the transactions.
It would be great if Xero had a batch bills posting facility.
My question is, if I go back to the first of these transactions (from the milkshake shop lets say) and change the rule to reflect reality, will this then change how all of the following transactions, from the same milkshake shop, are recorded in xero?
My tax returns have all been submitted to the ATO but it appears the information in xero is grossly inaccurate.
we came across from MYOB to Xero.
however since yesterday Xero creates a .
We have a situation where we have multiple small donations (1000+) each month and these are posted as a bulk figure onto Xero.
xero.
I noticed that it was broken Friday afternoon & contacted Xero Support.
co. uk/xero/issue-with-directcost-and-bill.
HiWe converted from MYOB to Xero several months ago and we now find the conversion balance entered was out by a substantial amount.
It would be ideal if Xero could provide a universal tick box list of areas to allow a user to access - or at the very least look at the fairly common roles people have in organisations and allow specific access for those roles.
how do I change the first screen you see when you login to Xero?
However Xero allows me to browse and select but then seems to be forever processing the import request.
We started using Xero 1/7/20152.
I have logged this with Xero support.
I know I cannot sync inventory between Square and Xero.
We work on client projects where we have to provide evidence of costs categorised as project expenses (travel, accommodation, etc), this can sometimes be 50 receipts+ - so more than 50+ transactions in XERO.
I have also placed this question directly with Xero support.
As usual we submit VAT returns using Xero, directly to HMRC (entering logons and passwords etc), which are then shown under 'Filed with HMRC'.
If I manually send it, I am concerned Xero will try to send it later.
This would be their only access to Xero.
Is there a way of recording on xero when deductions are made so that I can keep a track of this and also so that it will be included when I come to do my end of year return?
csv to Xero.
I've tried contacting Xero's customer support and they don't seem to understand the issue I'm having.
How can I update Xero manually to tell it that I have submitted both the last quarters manually rather than have it try to post them itself?
Ability to mark a PO as delivered/  billed - or to generate a PI from a POBasically upping the PO section of Xero.
If a purchase items from a supplier using a purchase order in Xero we currently create the purchase order and send it to the supplier.
I have been working on putting items from our last few months of credit card bills into Xero, and noticed that all transactions are showing up as "received".
Most of it was fine, except that there are some overpayments in both the debtor and creditor totals that Xero doesn't seem to know what to do with.
Ok, so I get that Xero apparently doesn't work the way I envision.
I think it would be a great addition if we could have departments and department heads within xero.
When I first set up xero I was dabbling with it for a while and made many errors trying to set things up.
I have follow the steps of Xero's Suggestion, used Conversion Tools etc.
Also I also send email to "Xero Support" with attachment.
I own single family home rental properties, and I'm trying to set these up correctly in Xero.
I have searched through Xero help and the forums but cannot seem to find the solution.
Started with Xero yesterday.
xero.
Im having difficulty with Xero taking so long to react to request and becomes unresponsive.
It is a critical item and I believe Xero could help us by providing it.
We're looking to work with a Xero expert, in a paid capacity, to help us to understand what is possible with Xero and how we can develop it via adds-on to meet out ever-expanding needs.
Was this Xero Document Designer implemented?
I started using xero in October and cliniko in July.
Without knowing the machinations of setting up a cyber fraud syndicate I'm concerned that emails being sent via Xero are being monitored & this might have happened to other Xero users.
Dear Xero!
I've been in contact with Xero support and whilst they gave me good advice about updating the third party permission for paypal I still haven't had a resolution to my issue over a week later.
How can we close a VAT period on Xero to prevent the value submitted to HMRC changing?
They have refunded me, but I am unsure of how to document this in Xero?
Keeps coming up unable to load Xero
Hey there,I'm running a woocommerce website and using the Xero plugin to pull all the transactional data.
I am a certified QuickBooks Advisor, and through my organization have recently begun using Xero as an Advisor.
For example, I have 3 rows in P/L, they are:Gross profitExpensesNet profit (=Gross – Expenses)And I also have 3 columns, they are:Actual           Budget            Variance (=Actual – Budget)So, for variance of Net Profit, does Xero calculate it by using Variance of Gross profit – Variance of Expenses, or by Actual Net profit – Budgeted Net profit?
Our team have commented over the last months that Xero performance is falling away and downtime seems to be increasing.
I have introduced my client to the Xero app for submitting expense claims.
It integrates with Xero via API.
With this in mind, I'm curious as to how Xero records VAT information from items under £2000 which I've labelled with VAT, does it know to not include this in my VAT return?
pngAm I right in thinking Xero is advanced enough to know that it shouldn't allow me to reclaim that VAT in my yearly VAT return?
It seems that Xero has a template which you can put the fields which correlate to the space provided.
What do I do If I want to change things up and make a custom template which is different to which Xero offers with regard to locations of fields of data.
When I try putting these details into Xero it fails.
Xero still seems to ask for a User ID, Password and Passcode Digits - these no longer work at Barclaycards end!
But, XERO doesn't deduct the 0.
We have the multi-currency version of Xero and that is fine for most things.
Or perhaps Xero can implement a change?
We're considering whether to switch from Quickbooks to Xero.
Does Xero also have this feature?
Maybe Xero requires strings to be quoted in the CSV?
Does Xero have this option available?
I am aware that students could access Xero for a free trial, but without data this would be ineffective.
Is Xero payroll currently down?
I read a thread from 2012 asking the same thing and a Xero team member saying they were introducing this feature and 4 years later there still isnt?
We are embarrassingly chasing for payments that have been made but Xero doesn't know about it.
QIF for example, Xero duplicates ALL the entries because it de-dupes on a different description field.
I moved to Xero as I thought I could avoid manual entry as I was already doing manual statement changes from our current system.
but although the Xero manual at https://help.
xero.
I've only used Xero for a few days but there is so much wrong with it that I can't believe it gets a good rating.
• Xero don't seem to listen to their users and update their app based on the feedback?
I moved to Xero because of the rating, i'm now thinking I could create my own accounting website/app and blow this out of the water.
We have proudly used Xero for management purposes for already three years.
I am doing a favour for a friend who i recommended Xero too.
HiWe are exporting from an external software into Xero.
Is this something Xero is working on?
I've starting using Xero this year and have back dated it to April.
Hello allI am now on my third bookkeeper this year and none so far have used Xero.
another story) to go through all of Xero to bring up to dateSo.
Have contacted Xero support and there response is to get Xero whitelisted at my clients end.
I'm not asking 30 clients to whitelist Xero.
This is adding a lot of additional work compared to the 'old reports' function that Xero offered.
I read another article written back in 2012 asking for this feature and it seemed to have a lot of people asking for it,In 2014 xero said it would be added shortly after the response it was getting.
I'm currently using the trial version of Xero.
hello,Can somebody help me and tell me where i can find manual journal tab in Xero ?
We have messed up our Xero contact file (no fault of Xero).
Also there is no Contact or support that I can talk to at Xero.
The CBA have told me to contact Xero.
Hello, I'm very inexperienced when it comes to accounting and Xero.
I cannot create a journal entry as there is nothing to debit until installment payments are made against the outstanding money owed and Xero want let you create a journal entry without debit and credit amounts being equal.
I have ordered an item on Xero, so I have raised a purchase order and now i have the item.
Currently has Xero and WorkFlow Max.
Perhaps this needs the joint c-operation of Xero's partners such as Stripe?
My GST return did not 'file' to IRD from within Xero.
I do find it very annoying that Xero don't have telephone support, Sent a email in to them at 12:00 still no response 4 and a half hours later!
I have searched high and low within Xero to try and work out what has happened with little success.
We used MYOB and moved to Xero.
and I have set this up in Xero.
Hello,I've been using Xero for several months and slowly getting used to the way it works.
I am using Xero and am currently retrospectively getting things sorted.
I am in the middle of converting to tracked inventory in Xero.
I have contacted Xero Support couple days ago but no response so far.
How long does it take on average for Xero support to respond to queries?
This forum gives you a space to ask, and answer, questions about Xero, accounting, and beyond!
A little while ago we added an Official Xero Update.
How would i reconcile these transfers through Xero?
Xero crashed, and when I tried to close down and open - nothing.
The next batch of expenses have been added to Xero.
I've reconciled all my items in the 'Reconcile' tab in Xero.
I have been using MYOB for more than 20 years and have recently switched to Xero.
2 - Issued a cheque a month before (ie April) we switched to xero.
The next day i received the funds and the transaction showed in Xero.
xero.
We've had a case in with Xero going on for a month now and the feed still doesn't function properly.
I am an accountant reviewing a year and a half of Xero entries.
I have been advised by Accountant to set up Asset (being 2 vehicles purchased in 2014 and prior to us using Xero).
Or am I better off sticking with untracked inventory, or taking my inventory offline into a spreadsheet and have my accountant do journals in Xero every month/quarter/year?
All these transactions are sent "live" to Xero.
Hello,We've been using Xero for a few month now and generally we can find a suitable user role for all our staff.
Our challenge is that all the bills are ending up under unpaid bills in Xero.
xero.
The Xero file was basically used as an ongoing trial/practice tool.
I thought there was a Xero user directory but can't find one.
xero.
Contacted Xero for support and got nowhere.
Xero only give a few expense options: COS, operating and other.
I would have thought there would be a way to edit this in Xero?
If you export data a larger amount of data from Xero to an Excel spreadsheet, you get a "running out of memory" error when you try to open the spreadsheet.
I have a client in the US that uses Xero.
On speaking with technical support at bankline - they tell me this has to be done by speaking with xero.
I started using Xero about 6 months ago, trialling it out when i was converting from MS Money.
I was planning to run them in parallel, but for various reasons, I relied on MS Money (which I was familiar with) and only sporadically did Xero.
Now, from 1st July I am committing to Xero and will let MS Money go.
I've meticulously gone through a print out of my online banking statements, comparing it to the feed imported into Xero.
I have messaged the Xero help desk on this.
Has anyone else run two versions of xero in this way and how have they found it, can it be done under one log in?
However it became apparent that the cost of goods sold would be easier if I selected 'I track this item' and after looking on this community support page and the Xero help pages I think that is what I should have selected.
I started using Xero well into the financial year, and imported all transactions prior to my start date with Xero, so that I would have the full financial year reconciled.
We see Xero advertising a lot over various media.
I am having major problems with my screen freezing while using Xero only.
I repeated few more times, but everytime Xero couldn't handle it.
What has happened to XERO support?
Currently I go into My Xero/Staff and then have to click on each person and tick their access for a particular client.
Hello we are currently evaluating Xero after having been in Quickbooks for the past 15 years.
95 so and in Xero it's obviously showing a transaction of &#163;11.
We see and read about all sorts of Xero-NAB offerings and enhancements.
Xero looking into?
Currently I am getting a 500 error after logging into Xero.
xero.
I sent an image and email to support@xero.
I am trying to send one email to all our contacts in Xero.
On several occasions, we've seen multiple transactions:* a Microsoft subscription for the same amount but with different referrence lines and a day apart;* a Xero fee of $1 the day after the feed showed the fee for the normal monthly subscription of $60 (We emailed Xero about this but never got a response!
However, it has happened enough now over the last 12 months that somewhere along the line our balance in Xero no longer matchs what Citibank says it is, so we have to go back and triple check everything (if not for an eagle eyed assistant this could have gone on for longer).
Citibank deny all knowledge of a problem as they cannot see these odd figures or transactions on their system, yet they seem to be appearing on the feed when it arrives in Xero?
I don't want to overwrite the existing descriptions as they have each been edited individually in Xero with characters that cannot be imported.
I have searched the Xero Guide several times without success.
Hello,We are in the process of setting up Xero.
I am struggling to sort out the best way to handle reconciling two transactions I have in Xero.
I have also emailed Xero support directly and have yet to receive a response.
I have renamed the CSV and moved it to a different directory on my computer thinking that Xero is trying to be smart and save me some work.
Can Xero adopt the same ability so that calculations can be done in Xero rather than on a calculator manually and figures entered into Xero?
i am looking to enter departments Budgets in Xero.
I run multiple eCommerce stores that all feed data into Xero using a connector program.
I am using Xero for a start-up in Costa Rica and having issues with exchange rates.
I saw that Xero doesn't support this feature at the moment.
My colleagues and I have been having a lot of trouble sending anything through Xero.
we find xero double billed us.
I seem to have run into some sort of limit, Xero won't allow me to send any emails to customers now.
We are in the construction industry, and for supplier bills with retentions, we enter two bills into Xero.
I'm trying to contact Xero Support and I keep getting a recurring error saying "My email is not formatted correctly"  I haven't changed anything and have filed cases in the past sucessfully.
HelloHow do I work out the break-even point in XERO?
9 € xero imports 12.
I want to subscribe to Xero directly and invite my accountant as an advisor.
I had a (not very competent apparently) accountant who set me up on Xero and one of the items that was imported from Zen Payroll/Gusto is coded for the wrong year, and I can't change it.
Hello Xero community!
Between 11:25 and 12:30 the Xero service was not accessible in NZ today being Wednesday the 24.
Does Xero have a contact support phone number?
=========================================Not good Xero down.
One of the reasons I transitioned to Xero.
We try to match-up  xero with own finance programme.
xero.
I think XERO is a good accounting package, but I may have to look elsewhere if there are not any alternatives made to subscribing.
We are a small brick and mortar retailer that uses square as a POS system and have the sync turned on between Xero and Square.
HiI am currently trialling Xero for our registered charity.
Alternatively it would be great if when you opened a purchase in xero if the attached pdf could automatically open in a preview pane to the right.
I'm having problems with using Xero and the support team haven't been much help to date.
I've asked for a call from Xero, but I'm not holding much hope.
If we book this as a bill with date 31 dec 2015, will Xero recognize this as the accounting period?
We're considering a migration from our current accounting software Freshbooks, to Xero.
I am using Xero for my online store.
Is there anything else that Xero uses to populate this field?
my question is  how to import closed status purchase bill into xero, and remain closed status.
They are telling me that it is an issue with Xero.
Xero newbie here.
Our sale recipients are downloaded directly into Xero.
Not sure how Xero deals with this.
I have been using Xero Touch to log my expenses when out and about.
Is deliverability of Xero email generally pretty reliable?
Does anyone have an effecitve and efficient method for recording Paypal/Stripe fees in Xero to aid reconciling?
If I create an expense in Xero, it can't be matched against the income.
I am trying the 30-trial of Xero, hoping to move my accounting from QuickBooks.
It's my first day using Xero after having used Quickbooks for twenty years.
so i am trying to do a trial run inputting it into xero.
Looking to start bookkeeping with Xero for a startup.
I'm getting really frustrated with the way Xero handles Paypal.
So Log into Xero this morningGo to Look up a customer and Hello - The Contacts page has changedUm do we not get advised of changes/updates anymore?
We are trying to access the partner pricing of $5 per month for one of our client ledgers - at this stage xero is not letting that happen and its a minimum of $25 - I've tried the Xero support and they are next to useless.
It's pretty much the only thing we now don't do in Xero so it would be nice to get this into the system also if possible.
Xero documentation says the following, which we find to be untrue:In fact, all of our conversions have included all the items reconciled in QB.
I am in the process of converting my payroll from Wave to Xero.
The reason being have a lot of customers which only order from us ad hoc, and sadly unil we get the Xero/Insightly integration fully up and running, the only way I can get information on how often they order/when they last ordered, is based on the date we last invoiced them.
When paying multiple payees from a single debit (option with Westpac AUS), will Xero split the payees/payments on import?
xero.
Xero has obviously done something today that has changed when you create a batch file.
Hello I work for a small charity and we've recently moved to Xero from Excel-based accounting.
HiWe received an email last week which appeared to have come from Xero advising that there had been a security breach and some customers details were compromised and to change our passwords.
I'm not completely confident with Xero yet so I have a question regarding opening balances.
Hey Xero, confusing much?
I'm really struggling with the lack of detailed tutorial information on how to accomplish basic things in Xero.
Currently I'm finding Xero very clunky.
Transactions volume - I would be interested to know if any user currently processes more than 4,000 transactions a month into Xero?
can Xero?
I'm no Xero expert, so they got a pretty good demo from a Xero accounting firm.
Now, while I have been suggesting Xero, he has been suggesting Odoo.
So I'm no Xero expert, I'm also not a accounting software expert, and I'm certainly not a Odoo expert.
So my question is - why is Xero better?
Why should I recommend Xero over Odoo?
I'm stuck on how to process my rental arrangement in Xero at one of my practice locations.
Is there a way that Xero can recognize the payments including the phrase "STRIPE TRANSFER" as having incorporated the fee from Stripe?
Xero Support has been unhelpful in regards to this particular challenge so I'm posting here.
Of course, Xero makes exporting anything a total nightmare, and thus we are really struggling with cloning our entire Xero organization from one login to another.
copied out from one Xero to another.
When I asked Xero Support for support, they asked me to upvote a three year old request for this functionality.
HelloI am trying to setup the revenue side of Xero.
We love Xero but I'm sure we are not the only people with this issue!
have raised the problem with xero but I am desperate to get this information into xero so that I can start my end of month finance reporting-any help would be appreciated.
Hello allI am trying to become a Xero partner, and have completed that  form on Xero website many times.
She wants to track her furniture using Xero.
xero.
Xero is a beautiful accounting software.
some of the leading Xero advisors actively share expert advice and tips on Twitter.
How does this work with Xero?
I had also uploaded a QB file that was imported and there is a message that shows up under "My Xero" that says:"QuickBooks conversion complete.
Instead Xero keeps emailing me this bizarre message, with the comments in parenthesis being mine:"Hello there,Unfortunately your message sent on 2015-10-01 could not be delivered to one or more of the recipients.
com) (current email address in Xero)To: David Johnson (oldaddress@company.
Because I'm often at the same cafes making the same kind of purchase, Xero automatically suggests splitting the expense (it'll say "keep as two lines" in the reconciliation screen.
Xero only seems to cater to expense claims or future payable bills.
My current solution is I have to pull out the reports out of Xero in excel and manually do this.
I have one organisation in Xero, which gives three partners (and our accountant) different levels of access.
Xero promised with this release to improve bulk registration, but I don't see how they've solved anything at all.
We want these individuals to post their expense purchases direct into Xero in a similar way as those paid from a CREDIT card, or, their own cash/card.
xero.
We're considering moving to Xero and are performing due diligence by doing a test import from QB.
But I wanted to figure out what Xero offers first.
We are a practise that uses Xero to provide administration support for a number of charities in the UK including Gift Aid Management via the Tracking options.
However, Xero was not designed for this function and we are looking for an alternative addon to integrate with Xero but handle all the donation side of things, including generating the gift aid claims and backdating donations once a gift aid declaration has been received.
How can I enter a VAT surcharge onto xero.
May have been gone for a while as I don't look at Xero from that side often.
My workflow is: Shopify --> StitchLabs --> Xero.
Dear xero team and community,in the video about giving discounts (https://vimeo.
Even when they have logged out of Xero.
We are about 2 months behind now in sending out statements from Xero and really starting to panic!
Also, we have since wondered about the accreditation process of Xero "advisors".
if they have to be the same (which they cant be from our excel sheet) where would we enter profit to the point where we moved to xero?
Dear Xero Community,I have a question about credit cards and our transition from Quickbooks.
Oddly enough, my 2014 data has "paid credit card" but NOT my 2015 even though we switched to Xero about 3 weeks ago.
xero.
An employee paid a Bill that was already entered into Xero using personal funds.
I had a sale from a customer who paid only a 50% deposit on the order pre Xero migration.
I've come to Xero from QuickBooks in the past month.
I can see from the discussions that Xero don't do job numbers, but I'm now really confused having read several discussions, as to how to manage this downfall in Xero.
And is Xero taking community requests for this function seriously?
we're changing how we bill client for project work, and i'm not quite sure how to best go about setting this up in xero.
It will be great if Xero has a function that I can attach external file from my desktop.
Experienced accountant, with low Xero knowledge!
xero.
We are Xero Certified Accounting Partners as well as WorkflowMAX Certified Advisors and numerous related technologies.
As an example, our firm, aBIZinaBOX offers an integrated package to professional firms that includes Xero, WFM, Practice Ignition, Google Apps for Work, extended online collaboration options and other technologies.
com/groups/Xero-WorkflowMAX-Related-Apps-Professional-8352197.
Dear Sir/MadamI have been familiarizing with XERO software and I am on trial at the moment.
I am very much interested in this XERO software and I think its a great peice of work, please help me here.
Hello Xero forum.
Alternatively, is it possible for Xero  to include a pdf of the quote in the email forcing the client to go online?
As of July 1st we are using Xero for our invoicing.
01 that we got back from the sale, Xero says that £1.
For some stupid reason you cannot login from the xero.
Good Day,I am currently figuring out if Xero have a capability of reporting project based or contractual activities in terms of profit and loss.
Is there something that I haven't considered in Xero?
Looking to migrate over to Xero, but there is one feature that is absolutely mandatory for us.
I start using Xero at the beginning of this Quarter, 1/4/15.
Sometimes xero displays the wrong date on transactions.
I have recently changed from Quickbooks to Xero for this financial year.
Xero has perfectly good date pickers.
Xero however downloaded the transactions while they were still “pending”.
Xero should NOT be downloading “pending” transactions on credit cards because they may either go away or the value can change.
newbie to Xero and a bit confused about recording purchases.
xero.
If it's Xero.
com/groups/342074332572117/ - Xero User Group AdelaideAn eventsbrite invite will be up soon.
However, the "Activate Feed" window keeps defaulting to a Chase feed I already have in Xero.
I have raised this issue with Xero support who acknowledge the bug - and they've manually fixed up transactions I've identified that have this issue.
From past experience Xero haven't been too good at notifying you when a bug is fixed through normal support channels.
He currently uses Sharesight to take care of his portfolio transactions and wants to integrate this with Xero.
I want to be an expert in Xero for this purpose i have watched couple of videos and did some practice on demo Co.
On speaking with their accountant it was mentioned that Xero cannot directly speak to their Gov software, and this is a legal requirement for all companies in Portugal.
What would it take to get 17 hats integrated to xero?
People are constantly asking what bookkeeping software people are using and I am constantly touting xero.
xero.
I've been through all the solution steps Xero Customer Care has recommended and I'm still unable to export a batch file.
Calling Partners of Xero!
To apply a Xero promo code in your , simply:1.
Sign in to My Xero at , then select the  tab.
XERO HAS SOME INTEREST FOR THE ITALY MARKET SME AND ADVISOR?
I have PDF'd some receipts and emailed them from the scanner to my Xero files.
Annoying the central alignment means that the PDF obscures the Xero form.
The help docs say "Avoid changing your financial year end once you've set Xero up for your organisation and saved your conversion date, entered conversion balances and comparative balances.
I'm trying to reconcile Stripe payments within Xero.
I am interested in finding out if Xero is PCI compliant, and if so to what level?
If you are a user of Xero and PeopleMine, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
I don't see where Xero allows this.
00 off the amount that Xero say 'Money must match' ($1259.
I attempted to enter a minor adjustment, but then it throws Xero's calculation off and won't allow me to reconcile.
I want to move from Sage Instant to Xero.
xero.
We’ve created this space for High school, University, and Polytech tutors to share resources, discuss ideas about teaching with Xero, ask questions and share  answers with each other.
You can get updates from Xero Education here too.
This is then reconciled off Xero and simply marked as reconciled on the system.
I changed our Company name last month, But for some reason Xero thinks we changed it over a year ago and has put our GST period (2 monthly) out by 1 month should be 1 feb - 31 March.
A client has a year end of 31st March and started using Xero on the 1st April.
However if I set the conversion date as 1st May, Xero doesnt inlcude the transactions in April.
Xero Support,I am managing Xero for 3 companies and I have faced a problem on Friday when I invoiced one of company client from specified company portal.
Trying to reconcile such a transaction in Xero is then near impossible, as xero only uses the transaction history provided by paypal and doesn't have access to the sub-transactions needed to properly balance the books.
We appear to have came across a bug in Xero.
Xero has become the slowest performing cloud based program we run in our office, has anyone else noticed a decline in performance over the last month or so?
We are using Chrome as recommended and Xero is slow to open at login, when opening a client and when moving from field to field or screen to screen.
I would be interested in how others make Xero reports available to nonusers?
This makes the fixed asset module in Xero redundant for common assets such as buildings which are often acquire part way through their statutory useful life.
As a result a second FAR outside of Xero has to be maintained for building and all other capital works items that are acquired part way through their useful lives.
(Obviously 'transfer' will not work as this acc is not added into xero).
I was wondering whether it's possible to approve these on Xero Touch.
I also notice there is no bills feature in Xero Touch?
Detail:I receive one weeks worth of trading info from one of our venues, we record this in xero once a week, but each day is recorded (mon-sun) once checked off.
- How do I classify these payments to myself in Xero?
I am in the process of switching from sage to Xero and all in all its going smoothly.
I match this against a credit note created in Xero for the full dollar amount.
Is there anywhere in Xero that you can actually enter a credit limit for a customer?
I'm an NZ ,  and Xero's 2012 Most Valuable Professional.
Here is how our still free   program makes Xero far faster and more accurate.
It can easily take several days, over a period of many months, to get a good set of error-free Xero Rules.
However, Xero cannot copy Rules between clients.
All that remains is my basic profile when I log in, but I won't be using Xero again and don't want to leave a profile behind as legacy.
I followed the instructions in the thread about deleting during a 30 day trial, however the Xero interface has changed since then and the instructions no longer make sense.
The feeds work for a few weeks and then fail and my client has to contact Xero to get it fixed which usually takes a few days, sometimes 4 or 5 working days.
if these cant be shown xero it will be a huge problem
com) allows you to create custom searches so that from your desktop (presuming you are logged into Xero) you can search your Xero contacts.
xero.
For title: Xero.
Now, when I want to quickly search for a Xero contact I launch Alfred (Cmd+space bar), type 'x' and client name.
I press enter and Xero opens with the contact record.
We often have to do catch up work for clients and have found it extraordinarily inefficient to reconcile by "older" means in Xero due to the fact that you have to open each transaction to reconcile it if it had been entered in manually.
xero.
xero.
I am sure its to do with Xero and Citibank feeds as Citi did change their web site and login process a couple weeks ago but surly they have fixed it by now?
Eventually Xero logs me out.
My first to the 16th balanced ie xero balanced with paypal balance.
Naturally  Xero now contains three transactions that match the AP batch value in total, but that cannot be reconciled individually.
Be really cool if customers from Xero would sync across to MailChimp.
Even better if they are added to segments/groups based on what products in Xero I'm selling them.
MailChimp syncs with Xero.
Is that because we haven't finished setting up our company/Xero completely online, and if that's the case, I assume it will then display everything once that's done ?
Xero should provide much more in depth tutorials on how to set up a good solid docx template.
I have read lots of reviews of online/cloud invoicing/accounting software and think Xero might be the one for me.
ideally with an option to setup a direct debitI worry that Xero is too complicated for my needs.
Log in to Xero iPhone app2.
The problem seems very easy to reproduce on a clean Xero company.
xero.
I think at some point I was going to input 2012 year end data into xero but decided against it because I can't enter it by tracking category.
7 version and integrate xero with it.
Xero only accepts discountRates not discountAmount.
I was editing a payrun happened in October, and Xero tells me "You currently have 6 active employees, which is more than allowed under your current subscription.
I think it would be helpful if we could have a unique email address so that we can email documents directly to Xero and have the attachment saved in the documents section to be linked to an expense later on.
Seriously, Xero seems great so far but calling this clunky is an understatement.
Is this sort of budget possible in Xero?
I want to transfer to xero because of the additional features available.
Xero seems to think we're happily reconciled.
I'm about to make the switch to Xero, and have a question about invoicing templates.
Xero is on tour across the USA starting October 21 for our Accounting Partners or any accountants and bookkeepers interested in becoming Xero Partners.
Xero is on tour in Australia starting October 16 for our Accounting Partners or any accountants and bookkeepers interested in becoming Xero Partners.
Now we have tried to export the data from Xero and import the stuff back into Sage.
But when i upload this template on Xero, it will not change the InvoiceDate with +28 days added.
Feeling a bit miffed :-(C'mon Xero - this is easy stuff.
On the whole, I am pretty satisfied with Xero's UI.
(I searched through pages and pages of Xero's search results for info on this and I hate to say it, but QB does provide much more relevant results. )
I know this could be due to a number of factors, however it is alarming from a security perspective and not a good introduction to Xero.
I know there have to be multiple businesses out there using Square + Xero.
I have loaded all of last year's data into Xero, and was doing a final checkover before handing it over to my CPA (ok, I'm a bit behind on this).
At this point I realized that some data that I had hand-entered when I was first testing out Xero was still there, so there were about 10 transactions that were duplicated.
Can someone please explain why Xero doesn't work this way, and how I can detect those duplicate transactions if it happens again?
I simply hate xero.
Last 6 months I am trying to understand Xero and failed.
I design finance solutions for multi national companies, but I cannot get my head around Xero.
Unfortunately I am unable to dump Xero because it the only accounting software which can talk to my website.
I have been in touch with xero support and had no satisfaction - they have responded with suggestions to show an opening deposit or using the conversion balances, neither of which appear to apply in our instance.
I thought i had made my decision a few days ago that i was definitely going to continue with xero.
We are yet to find an easy way to import a fully reconciled MYOB file into a Xero general ledger.
I've come across the Xero tutorial video and help pages explaining how to set them up.
For example:Fee for services in respect of XYZ project:Phase 1                                                                  $5,000Disbursements                                                           $200If we type this into Xero, the application handles it, except that it insists on putting a zero on the first line.
Xero has long had a problem with Paypal feeds.
Xero often duplicates transactions or drops transactions.
Hope to hear from Xero soon on how they plan to approach this as my work day has been effectively stalled.
This being the first GST completed in xero.
(And I feel Xero as a software could make more of a point of identifying 'this cannot be changed once set' etc.
They have been posted to 477 - Wages and Salaries in Xero.
I believe that Xero and WorkflowMax should allow me to achieve this.
99 for our online fax service, or the monthly Xero subscription, come to think of it) which is automatically billed against our Visa debit card.
MYOB was great at this, maybe I haven't set Xero up right?
Part of the usability of Xero is to have multiple tabs open in the browser.
I have tried to import my Paypal transactions manually into Xero but the mapping must be wrong or something because the amounts are in millions?
Has anyone been using Xero with the same issue?
Is this simple function available with xero?
With these sorts of functionality it makes Xero a real competitor to the more powerful software and will help tease people of Sage Line 50 and alike.
I’m not familiar enough with Xero to know if that is possible) leading me to a balance.
I'd love to see some work done to Xero's latency issues.
I am about to complete my first GST return since joining Xero.
I have been deciding between xero and waveaccounting.
Is there a good way to enter estimates/quotes and then analyse them in reports on Xero?
Xero is now centered in your browser – this was a really popular request!
I've got a client that we are moving from MoneyWorks Gold to Xero.
Is there a way to list all transactions that have been entered into xero?
We have been running the free trial of Xero for several weeks and will shortly be going live with this.
This will be an opportunity for accountants and bookkeepers to see a live demo of Xero and get an introduction to the benefits of partnering with Xero.
We started using Xero from 01/01/2012 and on 24/02/2012 we set up automatic import.
It would be good it the revaluation could be automated i. e. if Xero had the ability to enter loans directly.
I am working with a client who originally set up their company file in September and added some transactions to the end of the year but did not really start using Xero until January 1, 2012.
Using extra open browser windows is one of the best ways for speeding up Xero.
You can easily have different Xero windows open at once to when you want to refresh the feed for one or more banks.
I have been using Xero for 6 months and find it very frustrating that UB auto feeds are not working.
From this information I assumed that Xero would handle credit control as effectively as our previous Saas sysyetm.
Its really cool that xero has iPhone and iPad aps that are easy to access.
6 hour per day rate however when individuals book their leave Xero calculates the leave at 7.
I'm trying to understand why Xero calculates a different hourly rate for employees each month based on the number of work days in the month.
My issue is this:Employee 1 earns $120k per yearJune '17 they work 22 of 22 days - they are paid $10k per Xero (rate of 59.
6 hours))July '17 they work 21 out of 21 days - they are paid $10k per Xero (rate 62.
6 hours))Employee 2 earns $120k per yearJune '17 they work 20 of 22 days - they are paid $9,091 per Xero (rate of 59.
6 hours)) July '17 they work 20 of 21 days - they are paid $9,524 per Xero (rate 62.
She now shows me she doesn't have access to Xero Payroll despite me sending her an invite?
I'm currently using Xero Premium 5.
Can Xero cope with this type of payroll?
It makes it virtually impossible to work with Xero payoll.
Can you please advise urgently what's wrong and how I can fix these problems because Xero is almost unusable for me while these are happening.
Our client has migrated their payroll from other service to Xero recently.
How does Xero deal with this branching of ABN's
Also, once these are all set up within Xero, how do I then create a weekly batch bill and send a remittance to each company in one go?
If say a normal Tuesday someone usually works 10 hours but wants to take leave on that day - how is it recorded in Xero?
), in Xero it is set not to accrue SGC on leave loading and there is no option to change this setup.
We can download the data to an Excel file, but can the data be imported into Xero?
(And no, since our employees already put all their leave allocations in Harvest, and they are busy, high-paid professionals, it would not be appropriate to ask them to also put leave allocations into Xero as well, except as a last resort. )
uploaded from deputy into xero.
Is there a method that Xero can calculate a pro-rata accrual?
0/PayRuns	POST	500	Xero Payroll API - DataSavvy	ViewRequest:POST /payroll.
xero.
There appears to be no functionality in Xero to do this and it affects both the real estate award and the clerk award.
I'm trying to get xero to calculate PAYGW correctly from payroll.
I test the tax calculated in xero against ATO calculator, and xero is incorrectly including the ML.
I have a client who I recently converted from MYOB to Xero.
Can it be automated through Xero?
The process is meant to be that the employee applies for leave in Xero and has it approved before they enter their timesheet for that period.
I dont believe the employee has access to select rates through My Xero, only the hours worked.
Is there a way to get Xero to project ahead and deduct a percentage of their wages for PAYG withholding?
Hello fellow Xero users,This little issue is playing havoc with my head.
I have recently set up xero's auto super and when I did I remember clearly telling it to begin with the final quarter (Apr-Jun) of 2015/2016.
We have been emailing Xero Support, get the standard reply that they will be in touch .
Nothing appears to have been done on it yet, any idea how long it takes for Xero to come back with confirmation that it is ready to go?
BUT Xero is still adding this HECS tax onto their payslip.
Why isn't Xero automatically working this out and not charging it?
My employer wants to merge all employees from different entities (in Xero) to one.
Hello, Started using Xero for everything at the end of January and imported everything from my previous book keepers system, AcPAc.
Was hoping that the payments could be made through the Xero interfaceAny help is appreciatedRachel
Hello,We have swapped over to xero from myob part way through the financial year and Im trying to make sure the employees payslips have the correct YTD values for their Group Certificate.
xero.
If I am thinking this through correctly,  would Xero potentially consider having an extra item within it's payroll set-up,  "Estimated annual RFBA" or similar.
We appreciate the Auto Superannuation Function in Xero.
I am requiring support from XERO that can not be accomplished online.
it is all done automatically in Xero, to which they asked the reasonable question how does Xero calculate it?
I had to respond that don't know how Xero works this out .
The owner in fact runs two companies - both on Xero.
My question: can I take it that Xero would have applied the (PAYG) tax free threshold in each of the two instances?
We converted from MYOB to Xero in Nov/Dec last year and since then I've done a single payroll run for March 2016.
Exact details copied from another company I look after with same version of Xero.
As my employee is over 18 Xero gives me the following message if I attempt to remove it.
I would have thought Xero would have matched the industry requirements?
I am at a complete loss on how I am meant to manage this in Xero.
Under Tax declaration in Xero's Payroll, there is a list of check lists.
We only starting using Xero this financial year.
I have been following the instructuons in Xero for Dummies.
It's nice to know Xero's got your back on cyber security alerts.
I advised him that unfortunately it doesn't, but I think this would be a great development for Xero!
it would be really good if Xero could fix this so the correct standard hours appear in My Payroll.
Has Xero in their wisdom decided to change the sorting on Employee Leave Requests from Descending to Ascending, in Payroll.
I have started straight off the bat with xero (i love it) mostly managing the book keeping myself so the following scenario is pretty unique and not real sure how to tackle it.
How would you guys tackle this from within xero?
That is their only user-role in Xero.
Can you advise whether Xero offers bug bounties as these have been successful at Yahoo and google at lowering risk ?
I have checked the recent fortnightly payroll figures withholding tax calculated by Xero with the ATO Fortnightly Tax table and found some discrepancies.
10 is calculating PAYG tax in Xero at $696.
Dec 2013 this was originally notified to Xero and no feature implemented or updates from Xero?
Accounting software that cannot calculate and show your bottom line on your P&L, this is really bad Xero.
In Xero I have all the employees set up as Casual with no annual or sick leave entitlements.
xero.
I am a newcomer to Xero and I wonder if any experienced user would be kind enough to advise on how to import my clients' data from the ATO Portal into Xero.
Does anybody know how to treat this situation in Xero?
However, i did not set up properly and Xero didn't call to help set up.
Help me Xero-wan, you're only hope!
One employee who has been with us for four months already has over 300hrs of leave owing to her according to Xero which is almost double what she's meant to receive in one year!
However since we have moved to Xero payroll I cannot work out how to get these amounts to accrue.
In fact, it is almost a deal breaker as far as Xero is concerned.
(my manual calculation based on tax thresholds is less than what is Xero is calculating).
Hello Fellow Xero Friends,A quick question as i'm seriously frustrated right now.
I do some searching and come across the following Xero Help Article:https://help.
xero.
I'm setting up payroll in Xero and one of my employees was inherited with a payscale that pays different rates for different days, i. e. the first two days he works in a week are at one rate, the third, fourth and fifth at different rates to those and eachother.
We run our company with two trading names, and we tracking income and expenses in Xero through these two trading names.
Can Xero please explain if there is an easier way of doing this.
At the moment, Xero simply divides the number of total hours per fortnight over the number of days.
The payroll in Xero was then subsequently set up and used since 1 March.
Xero does not recognise.
I then reconciled when it came through into Xero.
1 - I have tried inviting the employee to Xero both ways, through payroll and as a user.
We are transferring employment contracts to another xero registered company.
It was easily drilled down to find this information in MYOB, but seems not so in Xero.
Am I missing something or is this a feature that I should request from Xero?
xero.
01 and you would expect Xero to calculate (when using the statutory rate) his super at 9.
We have recently moved to Xero from MYOB.
Hey guysI crossed over to Xero in August and loving it.
Using the Payroll feature in Xero automatically creates an entry in 'Superannuation Payable' and 'PAYG payable'.
My question is, will Xero adjust it's calculations around these entries, or will I have to make an adjustment?
Is there a way that we can record Long Service Leave provision in Xero ?
Since switching to Xero I have found this a difficult task as there is no way for me to record locations against paycheque items.
Is there any way to trick Xero into calculating the correct tax on her salary for the weeks the employee does work which also takes into consideration the unpaid leave?
Previously this had not been an issue, so I suspect that this came with the most recent updates to Xero.
It would be handy if Xero could instead point out that the email address was not unique to the employee whos details you were updating and offer the option to override/ignore this warning.
Having said that, Xero rocks.
I tried to change the start date but it "can't be after the termination date" says Xero.
I have now been using Xero Payroll for 7 months and although very happy with its overall simplicity and effectiveness, I'm surprised that the following basic features have been missing from the beginning:1.
A Xero-styled Search function on this screen would be extremely useful and much appreciated by paymasters worldwide.
I have read all the instructions as advised by Xero help but am getting nowhere.
The bill generated in Xero is for the net total of the employees and appears on the right hand side of the reconciling screen.
HiWe are moving to xero.
We have been running our payroll through iPayroll and syncing it to Xero.
Is there a quick and easy way to transfer all our data from iPayroll to Xero
This is a quick note to let you know we'll be making some changes to Xero to help take care of the super rate increases automatically for you.
Today we released completely rebuilt reporting functionality to payroll in Xero for Australian users.
We have been using Xero now for 3 months (love it btw! )
Paychex will provide an import file but I cannot find the correct Xero import template for payroll.
I'm trying to run my first payroll in Xero.
We have used Xero for several months, since Oct 2016.
I rechecked and I seem to have all her information entered correctly for taxes in Xero.
If in fact I did that (for February) will Xero pick up that I underpaid for the February payroll, and it will automatically catch up in March?
After many headaches with Xero's payroll system, we have migrated away to Gusto.
Xero makes great accounting software.
I got an email about Xero no longer supporting annual deposits.
I am trying to file end of year forms and I have an employee that is over 55 (Birth date is entered under employee details) that contributed her max to her HSA (3350+1000 (catch-up) = 4350) but Xero says its over the limit and will not allow me to process.
Seems odd that I can't generate a W-9 form, since I'm sure I'm not the only person using Xero and being paid using form 1099. .
I continue to struggle with Xero Payroll in California.
Now in 2016 my W-2 is not correct and I am again in a similar situation having to tell Xero support exactly what each box should read.
Everything on Xero seems to talk in hours.
We are in California and recently started setting up the Payroll module and I am finding it is missing some important functions:We will only be using Xero for internal accounting and detail.
Hello Xero users!
I’m looking for a handful of beta testers to stress test our app before we launch it publicly at xero.
I sent an email on the 26 April and 27 April regarding Payroll (which unfortunately is not as good as the payroll features in the Xero Aust) and have not had a reply, let alone within 24 hours.
Do I  send Xero USA another support request and give it another 24 hours to see if this is answered?
I've discovered, to my disappointment, that there is no timesheet link between WFM and Xero.
If you are using the automatic synchronisation, could you let me know how you properly book the entire payroll journal entry after it gets recorded as bill in Xero?
This may be related, but by W-2 submission is still pending in the Xero payroll system, even after reverting/filing it again.
What does Zen Payroll give you that Xero Payroll doesn't?
Our first one started in April when we discovered that Xero software produced inaccurate numbers on the government quarterly payroll reports.
Had our accountant not manually reviewed the numbers, I would have gone with the Xero calculations and improperly filed our tax forms.
The fourth is in Wisconsin and on Zen Payroll (because Xero was not available in that state).
xero.
xero.
This is wrong because I paid taxes for my 3 employees on Xero, and I paid taxes through Zen Payroll for my 4th employee so there should be nothing due.
I assumed this would be when they started with the company (May18) but then Xero customer service said it's when they start the Xero Payroll Service (Aug 1).
Is it best to start using Xero at the beginning of a quarter?
Xero is committed to bringing online payroll to small businesses to all states in the U. S. Offering seamless integration between payroll and your accounting books.
Payroll in Xero is .
I made a post complaining that xero had no live support.
I can't find a phone number to talk to someone so I'm unable to find a solution until i hear from Xero.
xero.
com & support@xero.
We started using Xero payroll this tax year, from April 6 2017.
What's the correct way to reconcile the PAYE payments in Xero such that we get one line item in the P&L?
Is there an option to let Xero know that he will be under &#163;10k pro rata?
However this month when I went to file the pensions with NEST they got rejected as for some reason XERO/NEST have duplicated an employee.
But Xero isn't letting me delete the filing.
I have two opt-ins which I realised I had incorrectly marked when I did the first posting and I have now updated them and I can download a file from Xero with the correct opt in status.
The problem is that I cannot upload to TPP because they show as already receiving a connected file from Xero and I cannot resend from Xero.
Our FD was running the Payroll in Xero in parallel with our existing Payroll to ensure everything was correct before we migrated to Xero on 1 April 2017.
We initially thought this might have been an auto enrolment problem - our staging date is July, but we changed both NEST's auto enrolment dates and Xero's auto enrolment dates to May to see if this would resolve the issue, to no avail.
Xero logged into our system to help me link the automatic filing correctly, so not sure why it won't work?
I have started xero from 31 december on so that the vat return would be accurate
Obviously Xero support is useless here with a 24 hour turnaround, no phone number and no live chat.
The solution that Xero support suggested, (clearing caches) hasn't worked.
I've been waiting for XERO Support to email me back but I'm wondering if anyone else knows how to fix this in the meantime?
I am trying to work out how Xero calculates an hourly rate from an annual salary.
I duly contacted Xero Support via email on the 19th April 10:42am and was emailed back with the obligatory "we aim to be in touch within 24 hours" (Its now 20th April 16:45 - no reply as yet)  I got in touch with the tax office and after speaking to my staff members they agreed it was a software issue because of multiple FPS/RTI submissions.
I really want to continue using xero payroll.
I keep thinking I must be missing something but can't see what it must beI have emailed Xero Support twice but haven't received any response.
I cannot correct it with a journal as my journal shows the deductions going to code 947, so I have no idea where the data is collected that has coded this money to ER Pension and all the pension codes in Xero have a zero balance, obviously because nothing has been coded there!
I contacted Xero support on the 5th April 2017 via email support and today (9th April) got a ridiculously unhelpful response telling me to change the code from pensions and do a journal to correct the misposting!
Thought I'd post here in case anyone has had this problem and can shed some light on it, as so far Xero have not been very helpful.
4th May 2017 - very slow performance using Xero.
We decided to start using Xero Payroll from 6 Apr 2016.
ARK CLS is eligible to claim this and we did for 2015/16 through Sage and also for 2016/17 through Xero.
I suspect we have overlooked something in the original set up of Xero Payroll.
They are wondering if they do this on Sage whether all of the payroll and auto enrollment data can then be transferred to Xero.
I know there may be a lot but couldn't there be an explanation and resolutions for all errors that Xero flags up?
This is odd of course because Xero uploads the figures to them.
I've been using Xero for nearly a year with no previous payroll experience.
As Xero notes, it supports two types of pension schemes.
Xero suggests that all is taken care of automatically - still confusing!
For those of us that lived through the first 6 months of Xero Payroll we were all part of a BETA test that we never signed up to.
Can Xero accrue holiday entitlement in hours and be taken in hours?
If you are a user of Xero and JuanTax, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
However after contacting Xero support it appears that this isn't possible at all and in fact there isn't a method for employees accruing holiday for every hour they work AND having an annual schedule for it to run from and until.
When clicking the approve button, in xero payroll timesheets, I get a little red pop up box saying "a system error has occurred" Any ideas?
"This suggests it's a problem with the Xero file that's been sent.
HiWe are struggling to find a payroll course for xero, really needs to be classroom based or someone comes to us.
Xero support not responding, definitely over the 24 hours.
Any idea how to do SMP in xero payroll?
To the best of my knowledge I have set everything up but Xero does not calculate the pension when I run the payroll.
I was under the impression that Xero automatically processed the pension.
We are trying to get employees' holiday balances from Xero and the balances shown are somewhat confusing.
Employee who is working from the beginning  of the year:we set 168 hours accrued annuallyEmployee has 160 hours of leave entered (and approved) in Xero for 2016 (plus 8 hours for 2017)Balance shown in Xero: -168 hours ?
Employee who has started 15-Augwe set 168 hours accrued annuallyEmployee has 56 hours of leave entered (and approved) in Xero for 2016 (plus 8 hours for 2017)Balance shown is Xero: -64 ?
If you are a user of Xero and ProRata, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
In the Xero help article: https://help.
xero.
Xero has assessed her as not eligible.
)Is my best option to manually write to her telling her to ignore Xero's "you are not eligible" email, and instead tell her we are postponing her assessment to November?
I have checked the figures on Xero for month 3 and everything looks correct.
I'm setting up the UK PAYE component of Xero.
However I can't make salary payments in Xero without completing the auto-enrollment information, which I don't have.
42 in previous months Xero has correctly calculated that the 6% pension contribution is &#163;227.
Xero does not allow you to enter a negative pension contribution.
Surely Xero will show as a single number somewhere how much we should be paying HMRC?
I have 30 staff on payroll (newly setup with Xero) and thus I have direct expenses and overhead expenses.
We are at the start of our annual leave year, however Xero has not updated the holiday entitlement for each employee for this year (plus any untaken leave).
Pension Provider Information:* Pension Name:* Pension Provider ID:* Pension Provider Address: * Town / City:* Postcode: Given that these details should be static for each pension provider, wouldn't it make more sense for these to be auto populated by Xero software based on which provider is chosen?
I have created a benefit for him in Xero, and selected 'subject to pension calculation'.
now Im Switching to Xero.
Has anybody else woken up this morning to various emails from Xero saying the EPS submission was declined?
It would seem they are incorrect if you started using Xero UK payroll midway through year 2015/16 and brought over the opening balances.
Is this going to cause more payroll submission problems - last month I had another problem whereby the NI category had gone missing after Xero did an upgrade to payroll, and I ended up being late submitting payroll as it took several days for them to identify what was wrong.
I have contacted Xero 5 days ago by email but still received no response.
Xero says this:It's a bit unclear to me what that means.
Also, could someone at Xero confirm I have completed my 201/16 Payroll Year End correctly as there doesn't seem to be anything that tells me I have done this!
Using Xero to manage a subsidiary.
Is it worth trying to learn how to do payroll on Xero?
Is it easier on Xero or HMRC's Basic PAYE tools package?
In Xero I entered the &#163;779.
Reading through this forum is not great for filling me with confidence that we should move over to Xero Payroll (UK).
We love the Xero accounting product but should we stay away from Payroll?
It would, however, be nice to keep everything on Xero if the payroll works properly.
Several of our clients require specific formats for payslips and this doesn't appear to be possible in Xero - is there a way round this?
I started using Xero payroll at the beginning of the financial year after using HMRC paye tools last year, therefore there were no previous payments for employees, however did not set up opening balances.
If it's the current YTD, is this info anywhere else on Xero?
Not holding my breath as I see quite a few posts that Xero are not replying to about holidays etc.
While I realise that Xero cannot advise which options to take a better understanding of what they mean would certainly be helpful to everybody.
When my Xero Payroll shows as being correct.
After doing my own payroll on Sage for 19 years and never having a problem using Xero Payroll  has been the most stressful experience ever.
Has Xero got any advice at all about completing Payroll Year End at all?
Xero appears to be working fine but I have a query re RTI filings.
Is it a Xero problem or HMRC issue?
If you are a user of Xero and Vega.
Can someone from Xero please tell me there is no mistake anywhere, it's very simple and all will be well?
So Xero, you have announced that"PAYE due date to HMRC will now appear on your Payroll Calendar"So I headed over to the Payroll Overview page to expecting to see the PAYE due amounts and dates under the  table at the top of this page.
I've been using Xero for a couple of years now but have always done the payroll on HMRC's Basic Tools.
We are employing more people soon and considering adding Xero Payroll to the package.
HiLooking to start using the Payroll tab in Xero.
The FPS figures submitted from Xero Payroll via RTI Submission do not correspond to what HMRC have received and recorded as amounts due.
HMRC have confirmed to me that the correction submission from Xero showed NIL figures.
Has anyone else experienced the issue I am having with RTI submissions on Xero Payroll?
it is bad enough that we have been Beta testing software for Xero without any compensation but the disruption to the clients' records can no longer be tolerated.
See below from Xero support:This seems to me to be a major problem and one which should have been communicated to all Xero UK payroll users.
I started using Xero UK payroll this month June 2015.
The XERO bods do realise that you do not actually have to register for PAYE if all of your employees are below LEL and have no other jobs, right?
We are currently running Sage 50 & Xero alongside each other and are due to switch to Xero.
They have started Xero part way through the tax year so have opening balances.
We gave two directors who have been entered as employees on the XERO PAYROLL.
I have tried contacting Xero support but the only email I have had back is that they are busy and will get back to me eventually!
I have two clients using Xero Payroll, we've either left, or moved all our others back onto our old Payroll System.
Both have previously successfully submitted FPS but it would appear that Xero has automaticly submitted a batch of EPS overnight.
I've emailed support as we are fast approaching the submission deadline of 19th May, if we end up loosing the Employers Allowance we will be looking for recompense from Xero.
After a few weeks of back and forth over email, Xero have now told me that payroll doesn't work for Directors at the moment.
Having been a great fan of Xero, I was excited to convert to Xero payroll when it rolled out in April.
We cancelled the excellent service of the incumbent payroll provider and switched to Xero.
Xero wants these managers to set up as payroll administrators to perform this simple task.
I am disappointed that xero doesn't have phone support.
Xero Support Ticket 2046380
I'm in the process of testing out Xero PAYE (currently using mypaye.
My old payroll software did not distinguish between paid and not paid sick leave so when entering into Xero I simply added "Sick leave".
I have also submitted a case but not heard anything (I imagine this first month or two is going to be busy for Xero payroll! )
payroll@xero.
I am sure Xero will sort it out but not a good start
It is as if Xero assumes that all companies are completely flat with only managers and their employees.
Ok I have a few questions:1) SMP - does Xero calculate the Small Employers Relief (103%) automatically?
would be really helpful as whilst it's great that xero have brought payroll to the uk its hr features are very limited, ie no dates for reviews or training, no upload of contracts, no timesheets, notes limited to 300 characters etc
We are moving a client's payroll onto Xero and have run a trial payroll run for April.
We also ran April in the old payroll system for comparison and found that the PAYE calculated by Xero is not the same?
"I am very disappointed to find this out after receiving an email to reassure me that Xero payroll could handle Autoenrolment.
I understand before the introduction of payroll to UK version of Xero, Xero had a simple set of screens for recording a payrun.
Now that Xero has timesheets it would seem logical this information would link and update the days paid.
Does Xero support piece rates.
The main calculation they give is 20% of gross wages (which is what Xero uses) or a $$ figure being 10% of the debt, with the lessor of these the amount to deduct each week, plus a third variable for protected earnings.
How can I check that I have entered leave balances as I have used xero since October 2014 and I'm sure I did enter leave balances?
I have a manual spreadsheet that calculates how many hours to date an employee has available, BUT when going through to Xero payroll and ticking that box to shop available to date = complete different numbers - some employees loose a whole 40 hours and now sit over their to date entitlement, especially after the Christmas holidays and close down period.
the rate for his AL as calculated by Xero = $16.
All overtime worked has been paid through Xero to date, so I am not sure why it has not updated.
If so, why is Xero paying out annual leave at his standard rate of $30 per hour?
We have entered the opening balances in individual employee section, however, the YTD earning figure on the payslips only reflects the amounts processed through the Xero Payroll.
At the moment we manually enter approved staff leave into a shared calendar but ideally this would be fed automatically from Xero Payroll.
However when the apply for sick leave etc Xero looks at how many days x hours per day that is loaded into their profile e. g 5 days per week, 7 hours per day.
Am I doing something wrong or is Xero payroll not quite there yet?
If you are a user of Xero and Datapay, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
We have been using Xero for almost a year now and this is my only complaint.
If not I will remove this system from Xero and go back to the excel format of keeping up with annual leave.
Can Xero consider making payroll available with Xero Cashbook products?
NZ Payroll - Does Xero calculate Annual Leave correctly when an employee works variable hours each week?
Will Xero update itself tomorrow?
Will Xero give annual leave again, or will it think this employee has already had his set amount for the year?
We started with xero payroll form 1st August 2015.
We recently started using Xero and have imported all of our statements for the last year and a half.
I recommend Xero to people, but I cannot recomend Xero payroll.
I am backdating payroll into xero from 1 April.
I am currently using Xero Payroll as well as Ace Payroll (my old system) and every week my amounts are completely different.
But instead, Xero does not recognise the anniversary date for which my staff member started.
We have somehow managed to enter and approve a leave request twice in Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and ClicData, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
again , what accrued amount and balance amount i should book into Xero payroll system ?
I am unsure how to migrate this across to Xero Payroll from my existing payroll system/data.
We have had Marc@Xero replying and we have made comments to him.
I'm amazed that a company as awesome as Xero would roll out such an unfinished product.
I have Xero Premium for multi-currency functionality.
If you are a user of Xero and BrightGauge, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Lulalend, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Instafile, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Function Tracker, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and CaFE, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Capital Pitch, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Apply now and connect Xero to CapitalPitch for your investment assessment.
If you are a user of Xero and HR Central, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Simply payroll, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and DEFT, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and ControlC, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
ControlC stores a copy of Xero data and attachments, and keeps smart copies forever.
If you are a user of Xero and Liberis, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Grow, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Get More with Grow — Your Xero Reporting Tool.
If you have used DCode services to build a Xero integration, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Nobly, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Dragon Law, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and AirPOS, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Nimbus Portals, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and intelligentpos, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and MembershipWorks, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Nifty Forms, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and ExpenseTron, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
File expenses, create purchase orders, extract reports and sync to Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and 2Shakes, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and iKentoo, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
iKentoo is an enterprise iPad based hospitality POS, which links seamlessly to Xero, and is trusted by over 3000 restaurants and bars worldwide.
If you are a user of Xero and Ecwid, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Seamless integration with Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and StatX, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Automated mobile dashboards for Xero.
Connect StatX to Xero on your phone to instantly see beautiful, mobile dashboards showing cash, A/R, A/P.
If you are a user of Xero and Fuelled, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and iwoca, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Administrate, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and MyCashFlowApp, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Dentally, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Connex, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Automatically sync individual or a daily summary of orders from Amazon U. S. , Canada, or Europe to Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and Recount, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and ExcluServ Connect, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Active Collab, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and i2B Supplier Portal, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Magnetic, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Okappy, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
You can save more than 5 hours this week using our simple job management app and Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and AdFile, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and PayDay, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Office 365, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Xero integrates with your Office 365 email.
Now within Xero, see the emails exchanged with each contact to access all your key customer information in one place.
If you are a user of Xero and Friendly Manager, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and receivabl.
Sync payments and fees back to Xero for easy reconciliation.
If you are a user of Xero and Billpower, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Zoho Reports, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Revel by 5.
5 provides a seamless, customisable integration between Xero and your Revel POS system.
If you are a user of Xero and AuditFile, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Link4, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Rezdy, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Chargebee, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Lightspeed, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Tappr, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Bookeo, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Stock&Buy, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and DueCourse, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and HReasily, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Surgical Partners, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Surgical Partners is the Financial Management Platform for Medical Practices and their Doctors - integrating any Practice Management System with Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and CarVue, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Loft 47, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and UKForex, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and NZForex, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and NAB QuickBiz Loan, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Clinic to Cloud, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Clinic to Cloud is a fully featured practice and clinical management solution that is entirely cloud based and is seamlessly integrated with Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and AccountKit, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and regroupTAX, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Ubookr, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Jet Convert delivers seamless Sage 50 (Peachtree USA) to Xero conversions.
If you are a user of Xero and Sapaad, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and YoureOnTime, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Complete appointment and management system for salons, spas or wellness with comprehensive Xero sync.
If you are a user of Xero and Figured, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
The complete online livestock tracking, farm budgeting and forecasting tool that works hand-in-hand with Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and OneSaas for Shopify, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Connect Shopify with Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and OneSaas for Impos, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Hotelogix, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Payspace, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and eShares, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Zenefits Payroll, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Rotessa, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and BizEquity, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and serko.
If you are a user of Xero and TSheets, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Commusoft, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Timelio, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and AppsForOps, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Power BI, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and ApparelMagic Cloud, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Armatic, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Businest, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Yoco, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and FreshBooks Connect by Workato, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and CartonCloud, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Flash Convert, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and BTCSoftware, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
This links directly with Xero to make year-end compliance simple.
If you are a user of Xero and Highrise by Zapier, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and OneSaas for Freshbooks, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Get Xero working with FreshBooks.
If you are a user of Xero and CloudDash, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and CFOapp, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Promis, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Paypr, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Tax Planner Pro tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Appogee HR, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and PayFast, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and SimpleNumbers, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and SuiteFiles, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Connect to Microsoft Office, Xero + Xero Practice Manager Find out more about .
If you are a user of Xero and PandaDoc, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and SAM, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and InvoiceNow, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Wink Reports, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Hike Pos, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and ZoomShift, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Debtze, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and MyWorkpapers, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Integrating Connect and Xero lets you seamlessly create and populate your workpaper files.
If you are a user of Xero and RosterElf, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and B2BGateway, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and My Own CFO, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and ProfitCents, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and BUZ, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Preno, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Waddle, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and FoodStorm, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and PropertyMe, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Salesforce Connect by Workato, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and ZingHR, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and NowInfinity, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Checkmybooks, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Automatically reviews Xero data and reports on issues.
If you are a user of Xero and DataQlick, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and FieldAware, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Prospa, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Google Apps for Work, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Taxify, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Taxify works seamlessly with Xero to file your returns automatically in every state.
If you are a user of Xero and Syngency, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and SalesSeek, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Razor, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Cushion, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Happy HR, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Manage payroll & leave with seamless Xero cloud based integration.
If you are a user of Xero and Dryrun, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Capify, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and AutoEntry, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Connex, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Roster Planet, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Set your staff roster and publish then turn you roster into timesheets and send to Xero.
Integrates with Xero AU payroll.
If you are a user of Xero and Simplepay.
If you are a user of Xero and Angeloop, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Connect Xero & share KPIs, Cash Reports and Updates with your stakeholders.
If you are a user of Xero and ApprovalMax, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
ApprovalMax powers up Xero with multi-step approval workflow.
If you are a user of Xero and Payoneer, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and SmartTax, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Simplify and automate GST reporting for Xero users in Malaysia.
You can now sync your accounting data in Xero and submit in GST-03 Form.
If you are a user of Xero and EZRentOut, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Workato, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Infusionsoft Connect, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Loaded Reports, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Arthur, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Handshake, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and CustomerLobby, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and ClearJelly, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Unparalleled insight, planning and control with your Xero data.
If you are a user of Xero and EzzyBills, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and BigCommerce, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Visible, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Easily integrate with your Xero data!
If you are a user of Xero and Trippeo, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and BizFi, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and EazyCollect, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and PocketSmith, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Send receipts directly to Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and Fuseboard, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Zendesk by Cloud Elements, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Podio by Phases, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Imonggo, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Qwilr, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and MINDBODY, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Web EDI, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Connect to your EDI trading partners quickly & easily using Web EDI and Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and Zenoti, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and webexpenses, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Avalara, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Saasabi, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Saasabi enables you to integrate data from Xero with data from other sources and analyse it for advanced insights and better decision-making.
If you are a user of Xero and Shopify, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Bill.
If you are a user of Xero and Moula, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Intertec TimePro, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Push data to Xero for invoicing & payroll.
If you are a user of Xero and OzForex, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Trustworks, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Freshdesk, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Flowrev, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and GetCapital, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Link your Xero data.
If you are a user of Xero and Expense Check, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Sendle, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Insightly, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Acuity Scheduling, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Stryke Tax, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Ninjodo, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Integrates with Xero, Gmail, MailChimp, Facebook & Twitter.
If you are a user of Xero and Klipfolio, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and buildXACT, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Sync with Xero to make bookkeeping a breeze.
If you are a user of Xero and ZeroTime, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Click Approve & Send in Xero and invoicing is complete.
If you are a user of Xero and ePrint MIS, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you're looking for a simple and efficient way to convert to Xero, you've come to the right place.
If you are a user of Xero  and Class, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Experience the efficiencies of Xero Practice Manager through Class.
If you are a user of Xero and Xploite, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Progressclaim.
If you are a user of Xero and Midpoint, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Union Square, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Talenox, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Momentum, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Momentum's simple integration with Xero means you will have an accurate forecast up and running in minutes.
If you are a user of Xero and Cash Flow Story, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Plooto, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Farmflo, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and MailSync, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
MailSync autosyncs your Xero contacts to your mailing list.
If you are a user of Xero and Mogul, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Neatly, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Expandly, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Synergy 8, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and BarTab, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Linking BarTab to Xero stops bookkeeping getting in the way of bartending.
If you are a user of Xero and Sush.
If you are a user of Xero and IntegraPay, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Payments are updated within Xero instantly.
If you are a user of Xero and Mentio, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and OneSaaS for Zoho CRM, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Integrate Zoho CRM with Xero and completely automate your accounting.
If you are a user of Xero and OneSaaS for WooCommerce, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Integrate WooCommerce with Xero and completely automate your accounting.
If you are a user of Xero and Volusion by Vextras, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and CommerceSync, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
South Africa's First Sage Pastel to Xero Conversions!
The Fast and Accurate way to upgrade your Accounting to Xero without loosing your old data, check out .
If you are a user of Xero and Fishbowl, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Seamless integration with Xero for advanced inventory automation of SOs, POs, WOs, shipping, receiving and more, reducing labor and human error.
If you are a user of Xero and Boomr, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Carbon Analytics, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Environmental Performance platform that converts your Xero data into detailed carbon, energy & water reports.
If you are a user of Xero and CoverKit, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Automatic, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and PennyPipe, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and MRPEasy, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Evopos, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Epos Now, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Ranqx, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Posboss, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and CS Cart by 4Sprung, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and LedgerLive, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Formitize, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and DataDear, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and TidyBuild, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Tallie, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and MechanicDesk, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Corecon, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Proposify, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Really Simple Systems, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Arlo, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Arlo is Training & Event Management software that seamlessly integrates with Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and iZettle, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Sky Collect, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Pepperi, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and QikBizCRM, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Seamlessly integrates with Xero for financials.
If you are a user of Xero and PropertySuite, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and PropertyTree, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Ag Profit, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
This includes managing farm inventory (livestock schedule) for Xero and using Xero data for farm benchmark & budget analysis.
If you are a user of Xero and BuilderTREND, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Temponia, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Features dashboards, flexible reporting, budget follow-up, mobile app and Xero integrated invoicing.
If you are a user of Xero and uCollect, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Collabspot, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Financial Driver, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Tripcatcher, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Timestamp, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Zeald, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Zeald ecommerce integrates directly and comprehensively with Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and Intellibook, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
It includes a seamless and flexible integration for Xero users.
If you are a user of Xero and Kwanji, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Current RMS, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Chargify, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Seamlessly export Chargify transactional data into Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and Best Practice Modelling, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Build integrated Excel financial models directly from Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and Shopify by Pipemonk, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Exchange data between Shopify & Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and Shogo, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Clover by Commerce Sync, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Veeqo, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and SyncApps, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and CheckVault, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and FG Receivables Manager, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and CreditorWatch, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and FORMbasic, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
FORMbasic will streamline lead capture automation by sending all lead information gathered from your website directly into Xero Practice Manager.
If you are a user of Xero and Agile CRM, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Datamolino, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Ento, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and MP Travel, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Real Estate Investar, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and EzyCollect, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and A2X Accounting tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
A2X fetches your latest Amazon settlement transactions, and post summarized journals to Xero simply and automatically.
If you are a user of Xero and Asset Guru, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Tower Systems, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Everline, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and iAgri, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Xpenditure, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Vision6, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Quickly automate Xero debtor reminders and send beautiful newsletters and promotions.
If you are a user of Xero and ClickDesk Live Chat, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Imporex, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Imporex enables and streamlines Xero for Bendigo Community Banks ®.
If you are a user of Xero and MyDesktop, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and MyTrucking, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and NextMinute, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and SalesIn, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Houston Medical, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Mobileezy, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Onsight, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and POLi Payments NZ, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Infoodle, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Cyfe, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Chaser, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and aXcelerate, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and EMAC, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Satago, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and SAT FXOnline, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Podio by Zapier, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Magento by Zapier, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Eventbrite by Zapier, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and commonsku, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Infusionsoft by Zapier, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Connect Infusionsoft to Xero with Zapier.
If you are a user of Xero and Re-View, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Neto, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Hosted e-commerce platform that enables retailers and wholesalers to develop and maintain powerful online stores that integrate with Xero & eBayFor more information, check out .
If you are a user of Xero and Nucleus Logic, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Timecamp, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Vistr, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Automate your forecasting with Vistr's predictive algorithms & Xero data.
If you are a user of Xero and Ezidebit, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and CaseFox, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and JunariCRM+, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Workshop Software, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Tax Connect, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and MarketInvoice, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Synchroteam, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and OnePage CRM, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and IQBoxy, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Swipe, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Base CRM, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Synergist, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Everhour, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Boxkite, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Scan2Invoice, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
The scan button for Xero, speeding up the scanning process significantly.
If you are a user of Xero and Authorize.
If you are a user of Xero and Constant Contact, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Export lists from Xero to Constant Contact.
If you are a user of Xero and Panalitix, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Roll, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and LEAP, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
By using LEAP and Xero, you have legal practice management and general ledger accounting that both you and your accountant can understand!
If you are a user of Xero and Client Heartbeat, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Client Heartbeat integrates with Xero by pulling across your contacts.
If you are a user of Xero and Quote Stock Sell, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and IODM, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and POLi Payments, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Benchmarking.
If you are a user of Xero and LedgerBackup, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and JobReady, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Exsalerate, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and BlueVine, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and FUTRLI, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Financiery, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Unify, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Sync your online channels with Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and Co-construct, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and RepairShopr, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and TaxJar, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Vextras, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and TransferMate, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Hubdoc, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Receipts, bills and statements - all in one place - automatically synced to Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and SMS My Debtors, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and invoiceASAP, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and SeederBoard, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Blink Reports, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Qvinci, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and ELAP Cloud, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Squarespace, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Set up a beautiful ecommerce website you can grow with and sync your store with Xero to keep track of your revenue, expenses, and tax liabilities.
If you are a user of Xero and smartAR, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and LivePlan, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Chrometa, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Prestashop by CarryTheOne, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and SimpleLegal, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Fundbox, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and My Inventory Online, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
The perfect link between Xero and your warehouse.
If you are a user of Xero and Breadwinner, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and MINDBODY by QSSConnect, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and SimplePay Singapore, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Funding Options, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Clio, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Simplified practice management & accounting with Clio and Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and BodeTree, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and InvoiceSherpa, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Link your Rocketspark online shop with Xero for a seamless connection between your e-commerce and accounting systems.
If you are a user of Xero and ZUUS Workforce, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Xero PayrollFor more information, check out .
If you are a user of Xero and vWork, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and SmartBiz Loans, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Simply Cashflow, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Rerun, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Debtograph, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Nexonia, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Shopify by DEARsystems, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Receive orders from Shopify,process and push to Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and Magento by DEARsystems, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Receive orders from Magento,process and push to Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and eBay by DEARsystems, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Receive orders from eBay, process and push to Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and EntryRocket (formerly CSV2Cloud), tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Thankyou Payroll, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Kabbage, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Connect Xero to Kabbage to apply for funding in minutes.
If you are a user of Xero and Late Fee Manager, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Float, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and tax1099, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
IRS approved E-file provider for 1099 forms, seamlessly integrated with Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and Cliniko, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Expensify, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Simplified expense reporting your employees will love, seamlessly integrated with Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and QWD Outlook Integration Tools, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and QWD Excel Integration Tools, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
QWD Excel Integration Tools gives you direct access to Xero and Xero Practice Manager.
If you are a user of Xero and Tradify, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Vinosmith, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Pin Payments, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Entryless, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Storbie, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and MMC Convert, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Convert your QuickBooks or MYOB data to Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and PaysOnline, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Xtracta, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and JobPro Central, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Postal Methods, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Hire Management by Smart Reports, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Legrand CRM, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and ecwid by Stitch Labs, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Import your ecwid orders, customers and inventory seamlessly into Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and Bizeo, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and BigCommerce by Stitch Labs, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Import your BigCommerce orders, customers and inventory seamlessly into Xero.
Import your BigCommerce orders, customers and inventory seamlessly into Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and Copper, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Simple Salon, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Spearmint, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and safeguardmy, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and TidyWork, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and GoCardless, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
With automatic reconciliation within Xero, GoCardless will improve your cashflow and reduce your admin.
If you are a user of Xero and Magento by Unleashed, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Manu Online, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
ATO compliant storage and documents linked right through to Xero, check out .
If you are a user of Xero and MinuteDock, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and One Saas for Salesforce, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and coreplus, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Ozbiz Solutions, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Integrates data between industry specific software and Xero - medical, hospitality, retail POS & optometry, check out .
If you are a user of Xero and PayPal, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
You can accept credit card payments and automatically view and reconcile transactions within Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and ProWorkflow, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Fooman Limited, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and QuoteRoller, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Quotient, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Re-Leased, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and iCOS LiVE, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Reward Super, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and RightSignature, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and ServiceM8, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Sharesight, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and SquirrelStreet, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Pricing Matrix by Smart Reports, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Maintain Product and Product-group specific pricing by Customers in Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and SmartBiller, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and SmartTrade, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Socket, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Create, send, and manage quotes online with website & CRM integration, online payments and lots more, seamlessly integrated with Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and trafficLIVE, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Spanner Planner, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and StarShip, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Automated shipping fulfillment: print courier labels, track shipments, email shipping and tracking details to customers and import orders from Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and Streamtime, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Stripe, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and TidyStock, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Easily purchase, store and sell your stock and seamlessly link to Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and Timely, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and ResBook by Tomahawk, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Total Synergy, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Practice management software for architects and engineers - projects, timesheets, contracts, transmittals, benchmarking + more, integrated with Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and track1099, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and TradeGecko, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Tradevine, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Manage inventory and connect to Trade Me, Shopify and Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and TriggerApp, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Tasks, projects, timesheets, budget tracking and invoicing integrated with Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and Dot Golf, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Checkeeper, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and 24SevenOffice, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Complete ERP system that integrates with Xero, giving you integrated Accounting, CRM, Stock, Purchase Order Processing, Project, and more.
If you are a user of Xero and ABUKAI Expenses, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Achieve true workflow with the only link for Xero & ACT!
If you are a user of Xero and ActionStep, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Active Collab By Trio, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
The Update Manager module for Active Collab 3 by Trio Technology is a crucial tool for companies using Xero and invoicing using Active Collab.
If you are a user of Xero and Accelo, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Airsquare, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Alive Docs, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Amazon.
com + Xero - check out .
If you are a user of Xero and ADP, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and AutoTask by My Accounting Toolbox, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Synchronise your accounting data from Autotask - world's #1 hosted software for Managed Service Providers seamlessly and easily integrated into Xero, check out .
If you are a user of Xero and AVS Networks, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
E-commerce, gift certs, one page checkout and lots more features, plus Xero integration, check out .
If you are a user of Xero and Batchbook Social CRM, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and BigCommerce by OneSaas, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Bilbus, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and BookingBug, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and briefcase, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Bstar, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and CallPro CRM, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Calxa, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Capsule CRM, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Capsule integrates seamlessly with Xero to provide a complete picture of your customers, check out .
If you are a user of Xero and inSTREAM, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
inSTREAM automates your paper and electronic workflows to deliver guaranteed-perfect data entry into Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and Checkfront, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Cin7, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Cin7, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Convert from MYOB and QuickBooks to Xero - quick signup and 3 day turnaround.
Fast, simple and cost effective Xero conversions, check out .
If you are a user of Xero and ClickPOS, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Move from MYOB desktop to Xero for a fixed fee.
Xero setup and conversion from MYOB done quickly, securely, accurately and cost effectively, check out .
If you are a user of Xero and CloudPayroll, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and ClubHub, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
ClubHub passes financial information to Xero for quick and easy reconciliation, check out .
If you are a user of Xero and Communigator, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Fleetmatics WORK, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and ConnectWise PSA By Wise-sync, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
A cloud based solution that synchronises accounting data between Connectwise PSA and Xero.
Convert all your clients to Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and CRM Online, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Crystal Payroll, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and CustomerSure, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and DEAR Inventory, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and DebtForce, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Debtor Daddy, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Deputy, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Dive Centre HQ, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Dremus, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and e360, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
e360 is an integrated website platform for SME's including Content Management, Ecommerce, Email Marketing, CRM, Reports, API & Xero integration, check out .
If you are a user of Xero and eBay by OneSaas, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and eBay by Stitch Labs, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Stitch seamlessly integrates eBay + Xero - check out .
If you are a user of Xero and Employment Hero, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and enableHR, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and ePayroll, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and EService, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Push completed jobs directly into Xero for invoicing, check out .
If you are a user of Xero and etz Technologies, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Evernote by Zapier, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and eWAY , tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Pass on surcharges, enjoy auto-reconciliation with the Xero eWAY Feed.
If you are a user of Xero and Expense Magic, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and ezimerchant, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Seamless Xero integration, check out .
If you are a user of Xero and ezyVet, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Fathom, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Fergus, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Fifo Workpapers, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Integrates directly and seamlessly with Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and FlexiTime, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and GeoOp, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Google Calendar by Zapier, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Google Docs by Zapier, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Wish you could make Google Docs and Xero talk to each other?
If you are a user of Xero and Grappster, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Harvest, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and IMS Payroll, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and AroFlo, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Jobs, scheduling, materials and billing integrated with Xero, check out .
If you are a user of Xero and Infinity RMS, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and inForm, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and invitbox, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and InvoiceSmash, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and iPayroll, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and iTrade, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Seamless conversions from MYOB to Xero in 3 days, check out .
If you are a user of Xero and Jobsheet, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Kounta, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Keebo, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Easily categorise & send receipts to Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and KeyPay, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Ledgerscope, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Automatically reviews Xero data and reports on issues.
If you are a user of Xero and Magento by OneSaas, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Magnetism, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Smooth integration between Microsoft Dynamics CRM and Xero.
Sage & Quickbooks to Xero data conversions - the quickest and easiest way to get your clients moved to Xero by UK software version specialists, check out .
If you are a user of Xero and Moxy Cloud Reporting, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Quickly create beautiful, bespoke, insightful reports using Xero data plus your spreadsheets, cloud apps, analytics, social media and database content.
If you are a user of Xero and MyPAYE, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and OneSaas, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Bring your orders, inventory and customer information into Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and Tanda, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Payescape, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Canadian Payroll - A complete online payroll solution with Xero integration.
If you are a user of Xero and Paypal by Zapier, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and PaySuite, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Practice Ignition, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Scalable modern practice with Xero + WFM.
If you are a user of Xero and ProfitSee, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and RESULTS.
If you are a user of Xero and RM Importer, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Senddr, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Shopify by Stitch Labs, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Stitch seamlessly integrates Shopify + Xero - check out .
If you are a user of Xero and Simplepay.
If you are a user of Xero and Simplepay.
If you are a user of Xero and simPRO, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Smart Payroll, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Number 1 payroll in NZ and Xero's Premium Payroll Partner.
If you are a user of Xero and Smeebi, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Solve360 By Norada, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Spotlight Dashboard, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Spotlight Multi, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Designed for multi-entity organisations such as franchises and associations, Multi allows you to consolidate, rank, and benchmark Xero organisations.
If you are a user of Xero and Spotlight Reporting, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Stitch Labs, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and SugarCRM Klix Connector, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and SurePayroll, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Trineo Dime for Salesforce, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
com and Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and Tymwise, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Unleashed, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Unleashed provides online inventory software integrated with Xero, allowing accurate costs, margins and stock control.
Integration with Xero is seamless and easy.
If you are a user of Xero and Vend, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Vinsight, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Website Builder, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Build your free website with full shopping cart, then keep track with sale/order/cust info sync to Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and Web Payroll, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Webrecs, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Store Xero reports.
If you are a user of Xero and WHMCS for Xero, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Edge Hosting have created a module to sync WHMCS with Xero.
If you are a user of Xero and Wisenet, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and WORKetc, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and WorkflowMax, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
A Xero owned product.
If you are a user of Xero and Workforce Guardian, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Wufoo by Zapier, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Connect Wufoo and Xero with Zapier.
If you are a user of Xero and Xero Workpapers, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and XO Cashflow, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Zapier, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and ZenDesk by Zapier, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Connect Zendesk to Xero with Zapier.
If you are a user of Xero and Gusto, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
PocketSmith offers a little integration with Xero, but it's not enough for my purposes.
I suppose they see Xero as a competitor.
We are looking to move over to Xero and also change our POS software.
We love Chrometa by the way and sync it with XERO.
xero.
Are there any apps that would combine these files so that we can send a single PDF attached to an email straight from Xero?
It gets confusing trying to track what was sent and when it was sent outside of Xero.
Why not write your own - we are trailing using Knack  it connects to xero via zapier or import and it is the best thing we have done, we have an equipment manager and contracts and invoicing and mobile usersOh and a superb CRM - lacking in Simpro and Xero
My employer uses Xero with Bill.
From the dashboard on Xero, my bill.
My question is can I take it one step further and get xero to automatically email the customer?
My question is can I take it one step further and get xero to automatically email the customer?
xero.
Xero is great.
Has anyone had any experience of the link of Ento and Xero and used Xero for processing > 100 employees?
Most days this clears out, but where the closing cash count is lower than the opening one, it leaves a credit in Xero's balance sheet.
We are changing over to Xero and was wondering if this was compatible and if anyone else uses Midsoft and imports directly into Xero.
Hello thereI was wondering if there is anyone else out there who has got experience of using Xero/RBank and Workflowmax for large construction projects?
I have worked with many Xero connected apps and as a rule they have all been successful, the companies have been helpful and staff incredibly knowledgeable and forthcoming.
Does anyone have experience with the Point-of-Rental/Xero integration?
I have refunded an order in Woocommerce but there doesn't appear to be away to sync it to Xero once it has been refunded.
Do you have to manually refund the order in Xero as well?
I am looking to integrate Xero with Focus POS software.
What applications are other accountants, using Xero for Practice Management, using for document management / email filing?
Ideally something which all intergrates with Xero would be perfect.
We would *love* to get your thoughts on the integration as we seek the blessing of the Xero following!
Flare is integrated HR system and they said that they signed up companies who are Xero users.
I have a large number of daily transactions from seven (7) branches such that integration with Xero can only be achieved by Journal Entry.
Up until now, I have been using manual process to record the inventory sold in Xero.
What ERP to integrate with Xero?
How does Clio communicate client-billable expenses with Xero?
Hey all, Is there anyway that Shopventory can talk to Xero?
Hello, For some reason my COGS from LIghtspeed doesn't seem to be mapping into XERO, or if it is, I am not sure how to see it.
We operate with Xero as our accounting software & office 365 for emails on MACCurrently we list our contacts on 365 and make a note to call them as a task on 365 but this process has its downsides.
work with Xero for accounting and Shopify for website and POS.
For my understanding xero and Shopify work well together .
I linked Rezdy to Xero starting the first of this year and I can see that it will be a great combination.
Good morning fellow Xero user!
Deputy (Roster/Scheduling app) integrates with Xero in NZ, Aus, UK and US - but when I asked them about Hong Kong, they said it wasn't available - and this was due to a problem on Xero's side.
They are looking for an App which integrates into Xero and will allow them to remind clients of service calls, allow clients to book service calls, and perhaps has other client communication options.
We are looking into the possibility of having a link between MS Access and Xero in one way or another.
com/document/xero/#orders-that-contain-a-discount-give-validation-errorsAny ideas?
Which will integrate with Xero as either a bill or a timesheet?
I am looking for an app that integrates with Xero and that will help with scheduling (also entering when someone cancels) and that will upload data for each visit with clients.
I've built an app that helps build a custom audience in Facebook based on the customer list in Xero.
Check it out at https://xero-facebook.
It's not rocket science but Salesforce think it would be a half decent project to set it up and other platforms either are very expensive and/or do not integrate with Xero.
I have a client who has been using stand alone xero and now we have integrated coreplus to the system.
Other packages exist for Quickbooks but I haven't seen anything that connects with Xero.
After published, I can find it in Archive and show the green bar "successfully archived to Xero".
Does anyone have a best practise suggestion for how to keep track of cheque and cash payments, yet reconcile them properly in xero?
So we're looking to implement some more complete cloud based project management software that will integrate with Xero.
HiI'm looking for a client manager platform/program that integrates with Xero.
I've searched the xero market place and cannot seem to find (maybe it is no longer available).
Simplified inventory and order management for Xero.
I have found one that auto sends orders from Woocommerce to Xero but thought I would ask here to see what you guys may be using.
I process my payroll through Paychex and am not sure how to import the payroll information into Xero to perform reconciliation.
Can anyone suggest a Workflow Software/App that integrates with Xero APART from Workflow Max?
This will enable those whose companies utilize Xero -- the Beautiful Accounting System to call out from the customer's contact record.
Cost is a factor but it would be great to talk to someone who has used any of these with Xero and offer advice.
* Then published to Xero.
I'm having issues when I convert my proposal from PandaDoc to Xero.
As well as this, they also hedge a lot of their contracts and are looking for software that links to Xero which will enable them to achieve these two objectives.
Xero obviously only offers quantity x unit price.
I am trying to find a software suitable to sync with Xero that will let me customise the reports and easily.
HiI have installed the Xero plugin for WooCommerce.
Now i am trying to figure out the best way to integrate Xero into this?
its clogging up my xero and I've been told it can be done but cant work out how.
I'm using the Shopify Xero app.
Is there anything out there that has a monthly cost of no more than a Xero subscription?
Tried Square Register but it doesn't appear to integrate with Xero for UK businesses.
The next day i received the funds and the transaction showed in Xero.
Are there any other Xero-using membership and/or recurring billing businesses or associations out there who have solved this problem?
Do I set up Xero to allow credit card payments, or Fergus?
Has anybody had experience using LedgerSync with Xero?
Recently I exported all my expenses to a CSV file, then deleted them in Xero, and then re-imported them into Xero.
if this has data entered into it, does it import into Xero's 'description' field within a'bill' or 'spend money' record?
Or do you have to edit the bill once imported into Xero?
Hello,I am looking for an app to integrate Amazon Vendor Central and Xero.
We are looking to improve the stripe automation with and Xero.
Stripe has deferred all questions to Xero and hasn't been too helpful.
Until June 30, all Xero Customers receive a FREE 12 month subscription to Recv'd.
Expensify wants my to categorize these under an expense before I submit to Xero.
Xero Practice Manager looks quite good - but I'm not sure it allows full project management (assigning tasks to jobs and users?
We're looking for a CRM system that's fully compatible with Xero.
We're currently using ACT which is a great CRM but doesn't properly integrate with Xero nor does it track progress of orders.
These are automatically imported to Xero.
Using vend with Xero.
Hello,Hopefully someone can help me, i recently integrated stripe and Xero.
I've had all my SKUs and categories in A2X set up for a while, so I am good there, my issues is that when I go to set up that same SKU as inventory in Xero it requires me to put a selling price and a cost.
I don't want to go through an input an average price and average cost for each SKU in Xero if it's going to result in the books being way off.
We have a client that is moving into Xero and they were using Cost Manager for all their invoicing which provided them with up to date prices on electrical products.
Seeking feedback on the following:- Straight forward set up- Cost (merchant fees)- Ease of passing on the merchant fee automatically- Ease of reconciling in Xero?
We are using Xero for our General Accounting and we have company's in different countries.
I already have Google Apps so when I check the Google apps marketplace there I don't find anything to integrate with Xero.
However we have now moved over to Australia and started using Xero also.
We are finding that we are encountering multiple problems with the functionality of expensify and then the connection with Xero.
Infusionsoft combines CRM, Marketing campaigns and (online) eCommerce - it would be brilliant if that all fed into into Xero!
One extra category would probably do the trick but as you all know this isn't an option with XERO.
Changing of details in the system will automatically or systematically update the correspond records in Xero and vice versa.
Currently using Xero and Unleashed .
I am hoping that there is an integrated app available for Xero.
I'm really trying to get 1 system, Xero.
Automatically reading data held within Xero.
I am keen to hear if anyone has managed to successfully integrate EPOSNow and XERO, please could you message me if you have?
I want to integrate our Revel POS system with Xero.
Xero=Inflexible - even in the forums.
GrrrrI am beyond thrilled with many parts of Xero, but many other areas make me want to literally pull my hair out.
while we are using quickbooks, but only one when we switch to Xero.
This carries a risk of what is being reported in WFM not matching Xero.
Links with Xero and SquarespaceHas drop shippingConsignmentInclude an image
Or even if you only have experience with one inventory - did it cleanly match everything through to Xero?
I am eagerly pursuing xero.
I am specifically looking for the ability to import information from xero into smartsheet and have a live link, or some sort of refresh aspect.
I still don't have inventory on Xero and haven't chosen a third party software to integrate BigCommerce with Xero.
The service itself will be developed in-house but it would be helpful, if possible, to outsource the signup and subscription management process to something that connects to Xero.
Recurly: does it all but expensive and the Xero integration is provided by a third party and probably will be missing some things.
Is there in Hamilton NZ a user of VEND PoS that interfaces with Xero who would be willing for me to do a site visit so as to see this in action and ask a few Q's?
When they started up they were advised to purchase outright a Tevalis til system and clunky accounting software - now that they have discovered the power of Xero (through us) they want to find out how to link their til system into Xero.
The developers at Tevalis say they have open API but not one that currently works with Xero?
Is this a Xero or Stripe issue?
- Integrates with Xero.
I'm trying to set my mum up with using Xero.
Hello I am currently looking at an inventory program called orderbot which integrates with Xero through API.
We are using Hotelogix with Xero, and having problems with syncing.
So our question is, can these be imported straight from our database in the same way that current orders are or is the ability to export data to Xero in this way limited only to future orders and not historical ones?
I am looking to move from Reckon to Xero.
I am both a Expensify and Xero user and have successfully got the integration working.
We plans move away from Quickbooks desktop enterprise version to Xero.
it must push information into Xero.
Hello, I'm currently in the process of implementing Xero as our accounting software.
We are looking for testers for our Xero Addon for Microsoft Word.
Perform a word mail merge to your Xero Contact list with full email analytics.
com/#contact) and mention you want to be a Xero beta tester.
xero.
I haven't seen anything coming through to Xero yet, and will be raising a ticket with IZettle support tomorrow, as I suspect the interface needs to be 'reset', or something.
Product info is NOT a part of the interface, so we will have to manually enter each product sold to get CoGs and update of inventory in Xero.
Once we 'switch on' Xero fully, we will be chasing iZettle to get the interface working with ALL the transactions, and will continue to ask for the product detail, which will save a lot of work.
We already have a few Xero customers on board and are looking for a few more to help us achieve the required number of users.
We are looking for software that works with Xero, essentially providing a full inventory management system.
Is there something within Xero that has been missed for this to happen?
We already have built several apps that communicate with Xero API, but looking for more.
Anyone know of a good way to crosscheck the POs in WFM with the bills in Xero (export is limited to 500 and I'm not sure if the export includes PO# anyway)?
Is there anyone UK based who has done xero / Directli integration and can chat through a couple of concerns before I import customers?
We're looking for users to help test the Xero integration.
We are prepared to offer one year FREE to any users who sign up and agree to test our expense tracking integration with Xero expense receipts.
Has anyone had issues with the integration between IMS and XERO?
After 8 months we have finally nailed most of the Xero/Clio integration quirks.
I setup the Xero-Square integration according to the instructions in the guide and everything flows smoothly.
How do I export / import tags on expensify expenses to (I guess) tracking categories in Xero?
This has been quite a process as our previous system was very old and needed alot of planing to get the old data over to cin7 and now contacts into xero.
This client uses Xero's tracking to track income/expenses between the companies locations.
Checkfront have suggested that it's likely to be an issue with settings configuration in Xero preventing the correct information being passed on to Checkfront, but I've no idea what setting might be affecting this or where to look in Xero to change it.
If I change them manually, Xero overwrites all the details of that line item, which is pointless.
Not import from Everhour (defeats the purpose of using Everhour and Xero together)3.
I was speaking to a (very helpful) current Xero user on this today.
I am opening a casual dining restaurant shortly and am looking for an EPOS system that either integrates automatically with Xero or is at least compatible.
Any suggestions from the Xero community greatly appreciated.
I am getting a Revel demo this week and that is one possible route as they are currently doing the integration work with Xero, I undertsand.
com'On both occasions this has happened we have double checked the email address in Xero and it is correct.
We have several clients using Xero and I'm unsure of the best way to go in relation to this.
To date I have not found that Xero on its own is suitable to manage share portfolios.
The contractors are based in 6 or more countries and we are using Xero multi-currency.
We have installed the WooCommerce > Xero integration which works well, however there are a couple of major sticking points we'd love to get resolved so that Xero works correctly with the import:1.
Shipping details + customer comments aren't exported to Xero.
Xero doesn't recognise bulk-purchase discounts against each inventory item.
Hello Xero fans!
We are looking for a couple of beta testers to test our app before we launch it for the public at xero.
Xero support have basically thrown it back onto Ozbiz to solve, but before I discuss this with them, I was wondering if any other bookkeepers has experience etc;
After discovering Xero, now be prepared for a complimentary SMARTER way of managing your spreadsheet data!
Hello Xero fans!
To help with this launch, I am looking for a handful of UK based  beta testers to stress test our app before we launch it publicly at xero.
co. uk  with the subject line “Xero Beta Tester”.
Some issues with tax HST tax calculationsWondering how others are coping with these and other issues related to trust accounting in Xero?
I am wondering what others have done to ensure that the Vend stock control matches to the Xero stock items.
I have been advised by Vend that stock control is a one way street from Vend to Xero.
We've recently been using Entryless, however we found Xero doesn't have a function to warn duplicate bills.
Xero needs to perform this check.
Hello Xero fans!
To help with this launch,&#160;I am looking for a handful of UK based&#160; beta testers to stress test our app before we launch it publicly at xero.
co. uk with the subject line “Xero Beta Tester”.
What addons works well with Xero that include a Crm and Inventory systems and Shopping cartI have had Tradegeko and Shopify recommended.
Your recommendations for a good payroll product with links to Xero would be much appreciated.
After discovering Xero, now be prepared for a complimentary SMARTER way of managing your spreadsheet data!
xero.
Might this be fixable from the Xero end?
I'm moving from Freshbooks to 100% native Xero.
This month, Xero will not sync with CLIO and import the bills to send to clients?
I have tried disconnecting Xero and Clio and reestablishing the connection.
In response to the recent announcements the team at Kounta wanted to put this message out to the Xero community.
Kounta will continue to support and nurture all shared Xero and Kounta customers and partners.
We will be using it stand alone to begin with and then to integrate with Xero.
are there better software property management apps out there that are not linked to Xero but work better on their own the the two options above?
I want to support Xero format for exporting feature, and am looking for advices.
I started from Japanese since I am Japanese, and I supported English recently, so I want to support Xero format for export now.
I am wondering if Xero users are interested in this type of app, and looking for advices.
com to xero.
I understand that you can create rules with xero but it's very clumsy compared to elegant way Mint and QuickBooks magically do the automatic categorization when statements are imported!
I am using Unleashed inventory system alongside Xero.
This has been going on since April 1st when I first setup Xero and Unleashed.
That being said, all of the topics I see regarding US payroll are typically before Xero rolled out their own integrated payroll in the US last year.
Hello Xero Community.
However part of the reason I love Xero is that it integrates so well with my job system - Paymo.
They have recently released Paymo 3 (still in beta) and have said they are dropping integration with Xero because "Xero has been unresponsive" Is an integration with Paymo 3 on the cards?
Currently there does not appear to be an offering for ACH payments on transactions originating in Xero.
We uploaded all the cutomers to xero (4500).
The upload works well, however each client then needs to export back to xero in order to link.
Not sure if I am doing something wrong or if it is a Xero or a a RB issue?
I am looking for a SAS provider to compliment Xero.
Hello Community,My firm has a client that is wanting to move from MYOB to Xero.
We were looking to integrate them to XERO using Carry the One.
I'm looking to move a community based dance school across from Reckon to Xero.
We currently have MYOB and in the process of switching to Xero.
I've already got the Xero Consumer Key.
For example, here' a video showing how to setup an online store on a Facebook page using items from Xero:The store itself has a stack of features.
They are looking for a cloud based tool that assists with Individual project (Show) Budget Preparation, Purchase Orders, Committed Expenditure V Budget / revised budget reporting and links with Xero.
I've contacted RB but they seem to think its a Xero issue.
However, it doesn't sync with Xero.
We also want our reseller stores contact details within Xero to be linked to the CRM4.
co. uk/whmcs-xero-addon/http://www.
What shopping cart apps have you all found to work best in terms of integration with Xero?
xero.
I'm looking for a CRM+ solution to manage my entire consulting practice that also integrates with Xero.
com/, which claims to provide backup of your data from Xero (and other cloud accounting applications).
Was hoping XERO could manage this but unfortunately does an extremely poor job at it (and this is the only issues we have with XERO),
And consider this for the roll out of purchase orders in Xero when finally released in the year 2040.
WFM JOB NUMBERSPush to Xero for tracking purposes.
Does someone know of a CRM that integrates with both Xero AND Unleashed?
A CRM system that is either a part of Xero or that integrates with both Xero and Unleashed would be great.
Hello,Can xero be integrated into prestashop 1.
We are not a XERO partner yet, that’s why connection to XERO needs be done via XERO login page (see video for more details).
3) Push the journal generated above into Xero.
We've had some interest over automatic entry of invoicing/purchasing data to and from Ingram Micro/Techpac (NZ) to Xero.
Why do you have to fully receipt a purchase order in WFM before it pushes to Xero?
Why can they not go through to Xero as drafts and as they are updated in either system updated in the other system?
My understanding is that Xero can not cope with this volume of invoicing.
I plan to do my bookkeeping with Xero, but I'm also looking at some of the addons.
I'm still finding my way around Xero (still trial at moment), let alone these addons!
I noticed WorkflowMax is Xero-owned.
Looking at Xero specifically:1.
Looking for feedback regarding online shopping carts and integration with Xero.
In Capsule CRM we are getting the following error when trying to export a contact to Xero.
Is there a project job management system that integrates with Xero using multi-currecy?
Has anyone heard whether Service M8 has been approved and is being integrated into Xero.
Previously I used Sage where this option existed however have moved across to XERO and hope to find the same feature.
I'm looking for a recommendation of quotation software for a landscaping client to integrate with Xero.
We're pleased to be announcing today that we're taking signups for Float - Cash flow forecasting for Xero.
This would really make Xero a useful management accounting tool.
Looking for a xero addon for an electrician that has 2 tradesman.
High All,            I am seeking to link our CRM, Salesforce with Xero.
Or perhaps a good way to do it within xero.
If not Sugar CRM online what else works seemlessly with Xero?
Currently Xero does not allow to send emails automatically (if you create them using an API from a different system).
Hey guys, when are we going to see a brilliant API that will truly allow the farming sector to fully utilise Xero?
Have you guys considered making a more extensive API for Xero?
What if you were to take a leaf from Facebook's book and create an API for third parties to actually integrate "Apps"  Xero?
(You could even offer some UI components so that third party apps could choose to inherit Xero's UI styling, to maintain a consistent UX.
We are avid users of the Invoicing gurus at Freshbooks and couldn't be more pleased that Xero connects to their API!
I saw this at  the recent Xero roadshow and have now successfully input all my SMSF data and integrated it to Xero - absolutely fantastic - can strongly recommend it - will save me hours and hours of work
Xero has the worst customer service of any company i know of.
Almost nine months ago I opened a ticket with Xero Payroll US for a problem preventing me from editing an employee payroll template.
If you are considering Xero, know what you are getting into.
xero.
I noted in my Gmail Spam box that there was an email that purported to be from Xero billing.
The domain the email came from wasn't xero but open.
The sender was Xero Billing Notifications, but the email address was on open.
Xero support have said that we have the wrong login details, we haven;t even got that far.
Funnily enough, it's about a problem to do with Xero not working properly!
SORTING REPORTS AND LISTS OF EMPLOYEES IN SURNAME ORDERNot sure why Xero sorts all payroll lists and reports in first name order.
Can someone advise if they have had issues setting up pensions through Xero and assessment and contributions being made incorrectly?
We have been back and forth with Xero and our pension provider (Smart Pensions) for the past three months trying to set this up correctly, however are receiving continuously conflicting information from both and from within xero itself and as a result our last two payrolls are wrong and now we have been advised to redo both however still have no confidence that this will be set up correctly as the support is limited from both sides.
I contacted Xero Support and was told that they were aware of the issue but it has not improved at all.
I have a query in regard to Xero Certificate, send it to Xero Support but never heard anything back in more than 1 day.
Who's fantastic idea was it to turn off PDF invoicing for the monthly Xero subscription?
Can you also advise how we go about cancelling our subscription with Xero?
I am trialing Xero today as I have heard a lot of very positive recommendations.
Xero is a complete zero.
xero.
It is ridiculous that I have to wait days for an answer from Xero.
As his bookkeeper, he is paying my hourly rate for me to sit here waiting for Xero to do what they said they would do.
I am trying to complete the registration, migration, and set-up of Xero Tax and XPM.
I have not received my engagement letter / quotation from Xero for 4 days now, queries on migration have been left unattended, calls diverted to voice mail, etc.
Xero's terminology of financial years is also confusing.
Xero out of all the features requested.
xero.
Wondering if Xero can have a more specific functions on the user setting.
Good day Xero,I am at a total loss to know what to do next, other than to cancel my 6 or so subscriptions to your product and find an alternative.
I would appreciate it if someone from Xero would bother to respond to us and get these issues sorted out.
this is again a failure in Xero which is basic accounting but totally omitted from your features.
- we are quite happy with Xero, however, if one day we decide to change.
- Who owns the data in Xero?
Come on XERO up your game this is not good enough!
I converted to Xero from Monchilla when Monchilla was sold to Xero.
since a week ago, xero is very slow.
Unfortunately for Xero and the customers, the forum for most purposes WORTHLESS piece of junk, coz what you and we have is merely hundreds thousands of individual voices partitioned off from each by the worst search function since the internet was created.
If you ask me Xero has decided it has a good enough product and is now spending 99.
I really had high hopes for Xero.
Very disappointed with Xero as Intuit has introduced this functionality recently and Xero remains to be silent on the status of this issue.
Barclaybank backend is ARCHAIC, but the fact that Intuit supports it makes me feel that Xero has been slacking.
Maybe we're outgrowing Xero.
Then, I made the Skype Call with Xero Support.
So Anyone can monitor this POOR "Xero Support" and make sure provide the quality service to end user.
However, I can honestly say in the past few months I have thought of leaving Xero because of one issue that has not been solved since we first began our subscription.
xero.
## I have send email ""Xero Support"" for this question, but its feedback is so slow which is over 24 hours.
AU Payroll in Xero seems to overcalculate annual leave.
In my opinion Xero in its current form is not designed with SMEs or B2C enterprises in mind.
I feel Xero COULD have so easily pulled miles ahead of QBO but it hasn't made MY life any easier, unfortunately.
As usual, what makes our lives harder isn't a priority even when it appears Xero has moved the goal posts.
Good morning Xero teamFirstly well done on the software, I have been a user for a couple of years now and have enjoyed the change from MYOB.
Hey Xero,The above feature that you enabled last month is annoying.
xero.
xero.
I have requested this auto-response from Xero, but they seem uninterested.
I have sent at least four emails since Sunday night regarding the reactivation of a cancelled Xero subscription.
I am having problems maintaining my Xero certification.
I think this is an amazing feature for Xero to offer and maybe should be publicized a little more!
Well done Xero!
Going forward, I know it's fairly straight forward, but this set up is making me want to quit Xero !
I understand these things happen - It was resolved quickly and the frequent updates on the Xero status page were really helpful and reassuring.
Well done to Xero – this was handled quickly and professionally.
Is this something that could be added to Xero quotes?
For 10 days now i have been trying to get Xero help with changing the subscription details from a former employee whose departure was  acrimonious and had set up 2 step password authentication for her login.
not sure if it is an issue at my end, or something with Xero.
We are using Xero on a Window 2012 server and we have Thin client terminals.
We have no end of trouble using Xero.
I was very clear in providing as much technical information as I could to help out the Xero support team in identifying the problem on their end.
I received a the following response from Xero support today.
Please help me as I am choosing between xero and myob now.
If u want an end user who uses Xero to is fullest to test and trial your reports or changes.
When it comes to Debt Collection - Xero where are you.
c) to give Xero access to our accountDo you people not understand anything about how businesses run?
As a bookkeeper who has been using Xero since 2012 and a certified advisor for 3 years, I am very disappointed that Xero are no longer offering certification for non partners.
Surely it is beneficial to client, the accountant/bookkeeper and Xero to have certified advisers using their product, as their level of expertise will be higher than a non certified user?
Xero's first response were some work-around suggestions that were useless as the mentioned feature (a + sign on the tax column that lets you ajust the tax amount) is not available in my version of xero.
Xero is awesome!
I am finding that I get a "Support note" type of response to my queries, and then have to go back and re-iterate my question and either re-direct the Xero responder to my screenshot or supply it again.
I am having problems with logging on to xero with Safari, (It keeps looping ) Xero know about this but haven't sorted it yet getting a bit fed up trying to log on through various  xero web pages.
I am going round the houses with you Xero.
He could not tell me, this is basic feature stuff, he says I should speak to my accountant (on how to do this in Xero, your product).
The Xero guy also directs me to your support team email address.
So now I have written to Payroll and waiting for a response which hopefully doesn't give me a spread of videos to wade through to not find my answer, or direct me to speak with an accountant so presumably there is no legal exposure with Xero.
When exporting a contacts details from Xero to a .
Hello Xero,I have started using Click Super and the March Qtr Super contributions were processed  on 10 May, however I find it frustrating that there are no reports in Xero from Click Super to confirm that the contributions have been disbursed to the actual super funds.
What has happend to Xero?
Seriously considering leaving Xero now.
I find the reports in Xero very limiting and basic.
My main concern is how to go abt the GST submission to custom dept and whether Xero is Malaysia tax compliant.
Are Sundays maintenance day for Xero?
Everything I'm doing today I've done hundreds of times before, and none of it is especially complicated - yet Xero keeps chocking, gagging, refreshing, and generally pissing me off.
Xero have no hesitation in raising fees when the competitiors have an equal product at a much cheaper price.
I get the impression Xero is raising its subscriptions shortly, from reading some posts on here.
We seem to have passed "peak support" from Xero, if my experiences today are an indicationno one seems to want to own the problemno support ticket number issued.
It is my understanding that Xero uses NetSuite for its ERP.
We have recently added Unleashed as a ad on to our Xero accounting software.
I want end of year work to be run in Xero and not in IRIS, or similar.
xero.
xero.
com/au/training/157-accountants-bookkeepers/159-bookkeepers/291-xero-essentials/It says "free".
So, I've clicked 4 deep, before Xero tells me I can't actually access these tutorials.
That is, after all, what Xero is for?
Love Xero.
Pull Xero Payroll off your products list or fix the issue and give us more reports.
XERO is doing shit!
Every day my life is hard because I'm using Xero "Beautifully Shit accounting software"231 people have voted for a deposit feature in XERO and yet no Deposit feature, Quick books has it, its easy to do.
unless of course I am the only Xero customer with this problem?
Goodbye Xero.
I emailed the below issues to Xero customer service (flagging these as urgent) and I am still waiting for a response.
We have 3 entities registered with Xero.
We have asked Xero Support for an explanation.
The difficulty communicating with Xero contributes to our frustration.
Maybe we can work out an ongoing paid Xero support deal?
I am finding that using Xero is extremely slow and incredibly frustrating.
Right, sick of Xero payroll.
I have questions about security at Xero.
Xero has an entire page devoted to security but surprisingly doesn't say anything much about it!
I remember all over again about how unfriendly Xero can be.
Really, this has made me re-evaluate if we want Xero at all.
Xero is a great online accounting system.
One very let down customer who once loved Xero.
Regrettably, the end of this FY and a migration off Xero cannot come soon enough.
Partners of Xero,We're looking into our re-certification process to make it more relevant and helpful for you all.
Have recently changed to Xero and am happy with it apart from the inventory adjustment.
Either way it's a HUGE pain to have to 'print' individual emails and then send them via an external email client (ie outside of Xero).
I'm offering these comments in order to invite further ideas, and to bring these to the attention of Xero.
Xero appear to have devoted its energies to date into channeling most support requests to the forums and FAQs.
Great care is taken in Xero's replies to this Community to stress how much they value their customer support, but actually providing some when it's needed would be preferable.
URGENTI am absolutely appalled at the service provided by Xero.
Xero claims, they are happy to call you.
I am not truly happy with the security or lack of security in Xero, especially after the recent "issue" or shall we call it breach, which has seen us forced to change passwords.
Xero is the lifeblood of any firms accounting and customer information yet we still only have the option for a password.
The other thing that concerns me is that you say;Xero takes security very seriously.
Not sure where Xero gets its reputation from now that I've tried it.
The last few days Xero has been very slow to load.
I migrated from MYOB who had support by phone to NO phone support or rapid resolution system with XERO.
Xero appeared to be aware this was happening but has not sent out a notice about it.
I have recently put our biggest client on Xero having been singing its praises for the last year or so.
XERO YOUR CUSTOMER SUPPORT IN MY EXPERIENCE IS ZERO!
We recommend Cin7 and Xero to most businesses wish to grow.
For myself - using Xero on a daily basis, and for our developer - using the API, it has been a breeze for us and 100x easier to work with and understand.
xero.
I was told I had support until I took out a subscription then my Xero rep told me there was no more help as I signed up with my accountant.
Xero won't let me either save or send, as an error message reads 'Invalid Email address' up the top.
I've had a couple of emails from Xero support since basically telling me to try refreshing and reactivating the feed, which I have done over a few days but that didn't solve the issue.
We have been looking at alternatives to Xero and if this issue isn't fully fixed in the next couple of days we are planning on moving over.
27-5 Emails to Xero Support go unasnwered, so we escalate to our President and CEO to call Xero.
28-5 We wait 24 hours access is still not restored1-6 I contact our CEO and Accountant to again BOTH get in contact with Xero and find out how to rectify this1-6 I lodge another support ticket in Xero, which claims something completely different to what was told to our CEO on the phone.
You should buy Xero simply to experience the best customer service and support you will ever experience.
Xero support responds incredibly quickly and always spot on with their advice.
xero.
As per the messaging on the website, Xero were supposed to help us with this transition - now, since we're based in Dubai (UAE), they can't assist us because we're part of the "global edition", we've enabled multi-currency and the excuses are compounding.
Unfortunately glaring omissions in Xero implementations make life very difficult and, in my opinion, unnecessarily so.
Its not the power and the concept of Xero.
I though that Xero advised that it can now save previous "Reference" details.
I've contacted billing@xero.
com and support@xero.
So if you are having similar issues please reply below so Xero we can demonstrate it is a wider issue.
I am a big fan of xero, but i have been experiencing  some issues.
NZ Starter Version Xero $25 AU Starter Version Xero $25BUT NZ version 0 employees AU version 1 employeeNZ Standard Version Xero $50 AU Standard Version Xero $50BUT NZ version 1 employee AU version 5 employeesNZ Premium Version 10 Xero $75 AU Premium Version 10 Xero $60Both NZ version 10 employees AU version 10 employeesIt appears on the face of things that the lucky land grass is greener, even if it was little old NZ that developed the software.
WELL DONE JET CONVERT and XERO!
Great feature to lodge within Xero using our Auskey.
Xero interprets SKUs as unique when they are not.
As an accountant that has used many different systems and have now been using Xero for a year I can not tell you how much I enjoy using Xero.
I am considering going back before I get too invested in Xero as I've been here a few years now and see no updates to the UI.
I am so frustrated with xero, currently I am on a 95% rate of my Purchase Orders that are emailed out not being received by the recipient.
We have noticed over recent months that the speed of screen refreshes when clicking between screens and company files in Xero has slowed.
xero.
I've been with Xero only 2 months but have to say I am really disappointed so far.
Xero's customer service policy is strange - no phone number on their website?
After an hour on the phone, I was left feeling unappreciated, unacknowledged and unimportant to Xero.
Dear Xero,I want to explain to you the reasons why I will be leaving you.
I understand PayPal don't care but maybe the Xero TEAM do?
What I asked is will Xero *fully* support them?
This was put into place with no consultation to Xero customers.
After all, it isn't long since Xero increased its monthly fee with no notice.
Two days later, Xero sent another email saying that due to the "passionate response" from its customers, there would now be a choice whether to adopt the service.
I then asked whether Xero wuld commit to maintain the Yodlee feel after August 2015.
005  from one system using XERO to XERO and it got translated to 125 x 0.
005 per message the XERO- XERO truncates this to 2 decimal places.
Xero appears to go off live often, but only for a short period.
xero.
I really hope there is somebody at Xero who focuses on maintaining everyday usability that can get this looked at.
Xero, thus far, is a great product.
I've recently started using Xero payroll and it is wonderful.
If that employee takes leave, xero automatically allocates those hours across 5 days.
Xero support team points their finger to Yodlee?
I'm quite certain a fix for this would be very well received by users, and in some cases critical for them to continue using xero.
I did trial Saasu before Xero it does handle inventory for similar spend and does not require unleashed to handle inventory!
In this regard, moving to Xero has been a step backwards.
I kind of randomly heard about Xero and decided to check it out.
If you're using MYOB, I'd strongly consider switching to Xero.
So I inquired into retaining her for fee to answer questions and help me implement Xero.
Hello,We're looking for five people to come into the Xero Wellington office this Friday (6th of December).
You'll be helping us test some updated designs for the Xero touch app.
XERO have stated they are not going to provide Phone/Chat support (seach Phone in Feature Requests) XERO should provide a forum/notice for users of current Technical issues/faults that are undergoing repairs/fixes.
My accountant threw Xero up as a way forward and it probably is, but the transition has been anything but smooth, actually the transition hasn't managed to occur.
So I'm left with trawling the internet, looking for someone who provides Xero training in my area, as I haven't managed to work out how to contact Xero to ask them.
I'm not stupid, but once I move away from doing basic accounting in Xero, I start to feel stupid pretty quick.
I don't believe that I am alone among your users, and I am actually concerned that other Xero users might be doing these activities wrong or partly wrong.
These might not be common tasks, but they are likely to happen to many Xero customers.
We moved to Xero for $588 pa for one company.
I have struggled with Xero from the start.
We are very dismayed by Xero’s narrow minded attitude with respect to banking feeds, especially towards UK based companies.
We are currently using 8 Xero licenses, accounting in different countries, including the UK.
Xero takes the dread out of this.
"It would also keep Xero with easy statistics on the life and decay cycle of their request pool.
I cannot tell you how painful it has been moving from MYOB to XERO.
In theory, XERO is a fantastic system if it stays up.
I cannot find a link anywhere to contact Xero for help.
after doing some reaserch i decided to try and see if i could get my quicbooks data into xero to test it.
the reply wss extremly woefull and it was obvious that the person replying had xero idea.
I'm giving up using this Community Discussion website due to lack of meaningful communication from anyone at Xero.
The only people who participate seem to be other Xero customers, sure Xero may comment sometimes but they seldom answer questions directly and often 2 or 3 weeks later.
I would love to see more transparency about plans for Xero.
Many users are hanging out and waiting for fixes to big issues, we want to know if Xero are listening and if anything is being actioned.
We have recently converted from QB to Xero.
I really hope Xero picks up the ball and makes changes quickly.
Now that I can see those things so quickly and so directly in Xero, it really makes me think twice before buying this stuff.
Well done, Xero!
If Xero wants to really develop an great product they must start listening AND acting on customer requests.
##### CLUSTER 5 #####
I need to refer to my Xero organization by email.
They've said I need to correct this in Xero.
Now I need to make sure that is all reflected properly in Xero.
Before you start relying on Xero and building your books with them you need to know what you are potentially dealing with.
Need to have a couple of years of experience using XERO performing above mentioned tasks.
We believe we have reached a point where we need to employ an accountant with Xero knowledge to fix these mistakes.
I need a way to increase our VAT liability on Xero by &#163;1870.
We enter order into Xero, specifying that we need 10 shirts from Nike and 10 shirts from Adidas, and then 20 screenprints from a decorator plus a setup charge.
The loan was started before we began using Xero so I realise I will need to enter a conversion balance.
Whilst xero does what we need it is very labour intensive .
Hello,I cannot find any V. A. T return features in Xero, I live in Malta and need to send V. A. T payments to the V. A. T department, therefore I need to see my V. A. T liabilities decreasing as well as increasing when V. A. T Credit is sent.
First of, I need to let Xero know that only 140.
I have no idea though what I need to do in Xero.
HiI know this has been asked and answered by Xero that it is not going to happen but I need help with how to work around my problem.
I am thinking I will need to ask Xero if they have had this issue.
Also I need to know what date I first started using Xero.
Xero doesn't think I need to fill one out for the 3 months to end June, so how do I do this?
Also where can I find in xero the total amount of directors loan and what do I need to do with it?
These are not included in the 1st return filed through Xero but need to be included in the return somehow.
I have assets that I need to depreciate at accelerated rates however Xero is only calculating a monthly portion.
Do I need to do a general journal entry, or is there another way using Xero's system functions?
We have been using Quicken98 for the past 10+ years and need to import historical data from that into Xero.
Our UK Xero accountant may set up our US Xero subscription as we save on costs, however we need someone to handle company returns/tax liabilities and in the future payroll and perhaps bookkeeping.
How can I set the direct debit process up and how would this need to be configured in Xero, can I DD through Xero?
It seems to me that I don't need all this data in Xero.
Searching Xero Help seems to imply I'd need to carve out a PO or BILL for each purchase line of which there are hundreds each month.
Xero performs far too slowly to accomplish this within the system, so I either need an external app or will need to develop a database.
We need three more for Xero certification.
Our Xero bookkeeping services are generally requested and offered as follows: Our bookkeepers can do everything for you so you don’t need to anything book work related.
I'm concerned that Xero would be overkill for what I need?
When I log in, I need a quick way of getting into the relevant client's system, funnily enough already in existence with My Xero.
When in any entry in Xero we have the ability to make notes, however if we have some of the team working remotely (include our accountant / book-keeper) we often find that we need to flag queries on a particular transaction that might need querying, correcting, recoding etc.
We desperately need the Xero App to default to Settings Defaults created in the full version of Xero.
I would be the ideal target customer - currently using Quickbooks (originally Pro, now Enterprise - but same point is true from both):  Xero has all the accounting functionality that I need, a nice interface, would be happy to go away from Intuit, some nice app interaction.
When a customer accepts quote online, there is no response from xero, we need something to go back to cust to say we will be in contact.
We need the feature in Xero to SPLIT the whole expense amount either by FIXED Amount or by % ((GST or GST Free).
She doesnt need access to everything in Xero as Adviser access would give her.
We need the ability to allow users to only access the inventory management function of Xero, without the ability to access all financial reporting etc.
This would be a great benefit, it would cut out the need to create the actual bills in another programme outside of Xero, such as Microsoft Word or Excel.
Currently, Xero automatically closes what I am working on when I need to go to another place.
It’d be great if it Xero had a Register of Shareholders built in, so that information doesn’t need to be stored somewhere else.
What we need is another option on the PO side to the PO to an existing bill within Xero and mark the PO as "billed".
Cmon Xero - you need to sort this - crikey!
I regularly have >1000 transactions that need approving with very few requiring any modifications to the default coding applied by the rules or Xero.
We need to delete a very large number of Manual Journals incorrectly posted to Xero.
We badly need per employee Xero pricing.
To import into xero i need to adjust these to "tax exclusive" before importing.
But Xero need a few more people to say they would love it to.
In our company we sometimes need to reconcile xero before we recieve all of the outstanding receipts on our credit card.
Also this field value would need to be stored with Xero's reusable Inventory Items.
Again, I will need to re-enter all their details into Xero if they restart work.
We desperately need this functionality in Xero Payroll or we will have to start moving clients back on to Sage Payroll
We've moving all our payroll to Xero now and timesheeting but need multiple people (users) to approve it.
Do I need to do anything else in Xero to ensure that it's running correctly from a GST perspective?
Xero definitely need to improve the User Access privileges options.
We have a CRM already integrated to Xero, and wouldn't need 99% of the features in Workflow Max.
I have been told that I need to issue a VAT credit note to our customer and claim it back against our next VAT return - how do I create this in Xero?
However as they are responsible for our stock control they do need access to the Xero inventory.
I need to VOID cheque created in XERO.
HiI'm a sole trader using xero and I need to lodge my annual tax return.
I called Paypal and asked what do I need to do but they said it is my settings in Xero that triggers this issue.
I still need this information pulled into xero.
They have their current year payroll records elsewhere and don't need the ones in Xero.
Would I need to run some other application alongside Xero or should I look at a totally different type of solution.
I need to reconcile these two transactions with the one receipt recorded using the xero smartphone app.
that I need to record in Xero.
It is being created to address a perceived need for Xero and WFM Advisors to actively discuss marketing and selling the tie software as well as related accounting, cloud integration and professional services.
Once they’ve already been downloaded into Xero after they either go a way or have been changed it takes a lot of work to figure out which Xero transactions are the ones that need to be removed or modified.
HiI have a few thousand lines in my paypal a/c in xero that i need to reconcile.
I need a statement generated from XERO:Lease Rent Payable                  xxxLess: Deductions                      xxx(for the payments made on their behalf)NET Amount Payable               xxxAlso, How shall I set up the landlords, as CUSTOMER OR SUPPLIER?
When I usually process a refund from PayPal there are two transaction that I need to reconcile in Xero.
For us, the problem with using Xero's inventory is that the items need to be added by the Item Code.
I have been a Xero bookkeeper, a Xero accountant and I am now a Xero Cloud Integrator and Trainer - I know how long it takes to get the information you need to make the right decision and I know the questions that need to be asked.
We need to enter this info into Xero as a sale for each day.
As a result we'll need everyone to have their own Xero login if we're to benefit from the live feeds.
Please let me know if Xero fits this description since I need a more organized and efficient program!
I will need to continue with an excel / paper based process for staff and re-key to Xero for accounting purposes until Xero allows multi-currency expense claims - but that's another story!
Do I need to enter every single one of their expenses into Xero?
However, for accounting and reporting purposes surely I need to have the details of each card transaction in Xero, where do these go?
Am I missing something or do Xero need to modify their .
We set it up after we started using Xero because it has the functionality to go back to a particular date and pull all transactions from that date forward – therefore I didn’t feel the need to start it on the day we started using Xero.
Hello,We have noticed that Xero does not calculate Payroll Tax and therefore we need to calculate this manually (hurry up xero), however Leave Loading is not included in Payroll Tax though Leave Loading is included into the Annual Leave rate making this extremely difficult to calculate Payroll Tax.
Do I need to wait for the payroll date before xero will let me see it?
Do I need a more upmarket payroll programme compatible with Xero to fix my problem?
5 hours of troubleshooting with Westpac, they said I need to go back to Xero.
I have not started using Xero Payroll but am wondering if it suits my need here.
My accountant and I have checked online and PAYE scheme is still active so we need to override this in Xero but cannot edit.
I have written to Xero support but they haven't come back yet (over 24 hours) and I need to RTI today!
Whilst it's probably not realistic for Xero payroll support to be hugely responsive at month end I haven't heard back from my email yesterday and because of this I'm in a mess as I need to run payroll.
Xero - you need quicker support for things that stop payroll running.
Does that mean Xero notifies HMRC automatically or do I still need to do something?
I have a staging date in June so I am keen to get this set up in Xero but to be honest I am having difficulty finding the details that I need to enter.
Amazingly if you are a manager, Xero seems to assume that these people have no bosses and that THEIR leave requests do not need to be approved.
HiI am considering switching to using Xero for payroll, but I would need it to track holiday entitlement.
Our advisor thought that once we were using Xero payroll we would not need to manually do this every month, but it seems this has not been happening automatically and now we are behind by a number of months.
If Xero wants to gain mass acceptance as a payroll provider, then they need to cater to some of those needs.
I need Xero to "integrate" with an external system.
I'm at a point where I need to adopt an inventory management solution that would sync my inventory information from Amazon FBA, Shopify, and link it back to Xero (preferably a cloud-based solution).
We need a simple barcoding system that we scan when it arrives and then scans when we've used it and transfers the data to Xero.
Also of course need integration with XERO.
Need the module working with xero.
I am a food manufacturer and need an inventory system that logs all ingredients coming in and products going out by scanning barcodes and keeps regular stock check, can you recommend one that works with xero?
Timesheets need to sync back to Xero.
Do we need to allocate the credits again in xero - even though they have been fully applied in ostendo?
I have showed her a quick demo of Xero and she loves it but I am not sure if it can contain all the information she will need in one spot?
I have this today, delivered from ABAX, but I need something that interfaces to Xero or WorkFlowMax.
However, Xero doesn't have features which match accounting names, so the app need to match accounting code itself in advance.
However that is growing and even though we are using Xero it's not quite doing what we need (we probably need travel agent software now, that tracks deposits, when payments are due etc).
They won't need to manage users nor demo Xero to clients.
The actions of Xero have resulted in my credit card being overdrawn and I need it fixed ASAP.
THEN XERO NEED TO GIVE CUSTOMERS A WAY TO MATCH THOSE FIELDS THAT SHOULD CORRESPOND !
------------------------We need to take Xero offline for a bit to roll our next release.
Remember XERO, we are the ones that need to work with your product for hours a day.
##### CLUSTER 6 #####
It would be great if you could pull up a bank reconciliation that shows all accounts on the one page
HSBC NZ bank feeds, whats the hold up?
The balance of the credit card on the Bank Accounts screen is $1,900 and it shows it's fully reconciled.
when cash coding, if you try and create a bank rule, you will automatically lose any coding that you have already done once you click on the create bank rule drop down arrow
All that would be required is a well thought out customised Chart of Accounts.
We have these two funds in our chart of accounts as liabilities.
I'm trying to set up bank feeds for my checking.
Our bank has Cash Management logins so that multiple people can access with restrictions based on their position.
When I check my bank account they aren't outstanding there.
I'm doing my first bank reconciliations with Xero.
Debit staff and credit cash/bank.
My company uses Xero (happily) for everything, including expenses and bank account reconciliation.
I'm pretty sure my bank isn't one of the partner banks (Bendigo Bank Melbourne) but when I enter the bank name the message box says "Bank Feeds available"But that's all it says - I don't have any option to enter in my bank acc number and other details, just a message box saying - bank feeds available.
I once tried entering the bank acc details then adding the bank name - then it said my bank wasn't a partner bank but also gave me no other options.
This includes credit card transactions (for which this cost is fairly standard) AND it also includes ACH transactions, i. e. direct bank transfers.
Appreciate If Xero can develop the ability to have 2 tax nominal accounts which is a compulsory feature for our client.
Although in the account we had the failed/returned payments (an Amex acc) these transactions are showing on the bank statement.
Our US Dollar bank account in Xero is reconcilled but is showing a credit amount of $26.
HelloI run a small not-for-profit registered charity, and I've made a mess of our accounts.
I want to reimport statements and reconcile our accounts - but there's a hot mess of deleted and unreconciled transactions, and I'm not sure how to revert back to a blank canvas.
I have paid my employee from my personal bank account, i know its not good but i have done it for now.
We own commercial properties and wish to know how to copy a monthly rental statement into Xero, so income (rent) and outgoings can be reconciled against the one bank statement line.
I essentially have 5 months worth of purchasing that I paid for privately ( all through a single nominated bank account for ease of track and trace ).
The expense claim covers four payments (or four bank lines).
I am trying to reconcile my bank statement, but there are a couple of payments that i have made on purchases that we made using some cash and some card.
Hello we have many growing company they will search for system finish for them the daily job so I suggest to make deal with Saudi bank because this deal will make the daily job much easyThanks
I simply usually link up my bank statement with Paypal transactions and keep the receipts attached to each bill.
My bank is investigating and they may eventually return the funds, but in the meantime it will be paid twice.
HiI have been asked to set up and back date a set of accounts from September 2016 and bring it up to date.
They've managed to take too much money from our bank via direct debit.
One of those is bank/credit card account reconciliation.
We want to start January 2017 for all of our accounts using the ending balances from December 31 2016.
It only showed the Date, the reference from the bank and the amount.
We are looking to transfer a client from MYOB into Xero, however the client currently has a number of foreign currency accounts.
I still can not automatically access my bank feeds from inside Xero.
She can deposit the check and then deposit in the bank and i can link that deposit to 310 account but was trying to see if there is another way of doing this.
It is definitely not in the bank account to reconcile.
This prevents posting in previous or future years (typos) which then require correcting when found (usually when doing the bank recs).
It also prevents any changes to data in previous accounting years where the accounts have already been finalised.
We prepare our Financial Reports in usual International format, with summary Balance Sheet and P&L, with many numbered notes and explanations to the accounts.
My client has had his accounts converted from MYOB to Xero by another party.
I notice that some bank accounts and petty cash are classified as Current Assets.
Howe do I change these back to Bank status.
statement balance shows a negative even though when I log in and check PayPal it shows a plus also how do I reconcile payments that pass through PayPal from my bank.
We are working on our year end balances and have a credit balance on our accounts receivable.
Some purchases are made from my AUD PayPal balance, some are made from my AUD bank account, and (up until recently) I have made some purchases directly from my USD PayPal balance.
Bank: Same as above, only using bank rates instead of PayPal.
How best to handle a bank transaction that went in and out.
I was doing the bank reconciliation and I had used the create function on the right instead of Match as there was a bill sitting.
After the end of the month I noticed what I had done and I went in to fix this (I thought)I went into the Bank account in question and I unreconciled the transaction in question.
I then went back into reconcile the bank account and I used the Match feature to fix it.
one day in the last couple of months, I have done my bank reconciliation.
It's generally accepted that most accounts payable transactions would be categorized as operating activities in the Statement of Cash Flows.
But Xero has chosen to categorize accounts payable transactions as  "Cash Flows from Financing Activities"?
We have a pool of assets (assorted furniture) Cost (approx) $2,500 Accumulated Depreciation (approx) $2,250 book value (approx) $250 have now sold one desk and have $150 in the bank account.
I have reconciled the bank transaction so that now I have an Expense sitting against account 500 - Corporation Tax.
They have repaid the overpayment directly into our bank account.
So if my employee's salary is, for example, $2000, I will have to take out $400 to deposit into his provident fund accounts, then on top of that, another $300 (company's contribution).
i am struggling to reconcile the 2 bank statement lines to 1 transaction.
I started by creating an 'Employee Loan Account' in the Chart of Accounts, listed under Current Assets.
However, when I came to post a record to that account, it was not visible on the drop down list of accounts.
Commission To DavidWhen PaidDavid To bank After paying commission the item was returned.
HO a/c, Branch a/c, Vendor a/c and bank a/c to be included .
I have manually imported a personal bank account statement into xero.
I understand law firm have a little bit more complicated approach to the accounts like they have lawyer's client accounts to take care of as well.
I am having trouble finding the beneficiary reference field, supplier name (if supplier name is different to bank account holder name) and bank branch code field.
The scenario I'm in is the following:- I didn't realise I could reconcile card transaction to the bank directly, so I used the expenses, this is bad.
As such, the way I planned for online orders is as follows: I will have 4 contacts:1- Cash customer2- Paypal customer3- Credit card customer4- Bank wire customerMy primary method of entering these orders would be through bank/credit card/paypal/cash account reconciliation screens.
Then in Xero, I would reconciliate imported credit card and bank transactions directly against COGS.
I am a bit late into the game with our accounts for this year, and am now playing catch up a little bit!
We have both recently paid our NIC, and these payments have since shown up in our Xero bank feed, however I am now unsure how best to reconcile these transaction.
There is no co-mingling between accounts.
One and the same company has a bank account in two different banks.
PS - A transfer between accounts of two different companies is never a problem.
77 that never happened, as in they are not on our bank statement for this period.
So now there is a difference for that amount between Xero and our bank account.
Accountants we work with recommended to "Show as a receipt in the bank and offset against Expenses COS if it allows" but I have no idea  how to do it.
in doing so, will it delete out all the expenses that went along with the personal accounts?
Part of this money will be also in money received in Bank.
A week later however, we receive a refund for this bill into our bank account.
I thought the account codes could be used to determine where accounts are located in reports, so I have set up 6 digit codes, to represent such things as Overhead:Type of Overhead:Sub categoryeg 601020 ie 60 (overhead) 10 (Establishment costs) 20 (Rent)I assumed the Chart of Accounts was the most significant thing to work on and I assumed that because Xero uses codes, they were relevant to everything else.
I have had no bank feed for almost 3 weeks now.
EVERY other bank in the world they rely on Yodlee to connect too.
They simply write code to make the bank think its an authorized user logging in.
I have 9 bank related accounts AMEX, BOA, Chase, and Seacoast.
But my 5 Seacoast accounts have not worked for 3 weeks.
So now you have a situation with Xero has no relationship with the bank or FIS, only with Yodlee, and Yodlee has no relationship with the banks or FIX.
The money was paid in by bank transfer into the buinsess account and the cars were bought at auction using the buisness card/bank account.
The property investment didn't show up in the bank feed, nor has the amount of the loan, since it was directly paid by the bank.
Now every month, the monthly loan payments (including capital, cost and insurance) show up in the bank feed.
HelloI'm in the process of setting up my first organisation in Xero and have a query regarding the opening balance for Accounts Receivable.
I've also entered the accounts receivable and accounts payable balances.
The correct approach in my mind would be to raise a journal to clear down and debit the accounts receivables balances and then credit individual contact accounts but Xero does not offer this option.
I am trying to enter in my year end adjustments which involve an adjustment to my Accounts Payables.
For some reason, a number of transactions prior to that date (which I had imported from my bank account) were balanced out by credits in a journal entry related to the conversion balance that I can't edit.
Currently only the user that makes the bank account change gets the notifications.
Hello,Wha will be accounting treatment of issuing bank/performance/tender Guarantee (Bond)?
My thinking is either after a Bank Rec (so no transactions can come in and mess up your Bank Rec so you can peacefully move into creating month end reports) or after all the financial reports have been prepared for the month, so any adjusting entries can still be made if necessary.
How do you close an accounting year  to transfer all P&L items to retained earnmings & carry forward balances to next year on balance sheet accounts
HiJust wondering why whenever I bank a cheque, it appears 3 times to be reconciled.
Is the bank doing something weird?
We paid for office materials online using the company debit card and the company bank account was debited.
Can someone help me to understand step 3 an step 5 when setting up Bank Rules.
I withdrew cash from my bank account with the intention of making a bank deposit, but never did.
Then I put it back into the same bank account.
The template also has a column for 'Cheque Number' which is really odd and very restrictive as obviously not every transaction on a bank statement will refer to a cheque.
The bank has already deducted tax, but when booking it under 270 Interest received it shows up as a taxable income, which it shouldn't be.
We have completed our 2016 tax return based on MYOB accounts and completed a conversion from MYOB to Xero in August.
During Myob to Xero conversion Xero created new accounts:Accounts receivable originalAccounts payable originalWe don't understand why and we would like to close them as well as completing another journal entry to agree Xero accounts with manual accounts done at 30/6/16These accounts have some VERY old AP and AR which we could never get rid of in MYOB.
how to pass bank service charges entry in Bank Account
I have 2 separate accounts for credit cards with Chase.
So for each property we setup a loan as a bank account and an escrow bank account.
we have already credited back the customer, but now I can not reconcile the bank statement.
The customers money is in my bank rec but the credit against their account cannot be seen to reconcile it?
Hey I have a Multi Currency Bank Account, Means i have more than one currency in same bank account.
My manager wants to know the accounts receivables(debtors) in each batch.
I run an independent record label (music) and our accounts are in GBP.
On the occasions that we do not receive the actual cash to convert the currency and bank it, we create Bill credit notes for the artist so that we can deduct the relevant amount from any future royalties payments to them (Bills we receive from the artist).
Meaning: I'll be double counting by putting dollars into the other GL accounts as long as 100% of the bank balance is always reflected in the main account.
The whole reason to move to a better accounting system was to keep better track of what was going on in my 2 main bank accounts with multiple GL Asset accounts - I'd have at least 8 total.
So there is an entry for $9000 received via the bank feed, and $9000 spent via the CC feed (the upfront 3% charge also appears and I've reconciled that to an "Interest Expense" account).
So if I have $20 as my PayPal balance, and I buy $100 of supplies, PayPal shows $20 used from PayPal balance and an $80 bank transfer.
And then reconcile the transactions in the accounts to the transfer?
The check was then rejected by the bank, and sent back to me.
The amount, plus some bank fees, were taken out of my bank account by the bank.
The client has now paid the amount owing by bank transfer (and my bank fees).
How can I account for these three lines in my bank statement - let's say $100, -$125, and $125 - in Xero?
All bank accounts have feeds.
In checking though the accounts, I noticed that all accounts were reconciled apart from the credit card (CC) account.
Under the "Bank Transaction Source" the one line item stated "Bank Feed" and the other line item with the same date and amount stated "Imported".
How do I select two bank lines (one debit, one credit) to match the bill?
Now no more imports have come  to my &#163; or $ paypal Xero accounts since September.
For instance, in my chart of accounts I have several payments to one company.
I have 2x RaboBank accounts that I use to hide my tax money from myself and because you cannot get bank feeds for these I am wondering how to deal with all the transactions that come and go from these accounts from my ASB accounts connected to Xero.
14Paid prior to conversion from AUD Bank Account 140.
97Now we are in XERO and we are using our USD bank account.
HiWe have a 'bank account' set up for our till, safe & actual bank account.
I have transactions and a bank feed set up for this account.
I have the bank account side of things under control and have now set up a paypal feed and also have several months of data to import from paypal .
I will also have to show the transfers to the bank account and any spend through paypal.
Now, so that I can reconcile that transaction, I want to create an account in the Chart of Accounts to code it to.
There are 6 to 7 debit transactions in bank statement feed in Xero.
Now in xero I have entered only 1 transaction of salary with break up and want to reconcile it against 6-7 lines of bank statement.
So, I have recorded the transfer from bank to petty cash.
Transfer to petty cash which credits bank account, and debits petty cash.
As a result, we are still using a Sage-derived chart of accounts within Xero.
I'm converting my accounts to Xero.
And because I only imported transactions beginning on 1/01/2016 and have set my opening balances as of 12/31/2015 I don't know how to record the expense without affecting the bank account balance, which is currently fully reconciled.
This then means that the £1,100 is never debited and so I always have an accounts payable in my balance sheet of at least £1,100.
They noticed it a week ago Thursday and went to the bank on Friday and thought they had it resolved.
Locked out again over the weekend so back to the bank Monday.
However these do not match with the lines in my bank statement.
Bank feeds from National Australia Bank have been missing international transaction fees since at least April.
To elaborate:We have multiple direct debit payments come through on a single bank account transaction (using a 3rd party).
The only way we have worked around this is to visit the chart of accounts from the browser, return to cash coding, and mysteriously, it works.
The problem is that the amount received in the bank account already includes an international transfer fee from the bank ($20).
This total is what appears in Bank account.
Bank Account and 2.
As they were not familiar with Xero, and have not checked with us whether all bank reconciliations have been completed prior to commencing work, they went on to finalise the financial reports with all these unreconciled lines.
If I delete the bank lines, I will have the same problem because i would have changed the bank balance on the 2015 balance sheet.
Note: Credit card is also created/saved on asset tab of chart of accounts, but reports as liability on Balance Sheet.
We bank with Wells Fargo bank.
"You will have noticed that salaries have been paid to staff during the month when you did the bank reconciliations.
(And I understand that Stripe is NOT a bank account, but rather a clearing house.
from our personal accounts.
because it's paid from our personal accounts.
It's showing one xero on the reconcile tab because I have imported a bank feed.
Do I have to create a bill for "Rent April", approve, mark as paid via bank transfer and then reconcile it?
With regards to the standard chart of accounts '880 Owner Drawings' and '881 Owner Funds Introduced', I'm curious why there are two accounts?
Hello all, We are about to buy another company which will also have its accounts on Xero.
We have set up both companies with the same chart of accounts so were hoping this would be the case.
We then lodge these and are paid this amount plus GST from NTG into the bank, so we receive $110 inc GST.
It seems the only way to do this is to roll back all depreciation for the registered assets (approx 70) and go and amend to straight line - the main issue with doing this is it will change all of the historic numbers even though accounts have already been filed, hence not really an option as it needs to come through as a one-off correction in this financial year.
Unsure of which accounts I should assign a fixed asset to when making an "Asset Type.
Why is it that Xero is tying these accounts together?
I have a private loan, registered under 900 – Loan in the chart of accounts.
Went to director's personal bank account.
Before receiving these instructions from the accountant, I had set up a bank account in xero titled 'directors personal bank account' and paid all the relevant receipts from this.
-Bank fee's on personal acct for wire transfers and money orders.
Is there anyone else who reconciles their balance sheet accounts using xero and if so, could you advise me on this please?
Now the bank account needs to reconcile this £5000 in Xero and I am unsure how to do this.
)- Paypal bank feed is already up and running.
Despite HSBC being such an early adopter of Xero bank feeds it is surprising that these have not been introduced.
On a related note surely the next bank which teams up with Xero to automatically import BACs (or similar) files for supplier payments automatically from Xero to the bank's internet banking is on to a winner?
Obviously we have locked it as the figures equal those of the statutory accounts and we do not want any changes.
So what I really want is a "Bank Account" that I can manually manage.
Is this the only way to "manually" manage statement lines for a bank account?
No problems there, coded it to bank fees.
So the bank statement shows a $250 deposit but the principal balance does not change.
How can I code and reconcile this as if I put it to bank fees in this account also it makes my principal balance look lower in Xero than it really is?
I have been handling her bookkeeping in another system since 1/1, but when I tried to import bank statements from January through April, I got errors that I couldn't quickly troubleshoot.
The last thing I want to do is run two parallel charts of accounts.
This would then match up easily with the credit card statement/bank reconciliation.
85 GBP, this amount matches the amount taken from my bank account.
Currently our system allows for multiple VAT control accounts and reporting so that we can run separate reports to complete UK VAT and German VAT returns.
I tried this way but of course it through out the starting bank balance.
Medicare advised us to bank cheque and for us to issue a refund to client.
now, the FD has matured and the bank has transferred the amount to our bank account.
However, the owners randomly transfer money to their personal bank account.
currently I have opened a Bank Account in Xero for their personal transfers to go into.
My thinking is delete all bank statements as they come in daily and simply adjust the opening balance as at 01/07/16?
Money has gone into both accounts, so it's not immediately clear if i'm owing or not.
reconcile the bank accountnot sure why i was convinced to do this way by someone, but i find it too much work.
I imported all my bank and credit card transactions.
The fleetcards are paid direct in their bank account for the month, less a merchant fee.
I am trying to clean up the accounts and I am having trouble make a manual journal entry to push these credit notes into other income.
Both companies have their own bank accounts.
"Bank reconciliation is completed, but your bank balance and Xero balance mismatch by 219.
It is nice and clean: the bank balance matches the Xero balance.
The charity prepares receipts and payments accounts.
On April 20, the bank feed from my checking account imported a statement containing three transactions, all dated April 19.
I suspect that something went wrong with the bank feed.
It is now showing in our bank feeds as a credit.
So I am going through my accounts and reconciling them.
The client and I have no way to determine the name of the intermediary bank that took the additional fees.
I understand it's possible to do a bank fees adjustment during reconciliation, however this asks for a 'Name' - but I don't know the bank name taking the amount.
Many Accounting systems allow for sub accounts.
Instead of reporting for Travel Air, Travel Hotel, we want a master G/L account called travel and sub accounts.
I've checked the accounts that I have selected and they are Federal Tax Liabilities into Federal Payroll Liabilities and Federal Employment Tax Expense into Federal Payroll Expense.
For reasons I won't go into, e. g. I messed up, I accrued a large credit balance due to SMP and HMRC have credited my bank account for that balance.
Now, as I import the stripe transactions manually into my Stripe bank account and also have the combine stripe payments coming in every 2-3 days this gives me double payments coming in.
On my bank feed I have two transactions that relate to a mistake in transfer.
The company does have a bank account but no debit/credit card.
We are currently furnishing the house and buying all the item using our own personal accounts and claiming it back from the company.
This amount  has shown on our bank feeds.
83 AUD was what PayPal converted it to before I withdrew it to my bank account.
In QuickBooks, in Account Transactions or the General Ledger, it shows the accounts that were used in the transactions.
Since a couple of days there are Transfer Wise Borderless AccountsWorking similiar to a bank account and saving a lot of UK Bank fees.
In Xero there are two Accounts Office Expenses and Office Equipment.
Here is my issue: My bank account reconciliation is all messed up, when I reconcile money coming in it actually adds to the money in xero and doesn't make it come closer to the balance in the bank account.
I re-enter the bank details and then the feed re-runs and works.
I'm converting off my FYE accounts and two entries are causing me problems1 accruals of 450 my accountant put on to cover what was eventually invoiced after FYE at 650 Inc VAT2 unpaid expenses due to meI entered both of these as conversion balances so the starting point matched my year end however I don't understand how to now reconcile the actual payments.
My accountant will ensure everything is correct for our end of year accounts, but he doesn't know Xero so he can't help me here.
For instance on 1/12/15 my bank rec said I had cash at bank of $52,846.
I am using the standard chart of accounts, where:720 = computer equipment721 = less accumulated depreciation on computer equipment770 = intangibles771 = less accumulated amortisation on intangiblesMy year end is 31 Jan 2016 and I want to enter depreciation and amortisation on 31 Jan 2016 to cover the period up to that point so that this is reflected in my accounts going forward.
I also had my checking account connected to Xero via Bank Feed.
A manual journal cannot post to bank accounts so we posted all the bank balances and unbanked cash to a clearing account.
Next: I created receipts in each bank for the opening bank balance.
At the end of this process, the bank statements reconciled correctly and the clearing account balance was reduced to nil.
This figure will not form part of the accounts.
I have a bank account and credit card - both set up with as bank accounts and bank feeds.
As cc charges come thru on the bank feed, they are reconciled as a spend money to the correct expense account - sometimes using bank rules and sometimes I create the transaction.
The cc is paid thru the bank account and handled as a transfer between accounts.
I  reconcile on both accounts (transfer to & from).
But there are many "Bank Transfer From" transactions that are reconciled on the cc Account transaction screen.
The bank account is reconciled and all "Bank Transfer To" transactions are reconciled.
I have always had some issues with a chart of accounts.
Xero lists several accounts for tax but none that this falls under.
They have 2 bank accounts.
* Am I right to assume that the 2nd account for their clients will be a coded in chart of accounts as liability.
However the 2nd bank account coded as liability will show up on their reports.
If I do this by choosing 500 in the chart of accounts it's classed as 'overhead' and is deducted from my profits for the current year.
An other option is to put it under 830 which a 'current liability' in the chart of accounts.
The customer pays a deposit into our bank account.
I have moved my client's accounts over from FreeAgent to Xero recently.
So I can only group accounts that have balances.
I started by preparing a journal (as for P&L) but then realised that you can't enter a journal for Bank accounts.
I am the bookkeeper for a local weekly paper, currently in the process of setting up accounts, etc.
I believe it recommends to make sure you've reconciled all of your accounts before converting.
Again, I read through all the requirements as well as differences (flat accounts in Xero etc. )
Is it possible to attach a Bank Statement (PDF) to an account at the end of the month/quarter after reconciling?
I'm trying to figure out what to change in my Chart of Accounts after registering my company for VAT.
com/uk/Q_TaxRegChange$Important) suggests looking at "Xero’s default Chart of Accounts for a VAT-registered company".
My bank balance increases by $1000.
In the chart of accounts I setup an account called ABC Liability and made it a current liability.
My company has bought an asset (a website) and it is showing on the bank feeds as the money spent.
Is this representing the Supplier name in the bank or something else?
Is that necessary to put the bank Name in Bank details Section.
So the accounts have been converted as of 1-August.
Currently I have separate Accounts setup for each.
The purpose of this feature is to be consistent in the ability to switch between bank accounts while in the reconcile tab as this option is available in any of the other tabs.
Select any of the bank accounts3.
You will see a drop down icon to switch between accounts:http://screencast.
If you go to the reconcile tab though, you won't have the ability to switch between accounts:http://screencast.
It would be great if the bank rec screen could simply match bank transactions to existing unreconciled payments.
It would be good to have a print button on the Bank Account Transactions Screen - or at least on the Search Bank account transactions screen
com on 31 Mar 2015However, when I made some journal entries to finalise the accounts and printed out final reports for the accountant, the numbers no longer matched.
As suggested by earlier forum contributorsStep 1:Dr ExpCr PCF (SGD)Step 2: Dr PCF (SGD)Cr AccrualsRecog Liability: Key in amount in SGD - in Aug15Step 1:Dr PCF (SGD)Cr Accounts PayableStep 2:Dr AccrualsCr PCF (SGD)The benefits of the above approach:1/ Adjustment to under-accrual is possible in foreign currency;2/ It can "accurately" (less the FX difference a/c) reflect liability in the respective months.
Is it best to set up a separate account for each draw / contribution (two accounts for each of us)?
All the money we raise comes into our bank account but 85% of it is then transferred to the charity.
We have a bank loan that is setup in Xero and a Non Current Liability (loan), which we process a transfer from our bank account each month for interest and loan reduction etc.
Does anyone have a work around rather than converting the loan to a bank account and recoding all the transactions.
The same for a refund to one of our accounts - especially credit card.
I have many payments into the company account, that then take off a bank fee.
I haven't found a way to set up a recurring transfer between bank accounts.
Don't forget, Xero automatically, without telling you, adjusts the take on journal for the bank account for any difference in that too.
It should not do that - rather make the bank account wrong so we can see that we have misposted something somewhere.
My bank reconciliation is going out by that amount.
Actual bank balance and Xero bank statement balance is differ by that amount.
Does this mean I have to import this transaction from the bank again?
Can some one tell me how to record the total interest payable into our accounts?
This way both the inventory quantities and the money in the accounts stay updated.
For some reason, our CNY accounts have been archived.
Hello EveryoneI am trying to complete Year end accounts information but having a great amount of difficulty posting some journals because Xero does not appear to have certain codes or accounts tabs.
The credit card facility we have does not have the option of direct bank feed for reconciliation purposes, so, to check I'm entering transactions correctly, etc.
However, in the bank reconciliation screen, if I click on the "Transactions" tab the transactions are all listed there in the "Spent" column.
95 to Bank Fees.
I have 4 main means of receiving payments:Online Credit Card - ANZ Merchant Account with eWay gatewayEFTPOS Machine In Store - again ANZ Merchant AccountPayPalCashWith the Online CC/EFTPOS we receive consolidated settlement amounts, and bank our cash as required.
However with both the online and EFTPOS accounts we also have Amex, and for each of these we receive separate settlements.
This has left me with a inaccurate exchange difference for the previous years accounts.
Another avenue I have been investigating is if I should setup revenue accounts for the Sections and a current liability for the accrual of the membership fees that go to head office.
I could then regularly journal the percentages into these accounts.
When it comes to reconcile, my bank statement has the employee and employer deduction to reconcile.
The internet speed is sometimes a bit slow and the bookkeeper clicked too many times on the "ok" button in the "bank reconciliation" screen.
Does anybody know of a way of doing this with Xero or perhaps a 3rd party tool for collating multiple accounts into one group snapshot?
I do the accounts for a large professional association, on a cash basis (no accrual).
It has an accounting function which provides general ledger entry details for all subscription and event registration receipts (credits to income accounts, debits to bank accounts.
Is there a way I can split it so that a percentage (or a set ammount) is allocated to 2 different expense accounts?
I do not have any "Bank Accounts" set up for the mortgage payments or equity in each property.
I have imported a bank statement through a CSV file into Xero.
It seems to think that my Accounts Receivable is 0.
I have the $45K going to a seperate bank account and the funding of the $20K coming out of it.
Bank transactions are imported but not the account code.
My automatic bank feeds from ANZ have not happened from yesterdays transactions.
I had reconciled some of the transaction using bank rules for one of  my Supplier name Bunning warehouse.
I am trying to post transactions from both a credit card and bank account directly to a GL code.
If there a way to bulk edit all customer accounts to reflect this change?
I've made two Federal Income Tax payments recently, which are showing up in my bank feed.
I've checked my chart of accounts and 630 is set up as a current asset, no GST, and named Inventory.
I then set up my credit card as a bank account to bridge to the transactions.
I now have 2 credit card accounts on my COA.
The one set up as a bank statement is working properly.
I am trying to import a bank statement.
If I create an expense claim, the expense claim has to go against one of the accounts (say, General Expenses for average things).
We have several credit accounts with suppliers.
I was wondering if there's a way to categorize Expense accounts so that I can separate them into Deductible and Non-deductible categories.
Example 2:  the bank account shows a purchase from Esso petrol station.
And I still haven't understood the difference between accounts 835 (Directors Loan Account) and 970 (Funds introduced by Owner)?
But is there a way that I can designate a certain amount of funds, let's say in my Bank Account, to a separate "savings box. "
I am coming from Quickbooks and I am setting up my chart of accounts.
I have already issued a refund (which will show in a couple of days on the bank statement).
When you set up a Paypal account, Paypal credit your bank account with a penny and a reference number you use to verify you actually have access to that bank account.
But I cannot use other bank accounts, only expense/asset type accounts.
In certain situations (such as when a bank rule has incorrect details),  many transactions can end up in the incorrect account.
We are unable to connect and download our bank feed for around 2 months now.
Now these transactions show up as unreconciled under the bank account.
Property A:  Rent = $500, Bank Deposit was $500Property B: Rent = $600, Bank deposit was $600Property C: Rent = $750, Bank deposit was $550 the break down is below: $750 Rent-$150 fee for properties A, B and C-$50 repair fee for Property B--------$550 depositedHow do I adjust the automated bank transaction to account for the $150 spread across all properties and the repairs for Property B?
There's no line on my bank statement to correspond to it, since I don't actually reimburse myself specifically for the per diem claims.
On the Xero community I keep reading about Trade Debtor/Credit accounts.
It created the prepayment, but then the bank balance was off.
84 in bank fees is 'missing' from the $145 refund.
I reconcile the charges against the various expense accounts (marketing, m&e, etc) directly from the feed.
We recently added a second Bank Account to Xero.
In practice, this come through the bank account in 3 different forms and I'm struggling with a simple routine way to handle this.
I have 2 accounts in Xero, Checking and Paypal.
Hence when we import bank account, we have 2 columns:- IDR value- SGD valueRemember that this bank account is in SGD.
Accounts to set up:Asset account: Motor Vehicle -	DR$21,675 incl.
There is only the rule that it must be paid before 2023, so I don't want to arbitrarily post it as a "spend money" against our earnings bank account with some random future date (or the extreme Dec 31, 2023) -- or is that really the best way?
An expense claim isn't appropriate since it is oriented to receipts and expense-category accounts.
We've tried exporting our accounts from Big Red Cloud in a .
Xero displays only bank account information / financial details for the contractor 4.
Upon attempting to login I am told to log in through the Internet Banking website which allows me to also access standard Savings and Debit accounts.
I switched them to their own accounts in September.
To which account (on my chart of accounts) should I allocate the attendance fee to?
So, for the past year we have been spending our own personal money on equipment, supplies, advertising, marketing, etc from our own personal accounts.
I have created a bank account for the loan.
Needless to mention i am having problems in reconciliation between xero and my bank statement and GST outstanding is also not correct.
I had a Freelancer import all my data from Saasu and I can see it is there under Bank Accounts, Money Coming In etc.
I have the default Xero chart of accounts at the moment.
Linking my bank account only brought one day's transactions (from 2 days ago) into Xero.
Do I have to first download all my bank statement to my computer, then upload them one-by-one into Xero?
HiI import bank statements from Nat West.
So, I open Bank Account > Petty Cash Jakarta > Spend Money, and paid the transactions.
Their MYOB file is quite a mess in that it has not been properly reconciled for a number of years, there are outstanding and duplicated trade debtors and creditors distorting their accounts.
The supplier subsequently issued a credit note and refunded the deposit into the company bank account.
I also reconciled the bank account with this cash refund.
My boss ask me to import the previous bank statement manually from 01/01/2014-22/09/2014.
So I deleted the bank statement from 20/08/2014 to 22/09/204 because I thought it were double.
To see the direct debit payments I have to go to the Bank transaction.
80I have two liability accounts set up - one for the vehicle, the second for unexpired interest.
I started by adding my PayPal feed, but it got really confusing because the purchase seemed to come up  in both my PayPal and bank feeds.
Right I'm handling these transactions by not having the PayPal feed, and reconciling the purchases from my bank account feed.
When reviewing the journal entry, it's asking for accounts for Loss on Disposal and I selected Gain/Loss on sale of asset.
Does anyone know how to make sub accounts under Loans to account for each client we lend to (we hope to have many).
And all our bank feeds has been deactivated, yet no on has deactivated them!
The automatic data feeds commenced around July, so have imported the bank transactions manually from 1st May to the day before the bank feeds started.
I withdraw £80 into my bank account.
To make things more difficult, the difference between the two is significant because the bank charged currency conversion fees coming back into my account.
I don't have this exchange rate, cause my bank statement doesn't provide this.
60 (Norwegian Krone) on my bank statement.
As this is my private bank account, I can't upload a bank statement into Xero.
- Property 1 is also a bank account.
We have done our end of year accounts.
all good until you come to bank reconciliation.
The only thing I can think of is creating a bank account entitled 'Amazon' and uploading a reconciliation via .
HiI am importing my bank statements (as my bank does not operate bank feeds) and all appears fine - that month.
They seem to separate the two accounts somehow.
Previously we had the bank feed set up for a HSBC credit card.
As part of the chart of accounts set up we did put the last 4 numbers in so thought it may be first 12?
Because this does not go through our bank we have no way of tracking it besides our own spreadsheet.
My NAB bank feed is sending payee information to the description field and not the payee field of the transaction.
My bank feed has been broken for 48 hours now.
The feed is clearly broken as it saysThe bank feed has been unable to retrieve accounts or transactions due to unexpected variations at the online banking website.
88 transaction I downloaded from my bank.
Each section of accounts has its own number series.
Tracking income from several companies received in a single bank accountI have a little company and we have several websites (10 and growing) and a consulting company which generate income and costs money.
All of these expenses/income is paid from/into a single bank account.
I then have my US Bank Account with my bank balance as of Dec 31st entered into the Debit account, per the instructions in Xero.
I'm adding some bills but the first one is for a Bank Service Charge (which is on my Chart of Accounts).
Do I reconcile the drawdowns in the bank to the fixed term deposit and then do a manual journal to the project expense code or do I assign it directly to the expense code?
Next I was going to update my Chart of Accounts.
I have set up two accounts for different revenue streams.
Every week we deposit funds into the bank.
We have not set up bank reconciliation yet, would this be the correct way of booking the transfer?
Instead of budgeting using individual accounts, is it possible to create a budget (Overall or for custom category like Departments) that groups individual accounts into higher level expense categories?
Take for example, RWT on interest earned in the company's bank account.
I am trying to set up my chart of accounts in Xero.
I have tried to import a few bank statements in CSV form, the date is as follows (dd/mm/yyyy), a column for description and then the amount, with income being a positive figure and expenses being negative, but xero is saying the CSV doesn't contain valid statement data, but I can't see what I have done wrong?
These payments show up in the bank feed.
Could I set up every buyer as a bank account (even if there is no bank feed)?
This appears to be in part because those accounts have zero balance at year-end, but the auditors want to see the transaction movements, including for retained earnings.
Then 4 days later the bank tells you it has bounced.
All monies first go straight into my bank account via merchant batch deposits.
These are accounts that have been funded by individuals or perhaps a fund raiser.
This was paid to HMRC in 2013/14 and recorded as a decrease in the bank balance and an increase in "500 - Corporation Tax" which appears in the P&L as an Operating Expense.
I am not importing a QB file and am wanting to capture these treatments in my chart of accounts assuming they are required?
The reconciled opening bank balance includes unpresented cheques.
Do you deal with it similar to the bank adjustments through suspense?
Are you tired of manually saving each page of Xero entries assigned to accounts?
If I take a bank account in SDG as an example, I'm ending up with an unrealised loss of approx.
Is this the only way to continue to see historical details for a client's accounts?
When reviewing the journal entry, it's asking for accounts for Capital Gain and a Gain On Disposal.
At the moment I am using Latvian online accounting software with no addons and no API, I love feature list of Xero, The only thing missing would be adoption for Latvian bank feed standarts and tax return reports compatible with local authority standard.
I’m setting up my expenses in the Chart of Accounts and I don’t see where I would associate an expense with a “tax line mapping” (in Quickbooks terminology).
I have a vendor which I owe $100 (which I put under Accounts Payable) from November (prior to conversion date).
The £100 is lodged into our clients bank.
Its more of a Yodlee and the bank that determines this.
I currently operate 24 separate wages accounts in my chart of accounts so want to do the split from the journals and not from my bank records.
Also, code 001 is our bank account and does not show up for selection in the Accounts drop down in journals.
What i currently do:Deposit comes in > input into spreadsheet to work out 70% of the money > send an email with a form link for customer to input bank details > Customer completes bank details > I transfer the money via internet banking.
It was suggested that I try Tracking Categories but they can't be used with Bank Transfers.
Set up Nat West Bank feed on Yodlee only to find that the client gets locked out of his account.
Anyway, fast forward several years, and I am now in a position where these accounts have funds according to Xero, but not in real life.
My question is do I list the expenses one by one and associate them with the individual expense accounts that I have.
I have a company UK bank account which is used as much as possible for all transactions to make life easier when accounting.
so it would be lying to say the full 10,000 went the company account - the bank statements only show 5,000 leaving.
There appears to be a way to split a purchase to various accounts but not to split a purchase to the same account under different Categories.
The 'paid to' field requires a bank.
I have already transferred $10,000 into my company bank account as a shareholder's loan.
The bank feed has received the Gross amount on both transactions, yet the Paypal CSV file has calculated its balance on the gross in transaction 1, yet the net is used in transaction 2There is also times where transactions used in paypal are not showing up in Xero also double up's of received income showing in the feed.
Simple WITHHOLDING tax from the IRD on savings in my savings bank account.
Should I allocate all personal expenditure to Owners Drawings so that the bank accounts reconcile?
60Dr: Bank fees (for paypal fee) £0.
32The bit I am confused on is my Paypal bank rec which shows the following:Cr (received) : £3.
18 transfer to bank accountThen in the bank account i have a Cr (received): where the £3.
18 is transferred to my bank account so I quite simply reconcile the £3.
18 in my bank account to the £3.
Should I go back through and mark all accounts as tax exempt?
We have two bank feeds into Xero.
I want to run a bank rule that will put all transactions into the same GL account, without having to do any manual reconciling.
Our Tax Accountants have now completed our year end accounts and have given me some balance adjustments to make.
When I try to set up the Manual Journal it won't let me post to bank accounts or locked nominal accounts.
I have imported and am trying to reconcile all transactions since that date and am not sure what Account they should be applied to in the Chart of Accounts?
I have created a few Accounts and have them all as "Current Liability" and "BAS Excluded" and have been Reconciling the transactions to the relevant Accounts.
"880 Owner Withdrawal""881 Owner Funds Introduced""882 Personal""883 Pre conversion to Xero"I thought this was all fine and dandy, except I have fully reconciled all transactions, and set the correct Conversion Balances, and my Bank Account Balances are way off.
The way this is listed on BofA is 3 separate accounts.
So I've setup the 3 accounts into xero, imported as much statements as I have.
We have bank feeds for it coming through.
The bank feed is of course a list of the 40+ transactions!
, to reconcile this credit card bank account given the above?
Nature of my revenue is such that the bank feed transaction requires entries on both the debit and the credit sides simultaneous.
This has meant I've invested capital in the company from my personal bank accounts (notably, from 2 of my UK based bank accounts and my Paypal account).
Currently, I have set up my bank accounts like this:1) Company Current account HSBC2) My personal bank account 13) My personal bank account 23) My paypal accountI have gone through all of these various costs and 'spent the money' from one of the accounts depending where i spent the money from.
At the moment we have to manually download the CSV file from an online statement and then upload it to the bank feed and it's a bit laboriousness to say the least.
Fraudulent transactions and the subsequent refunds - I have some fraudulent transactions on my bank statement and subsequent refunds.
Transfers of funds between company accounts - How do I reconcile transfers between different company bank accounts?
I am however confused about how to treat credit card Billing Accounts.
I therefore have two summary debits and two equal credits noted in the Billing Account's bank feed.
)Im also hooking up my asb bank to my account so will this sort the problem out without me doing anything.
I'm going through the process to reconcile my bank statement.
Here's an example;Bank statement;Credit 0.
I have grouped quite a few expenses in our Standard Layout (Motor Vehicle Expenses, Computer Expenses, etc) but now the grouped expenses print at the bottom of the Non-Operating Expenses instead of in alphabetically order with the non-grouped accounts - can we change this?
One I can think of is to delete the bank transaction and bring it back as a couple (one for each currency) but something more elegant would be preferable.
CBA bank account has only 8 digital numbers; however, the format in the form is “XXX XXX XXX” plus it require password to change the setting.
MY dilemma is that when I look at both my balance sheet and my chart of accounts it still reports that the liability still exists.
Does anyone know how to reconcile the VAT payments in my bank account?
2) Not list my bank account.
So, for example someone gives £5k for teaching disabled children to swim: the accounts must show the donation separately and with all associated expenditure (teacher's salary, transport costs, stationery etc) to a balance of zero.
I've spent today trying to reconcile my accounts manually.
The issueWe have a number of UK companies that maintain their accounting records and prepare accounts in Euros rather than £’s.
I do understand that these companies are a minority but there must be other companies out there preparing EUR accounts and facing the same issues.
The thing is, when I run my BAS for the 1st quarter of the 2012-2013 year (1 July to 30 September), it only shows the expenses that have come off the company bank account that I have reconciled.
My problem starts when I suspected that things were not adding up in my accounts payable.
Hey guys, I have followed your online video re: creating bank rules, and after the rule is created, and I click into the reconcile screen or cash coding screen, and the rule is not applying.
But how do I get the latest Bank Statement to Reconcile my Account.
I then generate a sale of this product and the sale is recorded OK (Sale vs. Accounts Receivable).
I looked in help and it was more structured for those using a loan as a bank feed.
At present they prepare manual cashbooks from the info on their bank statements.
However, that might be a few too many bank account.
I am an online store only, so payments will be received via bank deposit, credit card or money order.
I setup bank feed for an account a few months ago but only want to start using Xero from July 1.
We have two bank accounts set up in Xero; a Current Account and Saving Account both on automatic bank feeds.
I decided to backdate to 1 April so that I capture the full tax year in my accounts.
My client doesn't trust the  internet so I have to wait about a week and a half until I receive the May bank statement (plus his other relevant bank statements. )
I also followed an earlier thread about a similar issue by adding the prepayment using my Bank Reconciliation screen.
Umpqua Bank bank feeds became available somewhat recently but they have never worked for me.
I've tried adding all the details again (bank membership number etc) but nothing helps.
I haven't yet mastered the way Xero reconciles accounts.
Does anyone have experience using the bank feed feature with Santander?
In QuickBooks I had a vendor for the bank or credit card company (American Express) and a credit card (liability) account for the credit card.
On the dashboard it says "Your bank may require additional steps to update this feed".
Has anyone got any experience of using Xero with The Co-operative Bank?
However, I paid the £3500 via my credit card direct to HMRC and it did not touch my company accounts at all.
My client has two paypay bank accounts - one in nz dollars and the other in usdollars.
These are then batched and processed through Xero but the individual transactions appear on the bank statement.
We have one bank account Lloyds TSB UK  the bank account has 2 people with access to it and both have different internet log in details.
We are looking to move our accounts onto Xero, from Sage.
If I set up a bank account to manage the loan I can import statement lines that show £100000 advance, £10000 interest and £100 fees giving a balance of £110100.
What is up with Lloyds bank feeds?
Inter company B paid this creditor from B Company bank account.
Issue is in A company accounts, how to deal with the situation.
They can for Credit cards transaction accounts and portfolio line of Credit loans.
However it has only brought across feeds from April, when there are transactions on our bank account dating back to January.
I've reconciled our bank account by putting some payments in suspense, as recommended in the xero help guide.
We have been trying to set up a live Bank Feed with Metro Bank UK for over 4 months now.
I am having trouble setting up my bank feed with ANZ.
Xero bank feed - received $5000 from  Customer A ; received $2000.
I did a free trial on xero and as I am paid from overseas in US dollars, I send my accounts in USD.
I go to a cafe whose name shows up as  in the bank feedSUN &amp; GREEN PTY LT CAMBERWELL AUS on the physical receipt it shows up as SUN & GREEN PTY LT CAMBERWELL AUS that is the amp; is missingI tried creating a rule using the option contains and left out the amp; but the rule did not pick up the descriptiondoes anyone have a suggestion?
We have a client whose bank feeds stopped a few months ago.
The client hasnt cancelled it with the bank or anything.
I paid my first bill in xero a couple of days ago, however, the connecting bank account is unaltered.
or, should it have automatically been paid via my bank account once the transaction was made in Xero?
00I then in early March imported my Bank statements and started to reconcile all of the payments, incredibly easy.
I've successfully added my bank account where all my income/expenses have been going.
2) I get charged bank fees and sometimes the bank waves this fee.
I looked for a way to update the current account but it seems that once the bank was chosen in initial setup that it could not be changed.
This is the FOURTH acquisition of this particular bank & account that we have been through (first in xero though) and I can't find a previous question on the topic.
The bank feeds starting yesterday but it oddly did two things.
And bank account 'B' transactions are feeding into bank account 'A'.
The first problem was when i looked at there bank transactions on Xero it was only showing deposits from September last year.
Went online and checked there bank transactions on their internet banking and it shows all the withdrawals and deposits.
We bank with the Cooperative Bank who have no plans to connect with Xero (I've asked) so I can't connect our bank accounts.
I'm wondering if there are non-bank money transfer services that would give us better exchange rates and lower fees, while also being convenient for customers.
What account in my chart of accounts should these deposits be coded to?
We have multiple mortgage loans on several vacation rental properties, and are trying to set them up in our chart of accounts.
I'm thinking that the principal account would be an asset, while the interest and escrow accounts would be non-current liabilities.
00 refund back into my bank account.
This sits as a separate transaction line item in my bank feed.
------Similarly, I get a lot of "International purchase fees" appearing in my bank feed, which needs to be reconciled.
The International purchase fee is also a separate transaction line in my bank feed and are always small amounts.
I have imported my bank transactions from Jan 1, 2017 until now.
egI've dedicated this weekend to sorting my accounts out properly.
Is anyone aware of a service or facility that can take over the historic accounting information including files that are saved and attached to the accounts?
Hello--While reconciling my bank transactions, I reconciled my businesses expenses by creating a matching Spend Money and allocating it to the appropriate account (for example Automobile Expenses).
If you code it as a transfer in both bank accounts you end up with unreconciled transfers in each account.
TIP: You can have the bank reconciliation screen for each account open in a different tab.
Go to Accounts>Bank Accounts>(Bank Account Name)>Bank Statements.
This will cause the whole transfer to be uncoded so it will pop back up in the other bank account as unreconciled and you will have to code it again.
Using "Unreconcile" leaves your old coding sitting in the bank account as an unreconciled item and is often the cause of "double ups" in your bank reconciliation.
Our bank records receipts of coins, notes and cheques separately, so in two or three lines.
I have checked the bank statement and they were not taken out twice.
It is a direct feed from the bank.
Once I have set up a feed and imported data, maximum of 3 months with my bank, should i then download csv files for the previous months and load these in to give me coverage for the last 6 months.
This gets lodged as one amount to the bank for €1,000.
For example, Xero reports 'Check Paid' in the Analysis Code for Bank Statements.
Debit staff and credit cash/bank.
If you submit your expenses via a PC you get one set of GL accounts.
In my bank feed I am unable to ‘match’ this journal entry to the bank feed item.
My customers email addresses haven't converted over, is there a way to do it easily or do I have to go into each individual account and re-enter email addresses so I can send out accounts?
I think these have been imported into Xero via the bank feed, and I have reconciled everything that appeared.
I also manually entered in my initial deposit and payments that I have made since opening my bank account.
The IRD have transferred the money into my personal bank account.
You have too many rules that prevent me from simply posting the transactions that I want to post without creating "dummy" clients and vendors and I cannot run a simple journal entry between what you consider un-touchable accounts.
I can only assume similar service from support or accounts.
It does mean multiple expense claims in receipt bank for different clients and internal purchases.
In Xero it is a bank account.
Hello, im on my trial and i've added my bank account.
Hello allI have set up petty cash as a bank account, as recommended.
I have managed to import the bank statement and get bank feeds so that is fine.
Looking at the help guides it appears you either enter your loan as a bank account OR as a non-current liability.
So I have set it up as a bank account.
So my bank loan bank account in Xero is a negative balance.
The loan funds were allocated to my general bank account so how do I record this?
I have started using Xero from start of May but I have reconciled my April bank statement so all income and expenses are coded correctly.
The automated bank feeds feature strongly in Xero's marketing, and are a huge part of its appeal, so for them to consistently not work as they should is a huge let down.
I am really concerned for those poor tormented souls out there who are merrily reconciling transactions as they appear without realising they are incorrect, and then spending hours wondering why their bank reconciliation is out.
The bank feed will reflect the takings, net of the expenses paid.
But how do I reconcile this as my imported bank statement lines are two separate entries but my Xero transaction I have entered here is only one transaction?
Or simply a way to easily compare accounts across 3 different divisions?
Having made a complete b***s up of a paypal account when I first started using Xero, I've now decided to delete all the bank statements and start again (now I have some idea of what I'm doing! )
I have linked all my accounts and its now showing a large number on the account balance that isn't correct.
My Bank Teller totaled my deposit incorrectly to where the deposit was for 100.
a few days later the bank withdrew the 100.
I run a coffee shop and in an attempt to make my life a little easier I am adopting xero as my accounts system moving away from excel.
In the past 3 months, the Sole Trader has been using their personal bank account to connect to Paypal to make and receive payments.
Their bank account is not set up in Xero.
Thus ignoring all the personal items in their bank account?
co. ukApproved17 Nov 2015 11:31 a. m. Shake Accounts INV6212 to **** Ltd for &#163;99.
I have imported bank records for period and entered a conversion date of Dec 2014 and it is saying balances required up to 30th Nov 2014, so looking right.
I setup my bank in the trial and then went back to previous period of 1/12/14 to 30/11/15.
I posted a thread on Monday about how to print out transactions from accounts in order to reconcile with those in Excel (I am currently moving accounts from Excel to Xero and it's not matching up).
I've reconciled all the money I've received and the payments I've made into their respective accounts.
My client has 2 businesses and he pays bills from any of the businesses' accounts, so we are managing it as a inter-companies loans.
The current accounts work goes with Xero online.
I've created several chart of accounts, each one representing the Interest Only Mortgage for each of my Buy To Let Properties.
I am using the paypal bank feed to automatically import all paypal transactions and fees.
It has several receipts, some of which have different tax rates and all of which will be in different accounts.
Hello,Anyone has problem with chase bank feeds, amount on my checking account and amount in xero is always off, why is that, I did contact support but no help.
In fact if you click into the entry where it shows the breakdown, there are few things that strike me as odd:- Some "credit" entries don't have "debit" counterparts - even though if you click on one, you can clearly see the bank statement line that it is reconciled too.
Why would some of my purchases go into the Accounts Payable system account and not others?
Why would reconciled transactions not have matching entries leaving a positive balance in Accounts Payable?
via either cash or eftpos, occasionally bank transfer.
i have a bank feed and paypal feed.
We do basic cash accounting, our only assets are our bank accounts and we are not registered for GST.
I am about to submit our financial to our auditors, but my Bank Summary shows that our Money Received and Money Spent is different to our Income and Expenditure in our Cash Summary.
He's checked his bank details with Xero and says it's correct, but I think there's one digit missing.
If I have 3 checks to deposit - and mark them as paid, is there a way to print out deposit slip, indicating which checks came in and a total for the bank deposit?
Now I having two bank lines, one is withdrawal $1000, and another is deposit $670.
The till float will be either refreshed from the bank account or some of it paid into the bank as appropriate.
Card payments show up on the bank statement lumped together as one daily amount a day or two after the payments were handled, the amount we receive having had fees deducted.
When bank feed comes in and i allocate a transaction.
Obviously all EftPos transactions will go through the normal bank account.
B of A sets up their bank feeds to show the 2 cards, and one other account which is where the payments are posted.
Is there a simple way that I can update her accounts so that the opening balances are  correct and then we can start then as we mean to go on?
Meaning if I mark a PayPal credit as a sale what should I mark the transfers into my bank account?
I have a supplier in a different country who has supplied their bank account number, swift code, and aba# - where in xero to enter these in (as in which fields correspond to these supplied details in the contact record).
I've started a wine club and customers are paying into my bank monthly and expect monthly statements.
I was trying to refresh my current bank account but instead of being refreshed it completely disappeared.
However, it seems we constantly get an error message: "There is a problem with this bank feed. "
We have it synced with American Express, CapitalOne, Bank of America, PayPal, yet M&T is the only one that wont' work.
We user to have a user called <accounts>@businessname.
In my bank statement, you can see the money coming in and then going out again.
In the Guide under "Set Up a NAB partner bank feed" it shows that credit cards are not a supported account type but on my dashboard it says that bank feed are available.
When I click on get bank feeds it takes me to the page with the instructions "Enter your National Aust Bank NAB (AU) - Credit Card - Personal details".
So far I have begun my bank feed 1.
Is there any way to keep the info I have added without deleting it and changing the profit and loss statement, but correct the bank feed to show the actual amount in account.
This service collects customer payments each day, aggregates the amounts, and then posts these – net of fees – to our clients' bank account each day.
however, when I go in to match my bank statements the transactions do not appear and therefore I cannot match.
Even though we have set the default "reply to" email address to our standard accounts email address we never receive the reply from all of these clients.
The challenge I am having is entered the four expenses the employee had and reconciled with the bank statement.
However I want to enter that the check was made to our employee and cannot find a way to enter the Payee (the payee wasn't entered in the automatic bank statement update).
It hides everything in with accounts payable.
- Click on Accounts -> Bank Accounts- Click the correct bank account.
HiI am importing a CSV bank statement but all the amounts are showing as £1, £2 and £5.
The amount that are paid via EFTPOS show up in the bank as a single transaction (one for each EFTPOS machine).
When the money hit the bank, this was credited as coming from these clearing accounts.
When I check it against my bank account statement it only appears once.
We have a client who went over the USA and did some consultancy for an American Bank.
They invoiced the bank.
we got bills from suppliers and also paid by cash, so there is no any transaction record on bank statement, how can i do it for the bill i have data entered in the XERO?
I found it easier to track transfers and reconcile accounts by treating my contributions and draws as a "bank account".
I then formatted the balance sheet so that my "bank account" shows as equity.
I also mistakenly coded the entry to a incorrect revenue source and not my bank.
They wish to see clearly and quickly what they owe, and what they have paid so they can easily reconcile against their bank statement.
It is simple in MYOB chart of accounts.
We have very, very few accounts receivables.
At the end of the day I bring up the "Prepare Bank Deposit" screen in AccountEdge.
I select the 4 that were credit cards, the system automatically totals them up, I verify it matches the batch settlement slip from our credit card system, hit the 'deposit' button and those transactions are now cleared out of undeposited funds and debited into our bank checking account.
I cannot have each individual sale going directly to our bank checking account.
Some transactions appear in the reconcile register with a 'match' against an identical transfer amount from my bank chequeing account.
It does not import data showing transfers between bank and PayPal.
Does anybody have a bank feed for commercial accounts in Hong Kong?
Do I have to build this myself under an expense as its not offered in the chart of accounts?
Everything was going along nicely and then the accounts stopped balancing.
We see a huge benefit to enhancing and getting far more out of smarter bank coding - but it is only as good as the data that we can access.
Is it possible to apply a different rule to a bank fee transaction to the one automatically picked up Xero?
The bank feed doesn't differentiate between which car the petrol is for.
This morning I was trying to amend my bank feeds (long story) because my UK bank was brought out by a rival bank and are in the process of switching to their platform.
question, how do we reconcile last years payments that are showing up in this years bank statements?
My second issue is that PAYE is not appearing in profit loss accounts at all.
This morning, I clicked on refresh feed and waited ten minutes while the endlessly spinning progress wheel indicated "connecting to your bank".
I have no problem logging in to the bank directly.
Im going to have 3 accounts set in xero.
In our previous accounting system we would enter a general journal entry to credit our bank account and debit the various expenses from our charts of accounts that we created from the HUD-1, where the debits would equal the credits.
I see the suggested way to operate petty cash is to set up a bank account and call it petty cash so I have created one.
All three of the above happened to us - the sourness of the relation occurring when we got desperate to take back control of our own accounts after we got cut off without any warning.
I am very frustrated as Xero support staff have told me that this is because the australian date format is not supported, yet I believe it is as the previous accounts that I've manually imported statements for have had the correct date format.
But didnt setup a bank account for my company then .
I'd  prefer to have a one-way, read-only bank feed that pulls data back in XML/JSON and doesn't open my account to unlimited liability.
I know that Bank Link have feeds now for Natwest, which suits my case personally.
It'd help me sleep at night a little better knowing I haven't breached my bank's T&Cs by handing over full access credentials to my entire financial centre!
25% (Masachusetts) and so the total amount charged against my bank account is 159.
It should be an expense and is already subtracted from my bank account.
Effectively it is due NOW but the money might only be leaving the bank in 2013.
Previous QIF imports from same bank credits & debits OK. e. g. QIF elementD30/11/12T5939.
eg: takings = $200 expenses = $45 reconciled to bank statement deposit of $155?
I love that facet that data entry and reconciliations of Bank and CC accounts are a fun matching game, but what about the documentation?
I have tried ShoeBoxed, but it imports at Purchases and not Bank Transactions.
After an Android version of Xero Touch, bank reconciliation for our mobile app has been the next most requested feature.
Regardless he then books me for an additional appointment, gets me to setup Xero, gives me bank details, staff details etc etc.
The Special Company - it has two banks accounts and a couple of foreign currency paypal accounts set up.
We're UK based and require most of the basics - CT return, statutory accounts, VAT, payroll and some Xero setup and ongoing support/advice for specific issues.
I'd be looking for someone to check all the Chart of Accounts (and associated Tax rates), import Conversion Balances (from Moneyworks), and get things to the point where things reconcile since 1 Jan 2012.
Can anyone recommend any banks and credit cards suitable for small businesses, and integrate well with Xero's automatic bank feeds?
We operate on a cash accounting basis and receive bank, Farmlands and PGW feeds into Xero.
We want a cash summary that we can easily reconcile with our bank account.
Despite requests to support/my account managers/bank feed team there appears to be no progress, or in fact little action taken to get people at a high enough level in both businesses working together to resolve this.
It would be great if you could attach an email address to credit card bank accounts which sent a request to that email address (I'm thinking the card holder) requesting they attach their receipts.
Have the ability to select only the bank account that you wish to export instead of all the bank accounts.
When reconciling accounts it's a nightmare !
Users can edit a bank feed transaction and re-date it .
Option of HIDING Purchase Price from accounts.
This is a local, community bank with a few branches.
However, with no live bank feed, I cannot recommend the move because of the extra amount of work it would cause me.
One of my clients uses a bank that also uses the same online banking service as Integrity Bank & Trust.
One of the regular challenges faced by an accounts clerk is to obtain copies of dividend advices from share registry companies showing details of RWT credits and imputation credits.
Something similar to Receipt Bank would be great, you select approve on the receipt and it jumps to the next receipt.
Please could a bank feed be set up for Unity Trust Bank - https://www.
Please enable bank feeds for Australian Military Bank & RSL Money Bankhttp://www.
Even though Xero is saying the bank reconciles it has happened on many occasions that it doesn't match the bank statement.
For example, fees from your own bank, as well as fees from third-party banks.
Well if you are using Receipt Bank to bring over the bill, you have already "manually" edited the receipt to capture the litres in the first place (in the description field).
If Xero can have 'click super' remove superannuation payments from the organisation bank account, why do we have to manually download an ABA file and upload it to our bank to process the payroll payments?
However i found that XERO has less choices integration with Malaysia local bank for updating live bank feeds transactions, especially commercial current account.
It would be extremely useful for Managed Client user access to also have Contact Bank Account admin permission so they can set up bank feeds.
- ie bank accounts you would automatically include the 30 June Bank Rec- Debtors/Creditors - a payables/receivables Rec would be printed.
Would it be possible for yodlee to do an actual lookup on the bank statement balance?
At the moment one needs access to the banking in order to check the bank feed is complete and accurate.
That way I can set all items and accounts to the client's default rate unless I specifically want to have it be tax-exempt for example.
A warning or instant split to anything into these allocated accounts should stop this happening
I have clients with several bank accounts and credit cards and it would be nice to have this as a easy reference.
We display all of our bank accounts & intercompany balances on the balance sheet and they could be credits or debits.
Requesting an option to view your accounts receivable as ex.
At a minimum reword it to say "accounts receivable inc gst".
A total of all accounts should be visible on the dashboard along with a line chart of balance, in and out.
Having a feature to select or de-select different accounts would allow for individual customisation.
Currently on Xero, it is only possible to see individual accounts on the dashboard.
It would be great if we had a direct integration with Chase Bank (US)
If i wanted to solve this issue I will have to create one rule that includes all of the frequently visited stations as a "When money spent on the bank statement matches ANY of the following conditions" Then I'll have to create a rule for each station to code any spent amount that exceeds a specific amount.
in the bank account section, where you have petty cash etc not linked through to the import option.
When working on the Chart of Accounts, why oh why do I have to get bounced back to the bank account transaction listing if I make any changes?
If I am working on the Chart of Accounts, take me BACK to where I was!
This causes the bank to not reconcile.
At the moment, I can't use the 1099 rules to display those in the correct 1099 box, as the rules interface only shows the expense accounts (or "All Accounts").
It appears that Xero disregards the timestamp from the paypal bank feed?
but we don't want every employee on the chart of accounts.
Could the system allow a due date on an unpaid accounts to be updated to an unlocked period.
It would be very useful to treat Braintree as a bank account too.
Banesco is a well known US bank.
Credit card feeds are available, but not ones for depository accounts.
We regularly have clients prepaying accounts and these are entered as overpayments.
I do this when reconciling cheques that I have paid into the bank.
It would be better if you had memorandum accounts that you could journal the required amounts into, so they roll over next year as well.
It would be great if  notes with nothing active accounts could be disabled or market to not print, rather than being deleted.
Currently this information comes into the system from the bank.
Also in contacts if the chart of account gets set up, it should show up in the accounts tab when the name is entered of that contact.
It would be nice to filter these from the list to avoid confusion when grouping accounts.
The address of the issuer is: Heritage Bank Limited, 6th Floor, 400 Ruthven Street, Toowoomba, Queensland, 4350.
This would then enable us to restrict dates etc once the accounts are being worked on.
We receive an amount in our bank.
We can keep it on file until the amount showed in the bank.
It would be helpful if we could see the batch export in an Excel format and in the same view as it goes into the bank.
It would be great to have to feature, because this can be part of the substantiation for the bank transactions.
I have been using the 'Import your Bills' feature under the Accounts / Purchases menu.
Does Xero have plans to have direct Bank Feeds with Suncorp bank?
I've read in other posts that there is no near-future plan to offer filing functions within Xero, i. e. for accounts to Companies House or tax returns to HMRC (including iXBRL format accounts).
The bank account charts on dashboard is wonderful feature.
It will be even better, if there is an option to chart selected bank accounts together (stacked area chart), to see a consolidated view (optional).
We are having a lot of adverse commentary from our clients about the delay in receiving Bank Feeds from Farmlands.
When you click any transaction in bank for example it would expand down so you can quickly edit the account it was posted to or vat and save.
Hello Xero TeamTrust Account client recently underwent an audit and it was requested that Bank Reconciliation reports should contain a date stamp of completion date.
As a courtesy, we want you to know that in (File Name) the bank account details for (payroll EMployee) has changed.
it can be easily missed as it is not automated, if we inherrit a file from someone else and they don't do this, we do not know where the bank has been reconciled up to and hence have to run one and work backwards.
net are not supported for bank feeds.
Surely this should now only show the relevant accounts selected?
None of that is necessary as all I really want to do is download and reconcile bank statements and manage accounts against budgets.
Enable entering the units and unit price for reconciling bank statements.
Draft annual accounts are available under the Adviser role and include all reports necessary as a starting point for creating the annual accounts except for one.
At the moment, sorting has to be done manually by dragging and dropping the accounts one by one
We have people paying accounts at our registers.
We have clients from the same companies that insist on separate accounts.
This makes reconciling difficult because we could have quoted various departments but have paying from one accounts department.
41 from the bank account and auto match this to the wages payable liability?
This is another issue that causes businesses to send erroneous information to recipients' bank statements.
We have our checking and credit card accounts added to our bank feeds and we purchase a lot of Inventory items from especially our credit card.
As there are as yet no bank feeds for Swiss banks, I have no option but to import CSV files.
As a result, I often get one bank statement line showing as money received instead of spent.
Can we setup Yodlee feeds for Al Rayan Bank UK?
I joined Xero over a year ago and I've been asking for a bank feed to CashPlus since then, but still haven't had one, or even been given some indication of when this will be done.
Then I can customize it further by deleting all accounts except for Legal Costs account(for example).
In Farm Source bank feed, It would be very helpful if the Farm Source Fuel Card No shows in each transaction description.
We have at least a dozen of these accounts that we have to manual create a spend money transaction for each month.
Xero needs to incorporate a duplicate / copy function within a Xero file to allow a formatted balance sheet or profit and loss within the Annual Accounts to be replicated in the same Annual accounts for region/tracking purposes.
They prefer to show these name in dashboard as it's easier for her to rec funds transfer between these accounts.
Hello,In 2015 I was told that Yodlee is working on Bank of China (HK) bank feed.
Xero fails to automatically reconcile transfers between two accounts of different currencies.
Similar to partner accounts and staff member access (but more refined given this still isn't as efficient as possible).
The only way to allow them to do this is by allowing them access to the bank account and making them a standard user.
Under the bank statement tab - the introduction of statement lines or statements is good - but the option to sort by column headings would be extremely useful.
Each one of my bank rules is the same: I change "Reference" to "Any Text Field" and "Equals" to "Contains. "
Then I change "Run this rule on" to "All bank feeds. "
Quickbooks does a great job of automatically creating bank rules.
But if you're not willing to do it, you should have a little pop up after you create a reconciliation/bank match that asks if you want to turn that into a rule.
If your financial statements had a mapping feature that mapped a client's accounts to different areas of the financial statements.
This would make it much easier at a practice level to have consistency between financial statements regardless of how bad a clients chart of accounts is.
The debit expenses do not download as they are sub-accounts.
Currently, the following account types can't be edited and are excluded from Find & Recode: Accounts Receivable, Accounts Payable, Unpaid Expense Claims, Tracking Transfers, Bank Revaluations, Unrealised Currency Gains, Bank Accounts, and Inventory (tracked inventory).
So that the total is easily reconciled with the bank statements.
This link leads them to a invite page where they can fill in thier details, some would be compulsory (bank details, name etc) some would be optional.
Would be so good to have a Mail tab at the top where the 'dashboard, accounts and payroll tabs are.
$ of Super contributions, yet to be paidTherefore to calculate:Bank account Balance in Xero - (a + b + c) to give a real available Safe Balance.
example to show on Dashboard:--------------------------------BAS Owing: -747Income Tax withheld: -352Super Contributions: -564Balance in Xero: 5000Safe Bank Balance: 3337--------------------------------This allows company funds to be easily assessed, to stay in the Black.
Situation:I had 4 bank transactions that were not imported into a clients file, however the bank account still appeared to be fully reconciled.
Many people put all their trust in bank feeds without going back to basics and checking the statement.
I do understand/appreciate Xero recommends that you check the balance to the actual bank statement, but I feel the following changes should be made to make it clearer for the user:1) the words "Bank Statement" should be replaced with "Expected Bank Statement" (or similar) to more accurately depict the title heading.
When you import a CSV bank statement there is only one option for Amount and it expects a signed number (i. e. , positive amounts are received and negative amounts are spent).
It would then allow CSV files to be as useful as OFX files in terms of importing bank statement balances.
The facility can then be used for Direct debits,   be posted to a direct debit control account (Bank) within Xero.
_______________________________________________Correction done by me:Edited By Heather Donnelly 11 May 2016 Today at 12:26 PM Bank account number changed from xxxx  to xxxx.
Could a check box be added that once ticked only the principal practice manager would have access to untick the box and allow edits to the chart of accounts.
The temporary fix is to disable the enable payments to these accounts going forward but it cannot be configured historically.
At present, I have to select one item, mark it as reconciled, then go back on the back button three times to get back to the bank statement.
This makes the bank reconciliation process much more cumbersome.
After editing a bank rule I am taken to the Bank Reconciliation Screen, rather than being taken back to the list of bank rules.
This is very boring, especially when I have a number of bank rules to edit because my client has become GST Registered.
You have one for their bank account, but I can't find one for their credit card.
Currently only users with the ability to change the supplier bank account details get a notification of the changes made.
A similar function to the "bank rules reconcile" be added.
The current function is a safeguard to check that each bank rule is correct.
(and it would be a lot easier if your feature request system supported screenshots btw)In the top left of the screen you can open a drop down list of all your bank accounts to jump from one to the other.
It would be useful to have the option of setting up a bank account which does not default to fixed assets as we hold monies on behalf of our clients.
comQBO has a feed for this bank.
Having a better view in the transaction log, similar to that of a bank account, where you can see all the details:Date, Amount, Customer or Vendor, Category (Account), NotesLook at Mint as an example - very clean UI and easy to use.
Is there a particular reason that ANZ (NZ) doesn't support direct bank feeds for credit cards?
I'm not particularly interested in passing my bank login details along to Yodlee, and much prefer a direct connection between xero and my bank.
Would be great to have a flag that indicates if a bank statement has been automatically imported via a feed or manually imported by a user and the user who did the import.
Also indicate on the dashboard when a bank account does not have a feed available (Ie.
HiThe Xero Touch app doesn't let you create a transfer to a bank account in another currency on the app, unlike desktop.
It would provide ease for making an adjustment into accounts.
Instead of that, Can we setup our own chart of accounts as default chart of accounts for any client?
It would be great if the DropDown list in all reports were actually longer, or at least expandable, selecting multiple accounts over such a short list is very tediousIt would  be even better if you could select by Account Type - ie so you don't have to select individual accounts:    All Balance Sheet Accounts    All Income/COGS/Expense Accounts    All Bank Accounts    All Credit Cards    All Fixed Assets    All Liabilities    All Equities    Multiple Accounts (current method to be retained - it has its place too)This would provide improved efficiency.
For example, if you have an Interest Expense group, it will appear above accounts non-grouped accounts such as Accounting Fees & Bank Charges in the expenses section in the P&L.
In many corporates, this is ideal as we lock off the accounts each month to provide reports for the board and are unable to adjust prior month figures.
Accountants would know straight away when they can start preparing accounts for each company without opening each client separately.
com would allow the automation of feeds from investment accounts such as Computershare.
Esp important on transfers between accounts
Unfortunately, you made it so every account could be moved within the statement EXCEPT the accounts you call "bank" accounts, which includes all of our corporate credit card accounts.
It seems rather arbitrary to have a 300 line limit for manual journals, but a greater limit for bank details.
I am often in the position of searching my accounts to see if I have entered a particular transaction and I have always found the best way to do this was to simple search of everything in QB for the amount.
If the functionality for direct bank feeds exists, why limited to certain versions?
- One cannot rely on Yodlee bank feeds and must check the bank statement balance at each period end.
Having one list of transactions from the bank statement rather than split into when they were imported.
In my case this issue is with Bank of America, but people who with other banking institutions complain of similar issues.
I have this paid expense claim which I could not trace in the bank statement.
Can you please enable bank feeds for: 1.
HSBC Bank of Bermuda: http://www.
After entering several transactions from the bank statement I then have to go back into each one to reconcile it.
It would be great if account and tax codes in spend/receive money and bank reconciliation transactions be auto-filled with the details from the contacts data once a contact has been chosen.
Charts of accounts from one Xero Client to another.
This feature would also be usefull to ensure unpublished accounts are not printed as final copies in error.
Allow an option for bank feeds from all accounts to be displayed on the one screen, so that transfers and duplicates are easily found and processed.
Also we have had clients completely change their chart of accounts.
It would be useful to lock into a working date - so that, if for example, you are preparing financial accounts to 31 March 2015 you could lock that date so your don't keep jumping back to current date.
There are almost 100,000 agents across the country - more than any bank anywhere can ever dream of.
Instead of emailing everyone with changes to bank accounts.
I know I can write a rule for this which would split the transaction into 'Revenue' and 'Bank Fees'.
I want xero to apply a rule where the money is sent to the appropriate accounts but it ALSO records the specific item sold.
Once you have created a bank rule, Xero takes you back to the reconcile/cashcoding screen you were on previously (yay).
I would much prefer it keeps the sort you had prior to being taken to the bank rule screen.
So there's a normal statement for information, and a slightly stronger-worded version for accounts more than 30 days overdue, for instance.
This is leaving our employers concerned about accounts being overdue when in fact they have been partially paid.
At present, Macquarie accounts fit broadly into a handful of categories:- Not supported at all (example: mortgage and offset accounts)- Supported via Yodlee (example: credit cards)- Supported via dedicated bank feed (transaction accounts; CMA/CashXL/etc)Yodlee definitely support, among others, the mortgage and offset accounts, even if Macquarie won't make them available via other means - as I can see them available to me via other finance platforms which use Yodlee as a source of feeds.
Separately, but related: where bank feeds aren't actually available, the "bank feeds are available" button shouldn't continue to be displayed.
HMRC plans to withdraw it's own free iXBRL statutory accounts and company tax return filing service for accounts ending after 31/12/2015.
some clients have many accounts and it takes ages to update through them allsorry if someone else suggested this - there are a lot of suggestions !
ie search bank statement lines or cash coding for an amount, payee or reference to find an unreconciled item quickly.
From Banking - Manage (Bank Account) - Find TransactionsWhy not have this screen open directly with the Search functionality, rather than have another click to select Search.
I would love to see the ability to bulk edit accounts.
I have noticed a number of times when people don't lock down the periods which can be an issue for GST and annual accounts - comparatives.
Each month they setup a recurring bank transaction to my bank account with the reference of their name.
Once we had made our selection, we selected "OK/Record" deposit and it then produced a Bank Deposit slip that could be used for the banking.
That way you can jump to it quickly rather than scrolling down heaps on the dashboard etc This would be similar to the (1) or (25) etc which shows next to the bank account in the bank rules screen drop down bank account list
5) Click on credit note - Apply refund to bounced cheque bank account.
At present the annual account template is not in UK GAAP so that we still require formatting and presentation changes to produce our year end accounts.
Yet in the Xero bank feed that memo field appears to be truncated to “Tax”.
It irritates clients to have to provide 12 months of bank statements to me when they’ve been told repeatedly how magical bank feeds are.
Bank feeds are fantastic but I have a problem with Bank Recs when clients process.
It would be great if authority could be set up so that the bank emails statements to the client email folder when statements issue.
Bookkeepers are clients would not have to download statements from bank internet to check bank statement balance matches XERO bank balance.
I discovered recently that if you have multi currency accounts set up, the numbers are bogus!
Dear XeroI'd love to see a graph of total monies in bank for combined bank accounts.
We are currently using the tracking accounts to track each of our Fund Sources.
Wages for the month from the Admin Tracking account split to 10 other tracking accounts by various percentages depending on what has been allocated.
When you go Settings > General Settings > Chart of Accounts > Export button,The csv file that exports, has a Balance column with no values in.
Is it possible to have the shortcut regardless of the method chosen to hide accounts on the Dashboard?
My suggestion is: Keep the top row the From-Date-Due date-Reference and Total - Fixed as it will then balance to the reconciliation in the bank accounts and the Company Bank .
All of these are to for separate accounts we have with them.
It would be handy for other suppliers not to have to rely on the remittance advice that is sent and only have to rely on the bank statement.
Detailed equity accounts such as drawings, share of profit, share of tax credits, capital introduced should auto clear to an opening balance for each equity holder at year end.
Some of our client files have many users setup which could be from a combination of different external organisation e. g. Accounting Firm, Bookkeeping, Bank etc.
It would be really useful to have a total of unreconciled receipts/payments on the dashboard next to the bank account balance reconciliation.
This information would be helpful in targeting chronically late and overdue accounts in our collection efforts.
It would be great if it could all be linked together so that if changes are made to a code, it automatically updates the coding in the bank accounts that the code in question applies to.
Xero doesn't allow this description from the imported bank statement to auto-populate into the Why field.
On my purchase order page (Accounts - Purchases - All) I can see all my purchase orders however the reference field limited to 7 digits however my references are 8 digits.
When adding an account to Chart of Accounts, it would be helpful if I could, for example, simply hit the letter "e" on keyboard twice to arrive at "expense. "
This particular client has a good number of open accounts payable.
When we tested integrating our Xero financials to Live plan we noticed our liability accounts in the form of credit cards showed up Asset accounts rather than short term liabilities.
In their own code base, they have a subtype that differentiates between bank accounts, credit cards, and PayPal accounts, but that subtype is not available externally in their integrations.
It would be great if bank feeds could be supported for NAB nabtrade accounts, rather than having to download a CSV file.
Most suppliers have a different team and email address for processing orders to the team that processes accounts/payments.
Refreshing Bank feeds is OK, but the process takes 2-3 minutes to complete.
If Barclays were a partner bank, it would be automatic once the feed was authorised and setup.
(I'm aware I can change my message to include the entity, but it would be very useful for the response to include the entity name since they are created from within these accounts).
In payroll you have an RTI menu item, could we have one on the accounts menu for VAT submission status?
We already have the needed equal, starts with, contains and other logic in our Bank Rules.
cash concentration is a function where money left over on accounts at a certain date(s) or intervals gets concentrated onto one account you select.
That could be e. g. a savings account and thus help small businesses to save more AND get interest from the banks which they do not get on the transaction accounts here in ANZ.
Eg I don't want to allow access to bank accounts and reports - Draft only.
If each section of the organisation had a bank account and if Xero allowed reports to be filtered by bank account then problem solved: you would never again have to use Tracking!
It will be very useful to have the TAX RATE column included in the bank transactions page.
Today someone brought to my attention that in xero accounts there is different coloured fonts for"unreconciled" and that these different colours mean something.
This way we could create a folder named, for example 2015 - then within that a folder for bank statements - asset purchases - insurances - etc.
the scrolling of the bank account balance used to be available on xero, but now we don't have that option.
I have been asked by quite a number of clients for better bank deposit slip functionality.
with a trust or partnership which have beneficiaries or partners accounts in the Equity section of the balance sheet which have to be grouped to keep each beneficiary's/partner's a/cs together  eg.
I have to continually scroll up and down to access the options and identify which bank account I am working in (I have over 20 accounts currently).
As the largest bank in Northern Ireland could someone have a look and see where the feed went.
Ideally there would be a check box next to each user to allow access to the maintenance of the chart of accounts.
Bank feeds are available for debit cards and accounts, but not for bank loans
We did not discover this until we prepared the accounts for this client and the VAT control did not balance.
Basically a Master Account and then satellite accounts for employees.
I know we could copy and paste but this is a pain because it can only be done in the bank rec screen (not cash coding).
My PayPal account itself isn't a credit card, so naturally it doesn't come in through the bank feed.
fyi, compare this to bank credit cards - they are required to send you a nil transaction statement with nil balance for the month if you have had no transactions on your credit card.
We have two bank accounts in Xero, but one is a savings account and is only used for bank transfers.
When I'm entering several bill payments/spend money/receive money transactions it feels frustrating to have to enter "cu" and select the bank account for every transaction.
Can we please receive notification if a Bank Feed or Credit Card Feed drops out.
Similar to receiving a notification when a bank feed has been set up.
It would be great if there was a column for notes in "Awaiting Payments" so if more than one person is working on the accounts messages can be communicated.
This would be extremely helpful when making postings such as receipt of funds from credit card takings into the bank.
A system where DRAFT bills could be automatically received by email,  attachments saved and then reviewed and processed similar in a similar way to the bank rec process would be (in my view) a killer feature for Xero product.
Every bank in the SEPA region lets you upload a PAIN.
As for now, it is only possible to create Bank Rules where ALL or ANY of the arguments are TRUE.
This would allow to create a single bank rule for one particular repeating transaction, whereas at the moment, to achieve certain results you must create several different rules.
For example, with Bank Charges, I always reconcile these using 'spend money', and then choose 'To' 'Barclays', or 'HSBC' or the relevant bank.
I created a bank account called Suspense, and now want to merge all of those transactions into another (bank) account named Petty Cash.
I think it is a bit weird that Xero allows you to set up a data file as a Not for Profit but you are then unable to process annual accounts.
Financial Accounts for other entities are pretty average also.
My customers with multiple divisions all have separate checking accounts for each division.
When I am reconciling batch reciepts can only see the title multiple payments, would be better if it had the accounts name as title.
Right now, only bank accounts can be in a currency other than the base currency.
All of these drafting packages require the acount code and name in two separate columns to assist with linking the accounts.
This has probably been asked before:It would be great if it was possible to Duplicate a bank rule.
But this is not a minor adjustment nor a bank fee.
My thoughts are that there should be three levels of "lock periods":1) Lock period (ie at EOM/EOQ) done by client - good habit to be in2) Lock period (ie at EOY prior to finalisation of accounts) - done by accountant (only accountants/advisor can do do entries/make changes before the lock period date3) Lock period (ie at EOY post finalisation of accounts) - done by accountant/advisor (no one can change entries before the lock period date (unless the date is removed))P. S. I dont feel clients should have Advisor access - otherwise it is too risky when preparing accounts that they are not changing the accounts as prepare them!
When on the 'My Xero' screen in the practice software it would be great to have a column in my client list that shows the status of the clients bank feeds and how many unreconciled transactions there are.
This way the reconciliation reporting would be separate from any other accounts and life would be so much easier.
I frequently wish the ability to sort the Bank Rule list alphabetically existed.
Good day,Would it not be a good idea for a refresh All button that could refresh all accounts in a client that has multiple accounts.
Showing bank statement lines with narrations and the account they've been coded to.
I’ve started this thread to gauge the demand for a limit on the options available to users when choosing Chart of Accounts, Tracking categories, and Tax Rates.
It would be good if there was an area to input supplier bank details so they are logged.
Of course he have been deleted - he no longer works for us so we would rather he didn't have a login to our *online* accounts system.
Currently every transaction has to be approved by clicking 'OK' in the bank reconciliation screen.
This would allow for US based users to upload/provide files to bank for direct ACH (electronic funds transfer) processing.
Accounts > Purchases > (scroll down depending on resolution) is becoming tedious.
This is a slow process to conduct through the bank.
I spoke with Robert in customer service (ticket #1199139) about this and he said he'd spoken with his team lead and with a developer who'd told him Xero couldn't support these types of accounts because of a Yodlee limitation.
The error:---------------Bank Feed Cannot Connect To Online BankingThe bank feed was unable to find any valid active accounts at the online banking website.
It would be helpful if we could create a bank voucher with the list of payments .
We have a client who is with the Bendigo Bank and they have activated bank feeds using their online banking log in details.
When importing a chart of accounts, there should be a column for system accounts.
A function that can allow customers / suppliers accounts to be set to the correct trading terms instead of doing this individually as this can be forgot about and can lead to misleading figures.
Bank rules will not allow posting to a cash account.
As Xero Personal is no longer, my partner and I have set our accounts in a cashbook to see if this is applicable to be offering our clients.
Example: Matthew Smith, Vice President or James Miller, Accounts Payable Department
Our bank has changed where the information is stored.
I see this as a material weakness in the internal controls related to bank information used to create batch payments.
The IOS Application shows the Bank Balance/Reconciliation.
They are usually accounts related, which is why I think it would be useful to have a separate tab in Xero - next to File perhaps, so the client knows where to go to remind themselves of tasks outstanding.
Sorting makes these entries much easier to identify as balance sheet account numbers start with a 6, 7, 8 or 9 for example and they would list in a group separately from the expense accounts that start with a 4.
For Example: accounts@domain1.
com tied to theme Domain1 theme (maybe multiple)accounts@domain2.
We have a staff member that is not part of our accounts department who needs to place orders.
If so this would be a really helpful feature to many employers who want certain staff to have all the standard access options without all bank balances showing up.
Any portfolio that is of any value will most likely have brokerage accounts in different currencies (NZD, USD, AUD) for the receipt of dividends/interest and cash transfers.
That is fine, but it is too expensive to be useful for an investment portfolio with a couple of FX accounts.
A company has bank accounts in AFN, USD and EUR and dealing with customers in these three currencies where AFN is the base.
- during reconciliation, I would be prompted to match receipt files to transaction, in a similar manner that you currently reconcile bank feeds.
As this is something my bank was very clear on (Breach of T&C's, Security Risk, Liability, etc. )
Then when trialing a transaction, all items, chart of accounts etc.
I generally want to reconcile my bank accounts to a month end date and find it quite confusing having bank feeds and transactions beyond the date I am working to.
On the bank reconciliation screen and any other screen where a list is given, could we please have navigation buttons at the top too?
My specific suggestion for this would be to place it in a "possible duplicate" state on the Bank statements screen (similar to the deleted state currently) but with a different icon.
As we have automatic imports for bank accounts and PayPal, it would be good to have our Moneybookers/Skrill data imported automatically too.
Can I request feeds for CBA Homeloan Bank Fees :)
with my accounts filing ref number.
It would be great to see a feature in Xero that would identify transactions that are transfers between related entity loan accounts that have separate Xero accounts.
In our other accounts package we enter brief Next of Kin contact details in a free text memo field.
This could be acheived in the same manner as bank rules by selecting from a drop-down: 5.
Currently there's only a few options under Financial Details for the bank digits under Batch Payments.
When a GST return is filed and published in xero - can it automatically create a bill/credit in accounts payable?
Currently some banks offer bank feeds for both Term Deposits and Loans.
Simply , Quickbook , AccoutEdge all candian version have GIFI code pre entered with Chart of Accounts.
As Xero currently doesn't allow us to properly manage our staggered / spread-out accounts receivable from customers or staggered / spread-out accounts payable to suppliers, this should be a feature.
when i do credit calls, i frequently get people telling me, call back next week because our accounts payable manager is on holidays.
Having put in lots of transactions, bank rules, special tax rates etc.
Have the ability to permanently remove a bank statement line.
So the dashboard shows that my bank is reconciled to 23 October 2212!
The account watchlist widget is great, but it's somewhat useless without the budget for that month and YTD being shown alongside, such that you can get a quick overview of those accounts against expected performance.
I have a bank rule called "Friday entertainment" setup which splits the costs across entertainment accounts etc.
As of 3 or so weeks ago, my bank (Commonwealth Bank) is now only allowing manual refreshes of my  credit card feed and will no longer automatically update my statements.
Even  deleting a line, it was always possible to go "fish" it out of the bank statements.
Following this ill-conceived change, the only way to delete duplicate statement lines is to go "fish" out the line in the bank statement screen, as the ability to delete statement lines from the reconciliation screen has been completely removed.
It would be great if they could snap a photo and submit and then the accounts department could do the rest.
For example I am finding setting up a lot of the same rules for many clients around bank charges, interest paid, interest earned, council rates, electricity, water rates.
During certain times of the year, one of our accounts team will take a 3 week holiday.
HiI am the treasurer for my church and we have recently begun using Xero for our accounts.
For example, if the other site of the transaction is a reconciled bank transaction, ask the user to confirm the change, or return, etc.
When I get to my desk each day I want to see all my bank balances in one place - in Xero.
However currently we are not specifying a description in the bank rule then the transaction will be coded with no description.
If you bank all the cheques as individual entries through Receive Money, then you can't split the bank deposit to match up to the Receive Money entries.
So please can we split a Receive Money transaction against multiple bank deposits.
It would be great to have the ability to limit access to certain general ledger accounts by user role.
We have to export a TB and prepare the accounts outside of Xero which is not good and takes much more timePlease enable this funcitonality.
As a registered charity we receive many ad hoc donations directly into our bank account or via PayPal.
Automated bank feeds from the 5 major banks in Singapore:DBSUOBOCBCStandard CharteredHSBC
When I save the rule, however, it takes me back to "Bank Rules" page and not my reconciliation screen.
For example, we have multiple checking accounts.
It would be great to have a feature to allow the easy setting up of a non bank loan in Xero to manage these.
When will we get foreign currency bank feeds?
At the moment CS Cart only links with QB so I think there would be a good market there for tech-savy online retailers who want a nice seamless integration between their online store and their accounts.
Imagine you have 10K sitting in your bank account and you purchase stock items with all that money.
We actively manage our accounts receivables, but a few have become bad debts (ie for us longer than 3 months).
It would be great to have this tab added to the others (All, Draft, etc )within the Accounts Receivable section as it belongs there and is a very important list indeed!
It doesn't seem too much to expect that I could at least download a local backup of my accounts data.
Come on Xero - include an option to download my accounts data - sooner rather than later.
Or perhaps you allow the user to select and compare activity in multiple accounts and choose the type of output graph.
You may even allow drag-and-drop positioning of multiple custom graphs or reports - on top of the listing of bank activity, accounts receivable, and accounts payable.
Would be great if we could create sub accounts for Chart of accounts like Quickbooks.
I had to enter a monster COA the other day with over 300 accounts.
Specifically Berrima District Credit Union (Credit Union Australia) doesn't seem to have an immediate bank feed.
Any solutions to this or do you think xero can do automatic payments the same way they get bank feeds?
I would be interested to know why Xero believe I should be locked out of my own accounts system if I don't touch it for 30 minutes.
It hooks up to your bank account and allows you to transfer money to other Dwolla members quickly and easily with a single, low transaction cost of .
We have to prepare accounts both in the UK and in France.
I would like to suggest having an optional compact bank account view, basically a list of accounts, with their actual bank account balance, as well as current xero balance.
I assume it is compensating for the 8 days bank holiday, which also assumes bank holidays are unpaid.
We have two different bank accounts.
Expand that account selection to cover a broader range of accounts.
I have clients that split their wages/kiwisaver etc over a number of expense accounts as well as tracking codes (often multiple per employee) and it really doesn't work for them.
The bank rules handle it a lot better.
*  access to other bank feed pages at the  of the bank feed screens as well.
For example we have tool accounts with our staff.
I have two Xero accounts.
In order to prevent mischief, maybe any request to change direct deposit bank info has to be verified by the Payroll admin (and probably with an email alert back to the EE too).
com/2013/10/seamless-payroll-accounting/I want to match individual payments of employees to specific transactions in Xero on bank feeds.
(I realise this  come to the user's attention anyway when the bank rec is being completed, but in this particular case the client is a bit green and there are a whole lot of other bank rec issues for us to resolve as well. )
I have multiple accounts and credit cards for which I have setup the bank feed without trouble.
We have 2 Xero users and one bank account - Each user also has unique bank account log in details.
Also, the bill always gets accrued to Accounts Payable.
10 days later this appears in my bank account.
Why it is user, not bank feed.
In almost every case the contact entered at each transaction w=has the same chart fo accounts.
ie if I log on today 26th June and sync with my bank it only syncs up to 21st June?
Also I don't have a current online account so I wont be using the bank rec however I am looking at alternative banks that don't charge for this feature.
If I then change banks will it mess up the bank rec?
I have not changed the format of the bank account in Xero and the creditor has not changed their bank account number.
I have tried re-entering the bank account number but nothing has changed
I wonder why it does not show "Payee" in cash coding, but showing in "bank statement"?
I have pass through costs for payroll which we often receive in our bank account net of PAYG.
My account suddenly stopped receiving bank feeds.
I looked up help topics and there seem to be manual journals (I get the feeling this is overkill), or I could create an income 'account' in the chart of accounts and then enter a manual transaction somehow each month?
In the end I have collected money from these people and have deposit that into the bank.
If the Bills Awaiting Approval screen had another column for the Chart of Accounts Code,  you wouldn't have to open each individual bill to check it.
I am Watching a few accounts by adding them to my Dashboard Watchlist.
I only have assets types and accounts tab.
However, I pressed the save and reconcile all button and none of the transactions appear to have reconciled and there is a message at the top saying 'Loading your bank transactions.
I'm looking for a setup expert to fix accounts so they balance, etc.
I have spent the morning reconciling my 4 accounts.
I have succesfully had the green tick appear saying each account is reconciled and in each case the Bank statement balances matches the Xero balance.
This is causing us huge issues - we have multiple contacts for each client with different remits within accounts.
Working example here:Details from Bank:22 Mar 2017	Visa Purchase	Springvale CCard number: 4835 **** **** 7759On Wed, 22 Mar at 11:52pm$25.
50Details Bank feed put into Xero:Transaction Date	22 Mar 2017 Payee	4835610420827759 NF Reference	SPRINGVALE C Description	SPRINGVALE C  Transaction Amount	25.
Is there a way to export my Xero data that would create a spreadsheet with contacts down the side and our Chart of Accounts across the top?
75% surcharge my bank levies on foreign currency transactions.
However they will never match penny for penny (fx rates are bound to be different), and taking account of the foreign currency surcharge there will actually be 2 bank statement entries for 1 expense item, and EACH of them will be a small amount out from the receipt.
35 as one single transaction; my bank statement might show the same as one transaction of £5.
SO: the main transaction to be reconciled will be 7p from the sum of the TWO bank transactions.
All well converted well and my accounts were functioning correctly.
When I look at my transactions (for a specific bank account), 3 of them are not sorting correctly by date.
However, in the bank feed, only the first 80% of the deposit comes through; the remaining 20% is held, and it comes through as a separate line item on the bank feed days or sometimes weeks later.
It would seem that having the one click option of "Previous Financial Year" would be ideal, especially when preparing and reconciling end of financial year accounts?
When I go to reconcile this credit in my bank account, I can't match this to the $100,000 credit note.
Trying to restructure the COA for a client and remove sevral account but some accounts are locked by repeating transactions.
but after doing this the accounts still have the "repeating transaction" symbol beside it.
I'm changing my bank account.
Then I have simply transferred the money across between accounts.
We invited the client and she is set up as a user with standard access level and "contact bank account admin"We're trying to connect the yodlee bank feeds for one of their account.
Similar to starting balances for bank account but for tracking.
I have been using Xero since March 2016 and have been enjoying the automatic bank feed.
All of a sudden, the bank feed no longer works.
Synchrony Bank has been listed in the Yodlee Beta list forever.
I bank with RBC and would love to have the feeds automatically refreshed.
There should be a way to check if unreconciled items eventually balance with the bank statement.
It appears my personal accounts have been linked to xero, any transactions from these personal accounts have been set up in xero as debiting owners drawings accounts or directors loan accounts.
The bank insist it is on my end.
HiAs always I am late starting my accounts and thought I would try xero and get an accountant hooked in.
69, this shows as leaving our bank account on 3rd January.
2017 on our bank statement after financial year-end.
And I leave PayPal as it is, then our bank account balance doesn't match.
My bank feed refresh has stopped working over the last few days.
Obviously on the bank statements they all show separately and when you do a normal csv download or bank feed they all come through.
So I went to Account Transactions under Bank Accounts and where it says Reconciled in green, I clicked to unreconcile it and then on the Reconcile tab I checked the appropriate bill.
I'm trying to figure out the best way to manage our bank line of credit.
I have imported my bank statements from the two qtrs before I had my bank feeds setup and the are numerous transactions missing on the xero version compared to my banks actual statements.
However despite trying several times, as well as checking all the trouble shooting help, we have been unable to create the Yodlee feed for the Charles Schwab Bank account.
Has anyone else found difficulty with this Bank and the Yodlee feed, and do they have any useful tips to solve the problem?
They bank with Lloyds in the UK.
Then, there is monthly prepayment (interest + principle), it is auto deducted from existing (same) bank account.
Foreign currency Chart of Accounts/ledgers.
More recently is says it has refreshed OK but no transactions are pulled from the bank.
Remittance advice's aside, systems can automatically allocated based on bank fields (council rates are a good example).
By watching the videos, it appears that maybe only those with Accounts payable access can enter a claim?
Not manually create spend money or receive money transactions from a bank statement if we could get one from the client!
I am now wondering how I go about getting xero to send reminders to existing overdue accounts?
We have our UK bank account which the bank feed is set up for and works well.
I managed to navigate the Banking Import and Reconciliation for my main bank.
Linked my accounts together.
I have been dealing with Xero for the past month, with their sporadic support getting back to me at their leisure and then DELETING one of my accounts that I have spent countless hours reconciling.
I have a bank rule that splits a transaction over 27 lines (i could easily have more) using a % breakup of the total.
The benefit to this is that I don't have to go to my bank portal to send the check, then enter the info again in my accounting software.
I've had to import multiple bank statements, and they are all named by import date.
We are trying to update our contacts list with account numbers, financial settings & Bank information however when attempting to upload an amended cvs; an error is displayed.
Edit and void the expense (via Chart of Accounts -> Account -> Record)The problem is I don't have either option.
Does anyone know how I get these bank transactions to come through into the bank feed?
Invoicing, including accounts receivable is handled in the SMS.
As the chart of accounts does not have a "debtors" account type but only "current assets" and "bank" it means the balance sheet will always show debtors as zero.
U. S. Banks had a holiday on Monday Oct. 10th, including our bank, City National Bank.
This seemed to cause the direct bank feed from our bank to Xeor to take a holiday as well, and we received no bank transactions into Xero for this day.
Hello Xero Community,I am running into a very frustrating issue with my AMEX bank feed wherein if I set up it as a live feed, it imports transactions backwards: it says money we have spent we have received and vice versa.
We have an amount that was spent, and then refunded immediately onto the bank account.
However this way wont it effect reports etc as will show on the accounts, where really it never happened?
05 rounding figure, so as to balance with the supplier's bill, and the bank transaction.
We also have Euro and US Dollar bank accounts and work with customers and suppliers in Europe and the US.
To save making too many forex deals and losing out to the bank's spread we paid the European contractor in Euros from the USD account with the bank automatically handling the forex transaction.
This makes reconciling a lot of workQuestion:Which bank works consistently with Xero and has a good online banking experienceThanksAngus
All our purchases of stock and assets so far, I have shown the VAT split in the accounts.
00) in the bank feed that are needing to be reconciled but I am having difficulty with the best way to do this in XeroAppreciate your input.
The automated feed is not working ( i think this is metro bank issues).
Our bank feed to Lloyds keeps missing entries.
So we've got records missing and 100's of deleted lines because Xero duped all the bank entries during an import.
I have managed to reconcile many of the recent ones against current bank feeds.
if I press the 'try again' option, it goes back to the 4 digit security code screen and then if I don't enter anything it logs in and I see my bank balances!
I then click on a bank account and it says "Error" The operation could not be completed (XeroTouch error 2.
Bank imposes a bank fee and immediately refunds it - two items then appear on my transaction feed to be reconciled.
Bank imposes a bank fee and immediately refunds it - two items then appear on my transaction feed to be reconciled.
its pretty useless having a "apply bank rule" option if you still have to go look up that bank rule so you know how it was applied and then enter all the details manually.
Her bank feed is on.
i. e bank details, change of address, etc.
There is a huge difference between the balances so I recently active the bank feed and upload bank statements to reconcile the bank account.
A cash deposit was made at the bank in lieu of fund raising income received.
00CR (now owed by the bank to the organisation)?
The bank feed balance, from the CBA, for my credit card is out by $1,200.
Bank of Qld is declining the payments.
I think is it because I hide my main bank account on the dashboard?
P. S. I did look through the manual, but it only mentions about bank accounts, not director's loan accounts.
HiI seem to have an issue with bank rules.
I have set up a bank rule for receiving money that also has tracking allocated to it.
On contacting The Co-operative Bank they tell me they have updated their online banking system so that the questions that Xero asks will no longer be acceptable.
So previously I subscribed to Xero and connected my bank account successfully.
They have now refunded the overpayment back into our bank account.
The system will copy ever part of the bank import description of the payee.
35 (the amount of the wrong bill)Plus a credit/refund to the bank account of £396.
But in bank feed when Fuel is entered as Who?
There is a period of about 20 days that are missing from when I did a previous bank feed import.
In Quickbooks I could use a liability account and make a journal on a bank account, in this case the Mastercard.
I'm using Xero multi-currency feature and added all my accounts there.
I bought some equipment for the company with my bank card by mistake.
how do i rectify this so that the company accounts show this as a debit to me?
My bank is NAB.
I am reconciling my balance sheet accounts but am unable to run account summary reports (for opening and closing balances) on certain accounts?
Coming from an MYOB background that produces detailed Bank Rec reports showing all deposits and payments cleared during the month etc as well as outstanding cheques, how is it possible to produce this within Xero?
I am trying to run my bank reconciliation, however I have come across an issue.
HiI imported a bank statement, and for reasons I don't quite understand, two entries didn't import.
Can you create an ABA file in XERO when batching payments of bills so you can upload the file directly to your bank?
I have 4-5 different bank accounts that feed expenses into this direct cost account.
I want to go with a bank that has a good bank feed process.
I publish receipts from Receipt Bank into Xero.
Then group multiple cheques from undeposited funds and create a deposit slip for the bank.
I've cleared part of the expense claim with the amount leaving the bank account.
I can see the Stripe transfer coming to my bank account and showing it in my Reconciliation area.
However, I only have two options to choose from in the drop down: either (Liabilities) 2500 - Suspense or (Expenses) 6040 - Bank Service Charges.
We have a bank account and a bank loan account, and have configured both of these in Xero as bank accounts with bank feeds.
This single recurring transaction in MYOB credits the bank account and debits the bank loan account.
However, Xero does not support bank rules for transfers - only for spend money and receive money.
And, Xero does not allow a spend money (nor receive money) bank rule to be coded to a bank loan account which is specified as a bank account in Xero.
This solution is prone to user error and much slower than a bank rule.
Handle the bank loan instalment using two bank rules and a suspense account.
This requires creating a spend money bank rule to temporarily transfer the funds to a suspense account (because Xero doesn't allow me to use a bank account), and a receive money bank rule to transfer the funds from the suspense account to the bank loan account.
I assume there are many other Xero users who have this same requirement, and would appreciate any thoughts on how others handle bank loan instalments.
The actual money transaction appearing in the bank is the agent paying the second bill.
Someone else also had same problem so i copied and pasted their question as i think they asked it well: my issue relates to the list of bank statements (Manage Account->Bank Statements).
I have previously set up xero for my employer with no probs using the default chart of accounts - with a few tweaks.
HelloI have been using the Yodlee bank feed but its a bit sloe and not up to date by a week.
The natwest bank hasnt been open for too long so not huge data.
One of our clients with an ANZ Visa has a doubled up bank feed again.
This also shows up when searching in Bank Accounts as it doesn’t search both fields.
I have been running the software for a year now and I still don't have the automatic bank feed for my CashPlus (Mastercard) bank account.
For example, last month we were pre-charged US$5 & US$10, matching to ~AU$7 and ~AU$14 transactions in our bank statement.
Still sticking with the reference in bank rules.
I have a bank feed from the Credit Card into 1 of the businesses and so it is easy enough to reconcile transactions for that businesses.
Am I best bringing the same bank feed in to both businesses or am I best setting up a Directors Account where I transfer card expenditure over between the two businesses?
89 over the space of 4 days and we could receive payments to the bank of 29.
However by default the Profit & Loss for each period only includes active accounts for that period.
I want the email to come from accounts and all the reply's to come from accounts too?
99 rather than one bank transaction of 222.
99 then the bank refund of 209 later.
In my chart of accounts I have a number of expense and income accounts that are used sparingly, so they carry a zero balance until used.
The feature request to have running balances on the bank account has been closed, even though running balances have not been added to the bank account.
Hello - any reason why Xero has not yet processed the ANZ bank feeds for 8 June 2016?
Should I change my bank or my accounting software?
I use Stripe to process credit card payments on my website and I understand there is no bank account type integration for Stripe in Xero so I'm struggling to understand how I account for these transactions.
If you set up a bank rule that tries to match a reference that contains a hyphen.
For us it renders bank rules virtually useless.
Automatic deductions from my bank account and checks for the same amount that occur each month so all I have to do is print it.
I have taken over a set of accounts and there are a large number of issues dating back to 2013 - Customer, Supplier and bank accounts have not been reconciled.
2) in Mid June, start afresh with each of the connected bank accounts - delete all the existing transactions.
I am having a major problem in my bank feed.
My transactions are all reconciled correctly as debits/credits, and this problem is consistent throughout all of the imports of my bank feed.
After using Xero for a few months its was realised that a few chart of accounts that were set up as revenue gst free accounts should have been set up as Liability Not Reportable accounts instead.
But it breaks the xero bank feed link.
Any Ideas as I have customers accounts going on hold because of non payments but they have actually payed.
My xero bank account only shows transactions till 31 March.
Its been paid already from the bank account.
Linking a credit card to Xero works perfectly, but many of our transactions are international ones and Kiwi Bank (potentially others? )
NAB is continually slow at providing bank feeds; as one of Australia's top four banks we expect MUCH better.
I did manage to get it to refresh this morning and it didn't include any details of bank transactions after 13 April.
When attempting to access Bank Transactions on 'Adviser' account, page has timed out and displayed Error 500.
It does, however, go through on one of our 'Standard' user accounts -albeit slow loading.
We have found this only happens with our oldest bank account which dates back 3 years.
The newer bank accounts don't seem to have this problem.
A client has got a bank feed set up for their bank account.
They have opened another account with the same bank but it is linked to a different login.
The green button on their dashboard says "Start bank feed now".
On mine it says "Get bank feeds".
The Journal entry used to reduce these two accounts to $0 was $10,000 out.
We've contacted Xero and still not working so missing 3 days statements and holding up our management accounts.
I have the chart of accounts for the main screen?
com site but when using the mobile app, my linked bank account doesn't appear and the app tells me to 'set up bank account at Xero.
It would also be helpful to search all accounts of a certain type for a tracking division - eg - all expense or income accounts for Unassigned divisions.
When entering things I have purchase or paid for via personal accounts, if I do not want paid back for them, is it better to do an Expense Claim or a Bill?
I have a bank statement that cannot be deleted and a bank transfer entry with its bank charge component which seems to be some system error stuff that i cant delete away.
I made a purchase paid using the debit card of my bank account.
I have a bank feed, lovely, works great.
Perhaps something to do with the initial bank import?
I cant find the 1st March in the bank statement lines either.
edit: As the items all seem to be in the file reconciled (in the transactions area), could the bank feed be playing up and brought in a whole months items again?
By giving them Standard access they can select how they want to be repaid but this gives them so much more access, such as Bank Recs, etc.
If I remember correctly when I set up bank feed for the credit card it stated it couldnt go back to 5/2015 for example.
My bank feeds seem to have frozen on the 9 March and haven't updated since then.
My question is does this take care of the Accounts Payable outstanding?
The person deducted $ 15 as bank charges and returned the money.
I finished the chart of accounts and i now have to start updating the systemwith various bills/payments.
ie Manager and accounts.
I'm trying to reconcile my accounts and start a clean set up books.
00"  but doesn't show which bank account it was paid into.
I have put in my sort code and password but when I click "refresh bak feed" a screen comes up  saying "Your bank requires additional information to activate your bank feed" and asking me to "enter passcode" - what is this passcode referring to?
with so many clients paying same amounts a UIN in there bank  reference you should know who's paying without the guess work
They don't run with our current set of accounts.
I've linked my bank account for feeds into Xero and selected import transactions from beginning.
trying to link my bank to Yodlee feeds.
I've added my bank account and clicked on get bank feeds.
So I logged on this morning and when I clicked on the accounts transactions under my bank account the order of transactions has been changed.
Setup my account and in the process added feeds for checking and credit card accounts.
No login details have changed on the bank side.
I know I can probably swap reference and description fields using Bank Rules.
Maybe there could be an "Accounts Payable" tab or drop down list ?
Note that this asset was entered entirely manually and has no bank or Xero transactions associated besides the fixed asset registration.
If I allocate the overpayment in the bank feed to the bills agreed and with the remainder make an overpayment-spend money that all reconciles.
Some details to start: My bank does not have a feed available yet so I batch import my bank statements and reconcile them in Xero manually.
We use the Square Clearing Account to reconcile transactions that square deposits into our bank account.
I have bank feeds set up on my Xero account from HSBC but there doesn't appear to be a bank feed refresh option and they don't appear to be refreshing regularly at all.
I have imported some pre-bank feed statement data (56 transactions across 6 months) and reconciled the transactions.
Despite the bank statement for the import displaying a running balance as each transaction is made, at the end of the statement for that period, the closing balance is $0.
I have refreshed the bank feed to no avail.
He visits Starbucks and pays with his company bank card.
On his bank statement, these two entries show up against Starbucks, and when the bank statement is imported, Starbucks appears on the right hand side.
I enter all bank transactions manually and reconcile the transactions manually from the Account Transactions tab.
If you are locked out from refreshing your bank feed - there are some options about how to reverse this.
these include logging off and connecting to your bank and logging off / on again.
It advised me to not keep doing it else I might be locked out from my bank altogether.
The 'Bank' line show no account to be posted to, and if I try to select my bank account in the dropdown, I do not have the option of selecting my bank account.
I have 2 bank feeds - a checking account and a credit card, both with TD Bank US.
We have a wide number of entries in our chart of accounts that we set up to differentiate between or different design services we offer.
Will it request that the items with those unallocated be allocated to another item in the chart of accounts?
MYOB allows this at bank reconciliation or processing supplier payments.
They will be something outstanding one month yet when I check the bank reconciliation screen, nothing comes up.
For example, whe reconciling my bank I had to post a transaction.
This matches the reconciled transaction I see when looking at the transactions tab for the bank account.
The customer is charged this amount, but in my bank I have &#163;241.
Would the bank get confused?
Can you have a bank feed dropping into 2 separate files?
I am actually beginning to think entering all the info onto the CSV and importing was quicker than having the bank feed because at least Xero used to recognise regular customers, suppliers and payments
I have been importing my receipt via receipt bank and realised I should have been filling in the descriptions.
I have a small company with two checking accounts.
These two accounts are at the same institution and the name on the account is the same with identical tax ID, etc.
Logged in today only to find All My Currency Bank Accounts have Disappeared!
I am downloading my bank statements and find that reconciling most transactions is OK.
I have been trying to reconcile one transaction in Xero with the two (1 debit and 1 credit) in the bank.
Example: transaction in Xero of &#163;100 against transactions in the bank of &#163;110 debit and &#163;10 credit.
I am very new to Xero and I've linked my bank account with Xero two days ago for automatic bank feeds.
But it's still saying that 'A bank feed for this bank is currently in development.
We will notify you via the Bank Account Dashboard when the feed provider makes this available.
'Is it normal or do i have to speak to the bank about this or any other solution?
I've got access to adding client accounts to our account already.
I am currently setting up a company with multiple bank accounts loans and credit cards.
Hello, I am not sure if this question was already answered elsewhere with regard to Credit Card Accounts, but any insights will be greatly appreciated.
Why does Xero require a "Credit Card" to be set as a Bank Account.
Once you have bank feeds enabled, this facility no longer exists and the only method of manual reconciliation is to open up each individual transaction and then select "mark as reconciled" against each one.
Unlike Xero's bank statement lines, which come from the bank, the ones that convert from QB are manufactured as part of their reconciliation process and come through in Xero marked "reconciled" in grey (not green).
This would greatly assist the bank reconciliation process.
The upload worked, but upon doing my bank rec, I noticed some of the items are missing.
Further, I uploaded a single item as another bank statement, and it said it's a duplicate, but I can't locate it anywhere.
I noticed other items are missing from the bank rec as well -- and have not been reconciled yet.
I have one employee that has her net paycheck split between 2 bank accounts.
Therefore my bank account has 2 separate bank statement lines.
Hell,I'm using direct bank feeds from my Santander account into Xero.
I have run the update on my bank feeds and still nothing.
I have set up the bank feeds and started coding some Direct Debit payments to the various suppliers.
I tried (twice) to upload these into our bank account and keep getting an error message the there is an error in the file!
In the original Xero account, the bank feeds from Westpac (AU) were approved and working.
Or will the accounts begin to feed in automatically after a few days?
Is there any risk to payroll/bank account details having been compromised?
Set up bank feed before and reconcile afterwards.
In this card all transactions plus the monthly direct credit payments, bank fees and interest charges appear.
However in my actual bank statement is a different figure $ 940.
So I went in to see the bank statement tab, it is $940.
My actual bank statement matches  the bank statement in Xero.
Currently I have a university that I bill Conferences, Bars and Student Activities and get paid in one lump from the Uni accounts dept - QB sadly handles this very well!
Neither is bank feeds since transaction level is relatively low.
Paid 2 cheques into my bank account - unfortunately I added the sum up wrong doh!
So the bank credited the amount I put on the paying in slip then credited the additional sum.
So two entries on bank statement.
I feel that this is happening with too many of our bank rules for it to be user error, and I know I set them up correctly initially anyway.
we have bank rules set up.
there are around 5 bank rules that this has happened to.
Here are some:- transaction reference numbers all showing as 000000000000- bank statement dates overlapping (and hence creating multiple entries)- credit card feed often dropping out and requiring refreshing nearly every other day.
Called NAB and they wiped their hands and sent me bank to Xero.
75 being deposited in my bank account.
HiI have exported a cvs of my bank fees but when I import they are shown as a credit, how to I change these to debits?
In Accounts > Bank AccountsIt would be really nice if we could decide which bank account is displayed first, second, etc.
Currently, my least used and least important bank account is at the top of the list.
22 in my bank statement).
50 as a cost, as obviously I am unable to reconcile with the bank feed I have setup an account for these costs, but is it an expense, a purchase ?
On the statement we have quite a few 'Withholding Tax' (charged by the bank) and also quite a few 'Credit Interest Paid' payments (received from the bank).
How can I get my accounts receivable & payable balance as per my conversion balance ?
'Set the contact' I select 'the Payee from the bank' it never works and leaves the field blank.
Example:&#163;10,000 Hits the Bank and picked up by Xero.
Can only choose from list of existing bank accounts.
I am attempting to load bank statements into Xero which I have done for the last two years.
I have the two bank statement files in csv format-go to xero press import-go to browse select file click import and nothing happens.
Anyone know why by Fifth Third Bank feed isn't importing any information even though Xero says the feed was refreshed successfully?
The service then pulls the money from one of our bank accounts and pays the vendor directly via ACH or mails out a check if we don't have their ACH info.
For some reason using this service then disables the ability for QuickBooks to connect to that bank account feed and automatically download and reconcile transactions.
Confusingly, though, transactions from my website are imported as reconciled on my bank current account.
However, I have several extracts that I run that require accounts from both expenses and balance sheet.
The individual transactions, as per the statement, are entered via the purchases module and then matched against the single monthly amount appearing on the bank statement.
We are starting our accounts from the 30th June 2015.
The accountant has rounded everything up so my "accounts receivable" stood at $262.
There should be a facility to query individual suppliers/customer accounts.
I have transferred my chart of accounts over to xero and noted that my 2 bank loan accounts are now in assets and showing a positive amount.
They were current liabilities accounts in my MYOB before.
This morning when I work on the Bank Account Reconciliation screen and I want to click on either the Cash Coding, Account Transactions or Bank Statement Tabs, nothing happens.
Since end July 2015 our main bank account feed has only been coming in every second day so we have to import all the missing statement lines.
we have 2 companies, with their own bank accounts.
We are having an issues when entering a receipt on an iphone 4, with the app not listing all our expense accounts.
I am currently using the ledger to upload trial balances for various clients and produce man accounts.
Or CC the accounts person's email address in?
I also had 2 Xero accounts, 1 for each.
On Jan 1, DBA K had cash in the bank.
When making the Bank Fees adjustment it would also be very helpful if it automatically selected the Bank Fees account and filled in the amount of the difference.
This was really handy for Balance Sheets and Profit & Loss where my accountant has a different breakdown and grouping of accounts for tax purposes.
Checked on 2 accounts, 2 different computers 3 browsers.
In cash coding, I have a fuel purchase transaction from the bank feed for a one-off supplier I've used.
I would like to bulk re-do these transactions as accounts payable not spend so that I don't see the offsetting "paid credit card" and "credit card" accounts in my Income Statement.
Most banks have paying in machines that take an image of any cheques paid in and it would be handy to attach these banking receipts to the corresponding bank statement line.
Situation: We are a Canadian company and have CAD and USD bank accounts.
5) Click on credit note - Apply refund to bounced cheque bank account.
I have an issue with bank reconciliation reports.
78The accounts actually do balance and I understand from previous community discussions that it is to do with some banks importing opening and closing balances wrong (I manually import a OFX file) but I don't know how to fix it.
I have 3 GST accounts and I've realised Xero only uses 1.
I have 6 different Xero companies, all using a common (hierarchical) chart of accounts.
We have a second bank account that we aren't linking to xero.
When I click save it says the bank rule was saved successfully but when I go back in to check it hasn't saved any of my updates.
The live bank feeds bring that up in my transactions to be reconciled.
I have a bank account where I imported the transactions from a CSV file.
going through the bank reconciliation, after i have entered the details for an expense.
I realised I needed a 2nd Payapl Xero bank account to allow for multiple currencies.
why do we have to go to the bank statement page?
I didnt realise this until I ran the previous years P+L and saw that it was different to the final accounts submitted.
is it possible to have it set so the cc debit clients will only receive their email template, and the bank transfer clients theirs?
Dear Sir/Madam,Prior to updates there was a feature where prior year published accounts could be copied and saved as a draft and the date changed to the next financial year.
Steps:Pick a line item and choose 'Find & Match'Pick 2 items to matchCreate an adjustment for bank fees (we have to do this due to Stripe not breaking out fees in their transfers).
HiHas anyone in the UK used this successfully and uploaded it into a UK bank account?
I import from my Bank an OFX file.
Xero is saying I have all these pre start date bank statement lines that are unreconciled.
:)(I am also waiting for BANK FEEDS to be activated)
For some reason Xero is downloading “Pending” transactions from my credit care (Virgin America credit card provided by Comenity bank).
Could such a feature be implemented whereby items in the bank feed could be ignored or hidden?
Unless I was to create a 'personal account' in the accounts list.
all seems fine except if I now go to accounts/purchases it isn't showing.
I have added the existing share capital and share premium in the conversion balances having created two accounts in my Chart of Accounts for these numbers.
In Reports>All Reports>Income Statement> Layout Options>Choose Layout, I have saved an income statement layout and have tried sorting and grouping accounts.
It shows Accounts Receivable, then Benefits, then Cash (by bank's name starts with an R), then Salaries.
My accountant set up my bank feeds for me.
Even with these reservations, I went to "VAT 820" in our Charter of Accounts and updated it to "VAT on Imports".
Our client converted from Banklink to Xero using Jet Convert and the Credit Card has been imported as a Bank Account.
Bank rules don't help because with thousands of customers, there is no way to create a bank rule for each one.
I honestly reckon this would be a major timesaver, would be useful for both annual accounts and GST, and would allow truly electronic workpapers.
At the moment we do a bank transfer for the deposit and then reconcile it to the bill to show it as part paid.
I've double checked my credentials directly on the bank's login page and they are working so the problem is either from xero, Yodlee or any kind or param I should do on my societe generale account.
After investigating, I saw that the bank statement lines had never appeared.
So all the features are available but the integrator (Bluegem) can only access a specific set of company accounts vetted by Xero.
It appears Xero doesn't have bank feeds available for this.
I currently run a bank reconciliation for each account and then amalgamate them in Excel.
For instance, we have situations where a single supplier will supply to multiple companies and in order to understand the accounts payable or order history for that supplier, we have to run multiple reports and combine them.
I believe may be something wrong with my bank feed.
Our current account and the two credit card accounts.
So I have a bank statement line of $25 from the sale above that needs to be reconciled to somewhere.
Even if I download the template and upload exactly the same file with no changes it comes up with a list of accounts that are invalid.
I'm trying to reconcile my bank account.
Unfortunately, my automatic feed with my bank account reports payroll as two separate payments (1 to employees, 1 to tax authorities).
I realise that there could be multiple line items and in theory that they could have different accounts but in practise we would probably not mix the two up so taking the first account would be sufficient.
The first recorded reconciliation on our Bank Feed is 26 August.
That bank account is then reconciled within Xero.
Dear Xerojust started and am setting up accounts and was surprised to learn that you like to tell everyone that you are simplifying things by not allowing a hierarchical structure in the accounts.
It would be great if I had the option by an upload button on the screen to upload a remittance slip straight to the line item whilst i am reconciling my bank transactions.
once a week I deposit my cash takings to my bank account, then from Xero, I select the cash deposit and click 'Find and match'.
So here goes:Have two accounts - joint and credit card accounts.
The bookkeeper's account has been removed and I am about to "get bank feeds"My concern is I may duplicate records on import.
Xero support recommends ticking the box to also delete reconciled transactions when deleting a bank statement.
For example, when doing bank reconciliations, would be nice if there was a way to send off alert notifications for unexplained/unidentified transaction items.
Difference amount withdrawn from bank in AUD2.
How to create ABA files from Xero to Bank.
00 which made my bank balance -&#163;49.
00 as a bank fees bill and reconciled with the bank.
First National Bank (FNB) in South Africa recently asked us to update our login details.
My NAB bank feed is sending payee information to the description field and not the payee field of the transaction.
80 from my bank account.
A) The amount they take from your bank account is "Refund Amount" minus "Fee Reversal".
80 showing in my Xero bank account and I can't reconcile it against the $45.
B) I have already received my fee reversal from PayPal because as shown above they automatically deduct it from the amount they draw from my bank account.
As far as I can tell that transaction should not be imported into Xero because I already received that money when PayPal withdrew a discounted amount from my Bank Account.
If I was to reconcile it to the Bank Fees account as I normally do for PayPal fee reversals, the amount in Xero would not match the amount shown when I login to the PayPal website (it would be out by $1.
It has taken me all day to go back and figure out why my Xero accounts don't match to what PayPal shows.
It can take you many hours to Automatic OK many entries in many accounts and clients.
It takes less than 20 seconds to start 0CPAs doing this, 20+ times faster than you can do it, for any combination of accounts and clients.
Extract sorted bank reconciliations to Excel:This lets you only look once at many entries.
It also takes less than 20 seconds to start 0CPAs doing this, 20+ times faster than you can do it, for any combination of accounts and clients.
Extract Bank Rules to Excel:You really should extract Bank Rules to Excel, so you quickly find and fix errors.
If you then enter a keyword, it instantly shows the accounts used before.
Import Excel Bank Rules into Xero:This is the proverbial pot of gold at the end of the rainbow.
It's an issue with two accounts: one Lloyds and the other PayPal.
Is there anyway I can move funds between my own accounts and not have this impact on the limited 20 bank statement lines I have each month as I don't really want to have to upgrade to the next level of fees.
There seems to be so much focus on Bank feeds, that the simple act of ticking off transactions that match to your physical bank statement has been lost!
Due to we always have a Bank Fees cause my statement always not matched with my transaction.
I have to click on "Find & Match", then "search by name" or "search by amount", check the matching transaction, click "Adjustments" / "Bank Fees", enter the Bank Fees, click "Reconcile".
I think the same goes for accounts payables.
If two users reconcile the same bank statement item then this causes a duplicate account transaction which causes the accounts to become out of sync and cannot be undone (http 500 error).
I have set up bank feeds for a client.
When I import my Bank Statement data files, I very carefully map my Tracking Category and Tracking Option data columns to the Tracking fields in XERO in order for it to be imported.
I was thinking of setting up a bank account and calling it Elance, would that work, or is there a better way?
I am using a csv file for bank statement import.
Two further manual payments were then  processed via the bank, to match the Xero AP total.
This change was made shortly after we setup Xero and the first imported bank statement (via bank feed) included the detailed wage lines.
I'm currently looking at deleting the entire statement, setting up the bank feed from a future date and then importing the affected statements manually but clearly this is a tedious workaround.
The following error message came up "An error occurred for the following reason:Your accounts are locked by your advisor up until 31st Jan 2011.
I deposited an amount that was 3 cheques from three different clients into our bank account.
I refreshed bank feed to pull in recent transactions, and once complete, my credit card account was showing a NEGATIVE balance.
I created transactions to match the imported spends, assigning vendors, G/L accounts, and descriptions.
I've even deleted the imported transactions and given it a go with an import of a CSV bank statement.
Same issue exists if we bank a number of cheques as a single deposit.
This happens on Xero and most of the bank websites.
I have set up a bank account in Xero and imported my transactions.
I want to change the order in which accounts appear on my dashboard board.
I now have a bank account and entered the details into Xero.
Having spent days migrating over from my own excel accounts package I am beginning to wonder if it was a good move.
I can manage most accounts, however have questions in some.
The trouble is that payments to the credit card only show up in the master account's (user card 1) bank feed.
However, PAYE amounts paid are showing up as a credit on liabilities in Balance Sheet and they are not appearing in Profit and Loss accounts at all.
And my question is about the bank account setting in Xero where I added my ID number there's a checkbox for "Include self-balancing transaction in the ABA file".
Now I had to hire an external agency to manage my books of accounts in Xero even though I am myself an SAP Finance consultant with 15 years of accounting/consulting experience.
We are in the process of transfering old data onto Xero to ensure our historic accounts have been submitted correctly.
How do you import an exported creditors batch to Kiwi bank?
Every transaction since for deposits and withdrawals has been properly recorded, and reconciled on xero in line with our bank statements.
When we import statements manually the opening and closing statements of the bank statement are not included.
It was imported as a Yodlee bank feed.
Finally, if I could link to my bank account so payments of dues could go directly their that would be amazing.
We did purchase Sage Instant Accounts, but I'm having second thoughts now I've seen Xero.
I have closed some bank accounts recently and have changed some others around and do not want to see them inside of my login anymore.
I want it to come from accounts@XXX.
We now have no way to reconcile our Paypal accounts.
Not sure what to do from here whether we force them to reconcile or have to show something as happening in the bank account.
At the end of the month the bank automatically pays off both cards with a cash transaction from our working account.
2) If I start invoicing certain jobs to an account called 'Services' - but later down the line decide they should be edited to be in more specific accounts.
Is there any discussion or help regarding how to handle bank transactions that come into Xero as net amounts of several credit card deposits and refunds?
So the net credit card transaction that batched from the merchant provider on the same day and deposited to the bank account as a $50USD amount cannot be matched off against both Xero transactions.
How do I get back to a Xero balance equalling the bank statement balance?
For example, xero has added 'bank fees' as a contact or 'tax rebate' as a contact.
With my limited knowledge of xero, it seems to me it's adding anything I reconcile from my bank transactions as a 'contact'.
Is anyone else experiencing problems with bank feeds at the moment.
I have several clients who all have outstanding support calls due to bank feeds missing items.
ofx file shows the bank balances the .
We are in the process of finalising year end accounts for our clients who are using Xero.
• Each has its own bank account(s) and must be accounted for separately but ultimately the accounts have to roll up into the parent company for reporting purposes.
howewer the bank account in question is not viewable in the list of accounts.
I am working through my bank account reconciling all the transactions and this is working great, but i have hit a small issue relating to a credit note.
00With my bookkeeper entering the paperwork and auto bank reconciliation, it's the only info I want from Xero on a daily basis.
Have also noticed that Xero defaults Owner Draws and Owner Contributions as liability accounts.
Faster bank reconciliation – tracking categories and tax rates can now be applied directly from the bank reconciliation screen.
Tracking on coded bank statements.
Interestingly I can refresh the AMEX credit card feed but not the bank.
You also can have separate windows open for Reconciiation, Bank Rules, etc.
Have any Irish customers out there successfully established the automated bank feed?
I set up a Bank Rule to split a transaction 50/50 across two account codes, and reconciled these transactions.
I edited the Bank Rule to reflect this change.
Hello everyone,We have moved from MYOB to XERO recently (6 weeks ago) and I am doing bank reconciliation at the moment.
When I try to access some of the tabs on an employee's file I get the above message for the details, leave, bank account, payslips and some other tabs, and the formatting is all over the place.
ie it closes thursday currently but we have changed to wednesday to allow for monies to hit employees accounts by weekends from this week.
Checked the drop down list in the Bank Rec page and it isn't available to select there either.
My thoughts are to setup a dummy bank account and record payments, although this would never be reconciled.
Once noticing I paid the correct amount to the fund (as they would not except the over calculation) but my accounts are now out and cannot be reconciled.
So in my chart of accounts - wages and salaries - there is a much larger dollar amount showing than what has actually been paid out to employees.
He has requested that the allowance be paid into a second bank account.
Is it possible to link up his Car Allowance rate to his Secondary Bank account?
He tells when when using ABA files in MYOB, he would save the ABA in a folder designated MYOB Wages and it would automatically upload to his CBA bank account with having to log into his bank and upload the ABA from his bank login.
I was reconciling my bank transaction to 477 so i edited each transaction and now i reconcile to 804. .
The PE journals appear correctly in the expense accounts.
Up until the 22nd of Feb we were importing bank statements manually, and on the 23rd the bank import connected automatically.
I then transferred the net amount to the employee bank account .
I have attempting to log in with my "My Payroll" details but it doesn't show any details and if I login with my normal accounts/admin login I don't see any payroll information.
I set up an account called cheque (as I could not use the bank account) and entered all the transactions in respectably, ie.
One of our employees has asked to split his wages each week into 3 bank accounts.
So I went to Settings > Chart of Accounts > Wages Payable - Payroll and enabled "Enable payments to this account"3.
htmlCan you confirm that Xero has not been hacked and that there are no large scale changes to bank account details?
Can you advise that that the tax file number , super , personal email address and bank account details are encrypted?
The payrun was processed, posted and paid from our bank account.
We have different branches each and one of them with different bank accounts.
(Personal leave)Yes I have applied leave for Simone under Employee Leave from 17th June to 21st July Because i only started using Xero from 14th July, i have paid my staff manually from my bank transfers.
15 and was posted to Wages Payable (804) our bank feeds didn't come through until day after 2.
The bank transfers to employees will be the right amount, but Xero has the PAYG added on.
The boys work 40 hours but should only get paid for 38 as they bank 2 hours.
HiI am trying to work out how to reconcile bank feeds with payments to employees to Xerofor example: I paid an employee $1200 this fortnight (It comes up on the bankfeed) and I want to reconcile this to her payslip somehow.
The bank account statements match correctly.
Whose salaries also get paid out of different bank accounts?
Xero support recommended I contact the bank and after 2.
I'm assuming the error refers to the client bank account, but, everything is setup correctly as have processed supplier batch payments without a problem and also the bank feeds are working.
I have checked the bank account set up (CBA) and it looks correct.
This may be a silly question but I wanted to know if I could use Xero's Payroll feature without having a bank account linked to a Xero Account.
However it has only hit the bank account once (so my bank rec balances).
I have my bank feeds set up and have been doing my reconciling as often as I can.
If I go to the chart of accounts, the tickbox for 'make payments to this account' is ticked.
Would the problem be caused by:- we have two different wage expense (directors & employees) accounts?
As a part of this we have 2 separate bank accounts (one for each office) and 2 bank feeds.
I have moved our accounts over from a simple spreadsheet set-up so I am still getting my head around this more thorough method of doing things, learning the lingo etc.
I don't want the payroll function to journal into the accounts.
The Employee Salary Advance account is a Current Asset on the chart of accounts.
When adding a Deduction payroll item, only Liability accounts are available to be chosen.
Paycycle & Xero allow for multiple wages accounts, but they must all be EXPENSE type accounts.
Anyway, the expense, deduction and liability accounts were not set up correctly and now I have a mess with these numbers not being correct in the financial reports.
We have two bank accounts.
Does using Xero direct deposit for payroll cost anything either from Xero, my businesses bank, or my employees bank?
So, I realized I have the wrong expense accounts set up for Federal Employment Tax Expense and Federal Unemployment Tax Expense.
With MyDocSafe you can increase your employee productivity and happiness by depositing paystubs/payslips from Xero directly into their secure accounts.
Go to Payroll Settings > Organization and look at the Payroll Accounts section.
It asks for three accounts.
My bank, however, only sees these payments as a single lump sum.
The amount being fed from my bank is the larger $1875.
We are using the default chart of accounts from Xero.
In bank reconciliation, the Xero tax filing entry PD numbers do not include the suffixes that indicate whether they are federal, state withholding, or state unemployment.
I expected to see money being moved to various liability accounts for both fed and state withholding.
I can see where the allocation is in the chart of accounts.
So I got onto the webchat and they set it up there and then so I have a reference and accounts office reference.
All monthly paid seem to have the bank holidays showing.
The bank obviously only has a single transaction against it.
Xero - you started this idea of having employee payments and tax and NI bill showing as bill payable and it was great - no more control accounts for net wages and tax and NI.
If you are a user of Xero and Digita Accounts Production Advanced, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Manage your personal finances with automatic Live Bank Feeds and powerful cashflow forecasting.
Tripcatcher helps you manage those pesky mileage claims, using mobile and web apps, and publishes them seamlessly to Xero or Receipt Bank.
Connect the products, bank the savings.
SAT FXOnline will save you money on your foreign currency payments by removing transfer fees and offering better-than-bank exchange rates.
TransferMate offers better exchange rates & lower fees than using the bank.
Outsourced accounts receivable service, focused on improving cash flow and reducing debtors.
It turns the debtors in your Xero accounts into big, bold pictures.
Integrating SalesForce with Xero via OneSaas creates one seamless workflow of Accounts, Products and Opportunities to Accounts Payable data transfer, check out .
Debt collection on-line at the click of a button from your Xero accounts.
Automated line-by-line data extraction from accounts payable bills - seamlessly sent to Xero, inventory systems and a cloud-based filing cabinet, check out .
Includes a seamless integration of staff cost to Xero keeping your accounts right.
If you are a user of Xero and Receipt Bank, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Currently my only options are to mentally track two accounts, or manually duplicate this information into both packages.
com clearing-in and clearing-out accounts appear to be reconciled, but if I look at the account transactions for those accounts, they show as unreconciled.
The integration process won't import the bank account with the chart of accounts because it is labeled "bank" and not an asset.
I have added such accounting links before when using other accounts package but xero doesn't seem to allow it.
HeyHas anyone here used/is using the Digita Accounts production software?
I uploaded the photo to receipt bank and published.
However, in Xero, I cannot find the transaction in any accounts.
I have one trouble with reconciling from the bank feed.
For example, we have accounts for:  Admin - W-2 Wages, Admin - FUTA, Admin - SUTA, Admin - FICA, Admin - Medical/Dental.
)At what level can these accounts be mapped between Xero and Gusto?
I've triple checked and all the accounts a set up correctly at both ends.
I am setting up links with VendHQ, but my petty cash and paypal accounts aren't showing in Vend, any ideas?
Petty Cash Balance of £230 (£240 - £10)04/01/16: Deposit £130 to bank account to keep my petty cash float at £100.
We are a recruitment consultancy using Xero for our accounts and Jobscience (Saleforce) for our CRM database.
Guys, all my expenses come in from Receipt Bank.
Looking for some feedback on the Receipt Bank integration .
This is important because different clients will hit different revenue accounts in QBO or Xero and we would like Stripe to help break-out customers so that they can feed into these different accounts.
To satisfy Expensify's requirements should I be making expense accounts in Xero that have payments enabled and for cash back show it in expense claims?
Could anyone advise how we split the export so that it assigns transactions to PayFast and Bank correctly?
I have employees who are using Receipt Bank to submit receipts for expense claims.
In both my Xero and Stripe accounts, it shows they are connected.
au/The problem is that the above purport to be an “all in one” system, meaning that the clients will do their bookkeeping through a desktop based software without bank feeds.
Payments in as credits, transfer to Checking/Bank Fees as debits.
25 goes to checking via the bank rule.
When I publish from Receipt bank it  tells me that it has successfully published to Xero.
Although the bill does have the expenses itemised and added to the actual general ledger accounts.
iZettle transfers money each week collected from card payments, directly to our bank account.
From what I understand, StitchLabs will create a manual journal entry to update Inventory, COGS, and Purchases accounts once a month.
Zen creates a debit to our bank account for each employee but Zen support tells me that the integration with Xero creates a bill that has to be paid to enter the payroll transaction.
Having Xero and receipt bank using the same tax treatments would cut this step out and make the whole process a lot smoother.
I've tried workflow max, pro workflow, receipt bank, clerizon and tidy work to minimal success.
For example, I have put the year end date in for all company clients, so is there a way to automatically set up a job for annual accounts with a due date 9 months after the year end?
If I have to set up every single set of accounts, VAT return and payroll run as an individual job, I will do nothing else for the rest of my life!
First I have to approve the reciepts in Receipt Bank and then publish them to Xero.
I have taken a photo of a receipt and submitted it to receipt bank.
Does there exist any third party service that can receive bank CSV bank statements f. ex by email and that would transform whatever format they come in, into Xero.
I got lots of scripts of my own to convert bank statements, but these are local tools.
I then reconcile (match) the bank transactions (or credit card bank transactions) against those purchases.
I love about mint is when I import my bank statement mint categorizes mcdonalds as FOOD and my utility bills as UTILITY.
HiI have recently started using Receipt Bank for one of my clients.
That $10 is going to turn up in my bank reconciliation, with no outstanding sale to reconcile it against.
I am look at a lease management software, which as a feature has an accounting link allowing information to be exchanged (especially accounts payable).
For instance I want to correlate my receipts I store in shoeboxed with my bank ledger item that matches it.
Everytime I go to check the bank reconciliation against my bank statement the previous months get off and it is impossilbe to figure out why.
The bank reconciliation feature in Xero needs work and it is not very accountant friendly.
This incredibly poor level of response and service is completely unacceptable and if it isn't resolved soon we'll have to move all our accounts away from what initially appeared and functioned as a great solution for small businesses.
For many pages particularly the bank rec page, when a button is hit, the loading symbol comes up but the page never goes to the result you want.
We download the text file and manipulate the data in Excel to create management accounts.
HSBC is available for Bank Feed in HK and I will choose Partner Bank Feeds for my current account in Xero.
And of course whenever a bank account (incl cash etc) doesn't have a bank feed, the whole system falls over.
com/blog/bank-feed-status/In addition to being plastered over the Dashboard and Bank Accounts pages, it is preventing listing of Chart of Accounts and Assets, which seems incomprehensible to me, but is pretty bad timing, as I'm trying to generate reports for the end of the financial year, and have been unable to due to this error/problem.
I have had the dubious pleasure of contacting xero support a couple of times recently, once regarding bank feeds for The Co-operative bank and once for Santander today.
Really happy to have our accounts with this terrific system, backed up by an awesome team.
After a couple of days, technical support responded saying the transactions were not there and asked me to double check my bank statements because they were not there.
Switching to Xero with bank feeds and transaction detail from 1 June 16, however, some of the bank feeds have only started coming through from mid June and hoping to have it fixed to all appear.
csv file and then reimporting, any "0" at the beginning of their bank account details is either not exported or not imported resulting in an invalid bank account number.
Therefore all refunds artificially inflate the bank account balance.
- HSBC Bank Feeds not importing all the correct information (although to be fair this might be down to HSBC).
Linked up bank and imported my clients.
I have been asking you to fix the problems you have with bank feeds for weeks.
Now I cannot reconcile card payments at all until our bank statement arrives mid the following month because I have no idea who the supplier of these small amounts are!
I am informed by Xero support that I should perhaps create a new bank account in Xero, get direct bank feeds from our bank then archive our old bank account!
and yes our bank does offer direct bank feedsThis is IMHO a problem with Yodlee changing the info they feed through, therefore Xero should be talking to Yodlee and sorting it out.
I have the store feed, the bank feed, a Paypal feed and Braintree to reconcile.
billing@xero keeps asking me to contact my bank, but the problem isnt from them.
Transactions from the bank (Santander) start with FASTER PAYMENTS RECEIVED or BANK GIRO RECEIVED or similar.
Look if my bank or whatever has data fields that do not directly correspond to the fields available in XERO.
All that is needed is a bulk adjustment option, could be similar to the opening stock process, excel sheet , count and enter adjustment accounts , upload , boom!
Firstly, why are you monitoring our "secure" accountsSecondly, if you are monitoring our accounts why contradict yourselves and ask us to notify you of suspicious activity.
I have an Accounts employee,  an Administration employee, 2 x Stores/Order finalization employees,  a remote financial controller, an accountant and his assistant and myself as MD.
I'm pretty concerned that this is taking as long as it is on such a vital feature as bank feeds, and feel it's pretty unacceptable to be told that I'm going to have to wait so long for an update.
We've been using Quickbooks since 2006 and we've recently decided to take our accounts online - we purchased a subscription based on Xero's marketing and how amazing and innovative they are.
So even though I go to the trouble of entering a credit note (half a dozen now), there is no way to find them except trawling through the bank account transaction list.
To refresh the bank feed, open two more windows.
On the first, click Refresh Bank Feed, This window will now hang and cannot be used.
My bank is Lloyds and my credit card is AMEX (not niche providers!
Chase Bank (US) bank feed is incorrectly pulling in the Payee info into the Reference line of the app.
I see this as a material weakness in the internal controls related to bank information used to create batch payments.
This functionality is not fully integrated with "Bills", aka purchases/accounts payable and does not allow you to monitor unfulfilled amounts.
For one of our clients Amex Account, all the bank feeds were upto date till 31st of Jan and everything reconciled until 10th Jan.
The most ridiculous customer service experience i've had in a long while - And this coming from a customer desperate to be a client (even moved our corporate accounts to a supported bank), but its as if I am being tested how much i really want it!
Instead of having 'Payee' and a 'Reference' I now get a 'Reference' and a 'Description' with the words 'bank ref:' prepended.
As a result of this my automated Bank Rules no longer work as they relied on the 'Payee' information.
In the left side of the reconciliation screen, I see the fields from my bank statement which show transaction type, memo field and amount from my bank statement.
The bank statement has provided the following values -Date = 2013/10/10Unique Id = 2013101001Tran Type = DEBITCheque Number = Payee = "DEBIT"Memo = "NZD 40.
As an example, my bookkeeper (which happens to be my sister) was trying to reconcile accounts on Sunday 13/1/2013, and she advised the system was running so slow i. e. very slow or no response, that she had to shut down her web browser and re-start, and still running slow.
I am trying to set up the bank feeds for a UK credit card.
##### CLUSTER 7 #####
I am trying to allocate a payment to an invoice whilst using the iphone application.
82 which is payment for invoice #155 @ $66, #109 @ $66 and #124 @ $123.
So I have a big payment which corresponds to more than one invoice from different contacts.
We have received a payment from a customer in Canada for an invoice.
we have charged a customers credit card  twice on two separate days, the first charge was not received as a payment on the invoice.
2) Raise an Invoice3) Apply the pre-payment to the invoice.
Yet when I go into the P & L for October, click on an expense, click on the payment, it shows that that Invoice was paid in November and there is GST on it?
The invoice is still due and payment will be requested again.
So we create an invoice for £100 but the payment will actually be £99, for example.
I can reconcile my part payment against the invoice then am left with an outstanding amount still showed as owing.
I am trying to post two payment lines to a FX invoice .
We often begin projects by issuing an invoice for payment.
Previously my accountant would make an invoice for each payment.
We invoice on behalf of some of our clients and the payment goes directly to our customer (then they cut us a check for our portion).
I have an invoice for $5,000 and I received a payment of $2,500.
We don't go after the artists for payment, so an invoice seems unnecessary.
so my invoice payment is about 3% less than what is owed.
I have entered in one payment on the invoice of $330 which is for both the payments - is this correct?
I reconcile the invoice with the payment received from Stripe ($142.
Is there a way to send an invoice that provides two payment amount options.
I removed the payment and voided the invoice.
However if we don't record that the invoice has been paid (in stage 4) someone else might call the customer chasing payment.
If I put the single payment against one invoice obviously it creates an overpayment.
Possibly caused by the original invoice date being after the payment date?
Normally, looking at a purchase ("View Bill") where a part payment has been made shows the payments made (underneath the total), with an amount due that reflects the difference between the total of the invoice and the payments applied.
HelloHow to change the invoice status as paid once client make the payment.
(although small, my payment and invoice totals would be recorded incorrectly?
In such case, I would have to make the second invoice purely a tax payment to the tax office.
I can apply the payment against the invoice, but then I am left with a shortfall.
They invoice the individual customers for their monthly payments, and send us an aggregated payment each month, less their processing fees.
So I am about to receive payment for 1c less than the invoice amount.
Does anyone know how I can apply the payment made by credit card to an open invoice, when it has been deposited with other credit card payments as one?
I invoice over ten companies, all with different payment terms ranging from 7, 10,14  30and 60 days.
Am I best to go in and apply the whole payment taken (invoice amount plus cc surcharge) - which would then result in an over payment and then create an additional invoice that covers the surcharge amount and then apply it to have that one paid out in the system?
In the old days any payment was credited to the customer statement not to any specific invoice.
We create the invoice for $3,000, and post the down payment of $1,500.
Once their workshop is complete the Order is converted to an Invoice which I send out for final payment.
We find that often our clients and their bookkeepers will place a payment against an invoice if they know a customer has paid or that they have paid a supplier.
But that means the client will receive the invoice with an outstanding balance, even though they are expecting it to be paid already (because of their pre-payment on the 10th).
After paying a batch payment, I realised that an invoice had the wrong contact details.
I think once a quote is approve, it should turn into an invoice automatically for them to make the payment for it.
When on an invoice, and accept payment, it offers to email a receipt.
When a quotation for service works has been accepted - the work needs scheduling for a certain date - the work may take an hour a week or a month - it would be really useful to schedule in works and then create an invoice either before works commence or after works completed - perhaps having a deposit payment option.
I only realise the error when I check in the AWAITING PAYMENT or OVERDUE list, which can be 3-4 weeks after the invoice should have been sent, and I have to scroll through page by page to spot any entries that do not have the word "Sent" alongside them.
The invoice customisation field PaymentMessageAndUrl is working and displays the custom url to a payment service.
So the company logo is missing making it difficult for the recipient to identify who the invoice is from and most importantly there is no payment information.
When receiving payment for a large invoice recently, we ended up paying &#163;135 in Paypal fees.
Having the rep name populate on the quote and invoice would assist commission payment which is a "another topic"
So a tick box for direct debit would be very useful along side the payment plan date, this way the invoice amount would be included in my cash flow bar but when I do batch payments it could be easily excluded at a glance.
This means that in the reference column of the batch payment the invoice reference is required to manually added, doing this also updates the contact which means this process has to be completed every month otherwise you end up exporting payments with the previous months invoice reference as the payment reference.
I am constantly being told I didn't receive the email for Invoice payment.
Feature Request; Ability to schedule a planned payment date to a newly entered invoice bill.
The frustration is that when you approve a draft invoice, there is no option to go back to the draft box, so you first have to click on Bills again and then drafts, because it now defaults to Awaiting Payment.
In my opinion when customers see this on their invoice it urges them to make payment promptly.
Not a big deal, but it would be great to see clients invoice and payment details on the first page of the clients info card rather than the graph.
I have an invoice to the customer paying the payroll and a bill from the supplier that we pass the payment onto.
(shakes head in bewilderment)Record and reconcile a part payment on an invoice, bill or expense claimhttps://help.
In case your system strips the bolding, here they are:  This invoice was paid by way of a credit note on Feb 8th this year, and a payment of the remainder on March 6th this year.
When we receive the payment invoice/receipt, it firstly lists the details and proceeds of the sale.
I enter an invoice number for every single payment I make (otherwise it is impossible to track anything).
I have a world around, which involves me adding a future payment to the invoice.
Where we have added the online payment option onto an invoice it does NOT show the AMEX logo even though PayPal takes AMEX.
I am having to go into each one to see what is right and what payment got allocated to what invoice.
I also do not see a direct way to accept a credit card payment on an invoice when the customer calls in, besides going straight to Stripe.
I recently found an invoice that I believed had not been paid, and began to process the payment.
I don't know how to put double payment, as the invoice has been paid on first payment and where to put the refund of the invoice.
I got all member to put their membership number in the reference of their payment and have setup recurring invoice templates for each member.
Given either, I am baffled as to how a payment to CUST002 with reference XYZ gets matched to an invoice for CUST001 with reference ABC, and also why the payment from CUST001 with reference ABC is not even suggested as a possible match to the correct invoice.
The agent takes the booking and receives payment for the reservation direct from the guest, we then invoice the agent for the reservation minus the commission.
ie, at the top of the invoice, contact details should be email and phone first as the most important however the payment advice, by nature is posted and should have the postal address.
Once they receive full payment of the invoice I then get the remaining 20%.
Curious, I click on the link for each transaction and each shows as an unreconciled payment for one invoice.
i've put a payment on an invoice.
But since the invoice is already marked as paid I have nowhere to reconcile this payment.
Alot of our clients split invoice payment into 2-3 payments.
We didn't knowingly delete them and the transactions themselves seem to still exist (looking at a paid invoice, for example, where the payment is greyed out in the statement).
I have often come across the problem where an AP invoice is paid in a batch and for some reason or other the payment bounces back.
So am I correct in thinking that prepayments are for payments that have already been made and are not an invoice as such with payment terms (ie have a due date)?
I unreconciled the transaction but the invoice is still showing as paid on the date the payment was made.
Reduce Invoice - can be messy and lose detail of who made payment to3.
90 spent on my statement line - the original payment to TW▪	in find & match an invoice of &#163;298.
27 realised net loss on difference between invoice date/payment date▪	the fee of &#163;1.
Also, integration with a payment link on the invoice (such as Paypal/Stripe/eWAY, etc) would be very helpful.
When a customer pays an invoice via the online payment system he provides his name and card details.
•	Modify invoice, credit note, quotes and purchase orders templates to include your company logo, special conditions, additional payment options etc.
##### CLUSTER 8 #####
I can create an invoice, I just can't mark it as paid.
They've just sent a tax invoice that says 'Bronze compliment of a friend'.
Just creating my first invoice which is purely labour only.
As a sole trader, I normally just invoice a client for an amount plus GST and then take care of my own income tax.
This detail is required rather than just a singular invoice for their auditing purposes, and correct allocation of the expenses given I am a contractor to them.
I issued an invoice to a customer which was subsequently mostly paid, with just a couple of dollars left.
It is as if it just picks a random invoice with a matching amount.
Why can't I drill into a paid invoice and just hit a button "refund" and then enter details as to when the refund was made.
We regularly incurr expenses (not just personal expenses) for a Customer that we include in the next invoice.
Step6: raise an invoice for Customer A just $5000 exactly.
It just has a message saying to view the invoice in the pdf version and the total amount due.
Just trying to work out how to display an invoice due date.
It is frustrating to be asked when we press "print" if we want to mark the invoice as sent, because we have just sent it as an email.
It would be great if we could view the outstanding amounts per client, not just the full invoice values.
Those who are on track with their part payments shouldn't be sent reminders just because they still have money owing on the invoice.
Just a drop down on the top of the invoice that allows for us to set all the lines to another tax rate code would be very easy to implement and save us HOURS a day.
I just realised we can only set a email address for sending invoice, statement, and etc.
Would be really helpful, and save a lot of re-keying of entries if a Credit Note could be copied - just as the invoice can be.
A credit note is just as relevant as an invoice.
Take a look at Quickbooks they had this function 13 years ago when I started using it In Quickbooks, you just had to call up the Supplier and it automatically loaded the "LAST" processed Invoice for this Supplier, EVERY field was already pre-filled, no typing!
However, pressing 'Skip' leaves you on the screen of the invoice you have just entered.
I wind up just entering the original invoice as a Bill, and then leaving it 'unpaid'.
I have just turned on invoice reminders and setup 4 reminder settings.
I have just been asked to invoice a Client for an order which currently hasn't arrived into Australia yet.
I have customers saying they didnt get the credit off their invoice but they did it just doesnt show up as a credit note on the pdf.
I've just migrated from MYOB Essentials, which doesn't have a draft invoice option.
The tick box on the Invoice template just allows me to show our own VAT number, which looks confusing as it appears under the customers name.
I have the option to Import the complete invoice (complete with customer name & address) or just associate it to "website A / B / C etc.
However, I have just raised an invoice which turns out to have the same number as the last credit note I raised 5 days ago?
That works great when it's JUST a single transaction of a paid invoice imported that day.
A simple way is to just void the invoice we sent them and take up the credit.
Adding to this, I charge a booking fee for each performer I book, however this is just built into a single line item on a customer invoice, and not recorded separately.
I just want this to be a simple list - not reams of paper showing  a full invoice per page.
I've just converted my first quote to an invoice and encountered a couple of things that don't work for me.
##### CLUSTER 9 #####
Can it just be ''?
not just the $ figure shown?
We are getting a US based accountant set up to help but its taking a little while and I just wondered if anyone could give me some advise now?
Maybe I'm overthinking it, or maybe I just really screwed up, I honestly have no clue how to proceed.
And, just to clarify, I did read the guide about bill overpayments already.
Just click the link below.
Stripe just rolled out the option to accept payments using ACH.
Hii am just about to do my first VAT return.
I just can't get my head around reconciling it - I was wondering if anyone can point me in the right direction?
HiI have just moved from a bookeeper/accountant.
Is it assumed GST is included in the paid amount or is this just wishful thinking?
Im just not  sure how to best handle it though :)2.
Is it easier just to reset the organisation?
I've just come back from a video shoot - whilst there I bought water / hot drinks / food etc.
So for example say we have a total budget for the fund in question of £5000 to spend for the year on Events (this is just one of the budget headings) and £4000 of this should come from tracking category 1 and £1000 should come out of tracking category 2.
I just wanted to check something.
It just confuses things.
I really just want a SIMPLE system that accurately records all of this for income tax purposes.
I have tried to get it back from the customer, but they are just laughing at me.
Fist one, I find the issue, point it out straightaway, 2nd issue, I couldnt find anything after hours on computer, it took months for them to find the fault, they told me it is fixed and just tidy up my end it should be right.
In my current system it is treated as a "goodwill" asset, i just want to be sure that this is correct before adding in the balance.
I have submitted my tax return and just paid the tax due to HMRC.
I assume I should just scan receipts and create an expense for those startup costs.
Hello,I just started using Squareup after being subjected to 3 months of horror with "Paypal Here" what an abomination of a package that thing is.
I'm just wondering how to reconcile these?
We sign, scan, save - just nervous to shred!
We just want to be dealing with net cash in and out not the VAT paymnets.
Means, no cash movement, just an exchange on the liability side.
Just want to check that this is right.
Just wanted to check this was all good.
GoCardless/Directli have just amalgamated, which is a bonus.
Is it just a journal entry?
Hello, we've just registered for VAT.
Just GAAP and potentially IFRS.
Or should I just not worry, as the sum total is the same regardless?
not just the shirts in this situation).
It seems more sensible just to input a summary of activity on a weekly basis and although the paypal reports are a little confusing , I can figure this out I am sure.
Is it just a Direct Cost in Expenses?
I will be suggesting colleague just faxes the accommodation and authorises spend on our card in future.
It would be easy if I was just to enter the amount received or charged.
Was just wondering the best way to reconcile both transactions?
I was just looking for some advice on which Tax Codes to set up for a Solicitor working in Ireland.
Confusing - why not just create it in the liability area of Balance Sheet along with any loans?
Or can I just reconcile it on the right hand side under "create""WHO" Workshop"WHAT" 469 - rent and bills accountAnd just press ok?
Should I have just marked the purchases as tax exempt?
As these are probably quite different I just want to check?
In MYOB I would just calculate the GST amount and then the non GST amount would be calculated automatically as the balance as well?
I have just noticed that I have inputted my vehicle registration details incorrectly.
I thought I should just set it up as a mid-year conversion, and look back to the old system for the Jan-Apr data.
This just seemed wrong to me!
However, my Accountant has just started an audit and cannot remove the v. a. t. items from any of the reports he needs to generate.
I can't just not show it when I'm accepting bills.
I just purchased an investment property and so this will also have an impact on my personal tax liabilities.
but when i do one interstate which includes flights / hotels etc in the fixed price (say $14,000 fixed price but i have allowed for approx $2000 for my travel costs) then just recording the expenses against the codes is skewing my reporting.
But I don't think it is possible to reverse just a particular line in the JE or better yet, put multiple reversal dates on a compound JE.
I just want to make I'm reporting the correct type of tax deduction.
or will it just match out on my rec when it recognised the credit note?
My accountant has recommended that I just expense the inventory and take the deduction now.
I am wary of just using the "marking as reconciled" tool and moving onwards.
Currently I just generate a credit note for that client for their trial credit.
Or is it just considered an acceptable error since it is hopefully a rare situation?
Just a heads up on this pleaseIf I take a cash sum at markets at the weekend.
I just want to make sure I'm not missing some bigger conversion issue here.
The other system (Wave) really just functioned as a payroll calculator and didn't actually make payments for me, so I wound up doing transfers by hand (payroll is just to me and one contractor).
Note that as far as I would guess there should be no tax implications since it was just a movement of money back and forth.
We are planning a large change, and just curious to see how others might have tackled it.
I just wanted to ask about reconciling some items.
Just get back to me!
I have just had it running a day or so and initially I seem to have it working in a basic way, I have had to ask a few questions re support which so far I have had very fast and appropriate responses from.
Regards,AmanPS - I appreciate the tax treatment will be different,  but I just wanted to get the accounting journals sorted first.
They aren't on payroll, just professional fees.
It's been purchased, and I just want to make the quantity zero and put it all on Cost of Goods Sold.
HiI have just started selling using PayPal on my website.
Seems to me that if I do it the latter way, I'm paying VAT on income I'm just not getting with no opportunity to claim it back?
Am I missing something, or is that just how it is?
I Just want to see the cost of good sold on P&L.
I know that as an S-corp the profits will pass through to the shareholders (just me, in this case) and I'll be reporting that on my schedule K-1.
jpgIs there a way to fix or control this, or even just understand when and where and how rounding is applied?
Is it GST Free Income or GST Free Capital as it could just be seen as working capital?
I have just checked my P&L and can see that the refund has been counted twice and so is overstated.
25% just doesn't work which means that Excel will still have to be used.
I hope it wont be replacing the old P&L (as much as I dislike the date selection) because it is just too simplistic.
Hello,I just sold a motor vehicle, which was registered on the Fixed Assets register with the correct purchase date, amount and depreciation.
Is this the "InvoiceNumber" field, just called "Reference" here?
We've just done our estimate for the 2014-15 WorkCover premium and have the option of paying by direct debit (Sept to June).
It is a little messy just leaving them there.
( Or is it just good accounting to do so ?
Can I just do a one line manual journal entry to get it back up to the correct figure?
I am in credit with some of these suppliers how do i enter a credit note in is it just a negative figure I did try this however it told me i couldnt enter in a balance less than zero.
Excel is not limited by the number of columns of information so just include all data that relates to a transaction on one row including the underlying referencing and indexing.
Unless I just treat the additional refund as sundry income.
I have just paid my eBay fees and now have to reconcile that transaction.
Is there an easier way to transfer the images from receipts into the image library / inbox, or have I just got to manually transfer the data?
It is only saving a completely blank draft with none of the figures that we have just spent the last hour or so entering.
But that should be no problem, I just delete the lines from the statement, right?
£2,380 on a closing balance of just SDG 455 or when translated at closing rate £62.
I just sold a property (a house) for $300,000 that was one of my rental properties.
I just tried the Sell wizard, but I can't figure it out.
Example: Lets say there are 10 days labour required on a job, I just want to the quote to the client to say: Labour (10 Days) €1000, where as the break down of this might be 5 days for a carpenter @ €100 per day, 3 days for a plumber €110 per day and 2 days for an electrician @ €85 per day.
I have a small single person company and have just purchased a second hand vehicle ($10000).
There is also registration, insurance, etc on top but assume I can just put these down as motor vehicle expenses and claim using expense claim.
I have spent just few hours learning this interface.
Just was taking a look through all my reports to wrap up the year.
If the finance was available i'd just hand it over to an accountant but at this stage its just not a possibility.
I don't want to write over data that has just been reconciled.
I have a farm and contract pumping so a schedule f and c.  I know there is a tracking option I just want to set it up correctly so I get good number at the end of the year with out having to download to excel and categorize again.
Just looked through the guide for "Cash Refunds", and it's not helping me.
I think I know the answer is "no" - just clutching at straws and hoping some clever person has a solution.
Work as a freelancer and just starting to put all these things together.
And just mark said transaction as spend/receive money?
I just want to change the date of sale.
I was just wondering if there was a way to delete the demo company?
Just a nudge as I am not sure if I am correct or not.
Just reply with your details and I e-mail them through.
Would be great if Standard could include up to 3 employees, I think this would be a much better option than just 1 employee only for small businesses with payroll.
co. uk, thinking it would just change the log in and not the whole setup!
I have just stumbled upon a way of automatically entering recurring journals that I thought i would share with the group.
It is also just as important that we find out what it would balance with!
I just started printing checks and of course, they were wacky.
I do not care to be paid back anytime soon, just want it recorded so I can enter cost prices for the items into my inventory.
Just spins and says failed, no indication of what's wrong.
I've just imported details from PayPal and I have misassigned the fields on import.
Just wondering what I should have searched under?
I've read most people take cashback of the cost of assets, but there is no asset in this case, it was just services for the company formation.
Just stopped working in the last few days and not sure why.
I have just completed a project where my fee was agreed at outset to be a percentage of contractor's total build cost.
I just cant locate where the error is.
Owner/Driver who just needs to keep basic track of income and expenses.
Just about every tutorial shows invoicing with just one or two item lines.
I phoned the number I have had on my wall here since early 2013, 1800 22 55 93 (Australia) and there is a message that just says "We have decided not to take phone calls any more".
I just have some late payers.
So I just want to show the actual amount that is owed to me by the retailer.
Should I still worry about this or just start from 1 July 2015 onwards now?
Would I just do this using the 'receive money' function or some other way?
HiI have just spent many hours adding expenses from up to a year ago.
I just want the easiest option!
Your privacy and confidentiality would be fully protected, just as it is now.
Just get back to me!
May seem obvious but just want to check I am processing it correctly.
tried to find the answer but I'm afraid my search terms just not good enough.
Your help would be so much appreciated, please keep it really simple as I am just a learner & after searching on here for ages are finding everything but!
Just to give you an example of the power of the front page, let me talk about a recent client I worked with.
I've just hired my first contractor and found this helpful link (https://help.
We have a CSV file that if I import, it works just fine.
We have looked at NatWest's Guide -"Import file layout guide  CSV format" but quite frankly we just don't understand it.
(When I click on contacts it just shows me existing clients.
Not sure if I should just treat it as a manual credit card for reconciliation.
I create products in Unleashed, then just push them to Magento, which creates a store so I can sell the products there.
None of the "How to's" explain what I just have explained here.
It just sits on idle.
I've just used the default lines for PAYE and NIC.
When I try to type a product name it just accepts it as plain text, instead of initiating a search in my inventory.
This may be a simple question, but I'm just a beginner so go easy!
I don't know if we are supposed to set up a feed just for GBP payments.
It's just the country field that's wrong.
Having to manually total this stuff up each night and manually construct a journal entry is just making my life a bit more complicated, and I want my tools to make my life a bit LESS complicated.
Is it me or is this just not something that is important to other?
This would be very useful to have just in general and also for more investigatory work.
You see, if a parcel is just signed for, then the customer accepts the goods and the carrier can wash their hands.
Can I just change my organisation settings?
Again Harvest looks good for this puposes but a bit too expensive (normally we would only have 5 users but sometimes up ot 150 just for a few weeks).
We havent launched it to the public just yet but our initial customers are loving it.
It's just a bit trickier to find out about companies on the other side of the world so any suggestions or experiences much appreciated.
I just want to work out who has and hasn't paid.
If you are just writing on a blog w/o care for what your target is, you might as well be writing in a journal by your bedside.
Now I think I have just got my head around “Expense claims”.
Any chance you can make those other ones shorter to free up space to make the customer name more visible than just 15 characters?
Not so much the technical accounting side, but just your general processes.
Among these questions, I just have one to ask for now.
It's all just expense input.
I don't think you can do this easily at the moment, it should just be an option the same as create but select.
I have just started watching the videos ready for our move to XPM from 1st April.
For example can I just type 141172 instead of 14/11/1972
If you could have a button or short cut key which could just allocate the whole amount it would be much quicker.
This feature would be more helpful if it did NOT display contacts that have been archived or merged - just the current contacts.
This "employee" has not been setup as a Customer or Supplier - just as a Contact, purely because the system requires it.
My suggestion - can we just remove those hidden reports?
Can we just by default have all the categories unhidden so that all reports are displayed?
Maybe you have it and I just haven't found it yet.
This is not just a technical problem but a matter of workflow, control and visibility.
Besides that information is created for accounting  benefit, but is lost just as quickly.
It would be a major undertaking to set this all up again in Chrome just for this one function.
Ability to see all debits and credits on a contact in one place and not just a description of the activity.
I just had a Practice Review and the reviewer suggested that the cover page of my financial statements should contain the words "Unaudited - see Notice to Reader".
It would be just swell!
It just seems logical.
It just gives us confirmation/transparency that this step has been done.
I understand that marking a printed one as sent is necessary, but not when you have just emailed it out.
Of course as everyone asks - the cost price/ mark-up would be invaluableThis is a bunch of ideas - but basically it is just a request for greater functionality.
EVERY SINGLE ITEM IN THE INVENTORY WAS EXPORTED AND NOT JUST THE 35 ITEMS I HAD SELECTED.
When trying to enter multiple businesses in the current tax setup (be that company, trust or individual) this does not allow for a separate schedule but just extra rows.
I've setup a template of what I want but I'm just unable to apply it to anything.
It just seems to be an extra and unnecessary step.
I just archived a manual journal - thinking I was deleting it - but the transactions seem to still affect everything.
I have just lost my typing in the Description column.
I did not click over to the next column and just tried to save during my workings.
Just a quick window to say 'payslips sent' or ' summaries in queue' would be very helpful.
No alternatives are offered - its a simple "Sorry if you don't have mobile access you just have to miss out".
So it would be good to have a GST code that populates to G15 so that we can do a manual journal to adjust for private expenses rather than just typing an amount in the activity statement.
But this just doesn't work for customers that don't want their bookkeeper to have their user names and passwords.
I have been doing this successfully for a year with my file size getting to just below 1MB.
The problem is the guys at the top just aren't!
When inputting addresses, it'd be good if you could just put the post code in and then all the addresses on that street would automatically come up in a drop down that you just select the correct one from.
Instead of just saying they have been sent.
In my particular scenario a client continually backposts information, not just the odd transaction that would be easy to source, but multiple entries.
But I have a Tracking Category set up that only applies to expenses, not income, so there's no way to apply a filter to show just that category expenses without affecting income.
Just take my money!
This error message does not tell you what is wrong, just that something is wrong.
If the checks just printed alphabetically (optionally, with some other user-selected sort order such as earliest bill date), this would be fixed.
Doing both is just a pain in the butt.
North Canterbury is a big place not just Woodend and Rangiora.
I dont know why I haven't found the draft tab more useful, but personally I just seem to be always clicking to the ALL tab to find what I am looking for in there.
It's just a little thing but speeds things up.
It's only a small thing but it's the little things that make the work flow just that little bit easier.
My column widths have just shrunk, so I can no longer see the whole quote reference.
I just sent a quotation with a spreadsheet attachment but it also had my company profit margins on an adjoining sheet.
In AE we could choose if we wished for a schedule to integrate or not (keeping the schedule just not integrating it) - could this be done also in XPM?
I can just email it to my accountant without having to pass on all the details to him.
Just disconnect stock tracking and invoicing.
I just want an easy - but secure - life!
Whereas I am just changing the date of the bill.
Not just graphs but designed to communicate clearly the state of things.
It would be much better if the leave section sorted by year first, not just by date.
It would just reduce the number of clicks between switching between items.
It would be great if at the very least, any of the drop downs for selecting number of months can allow for any number of months from at least 1 - 12 (or ideally more), maybe even just a text entry field.
Also would prefer the email itself to be added as a document and not just text.
I know that we could just "swap" the positions however this creates problems as only the primary contact is shown on the supplier list and contact summary card.
(Currently it just shows the full contact list)
It just make sense to save in DB the contacts created through the POs "Ship To" field.
I have just exhausted my 10 votes, didn't know I had a limit til then.
Should only have to select the customer once and just change the search criteria.
Although we encourage clients to sign in, most want their accountants to do all the work and just send them a summary of transactions.
Why cant I just have a save and print as quotation button?
I do not know what the reason is for limiting library files to certain types, but given that there is a very simple(just an annoying) workaround for it, any desired effect the extension check was supposed to have will not come into play anyway.
Just the type of work that we do.
Just wondering if anything is in the pipeline?
It would be great to assign User Access to the Payroll administration at any level, and not just at Standard User level.
It just shows as 'system generated'.
At the moment you fill in the first few items, type in the total, put the Item code & then the tab goes straight to sub total & then you have to physically go back to the Unit price to enter the price, it just doesn't seem logical.
It would be even more awesome to have it link it to my courier's tracking info but I suspect that's just asking too much!
I am wondering why we cannot just select the "State" as whole in smart lists?
sometimes just 25mins apart and often 4 or 5 times a day.
Why doesn't it just list suppliers?
I feel this is just a really bad change and it slows things down and is not useful at all as far as I can see.
But now we have to either set up a different quote for each tenderer or just keep revising.
Be great to just have "Using MOSS" option and all countries and appropriate vat bands appear in the options.
Just my pet gripe at the mo'
However, I have run into an anomaly, and I am not sure if it is a bug or just an error on my part.
I still want them to be linked to transactions - but just deactivate them so I can no longer choose or allocate them.
It would probably be easiest if the colours/tones were just changed.
At the moment we have to book an overpayment for every month, and there is no ability to copy that overpayment, so you just have to sit there and do 12 of them even though they're all the same with one month between them!
But it would be even more useful if I could allow some users access to just the Inventory Control, without them having full access to the financials.
My preference would be just the Memo and total.
Just a thought for tracking whys and wherefores
I can't recall if this problem was in Spend Money, Receive Money (which both appear to behave now), More Details in Reconcile, or somewhere else that I can't find and replicate just at the minute.
Most tax softwares are linked to general ledgers so it is very hard to get just a tax return software solution.
All the information is within the software, so it is just a matter of constructing the reportThanks in advance
I'm sure this wouldn't be a priority, but I just wanted to throw it out there as a "some day" request.
The PDF view is fine, as is the edit page, but I don't want to have to load either of those just to double-check a single line at a glance.
Now, we have just had an instance where.
These are just products so they all have the same tax settings.
It would be really helpful if you could set reports to print on one page or change the margins, there are numerous occasions when printing management reports and the balance sheet is on two pages, but it is just the last one or two lines on the second page!
bit of a pain just to produce a delivery note!
I assume it is as simple as just creating a link.
I have just had a client who has literally destroyed their file!
Can the option be made available or an added feature so we can have this additional footer available just on those specific pages.
The rest of the reporting is great just the customisation of how I want my reports to be presented is not available to me and this I believe is a very important function of the Financial Reports.
Just more flexibility with billing customers and dealing with suppliers terms & conditions.
Just having the value selected by default would be a huge productivity boost.
What I just described is pretty straight forward with two currencies, but obviously gets really complex if there's a third or more!
Just vote and lets see how many of us are interested.
I just spent all day creating and tweaking a .
When viewing reports it constantly bothers me that I have to re enter dates after refreshing or changing reports when I am just looking at a balance date etc.
If you agree don't vote but just reply +1!
So all I did, was to call up the transaction for this supplier and I just had to change the date and amount and I was done !
I know there are ways to work around this manually - but this would put just too much workload on our accounting.
Because some things you just don't want to wonder about.
And sometimes they're just not paid very quickly.
The system should search by the first letter of all the words in the name, not just the first one.
They just see top line and total amount.
to be totally portable i have just started using an ipad for data entry and payroll however my stumbling block is ipad doesn't do ABA files.
However, to get meaningful trends, it needs to compare more than just the previous month to determine the true direction of the trend.
I have asked repeatedly, and been fobbed off just as repeatedly, so here it is for all to see and comment on.
It is just far too easy to mistakenly delete a statement line from the reconciliation screen.
And ability to then click and edit a single transaction (just in case it was incorrectly categorised and should not have been part of the G11 total)
However it just needs a few minor tweaks to make it completely useful:1.
It would just keep everything streamlined.
Give employees the option to include detailed narrations on their timesheet, instead of just recording hours worked.
it just would make it easier to then cross reference against rosters and things in the workplace.
At the moment you can't remove any items so it just continues to sit in the list.
I am just wondering when a leave request is submitted, whether there can be an option to just Approve the leave, and not schedule it as well?
I have just had my first SMSF Audit done.
just want to make it look simpler and nicerThanks
If it's about spoiling leave accruals, then surely that's just a case of having a tick box to disallow leave accrual on items that are of type Ordinary Hours.
Surely we could have the option of using just one or both Tracking categories in Timesheets?
We have just competed our first RTI submission - hence the bombardment of comments!
Please let me know if you find these queries are system related or have I just not set something up https://community.
Just migrated over and am trying to find an option to upload our company logo to display on the payslips.
IE;- What EMPLOYER details are being sent- What EMPLOYEE details are being sentCurrently we have no idea, and are just adhoc submitting it.
Just wondering as it would make things simple.
Public Holidays do not show up on the payslip (or anywhere else for that matter other than the Payroll Settings and Employee Settings), it appears to just get paid as normal ordinary hours on the payslip.
Just to tweak them so they look a bit better.
My suggestion is to allow payroll setup by any employee in the accounting firm rather than just subscriber.
Just a couple of small things that would make setting up employees easier in the payroll section.
It is very inefficient to have to log in and out in different browsers just to get things to work.
I have to go back to the discussion thread and tell my client to look out for the separate email I have just sent.
So for example say we have a total budget for the fund in question of &#163;5000 to spend for the year on Events (this is just one of the budget headings) and &#163;4000 of this should come from tracking category 1 and &#163;1000 should come out of tracking category 2.
It really should just be a neutral exercise.
Very strange, could the cloud that my information was saved in just evaporated in the last gust of wind?
It would be EXTREMELY helpful if the monthly period from date was 1 to 12 and not just 1, 2, 3, 6 and 12.
It would be great to alter the date of this transaction or even just delete/rewind it - but I can't seem to find any way that is possible - hoping I'm just looking in the wrong place.
The HTML is still there in the page, it just doesn't show up and even if I manually display it, the button doesn't do anything.
HelloI've got a strange problem which I've only just noticed with my Cost of Goods Sold.
If it's permanently broken then tell us, don't just ignore the issue.
This usually happens instantaneously, and it's just stopped working for me - I take a picture and it's not uploading the entry at all.
HiI've just had to manually post two quarterly VAT returns with the HMRC in one hit, so one for the last 6 months.
Have just noticed that the INV PDF is attached to each email sent to customers.
Just FYI, it did used to work :o)
I have just done my first bulk mail-out to clients.
I've also tried switching web browsers just to see if that made a difference.
The other option I can see is just to set up 3 independent companies on separate subscriptions and have companies 1, 2 and 3 and manage it that way but for simplicity’s sake I wondered if that above would work given most of our inter-company trading is mostly coming to / from the one parent company
Is this just us or are more experiencing the same?
I am not a bookeeper, just do the basics for our small company so simple language appreciated!
It opens just great in Excel.
We started a school this summer and our first students began just over a month ago.
I just want to get rid of them all so i can then do a manual CSV import for the last 9 months.
Can I just check that my understanding is right?
)I have just downloaded the latest version of this app accounting fron the App store and this makes no difference, is anyone else having this problem?
This item is tracked, ideally I just want to delete it and start again.
Please advise if it is and I just havent located itRegardsDan
It's been definitely a steep learning curve from just using spreadsheets.
HelloI have just tried my first upload of a .
Pressing find and match and it just sits there with the circle spinning.
Before that date, I can download PDF's of the statements, but nothing that I can just automatically import.
transactions on days after that have come through and are all fully reconciled , just everything that happened on 13th July haven't appeared.
But that is just this supplier, which is a complicated one.
Was just wondering if this is a feed error or something else?
I'm just wanting to clarify that Payroll transactions will be ignored too.
Does Excel change some unseen formatting or is it just a bug?
Is it possible to upload inventory items which don't change the description just the product name?
With thousands and thousands of customers (most of the stuff sold is just cheap small transaction novelty items).
Could some really solve problem, it is not just reply automate computer answer?
It just seems quite a big gulf between these two options.
I am not sure if this just frustrates me as i was a previous MYOB user and that was one of the features i  liked about it, Possibly the only feature.
We couldn't even log out, we just had to restart our browser.
They were never applied to purchases as they just put the purchases through at the reduced amount.
Just want to get a handle on slow server times or service unable issues occurring of late in NZ.
This is just making it difficult to go back through the transactions and check for errors or to try to find certain transactions.
This company is just separately invoiced for the goods it sells.
Is it just through MasterCard?
However ( just to be devilish !
It would be good if you could just enter as 010216 instead of 01/02/16.
Just want to ensure all transactions are reconciled at the end of the month.
Just wanted to make sure reallyThanks
Whenever I go into contacts it just says:"Uh Oh.
I don't want to import just balances.
not just the 3/6/12/24 options?
Since I can't find it, and it appears in several different places on different pages with exactly the same instructions, has it been removed, moved or is it just invisible.
Can I just delete a line now and what do I do to avoid this in future?
I understand this but just wanted to check that If I should classify all monies received as 425?
There is a rule set up so when I reconcile Paypal I can just click 'OK' there are also some customers, some repeating customers who seem to be set up as a rule because of their email address.
I just want to be make sure so that reporting would be correct also.
I'm just curious as to why it's not appearing in the drop down menu.
Sorry for the stupid question, I'm sure it's very basic, but unfortunately I just can't get it working for some reason.
I don't want to recommend a product just because it is the "cool kid on the block".
But that's just a guess.
But when I go into Cash Coding those items are presented as though I have never reconciled them before, just waiting for me to cash code again?
Previously the Asset Type field was meaningless - no one knew what it was for, so we'd just enter whatever information into it.
I've just started using the PayPal feed.
I've often just added this to expense claims on an excel spread sheet.
We are just starting (31/08/2015) to operate this system so any comments and assistance the earlier the better.
No inventory was recorded against it, it was just a total amount.
I changed the description text to see if it was just the first condition field that wasn't saving and it did update the description text and the name of the rule so it must just be those top conditions that aren't saving.
I just want the customer to get the total cost at the bottom of the quote.
It would also be nice to just show quantity of each item, but not price.
We run a primarily wholesale operation in which clients will usually just give us a credit card over the phone and we run it through a virtual terminal (using Authorize.
This is 2 part query:Part 1: We're a limited company and have just sold some old equipment on eBay.
This means that unless you create the spend money first, you have to lose all the matching you have just done to then create the spend money and tick it all off again.
Freshbooks has it (for a fee), but they are just an invoicing platform.
We have just switched over to receiving monies through trybooking.
Or is that $500 just lost in the system now?
It's at the point where its just becoming too hard to manage.
Basically one would have to have an idea of who, what, when, which, how before one can proceed to go through all the reports, instead of just typing in the who, then the rest will show up.
At the moment I just added it as free text under the text box field "terms and payments" - is there a better or more appropriate spot for it?
It may be that the feature is already available, and that I just haven't 'switched it on'.
Just click email updates below to stay in the loop.
Something I just discovered for OSX/Mac users:  Alfred (www.
Do I just ignore this quarter and move onto the next?
My GST is 100% correct and does reconcile - just it is annoying that it says unfiled.
I seem to recall that when we signed up there was a 25% discount for company No 2, just not sure how to setup a second company or how to apply this discount.
It just sits there after asking for my Card Reader authentication and never refreshes.
It's just annoying that it appears and I wanted to know why and if I might be doing something wrong.
I just downloaded the iPhone app and it shows "setup in progress" - why ?
I have just imported my contacts and have a couple of comments & questions:First, I imported my customers & they were in the "All" category.
It's just a minor things that's been bugging me a lot!
I just get the spinning wheel of doom.
But my staff, who mostly just have payroll employee access, aren't so interested and can be confused by these emails.
We have just realised that when sending statements to clients, there is no comment being automatically recorded to say this has been sent.
ATM they are just sitting there and redundant.
I have only just paid and started using it today so not sure if it is something I have done wrong, but unlikely.
Just a quick question.
Just trying to figure out the most efficient way to do this.
Just a tip which probably most people know, but worth reiterating.
When you want to navigate to another area, just hold your CTRL key down on your keyboard as you click, and you'll find another window opens.
We have one employee, and his leave was accruing normally until just recently.
I've check against other employees and it's fine, it's just wrong for this single employee.
Does anyone know how to get these payroll expenses to recognise the tracking category or is this just not possible within this particular set-up?
I just cannot find the setting anywhere.
the funds just weren't transferred.
They accrue just over 1 hour of public holidays a week.
They have just paid themselves but not issued payslips etc.
Just been doing payroll and employees tax category is tax free threshold.
Hello,I'm just about to role out the XeroMe app to our staff so that they can easily view and store their payslips and ultimately to apply for leave.
I have just started doing the company books.
I just realized that the rate of the levy decreased in July to 2.
every other menu and page works just those under payroll are affected.
The issue is their leave needs to be calculated monthly Based on Ordinary Earnings for the month and not just 152 hours / 12 months.
We have just recently switched from offering leave loading as part of employees total packages to being paid upon taking annual leave.
We just currently hired an apprentice.
It just comes up with "Fund Pending".
Why can't you just create the templates and then update them instead of having to create a timesheet, then upload the template then save that, then deal with the timesheet you've had to create etc.
I have just realised that one employee's super has not been automatically generated in the Payslips.
I have rcvd payslip from one of my employees where they have selected just casual loading hours (which is the correct final dollar value and hours worked @ 25% loading rate) - however, the base hourly rate of $20.
An employee has just shown me her payslip as at 30 June, which shows an amount of $266 under PAYG for HELP.
com/app/answers/detail/a_id/9281/~/employee-purchases-and-gst) (less the Vend part) that I think creates what I am after I'm just hoping it is available in XeroRegards,Daniel
It must be there I'm just looking in the wrong area.
Or is it just automatic after summaries done?
Just want to make sure that everything would be processed correctly.
Unless it is capable of doing this and I just haven't seen it.
However, we do not want to give them full payroll access, just the ability to enter timesheets for other workers.
I just can't figure it out!
I have just run the fortnightly pays and noticed (after the pays have been processed! )
Have an employee that has worked just 3h pw since July 1 2014.
Just hoping someone can help me out with a problem here.
I'm a fully qualified accountant who just happens to also be doing a payrun each week for one of my clients.
I just want to remove it as a selectable item
------But it just doesn't work.
I'm not sure if I will just simply adjust the the wage, or adjust the wage and also the payg?
Just curious why you have made email address a required field for automatic super payments?
25% but is calculated at just over 7% instead.
My bookkeeper had no idea how to set payroll up so for the last reporting period she just did the payroll in MYOB and manually created the BAS statement with pen and paper.
I have just processed a payrun for a staff who has a SFSS and HELP tax component however neither of them actually accrued any tax.
Have we just not set it up right or is this a missing feature?
I have just gone to run a payroll and all my payroll data is missing and I am being prompted to setup payroll from scratch.
My goal is to set this up so it is tracked and reported correctly, and I just don't have enough knowledge in accounting to truly understand what needs to happen.
Is this a "feature" or just a problem with my data?
Thereafter I cut an employee paycheck and I accidentally used the wrong period, so I think I may have created a paycheck for a period where the taxes had already just been submitted.
For instance, it still is giving us reminders to file quarterly payroll taxes (something that Gusto just does automatically without manual intervention, FYI).
I just want to clarify if I'm right in my findings.
I have tried to contact support and they just seem to blow me off without helping in the slightest.
Now, I just want to delete the old paycheck.
Is there a way to just enter hours and generate a paycheck?
Unless I'm just not finding it, it seems there is no way to automatically create a bill for a 401k liability created during payroll.
it's just stuck in pending.
I've just set up pensions for our firm, luckily we have very few employees to process.
Approve Timesheets - Painfully slow as if someone was on holiday it's not shown, so there's just a blank against that day and I have to work out if they were on holiday/sick etc.
I don't want to hold them all up just because a few people haven't completed their timesheets.
I have just filed my first month of AE and all eligible staff have uploaded directly to TPP with no problems.
Today I tried changing and then instantly triggering a payrun but it just showed the same two lots of his regular hours at the old rate.
Clicking this takes me back to the PensionSync page, then I just go round in circles.
Have I got it right that I just put in the references and govt gateway passcodes that I have and will eventually be active, and then just run the payroll.
Is it some sort of technical bug I can't fix by myself, or am I just missing something obvious?
The address tab just as "go to this address".
I have just checked 2016/2017 P60's to make sure they are correct and for some reason it has included employees who's employment ended in 2015/2016 - Does anyone know if there Is anyway of stopping this ?
There were no apologies just fatuous forum fairy platitudes of "we are working on it" or "have you tried this great work around"Now I get an email to tell me that my 2 years is up and they want to charge me &#163;5 + &#163;1 per employeeWhat a slap in the face when I am already paying for premiumI am feeling mugged again by XeroTime to move to QuickBooks
48Instead of showing just one amount of &#163;1,430.
I just had to re-run 10 months of payroll for something that I feel could easily be fixed so felt it was only right to explain it so that some other poor soul might find it before ending up in my position.
5 hours in 1 day but want to just book off half a day, could they request 4.
but just wondering what would you do if you had to split the cost by department.
I have just logged in to our Government Gateway site and noticed that the PAYE liability they are expecting is greater than that shown on my P32.
No problem I thought, just do it again and it cancels out the old one.
I'm now thinking of just sticking with HMRC basic tools, as I know this works.
It's really simple - just one employee.
i just want the old system back!
Considering MyPAYE is &#163;1 per month and, ok looks ugly, but just plain works this is a real let down.
I have an employee who has just gone over her anniversary date.
Our employee has been working for us for just over a year now.
Is there any way to fix this or should I just not be using payroll for W/T contractors?
It seems to take forever to approve, and more often it doesn't, just finally comes up with a message "are you still there"!
I'm just wondering if I have to bite the bullet and change it over, or if I can keep with what I am used to.
Have just looked at the profit and loss, and the payrun's are sitting in unallocated.
and not just the 3 days since the anniversary date.
I have just run all  April payruns for our small weekly payrun of 3 staff.
The system takes just a minute to get you started.
Just wondering if there are other law firms or accountants who are using Chrometa in NZ.
Eventually they may consider using an inventory management system, but until the shop is operational and it is known how well it is going, they will just manual manage inventory.
Ive tried deleting the app and reinstalling and that doesn't work, it just sets up with old settings.
I'm just trying to work out what advantage it will give me.
Sorry if this is simple, but I can't seem to find a mention of this, and I'm too nervous just to 'try and see' in case it causes a whole load of work trying to undo everything.
They currently process their payroll totally separate to the entities and just jnl into the separate files.
I'm just starting to reconcile after adding Kounta integration, and am not sure how to handle cash purchases made from the cash register.
I then want another email saying only 3 months left till expiry and then again when just 1 month left to expiry.
Some I just want paid by EFT or whatever.
I've just migrated from QB Online and set up Stitch Labs for inventory tracking.
33 which doesn’t show anywhere it just is?
We are looking just the capability to ship out and not much about the complicated inventory management.
We just want to know that we're making a descent margin/profit on the work provided.
It just isn't very "seamless".
I have a client enquiring about it so just wanted to get some more info before going back to him.
I have just had an inquiry from a child care center.
It seems to work with AP just not sure how to make it work with payroll.
My payroll is basic as it is just me.
I just hate stressing over this stuff each quarter since I run my books myself.
)Basically Netfira Shop is an online store that can be used standalone or "plonked" into just about any existing web site by copying a single line of code.
There may be one overall project, but you don't want everyone on the overall project - just sub sections of the job.
At first it will just be me, maybe one other engineer and one drafter.
Today it just stopped working.
No workarounds - but just works in multi-currency.
We just wanted a clarification on the bill for the monthly subscription, whether it has been double billed and double paid.
I just cancelled my subscription and it said I'd have a month (the notice period) to get all my data off the system before it completely disappeared but it vanished straight away.
it's just one more way to lose the trust and respect of your customers
Bellow is my last communication with the "Beautiful Accounting Software" team:-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------Hello,If there is no timeline, then it is the same as saying that nobody is really working on it, and you are just trying to get me to stop contacting you.
It's nothing personal - but I just want the darn things working!
Surely a filter can be used here just to show correct contacts, In general, just from the first few minutes, its clear a lot of work and UAT is needed.
I just spent 15 minutes searching for how I would contact support, something that should take 1-2 minutes max.
Is it just me or does anybody else have this problem?
My best friend lives in NZ :-)  But, it just isn't to be for me.
They just want their overall balance to be correct.
They just sit on emails for problems they can't solve because, hey who cares right?
Ive just been entering my receipts for the last tax year.
It's just carzy.
I just wanted to say thank you for the great customer service.
I was sold this program on the basis that it was mobile and worked great on a tablet well that was just BULL @#$%^.
I have found a bookkeeper, but she is 3 hours away, which seems just mad.
Reluctantly I am beginning to wonder whether I may just be ready for that change!
Initially I thought it would just be a connection error and it would sort it self out within a few days as I hadn't changed anything on my end.
if the system has something wrong with it, you roll it back, not just persevere with it until you 'fix' it later on.
It does seem to be entered but just not displayed correctly.
This just happened after my first 2 hours of using your software:"SSL connection errorHide detailsUnable to make a secure connection to the server.
We can see that the RAM used by the IE process is getting over 1GB, then it reaches a tipping point and just crashes.
Just search for Bills Credit Notes and if any of either occur, then display the link.
Just curious if there's a roadmap for a FRESH, web 2.
When typing a name, i just takes too long to catch up.
If you feel that 10 is just enough, or not even close, let us know here!
I've tested all my transaction using just the help centre and not needed any other support.
No it is not something to do just with my phone.
- Typing a name should search names containing the search term, not just those starting with it.
Just making the change to search names containing the search term would be so quick and easy to implement.
I've just wasted a day trying to get the feeds working, and although connected, it's not an ideal customer experience.
It's just a superior product, in my opinion.
If I go to the 'File' page I can drag & drop with no issues, it just seems to be on individual transactions.
I just went to setup another 2 companies we've branched off to find now I only get 15% discount.
These are just a few of the things we would be using immediately!
I just want the damn systems to work properly!
I am downright unhappy about the change in accounting terminology that was just released.
Just read feature requests to get an idea of it's lacking features in more specific detail.
Some mention roadmaps, which would be great but compromise your "first to market" strategy, some just complain etc.
In my opinion, if you could provide just half the reports that Quickbooks has, you will sort out 80% of the problems.
##### CLUSTER 10 #####
It'd be great to be able to give clients access to Payroll reports and not full payroll function
Once we reach september I will be able to audit Sept-Nov. My VAT quarters are Jan - March, April - June, July - Sept, Oct - DecSo it is out of sync by 1 monthDoes anyone know how I can change this?
Since we are invoicing weekly, we are never able to provide clients with an up-to-date statement.
If I was able upload a blank version of the separate spreadsheet I'm using to keep track of budget vs actual it would probably make more sense.
I've played with editing my dashboard, but all I seem able to do is remove panels.
I'd love to be able to follow all of that in my Balance Sheet but I really don't know how to code all of this.
Will I be able to port or push another PO in Xero from TG?
I am able to open a paid bill for editing, and able to change the tracking category.
It would also be good to be able to adjust the amount due to penny differences.
Ok, here's the issue i can't get my head around and was hoping someone might be able to help.
Xero should be able to figure out these are different, but it doesn't.
I can see it under subscriptions and billing and I have updated the billing details, but don't seem to be able to make it live again.
If I wait will Xero be able to deal with the fact I've backdated the request to change.
but i was not able to do the transfer within xero because the FD was set as a CA.
Is anyone able to suggest the best way to do this?
This will allow me to keep an eye on my debt ratios, for example, and so I would expect to be able to do some appropriate reporting/analysis off the back of it.
Doesn't seem too complicated but I haven't been able to figure it out.
3) The satellite offices will not be able to view other offices accounts4) The head office is able to email all the prospects and clients from all the satellite offices.
Am I able to Unpublish it?
It would be great to be able to get a feed from them.
My background is not accounting but I have been sucked into it but wish to delegate more responsibility to our finance and admin person and I hope that you can be able to provide some advise to make this happen.
Someone with experience in these systems i have mentioned above might be able to assist with my questions below.
I have not been able to find a way to import all the disbursements into a bill format, only to create it manually.
I would be most grateful to anyone who has gone through this process successfully and who would be able to provide fine details on how it's done.
There doesn't seem to be a feature to be able to download a statement in anything other than a PDF format!
Using this option would enable us to email returns to customers to sign without running into issue of not being able to email tax file numbers, but if we do that we will then receive back a signed copy without a TFN on it - If we then lodge this with the ATO and they decide to audit, will this be an issue (the lack of TFN)?
I figure if I understand how it comes up with it I may be able to tweak some things.
When all is said and done I plan on invoicing the customer and referencing these transactions, and then (I assume) Xero would be able to figure out the gross profit of the overall transaction.
However, I am not able to find help on this subject in Xero.
Clearly we want to be able to differentiate between the two types.
Rent for example is received per quarter we are able to book the rent as costs and then apply a period.
I hope someone might be able to help me out.
Am I able to claim this Importation GST?
I want to be able to calculate the value of my stock on hand at the beginning of each month to be able to show this on my balance sheet.
We want to be able to show the facility plus when amounts are falling due.
I've looked through the documentation a I haven't been able to find anything on it.
I have tried creating a QIF export of data from Quicken, but when I try to import it into Xero, I get the following error:  "The statement was either empty, only contained $0 lines, or has already been imported"There do not appear to be any other options to export data out of this version of Quicken, anyone have ideas for how we might be able to get that data imported?
It would be good to be able to merge tracking categories.
Being able to enter an operating expenses without needing to enter units and price per unit, since it only applies to Inventory Items.
I would have thought this is a basic reporting requirement for management, to be able to see a number of months beside each other for comparison.
Hey everyone,Hoping an accountant might be able to help me with this one.
I hope someone might be able to help.
As in, what category does it fall under - but also perhaps for reporting purposes I want to be able to see how much has been spent on said meetings?
I don't seem to be able to answer the question "Who has/hasn't paid their fees for X? "
I am in the process of setting up so I want to make sure that I get the right software to be able to manage & track lay-bys.
is anyone able to recommend a good accountant (central auckland) to give breif advice regarding setting up loan repayments, and FBT in xero?
- how will xero hold my data historically - ie in 2016 will i be able to access 2012 transactions.
Cash flow was a little better the months after so we were able to repay the funds to me within a couple of months (by the end of June 2011).
It’s a Yodlee feed with MFA…So how do we get the second person to be able to refresh the feed… When we try this in xero it still wants the first persons authentication.
Would you please be able to assist?
I read over some of the documentation but I wasn't able to get a definitive answer.
They should not - I will not be able to reclaim this VAT since I will never be registered for the period.
The only thing I've been able to do is go into the expense item, detach the receipt from it and save it to the file library.
I have tried numerous reports to be able to obtain the figures needed but to no avail.
I don't seem to be able to do this even though it seems to be so simple it's only allowing me to include GST as an original sale which would be incorrect.
are there any small businesses using Xero which would be able to give me some advise on tax reporting for the US (Utah state).
- however I was not able to type that symbol in this post.
All of our monies/items received are subscriptions, donations or gifts, raffles etc, however are we able to get a refund on GST paid?
I don't seem to be able to find an option the equally distribute the discount amongst the items.
I was able to reconciled it with the ATO statements.
Then I must attach the File Attachment then (because I won't be able to in the Reconcile page.
In the past we've shown clients the demo company and sold it to them, but more and more people want to be able to have a play on the software before they go ahead with the subscription.
Or we should be able to view the records of the old subscription up to 7 years.
We used to this on myob and was able to track if costs/price units were changing and it would get mixed up with our inventory prices (our buy price and the clients buy price).
Am I able to go back to the point where everyting last balanced.
They want to be able to identify they bought black dress size 12 from Supplier A and sold black dress size 12 to Wholesale Customer Z.
Hey everyone, I can't seem to find the answer I am looking for and hope someone may be able to shed some light or perhaps have another solution that works for them?
We sell outdoor furniture and was wondering if there is a way to be able to print a delivery receipt which then needs to get signed by the customer receiving the goods.
It would be useful to be able to remove payroll admin users from being listed in the leave approvers.
Would it be possible to be able to print the GST Return per Tracking code.
Xero should be able to calculate the correct PAYG instalment amount and timing based on the tax return data and PAYG instalments paid to date.
I would love to be able to retain that email wording with that clients history for the return sending/signing etc so it can be referred to later on.
Essentially the details entered in the mobile app should be able to be viewed/printed in detail from Xero.
We should also be able to see the lock date in Xero HQ for each client.
it would also be awesome to be able to print these lists
Of course they should only be able to see their own bills.
It would be great to be able to assign emails directly to open jobs within WorkflowMax / XPM via a gadget installed within Gmail or on your PC for desktop outlook users.
It would be good to be able to have codes (eg entertainment or motor vehicle expenses) with an alert or an instant split to a designated non deductible code.
It would be helpful to be able to see which transactions have been reconciled when running reports.
Is it possible to be able to delete a Staff Member and this automatically removes that staff members having access to the files they have been allocated to.
They will then be able to view private company information such as staff base rates etc.
It would be great if the Practice Admin log in was able to have Accountants User Permissions so this controlled which clients Xero the staff in the practice could access.
Debtor and Creditor clerks are not able to work at optimum levels.
HOWEVER, we then noticed that the financial history for this employee was being collated in the Contacts area - as plain as day for any Xero user to be able to see.
I believe the feature roll-out would be to allow reports to show which entries are tied to a billable expense and be able to filter to the reports with the billable expense tag.
Currently Xero users are only able to download reports and workings to Excel, PDF and Google Sheets.
For many reports it would be great to be able to select a "Date Range" of "Today" rather than going to "Select Date Range" and having to alter the dates to suit.
It would be so easy to be able to upload a CSV file using a Xero-determined template.
However, that information is not made available to be able to be looked at unless that transaction is opened.
In other software's you are able to choose between left or right to view the same reporting information on the next period range.
It would therefore be great to be able to tag a user in the note that then appears in their Xero inbox / notifications.
We are no longer able to see the TFN on the client record.
I should be able to create a rule to auto-reconcile this into a "Receive money" into income of $90 and a "Spend money" to expenses of $1.
It would be great to be able to publish or export reports and have them marked with a stamp that says "DRAFT Not to be circulated" or something to that effect.
It would be nice if I was able to print a contacts details.
You are able to import them but not export them.
Once you have made the changes in excel, able to import back into xero without warning of id needs to be unique.
Being able to set some columns with individual colours etc would be great.
We have vendors giving us w-9s and I think it would be a great idea to be able to attach it to a vendor file.
Also be able to print these notes for correspondence details.
I have been informed it would be handy to be able to import transactions into XPA by tracking code.
It would be good for accountants to be able to isolate entries in the cash coding screen and be able to cash code and sort only those entries.
However eWise is able to login and pull the transaction from the SG banks.
This prevents me from being able to run product reports in Xero.
Whereas it would be so useful to be able to simply select the statement line and change the amount to spent instead of received (and occasionally vice versa).
When will we be able to change the notes in the financial statements.
I want to be able to print out Xero's substitute 1099's for mailing purposes.
In MYOB, you are able to create categories and then run reports on categories.
It would therefore be useful to be able to change both tracking categories during the timesheet entry process.
Users should be able to customize which columns are visible for their own needs.
You should be able to select the fact that you want the net book value (carrying value) of individual fixed assets to be a round pound (or dollar) amount.
I know you can export to CSV to see this information but if would be very handy to be able to see directly in the browser.
In purchases you are able to, by clicking on the little red x next to the expected date you have previosusly set.
It would be great if we had the option to be able to hide columns that are not used or rarely used.
HiIt would be really productive if we were able to select the individual tracking options to include in our Profit & Loss reports.
Would be great if I had a register that as I put the first transaction in, I could press enter and go to the next line and the next line and have them reconcile at that moment or check them all off and press reconcile for the ones I choose or have them in find & re-code and have a reconciliation button there that I could check off all the transactions and be able to reconcile them in one fell swoop.
It could be nice to be able to show what you know as Credit stars.
Would be good to be able to set as default whether the "Show journal on cash basis reports" should be ticked or un-ticked on manual journals.
Along with this, it would be good to be able to see easily which journals posted have this ticked/unticked.
It may work for other people to even be able to include a specific tracking option.
We should be able to setup all client features for them, not have to log in as the client to do this - Kashflow allows adviser access as the client to do such things - much easier!
We should be able to setup all client features for them, not have to log in as the client to do this - Kashflow allows adviser access as the client to do such things - much easier!
I want to be able to search bills by customer so I can see all bills that have been applied to that customer.
Is there able to be set up a button that can confirm mappings in bulk.
It would be very useful if we were able to select one or more inventory items when running reports
Even If somehow  we could allow the Practice database to remain open or to be able to click on a nice BIG blue or green Practice Button that takes me straight there I would really appreciate it.
HiAny chance of being able to run a TB with only TWO columns for year to date?
The Xero for Android app should be able to rotate to landscape view, as most stands and attached keyboards for Android devices wok best in landscape rather than portrait mode.
Then as per other requests to be able to amalgamate selected budgets to give a total budget.
- to be able to save it a .
More Specifically, to be able to remove the Net Income / (Loss) before Tax and Total Comprehensive Income lines from the Income Statement.
It would be really handy to be able to view an original transaction after it has been edited or amended in any way.
I'd love to be able to do the same but for the full year to the period selected.
it would be nice to be able to set up a rule to send direct to Xero rather than having to import every csv file.
It would be good if we could give them a reference number and be able to sort by this in the practice list of organisations.
meaning I have to bring everything in that category up and export to excel to be able to extract one supplier.
As these are a) quite dispiriting and b) not particularly useful on an ongoing basis, it would be good to be able delete or hide these items.
This would be great as you would be able to ensure that you have invoiced the correct amount of products.
One needs to be able to design their own reporting requirements to fit their tax jurisdiction.
It would be great to be able to have multiple attachments and be able to choose which you want attached to transactions as you are reconciling - all, a selection with a tick box, none.
It would be nice to be able to see each individual transaction's expense coding.
Once a bunch of receipts have been entered into an expense claim, it would be nice to be able to print it out, showing details and amounts and totaling at the bottom.
To be able to set defaults so when logging into Xero instead of going to all client list it could default to starred list or a specific group.
This would able a quick confirmation that the rule is allocating correctly
Xero should be able to mimic this behavior.
It would be great if we could do a search on a manual journal description or date, (as you currently can), and then be able to bulk void these journals.
We should be able to cancel a purchase order and send the cancellation to the supplier.
It allows to do so by reference -- but I wasn't able to get it to do so via contact group.
Also, being able to apply mass settings to a contact group would be helpful (in the contact information) instead of manually inputting all information.
To assist understanding of this requirement I would have provided a screenshot, unfortunately I was not able to upload it to this feature request.
Nice to have (but I would be able to live without it) would be: additional address options (i. e. Work, Seasonal) and ability to link relationships with other contacts (i. e spouse).
We should be able to select one or two users to receive the notifications.
It would be useful to be able to sort the job list by client group, such that all jobs relating to a particular client group appear together in my job list.
Our biggest request is to be able to attach documents to the Line (which we can do ) and be able to access it from the line not with a big list at the bottom of the page this is very unproducitve and confusing.
It would be very useful to be able to merge fixed assets when they are in "Draft" status.
I want to be able to record expenses using the expense claim system (employee enters expense claims with supporting receipts) and then I authorise.
It is important to be able to see if it has been deleted, when it has been deleted and who by.
This would be a key tool for us in regards to being able to fully utilise V2 reports in our practice.
It would be great to be able to have links to reports on the dashboard.
We wish to be able to upload our director's scanned written signature into the Statement of Disclaimer of the Financial Statements templates.
It could be simply the "INCOME" line from the EXECUTIVE SUMMARY but able to be set for any date period.
i. e i only want my customers to able to view 2 months transaction history online.
It would be really useful to be able to recall the different revisions made to a quote, as quotes are often modified due to client negotiation, and to be able to see historic revisions would be useful
It would be great to be able to sort by 'descriptions' in the Find & Recode.
And I'd love to be able to overlay receivables and payables onto that graph.
Would be easier to be able to tick them and then mark as sent.
This is something that Sage is able to automate via the recurring entries system.
Thank you for the chance to write suggestions to you it is appreciated that we are able to contribute.
It would be nice to be able to prepare a Canadian Balance Sheet.
Instead of Net Assets to be able to show Total Assets = Liabilities plus Owners Equity.
We want to be able to cross-reference these external drafts with Xero in the future.
It would be great to be able to allow more than 1,000 inventory items to be uploaded via CSV file at once.
We'd love to be able to create milestones under clients.
If this feature is added it would also be handy to be able to "merge" contacts together to remove multiple ones.
Would be great to be able to hyperlink text in the description field of Quotes.
Also, being able to change line colours to match logos etc would be awesome.
Be able to save a manually created Petty Cash Transaction as a draft until you are ready to reconcile (would be handy when waiting for Cash Slips from clients)
When creating rules we can only select if "all" or "some" but a more comprehensive set of if/then rules would be awesome - for me it's being able to select some products as ebooks (in some countries they have a lower vat rate) and say all other products get the other rate kind of thing.
Voided checks should remain visible so that you can remember that a check was written to a vendor with the possibility of being able to make it active again.
Not being able to see the voided check caused a lot of problems.
I have a lot of inventory which is very similar and would love to be able to copy an inventory code I've already got.
Also being able to display this from an accrual basis or a cash basis would be great.
I want to be able to see  which of my branches performs best per contact.
I want to be able to compare branches too.
It would be great to be able to enter the requests into the system with our number and then, when approving them, enter the suppliers number thus matching each request to the credit provided.
You should be able to make the relevant column narrower by adjusting it on screen, even if some info is cut off.
I see merit in also being able to lock it for Advisors as well.
I'm accustomed to being able to scan a period of transactions to review how each transaction was split.
We should be able to search based on Paid Date also.
Admin users should be able to click on "Total of current claims" to see the details.
Now you have to go to 'view details' which could be easily solved by simply being able to drag the attachment to the transaction.
It would be useful to be able to create rules based on transactions values.
And also have it shown on reports and be able to be searched for.
We should be able to lock out thresholds for rong passwords and PINS (Xero Touch).
It would be nice to be able to attach files to reports.
It would be very helpful to be able to download the customer statements into excel as many of our customers require it in excel format.
Income should be able to be reported by Customer.
When reconciling a transaction it would be great to be able to apply an existing Rule.
It would be helpful as a practitioner if I was able to sort clients on the My Xero Practice Home page listing those clients by the most unreconciled transactions through to the least.
This would enable me to be able to quickly identify those clients with unreconciled transactions who may require assistance.
I wish that Xero would be able to download BAS'/IAS' & tax returns all at once rather than individually.
It would be great to be able elect to remove any changes where there has been no change to the GST total of the transaction (i. e. basic recodes with no bottom line GST effect).
It would be great if the questioned asked on all the boards were able to be flagged by the original posting person as answered.
Yet we are able to do this on the standard Xero Reports?
There are too many items which require administration privileges, for example lead templates, we should be able to give people access to lead templates without giving them administration access.
I am able to put my own practices logo on via My Xero/Settings/Publishing Styles.
com/ I would be able to map to my own domain, ie http://ie.
It would make it "cleaner" to be able to see that all returns have been submitted and would be good as a check for both accountants and clients.
Is the system able to create a bill after you publish a BAS or IAS?
To be able to manage debtors more effectively, a Receivables Reports that shows details on notes or comments would be helpful.
It would be ideal to be able to export transactions as a CSV file.
It would be helpful to be able to choose the VAT period covered.
Acknowledging that the system has been constructed using a role based security model, implies that as an organisation a person who's security access is restricted to only inputting and submitting data would only be able to view their own data in an organisation's Xero library.
Shortcut Keys - i. e. See Reckon/QuickBooks shortcut keystrokesThere appears to be too many mouse stroke entries - instead of pressing "save", have the "enter key" as the "save button"Dates - you should be able to enter 050614 and 05.
It would be great to be able process a manual journal in foreign currency and to pull the exchange rate on the date of the journal.
Xero doesn't seem able to produce a detailed general ledger broken down by tracking category.
Using Files to obtain and create transactions from is great and my clients have started doing so with gusto, however we have found that when trying to enter the transaction with the file viewed on the screen, there is not enough real estate on the user interface to be able to see all the info on the transaction.
It would be great if when you downloaded a template it was easy to see what columns were mandatory to be able to import it.
We think it would be helpful to be able to upload pictures of our inventory items into Xero.
It would be great to be able to specify units (e. g. no.
Would Xero be able to remove the sale undo's to be a separate function.
Are we able to get the preview pane to show the actual data input amounts, instead of the tax-free component of each line?
It would be really useful to be able to print from the mobile apps.
Xero needs to be able to send statement to one customer from Coastal Patios and a statement from Coastal Furnishings.
e. Shop 1 - brand 1      Shop 1 - brand 2It's a real problem when it comes to sending statements, as even though he can search by brand name to group all of those statements together (in order to be able to bulk send statements to the customers who have bought that brand) there are often more than 50.
It would be great to include a SEARCH FUNCTION for these reports and be able to search by:- Customer / Supplier- Date (From / To)- Amount (Min / Max)- Reference No.
If the Xero application could offer this functionality, I would be able to move my receipt keeping to a paperless system.
It would be great to be able to allocate an alternate item code for inventory items.
it would be nice on some stock items to be able to select a box "flag when paid", so that I can then be reminded to order the product.
We do not seem to be able to run a comparative Trial Balance i. e. compare the 2012 to the 2013 year -  this a standard feature on most accounting packages.
If I'm in my office I'd much prefer to be able to upload / submit receipts directly via the Xero website.
It would be useful for us to be able to log onto a customer portal and view the status of open support requests and also view and historical requests that have been made.
Date Reminders: It would be helpful to be able to log all key dates and have them pop up as reminders - Vat return due dates, annual returns, PAYE and RTI due dates etc.
We should be able to merge our own Feature Requests.
It would be great to be able to assign a credit limit to a customer profile which alerts when exceeded.
We would love to be able to create more templates using this feature.
It would be very helpful to be able to customise the dashboard.
It would be really cool to be able to record payments in Xero Touch.
It would be great to be able to simply forward the email to Xero which then automatically raises a draft Sale for review at a later date when logged into the system.
the board members have View Only rights in Xero but I wish for them to be able to Approve bills.
The ability to customize a csv output file to be able to import into a banking system.
it would be great to be able to sort or filter the rec screen in a simliar way to sorting the cash coding screen.
Also, since the fields themselves don't interact with the accounting side of the application, they shouldn't interfere with anything and should be able to be done rather quickly by the developers.
It would be so totally awesome to be able to:1.
In quickbooks when processing an expense he was able to assign it as a disbursement to a specific client.
It would be great to be able store notes against the Xero company itself so that I have a single place to store and access my corporate data.
It would be great to be able to see the Description field when printing manual journals - the field shows up when viewing the manual journal in Xero, but when you print to PDF it disappears.
Would be good to be able to have multiple contacts under the one company name.
I am currently using MYOB and the feature in that which is important to me is the provision of a unique Customer/Supplier Card ID# - and being able to import using that unique id with duplicates being automatically rejected.
Also, the csv template does not have the ability to include a tracking code- we're finding that more clients are using tracking codes for profit centres so being able to have depreciation going straight to the relevant profit centre is useful.
It would be nice to be able to have recurring journal entries, i. e. a journal entry that is to be repeated every month over a period of 2 years).
Are we able to set up multiple logos and select for different employees on payslips ?
For 1 days vacation the employee is able to override the figure.
It's not appropriate for the Office Manager to be able to view all personnel payroll and salary details.
It would be a good feature to be able to show the address of the location the employee works on the payslip rather than a single location for all.
It would be very beneficial if we were able to enter multiple weekly draft payrolls to cover the shut down periods, then post them in date order.
This would be similar to paying Leave in advance which is quite common, but I was not able to find any instructions how to do it.
I. e. Staff should be able to place in the hours that they have worked and the breaks that they have taken.
Always good to be able to refer back to Notes to verify what has been said.
Is this going to be able to happen in the near future?
Will Xero payroll be able to cope with average daily rates?
It would be a good idea to be able to run multiple payrolls such as a weekly and monthly payroll and then limit the access to specific users.
Xero, you pride your software on being able to  lodge everything directly with the ATO etc.
It would be great to be able to approve leave from one window instead of clicking on Requested and having to drill down into the individual employee's leave and then going back to the employee overview window to find the next one.
Being able to  from the employee screen would.
It would be great to be able to write individual messages on payslips for individual employees.
It would be good if a number of different Xero users could prepare payroll but be able to send out payslips from a generic email address, for example payroll@company.
Any compliant payroll software should be able to monitor the hours of an employee under 18 and apply superannuation if the hours exceed 30 hours per week.
Being able to edit those in tabular format would be great.
I was sent an invite an accepted and was able to lodge 1 timesheet then they disappeared as an option and it only shows me my old job.
They used to login and only be able to see their own expenses.
It would be handy to be able to group track transactions.
If I was able upload a blank version of the separate spreadsheet I'm using to keep track of budget vs actual it would probably make more sense.
If Eftpos & Visa were able to coordinate their receipts with Xero eg.
As an aside, being able to merge items together would be useful as well.
There is one question I've had some pretty mixed answers to and haven't been able to find any info on to confirm it either way.
I am used to being able to hit 10 for the 10th of the month we are in, 1002 for the 10th Feb this year or 100217 for 10th Feb 17 this makes input much quicker and although Xero seems to be able to cope with 10 gives the 10th of the month we are in, if I hit 1002 (for the 10th Feb this year) it gives 1 FEB 1002 ?
This could be made a lot better, most desktop accounting software has been able to do this for years - even Sage!
Hope someone understands this and is able to help.
Since Friday I've not been able to get the feed working.
Has anyone found out a good workaround to the issue of old downloads (xls) not being able to opened in windows 360?
Is this something that will be able to happen in the future?
)However that doesn't seem quite right, I know I'm doing something wrong, but I haven't been able to figure out what yet.
If I lose this phone I will not be able to log in.
But he said the App should be able to do it too, eg if he is working on his ipad.
I want to make sure that we are able to reclaim pre-registration VAT on unsold inventory and start up costs.
I used to be able to login with touch authentication which worked fine, however now I can't set this up and worse, now I Log in with your security code, I see a message saying "Authenticating" then changes to "Loading", then it says 'Error, There was a problem downloading organisation data.
I am not able to reconcile it.
I used to be able to do contra payments in sage but a little unsure of how to do it hereany clues gratefully receivedthanks
You're also able to request features, engage with the Product team, and receive updates on a feature you want developed.
This would give him a view of everything without being able to accidentally change any transactions or settings.
Up until now we have been able to pull our budget vs actual reports directly from Xero without making changes in Excel or running multiple budgets - I really do not want to be doing with a work around.
It is very onerous to have to manually save a document and to search for the document to be able to upload and attach it.
Ideally you'd be able to tick multiple transactions and apply to a bill.
the only way to do this would be to be able to check transactions by entry date, otherwise I can't find them!
It would be useful if you were able to specify the number of columns you require especially where you wish to show quantities as well as values.
At the moment, I am running the Find and Recode for each individual contact or GL code, but it would be good to be able to search a whole group .
If anyone is able to help out on the above that would be great.
I expect to be able to attach each of these payments to the same Xero transaction.
We used to be able to look in Notes & History and see for example that the order number had been billed.
Are we able to reset out data (clear down) if we continue with Xero outside of our trial.
it would be really useful to be able to import the client name as a meaningful reference.
A couple I have been able to invite without any issues, some were missing email address which I have added under the Employment -> Details page.
I maybe able then to track these amount while understanding the reduction in income.
It's probably a simple procedure, but I haven't been able to figure it out.
Under the old system, I used to be able to process expenses in bulk.
I want to be able to see the 50 or so slowest paying customers, so we have a sort of 'watch list'.
It would be lovely to be able to send out the monthly statements with the shops email address as the issuer/contact.
Is anyone able to point me in the right direction for this at all?
(would be nice to be able to upload images here to show)
I. e Search for all items with no tracking and then be able to bulk assign tracking using the find and recode options
It would be so useful to be able to produce reports for last accounting year as a preset choice.
Is there a simple way of doing this that I haven't been able to find?
To date I have not been able to figure out a way of doing this, although I might be missing something really obvious.
How magic would it be to be able to sort a GL by transactions that had yet to be reviewed, or that had a review point?
I think it would be great to look down a list of transactions and be able to see (by the shade of the transaction) what the tax rate on the transact is,  rather than having to drill into each individual transaction to check the tax.
I needed to post a customer a quote (older generation), to get this to be able to:1. be printed without the draft quote heading2.
Hello,I thought that I would be able to convert a number of purchase orders to bills under one contact but unfortunately the 3 orders combined onto a single bill.
If the screen aligned left I would be able to drag the PDF window to the right and see both at once.
It would be handy to be able to have the option of producing the statement GST free or to be abe to show it seperately
It would be great to be able to import these rather than entering each bill's details by hand.
should be able to delete unused/trial branding themes from drop down list or program in general
We have seen the threads about not being able to delete a contact but can see no reason why the contact number shouldn't be removed from a contact.
It would be great to be able to do this on the move.
I believe the Xero substring match is only able to deal with things separated by spaces so if I entered "1406-IMPARK00090436A" it would match.
If I describe it, someone might be able to help me improve it.
This is all part of the same company but we want to be able to see the turnover and profit and loss etc for each branch to monitor its performance.
In my old MYOB program I had the ability to date each day of service eg;Date    Description       AmountAm i able to do this in xero or do I have to include the date in in the description field?
However they must not be able to actually reconcile the items since that would bypass any approvals process.
This was able to be overlooked because we could delete the duplicates.
I haven't been able to find a way around this.
Coming from the MYOB environment I was able to do this easily, and probably did it hundreds of times.
It would be nice to be able to adjust the voucher alignment independent of the check or to not adjust the voucher alignment when adjusting the check alignment.
40 all of which was GST-able.
So all in all I am left wondering how others carry out the credit control function on Xero especially with a biew to being able to track back with a demonstrable audit trail of how an outstanding debt has been communicated to a debtor - a requirement of the courts should it get that far.
The only avenue I have been able to figure out is to set up each company (sub contractor) as an employee, and set the Tax declaration as TFN exempt and employment basis "Labour Hire".
No one seems to be able to tell me what's happening with updates for PAYG tax for Backpackers.
Is it able to be changed or is it in the locked section which I would've thought I had access to but don't see what it is that I can't get into to change.
We've got an issue with the leave request where I and some others are not able to choose who authorises our leave requests.
I have clients who are Public Benevolent Institutions (PBI's) whose staff are able to salary sacrifice up to the FBT limit.
Click super have advised me that effective 1 July I will be able to login to their website to sort out the minor discrepancies.
We want to have our employees enter there times only with a job description and them not to be able to see all of the different rates?
As it stands we aren't able to this through Xero Payroll system.
Unfortunately Google and searching here I wasn't to able to find what I was looking for.
With over 100 employees It would be really useful to be able to sort employees by last name in the relevant Payroll reports.
I have been going backwards and forwards with Xero support - however they are not able to fix it as yet.
6 - I am able to run his payroll as per everyone elses - except I have to enter his timesheet manually as he is not able to log in to lodge a timesheet.
In my previous accounting system I was able to record a 'location' against every timesheet item as well as every paycheque item (such as bonuses).
ly/cd5ok I have been able to reconcile all wages that have been	"Generated by Paycycle - Earnings" however after the integration of PAYCYCLE I can not get the Payroll Activity Summary and the Profit and Loss to reconcile.
5) When entering the payroll we will not be able to adjust the payroll taxes and we must be able to do this in order to exactly match the County's payroll register exactly.
Seems I should be able to delete it.
The last service I used was with Intuit and I was able to start using it during a quarter with no issues.
Although it would be nice to be able to call in directly, I must say the customer service to pretty great.
How do I set up payroll to be able to produce this result in the P&L?
I'm hoping somebody might be able to help as the 'support' I'm getting from Xero is fairly useless.
Has anyone found an easier way of getting in touch as there is no contact telephone number to be able to call.
I feel this would be hugely beneficial as I would be able to cross reference timings with the allocated shift times.
Previously I have been able to click on the Holiday balance amount and this open a window where you can amend said values.
Keen to be able to see all this in the P&L.
I want to do a trial run of the payroll and see whether i am able to arrive at the same figures.
Be able to view a payroll journal that has been posted automatically through a payrun.
At present under the Payroll PayrunTab we are only able to see that a payrun has been posted.
We have also called them up too, but unfortunately they weren't able to specifically confirm the elements to be used in the calculation.
However, we are finding that the payslips are proving to be a little confusing for employees to be able to track, with confidence, their annual leave entitlement.
When I am click Save in edit leave type to close out of it, I have to refresh my browser page before being able to do anything else on the screen.
Will they be able to log in and record these hours themselves and with the Payroll Admin being able to Approve these?
We provide easy integration to Xero to automatically pull through key financial information for trustees and other parties to be able to access.
Be able to have someone sign the dockets electronically.
Most importantly I have always been able to get hold of someone if there have been any issues.
We would require something that allows us to handle over 4,000 assets for one client, as well as having the option to have tax vs accounting depreciation, multiple depreciation rates for an asset (e. g first year depreciation, 2nd+ year deprecation rate), being able to dispose part of an asset along with a few other more complex functions.
We are aware of Asset Guru but if there are any other options that you are able to suggest to us to look into it would be very much appreciated.
I am not able to find this solution yet, am i overlooking something?
If this is the case will I still be able to reconcile  payments as transfers?
I am looking for a program that will integrate with XERO to be able to send SMS reminders of services that are booked.
I'm sure I'm not the only amazon seller trying to do it this way, but I haven't been able to find a clear FAQ on how to set it up simply
On purchase and AP side, the system should be able to track open POs and items receipts.
The email component will allow for at least two email addresses for the sender with at least two different signatures able to be selected at the push of a button eg John Smith, Managing Director of AUSTRALIAWIDE Training and John Smith, Managing Director of AUSTRALIAWIDE Merchandising.
Want to be able track all our day-to-day activity with customers and be able to track by customer all of their information including contact details, opportunities, lab set-up, installed equipment.
It would be ideal if it was able to track overtime hours as well but not a necessity.
I'm pretty amazed that I can't find anything on this subject, but I really want to be able to sync Google Contacts with Xero and I'm finding it increasingly hard to do so.
What is stopping us is that once we switch over, we would not be able to connect Xero to UPS and FedEx shipment.
I'm also working on linking XERO to Woothemes for our online site integration so users must also be able to log on as either wholesalers or "end users".
Are you able to advise if there is any software out there that you are aware of that works with Xero?
I'd be interested in hearing any other requests for products in this space where existing offerings haven't been able to meet your needs.
The inventory feature does not have to be very complex, but at least be able to manage quantities bought and sold of several stock lines.
One month we may do 3 days, the next 7 days but we want to be able to monitor the amount of days left on the original POThanks
We want to be able to manually adjust stock as well.
We require standard payroll functions as well as super clearing and the ability to be able to lodge ATO forms (tax dec) online.
Hello all,As a workflow solution, I would love to be able to sync a particular Notebook in Evernote, where each note in the notebook would be a file in the Xero "Files" section.
I have not been able to find anything similar for Xero yet.
Due to food safety requirements he needs to be able to track where his product has been sold to his customers.
He needs to be able to identify individual batches in the case of of product recall.
We were thinking keeping it super simple with three choices: 1) Late Fee, whole dollar amount $2) Service Fee, percentage of balance %3) being able to apply both Late/Service Fees or the greater of the two?
MILESTONESReally should be able to assign Milestones to staff.
STAFF PERMISSIONS- Should only be able to see list of jobs they have access to - if not ticked for Job Manager.
I want my salesmen to be able to enter their notes for all users to see, and I want them to be able to enter there orders so they appear in Xero as waiting approval.
Will we still be able to access these scanned dox if necessary?
Trusting that someone will be able to point me in the right direction.
Xero should be able to handle this.
You should not even be able to read the contact information because you claim it's encrypted.
It would be great if we could turn off the sent and accepted functions or even be able to quickly change the status.
For nearly 2 weeks we have not had access to our subscription and Xero customer service have done nothing to rectify this, nor shown any concern nor care for the severe damage not being able to access the system can do.
Now we are finally able to look at the stocks balance to prevent over ordering.
This was really helpful to quickly check how many more transactions were able to be reconciled for the current month, as the Starter plan has a limit of 20.
Pretty pointless being able to complete the reference field at the quote stage if it is replaced anyway.
It would be nice to be able to dictate the formatting, though.
"I don't see any other email addresses published on here in response to posts, so I am unclear as to why why she wasn't able to reply to me directly on here?
The Xero connection process asks for many details which aren't used, and eventually I was able to establish a connection using only my name and membership details.
Using this as a simple example, if I give my client access to invoicing, they also are able to adjust settings in Xero - something we would prefer this client not be able to do.
##### CLUSTER 11 #####
Is it possible to manually add more fields to the Contact Information?
So in this is it possible that there is an App / Add-on that will allow me to add images to my inventory items so that when and if a client says of yeah I want these internal doors installed called "Chateau" I can say oh yeah so they are "these" by clicking in my inventory I can show them a photo of it before submitting a quote.
However, now that I have got better, I wanted to now add depreciation on these assets from when I brought them.
I can connect one login but Xero does not give me the choice to add a different login for the other credit card.
I have created a tracking category for a group of expenses and want to add it to previously paid bills for a specific vendor.
, apparently it cannot add up.
I don't mean that I want to go and add each one individually to get the total.
Add spend money from Petty Cash with freelancer as supplier, it will credit petty cash and debit ?
I would prefer to simply add a single Purchase order or bill showing the total amount that i was charged by the distributor.
When I try to add a feed (paypal, scotia, cibc) or whatever, most times it doesn't show up.
I see that there is an option to add VAT.
I have disable ADblock, add the entire domain as a trust domain in my browser (google chrome).
Does xero have the feature to add cost centers?
Is there an add on that allows multiple VAT reporting.
08 excluding tax to add another penny of tax.
I spoke to Directli who do a Gocardless add on but it doesnet deal with our workflow unfortunatley.
I have checked the Add-on pages for Xero and didn't spot anything ideal.
We also add interest to the loans, but could do this with a spreadsheet.
I thought the GST on expenses would then fall under purchases and should add up in 1B.
I though it should add up to all of the GST I have paid.
How am I supposed to add these receipts?
Although the transaction is saved to Fixed Asset drafts, the asset type info is not captured, so I have to manually add the asset type before I can register the asset.
When I am in the reconcile screen, I click the area to "create" and then at the bottom right of that box is phrase to click that says "add details".
This part works well - add expense, upload receipt and submit for approval - perfect so far.
Can someone advise please how to add the Mark as Reconciled button?
Is there an Add-on out there that might work here ?
xero won't let me add inventory items that have no value.
Its a POS web application where user can add Xero as one of Accounting AddOn.
And I cannot enter it as bill as I will add further complication.
if not is there an add-on available that provide this functionality?
How can we add these fees into Xero?
I searched online and some people say to add it under asset and others under expenses?
I have followed the following example to add my payroll into Xero:http://developer.
Could we add a column for journal numbers in the Manual Journal List?
I can only think they they will have to scroll down the page and add these up manually which seems silly in a computerised system.
Some sort of pointer towards a project management tool may be the answer although I can't see an add on that does this.
I thought I would share a list (and maybe others could add more) of banks that connect well to Xero and provide useful statement line information.
HiI have this situation where my conversion date is the 1April 2011 and I pressed the 'add comparative balances button for the previous year.
Can I add/import existing (pre conversion) items to the register only, without creating another accounting transaction?
A list that I add or delete from depending on my needs.
Anyone else out there feel free to add your own experiences of common Xero mistakes.
I am looking for a solution to manage fixed asset financing in Xero, either using the basic program or using an add-on.
I was wondering if there was a bulk add process of purchases to be marked an a client expense without edited every single item.
Or should I bite the bullet this year and do things my old way for everything prior to June and add those numbers to my Xero reports to submit to my tax preparer?
Students select which workshop they want to enrol in and add to shopping cart.
The bill has a set daily rate e. g $100 for a 9 tonne truck then it will add KM's, Admin Fee 3.
Month end I receive receipts etc and I add all these expenses as a "Bill" in Xero.
Do we have to add up manually?
Add next "to do" dates on the notes.
We’re looking for a handful of beta testers to test the Xero integration before it can be launched into the add-on marketplace.
I'm aware of the PAYE add ons but I want one where I can enter all of my employees and self employed subcontractors in to plan holidays, track wages etc.
If there are no Xero add ons can someone recommend and good standalone cloud based options.
Does an add-on exist which will allow us to input a full inventory of all our components, and then auto-transfer components out of "component stock" to a "finished stock inventory item" according to a BOM?
Can an add-on then be used to create a delivery note which will auto-deduct the finished stock from stores stock levels?
or better yet add dot points?
I had a case this morning where I needed to quickly add a file to a historical transaction for a known contact and I had to do the following:- Start at the dashboard.
Is there any way to add aged balances to a customer statement, i. e, current, 30-60 days, 60-90 days etc?
I know there’s other apps, but surely Xero could add this simple feature?
I would have thought it's no more than a minor tweak to add this as a database field.
Hello,Do you have any thoughts about add-on solutions for the following scenario?
How do people manage this, is there an add-on (I'm trying to look) or an application that can pull in Xero repeats etc etc.
Included are references  from user group discussions and also the Xero add-on's you may find useful for particular industries.
I have tried to keep relatively industry specific, it is by no means an all inclusive list of Xero add-ons.
I am creating an inventory add-on, and really only have my own experiences to fall back on.
I'm demanding you add the timestamps to community posts.
add customers & allocated hours for per client ) for staff to allocate hours what they have worked.
Hope we could have them as one of our add on partners.
Is it possible to add columns to the import template to include Primary Person First / Last name?
An option to select more than 1 file and add/attach them all in one action would make this a breeze.
Surely this cannot be that hard to add.
This would enable countries without native Xero payroll support to add calculated fields for ex.
Would be good to have the choice to add/subcontract these fields "separately" rather than combining into one.
It would be great to add the ability to write notes in a window underneath the Budget Layout.
It would be great if you could add to inventory without losing Bills that you're partway through.
Could you add a feature which allows us to insert a symbol when invoicing?
The reason for this is to add an 'Estimate to Complete' figure to each row which can be used in conjunction with a formula column to to add current costs to Estimates to Complete and then Compare those against the Budgeted figures to give a Variance for each line.
It would also be useful to add a date range!
Basically I want to add small labor amounts throughout a month and then have all of those added to the recurring template at the end of a month.
Add description for every journal.
A current work-around is to add a task to remind each staff member to clone the job for the following period, but this still only allows us to be one period in advance, rather than allowing for more regular tasks to be allocated.
We have to manually work out the unit rate of each item and add it in.
Is it possible to add a quick access to Quotes from the Dashboard or anywhere else?
I have no issue with this, however, unless they are set up as an advisor, they can't add to the chart.
), in order to add columns with nothing in them/data I don't want to see.
I never have only one bill to enter when I work for a client, so I request that in the personalized settings we can choose to have "approve and add another" as the first option on the add bills page.
This means I don't have to click the down arrow & select 'approve & add another" which means two clicks.
The bill has inventory items on it so I add the bill along with the items, I want to then turn this bill into a invoice to charge the customer, I can only seem to add them as a billable expense which doesn't seem right or I have to manually do it.
There needs to be the option to add a footer or comment to these pages.
If it isn't much of a bother, please add those options.
It is possible to add files to expense claims and bills - great idea.
Please add simple checkbox functionality next to each claim together with a 'select all' button so users can quickly authorise expense claims.
All it needs is for Xero to estimate corporation tax (not hard for most small businesses), and add together opening reserves, profit after tax and dividends declared to come up with reserves remaining.
It would be great to add modifiers to placeholders in email templates.
Currently the TPAR print-out from Xero doesn't look that great and it also doesn't have any totals at the bottom, unless we export to csv (Excel) and add a formula.
Xero response:Currently it is not possible to add Draft and Custom Reports to the Reports tab.
Also the ability to add an email footer placeholder to the templates would be a great addition to the system
It would be really handy if you could add   Drafts    and    Published to reports menu.
Otherwise you have to go to the Chart after completing the transaction to add this detail.
After entering a bill and choosing 'Approve and Add Another' the 'Allocate Credit' option pops up.
which excludes it and then you have to add it back on later.
There is also a blue "SAVE" button which allows you to "save and add another".
Now, this could be achieved with other apps, solutions, and add-ons that has proven to be expensive.
It would be great to have the ability to add the substantiation declaration to all types of ATO forms.
I needed to add a line at the bottom and drag each individual line and drop it in place.
Simple request - the "Add another option" button is at the bottom of the Tracking list.
a user role to access the fixed asset module, add notes, upload files, create draft assets
Add start and Finish times to Timesheet app for employees
It would be great if you could add this feed.
Dear Xero support,is it possible to add "Reason" field on the Credit note template?
Please add Etsy and Shipstation.
Hello, Is it possible to add a  graph to the Dashboard please?
Let's add some meaningful development to the app we invest so much money in!
Perhaps a " save and add another item from inbox" option when saving  the bill.
Seems simple enough to add this feature.
Can default Asset Types be included in Xero rather than having to add Asset Types for each individual client ledger.
We request to add:- Item categoryWe don't have it yet
I appreciate that Xero doesn't want to complicate the levels of access too much, but perhaps they could retain the current levels and add an "advanced" tab which shows more options?
Hopefully it would be a fairly straight forward feature to add and I look forward to any progress on this.
- A BIG WIN would be an interface with employer returns, but this would likely be an add on for each tax jurisdiction, if there is a market for it.
Since the Fixed Assets upgrade you have removed the 'Register & Add Another' button - would be great to bring this back!
The Xero iOS app allows users to add receipt photos when adding expense claims, however there are no basic photo cropping tools, nor options to convert to high-contrast black & white or greyscale.
On the Xero App there doesn't appear to be the future when reconciling to add a split item to a bill or receipt this facility exits win the web page but not on the app.
In one case we had a client with 1,700+ journals from an add-on in one month and they were posted all over the place.
We could void all 1,700+ manual journals, run reports in the add-on and then do end of month entries manually in Xero instead.
If would also be great if we could do a search for a manual journal based on the user (i. e. a person or add-on) to find all journals posted to Xero by that user/add-on.
Add the decimal point after the second digit has been typed.
Really simply let us add notes to files, adding notes will make us far more beautiful!
It would be really great to add to the "assign to a customer" info to the timesheet.
We'll then get a better idea of what to develop if we add it to our plans.
There should be an ability to add attachments to our email templates.
HiPlease could you add a feature to allow filtering of records in reports?
We have builder clients who work on a cost + basis when billing their clients, and they add an agreed margin ( eg.
Is it possible to add a feature to the files function that will allow a user to 'archive' files?
Smart lists could do the search, but then I can't do anything with that list other than export it or add it to a contact group (which I can't email statements to either) This would be really helpful.
Add a placeholder in email templates for the user logged in.
Tracking PayrollPlease add feature to track payroll items
Our process is:1. add a schedule date o the bills to be paid2.
I would be great if we could add or edit a tracking code when entering a purchase order.
So I have to place the purchase order then save it as a bill then add the tracking code.
With quotes, the options are not as simplified, and we actually have to press 'save' or even 'save and add another',  and then enter it again to find a drop down box, to mark as sent, to change it from a 'draft quotation' and then view again to print.
Add postcode to location
I would suspect that it may be similar for other add ons that involve HR issues, third party post/mailing and possibly others.
I. E. if i put the total in as $100 and the current lines i have entered add up to $80, that the balance left is $20.
My feature request is to add more detail to the My Xero Home tab.
Some customers may not want Add-Ons as Inventory tracking is not essential for them.
I know you can add additional branding themes and custom.
It would be great if you could add a contact field for YouTube.
It would be great if we had the ability to add files directly int he Cash Coding Screen so that we can upload supporting documentation without having to go back to the reconciliation screen.
That way, anyone who wanted to include a link to the online version, inside the PDF, could easily add this to the Terms of the quote.
Plus anything else anybody else can add to the list.
It would be good if there was an option to shade the comparatives column and have the ability to add dollar signs.
I then have to go into each bill and add the tracking code.
Would it be possible to have 'approve another bill' as well as 'add another bill'?
It would be useful to have the ability to add additional office contact details on the firms public profile for practices who have multiple sites.
Pls add a feature where we can generate reports byPrior YTDPrior QTDPrior MTD
Inventory items should have the option to add the expiration date.
It would be great if Xero allowed users to add extra fields to paypal importation (not the manual one, the automatic one) and map it themselves.
Please add this to your thinktank.
Add UK Xero and UK Square integration.
Or add tracking category options to the other two reports.
Here's an easy feature to add that would be very helpful to me.
Please add payroll for Canadian customers.
I should also add that a Payroll User with only access to Timesheet entries should be available to us.
Can you please add that back on?
Please add this ability or provide a workaround that would produce ASC 958 compliant financial statements.
Also we cannot look at the budget for 12 months from the start of the 2nd financial year (only for 24 months from the next financial year) so to get the budget totals for the 2nd year we have to export it to Excel and add in formulae.
I want to add the cost of the 5 items together and currently I have to do that with a calculator.
sq-view-quote-title-accepted {color: #390;}Suggestion to add:.
Why make me add them in my head to get a clear picture of where I stand?
Is it possible to add this to the current template?
Sage One (and I not a fan) for all its shortfalls can do the Irish Vat easily, accurately and with no chance of errorI know its a regional issue but surly there must be some clever add on (attention developers)or tweak that can sort this out for Irish customers.
I understand there are some instances where you don't want all files sent to client, but it would be nice to have this as a default setting choice, or at least a single radio button for "add all files in email to customer".
I know everything is easier said than done but what a great tool that would be to add to your already amazing software.
Can you add one of these?
It'd be great if Xero would add the option to print signature on check using a signature-looking font of my name.
This may not be the case for many users but if an option was available to add this column into tailored reports it would be a very helpful addition.
I think this information is essential when reviewing credit terms etc and would be a really valuable feature to add.
well i would love to see a way that you could add a comment to a customers statement.
I would Xero to allow us to add logo on all reports .
To add a task feature to Xero to remind you what needs to be done when.
On each page, have another row up the top with direct shortcut buttons of the main features:'add contact''add bill''add invoice'Add Contact really is NEEDED as a option in the app also!
The total (net profit) variance should then add all variances together, rather than taking Gross Profit value and deducting Expenses total.
Are there plans to add this?
So could you rather add the email subject to the Files screen and the Add Files pop-up on the respective spend money transactions.
I'm an NZ , , add-on Developer and Xero's 2012 Most Valuable Professional.
Would it be possible to add this feature?
Without it, you either have to go into the statements, or manually add the columns.
If not may I suggest this to you as an add on to our practice file.
2) Consider moving Expense Claims / Add Receipt up into a more prominent position (replacing this non-functional space) on the Cashbook Dashboard.
Category Options Should be Importable, So we can batch add options in the tracking categories.
I do not want to add all the information again!
Add-on apps can allow users to bring across strange GST amounts to Xero and it would also identify corrupt transactions causing an out of balance amount.
It would be good if we could force user the user to add file attachments to certain expenses eg.
The ability to crop a photographed receipt would also be great as would any 'smarts' you could add to verify focus/legibility (OK, I'm getting ambitious now! )
Currently, they have to manually add the local currency net and vat amounts together if they want to calculate the total payable in GBP.
The very good Zen Payroll add on is $29 for one employee, $57 for 11 employees and $77 for 21 employees.
Add a customer or supplier terms must be completed.
Is it possible to add a feature which will allow you to choose what email address you want to send too?
I seem to be unable to add/delete contacts from the app directly.
Now - my feature request would be to add a mechanism on the Xero side of the Yodlee data feed to do a really rough and easy analysis of the transactions being imported.
Requirement:Add a TFN field into the Tax details for contacts
would it be possible to add a 'call back' date space?
It would be great if we could add tags to contacts/transactions in Xero that would then be available to filter reports.
It would be very useful if you allowed ratings/reviews of add-ons.
Might save me a lot of trying trying to evaluate every add-on option!
This is an important feature, please add.
We're at budgeting cycle now so it'd be bloody marvelous to add this feature asap
You still have to click on the down arrow and select Approve & add another.
Is it possible to add options for different colours and sizes?
when add expense claims, it would be great if i can attached the actual receipts received from other people, to keep record.
Please can you action purchase orders that are editable eg Add logo plus add or delete fields.
Some UI improvements -Add a Hero or Showcase module position to the Dashboard.
My current work around is create a qty item to include as a separate item and then manually add up the quantity.
Please add support for common, Open Standards formats, such as ODF & PDF, and less of a reliance on closed/vertical application stacks.
Why not add a simple chart to show this on the dashboard?
The easy way could be to add a track value in the employee/contact details.
Until then, add site:Xero.
Currently Xero recommends you either: a) delete existing payments, then add additional interest charges, then add the payments back.
If there was an option to add a logo, change the page colour, or another distinguishing feature of each company page this would be avoided.
They also offer sign-up pages where customers can login, check their current subscription, switch package or add "bolt-ons" and it automatically updates their subscription payments.
This would be a great feature to add especially when there are potentially hundreds of contacts.
Also, when importing contacts from a csv file, if it were possible to tell which group(s) to add the contacts to when uploading.
Could you add a freight charge box in invoicing, so that it shows separately from line items?
The graphs don't add any value.
It is essential for some of our clients to have the ability to add a second date.
Why can't Xero add a feature for Company Contributions.
It would be useful to have the ability to add additional information to the payslips, an example being employers pension contribution.
Do you have any plans to add an Employee Performance Management module to Xero at any point in the future?
Please would you remove North Humberside and add East Yorkshire?
This made it difficult to demonstrate how easy the function is (and help her realise the advantage of moving up a subscription level to access it)In hindsight, I probably could have found a video to show her (and in fact she trusted me as to how easy it is) but I thought it might be useful to add to the demo company, so it is truly a complete demo.
Can you add a Download Payslip function that shows the employees details on it?
Not enough if you want to add a fair bit of detail.
On the Bills page (after bill is approved) XERO has a feature add another.
The same problem / solution scenario ought to be looked at for "Add Timesheet".
Can Xero add this feature?
If Xero could change to colours or processed runs to that of those that are merely posted that could be a helpful solution, or add a column 'Processed'.
Under the banner of employee self service it would be really useful if a 'standard user' could add.
See ZenPayroll's process for an example: employees receive an invite, log in and set up their password, then add all the key info on their own.
And is it also possible to add an indicator that will tell if the invite has already been sent to the employee.
I find that there is never enough room to add what I truly want to say.
Please add support for Australia's Maximum Super Contribution Base (http://www.
There should be a "Annual Leave (Termination payout)" type that doesn't add super and changes the tax table because:http://help.
Is it possible to add the little blue star button also for the Payroll Reports?
Please add to Xero.
However I am unclear if I can add multiple lines for a single customer and multiple customers within the same import file.
Under Firefox with No Script add-on installed; it displays some third-party elements.
The filters only appear if there are no columns, but when I edit the layout to add them, the filter disappears.
Go into the unreconciled bill, select Bill Options > Add Credit note which does suggest the credit note is FROM the supplier, but then once the credit note is created, I try and reconcile the received funds to the newly created credit note, but it doesn't appear match when reconciling.
Expensify estimates the GBP value of the expense using their own fx to convert and (I hope) I have now configured it to add the 2.
When using the Xero app on iphone to add a receipt.
Add the Who (i. e. The Warehouse)      b.
Add the What (i. e. Stationery)      c. 	Add Description (i. e. Stationery)      d. 	Change Tax Rate to 15% GST on Income      e. 	Click Add Details              i.
Currently we enter bill details, then save it, then allocate cash if there is unallocated cash present, then click add another bill to start entering the next bill.
The only way I can find to fix this mistake is to add another adjustment on the same day as my mistake to reverse it - but this seems ugly and unnecessary.
Would be great to have the ability to add multiple file uploads for photos.
Once the items arrive, we then add the items into the inventory manually, adding number of items purchased etc.
There doesn't seem to be an easy way to add these to a bill, other than manually searching for all expenses against that client and then manually selecting the month which needs to be reimbursed.
It would be good if you can add all the items then click a button to compress all the information.
Why in the Xero app when you go to enter a receipt you can not add a line.
Example case:Purchase Price: $70,000 (I want to ignore all of the extra costs I would add on for now)Loan Amount: $56,000How do I enter all of this so that all of my numbers line up?
I tried to add the Google Authenticator app to a second device ,my ipad  as a back up, yet to my amazement I was unable to find a clear solution of how to do this online.
Smith A, Smith B, Smith Coruse the same repeating customer and add a separate reference?
We have sent our Xero network key to one of our suppliers to add to our contact details on their system.
can you guys somehow add a link that would take me directly to that question/response, or is that not possible?
It should be a fairly easy add inMany thanksJason
HiI am trying to add Barclaycard UK feed to our feeds.
What option we should choose - add-on / other?
and are delighted to invite you to their Xero + Add-on’s information session.
Since I am the principal user of this subscription, so only I can add or remove user, or access payroll etc.
Add the bikes as assets2.
Some have 500, but the team may not be in position to add it to their plans.
I'm having to go back through a year of bills and add them all again!
Does anyone know how I can add this tax rate to the bill?
Otherwise I have to manually add up all the bills using a calculator to see what we owe!
Is there any way, or an add-on that offers a way, of changing how transactions/history is viewed in each contact page?
When will a more featureful add-on be worthwhile?
ORHave the contact person name fields in the "add address" pop up, so it can all be done in one place.
Would it be possible to add a logo to purchase orders.
Could you add it please
Is it possible to add optional line items to a quote e. g. so if a user views the quote online and there is an item in the quote they wish to remove before accepting - is it possible to do so?
At point of collection I used xero smartphone app to add a receipt photographing the printed receipt received from the store (value of &#163;2100).
In order for me to work out how many payments have been made and what is outstanding I have to pull up the contact record and manually add it up.
So within the edit a contact screen, teh ability to add a document (or 2) would be great.
How do i convert/add the items on this Purchase Order to Inventory?
I don't want to have to add the accessories to the invoice as the customer is buying the product and they are add-ons.
When I tried to add my credit card, I found there is not drop-down option on my screen that allows me to select credit card.
Lets say these would add up to 1000.
I'm not interested yet in paying additional money for an add-on so I'm looking for a work around.
I assume if I don't have it I'll have to add it in.
I have managed to edit a couple of assets and add a serial number.
We are attempting to add the balances as from the figures supplied by our last accountant.
If I purchase an item with personal funds, how do I add that item to tracked inventory when I go to make an expense claim?
I know I can add another organisation to Xero (saving money in doing so) and restrict user access o different activity levels within that organisation.
Right now in inventory I add the Item code and Item name into the inventory section.
I guess the best way would probably be if I could create a batch and then add to it multiple times.
It would be really great if you could add or change Tracking using Find and recode.
what i done on my previous system was every month tally up the paypal fees and add an entry of that value.
I had a quick look through the add-ons but couldn't find anything that dealt with this specifically.
However, I am trying some add-on reporting with Fathom which can only run reports according to the financial year set up in Xero.
Is it possible to add function to allow to download the outstanding transactions into Excel/CSV?
It was from that moment that the Cloud Accounting Add-On Expo was born.
The tutorial should show how to add and delete fields, move fields, etc.
Click "Add" at the top right(This creates a default 0.
If that were to happen I could probably add 40 more clients to Xero!
So I figured I would add them to the "Customers" group but, strangely, that's not an option.
)Oh, I should add that we manually import statements from an OFX file and have never noticed duplicates.
As a result there are a lot of transactions that I want to add a tracker to.
(eg Holden Commodore - XXX123 - W-091273) Is there a way to add in extra references that are searchable?
HiWe've recently set up Xero and have a number of expense claims to add in.
I also can't see how I can add in my staff's claims on their behalf.
Is there a way that Xero or an Add-On can help in this matter?
HiWhen I add a line item on an invoice there is a little plus sign next to the Tax Rate that allows me to add an amount for tax in case it is slightly different.
Can we have the option to not have Receipts add to the Contact List?
My client has an arrangement with one of their employees who is on a salary that any additional hours worked over his agreed amount are to be added to his annual leave - so his salary agreement is for 35 hours - if he works 40 hours we are to add 5 hours to his annual leave.
I try to minus the accrued by used and it doesn't add up the balance showed?
Can Xero add a button so that leave loading can be calculated on the award wage/different wage.
Where in Xero do you add the APCA Id or the Direct Entry User Id?
I then go into timesheets to add the timesheets for July, Aug and Sept, however, I can only select Sept for this employee.
But when I try to add it, I am getting an error message : "Superannuation fund already exists".
Can I add a fund that is not regulated by APRA in Xero.
I am also wondering if it would be possible to add notes for each days timesheet for what their shift entailed.
I'm trying to add a Company logo into the Payroll system and it tells me "Something went wrong"!
Can I set up a wage template (similar to an enterprise bargaining agreement) for standard base wages and entitlements for apprentices, supervisors, skilled workers etc and then add extra entitlements to individual employees as required?
Will it mess up the Payroll module for FY15 if I do an unscheduled payrun to minus out the allowance and add it back in as a Salary payrun?
However, Xero only allows me to add Australian residential addresses to the employee information.
If I put it in wages it is already on file so am slightly worried it will add to the credit column?
The only thing I can do is add another ordinary hours earning line on the employees payslip to adjust for the correct hours.
Create a leave type and then add leave applications for your employees ensuring you select public holiday as the leave type2.
It is not clear where I add it in.
I was thinking to add an earnings item as the leave have already been paid.
I am trying to add the balance of personal / carer's leave to my employees' payslips in the same way that annual leave appears.
Are there ways to add employees to a Payrun manually?
I can see you can add tax but not take it off?
comIf you're an existing Paycycle customer and you haven't migrated across yet, there’s also some information in our Help Centre on how to do so: If you're not in Australia, please consider one of our great payroll add-on partners to get your payroll accounting entries pushed into Xero.
I should add that another employee who was only with us for a few weeks made $200 and had no Federal income tax withheld.
I did a reverse payrun to add a bonus that I originally forgot to add.
The Add button is grayed out.
com/add-ons I will give all beta testers a free unlimited seat subscription to MyDocSafe for helping us with the integration test.
Log onto Nest to add all the details there.
Instead, I have to add up all the hours and enter them manually to the payroll.
Also I note that if I click "Add Opening Balances" button, the Opening Balances for Tax Year 2015/16 is displayed with all the fields disabled, including the Employment Allowance field which is 0.
I've now been informed that we needed to add a bonus to one of the employees and as it's year end it needs to be done TODAY!
I've also allowed the employees to add paid overtime through timesheet.
is deducted after gross, if I add this refund to their gross it will be as though they were paid too much - their gross would be incorrect on their end of year P60.
Currently only the subscriber of organisations can add payroll admin to users - which isn't always practical when you are an adviser of hundreds of Xero clients, and that person may not be working that day or on holiday etc.
Will it add the accrued January holiday entitlement next month?
I have started adding an employee but it won't let me go any further if we don't add in pension provider, we are not scheduled to start auto enrollment pension yet so how do I disable this please?
C) Add the company logo to the payslips?
In the "Employment" Tab I have to set up an "Add Salary & Wages".
We then add the hours off our rostering software manually, and the payroll is done.
Add too.
Add custom Incomes & Expenses or adjust the planned dates to see the net cash affect.
If not, what add-ons have you found to be invaluable for speeding up transaction coding and reconciliations?
We are looking for a Xero add-on programme to keep records of our staff, their training and qualifications.
I am positive as with most things people have had positive experiences with Veeqo however I wanted to provide feedback for anyone else who is looking for an Inventory add on.
I keep getting the "add an organisation screen".
We are looking for a good document management add-on for Xero that includes the ability to auto-file emails to/from clients (similar to CCH iFirm’s  document management software).
We're looking for beta testers to try out our add-on, ReportAmigo.
If you are currently using an add-on, we would very much appreciate your feedback.
Opening a cafe and am curious for feedback on which POS add-ons work best with Xero?
We run Xero & about to add Zoho CRM & some shop drawing software to our front end.
I am looking for an add on that allows me, the bookkeepper, to put in timelines and deadlines that all staff can see and participate in.
What add-ons are you using to make your inventory changes etc.
I am after an add on that links to xero, which can deal with the second hand car margin scheme?
QUOTING system that allows one to change/add a markup percentage (or similar) per quote line item.
We noticed this because when we created our KPI dashboards, the numbers didn't add up.
I don't yet have the eway add on for Xero.
I am looking for an add-on to manage inventory right through the supply chain from growing to processing and sale.
Is anybody currently using an add-on for this that works well?
I am looking for an Add-on that will allow the tracking of inventory items by serial number through  Xero.
I have seen that it may be possible using Stripe add-on, could someone acknowledge me on that?
I have integrated iZettle as an add on to take card and cash payments.
We are looking for an add on to Xero that would do the following:1.
Does anyone have any recommendation of Add Ons that work well with Xero to do this, or even one Add on that can do both?
This add-on is ideal for retailers, cafe's, convenience stores, hospitality venues, trades people, and anywhere there may be a number of delivery locations and people involved in the receiving process.
We have a photography studio and I'm looking for an add-on to manage scheduling and emailing clients for appointments.
I love XERO and I'm looking for add-on that will replace Successware.
I think this will work for me, however the last thing I heard from Expensify was that they can auto filter out transactions for me if I send them the merchant name that showed up for transactions that I didn't want to add.
HiMy client needs an add-on that has both job costing and stock management (with landed costs) in the one add-on to link with Xero - any suggestions welcome.
I've been having a look through a lot of the Xero add-ons, but there are so many and it's a bit overwhelming!
A client of mine has had the bombshell dropped today that Order Harmony, an Add On for Xero, are closing at the end of May!
Also I want to know how we can calculate the super for each quarter (instead of having to make a note of each employees super each week and then add them up) in Xero.
It would be great to get an add on that linked with Xero to make their transition easier!
I have looked at many of the add on offerings for Xero.
If a module/add on is too much to ask for an idea for constructing a work around will also be helpful.
Which Add-On supports Negative Inventory?
We have been told that we have to create a customer in Xero for each individual Merchant and add it as a customer in Expensify!
I have had a look through the add on marketplace but cant really see anything.
We currently have 2 building clients looking for an add on to Xero that does something similar to these software platforms:•	http://www.
We are looking for an add-on which expands the capability of XERO tracking.
k. 	The ability to add ancillary costs to each service such as parking, printing, travel, accommodation etc.
Can anyone share their experiences ( both positive and negative) from using any of the CRM add-ons?
Any suggestions for another 'add on' provider that we could be looking at to provide this service or perhaps other alternatives?
Not sure if this is possible in the one add on option.
Unfortunately Xero have been unable to advise directly, due to the number of add-ons available.
I don't see this function anywhere in Xero itself, and a scouring the of the most popular reporting add-ons turns up nothing useful as well.
We, at Pipemonk, are super excited to announce our latest Xero add-on solution for FoxyCart store owners.
Free free to comment on this thread if you have query regarding the add-onThanks,Vijay
My client operates via his Opencart website, EBay and Amazon and up until the transactions haven't been enough to justify paying the extra costs for using an add-on partner.
I had a quick look through the add-ons for costings but most seem too complicated?
Track correspondence to customers in the Add-on.
Have an Electrical Contractor client who needs add-on for job costing and tracking.
But for us it may be a little bit too much to have two paid add-ons.
Do any of the other expense add ons support this?
Can you suggest an Add-on, Our customer would ring and say they have a fault with a machine, when we get there they would relies they have a fault with a few other machines too.
At the moment it is not possible to do this with Xero and their support has said find an add on but wont recommend one.
Its clear that if there is such a great community here around Xero, much of needed add-ons are already covered, developed.
Our existing integration with Shopify is 5-star rated Xero Add on.
I will ultimately move them to Xero so an add on would be good.
Our client is a roofing contractor who needs an add-on to prepare comprehensive quotes for commercial projects which can be converted to a 'project' once accepted and all expenses related to the project tracked against that job.
HiI am looking for a add on to analysis the trends for my customers and supplier.
If anyone could point to an add-on app that links to Xero that would help us out here, I'd be very grateful.
I see various add-on's that will download Xero data to spreadsheets, etc.
I am looking for an alternative to Winforecast that will "add on" to Xero.
I am after suggestions for which add-on will work best with creditors talking to debtors.
Can you recommend an add-on which can do the following:A customer send a Purchase order for x days consultancy which would be invoiced as and when.
We had the thought today that it would be a nice feature if you could integrate your current Add-on with the Demo company to see how it would work.
com/add-ons   We will give all beta testers   If you’re interested please email me directly at jan@datamolino.
I am looking for a suitable add on for a client in the window manufacture and installation industry.
I am really hoping that there is an add-on which can facilitate this as Xero does not currently appear to have intercompany  capability.
I'm looking for a project management/timesheet entry add on, that can be used to track hours spent on projects (within different tasks) and the invoiced amount.
HiI am looking for a xero add on which will allow me to track expenses and compare them with actual costs.
We want to keep perfecting the add-on before we release it publicly through the Xero app market.
Once I receive your email we will set you up with a free subscription to One Click Cash Collection add-on and walk you through the Xero integration.
Once I receive your email we will set you up with a free subscription to One Click Cash Collection add-on and walk you through the Xero integration.
It also nolonger appears in the directory of add ons.
I'm looking for an Add-On to Xero so that we can keep a record of all the various clients we have dealings with.
We want to keep perfecting the add-on before we release it publicly through the Xero app market.
Most of the Australian Add-ons only focus on one area.
It is telling me that I have to add customers phone numbers and address.
Add on to manage quoting, creating job cards, and scheduling of workflow.
From what we have seen on the Xero's Add on systems suggested DEAR and tradegecko seems to be best fit for us.
If so, please advise which add-on and if it has been effective.
com/signup and go to the Kounta Add-ons marketplace to connect Kounta and Xero.
Is there a Xero Add-on that could assist them with their production timetabling?
I have had a look on the Add on website but I can''t see anything specific for nurseries.
Looking for this killer add on!
Is there an inventory add-on that covers both point of sale and online transactions?
We have spoken to our IT Guys and they say Xero needs to add a API field then Geo-OP can do the same.
I am looking for the best payroll add-on for zero.
Anyone recommend one from the Xero add ons would suit us?
Or is there a further alternative add-on that I've not investigated yet ?
Can someone please let me know if this is possible with Xero's add-ons?
Has anyone found an add on solution that will allow me to print the MICR information on blank check stock?
John Mac(Posted to the Partner & Add-on forums as wasn't sure which was best)
Any suggestions or leads would be invaluable as all the add on products I review only do part of what we want.
com/us/add-ons/ecommerce and it's quite immense.
Does anybody know a way that as you add files to XERO they automatically sync with HIGHRISE and visa versa.
LEAP have an add-on for MYOB only.
Does anyone know if there is an add-on from LEAP Accounting to Xero or heard if a developer may be working on this?
Can anyone recommend a suitable add-on that will do the same as Boldfield does for Sage in respect of updating costs from nCall?
After collecting some excellent feedback from our customers we have added a number of features which add even further value to our great product.
Is see that Workflowmax has a 'leads management' add on.
Does this add on provide basic CRM functionality?
I would appreciate any help or pointers the Xero/Add-on gurus could offer!
There are so many add-ons out there it's hard to tell which will fit my needs without trying them all for myself.
ADD CUSTOM FIELDS TO POVery limited.
ADD REQUIRED BY DATE TO POAdd field to select from calender date goods are required/delivery required for every PO entered.
Hello I am currently using Xero on trial period and looking for an add-on that can be used for project management/job costing and inventory capabilities.
I was wondering if there is an already existing add-on that can cater for this industry?
If so, please try to join Ray Bonachea's presentation Feb. 21, at 3:20 p. m. , to learn more about , a social CRM which recently joined as an Add-on that works hand-in-hand with Xero.
Anyone have any suggestions as to payroll services or add-ons to XERO.
Please create an add-in to link Expense Cloud directly to Xero.
Therefore do any of you have experience with Workflowmax or any of the other compatible add ins and have a suggestion which would suit us best.
Is there an "add-on" which already does this?
Currently we can only add one freshbooks integration.
Can some one help with a add on that will help a builder keep track of his project costs.
What is your favourite Xero Add-on?
If you add an inventory item you can select "I purchase this item" and/or "I sell this item".
Additionally, would be possible to add Monthly Product Update as a filter to the search criteria so that these can be easily located?
Give us a click button somewhere on the screen to 'Add Last Items?
And perhaps in future, Xero might want to add an 'email preferences' link in the email notification that comes through - so that once you do decide to change the settings, it's easily done directly from your email inbox.
I would add that the reply to my VAT query was a lot more helpful, thank you!
I do realise there is inventory add- on but we are a med sized restaurant cafe , all the inventory add - on are  way over and above what we require.
You used to have a nice big field to add the address, you could copy all of the customers data from an email, paste it there then copy and paste what you needed into the other windows.
I have read through most of the Inventory Add-on comments.
No, I'm not comparing functionality--however, the reviews I'm reading are claiming that QB is very much catching up and has changed their entire approach to APIs and add-ons.
After talking to support about this I was told to delete the transaction and add it back in another way.
I have gone through all the Xero functions and  Add-One but couldnt figure out how to fix this issue.
We cannot be expected to add a workflow of converting all received pdfs to jpg surely?
##### CLUSTER 12 #####
I was curious how seamless it would be to integrate Xero with Volusion with respect to sales orders, and ultimately updating our inventory and COGS?
I am trying to figure out the quarterly report for sales tax collected on each revenue or sales item.
When you locate an invoice relating to an already submitted VAT ( Sales Tax in Xero's world) and you want to flag these for submission on next period.
When there are 2 sales taxes relating to invoicing, existing xero does't support to enter both taxes to be accounted separately .
We have distributors who buy our product and we have been reporting as Sales per customerCOGS per customerIn this way we can monitor the profitability of each customer.
At the moment, we work on our sales profit margin on our product excluding vat due to vat input/output and I am trying to figure out how I can link these figures in with utilising the budget manager if they include vat or is there a way to choose how these figures are displayed?
Which team would you put sales revenue to?
It would also be good to track sales and margins based on country of sale, would this be possible?
if so what do I put it under obviously it wont go under sales as I have not sold them anything and I cannot allocate to anything as they are all up to date with payments etc.
I got my sales tax rate all set up in Xero and this works fine, and my questions is more to do with the Remittances paid on a quarterly or annual basis: what are the best practices out there to do this?
Say, we have total sales of £1000.
A sales invoice of £1000.
OrA sales invoice of £1000.
Accordingly, I have now been paid for sales that took place in the past, before I became VAT registered.
The total amount has gross daily sales and tips.
Being newbies to Xero and Mindbody, we accidentally linked our incoming sales tax sales to "tax on purchases" instead of "Tax on sales" How do I switch over about 100 invoices whose tax rate is against tax code "Tax on Purchases" to "tax on sales"Thanks
So, for example, I have a sales tax account that says I owe the government $1,000 but the quick method means I only actually owe them $900.
VAT though is variable by week and with the best will in the world calculating it weekly based on sales and doing a manual transfer to prepayments will be .
I've got tracked inventory all with associated sales and cost prices.
But it transfer the amount from the bill  the Sales Tax.
Also, since I carry very little inventory, I don't account separately for inventory and opt to enter them on sales when sold.
However, in the P&L is it possible to pull more than one sales nominal code  into the cost of sales?
Scenario:We collect rewards from the customer and merchant daily and recognise it as sales.
The way we are doing:For this, we create a Sales Invoice for the amount received.
I've already entered my Sales opening balance for the year into Xero.
I have two types of sales:1. sales that come via my online store and I don't invoice for, and2.
sales that I invoice forMy question is in regards to sales that I invoice for AND which are paid via Paypal.
Some of the sales were paid for with cash, others EFTPOS.
Please can we have Sales Tax codes and reporting setup for EU trading, not only purchasing?
my question is when doing my P+L it is recording these as sales but my conversion balance is obviously in sales ledger account so this means my figures make no sense.
How can we adjust Sales in regards to daily eftpos transactions which include both GST and GST Free Sales.
If I have a client that is for exmaple on the standard pricing plan but then changes to the starter pricing plan, what would happen to the clients balances in the sales ledger and purchase ledger?
The Sales Ledger would already be over the limit that the starter pricing plan has set?
Sales Tax paid: this is being carried on the balance sheet, it has no purpose.
Seems Xero is designed for manufacturing/sales of products, and if you do anything else you're basically stuck.
I have 2 questions:- I have been using the EC Sales Services tax code on the invoice, however, these sales do not appear on the vat return, are they supposed to?
I thought this was a little strange as my expenses exceed the sales tax I've charged.
I've looked through the Sales Tax Transactions page and see that sales have been marked as "credits" and expenses have been marked as "debits".
The account type for Sales Tax is set as "Current Liability".
This means Sales - Deposit received today for next years holidayPurchases - Deposits paid today for next years holiday.
They process the sale of her items through their boutiques Shopify account (they also keep 12% of her sales + sales tax on these purchases).
I run the P&L and in the sales line (before costs of goods sold) it gives me a figure.
Therefore each quarter our apportionate percentage changes depending on sales and expenses levels during the quarter.
I'm trying to find out how the VAT on sales works on Xero.
I tried Find and Recode on the existing data but nothing reposts - I guess because Sales Tax is a control account .
As i have added ' Install Team' as the item, what 'sales account' should i select?
For example, a deposit representing sales, is coded to sales, but then the GST field remains blank.
Sales for day are total of eftpos and cash.
5% for Resale & Not for Resale (=4 codes)Sales @ 23% (=1 code)Tax Exempt (=1 code)Zero Rated Tax (=1 code)The locked tax rates of "Sales Tax on Imports" and "Tax on purchases", would therefore not be used.
ORWould those codes be set up under the Sales & purchase tax locked codes as drop downs?
I'm looking for advice on the most efficient way to handle my sales.
I will be running all sales through dedicated buttons on the till - but this will still show up in my daily sales figues.
Is there a way to select multiple transactions and reconcile them with one sales invoice?
I frequently end up with the Sales Tax being off by one cent.
From a tax perspective I want to keep this clean, so propose to record the settlement of my sales invoice in full and then settle the purchase of Equity (cash net zero), and record the same on my balance sheet as an (Investment) Asset.
In my state (NC - US) I have to include on my sales tax report the total sales, the portion of total sales that is tax exempt and the portion of total sales that is taxable.
I'm setting up Xero for a Petrol Station and wondering if there's a better way I could be entering in their sales.
I'm entering in transactions from May 2015, each day gives a breakdown of fuel and shop sales and then the breakdown of GST/GST Free sales.
I'm unsure what my offsetting account would be if I did a manual journal entry to move the sales from "Wine Dinner Sales" on 03/27/2016 and then reverse the entry 04/06/2016.
For January:Total sales of dealer 1, dealer 7, and dealer 13.
Show those sales with everything Thats pretty much it.
In trying to track down issues with sales tax reporting relative to other internal office systems, i noticed sales tax is being rounded incorrectly (or differently) on invoices.
Sales tax rate is 6.
Or doing the rounding on an individual line item basis (vs the total) throwing off all sales tax reporting.
Cash paid and received is in 2016 but we don't want to affect our current year purchases and sales.
How do I assign an account to sales tax or purchase tax?
5% and Sales tax 8.
5%) and want that Sales tax at 7.
5% should go to sales tax 7.
5% account and sales at 8.
65 to Sales Tax 8.
In California - and perhaps other states - goods which are purchased for resale are exempt from Sales Tax on that purchase.
In this case, the sales taxes paid on goods for resale may be used as an offset against sales tax liability (the forwarding of sales taxes collected on goods sold to the taxing authority).
Sales are the money made from jobs, therefore GST on sales gets paid to the gov and falls under 1A GST on sales.
We have a commerce site, and 90% of our sales are commerce site driven and are not invoice driven.
The sales transaction is recorded against the trial entry account.
The transaction is recorded in the sales account.
There is no sales tax issue.
We then change the date on the sales invoice to the tour date (next year) and approve the sales invoice in Xero.
This pushes the sales invoice into the next financial period.
Most of my sales are online so it's not a huge issue going forward.
Scenario:Option 1: Let’s say I buy a popcorn machine for R5000 (fixed asset)and I rent it out for R500 (rental sales) which includes popcorn and spices and this cost me R100 (cost of goods sold).
Option 2: I buy a popcorn machine for R5000 (COGS)and I rent it out for R500 (rental sales) which includes enough popcorn and spices for 50 people and this cost me R100 (COGS).
And In next month I made the sale of remaing goods, so my profit will be (Sales - Codt Of Goods Sold) and due to that percentage of Profit are different in each month.
I've integrated iZettle feed with the wrong VAT on sales, I'm flat-rate VAT and it's showing as 20%.
How can I best track my sales and inventory in Xero?
My Paypal is integrated, so those sales will show.
How can I best account for my sales?
I take Square Payments and offer both sales of products (herbs & supplements) and service (acupuncture treatment).
Sales is goods sold and then i have another account called "Acupuncture".
She has 2 types of sales; Services, which have GST, and Retail products which have GST & PST.
Obviously it will be near impossible to choose the correct amount from Visa, MC, Cash and interac to equal one total daily sales invoice and make it match, plus deposits over the weekend lump together also.
Should I code the prepayment to an accrued sales code in the balance sheet?
I receive payments from Amazon every month for Kindle, CreateSpace, and Affiliate Sales, as well as iTunes Payments and Google App Payments.
I do e-commerce through Squarespace, and I accidentally had Squarespace set up to take sales tax, even though my product is exempt in my state.
I have refunded the sales tax, but I don't know how to reflect that in Xero.
I can log in to eWay and see which online sales correspond to which settlement, but cannot see this for EFTPOS.
08I tried splitting the transactions into 3 (2 for A/R sales and 1 for cash sales.
I am tracking the sales per type (Food, beverage, etc) and have no info on what was sold via cash and A/R.
I have other stylists that the sales go thru my salon but i keep 50% for their rent and the remaining amount is their sales/tips.
Some sales are within Australian and I collect GST, some sales are overseas and I do not charge GST or collect it, however you look at it.
When I go into financial settings I see Cash Basis or Accrual Basis as a drop down menu choice under the Sales Tax heading.
I'm confused as to how to deal with a daily tally of sales.
The other an almost equal sales invoice for services we have provided.
This code applies to all purchases and sales.
We're a retailer with daily sales proceeds by credit card deposits.
I'm curious how to handle a sales tax refund on a purchase I made that was originally coded as inventory to be sold (140)?
Certain suppliers charge me sales tax upfront and give a refund of the sales tax after the sale instead.
In the chart of accountants, I have set up 3 codes : "Sales UK", "Sales Europe" and "Sales International".
My boss wants me to give him reports for the following :1) Sales UK - quantity of Part 1 sold Vs quantity of Part 2 sold2) Sales Europe - quantity of Part 1 sold Vs quantity of Part 2 sold3) Sales International - quantity of Part 1 sold Vs quantity of Part 2 soldWhen I run a report based on chart of accountant code and export into excel, it puts the part number into the same box as the company name so I cannot re-order it by part number.
I mistakenly set the sales tax rate on about 6000 reconciled transactions to 5% (tax inclusive).
We receive a total of $1500 for $2000 worth of sales.
I then invoice my client at cost through Sales.
My online store is through Squarespace and daily sales summaries account for stripe fees.
50Would we record the sale as Suspense 850  $35 Sales               - $24.
For all the old sales/expenses prior to setting up tracking, do you bulk assign all these to the 1st store somehow so reports are tidy?
but it turns out that both post as CR and now it shows twice the amount of sales that I have actually done (whilst Tax man would be happy, I certainly aren't)  :-PAny advice on how to balance those two or if I misunderstood something?
I had created a sales invoice for $1000 to our customer.
A have a few concerns I would like to be advised with :1 - Sales vs Contract Worker PaymentSince the sales are booked in the current month as they occur, and the invoice of each contract worker is issued and paid in the following month, both sales and expenses don't end up being booked in the same month.
I tried to call Xero only find out that you do not have phone support team, only a phone sales team?
A major issue is that we get a large percentage of our sales from a "daily deal" site.
The merchant center provides the sales details, minus merchant fees and credit card fees.
We have only done eBay sales (we have a store on their site) so far but we are about to open our WooCommerce web store as well at our own official domain.
We are probably looking at towards 1000 sales a month, and it may go over that - which I realise Xero is not built for.
Side question:My "Sales Tax Payable" account was $7.
How do I move it from Holding Stock to Sale Purchases as a cost against the right sales invoice?
My balance sheet is showing correct but in the P&L statement the less cost of sales column is showing opening inventories (16914.
I have the following in sage:2200		Sales VAT Control Account						CR 28642.
The eBay fees are % of my sales (variable cost depending on sales volume).
My credit card merchant Swipe HQ makes batch payments every few days from credit card sales with fees deducted.
Here is a typical transaction:- My client sells tickets to an event- I collect all sales from my clients customers through a managed merchant account.
- There may be other line items such as a monthly subscription fee, taxes collected on behalf of, donations collected on behalf of, etc- I then wire by ACH the gross ticket sales to my client.
Clients want to see a breakdown of gross ticket sales, order totals, my service fees, taxes, etcNow I don't have an accountant, because I believe I can more or less automate this once I craft the proper way to book keep everything.
Should I track incoming gross ticket sales into a liability account (my bet), or sales/revenue?
Sometimes I owe them a lot of money (collected their ticket sales)7.
I did a collaborative art project where I am selling the prints and giving a % of the sales to my collaborator.
My question - is it possible to send the pdf file attachments with a sales invoice?
If so, how do I then "move" it to Sales?
Questions:1) Is my thinking correct that Sales Tax on Imports will track taxes due but not show them as owed by customers on an invoice2) How do I edit this rate?
In the balance sheet, there are 2 lines under "Current Liabilities" for GST - "GST Collected on Sales" and "GST".
I would have expected that "GST Collected on Sales" would be a positive figure, being money that is owed to the ATO as the tax that is collected when the company makes sales.
The JE would be Debit to Due from and the Credit would be to the individual unpaid sales invoice.
We have a specific group of sales and purchases that are deemed 'out of scope' of VAT.
Hello everyone,I'm having a problem calculating sales taxes for meals and entertainment in Canada.
Now, in Xero I created a separate sales tax component for meals & entertainment whereby the sales tax rate used for meals and entertainment expenses is half of the GST/PST rate, but this is where I run into problems.
BUT when you go to the SALES > AWAITING PAYMENTS section it shows $8789.
He had a number of questions, one was, why was there a negative balance in the sales tax account under current liabilities.
Rule 1: Classifies the withdrawal of $xxxx as "630 Cash Float" which I set up as an "Asset" in the Chart of AccountsRule 2: Classifies the deposit the following friday as a Fixed Line of $xxxx as "630 Cash Float" with 95% of the remainder as "200 - Sales - GST" and the other 5% as "210 - Sales - GST Free".
With every transaction (sales & purchases) I have made sure to account for the amount of VAT and its percentage on every line item.
Now XERO is deriving its VAT Return from the total amount of VAT taken in on SALES (which is fine) and the total amount of VAT paid out in purchases for each VAT Rate.
For example, I want to reconcile a hotel stay with the same amount I have entered onto a sales invoice.
Sales invoice is in approved status, but not paid.
Can I post directly to unearned revenue and account for VAT rather than post to sales which I don't want to do as P&L's won't be accurate.
You paid x in sales and 3. you owe revenue x.
I am comfortable with using pending sales and prepayments for future transactions in Xero but am trying to work out how to transfer them from MYOB.
This creates a nice payables balance for tracking sales tax owed.
I have a question about how to handle custom reporting on sales abroad.
I have two tax codes with one component each:Incoming Sales Tax, 25%- High TaxOutgoing Sales Tax, 25%- High TaxThese are used for domestic purchases and sales respectively.
This would enable total sales and tax to be correctly recorded in our ledgers.
What do I need to do to make this appear in the Sales of July 2012 instead of the Sales in June 2012.
My question is: i want to post a reversing journal over the year end to take the amount out of (then back into) sales, what's the procedure (and am I doing the right thing)?
Having followed the help section this will raise a sales invoice (@ nil profit) and raise a trade debtor.
My client measures the amount of deposits and also the value of those orders not yet sales.
All our sales and post of our expenses are in GBP, but we work with a few people who bill in USD - for example for online software.
However, iZettle only offer the option to send all sales to Xero as one sales code (200).
I don't know if this makes sense but any advice on how to track daily sales & expenses on xero would be greatly appreciated!
Require TWO invoice numbering systems for SALES and REPAIRS eg SALES to be 4 digits and REPAIRS to be 5 digits and to follow on from current books.
Here's an illustration:I have $500 in my till PLUS $250 in cash sales for the day.
Looking at Xero I have to view sales and purchases separately for one 'department / tracking category'.
We have already used both of the tracking categories which are needed for sales categories, unfortunately these can't be removed.
HII was looking for some help on the followingI have some sales credit notes in Xero, and some of them are for companies who have not claimed them and have since left us.
HiWe have mistakenly recorded an expense to a 'Sales' coded account.
But of course this has meant they haven't come through as a direct cost of sales where I think they should, especially on assignments where I bill for them.
Motor mechanic receives €1,000 in cash sales from five different customers.
The way we work is that a horse incurs charges during the month (saved as a draft Sales invoice) & then once all charges have been accumulated throughout the month, at the end of the month the bill is split to multiple owners.
Apart from deleting each invoice one by one and re adding them, is there a way to change them from Sales to Suppliers at the click of a button?
I currently have been stuck using Square for in person sales and Xero (With Stripe Prcoessing) for online sales.
Thinking maybe taking a phone call these days was a bit old fashioned, as a quick comparison I phone both MYOB and Quickbooks (which I think are the main online competitors to Xero in AU), and within 60 seconds I was talking to a sales person from both companies.
I'm trying to find a way of creating an easy set up in Xero for reporting Key Indicators to enable me to see if local advertising, google advertising or website alterations create a different to our sales.
I am having trouble with the Cash sales and don't know how to handle these in Xero.
but then this would be double counting the Sales transactions already imported into Xero from shopify.
I keep the cash sales and cash expenses in seperate spreadsheets.
C) The ability for an API feed to automatically pick up web orders and create a list of 'Live Orders'This would help me to manage my sales better.
I have created an invoice, added my sales item, added a postage cost and now I want to take that total and minus 30% commission off the cost of the sales item (which goes to the retailer).
But also the total cost of the sales item.
We did try Poli for the internet banking but 99% of our sales are to other businesses.
Am I better to enter the sales from my POS program daily/weekly/monthly and remove the statement lines that are sales/income related?
For example, when I enter design, I wanted the "Tax on Sales" to automatically pop up in the sales tax section of my invoice.
I can't see an option for this and have been working with creating a branding profile for each sales person and adding static contact details content to the templates.
Eg I want to see what Marketing Produced ho much sales.
I have approx 12 "Cash Sales" per month and wondering what is the best way to put this through Xero without creating a contact for every individual client.
I opened a contact "Cash Sales" and went in to edit the address to suit with each customer after approving the invoice.
I am looking for a way to insert a missed  line in a Sales Invoice.
After sending a couple of emails to support and sales I've had no response.
Sending the sales orders?
Also, am I right in thinking that I should be using the Quote feature as my Sales Order?
Question we have a small retail shop and also a cash box at the farm for cash sales from farm tour people.
After reaching the front page his traffic went from 75 a month to 450, the amount of calls he received almost tripled and you can guess what happened to the amount of sales he was making!
The result will be a GST refund due to the high expenses and low sales at this point.
I don't know if this has been a topic of discussion, but when I created a quote, the contact's sales tax rate did not automatically show up in the tax field.
E. g my sales are £1000 for the month and I refund £5.
If I create an overpayment would it bring my sales up to £1005 so that when I refund the customer it comes back down to £1000.
The $10 &  $19 subs don't fit because they don't have the sales invoice feature.
I submit sales tax to multiple states and am currently using WaveAccounting.
Another issue is that I might create a draft Sales Invoice for a client which builds/accumulates over a period of months and contains information derived from multiple Bills and parts.
This occurred on Sales VAT.
Let's say on a typical day we have 5 sales: 4 credit card transactions totalling $2,200 and 1 check for whatever, let's say $500.
In our current system, each of these 5 sales is a separate transaction.
It shows each of these sales/receipts.
Currently, we enter all retail book sales on monthly zero sum sales receipts.
I would like to continue on in this way, if possible, as the zero sum sales receipts give her correct sales and sales tax information which she needs to report monthly to the state.
We have staff that we want draft only access for but they do not require access to sales data.
Sales are received in cash and by EFTPOS.
When I click 'Sales' on the dashboard I'm shown a nice example of what a sales graph could look like, but because *all* of our income comes from card transactions and PayPal (micropayments for subscriptions) we don't actually deal in sales invoices - therefore our nice sales screen is going to waste.
State Sales tax is 6.
If I select "tax exclusive" Xero calculates the sales tax shows it at the bottom and the total matches the total amount of the reciept.
I find that when I do this, my Tax Rates return to default for my Sales Code, rather than what they were on the previous invoice.
I have had clients inadvertently select the purchases code when entering a sales invoice and the chances of that being an error have got to be over 99.
Dear All:I understand that the mobile apps allow our sales people to enter their expenses when they are on the road.
CATProjects can export sales invoice data across to Xero and this data is transferred into the fields of draft sales invoices.
it actually tells me under Sales that I have a draft invoice, 11 unpaid for $383, and 4 overdue for $124.
but I imported all our 1,500 sales contacts, and Xero correctly identified the area code.
Our state requires a separate sales tax return be filed for each store location.
Sales by contact is provided only at the aggregate level.
WorkflowMax has a "Zero rated GST" checkbox field in the client screen that the WFM Help Centre states "If this is an overseas client and you are exporting to them, you may not be required to collect sales tax, so select this checkbox to set the sales tax on your invoices at 0%.
When multiple payments are made to the one sales receipt, it can become confusing for customers.
However, the issue is that when the bankfeeds come through they put the items straight to sales or straight to cost of sales for instance and effectively both income and expenses can be doubled.
Can this be added as an option to the Sales Tax, Tax Period in Financial Settings?
"), and I have update by with out providing this sales terms but its not working.
Could the headings instead be "sales/income" and "purchases/expenses"?
But if I could for example see how many of X product was sold in September,  of Group A sales in October.
Instead it refreshes the page to the Sales or purchase account.
Currently, I can't compare for e. g. Aug 16 customer sales versus Aug 15 customer sales, unless I export to excel and spend about 10-15 minutes manipulating data to show what I need.
When creating new Sales Tax Groups, it would be ideal to have a drop down menu of existing sales tax items and groups to select from so that they are kept consistent and to avoid creating a possible duplicate sales tax item for the same municipality.
We have staff members who have user access of Sales, 'Invoice Only'.
I don't want to present my IS costs by "nature of expense" (staff, depreciation etc) but by "function of expense" (cogs, sales & marketing, general & admin, R&D, etc).
Every customer in xero is assigned to a sales representative and we need to see the customer sales in total each month for that sales rep.
It would be great if we could get a sales analysis report by item and featuring month by month analysis (like in MYOB) so we can see the sales each month in columns.
In, India, there are Excise for productions unit and service tax for service industry and VAT for sales and I can see only GST feature at Xero.
Could a select box be added to the purchase and sales invoice screen, which would allow all transactions listed to be allocated to a tracking code.
That is to see how many units of a particular item we have sold for a particular sales group so I can compare with my margins to see how much contribution each particular product made over a particular month.
We get asked by insurance and various other bodies that we deal with for sales by location - and I can't find that information readily available in Xero.
If a sales representative has been added to a contact under the customer information profile, the invoice corresponding to this contact should automatically pre-fill with their name.
We do obtain quotes from our vendor on a one on one basis, so using the Xero Inventory to get a sales NET per client order has been near to impossible.
allow COGS and employment cost as a percentage of sales.
It is available on the Sales Invoice one.
It would be helpful if this could be linked to Sales/Contacts so when creating a final invoice the approved variation would pop up.
We have an admin team with Sales Only user role that prepare the batch deposits.
When we first printed the Sales Tax Report, we expected Taxable Sales by Tax rate, total Sales Tax collected, and non-taxable sales.
What we found was the Tax Exempt tax code detail included ALL Payroll entries and Expense transactions, along with the non-taxable sales.
There was no way to easily get a non-taxable SALES number, except to bring the report into Excel, and delete the lines that were not relevant to Sales Tax.
Sales Tax Reporting should be for SALES only.
Suggestion: Allow inventory quantities to be tracked at the item level but disconnect it from active sales/invoicing and instead allow COGS accounting to occur on demand (similar to how depreciation of fixed assets works).
The Sales Tax  to Vat heading is more important though.
I have tried Income By Contact and Sales by Item.
Sales by Item is okay however it stills includes refunds.
Currently setting up a tracking category on a customer account will not default select that tracking category on lines added to quotes and sales.
It would be good to have the option to give users access to both the sales and purchases areas of Xero instead of one or the other.
Take payments on the spot and create a sales receipt, with a automatic sale receipt reference number.
The reporting available to sales managers and teams in Xero is not good.
Sales by item - better - but without the tracking categories I'm still missing some data.
Sales by account - ok - but because Xero was immature when we started using it years ago, we have sales divided into all these buckets so we could track sales.
I was originally searching from within the Sales page.
- It appears that the Global sales tax reporting is based on the New Zealand sales tax requirements.
This will allow us to verify the suggested match as the PayPal reference (from automatic feed) and our sales invoice reference (created from our webstore using the API) are always the same.
We have 'Sales Discount %'; why not 'Purchases Discount %'?
For small/medium sized businesses, only 1 USER is available to perform DATA ENTRY functions: sales, purchases, receive money, spend money.
I am already having problems in Jamaica with this feature; senior managers have to do DATA ENTRY for the CASH functions because they give staff the INVOICE ONLY (draft only) access,which allows them to do data entry for SALES and PURCHASES only.
When I am on the road I want to see sales that day.
I have set up a German company on Xero and I don't see the option to produce EC Sales List as we do for a UK company.
This would help us to analyse the level of sales from each customer on a monthly basis.
This would mean allowing us to create up to 40 different sales invoice templates.
The same thing applies to Sales and Purchases - usually looking for history for a specific customer or supplier, so why not provide the search screen straight away rather than having to select and wait again?
It is also annoying to have to do separate searches for say "All Sales" or "Open Sales" for the same customer.
I know there are various ways to report on Sales in a period, but it would be great if there could be a panel in the dashboard that could be set to display total sales from any given date or for a set period, set by the user.
Therefore we receive hundreds of payments from invividual debtors each month that are matched to one xero sales invoice.
I'd love to see a feature that would allow a PO to be generated automatically for any items in sales orders that aren't in inventory.
Ideally this would aggregate the quantities from all outstanding sales orders that can't be met with current inventory and create a single set of POs to send to suppliers.
I deal with both account customers and individual sales.
No access to total figures of sales.
Hiit is really important to have a back order column  for both sales and purchase.
However, none of these options enables you to show all "Actual Invoiced Sales".
This would be much quicker and easier to navigate, instead of having to navigate into sales, then navigate again into the particular area.
Income no problem, however the Grant Expense could be in Cost of Sales or Expense or even Fixed Assets.
For example Equipment Purchases v Equipment Sales, Services Purchases v Services Sales and Design Purchases v Design Sales.
The costs of these items have to be applied against our jobs / sales in WorkflowMax to enable us to monitor the P&L on our jobs / sales in WorkflowMax.
Currently, three reports allow me to see Quantity of Units Sold: Inventory Item Summary, Sales By Item, and Inventory Item Detail.
We have a situation where we have different types of sales activity set by different account codes.
These sales activity types can be used across the same client or many clients.
A report of each inventory item detailing sales to each customer (Quantity and $) and/or sales to each customer of inventory items (Quantity and $).
While we try to keep things electronic and avoid using paper, sometimes it is necessary for us to have to Print a sales invoice on paper.
pdf to the Sales Invoice.
APPROVING ORDERS -                                    TO CUSTOMER AND SALES REP .
AND DRIVER CONTACT                                     NUMBERTHESE FEATURE MAKE TRUST ABOUT COMPANY ,AND REDUCE SALES PERSONS NEGLIGENT
HiWhen looking at the P&L report, clicking on a sales line will show the components of the sales in individual product sales, rather than individual invoices.
I created a repeating sales invoice and chose “Approve for Sending”.
This process takes longer than it should, and it's obviously not streamlined with our Xero and Harvest sales/invoicing workflow.
Say for example, a simple arrow indicating that cash is declining, sales are increasing and debtors are increasing.
This would be useful where there is a split of GST and GST free items, or purchases with freight that varies, or sales where commission is not predetermined and must be entered from invoice (eg livestock).
e. g. a GL lock that allows Sales & Purchases to be applied, as long as they do not affect the totals?
Wish I could limit sales staff to only see information relevent to their sales.
For example, if an invoice that gets imported from another sales channel comes in with the incorrect tax code, we have to edit every single line, and if it was a large order, it takes forever.
Increase sales and sales speed.
Would it be possible to have different background or font colours for sales and purchases ie purchases blue and sales redWould be good to distinguish which one easily youre in by colourI have ocassionally entered invoices for in  purchases that should have been sales
We have the ability - albeit rather crudely - to 'select' an e-mail address for a particular Contact depending on whether we are e-mailing a Quote, Purchase Order, Bill, Sales Invoice, Remittance Advice, etc.
Xero's current Sales tax feature does support this to some extent, but with some attention full support for Singapore's GST system can be built in, including an auto-generation of the periodic filing Form F5.
we have come from Cash Manager whose dashboard had:Last months sales: $XXXXXXX.
When searching through Sales / Purchases items at present you can only search by number, reference or name.
Custom tax rates - when setting up a custom tax rate with a BAS Excluded tax type and 0% GST, have an option to link it to sales or purchases.
I am sure it is a condition of ISO 9001 here in the UK to provide an Order Acknowledgement on receipt of Sales Order confirming price and planned ship date.
I see this being a preface to raising the Sales Invoice in the same way that Purchase Orders will be converted to Bills.
Can users with sales access have full access to the sales ledger?
I've yet to see whether I can create and adequate DOCX sales template which will give me a satisfactory looking Australian sales invoice though.
Lots of benefit here for businesses that have sales staff or agents and want to quickly run a report to show them how the sales they are responsible for are performing.
As a distribution company we outsource sales to representatives.
Someone else does the data entry and at a glance I can tell if last week's sales receipts are entered or not, and likewise, she can quickly view what I have entered.
GST is handled fine in XERO, no problems there (GST collected on sales, minus GST paid on purchases = GST to remit to government).
E. g. Cash Sales for a day - could be a combination of cash, cheques, eftpos (including Visa & Mastercard), Amex, Diners etc.
I've seen too many cases where clients/users have accidentally billed a Sales Tax inclusive amount when they intended to bill as exclusive.
Xero help centre states that:"If you do include sales tax on an invoice or credit note that's in another currency, the tax amount will be calculated and displayed in the currency of the item.
Sometimes (depending on how I name them) expense codes can appear in-between sales codes.
Counter sales customers are never too happy to wait while a sales clerk navigates fluffsaround navigating through a number of different screens to simply provide a GST receipt/invoice.
While a minute may not much to wait for an invoice/receipt, in a fast moving counter sales environment, queus can go on for longer than required.
I have tracking in place looking at sales categories, and I have employees tracked against the relevant sale categories.
All I want to do is track at total cost level and not item level, so I can simply see what stock at cost I am buying versus sales etc.
Thinking of doing this by following, say if sales is .
Right now I have to generate a sales by item date range.
It has been entered in Xero in "Other Revenue" but that means it is showing up on our Profit & Loss which I don't want as it is not really Sales.
This sends sales directly into Xero.
As an example, if someone has bought 4 items, each sold for £10 with a cost of £5 for me, the first line of £5 is entered into my Cost of Goods Sold and the total £40 is entered into my Sales.
Another example, I have an order which is recognised in my Sales as £100 but nothing is recorded at all in my Cost of Goods Sold.
However due to sales going through the same day as the refund the merchant settles daily less the refund and puts that into our account.
Hello all,Wonder if anyone can advise me - I am looking at using the sales invoice import function in Xero and have a few questions.
At the end of the day the information goes to Xero to tell me my sales, tax rate, Square charge, etc.
As it all comes on the same invoice and is paid out inone amount clothing department profit gets reduced because of items given for free in franchise sales.
3) When vendor ships any number (or all) of the items on my PO I assign those items to the appropriate Sales Order.
Sometimes a PO goes to one order, sometimes there might be multiple items on a PO that might go to different Sales Orders.
Relatively easy since all the sales are on PayPal.
But It seems like the system and/or myself has doubled up sales inputted and transferred sales from cliniko.
A sales invoice was created & sent by email to the client via Xero.
At the end of year, I want to close entry from Sales tax account to income tax expense Can you guide me how to do it ?
A couple of sales that have been paid and some expenses that I have receipts for but nothing to reconcile them against.
If GST is collected on a Accrual Bases then the BAS statement adds up the invoice manual journals for sales and GST.
I have clicked "approve" rather than "save as draft" on a sales invoice, is there anyway I can return to draft status?
Our sales I have all put as no VAT.
Is it right that I've been putting all our sales as no VAT pre the registration date?
I have a client wanting to track individual sales (via Xero) within a barber shop, thus using sales invoice module in effect to record each member of staffs daily sales, etc.
The client is a chef who has one company that she uses for e-commerce sales and the other for speaking engagements/cooking classes.
I am trying to check that I have correctly divided employee payg and sales gst in the installments that I have paid.
Each month, I get a few payments from sales on my website from Stripe.
It could be online advert, personal friend, BNI Networking, Online Advert, Press Advert, Sales Agent Fred and so on.
For each daily deposit, I can pull Sales, Sales Tax, Shipping and Credit Card Fees information from Shopify and put it into a CSV file.
I tried importing a less amount but it still did not import the full amount of sales.
We have charged a sales tax that wasn't supposed to be charged on a line item.
I split my sales by specific type, e. g. within Consultancy I have plain consultancy and training.
Using tracking Sales may be classified by market segment and product.
Will this be quicker and smoother in Xero with a similar number of stock lines (maybe more than 500 lines)Also, sales order processing does seem to be available.
I've managed to change the sales tax rate in general settings > tax rates then clicking on 'tax on sales'.
MYOB has the ability to calculate within the dollar amount fields (via a pop-up calculator) in sales, purchases, spend money and receive money.
We've switched from Sage and used to have an account that we called Cash Sales.
But if I enter all the profit & loss information - sales, rent, salaries etc.
The interest element of the sales invoice will go to sales.
Have i done something wrong as I thought it would enter the sales price.
the Inventory Item field involved is "Sales Description (for my customers)".
But what why can't I enter in conversion balance tax (sales and others) a/p and expenes and then move forward from there.
Our sales numbers are never correct and I am at a loss to figure out why.
The second is a line item of type INV called Square - Net Credit Card Sales that is the invoice that square uploaded on each day.
So this tells me that Square is syncing and we are in fact adding net credit card sales twice.
If I want to record say a donation I cannot record it as Sales, or Revenue or Other Income because none of these account relate to the FRS 102 that I have been told to follow.
They were all originally put to one income account - Sales 1.
Now, the Squarespace sales map Stripe's fees to our Cost of Goods account.
So say I have :Item A for $5 (sales tax 10%)Item B for $10 (sales tax 10%)Service A for $10 (no sales tax)But I don't want the individual line item prices to show on the client invoice.
50 including sales tax for the two taxable items.
For sales transactions, do i have to create a single invoice on Xero and match it with the paypal transaction?
We have been using Xero for over two years now, and we have set up tracking categories to track our 'Sales streams' and another for tracking 'Projects'.
The sales come from the same stock of items, so creating two separate items would be problematic.
I have used the correct sales price in Xero and so, for example, 100 items sold should be £100.
Why or why can we not post payments on account to either sales or purchase ledgers (not that either exist) and have them including in a VAT return for cash accounting.
Dear xero team and community,I encountered a srange problem with displaying sales discounts on my custom invoice template.
Ie to take a customers order "quote" and apply deposits monies to it whilst the various purchase orders are being completed for each sales order.
00If I calculate the sales tax by hand using a "calculator", I see the sales tax should be $17.
Sales in the income statement include sales tax.
In reporting sales on monthly sales tax returns, we must compute the tax included in each customer's reported sales to get to real net sales which are then reported to the tax authorities.
This is how Quickbooks does it, and it is much better for sales tax reporting.
The recurring sales would be a much needed feature that will allow standing orders to be saved as recurring transactions.
Recently apple forced an update on us, which has resulted in an irratic ability to select and edit cells on the sales and purchases pages.
Original sales transaction was GST free sales $1000GST on sales $3000 (attracted $272.
I have already paid the GST on sales of $272.
Unfortunately in this scenario, whilst the sales account only shows the final transaction and the P&L looks right, Sales by Item shows the product being sold twice and Xero's inventory record is incorrect.
Before sending that invoice I was managing my other company sales profile its logo setting etc.
When copying a sales invoice to enter a similar item, I accidently clicked on void.
When we make a purchase, it doesn't mean that we made sales as well.
What I know is Sales - Cost of goods sold = Gross profitCost of goods sold = Cost of inventory in the beginning of the period + purchases - Inventory cost at the end of period.
Hi,We get regular amounts from Worldpay: they give us a transfer report which credits us for book sales (zero VAT/sales tax), but has an bill attached (including VAT/sales tax).
So he would have a merchant ammount every day from credit card, direct deposits, as well as a paypal deposit from the ebay sales.
00	20% (VAT on Income)Barclays	Refund	03/05/2013	Cost of Sales	101	-21.
Well, I actually know why they are not - it is becuase the PAYE payable account is setup by default as a current liability, rather than cost of sales or operating expenses.
Am I right to label them all "Sales"?
Now i have taken a look at my profit and loss report and it says my sales are about $300 more than what PayPal is saying for my sales may, also April is a little off as well.
I make a lot of sales so it would be a huge pain to go through each individual item on the list and cross reference it with PayPal.
I ended up using the sales tax transactions numbers for filing, as well as the total sales numbers pulled from the profit and loss report.
Edit daily sales invoice to reduce for payments made 3.
It would be wonderful if a user could have access to payroll only - without having access to banks, sales, purchases and setup.
I have linked the wages of 2 employees to a cost of sales account.
I have entered the GST component of $5604 against the GST code of 820 (using this account for both GST on Sales and GST on Purchases).
So our sales team receive commission each month on top of their salary.
Nobody answers on the sales line either
00Less cost of sales			Direct Wages (320)	&#163;3,000.
AirPOS is point of sale and ecommerce software that helps independent retailers manage their sales and inventory, both in their shops and online.
Easily synchronise Sales, payroll and inventory data.
Automatically syncs your sales data with Xero.
The most advanced property management solution in the cloud, with a mobile inspections app, rental & sales trust accounting, landlord portal & more.
Get sales tax out of the way and off your mind.
The leading mobile sales order entry and B2B eCommerce platform for manufacturers and distributors.
File your sales tax returns quickly and easily with Avalara TrustFile.
Sales Channel software that allows you to sync your orders & inventory across 35 channels inc; eBay, Amazon, WooCommerce, Shopify, Magento, OsCommerce.
Automatically transfer Stripe sales information to your Xero accounting software every day.
Integrate CS Cart with Xero to automate your accounting and shopping cart sales.
Extend Xero to your sales team with the market-leading sales suite for brands and wholesalers; mobile e-catalog, order taking, and web B2B storefront.
Features residential & commercial sales and property management.
A cloud based service to automatically integrate your POS and e-commerce sales data with Xero support.
Automatically transfer Clover sales information to your Xero accounting software every day.
Provides automated accrual accounting for Amazon sales and fees for Amazon marketplace merchants worldwide.
The industry leading web-based sales, listing and CRM technology that helps you run a successful real estate agency.
Invoicing, Sales Orders and B2B.
The ultimate platform to manage your incoming sales!
SalesIn is the all-in-one solution for your Sales Reps, Showroom and B2B eCommerce needs.
Mobile sales app for distributors, wholesalers & manufacturers.
All-in-one dashboard for social media, analytics, marketing, sales, support, and Xero.
OnePageCRM is focused on sales activity and converts leads to customers fast.
Manage sales and customers with Base, sync your invoices in Base to Xero and automate your sales and accounting workflows.
Quotes, inventory and invoicing with sales reporting.
Quote Stock Sell contains POS, warehousing and basic CRM and enables you to check salespersons progress against sales targets.
Increase sales and improve client retention.
Automatically import e-commerce order history, summarize sales tax liabilities, and post them to Xero.
Integrate Volusion with Xero & send sales, tax and inventory data instantly.
Automate transfer of client and sales data with tax coding from MINDBODY to Xero, as well as keep inventory values in balance.
Vinosmith is a complete platform for Wine Distributors to manage their operations and sales force.
Complete integration of inventory & sales with Magento eCommerce (all versions).
Sales, Returns and Customer info is automatically added to Xero for you, check out .
Create and send sales proposals to your Xero contacts.
Increase your sales and impress clients with great looking proposals, check out .
Custom pricing, discounts + sales invoice generation, integrated with Xero.
A must-have to manage inventory, orders and customers from all of your sales channels.
Seamlessly synchronize BigCommerce web store sales and customer data to Xero with the OneSaas BigCommerce integration, check out .
The eBay connector by OneSaas allows you to automatically push your sales and invoice data from eBay to Xero, check out .
A must-have to manage inventory, orders and customers from all of your sales channels.
Synchronises sales, payments and customers with Xero, check out .
Easily sync your sales and expenses from inForm to Xero, check out .
The OneSaas Magento connector means synchronized sales and invoice data between your Magento store and Xero, check out .
A must-have to manage inventory, orders and customers from all of your sales channels.
A must-have to manage inventory, orders and customers from all of your sales channels.
Seamlessly sync sales and purchases with Xero.
Automatically import sales and customer information and apply payments in Xero from Zen Cart with Carry The One, check out .
HiLooking for recommendations for a POS system that sends sales to Xero from my clients cash register in his shop.
A2X exports amazon invoices into XeroThe problem is we now have two entries for the product sales, one from DEAR against the original sales invoice (with sale line items coded to 210 Amazon Sales) and another imported by A2X on the amazon invoice.
Currently Xero wont let me invoice for these sales and as such I have to make "Fake" purchase invoices to manipulate the inventory system inorder for it to let me create a sales invoice.
Module purpose: Cash operations, commodity accounting and very important the commission from sales.
What simple plug-in would you recommend to manage stock control and sales reporting?
I and many others have been asking Xero to improve/provide customer sales reports.
So the tax rate has been set up to distinguish the sales from the other using the description but, in essence, it is allocating a 0% deduction for tax purposes as the deduction is being dealt with.
Allocating serial numbered items to particular sales order/despatch/invoice.
When I integrate xero and vend, will it pull data retrospectively - in which case my bar sales will be duplicated?
The integration is using a 3'rd Vend Store that exclusively receives Sales/Refunds from Shopify.
Should i integrate directly with Shopify (using the built-in Shopify support for Xero integration) to record Shopify Sales/Refunds, Charges, etc, AND also integrate with Vend for overall Inventory and brick-n-mortar Store Sales (and exclude Store #3 - Shopify).
So for example:01/01/16: Petty Cash balance £10002/02/16: Process £140 of cash sales.
The Sales Order needs to be sent to/accessed by the warehouse to "pick and pack"3.
Is there an App which will allow him to link web sales to an existing Xero company?
They are a furniture store, who need something to raise sales orders, raise purchase orders (preferably from the sales orders), book the stock in off the back of the purchase orders and then dispatch goods.
I am researching into whether the Float app would help me with cash flow forecasting and am wondering whether anyone else has had experience with this APP when invoice discounting some of their sales ledger.
We do not keep inventory, all orders are drop-shipped to customers with our software/services, so ideally all sales orders should be creating POs for vendors.
Sales commission will be payable on most of the orders so each order will be identified to a sales person.
I have two sales channels, Woocommerce (my headquarters) and Amazon FBA.
Matching woocommerce sales is also extremely painful because the deposits are grouped daily by authorize.
Typically under traditional GAAP accounting, most of these type transactions would be nested beneath an account entitled “Sales Returns and Allowances" or something similar.
For a sale, there is nothing special - record sales and COGS.
It needs to track sales and inventory levels.
If the system also has the facility to track sales leads that would be a bonus.
Moving forward, we are needing to find a solution ourselves as this has gone on way to long and our sales paperwork is getting out of control.
My client is U. S. -based, with only U. S. sales, and shipping from one location using Fedex and UPS.
I can select 'Do Nothing' or Cash, but there needs to be some sort of 'Fees Only' for the sales invoice.
For sales transactions, do i have to create a single invoice on Xero and match it with the paypal transaction?
Hey guys,I'm looking for the best way to reconcile sales within Xero for an Australian based online retail store built on the Shopify platform.
A substantial proportion of our sales is to overseas customers (30% of orders) & we do anywhere from 30-80 orders a day.
This leaves us looking for a solution to the recording of sales in Xero.
Can anyone recommend a system that will allow us to track all sales leads generated quoted and won and therefore invoiced, and also those not completed/accepted.
Only the financial aspects integrate (cash, credit card sales and deposits from iZettle).
It facilitates the automatic receiving of sales order from a variety of B2B and EDI formats and will allow Xero to automatically import these orders and respond with an electronic invoice when processed.
The packages I have looked at so far seem to do purchasing, receipting, adjustments and sales ?
I am looking for 3-way forecasting (P&L, CF & BS), and to make it simpler, the five points below are the top features I'm looking for:- allocation of budgets to project costs and vice versa- tracking capital and other spend- individual PM access to respective budget- product planning - allocation of tooling costs and sales figures, and easy manipulation of these- 2 to 5 year Forecasting toolAnybody out there who has any recommendations?
Right now it is dumping all of my sales (service and product) into my general sales account.
But problem is I have already mapped another option to the 'Sales' account.
Their production is largely determined by their sales orders which are entered into Xero as a draft Sale.
When sales are made Unleashed creates a stock journal entry to reduce SOH and increase COGS.
To record their sales we have various different techniques, but mainly this involves a cash sheet and posting either on a daily or weekly basis.
Client currently inputs till reports for each day into an excel spreadsheet which breaks sales into various cost centre and shows expenses paid from the till.
I have setup the various tax codes in Xero for each province and territory, but the sales integration is not using them and has the product line allocated to the sales account (which is correct) but the tax column has the tax exempt code.
I have been using Handshake, which is great for Sales and Catalogue features, but unfortunately won't integrate with Xero without significant API work, which is beyond my ability, and beyond my budget to get a custom setup.
I have looked at unleashed but they are unable to convert a sales order into a purchase order.
to do the sales processing,stock control, magento links and inventory.
would it then be possible to bolt a decent crm system onto Xero to accomplish the prospect data capture, sales reporting and eventual face to face sale processing.
We also sell to wholesale customers via agents, so a mobile options for sales would be ideal.
I am not a bookkeeper per say and don't do payroll or sales tax, especially the form filings and regulatory reports.
Also, how does Xero handle sales tax filings and reports.
HiIt would be great if the Budget Manager feature of Xero could take the Sales Pipeline numbers direct from Zoho CRM.
HiI have a shop on shopify, the sales feed through to Xero as do the Credit Card payments, I get the sales twice in Xero, once from the sales feed and again from the credit card transactions, I code both to sales.
I have emailed your support team, your sales team, my development rep and NO ONE HAS HELPED.
Meaning that we will bill Sales first before buying from supplier.
I suspect the reverse is probably true for customers whom you might be providing only Sales Credit notes to.
I manually import sales/product from all the above.
I am afraid to import any sales especially as that two-week period tripled in volume and so would Duplicate Inventory SKU#s increase.
One concern I have is that sales/inventory data is not bidirectional.
##### CLUSTER 13 #####
On a customer's statement show with a flag if an invoice is fully paid.
I have put these invoice in reference order from 001 to 113.
Locking the date and forward dating the invoice to the entry date is against the rules.
Each invoice shows 8% VAT which looks odd and when I scout around on the web I cant find anything suggesting 8% as a valid VAT rate.
I envisaged some sort of merging proforma and invoice together but I don't really know what is the correct practice with managing these types of transactions.
In Thailand, there is a 3% WHT when customer pays an invoice.
So we do not receive the full invoice amount.
However we cannot update the WHT in the invoice.
When you enter an expense claim, bill, and invoice you have the optional choice of entering a reference #.
My understanding is to do an invoice with Groupon as the customer and the following:Deferred Promotional Expenses for the full $35Promotional Expense - Groupon for the negative $21 that groupon keepsthus the balance of the invoice is the $14 that groupon pays my client and is deposited in her bankthen i invoice the customer when they come in as the following:Service with the normal unit price and then a discount to bring it down to the $35 they paid grouponDeferred Promotional Expenses as a negative for the full $35thus bringing the balance of the customer invoice to zero and also zeroing out the Deferred Promotional Expenses account.
Is it as simple as creating an invoice with the combined expenses?
Some transactions have been given the wrong Invoice date/s.
I have a client who has an unpaid invoice on file for $80.
We have a client that forward books us and the invoice is automatically generated through our reservation system.
Originally we overpaid an invoice from a supplier.
The Due Date is now at the bottom of the document, it has lost the To:  and  From:   The Invoice Date:  Invoice No: etc is in between and muddled up with the addresses.
I have identified all of the charges referenced to an invoice number.
I've imported an invoice from Shopify and it's matched up all the inventory perfectly.
We have two brands on which we invoice.
Both require the invoice sending email to be brand specific, example: accts@brandOne.
On every month end or year end, I plan to import the receivables and payable from the online store to Xero using the invoice numbers assigned to them from the online store backoffice and the real customer names as contact.
), but in practice they invoice me as contractors.
Some clients are using the "I didn't get my invoice" excuse and it would solve this problem if I can get a 'confirmation' or 'it's read' email sent to me after the client opens their Xero invoice email - I could show them it was done!
Currently I have a repeating Invoice to the tenant, and a repeating Bill to the landlord.
This comes as a separate invoice from the freight costs, and is 100% VAT.
I had a client yesterday who complained their invoice is 1c different to the statement.
I can record it as invoice, but the items has not been delivered.
Plus a one line entry with an invoice number for an admin fee.
When asked to supply a copy of invoice- no- its in admin fee.
So I am adding super to my invoice, which I then send to them.
So will Repeating invoice correctly know to increment invoice number?
A customer paid my invoice $1045 via Stripe.
But, because we have already accrued it in the period that the invoice is dated we are showing double costs!
This was working fine until I started using Xero, as I can't work out how to reconcile one invoice against the other in order to cancel them out.
I've received an invoice for a small amount - £6.
Each company requires an invoice for my commission which I generate through Xero.
I suspect this is because as the company is on invoice basis the GST is only calculated based on invoice dates.
The possible solution that comes to my mind is to create a 0 value invoice as on the closing date say 30 Sep and then enter a bill with cost +revaluation amount to average out the affect.
So, I thought that since they already paid, if I voided the invoice, everything would balance out.
We received an invoice which has been paid by a third party (being treated as a loan).
My transactions where as follows (assume VAT is 14%):1 Feb - invoice for $11,250 excl (i. e. $12,825 including VAT)15 March - received $1,185, i. e. $1,039.
I am adding receipts using the online and app expense claim functions but when I get an invoice such as one from Telstra which has GST and non GST amounts in it.
Often the invoice will include overseas items as well as local items so splitting can be a hassle.
Can an invoice plus a transfer transaction be reconciled together?
Recently I sent them an invoice for $2000 for a service I did for them.
However, I have one question regarding "best practice":Suppose a customer pays their invoice via credit card on 1st of September.
The first is more attractive to me, because it prevents my clients from receiving overdue invoice reminders after they have paid.
The batch invoice for the day is $114.
I have the following invoice, and I'm trying to ascertain what the best way to accurately capture this might be:16 Widgets for $511.
I sometimes get the scenario that I'll do a job, produce an invoice there & then and be paid in cash.
The invoice is for €1500 and I need to issue a cancellation invoice for her insurance.
Retrieved from customer invoice reports.
Also the invoice provided by the consultant always contains an expense claim by the consultant.
I am assuming I can code this as one with the consultant's fee as it is one invoice?
Now at the end of each month i invoice the council and i am getting paid.
We sent the Invoice by email from Xero.
The question is should I upload the PayPal Transaction details as attachment to prove the transaction or should I attach the original invoice for $153.
The sale happens in Germany and we have to invoice with German VAT @19%.
There is an invoice that has been part paid last FY.
When I move over the invoice to Xero - how do I deal with that invoice ?
What would the correct posting be when entering those transactions onto Xero - ie we had one rent invoice outstanding from the previous financial year, which was included in the total accruals.
The grant will be paid in installments upon invoice.
4% from the invoice values that we bill to customers.
say, i send an invoice of $1000, we will only receive only $996.
My client has asked me to send and invoice to his client for a deposit (lets say $5000.
However - the items that relate to the above freight invoice come on a separate invoice, and would be GST Free.
We create a single invoice for the 12 month period and then reconcile the monthly payments against the invoice.
This creates two problems1) We have several hundred Direct debit payments to reconcile every month which have to be split to match the invoice so takes about 5 clicks for each one!
When I create an invoice for Customer:Merchandise XXX I have selected Revenue>Vendor Deposit for the line item in my invoice.
Client has customers who want their purchase order numbers shown on the invoice.
Is there anywhere it can be entered that makes it a field that can be put on a custom invoice?
I have an invoice with the total amount I would have normally charged.
To do this we created an invoice to the previous owner, then they invoiced us for the remainder of the purchase price.
As we didnt receive any "money" for the invoice we created its now sitting as unpaid.
Raising an invoice with 0 value is not correct.
I have the need to create a repeating invoice that is dated on the 1st of the following month, but I want the invoice generated and sent to my client on the 23rd of the preceding month - i. e. invoice generated on 23rd March, but dated as at 1st April.
For example, the Xero invoice is sent to us on the 1st day of the month, but charged on the Credit Card 7 days later.
I paid cash for my part and only have a copy of the invoice for the entire group.
for example, I have an invoice with two items, $794 and $59, both taxable.
Normally, it would be one invoice per deposit.
After Year end I got the invoice for accountancy fees of 650 Inc VAT.
We are running small AdWords campaigns at the moment and given the way their billing works we end up paying as we go throughout a month and then receive an invoice at the end of the month with all the payments we have made.
Can somebody suggest me on how to post the Purchase invoice.
DHL sends invoice about 1-2 months after the product arrives (US).
I only reconcile and upload invoice copies.
Period of expense Feb 2016,Date on invoice is 10th March 2016Expense Paid on 25th MarchAlso, if a small variant of above with bill received in advancePeriod of expense Feb 2016,Date on invoice is 15th Jan 2016Expense Paid on 25th JanThanks
(Here is probably the first mistake of us: I order them and assign them to one or even two projects)After manufacturing the product we invoice service and products in a combined sqm rate.
these two payments should go against a foreign currency invoice (the same one invoice).
As long as i post one of the payments, xero keeps helping me to adjst the FX gain/loss and closing off the invoice balance.
Basically, the way the invoice reads now- the item code and the name of the item are in the same column, and the next column is the description.
This would mark the transaction as completed and send the invoice to Xero as "paid".
The client does not want to raise an invoice as money received may never be invoiced and the invoice amount is unknown.
The invoice is 2 to 3 years into the future.
Law firm will issue an invoice and send it to person A.
On an invoice I have the cost of the equipment which includes GST, however GST as the cost on expenses tax rate, then have the labour, the money I will be pocketing and GST on income tax rate.
As I understand it, a repeating invoice doesn't work so well with these because it's always for a specific, and the same, amount, so a rule is better.
I want to know the invoice was dated 25th Jan, but not paid till 24th Feb, or whatever.
Showing GST on all of the invoice but customer only paid a part lump sum .
I then invoice the customer $1 in CAD currency.
My client wants the tracking category of Size and Colour to appear the invoice to his customers.
My client will not be using tracking categories for reporting purposes, only to invoice.
Would we create the invoice as Tax rate = 'zero rated income' or something else?
Which means I can get in a situation where an invoice would be negative if I return more of these packages than the amount of products I ordered.
Shall I enter it as  a Customer Invoice or Batch Invoice?
One of our clients recently started paying on our paypal link in the invoice.
I invoice client for $1,000.
Xero marks the $1,000 invoice as paid, at a full $1,000.
I can't work out how I can remove item number from my invoice.
Now I have the following scenario:Day 1 - Invoice $1000 to Person ADay 2 - Invoice $1000 to Person BDay 3 - Person A pays invoice.
Day 4 - Person B pays invoice but Person A initiates a chargeback on their invoice.
I have uploaded our own invoice template as per instructions through Xero, however keys elements of our invoice is missing such as Our Company Logo, Clients details, etc.
This is all going well however the accountants AR balance is net of VAT but when I enter the opening debtors listed by invoice then these all include VAT and hence the balances are out by the VAT amount.
However when I look at previous entries made by my accountant she has made an invoice for each transaction.
I issued an invoice for some custom work, with terms 50% deposit, balance on delivery.
Which is correct; issue a credit note or simply void the invoice, and why?
If an invoice does not separately show these amounts, it is not considered a valid tax invoice and cannot be used to claim GST credits.
This combined figure is shown at a wine equalisation tax-goods and services tax (WEG) label on the invoice.
I have an upcoming invoice denominated in a foreign currency (SGD) while my base currency is USD.
help topics seem to suggest credit notes but this was never an invoice, or overpayments but that doesnt seem right.
Am interested in your assistance to help me satisfy the invoice approvers, the suppliers  and the boss!
The Doctors want an invoice showing their gross earning and the management that is been deducted at source.
The invoice from the contractor is only sent on completion.
It seems that Xero will do exactly what I want using the Currency Conversion table but only when the invoice is in a foreign currency.
Nearly every invoice I look at from my suppliers shows the VAT rate, the net total amount it applies to and the corresponding tax total in a table.
Most suppliers call it an "Invoice #. "
And when I try to reconcile that invoice.
Attached is an example invoice.
As you see I have put two invoice lines for HomeAway Fee.
A customer was due to stay in Sept - so we issued an invoice.
I suspect them to be around $200, but I don't yet have an invoice so I don't know.
The fifth invoice for &#163;15 with the linked credit note is no longer on the list.
After that i want to have a look to the invoice of that reconciled transaction.
but the invoice will still say for $100, and it's making reconciliation a pain.
This works correctly however we invoice in two currencies, AUD and USD.
The Invoice still shows an open amount of about 3%.
I have a client who would like to attach a timesheet to an invoice and allow the customer to see both the timesheet and invoice when viewing their record.
So maybe there is an order confirmation with no VAT breakdown but sometimes there is no receipt and no invoice.
I can't get hold of the VAT invoice but I know Staples is VAT registered and I know the items purchased are vatable.
Is it easier to raise this as an invoice (which it wasn't) and then put all the payments made against it?
I read up on this today and added credit notes to the invoice to cancel out the money we received minus a cancellation fee.
Have a customer who has paid for an invoice twice.
The only option Xero offers is manual entry of every invoice and credit note.
Xero doesn't allow me to post the Tax Invoice in credit.
x for our invoice templates.
For some reason, Outlook (in the main) is identifying the invoice emails as 'Junk' and placing them in the Junk Folder.
As a result, we are now having to chase customer payments 30 days later because they claim they have not received our invoice.
I purchase the domain from my registrar, mark it up and then invoice my client.
I noticed that when I enter an invoice in NZ$ it gets converted to sterling at the current days exchange rate.
Most of our customers order on a weekly basis, so we have to send an invoice out each week.
I can see the group tick options, but on testing this on myself I received an email for each invoice.
I am wondering how I reconcile this so as to show that: a) the initial invoice for $100 has been cleared (paid) and b) the additional $100 shows up on the debtors ledger as a prepayment/credit balanceThanksAnita
This is achieved by setting the invoice to tax exclusive and selecting 20% VAT on the item line.
I owe my supplier $4,000 for their invoice, and my customer paid me (direct to supplier) $5,000.
A customer paid for an invoice with a personal check for $110.
I received an invoice from a one-off supplier that included a deposit.
Xero will then match the invoice to the credit note.
The article explains that Xero can create an invoice from this job, but I don't understand this point.
I'm now showing an overdue invoice from this customer, and overdue bills from our supplier.
)We have a POS system that creates a weekly invoice and we import it into Xero.
If I make a purchase order in Unleased, then approve it, it ends up as an invoice in Xero, but I don't really want that, cause maybe I don't want to invoice everything at once.
In the API docs, it says:<InvoiceNumber>	- ACCPAY – non-unique alpha numeric code identifying invoice<Reference> - ACCREC only – additional reference number, so we got no "Reference" field on ACCREC?
It's a client we do a *lot* of work for and knowing which check paid which invoice is very important if there's confusion about what has and has not been paid.
We receive a check for $10k and apply it to invoice 001 but our client thinks they've paid both.
I want this to show as a single line on my invoice so that it's transparent to the client.
Because it is structured text, the accounting software can access the access point and retrieve the UBL invoice.
Is it necessary in the USA to include the number of hours and an hourly rate on an invoice?
I've tried putting the address after the invoice number but that then changed the numbering pattern.
When I’m posting a new purchase invoice in xero, it gives me a warning if I enter an invoice number which already exists.
When we incur an expense on behalf of a client, and reconcile it or create the "purchase" invoice, we enter the costs, and choose the code "disbursements", which automatically brings up "15% gst on income" for the tax rate.
I am looking for some one on one training with someone who knows the fine details of customise an invoice in Xero.
An example would be 'Team A winter league 2014' and with a 'selling price' set for this item, it could form the basis of an invoice issued to each player in that team.
30 GST, but I am charged 'GST on Importation' as line 1 on the invoice.
Stock is purchased from various vendors, where a typical invoice will contain items as follows:3 x box  25.
20when I create a matching Xero purchase invoice, I have to enter with VAT included as follows:3 x box  90.
except, a real invoice has many, many more line items, and often the VAT calculation comes out to 3 decimals, which means the total doesn't match.
A client paid an invoice, which is now not needed, as the work is being postponed.
I have been exporting purchases orders over from our CRM system Zoho to Xero, after it has exported it will create a draft invoice in the xero purchases folder,after I altered the invoice accordingly this draft invoice is then saved as "saved and submit for approval".
According to the user guide:Make an invoice or bill payment1.
The only difference is that you'll enter the actual amount paid in the Amount Paid box, which will be more than the total on the invoice or bill (or the total remaining to be paid).
However, having uploaded the theme, I am trying to test print an invoice and constantly getting the following error message:I'm sorry, the document cannot be printed at the moment.
With our orders we always take a £20 deposit, then the final balance on production and then create a final invoice.
I have an invoice where we brought office furniture and recorded them separate as well as the delivery cost.
I have to do a credit note or an invoice .
Or the invoice were paid 2013/2014.
This is then repaid once the invoice is paid, minus a small % of the total invoice value as the fee for using the service.
I have since paid the invoice and reconciled the transaction.
I have attached the timesheet to the invoice by using Files.
But when I send the invoice by email, the 6 files are not attached.
If a supplier is not registered for GST (has ABN, doesn't charge GST) - what tax code should be used when entering their invoice?
We raise an invoice to a customer for £1002.
We buy and sell computer hardware, and often invoice for the sale a week after purchasing the items on our credit card.
If we buy a $5000 server on 29 Jan. 2014, and invoice client $5500 on 2 Feb 2014, our balance sheet shows a loss in January, and a crazy profit in February.
Since our margin % is standard across most products, this journal should then give me a better idea profitability each month, and would highlight if I forgot to invoice for something I purchased.
Is it possible to automatically create an invoice for each sale in Paypal, supposing the automatic import works?
Considering the facts that the invoice is in USD, paid in EUR and than later VAT applied in EUR.
For example:Payrun pre-tax deduction item - Childcare Voucher £100Invoice - Childcare Voucher provider £110Payment - Childcare Voucher invoice £110Accounts payable balance  £100Does this make sense?
As the invoice was shared between myself and another person (2 flights - we paid separately etc), the refund from flight centre went to the other person.
We create an invoice that is sent to a debtor finance company.
I've got myself into a strange situation I raised an invoice dated 31st July for $10,295.
13 part payments were attributed to the invoice (via the reconcile feature) until there was $1,505.
I then realised that the original invoice amount was wrong so I reversed all 13 part payments.
The history for the invoice clearly shows the "reversals" of the payments have been made but this is not reflected on the invoice (but is in the aged rec's)I'm not sure how to correct this?
The RF may also invoice separately for items such as invoice books and other stationery, branded protective clothing, etc.
Remember it is NOT an invoice yet.
that are paid by DD a few days after I receive the invoice, e. g. invoice dated 25th February paid by DD on 25th March 2013.
For example, my mobile tel supplier doesn't send me the bill/invoice.
enter the bill/invoice to Xero as normal.
Particularly, we want to import each debtor transaction separately (not balances) so we can then apply receipts post conversion in Xero to the actual invoice.
In the FX rate at the top of the invoice I put .
Invoice amount (invoice date: 14 April 2013) is 4000.
When I put the invoice amount of 4000 on unitAmount field in SalesInvoiceTemplate I could import it but how do I treat the prepayments(before conversion date of 31 March)  of 1000 against this invoice.
I have tried putting invoice amount in unitAmount field in salesinvoicetemplate.
From what I can see however it's not an option on the standard invoice settings and I would have to create a separate docx file for each one, manually removing this box?
Entering them as a credit is a possibility but * this shows on the customer's statement as a negative invoice rather than a prepayment and* the liability account (Customer Deposits) does not appear to be updated when the pending invoice is approved and the credit applied.
We deliver to them and invoice them every day.
55 and coding it to the 'Rounding Account' in liabilities making the invoice match what was recorded on paper, recording the invoice and amount I paid correct.
It works fine to create a sale and enter the inventory into the invoice however we are then left with an outstanding invoice.
We were issued an invoice and I input it into Xero.
An invoice typically includes only one payee, so I am not sure how to deal with it.
I have a large client which pays on a monthly cycle roughly 7 weeks after I submit and invoice.
When I put the ref number in (the one that I searched for and got no results) xero tells me that an invoice with this ref number exists.
It even give me a link to followThis link leads me to a blank invoice.
But at the bottom is a note about the invoice.
We are having troubles recording the repayment of the factored invoice/s and the fees of which are charged.
The only issue I'm having with Xero is if you have a receivable invoice for say &#163;1,000.
Short of voiding the original invoice and creating two separate ones (which then messes up my invoice numbering) I'm a bit stuck, and it leaves my books all out of order and balanced properly.
So for instance, a customer invoice was $1000, but as they paid within 7 days, they were eligible for a 2.
2) So I thought about setting up a dummy invoice each month showing total amount invoiced during the month and tax collected - we can easily get this info from Recurly.
the invoice date might be 24th July - and I want to process this in August.
We send out invoice to client 5 days ahead, example for work done in July 2012, we send out the invoice June 25, 2012 (this is the invoice date).
55I raise an invoice in Xero, and send it to my customer for this amount.
so I now have an invoice for $571.
I consider the invoice fully paid.
86, and somehow write off the rest of the invoice?
This revenue comes in without our having to invoice for it.
I've since set up the invoice in Xero, and it appears that my original invoice was 1c out due to rounding errors.
Do i Void the invoice?
I then set up repeating invoice for £29.
For example, Xero sends me an invoice for £22.
The way I achieved it was to enter a repeating payable invoice with the first line being the debit amount, and the second line as a negative amount.
I am self employed so i have submitted an invoice which includes the expenses.
The rest is being held for our payees but I have to supply an invoice to the payer which is why it's being classified as income.
My concern is that the email I received looks very suspicious and I would definitely NOT click on the invoice link.
So manually entered variable text on an invoice.
I recently sent an invoice to a customer for 2 units of a product.
Is there a standard way that most people are using to accrue or collect all these fee entries in the PAYPAL feed off somewhere into a single lump which can then be reconciled with the PAYPAL fee invoice at the end of the month ?
I'm setting up our standard invoice template and I'm getting frustrated.
My invoice numbers are going up in twos ie 115,117,119 how can I stop this from happening?
I then started using Xero in February and entered the historic Invoice, approved then marked as paid £540.
Typical invoice value is between $1,000 and 15,000 NZD, and most customers would have 2 or more shipments per year from us.
I have one contact to which I invoice quite often.
)(the big invoice = exhibit expense?
10 and receive a invoice covering the £1.
I type the amount of the invoice into "total"?
For example, we recently generated an invoice from the customer for $8000 that we owed him.
My goal: I want to track revenue by adding line items in an invoice, "Approving" (but not sending) it as I go.
It would be great if you could send a photo or file that you've attached to an invoice in Xero Touch, with the invoice.
Consequently I have to carrie out two more actions to approve the invoice.
Shouldn't the customer details be shown on invoice?
If I want to allocate a cash expense to a client and then invoice it on, there is no option of which I am aware.
HelloI have created an invoice then edited it to deduct part of a cost for a customer.
In theses cases I have to manually go invoice by invoice changing the reference to match the clients billing period.
Don' know what they think but every second invoice disappears, get emails back that my server is at fault, yeah right.
e. g. type in invoice number from last month to look up details and it's telling me:No results for '516483' foundTry narrowing your search or search for '516483' in the Help CenterWas working perfectly.
So, my procedure is to print out the invoice as a pdf to keep for my records and then email the invoice.
On a few occasions, after printing out the invoice I have forgotten to email the invoice.
as it takes you to that invoice if you dont allocate this credit.
We Copy the Invoice and discount the invoice according to the share % of the ownership of the horse.
When you create an invoice/quote or make any changes to a contact, they will be listed under activity for that contact.
When you create an invoice, it will be there but if you go and void an invoice, not only it will not say that it has been voided, but it even removes any track of that invoice even being created before.
Ive trialled Xero for a month, and cant find a solution to efficiently invoice quickly.
It would be great if I could integrate with Xero so that when I submitted the spreadsheet to Xero it would create an invoice picking up the key billing information and attaching a PDF of the spreadsheet to the invoice.
My invoice numbers start with 16. .
The search functionality is available for invoice and bills, however doesn't appear to be available for expense claims.
I am currently customising a docx invoice template.
I have gotten this far with the first extra line using the following IF function:{ IF &#171;StatementType&#187; > 0 "Invoice Total" "" backslash* MERGEFORMAT }{ IF { MERGEFIELD InvoiceTotalNetPayments backslash* MERGEFORMAT } > 0 { MERGEFIELD  InvoiceTotal backslash# "#,##0.
> 0 and then the invoice amount shows correctly.
The invoice in theory when set to GST Free exports would calculate the total invoice to be 300-27.
My client has asked me to send and invoice to his client for a deposit (lets say $5000.
Basically I will create an invoice for the photo booth hire.
I sent out an invoice for a large $ amount and that amount is sitting in AR.
I currently invoice my clients for my services through Xero, which works great.
Should I do a an invoice for the total sum sold for digital products every month?
Currently I'm getting out the old calculator and doing it manually for every invoice.
Tweak the invoice so the TOTAL is tiered.
The invoice is going to them, not the customer.
when customers have an unpaid invoice).
We are a small interior design company where we have to invoice clients in advance for the FF&E items that we purchase on their behalf.
The allocation of billable expenses to a client appears to only apply when a supplier invoice has been approved.
So is there any reason why we could not create an initial supplier invoice (based on a quote but that may need to be changed later), approve it so that a client invoice can be raised and then if necessary, go back and alter the initial (approved) supplier invoice once the item has been ordered as it may be that the date of the invoice, invoice number etc may have changed.
co. uk) YESThis goes off to the client and I receive my copy into my outlook inbox, so the invoice has definitely been sent.
If I select the invoice and select it's history it clearly shows three things (for example):Created17 Nov 2015 11:07 a. m. System GeneratedReceived through the Xero API from WorkflowMax Invoice sent 17 Nov 2015 11:30 a. m. Shake AccountsThis invoice has been sent to David@***.
I currently have to raise a PO, then mark it as billed, re-entering the date as it defaults to today, change the reference from the PO number to the Invoice number so that I can then search via PO if required and Invoice number if required.
I am trying to find a way that I can auto generate an invoice for the amount of visits per client per each week.
com which has triggers that would kick off an invoice in Xero, but I didn't want it to happen everyday.
Here's the tricky bit, to make sure this is accounted for I am planning to create one invoice per workshop and have in it the students who enrolled.
i. e. students have to send an e-mail, I create the invoice then send them the link.
I prefer that they check out and invoice is sent to them automatically, I only intervene if there is a problem.
I went into one of the customers and I can see the invoice but no evidence of it sending.
On the invoice they say the VAT is 90c, but the lowest I can make it with any of my tax rates is €1,50Obviously only some of those services are subject to VAT (and possibly only part of them) but it's not clear which and can't be bothered to find out.
I'm having difficulty over how to deal with addressing an invoice.
When I invoice I invoice based on their hours and it is cumbersome having to convert each entry back.
on behalf of a client and then invoice the client at a later date.
I am required to supply an invoice to each client and generally the client would be a one off sale.
When invoicing we must invoice to the individual branches.
I know they've looked at the invoice as it's been paid, but no status change.
Or it may as well be - -we are told to create our own invoice emails, create a pdf, download it and attach it.
I'm not going to sign up to premium for one invoice
The invoice then lives with the purchase and that's great.
Ability to product an invoice on % complete over at multiple sub-components & variations of the jobs - each having a different % complete charge of the quote eg painting 20% complete, plastering 80% complete, concreting 50% complete etc.
The guidelines suggest Xero is suitable for 200-500 invoice per month.
When they want to 'buy' wine using the money they've squirreled away I assume I create an invoice and allocate the prepayment / overpayment that I already have to the invoice and their statement is automatically updated.
This would be separate from the notes field and should be a mergefield available when creating an invoice .
You can invoice everything directly through Xero.
And the booking fee (in our other CRM/ invoice system) is applied to that sale.
Is there a way to put it under a booking fee COA then transfer it to the invoice some how?
When I incur expenses when working for clients I reclaim them via my next invoice.
Now I have about 300 parts entered into the Settings/Inventory Items list and I've used them to create my first Purchase Order, which can then be copied to a Purchase Invoice/Bill.
However, the invoice in question still shows as an outstanding bill.
If I follow Xero instructions those details place themselves in the body of the invoice.
This can only be done when creating an invoice or bill.
Normally, it shows invoice number under this column.
I have to invoice for a project where there are staggered payments.
This morning I logged on via my mobile phone and I entered the same invoice which was partially successful.
This needs to go into the invoice.
But then when a quote doesn't actually become a job and thus doesn't become an actual invoice, then that invoice number is missing.
The only way I can see to do this on Xero is to do a repeating invoice?
Can you please tell me how to enter an invoice that is purely gst.
A pdf invoice and a pdf of receipts for that week.
I am getting some confused customers wondering why they get a copy of the packing slip everytime I email the invoice.
I made an made an invoice for a client and mistakenly marked it as paid.
We buy supplies and enter purchase invoice.
Typical example of invoice from one of our vendors as follows:square pegs - qty 100 - unit price 0.
So, I usually end up making an excel spreadsheet and spending upwards of 15 mins tweaking rounding so that it all adds up to same total as given on invoice before entering into Xero.
So I have received a supplier invoice.
I start receipting items in from the supplier invoice.
Example,For a $5000 project, I might invoice $2000 in October, $1000 in November, with $2000 yet to be invoiced.
I am trying to get it to display the same as my invoice date (09 Sept 2013).
We send out orders daily and invoice weekly.
The RF may also invoice separately for items such as invoice books and other stationery, branded protective clothing, etc.
Do I create a purchase order when I refund the $250 to even out the difference, or is there a way to delete the paid invoice once I have received it - or reverse it?
That was the customer invoice will only show FILTER UNIT, but my inventory will be correct.
Same as the previous one - consultants have an excel spreadsheet where they enter their expenses by day (weekly) and a separate excel with an invoice for us.
i also have the option to go to invoice say customers>new invoice>electricity 445 or rent etc.
I have multiple clients using our SaaS product where I invoice monthly.
Do I still have to manually tick and match each paper receipt/Tax Invoice against the statement?
Now he's upset when I hand him an invoice for my work?
As a general rule, should I always make an invoice for everything I'm spending?
If not, when should I make an invoice and when should I not?
Currently and before Xero I send one invoice to the 'spokesperson' and I get automatic direct payments from the 4 owners of the units e. g. the invoice is split 4 ways.
Or do you have more of a one-to-one situation where you send out a purchase order, receive it in one go, and get one invoice.
I had hoped initially that by leaving the number field blank on the import file, Xero would allocate one of its own invoice numbers.
I'm surprised that there is not a way to import data to Xero for it to create an invoice.
With the added "edit layout" feature you could easily insert a formula column to calculate the FX rate multiplied by the domestic rate to give the actual value of the foreign invoice.
I can see the various invoice template here:Xero > Settings > Invoice SettingsIf I don't wish one of the templates to appear in the drop-down box under "Branding" then it appears that my only option is to delete that template.
you have to log onto safari and click Include with Invoice.
The Invoice Settings features should either be moved to the Advisor role or better still, become a 4th option tick box at the bottom of the permissions page.
Don't understand why this feature has been created for when creating an invoice but not for a bill.
As this information is hidden you only know it is wrong after the invoice has processed it if you don't check each invoice before.
Right now, you have to navigate out to see the corresponding bill or invoice.
It would be great if we could pull the invoice reports out with the description so we know what each invoice is for rather than having to copy and paste each description into the excel spreadsheet?
MYOB and QB both have great looking invoice email templates with buttons and logos in the email.
For instance, my dashboard tab currently says:1 Draft invoice 0.
Currently, email templates and invoice reminders only allow using the "Trading Name".
One is usually taking a photo of an invoice, receipt etc.
They are all the same amount, but find and recode doesn't currently allow me to amend this aspect of the invoice.
The ability to change the heading to TAX INVOICE - I see this is requested.
Well this would make the Online Invoice 'legal' in its own right.
Should be an option to ONLY SHOW the total invoice amount and GST amount.
Something has now changed so that it copies over the first invoice’s invoice number in the reference field.
It appears to be possible now by clicking the url generated via the Share Invoice option so it shouldn't be a big issue.
It would be very useful to enable such variables as "current month" within the description field of the repeating invoice itself.
At present the only way to see how much VAT is liable on an invoice is to go into each invoice.
Is it possible that we could creat a credit note from and invoice.
The ability to create an invoice in Excel/CSV first and then import it into Xero would be amazing.
If the confirmation is incorrect either funds were not received or cheque was not cleared they it is still an outstanding invoice but reminders are not being sent.
It would be helpful if we could have the ability to determine who has access to turning invoice reminders on at invoice level
The invoice could then have a reminder (popup) attached to it to remind user to send invoice once mobile service is available again.
The invoice might also be  shown to client on site and discussed as another bridge to managing customer expectation.
Added to this would be a print function on the phone app in offline mode only so an invoice could be completed and given to customer, with again the follow up email once in service.
Currently we have to unlock the prior periods when changing a Due Date on an unpaid invoice to the current (or future) month.
Often this is for an invoice that has been queried last month, is in dispute or received late.
Unless we update the due date the old invoice does not appear on this schedule (and then misses the approval process and does not get paid)
OR- a per-user setting in my invoice/email settings to allow Xero to default any attachments uploaded to an invoice as 'include with invoice' = trueOR- a warning dialogue that pops up saying 'You've selected to include attachments, but you currently have no attachments marked as 'include with invoice'.
In UK law the Registered Office has to show at the bottom of the invoice so the invoicing in Xero picks up the Postal Address to do this.
I really need simply any field under client's detail at invoice to add "Site Address" and "Credit to" details while I'm generating an invoice to my property manager clients.
pdf invoice that is generated, in the order they are featured on said invoice?
Numerous of my staff are requesting a "Emailing Preferred/Enabled' Feature, to be shown on invoice.
What we are after is an icon of some sort, located on the invoice screen, so when we have completed entering an invoice, we can see that the customer has an email address already entered or that they are an 'email preferred' customer.
Essentially every 10 cases a liquor store buys, they get one for free but we cannot put that on the invoice as a free case, it must be discounted from the whole order as a separate discount (KY State Law. )
I see there is no where to enter a customer's PO number when they accept a quote and also when you invoice them.
3) Issue my own purchase order(s) to vendors for supply and charge to job (i. e. the Quote above)4) Receive supply from my vendors5) Send customer order and invoice customer against their P. O. Num.
If you copy from a PO to Invoice or Bill or both it would be great if it showed on, for instance, the invoice copy that you also copied to Bill?
Currently, I believe, the only history of everything is on PO side so when you copy to invoice it shows copied from PO and likewise if you copied to Bill it shows copied from PO XXX but if it could show all of the history like Copied from PO XXX to Bill YYY and Invoice ZZZ on each feed would be fantastic!
Makes invoicing easier and ensures no items are missed from an invoice.
Invoice reminders is great, but it really needs to follow the branding theme set for the customer it's emailing the reminders too.
Currently, is the only option viewing the history on each individual invoice?
Then go through it all again next invoice input.
FIND- 069123and bang the invoice comes up for you to allocated your credit too.
In my line of work it is often required that i write some detail on a customers invoice.
Currently i do this in one of the description fields on an invoice.
This only allows the note to take up the left 3/5 of the page and for longer notes causes the invoice to spill over into 2 pages.
- This repeating invoice is set to *automatically* Approved & Sent (because that's what Xero's for!
- Option 2: After I create the Credit Note, I also *manually* change the Repeating Invoice to only "Create a Draft" (rather then "Approve & Send").
- As a result, that would trigger a screen asking: "Do you want to allocate this Credit Note to the following Repeating Invoice, which is scheduled to be created on XX date?
Xero could automatically quote which invoice numbers and credit note numbers have been paid in the remittance email to the supplier
I have some customers I invoice a lot, and some I invoice once a month.
For the customers I invoice a lot, paying online is much easier.
So we have recieve ledger from the company so it's extra work having to click through every invoice to adjust to paid.
HiSo, i have a client who needs to lock the preset unit sale price on his invoice.
He wanted to limit ability of "invoice only" user from editting the preset unit sale price.
So, my procedure is to print out the invoice as a pdf to keep for my records and then email the invoice.
On a few occasions, after printing out the invoice I have forgotten to email the invoice.
When creating expenses claims with items that are Vatable there is no option to edit the VAT amount to match the invoice / receipts associated with the claim.
It is possible to assign expenses to customers and then invoice the customer - another great idea.
It would be great if they automatically flowed through and attached themselves to the customer invoice when you tick the box when emailing the invoice to "Include files as attachments".
One problem with this idea - expenses are assigned to customer at transaction line level, not invoice total.
Note - the file needs to stay attached to the original bill / expense claim as well as being attached to the invoice.
It would be great to have an android widget sitting on my phones homes creen with quick access to creating a receipt or invoice or contact.
00am submitting an invoice for xyz companyy user @ 9.
ie "Apply tracking code to invoice" with a drop down box of options.
This would mean that customer numbers stored against the contact would populate the  tab, but invoice numbers entered from previous batch payments are erased.
I often check the online invoice to make sure the invoice looks correct.
A simple barcode button on this line (under "Invoice Item" screen) would be great.
and it immediately takes you to a new invoice with the next invoice number.
This numbering is irrespective of the normal invoice sequential numbering order.
This causes the invoice format to differ from customer to customer depending their browser because their browser.
I had a complaint this morning about a invoice printing over 4 pages because the line description was all squashed up.
After adding a billable expense to an invoice, the billable expense will get a link to the invoice in the description field of the bill.
It would be great if the link could also work from the invoice to the bill.
We need a future to add dates on the invoice, for example we are a cleaning company and our client has weekly cleaning on Fridays and he only wants to receive invoice every month not weekly, so when he receives monthly invoice he could see the dates on the invoice automatically.
When creating a new invoice on the web app, setting the invoice date automatically calculates the due date from the terms for that customer.
For now I'm having to update each repeating invoice manually, by clicking EDIT MESSAGE and choosing that same email template again.
However, this doesn't translate to a Purchase Invoice in Xero.
For example:Invoice Invoice Number from Tracking Category 1 for Contact NameInvoice Invoice Number from Tracking Category 2 for Contact NameThat way my clients will see the correct business they are receiving the invoice from - rather than my legal entity which is a trust and can confuse people.
For example:Invoice Invoice Number from Tracking Category 1  Tracking Option 1 for Contact NameI hope this makes sense!
It'd be great to mark invoice's as complete so we know what orders have been fulfilled and which haven'tI think this is something basic that Xero should have by default.
To give the option to send a client an editable invoice in an open format as word of example.
each item line of an invoice appears in the CSV).
This makes it hard because you have to manually clean the data, if you want to end up with a sheet that only has one row per invoice.
Invoice reminders will not work if you haven't sent original invoice from Xero.
Invoice reminders should have an option to send even if you haven't sent the original from xero.
when creating invoice I you can assign expenses to the invoice BUT they are the individual items.
Now we are going to have a separate control account, invoice numbers and invoice layout with a manual reconciliation process.
As I understand it if we raise an invoice in Xero Practice Manger and select a contact which in turn has an email address then this will sync across with the invoice.
But only when that invoice is raised - and will not update again until a new invoice is raised.
It would help to see the description as an optional layout feature at the bill and invoice stage
In addition to the other source documents xero can create ( quote, invoice, PO, etc ) It would be useful to have a change order form that could be generated as well.
Right now we are sending quote out and once approved, nothing happens till we send them the invoice.
I think this should be a simple code tweak as the quote will be converted to invoice automatically in Xero once approved I believe.
May I suggest an improvement “Invoice sent 	14 Apr 2016 2:22 p. m. 	Gavin Evans 	This invoice has been sent to jon@zyx.
Com that it has the actual invoice attached to it as well.
For example, if I'm producing invoice numbers 1-20 and I want to hold off on entering Invoice # 10 (say it is pending approval).
NB: This topic refers to the invoice 'Date', not 'Due Date'
Let's assume my headers (To, Date, Due Date, Invoice #, Reference, Branding) are all populated and I tab and begin filling in the first line of the invoice (navigating using only tab, not touching the mouse).
Currently the only way to change the status of invoice reminders in bulk is to do it from the "Contacts" list within the contacts area.
It would be a great feature to have the ability to set invoice reminders from a smart list, it would also be a great feature to have an option for that smart list to automatically refresh in the background and auto update that list with the invoice reminder setting.
see who you're creating an invoice for from the invoice screen'.
We open a draft invoice or quotation and update it throughout the month, emailing when complete.
Some of our clients require a purchase order to be quoted on their invoice.
Could you have a reminder of some sort so that if an invoice is being raised, we are aware that a purchase order number needs to be quoted?
Currently have to go into every single invoice and change it.
It would be easier to know where we were up to if we could view the property address (reference) rather than who we have sent the invoice to.
The due date can still be added on the system, but the option to remove from an invoice should be available.
- Xero customers should have better control of their invoice creation.
That means if in an invoice I put an item for $22.
The ability to have ongoing invoice reminders.
Problem is when we come to approve and send the invoice at the end of the month if we don't notice and correct it the invoice gets sent with the date sometimes up to a month prior.
It would be nice to have an option in company setting to select that any invoice copies after the initial invoice sent would automatically have COPY added to the copy invoice to be sent.
When setting up a repeating invoice you have to select a date.
'Due Date' is ok for gentle reminders, but 'Invoice Date' would help get the point across when advising clients how long invoice issue and correspondence has been in progress.
Here's an example:Legal Entity: XYZ Corporation, Inc. Business Lines (dba's): Tasty Ice Cream, Valley Delivery Service, Acme Refrigerated DeliveryThe attached invoice always goes out as "Invoice from XYZ Corporation, Inc. "
If it is non-printing, it doesn't count towards the 5 invoice limit.
On Xero you can only copy a Purchase order to a bill, a second purchase order or a invoice.
Hello,We invoice out for different kinds of services to our clients.
For example a client had an invoice with several lines which had been approved, they then went back to edit this invoice and approved it again.
At the moment they can't be copied or cut and pasted and are gone once the invoice is created, so I have to remember to write them down first then retype them when I created the invoice.
With this in mind it would be useful to have a drop-down list of all people / email address available for a particular contact when we are about to send a quote, invoice etc.
Printing in Excel it wil solve other language having a readable invoice (which we can't print invoice in our language) and it will be less expensive to XeroHisham N. Diab CPA
and once applied will the purchase order show the remaining amount left to be invoice by the contractor/supplier?
Then apply a negative discount against the inventory items being purchased to gross up costs for freight etc and thus revert the purchase order total back to the suppliers invoice amount.
And do they have to show on an invoice to the customer?
It would be great if we could change text size and colour in invoice reminder say the word  or  in bold larger and red.
We now have to go to the Statement to see what the date each invoice was raised.
It would be really helpful to include a column for that, as one can then see a) whether it's been sent, and b) when it was sent, without having to open each invoice to check.
Once the goods have been shipped to my customer I copy the Purchase Order to an invoice.
Would it be possible to send an overdue invoice reminder on demand?
So a button on each invoice to generate and send a reminder would be useful.
If during the entry, one needs to switch from say invoice number to name, after entering 20 payments, the payments are lost and I have to start over again.
I would like a tick box/notification created, which indicates on an draft invoice, that the customers has email as an option for sending invoice when complete.
It would be good if that marker / symbol also indicated whether or not that attachment had been marked to attach to the invoice when sending.
Personally I attach an authorisation to every client invoice and it is sent with every invoice.
The only way to check is to go back into each invoice and then the attachment to check each one.
If you give a user INVOICE ONLY and DRAFT ONLY, that USER cannot perform any CASH function (RECEIVE or SPEND money).
Another alternative is to put a second Approve button at the top of the invoice prep screen next to the action buttons (Email, Print, etc.
We have invoicing importing from a stock management system and there's a few rounding issues when the invoice hits Xero.
That information is held on the transaction/invoice, and not linked back to the Contacts list.
00	 	               Paid	     "R"It would help greatly  if a separate column  could be inserted after Status stating whether the invoice has been reconciled.
At present, although the item appears PAID you have to open  the invoice to see if it has been reconciled.
Our customers make multiple part payments over a 3 month period for one invoice.
It's great to hear all of the recent feedback on Invoice Reminders!
Example my default curreny is ZAR and I am unable to match payments to the USD xero invoice.
A reminder email to clients that have a quote outstanding at predefined intervals (similar to that of the invoice reminders).
Hello Xero Community,My firm has been relying on third party applications such as Debtor Daddy and Invoice Sherpa to chase outstanding apps before Xero released their new invoice reminders feature.
The one feature that Debtor Daddy and Invoice Sherpa have, that isn't on Xero at the moment, is for us to receive list of scheduled reminders a day before they're sent.
Having this list sent to us daily gives us a piece of mind that reminders are being sent, instead of having to check the history notes in each invoice.
Under UK VAT regulations, input VAT claimed on purchases must be repaid to HMRC on any purchase invoice that remains unpaid for longer than 6 months from the date it became due.
If the invoice is subsequently paid, then the related VAT can be reclaimed.
what would be more lovely than doing the payroll by the gate would be to have the option of the "From" category auto filling from the previous invoice.
Doing this manually for each invoice takes hours unless we have missed something.
Our company have 4 branch in Delhi City so we want that separate Invoice no for  all 4 branch ExampleDelhi city have four locationLocation Name              Invoice no Punjabi Bagh                 PB-001Greter Kailash                GK-001Okhla                             OK-001Gurgaon                        GUR-001
When entering an invoice or receipt directly from files, I usually press the zoom button 3 times.
I would then only adjust occasionally, rather than on every invoice.
When allocating billable items to customers,  sometimes you miss/forget to invoice all billables back to customers.
The Xero Touch app allows you to approve and send a draft invoice in one process.
I email the invoice with the zero balance due but this doesn't seem to be satisfactory for many of them.
However, we invoice monthly for the work undertaken that month & when we convert the draft invoice to an actual invoice & invoice the items performed that month, we lose all the 'work in progress', or the balance of work to still be invoiced.
It is very rare that today's date would correspond to the invoice date - so why it is a default I don't understand.
We do this by noting the ACH file reference number on each invoice, while changing its status to "paid".
I have never seen invoice/bill detail print on the voucher.
It would be great to enter a customer invoice and then click a button and a service reminder will be smsed or emailed 1 year later to that customer
When invoicing, there is no limit to how many characters that can be inputting, however once this information is transferred onto the actual invoice there is a restriction, no matter how I attempt to work around it!
Is there a way to partially invoice items of a quote/proposal (due to part of work being completed) and the balance only to remain under quotes?
Would be very handy for monthly management reporting to Key Stakeholders as we are currently exporting to Excel and writing details next to the invoice - when the info is already captured in Xero?
At the moment it defaults to a one off invoice.
And I wouldn't think it would be too hard to have this work seeing as it simply takes the month and year of the invoice.
It would be great if we could edit totaled amounts at the end of an invoice line item and have the discount automatically calculated out from our unit price.
On the DRAFT invoice screen at present, the "Submit for Approval" option is found under the SAVE button.
Please provide additional option in Aged Receivables and Aged Payables reporting to show Aged Days (from invoice date) in the pull down 'Ageing by' field (Already has Invoice Date and Due Date)
We utilise  a workflow as follows:DRAFT createdREVIEWER (usually a project manager) review details and SUBMITS FOR APPROVALFinance administratror APPROVES and issues the invoice.
My suggestions are:1.  that the 'merged' invoice optionally can have a label that it is a 'merged' invoice2.
I understand there is an "all" tab, but you cannot access certain details of an invoice from this tab.
It is frustrating to not find an invoice under "unpaid" and then switch to the "paid" tab, only to have to type the details in again.
If this is possible, then possible it can be used for Invoice templates as well, in cases where quotes are not used.
We’ve had an indepth look into the feedback given on the  thread, and think the recent changes will solve the majority of situations where an invoice needs to be edited.
However, on occasion I APPROVE an invoice but overlook the next step of EMAILing it.
This assumes A) you have raised the original invoice.
B) you have paid this invoice off.
2) Raise credit, in the invoice screen, for this invoice (duplicates same nominal as invoice) - and allocates it.
3) Go to invoice by clicking on invoice at the bottom - takes you to invoice.
4) Unallocate credit by clicking on x on right of credit amount below invoice.
It would be REALLY useful if there was a way that I could link the Supplier Bill to the Client invoice.
I would like to suggest that the Invoice Date is added to the available placeholders in the emailed invoice.
"Please find attached your invoice for week ending <<Invoice Date>>"
We invoice customers for annual license fees.
s in the one invoice and also asinine inventory or item to a particular currency.
Before generating the invoice PDF we must double check the customer file to make sure the right name is in the attention field before printing.
Perhaps have to put the invoice number in the subject, and have xero attempt to match that with an invoice number in the system, if it matches, attach that document to that invoice, if no match, warn the user and have an option to save it in the inbox in the file library.
Basically the first copy which will stay with the Customer should be the normal invoice and the second copy of the invoice will stay with the company sending the invoice, and this copy should indicate that it is a Duplicate invoice.
It would be good if there was an option after approving an invoice whereby Xero recognised the supplier/customer name was similar to a previous one and suggests 'do you want to merge contact with.
This is especially an issue for new clients who view the invoice on their mobile and do not realise that they are not seeing the complete invoice.
As a minimum it would be really helpful if the invoice had some text explaining that this is not the full invoice and it should be viewed on a desktop.
But really it would be great if recipients could access the complete invoice on their phone.
It would be great to have supplier payments shown on supplier invoice reports - this would make it much easier to reconcile to supplier statements where their statements list the payments as a separate line.
I would absolutely love it if I create an Invoice from the Quote if the attachments were attached to the Invoice.
At the moment I have to store them offline and re-upload it to the invoice.
Allowing the ability to warn the user that the invoice date they keyed is for a date outside current year.
I find when users take a photo via Xero Touch (or upload a photo) it's too large - 2MB+ for a small Tax Invoice.
i. e. for an Overdue Invoice I'd like to set up a string that reads:Invoice (Invoice Number) for (Invoice Total) is now (Overdue By) days overdue.
For example, if we sent an invoice to Xero our invoice number might be XER-001.
At the moment I have to set that code up on every invoice I send through Xero.
It could be one box to fill in then Xero loads that prefix into the 'Invoice #' box when you create a new invoice, really simple and a great way to customise your paperwork and speed up workflow.
We would expect that after company B paid the invoice, all the items would be added to inventory automatically.
But when you click on PDF the 'Tax Invoice' appears.
Hello,It would be fantastic if the invoice history list at the bottom of the invoice screen said which email template was used when sending.
Xero has no place to store "potential cash/revenue" to be trued up once the actual invoice flows in.
The obvious workaround is to break the "real" invoice into 12 and post them all with the same description (as much as possible).
It would be a really nice feature if the Due Date of an invoice came up automatically.
What would make my life easier is one of two things:1) Instead of entering into each individual invoice, and then clicking "back page" and going into the next one, an option of simply clicking "next invoice".
If these could then self generate across to the Invoice and a return confirmation could be emailed back to customer automatically.
Our supplier issues us an  individual invoice for each customer.
Eg supplier  Bill has delivered to our customer Jack 15 products and given us one invoice for these products.
The 'next invoice' date updates accordingly and the template is saved.
Hello,Would it be possible for invoice numbers be allocated after a draft invoice has been submitted for approval?
This would stop the invoice numbers being assigned from the repeating invoice schedule.
ie: "14 days from Invoice Date".
This is particularly frustrating when processing a large invoice/quote.
In the Freshbooks dashboard there is a running commentary of customer activity: when they open a quote/invoice, if they print it, download a PDF of it etc.
I know Xero records when the customer first opens their quote or invoice, so can this feature be expanded as described above but with a running summary on the dashboard?
The Standard Invoice Format (and Statement Format) includes a section at the bottom underneath a dotted line with an image of a pair of scissors.
Drop down menus to customise access would be great, as there seems quite a jump in accountability / responsibility between Invoice (draft) and Standard access levels.
I found this feature useful from ZOHO Invoice and I believe it is easy to implement.
Is it possible to have the option for people on the invoice only user role to have access to the reports?
It would be really useful if we could enter an annual invoice and then schedule monthly direct debits against it together with the monthly amounts.
Either of the following placeholders would allow me to achieve this:- day number - invoice dateUnless anybody has an alternative that isn't to get customers onto a monthly billing cycle .
It would be great if there was an indicator on the invoice as to whether its been printed or not.
During times of increased invoice entry it would help to know what has or hasn't been printed
I change the quantity or amount and approve and email the invoice to the customer.
Perhaps you could then double click into that receipt and that would then show the allocation of the receipt against each invoice/credit note.
I don't mind the invoice # changing but it should save the invoice, this causes issues because if someone closes the browser by accident without noticing the invoice is lost.
Hello,We have started using quotes using our invoice branding themes.
The only other option is to find an old invoice and "copy" it but that requires you to leave the enter purchases screen and search for an invoice.
We sell items on WooCommerce and all of our paypal transactions that are created in paypal, have the Gross Sale, Paypal Fee and "WC" prefix to the invoice field.
The Payable/Receivable Reports and Customer/Supplier Invoice Reports all show GST inclusive values.
From a client perspective it would be nicer to have the option to include all attachments in the  PDF as the invoice.
I am finding that even after creating an invoice from a quote, whenever I go back into the quote - it still has the "create invoice" option button available.
At present you have to go to settings, email settings, change the email address then send the invoice.
Even maybe a dropdown tick box with some common reasons e. g. Duplicated item; Invoice issued in error etc, and Other - and a line to explain maybe?
pdf that I could attach to the invoice.
This would be especially helpful for us, as we have used the draft invoice feature for producing our quotes for the past three years or so.
This we have to note the details down and write it all in again, otherwise neither us nor our clients know what property/job the invoice relates to.
I can see under Status that the invoice or bill has been paid, but not the date.
At the moment I cannot see if a repeating invoice has already been created.
)Next in the case of a Vat return that has been submitted say for the period Jan / Feb 2015 and it is safer to lock data entry to periods before 28/02/15 at this stage lets say a further purchase invoice dated 15/01/15 turns up that had not been included in the submitted return, Normal practice would be to include this invoice as part of the next vat period (Mar / Apr 2015) however if you post this invoice to XERO global with its actual date the submitted vat period figures will be distorted.
XERO solution - change the date of the invoice to the 1st of the next vat period- to my knowledge and from attending several Vat audits it is illegal to alter an Invoice?
We require a fine grain level of access to reports such that our invoice/purchase people can run SOME reports but not all of them.
It would be great if we could create an instance of the next invoice from the repeating template, modify that instance to go out on schedule, and not affect the underlying repeating invoice template.
Xero I love the flag/ notification you get when you receive in an open invoice, notifying you of a duplicate.
I currently have to create deals with my customers in a word document, and then upload to Adobe Echosign for them to digitally e-sign and then invoice them using Xero each month.
For example sending an invoice for 12 months subscription that you want recognised each month.
It would be good if:- You could set up the repeating journal directly from the invoice.
But then, I have to manually check each item to be included with the quote/invoice to my client.
This has been partially covered in although with the new quote functionality it would be really nice if we could do the following: - Set a required deposit percentage on the quote (perhaps displayed on the generated quote)- Generate an invoice for the selected percentage as a deposit invoice with the click of a button- Generate an invoice for the remaining amount (total minus the deposit) with the click of a button - At a glance of the quote see if a deposit and / or total invoice has been paidApologies if this has already been suggested, but this would really help my invoicing workflow as I often have to keep a separate record of deposits sent / paid and manually calculate the remaining amount to invoice on completion of a project.
I can make an invoice so easily that is loaded with our inventory items and prices etc.
Assuming the invoice was paid with one transaction I guess?
Standardised info on invoice only change quantity, discounts etc for different clients.
and for client name XYZ, their sequence should be XYZ-0001,0002,0003 etc, I know Xero allow you to specify unify invoice sequence number, but there is no rule setting in customer level.
Would iy be possible to have a simple reminder feature once you have created a customer invoice when you click away from it which says "do you want to email this invoice? "
It would be great if once the invoice was paid the due date would be removed.
We are looking for a solution where we can generate a SEPA direct debit XML from customer and invoice data in Xero.
However, if an ending date is set that is the same as the invoice date, an invoice will be sent out anyway.
I have customers who receive a repeating monthly invoice for services, and might incur additional charges during the month.
If we had a suspend button that would allow us to pause that particular invoice from the regular repeat cycle, it would be a big help.
I deal with several people in several companies but only invoice one department.
It would make those that have multiple order numbers easier to find against the invoice number.
a  of Invoice numbers3.
Is there an option or way to choose only certain user or users to approve that invoice?
Often a customer will purchase an extra item after the invoice has been saved or approved.
The basic invoice template ?
Most tradesmen wold prefer this type of invoice
Xero Touch allows you to provide a quote and to choose the branding for a quotation rather than an invoice.
At the moment, I have to click on each invoice to see the reference.
At present we need to manually apply the overpayment after the invoice has already been automatically  approved AND sent, then resend the invoice reflecting the applied overpayment.
This way the outstanding balance would reflect the fact that the customer had previously made an overpayment when the first receive the invoice.
Alternatively however (and this may be more inline with the existing ability to apply an overpayment to an already approved invoice) it would be sufficient if you could open a repeating invoice, and if an overpayment exists, have a messaged displayed indicating an overpayment exists for this client and a link allowing it to be applied to the next approved invoice.
However, once these files have been attached to an invoice or a contact etc, renaming is no longer an option.
I've created multiple invoice templates with different branding, and different email templates, yet all emails are now sending from one domain (eg: company1.
It may be a typo error or an old invoice date.
If we don't invoice the company name exactly correctly they return the invoice.
This is a great feature when it comes to invoicing as you only have to enter one invoice per group.
Problem is, once it's entered, the invoice preview always shows the tax-free amount for each line.
Simple the ability to automatically have the Due Date of the invoice 60 days EOM from todays date.
It is our industry's standard practice is to have an image of the product (in my case an 'artwork') on the invoice.
When you go into a Supplier contact and view the invoice list from that supplier it would be helpful if the system sorted by date and then invoice number.
I have found that there are several unecessary steps for printing an invoice.
I'm wondering if perhaps an option for a HTML invoice template might be helpful.
Selecting the tracking code once with this automatically updating all the lines of the invoice would be very useful.
Having to mouse click into this field on every line of the invoice is very inefficient.
I am currently setting up a repeating invoice for each one of them to automatically be approved and sent each month.
I would love the option to have the search field always active on the invoice tabs.
The only way to do this reliably and in a manner to suit HMRC was to get the invoice numbers to match, using the automatic sequencing in both packages.
This is turning an automated process into a manual one as we have to double check every invoice as it comes into Xero and sometimes manually adjust the numbers.
Let's assume an invoice is received from a supplier for &#163;100 and requires the reverse charge at 20%.
You should then have a negative line for the net invoice amount of (-&#163;100) and a positive line for the same amount (ie &#163;100).
Place document to scan in scanner5. scan, (sometimes your forced to do a preview scan as well as an extra step), 6. save the scan as a local file, 7. attach the scan file to Xero invoice.
The recurring invoice template should optionally update to include the latest details submitted from a draft invoice.
I. e. a reference number that accurately defines who the invoice is from and links the (Xero) supplier to their main SAP data base.
Related to this, can we have an export from the Invoice Listing screens.
Perhaps it could be a tick box on the import screen e. g. 'TICK - Create invoice numbers automatically'.
I have a few suggestions for the Invoice Item entry screen in the mobile interface:1.
Also, when the invoice date is changed (I often enter an invoice for the following day), the due date should be updated automatically.
I'd be happy to break all these issues out into separate topics to be voted on, but I thought it might be useful to discuss the efficiency of invoice item entry as a whole here.
This feature would do the following:- Import the supplier statement (invoice number & amount) and match to awaiting payments in Xero.
Hello,Is it possible to round an invoice amount so that does not have cents, only Dollar amounts?
DOCX template to replicate the appearance of the online invoice.
Would be great to have an option to select a job number for an invoice (or invoice lines) which then attributes those costs against a job in WFM.
It's would be great if there was an easier way to enter contact details, without having to leave the invoice page.
Or even a prompt when you try to send it reminding you it's still a draft invoice.
This I also find strange that it will not roll back to the invoice number if deleted, so the new invoice takes that number.
After all, this is the reference field that appears on a customer's statement, and if you entered in the invoice number, that would simply result in the statement listing the invoice number twice.
When viewing an invoice Xero offers a History/Notes button.
m. 	Tom Smith 	This invoice has been emailed to customer@someplace.
When I approve an Invoice it doesn't automatically open an new invoice.
It would be great if we could attach an email directly from Google Apps to an invoice to keep the audit trail simple.
So if you could match multiple transactions to one invoice, and it only marks as paid one the full total has been met that would be fantastic.
Now I want the amount to turn up in the month of travel, not in the month I issued the invoice (same for costs).
So for example, when I set the invoice date as the 7th it will give me 7 invoice lines with the following text:Invoice Line Text (Invoice Date - 7) Invoice Line Text (Invoice Date - 6) Invoice Line Text (Invoice Date - 5) Invoice Line Text (Invoice Date - 4) Invoice Line Text (Invoice Date - 3)Invoice Line Text (Invoice Date - 2) Invoice Line Text (Invoice Date - 1) Etc.
pngWhen reconciling, Xero automatically matches the invoice and shows the invoice ref.
It would be great if the matching invoice could be linked in this screen.
This means the user could quickly view the invoice details and come back to the reconciliation before they accept the invoice.
I think Xero needs to focus on adding some real ground breaking invoice features to keep ahead of the game and or simply replicating some of the brilliant feature sets from competitor SAAS applications.
Track Invoice ViewsSend your invoice with FreshBooks, and you'll see when your client has viewed it.
For example, have a few invoice lines, a subtotal, some more invoice lines, a subtotal, etc.
I have to wait for the actual date it is due for the invoice to be created before I can email it out.
It would be great to have the opportunity to get an AR/AP statement in invoice currency (and not only local currency).
This would be great with sms saying invoice uploaded to google docs or email notification.
While Xero has implemented Overpayments and Prepayments on the frontend - there is still no way to apply credit notes towards an invoice using the API.
I have not entered an invoice into the system.
at that point I want to attach an invoice .
but if I do it via reconciliation the invoice is completed for me.
But this only calculates from the current date, it would be great if it could work it out from the invoice date!
Why is an incoming and outgoing invoice both described as "Inv"?
Surely a supplier invoice should have a different type description!
Currently I have to go into every Customer, or worse, every invoice, to see the notes there.
Actual item here ------------------- Project management------$100 (hidden line on printed invoice)---3.
At the moment I can import & export financial data via an Open Standards CSV format (& well-documented API's), which is great for interoperability with other systems :)Unfortunately this is not carried through universally, such as Custom Invoice Branding, which is reliant on ms docx formats.
i. e. If an invoice is created and tracking has been set up, the invoice cannot be approved until each invoice line has been assigned.
I have set up a different print template under invoice branding to print stock code, description and.
quantity (no requirement for pricing info) to act a picking and packing advice notes however keep forgetting to change this back for actual invoice -then too late.
I exported invoice details for upload to our CRM.
ATM if I have a contact called 123 Company with a contact of Fred Jones, when writing an invoice I can not try typing Fred Jones but must remember 123 Company.
Given that our financial year is 01 Aug - 31 July, for the third invoice, we would want the invoice date to be 01 Aug and also, as it happens, the due date would also be 1 Aug (although it could be something else).
The easiest solution would be to make the invoice generated date available when customising the invoice via invoice branding e. g. &#171;GeneratedDate&#187;This simple change would make our lives a lot easier, not sure if anyone else has a similar requirement?
In the last software we used it had a box that came up as- this invoice all ready entered & an option to continue- yes or no.
I'd love for these log messages to include diffs, to see exactly what invoice data was changed, too.
I also purchase some goods online and then receive an email with the invoice details.
It would be great if XERO could enable their CSV invoice import file template to accommodate multiple currencies.
When sending an invoice via email, the email message field always appears blank.
Auto statements and invoice reminders.
Can this/ is this a function integrated into Xero and can those times and docket references be transferred/saved as an invoice when needed.
I've really enjoyed customizing my invoice, quote, and other templates.
This would be a similar function to the feature used in invoicing that allows you to check if an invoice has been received and/or opened by the recipient.
my draft purchases even my xero subscription invoice is coming in as tax included and I cannot tick the box to approve, I have to open the draft and change all values to be tax excluded.
I should enter into Xero the Invoice Date and then simply select from some standard options for 14 days, 30 days, 60 days etc.
I have been logged in to Xero for around the last 5 hours working on a complex invoice.
On logging back in to prove I am here I was taken to a blank invoice!
We have recently discovered that the user role: Invoice Only + Purchases has recently changed.
Recently it appears Xero has introduced some type of extension to the "To" field when creating an invoice.
Correct me if I am wrong, there does not seem to be a way to assign tracking categories to transactions, i. e. an invoice, bill etc.
Looking back in to the paid invoice how do I now send my client a receipt?
Good Afternoon,We are currently have to manually apply credits against each invoice.
The client says she did not receive my quote/invoice.
Of course we are unable to list every invoice number in the reference box, so we call it by the month of statement.
Why on earth is there not a check button on the New Invoice form to turn reminders on / offIt is quite stupid that we have to create an invoice and then go to the invoice list to manage reminders.
With this we manually input all the days transactions into a single xero invoice, which whilst it works I'm sure could be improved.
Does anyone know if it is possible to change an approved sale/invoice back to a draft status?
We are finding that occasionally a Quote is marked as invoiced, but there is no associated invoice number.
How can I produced a full list of sequential Quote numbers and see if they have a related invoice number?
Here’s the result of GET’ing an affected invoice: <Response xmlns:xsd="http://www.
I've been issued with an invoice to be paid by a supplier, paid it, reconciled the transaction and bill.
That way when I assign it to a client it appears in there invoice correctly.
It would be great if any one name out of the available contact name list could be selected when preparing a Quote, Invoice or any other document.
However, their statements shows the amount should be still paid even though each invoice shows they were paid.
If the Invoice Date column and the ORGANISATION NAME columns could move to the left I would not get the squashing of the Email address!
IN order to match the invoice from my supplier, I created the PO and bill as "tax exclusive" and assigned the 20% VAT tax rate, so that the VAT is added to the total at the end.
My inventory management software imports the invoice.
Is there a way I can change who the invoice is addressed to for each invoice without having to set up multiple contacts for the same client?
So as an example, even if the invoice date, due date, and paid date were, say, the 1st of March.
I have left it un-reconciled as it doesn't correspond to an invoice.
Let's say I have an Invoice of total amount $1000 and two $300 Payments applied to this Invoice.
The details are:- On 29th December I paid in invoice via PayPal for $3,139.
However, our client provides discounts at the invoice level only.
For eg: an invoice will contain 50 items and at the end the discount is provided as a percentage say 5% on the total invoice value.
It would also be great to have somewhere that the PO number can be stored so this populates the invoice.
We have set them up as Users with the  "Invoice Only- Invoice=Purchases Only" user role.
Good afternoonPlease find attached PAID invoice INV-002736 for $195.
i. e if the invoice is sent in sept with is a charge for october.
They invoice us for the work they do, should this be entered as a bill or as an expense claim?
Have we incorrectly set up the email/invoice layout?
So I'm looking to basically create a draft invoice every timeI email myself a PDF invoice to the file manager in Xero.
We run a consulting firm and we typically invoice our clients monthly.
It would be better if Xero made it easy to select a date range for expense reimbursement that could be automatically transferred to an invoice when it is being drafted.
This clears invoice 1,2,3 and 5 and part pays invoice 4.
I have setup the default numbering system in the invoice settings.
As an example:Invoice numbering:  TH-INV0001Filename of PDF output:  Invoice # THINV0001The hyphen is not included in the filename of the PDF output even though it is an allowed character for file names.
In addition Xero were contacted & they went through the process of confirming that their system was not compromised & the invoice left their system in its original state.
I'm currently making out an invoice for $1000 including gst, and can only get $999.
I clicked on the invoice which shows it has been fully paid.
I am missing two invoice numbers in the sequential numbers.
I managed to create a solution for not having the Pro Forma Invoice option on Xero, so I though I would share it with everyone.
Hope this helps-Go to Settings-General Settings-Invoice Settings-Download your original Branding theme containing your Invoice, credit note etc-Open up your downloaded Invoice and remove the delivery note from the template and change the title to PRO FORMA INVOICE, you can also change anything else that may be required.
Now save this as Pro Forma Invoice-Now go back to Xero and make a new custom branding theme on the invoice setting page.
I'm currently checking their old invoice to see what price they paid to ensure they get billed the correct price.
05 off their final invoice to round it off nicely.
When I go to settings, invoice settings.
I click on inclusive but when I go to create an invoice or quote it puts Exclusive automatically.
However the file is still attached to the voided invoice (I guess, as it's not in the file list) and I can't see the voided invoice anywhere.
TLDR is that sometimes i have to enter the credit note way after the invoice is paid.
Only way I can print is by viewing the invoice online and then downloading a PDF.
So I was going to date each separate invoice in the month it was due so it would only appear on the statement then.
Because our company sells a service, each invoice is for a different amount, and we sell internationally so the tax rate varies.
docx for an invoice template.
The original invoice for this vehicle has about 10 vehicles on it.
I have allocated 2 credit notes to one invoice for one of our clients and I'd like to keep those credit notes as 2 separate lines with corresponding amounts when I print the invoice as PDF.
The invoice is tied to a transaction, so I can't make any changes.
PS: From an accounting perspective, this invoice dates back to when the company was still a single member LLC which books an invoice when it's paid.
The problem:I have one supplier who takes multiple payments from us per day, usually a week or so later an invoice will be added that matches the amount on the statement line.
However, at one point I manually reconciled a few transactions for this supplier, from this point on all statement lines from this supplier, if no invoice has yet been added, come up with an automatically suggested entry.
Either way (set a date within a month, or a date at end of the 6 month period) the invoice would be mis-leading.
Doing it this way, when I import the invoice Xero shows the 15.
However we have a number of different customers all of whom require additional pieces of information that must be included on the invoice specific to the individual job we are invoicing.
So, I have an invoice for the correct amount of £198.
85How to I reconcile these credit and debit transactions with the invoice?
He had an outstanding rent invoice for £276.
This means that I now have 2 items to deal with:1.  the original invoice she owed eg.
I've got a repeating invoice set to generate on the first of each month.
I cannot reverse the process by reconciling the payments back to the invoice as this would exceed the total amount outstanding on that invoice (due to the ''hollow'' amount that makes the invoice partially paid).
We dont sell quantities or unit items - we offer/invoice our service of labour to fix repairs etc.
At the moment the only way I can invoice is through quantities but it looks silly having a quantity and amount of items next to a description that isn't unit or quantity based.
On the Invoice how do I or can I set it up to say Due Date: 7 days after statement date, or words to that effect.
But invoice is paid.
I have done this for 2 payments and a invoice.
1) The customer relationship is with the guest and we raise an invoice against their stay and the room booked.
I received an invoice from EE for &#163;159.
It would seem, correct me if I'm wrong, that you can't print an invoice to PDF unless you are an administrator user.
They have some pre trading expenditure (with VAT on) that has been posted with invoice dates in March and they were also created in March so aren't being picked up by the include late VAT claims option.
How can I best manage this, given that each invoice is likely to correlate to 2 or 3 different prepay charges at varying exchange rates?
When i click on this invoice, it shows $10.
However, when i try to allocate $10 into this invoice, it shows that the invoice has been partially paid.
HiWe have two companies and each issued an invoice to one customer.
Can I and is it correct to manually adjust for the amount which relates to the invoice for the second company.
In credit note screen it only allows me to get a cash refund, and not to allocate that note against an unpaid invoice.
I was really surprised to hear that when I switched his access from Invoice Only to Read Only he could no longer see the My Expense claims area.
I invoice my customers 5 days a week, but each day have different quantities and items to invoice.
For example Invoice date 20.
Attempting to handle the conversion fees on the invoice itself seems unnecessarily complicated, as there would be 2 or 3 different conversion rates from different pre-payments to partially calculate.
So it tries to match it to another invoice, or can't match it at all if there is no similar amount.
I was wondering if there is a way to apply the refunding line to the initial line so it reconciles without editing the invoice in Xero and putting through a credit note?
As we have added more products to our stock lines it has become very slow to create an invoice or estimate as when I start typing a product code, QBO freezes momentarily whilst it searches for product codes that match the first letter I have typed, then the second, then the third.
You can create an estimate and convert it to an invoice but there isn't a means of part dispatching an order and creating a back-order.
I'm trying to find a solution to import data to go onto an invoice to be created in Xero.
csv files and I want to import this information then group lines of data and create the actual multi-line invoice in Xero.
Excess was paid for by guilty party, by means of an invoice with an item marked as "expense".
Is there a way to bulk import the individual payments received on a daily basis and have them matched / allocated to the individual debtor / invoice?
HiIs it possible to re-issue a paid invoice with a different date?
Can anyone help me with the code to create an invoice period (e. g. from 3rd March - 28th March for example).
I'm finding it frustrating that it takes so long to type every purchase invoice into Xero.
So if my invoice has 30 lines but I have missed a step in line 19 - I have to delete 19 onwards, insert the missing line & then retype lines 19-30
As such I have to invoice my client, and include the fee I am being charged by my supplier.
E. g. I invoice my Cient £650.
Most recently I have noticed this on the Invoice page (AccountsReceivable).
I have exported the invoice list from xero to excel to create a mail merge, however, it doesn't have the contact person on the exported document.
I was on the understanding that invoice numbers and credit note numbers run consecutive.
I have an invoice that we are slowly paying off on a weekly basis.
We renew these each year, and again no 'invoice' or 'bill' is issued prior to the renewal.
I tried to send an invoice to a colleague purely to test whether or not it would work, and the e-mail didn't arrive until after we had left the office hours later.
I invoice a promoter for my fee.
I've tried creating an  invoice, but still can't match the overpayment to anything.
We invoice at the end of a month for services delivered in the next month.
I invoice $1000 for services provided.
If anyone knows how to force a logo on to the PayNow page, whilst using custom DOCX invoice template, please let me know.
And, I want to invoice the customer within 24 hours and before the Expense Claim is paid to me.
For example:At the invoice stage:01 Hours spent on design x qty x $  etc (line 1)02 Hours spent on approvals x qty x $ etc (line2)Enters as:Design (HEADER FIXED TEXT)Line Item: 1, Item code 1, Description1, etcApprovals (HEADER FIXED TEXT)Line Item: 2, Item code 2, Description 2, etc-----------------------------------------------------------Currently all I am achieving is:Design (HEADER FIXED TEXT)Line 1Line 2Approvals (HEADER FIXED TEXT)Line 1Line 2Is this possible?
It would also solve the display problem where the pdf of the invoice always opens on top of the space where you are entering the purchase information into Xero.
Is there a way we can show client contact number and email on invoice?
I got a large number of Invoice "print " requests which failed after about 2 minutes with a "Refer to support" message.
I have reimbursed them for the $363 overpayment however cannot reconcile the invoice.
I have tried to create a credit note against the invoice, have tried to create a separate invoice for ($363) which is not possible given is below zero.
In the scenario whereby the invoice total is $58.
Quotation was made and been accepted so he maded the deposit, where can i allocate the funds Because i dont want to convert the quote to and invoice due to the fact the job might have additions and will only be done in 2 weeks so the dates and due dates will be wrong.
It's very common to invoice 50% of an invoice first and then on final invoice there's the next 50% and possibly additional expenses.
00 balance draft invoice into Xero.
We tried several things, such as reimporting the invoice and adjusting the G/L mapping to no avail.
But, my client tells me she hasn't received the invoice, boo!
After the invoice repeats (I do every 12 mths), the next repeating invoice drops my reference and I need to add it back in.
We would love to have the option of associating a location with each line item in an invoice and then reporting on total income per location.
Even though when I click on invoice it shows as being paid and reconciled.
Before that invoice goes out, the clients buys a one-off item.
Customer invoice is $1,000 AUD, customer paid $2,000 AUD which was converted to (est. )
This will apply to the pdf attached file and the invoice link viewable to the client.
The invoice cannot be deleted as it is in a finalised accounting period.
We've never had to keep an invoicing system before and I'm about to issue our first invoice.
Open up that CSV of the dummy invoice - and the tables from exported CSV and the downloaded CSV template are not the same.
This pops the asset into the 15/16 FY rather than the FY it was actually purchased in - date on my tax invoice and the receipt is date of purchase.
To guide responses, let's say I charged $150 for 5 patients - I've been entering this invoice into Xero.
I want to prepare my invoice on site when I finish the job and record/email it before I head to the next job.
I therefore produced an invoice for the amount of $261.
is that where a custom invoice .
Invoice 7414 - then Invoice 7415 instead of Invoice 7414 then defaulting to Invoice 0483.
I used «DiscountPercentage» on my invoice.
Creating repeating invoice is not working currently.
So now I have a debtor invoice and a supplier credit.
Every three months they'll send me an invoice showing my real usage and, at that point, I'll see whether I'm in credit or debit with them.
If I create an invoice from the quotation it will be for the full amount and I don't really want to discount each line item by 50% then duplicate as that is not what is happening in reality.
Occurred to me that I'm having to enter this 'location' for each line item and is always the same for a given invoice.
Was curious as to why this doesn't apply by Invoice/Bill as against each line item?
Or is there a way to do it by invoice that I'm missing?
This assumes A) you have raised the original invoice.
B) you have paid this invoice off.
2) Raise credit, in the invoice screen, for this invoice (duplicates same nominal as invoice) - and allocates it.
3) Go to invoice by clicking on invoice at the bottom - takes you to invoice.
4) Unallocate credit by clicking on x on right of credit amount below invoice.
I then received another invoice from the same supplier for computer expense of $100.
When you edit something, such as the unit cost, after an invoice has been approved, it first appears to have changed and the total calculation has also appears to have changed.
I've now had to check every invoice.
the upfront amount that was paid will then be applied to that invoice.
they're not paying us until that invoice is created and the credit applied.
Under "Invoice Settings", I can clearly see my custom branding theme with "Invoice.
docx" set as my invoice template and "Standard template" set for everything else.
Xero Calculated Invoice Sub Total = $195.
net thereby skipping the step of also having to go mark the invoice as paid.
we now want to refund 1 item from that invoice.
The Batch Payments function is awesome, however it could be even better if it allowed the user to change the amount that is going to be paid against a particular invoice.
we want to have 2 templates for the invoice email that gets sent out.
Also, it would be nice if you could automatically attach copies of relevant invoice to an outgoing statement.
When I generate an invoice based on the template, it gives me too many decimal points.
I have used this for invoice uploads and everything works fine with it.
We auto invoice some of our customers monthly (approx.
400) and currently we have the ability to automatically charge/debit their card of choice for the monthly invoice.
docx files for invoice, C/N and Statement.
On the Bill Options drop down menu of an invoice, could 'credit note' be added to delete, copy, repeat.
Therefore the email invoice feature is is virtually useless because it does not allow the possibility to attach any supporting documents.
We manufacture sheetmetal products to a design provided by the customer, we currently embed an image of the design in our invoice and quotes.
So, unless anyone can help me with the above, I am planning to download, buy if necessary, some pre-customised invoice templates.
I then went back to this invoice and edited it to see if it then showed as "VAT on Imports" instead of "No VAT" which is what it showed previously, but nothing changed.
All cruises are pre paid and the invoice is in a way used as the customers confirmation that they want to go ahead with the cruise.
Now as soon as we create the invoice it adds it to our P&L / BAS regardless of whether it has been paid or not.
If an invoice had inadvertently been entered with the wrong tax rate it would stand out as different from the others.
We only receive one invoice from them and only 1 bill is set up in our bills section to match their invoice.
We generally offer either monthly via direct debit on the 1st of the month (provided by Westpac PayWay), or invoice quarterly in advance.
A renewal invoice is automatically sent out on the 1st of the 11th month.
More often that not it's not until a day or so before that i have to go hunting through Xero to find if the invoice was paid and if not then start chasing it up.
This could be done by imposing other limits rather than the 5 invoice authorization 30-day limit.
Hey allWhenever I create an Invoice or Quote, there's only my client's Company Name visible.
5200Am I correct thinking the way this is handled isa) the USD amount is converted to GBP using the rate on 15/1 as a p/l item in the cost account i. e. it is locked in on that dayb) At  the EOM if the invoice is still open the amount is revalued at the 31/1 rate an fx gain/loss is entered into the fx gain/loss accountc) following month the invoice is settled and a real GBP amount entered.
The followings are some of the methods I have gathered from reading Help and communicating with the XERO support:-both of these reports would only works when the transaction involves an invoice being issued.
The issue I have I with this newly created piece of functionality is that I invoice one month in advance for some items - and when done for quarterly/monthly periods this function falls down as it cannot know to move the year on the correct amount.
In WORD this shows as &#171;RegisteredOffice&#187; with field code &#171;MERGEFIELD RegisteredOffice *MERGEFORMAT&#187;This returns on the printed invoice: Company Registration No:&#160;xxxx.
We have one invoice with a due date of August 31 that is unreconciled - we assume this had been paid prior to 26 August.
For one of my clients, I need to issue an invoice that shows a 5% workers compensation insurance levy applied to the sub total of each invoice issued.
For example, I invoice a customer for $200.
Please could someone let me know how to calculate the profit for each invoice.
We run a care facility and invoice customers each month for services.
Currently we invoice a net amount to these customers.
How do I incorporate the fee to be received from social services funding  the amount due directly from the customer into the invoice (but only asking for the net amount due).
The problem is they only issued one invoice totalling £48.
But when I send the invoice from 1st Company the changed logo was printed on other companies managed.
And even if I could, it would be incredibly hard to determine which batch deposit corresponds to which invoice.
It would be great if it could show things like the invoice number, total receivable from the client with details of each invoice making up the total, date invoiced, due date etc.
Suddently my invoice is dead and there is no way to reverse it.
Can I edit the invoice template and change the way the Quantity field is formatted so it displays "3 hours 45 minutes" instead of "3.
I'd be happy if I could even set a template for a particular invoice, and have that stick.
However, we do carry some items in stock and we would love to have all of our items in our Xero inventory so that the information could be added to the invoice automatically.
When they owe me money for something I create an invoice for them.
Also, are there any fields that would allow me to differentiate between a 'draft' invoice and one that has been 'saved for approval'?
The issue is they have quite a lengthy description of the work completed per client which pushes the invoice over to two pages and can also look somewhat messy.
However, I do not see any import click on the invoice page.
We have been putting some of our new swimmers in under " contacts" not customers therefore when going in to find there invoice it appears they don't have an invoice in.
We have picked up that one of the invoice dates was for 1931 instead of 2013!
I have copied the invoice and re set the date as it wouldn't let me alter it.
I have not had problems doing the same this on the Invoice.
22222222222222% But when we pass this in invoice line items it takes discount rate 22.
Our inventory items are GST inclusive, so we select "Tax inclusive" option for the when creating an invoice on-line.
docx for an invoice.
We also want to know when a customer has paid their invoice.
Will it appear in the draft invoice list for editing and approval 14 days before invoice date, 30 days before, on the day, etc?
I have a client that we regularly invoice for services provided to them.
(I know that the client is not gst registered, however I have always been under the impression that all information on receipt/invoice is the be noted)Is this not right?
I have a customer who has a negative balance, and there is no easy way to post a check from them and have it available to allocate to an invoice as soon as it is posted.
Would love to see this as a feature as it would create a much more accurate history on the invoice.
At the end of the month, an invoice for all work carried out is generated and is deducted from the credit.
I invoice my customers monthly but complete a number of jobs throughout the month.
Hello,When an invoice is paid to us by our customer, government rules (India) requires a tax deduction at source (TDS) of 10%.
It would be great if we could have it work so that it suppresses the zero in the PDF invoice in the amount column if the Qty and Unit Price are zero.
Examples are;Invoice Date     -   Due Date12th Jan 2013   -      28th Feb 20131st Feb 2013    -      31st March 201330th Feb 2013  -      31st March 2013Using Numbers that are relative to the invoice date is messy, because we need to always add 28 days.
I have now customised an invoice template and it now clearly displays my trading address under the logo.
However, if you then click on the view PDF tab, you see the proper invoice, showing my address on it.
I have added my registered office and company number details as a footer to the invoice templates, so the legal requirement side is satisfied.
or do i charge the invoice plus $10 for admin expenses?
to enter a single invoice.
When sending an invoice, automatically have a script for example Dear.
, Please find attached a copy of your invoice, Sincerely .
I created an invoice for goods supplied as a xero rated supply.
Example:The issuing of a debtors invoice at say $1,000 requires a creditors invoice of say $100.
Or could this be done simply by using an invoice payable?
- no audit trail is left on the invoice record of anything other than the first invoice which was sent- no audit trail is left on the customer record of when a statement was sent by email.
I can download ABA file, email payslips and revert to draft, but the option to create a draft invoice is missing.
Now i invoice this 2 guys and they have paid me.
Now i invoice this 2 guys and they have paid me.
Seamless integration of Concur Expense and Invoice to streamline and automate your expenditure processes all within one enterprise level platform.
i2B Supplier Portal is designed to manage and share the flow of Xero purchasing information (from order to shipment to invoice) with your suppliers.
Never wait for an invoice to be paid.
Get 100% of the invoice value within 24 hours.
All your successful shopping cart order invoice will go straight to Xero.
Automate your invoice collection with Direct Debits, eCheck and Credit Card Charges.
Invoice everything through Xero.
Simply scan, enter data and upload your invoice in one go.
Send a friendly SMS reminder a couple of days before an invoice is due & follow up if overdue.
Connect with your customers beyond the invoice.
Forecast and manage cash flow, get paid faster and find commercial invoice finance.
Cut the cost of invoice processing.
Get paid faster with eWAY processing your Xero invoice payments.
Paperless job to invoice in realtime with GPS, reports & timesheets, check out .
Streamlines the process of sending overdue invoice reminders to your debtors to help you receive payments faster.
Upon attempting to send an invoice from WooCommerce to Xero we are seeing the below error that prevents a creation of invoice on Xero:ErrorNumber: 10 ErrorType: ValidationException Message: A validation exception occurred Detail: The Date field must be specified.
Our customers require the Xero invoice and our associated pdf attachments (timehsheets and stat declaration) as one pdf file.
it would be handy if the deposit was offered/available when raising the final invoice.
I run a translation/interpreting company and I am looking for an App that integrates with Xero to perform the following tasks:- Send job alerts to suppliers via SMS- Send job alerts to suppliers via EMAIL- Manage suppliers- Create invoice to suppliers- Search suppliers via specific fields- Upload files, manage projects/tasks- If possible, with CRM as wellIf anyone has any recommendations, please let me know.
------------------------ERROR creating Xero invoice: ErrorNumber: 10 ErrorType: ValidationException Message: A validation exception occurred Detail: The Date field must be specified.
Currently, each employee records the above info on paper as the job unfolds, then at the end of the day sends the info to the bookkeeper - who then manually transfers the info into Xero - directly into an invoice which is then sent to the client.
I'm looking for a way to simplify our workflow as we're currently taking orders, updating the nightly order sheet and then when it comes to invoicing customers we're collating the number of bottles and inputting again into Xero to generate the invoice.
Inventory needs to be increased or reduced prior to receiving or sending an invoice, respectively.
I suggest it is possible to record each transaction taken by izettle as a separate invoice in Xero- these can then be allocated to the correct customers.
We win a job, we order the material, the material comes in on a truck, we don't do anything to confirm the stock is received or correct, we manufacture the job, we install the job, we invoice the job,we stack off cuts in any available space,we do NOT record what goes out the door,we do NOT know what a job cost us.
Ability to1) Pull in billing info electronicly so as to populate a recurring bill in Xero and or2) Ability to import on feed the bill invoice and attached to the relevant transacttion.
Then for this Delivery Docket to be converted into an invoice for this fuel at a later date, say for a month end statement.
something goes awry and despite Receiptbank getting it correct, Xero then assumed different rules around Tax and ASSUMES tax even if there was none on the receipt or invoice.
this all needs to feed through to a Xero invoice!
I've manually clicked on sending invoice to Xero in order action, but failed.
Ability to invoice in the field and potential to link to a website desirable.
I went to send myself a small invoice to see if i could test the process.
EXAMPLE FROM A2X INVOICE:ShippingChargeback - Amazon.
so we want to create an invoice and receive funds into petty cash.
We raised our first invoice on Leap a couple of days ago, but nothing pushed through to Xero.
We will raise an invoice buying, say, 100 meters of Fabric1 to supplier A.
HiWe are looking for a quoting system where you can book/schedule a quote request into the diary / calendar and then from there turn that in to a written quote and then if they accept turn in to an invoice that links with Xero.
And also, if i sell an item on my office, create an invoice on xero, would this software sync with Bigcommerce and take of this unit from the stock on Bigcommerce?
▪	I get a euro invoice on 21/09 for €403.
(Signup software) An invoice is generated automatically that feeds into Xero as soon as possible5.
I understand that if using DEAR for the inventory process then there's a facility to receipt inventory from a delivery note and then match this at a later date to a purchase invoice.
and the differences will be timing differences between delivery note and purchase invoice.
Prior to using Xero we used another product (Wave) that also linked to Stripe payments in Stripe came through with our invoice number in the description.
Which means we must back out the invoice, and create separate ones for each customer that requests it.
I have a client that has multiple deliveries during the month to his customers then at the end of the month we issue one invoice listing each dellvery line by line.
At present client has to generate invoice on XERO and do a Word Document as an attachment with the extra fields needed which is doing double the work
I created an invoice for catering for $300 (USD).
I cant figure out how to apply part of that day's Square receipts to the 'real' invoice without adding an additional $300 as income.
We tried quotes but found to easy way to relate them to a partial invoice.
When you buy an asset take a snap of the invoice and record a few key dates and Easy Trace will send you reminder emails before your warranty is about to expire.
In addition Easy Trace allows you to print travel expense reports with copies of original invoice images with a single click.
Which is creating all the payments to be out etc and its very annoying having to go into each invoice and edit to take off the GST.
•Added validation on Purchase, when Invoice first method is selected, that will check whether quantity on Stock Received matches quantity on invoice.
We are wanting our purchase orders to link with the current invoice so we remove manually pairing these  together.
Subsequently we dragged the same invoice into entryless.
I am trying to fund some unpaid invoice and I am using bluevine.
I added that info when I created my invoice but for some reason its not showing up on bluevine.
I have added invoice through ecc cloud.
Then tradesman will appear automatically on invoice.
I believe this is because no invoice has being raised in xero.
When I coded them all and transferred them to Xero there are 25 that have no invoice file attached.
When we try to edit the invoice and delete the "rounding discrepency line" it wont let the invoice be processed as a negative $ amount.
I presume this is all because the negative purchase order from Vend has come thru to Xero as an invoice and not a Credit note.
We then go into the invoice on Xero and change it to US$ to email to the customer.
Unless the invoice is paid, as soon as the next sync happens, all the amendments are lost.
Does anyone know how to lock the Xero invoice to US$, once amended?
Best thing, i don't have to type up the invoice, its automatic.
Attached is an sample invoice.
Now when RB sends an invoice to Xero, in order to view the scan you ahve to download it first, then open it.
this takes way longer and if you are trying to run through 100's of invoice and approve them it will take for ever.
pulls in data from Campaign Monitor and pushes out invoice data to Xero.
The recurring invoicing function of DEAR Inventory allows you to invoice customers on a regular basis.
A very good CRM solution which is missing an integration with invoice creation from a won deal.
They currently invoice using an excel spreadsheet which uses a sum to calculate the seconds contained in the audio minutes into a fraction x by the cost per audio minute = the figure charged.
However we export them to xero before we print them and this means that everything appears on the invoice and we have no control.
With the import as it is we have a list of costs, labour etc so are having to completely alter the invoice once it shows in xero.
When stock is received in Vend, you can create a Payable Invoice in Xero.
comWhen I logged into Xero itself there was no message notification telling me there was an Xero invoice ready to view or accept and no additional invoice on my subscription list.
In the past few days we've been getting reports from a number of customers with recurring invoicing that the online invoice link isn't clickable.
It's now an extra few steps that I have to do to get the invoice.
- Allow faster invoicing entry - i. e multiple invoice for one or multiple suppliers - people who are used to keying in other system that allow fast entry will find this very slow.
- Why on invoice entry is the default NL code not entered?
Unfortunately, the latest change in the 'to' field of the invoice is a step back for me.
For every painful invoice.
The issue is that there is no way to edit the inventory amounts or inventory items on an invoice once the invoice has been either paid or partially paid.
For example my consumer customers don't care what invoice a credit goes against.
The app - No search option for outstanding invoice by customer?
In the process of creating new invoice, see something I want to change, go to Invoice Settings, error 500.
Occasionally it allows me to adjust a copied invoice, go straight to approval, but it calculates it incorrectly.
I had to manipulate and set up an invoice type email thing to achieve this bulk debt collection demand.
We started using Xero 6 months ago and are now looking to set up Infusionsoft for Marketing and inlife processes - probably up to and including raising an invoice.
We will then want to pass the invoice data to Xero for record and reconciliation.
I also got som generic work-around suggestion that didn't even make sense in my sepcific case - which xero admitted in thier next response and suggested to write the invoice in word!
Xero should include a 24 hour phone number on the invoice or at least let us quit more easily.
I eventually received the bounce back on 18/4/2016 which was 3 days after the invoice was due to be paid!
This way if I have multiple quotes for the same client at around the same price I don't have to go into each quote or invoice to see which job it refers to.
Once an invoice is Approved (let alone paid and reconciled) it should stay unchanged unless specifically edited by someone with authority to do so.
I now have to take the invoice pdf out of Xero and sent via MS Outlook.
In less than a year my costs of creating a single monthly invoice to the US has gone up 300% from 25$-75$ per month.
Invoice DesignPerhaps the most disappointing feature is the creaky invoice templating.
And now our invoice numbering has an inexplicable gap in the numbering.
However it's also not flexible when you have no stocks, Xero doesn't allow us to create the invoice.
I found that I needed to go back to my quote, copy out the title/summary info and paste it into a new line in the invoice to make the charge description on the invoice relevant.
There's currently no way to attach PDF files when you email an invoice.
So I would have to download each invoice, save as a PDF and then email through my regular Mail system.
It you can't send me an invoice that works right, what are the odds that the ones I send to my customers will?
Your half assed version of quotes (Draft Invoice) is nothing less than insulting.
I sent a invoice for 125 x 0.
The invoice "To" field is incredibly basic and frustrating in its functionality.
I have tried sending one invoice to a friendly client 3 times and still is hasn't marked it as such.
##### CLUSTER 14 #####
Would be good to be able to do this directly in the 'recurring invoice' screen
i am able to raise an invoice.
In MYOB we were able to invoice customers for both.
In Sage I was able to amend the invoice depending on customer.
I am not able to track who the invoice was sent to.
You are then able to edit according to your received invoice and aprove.
Would be great to be able to determine who has approved an invoice or bill.
Since there is an option to set an amount not to send if the amount is lower than "x", setting a starting point for an invoice # or a date should be able to be added with little trouble.
It would be great to be able to set up 'Joe Bloggs - On a/c of invoice 1251 - $5.
If I am searching for a supplier invoice for 1 customer, I will be able to see them all in a list, not have to open each one to see which customer it was allocated to.
As you do not have the ability to be able to upload a csv file to automatically record those receipts, It would make it so much quicker if access to the client invoice list could be organised so you could keep the same page accessible after recording each receipt instead of it going back to the first page.
It would be a good option to be able to permanently  change the branding theme for a  customer when putting on an invoice.
I would love to be able to edit Transfers or Spend and Receive Monies, if you make a mistake you have to void it and start again,  if you can edit and invoice why not a spend money.
The invoice should be able to be sorted by clicking the headings displayed, i. e. click on "Item" and it is sorted by Item name A-Z, click on "Description" and it's sorted by Description, click on "Amount" and it is sorted by Amount Lowest-Highest.
I'm looking to see if anyone has been able to create a custom invoice that calculates a page subtotal and then carries it forward onto the next page?
I found it really uneasy while working with quotes to not be able to have an hard link between invoice and quote(s).
Also, not beeing able to have separate field to distinct Customer's own reference, our Quote# and some 'title/object' make the formatting of the invoice a pain.
What would then be great would be to be able to multi-select the items and create a draft invoice based on those items.
It would be ideal to have a field at invoice level for salesperson and then be able to run reports by salesperson.
2. being able to view and print an invoice in the iphone app would be very handy.
Would love to be able to change all the tax codes on each line per invoice.
At the moment I have to open each invoice individually to be able to copy it.
It would still be necessary to be able to edit this invoice line field.
It would be great if we could rather invite a customer directly to sign up and be able to view their statements online without having to do it through an online invoice.
It should default to the invoice date but one should be able to change that date.
It would be very handy to be able to enter a reimbursement to a timesheet in the Employee Portal so that an employee can directly submit any expenses without having to create an invoice.
I want to be able to have them under that same company name, but choose the department/person that I want to invoice.
Also I think that departments should be able to submit a PO, Quote, Invoice or Bill for approval to their head of department.
I keep reading that I should be able to find the invoice through Find & Match, but it doesn't pull up any.
Nothing I'm able to do will get the Contact Person field to show up on an invoice.
However, as it appears to me, I now have to manually match every invoice paid every day to be able to reconcile the EFTPOS settlement amount.
In MYOB I was able to create Jobs in which I could allocate invoice/ purchase transactions to, to keep track of expenditure.
Able to pick up repeated invoice from supplier.
We have a tremendous inventory and being able to write a draft invoice with visible SKU's would make for faster, more accurate packing.
If a client requests a copy invoice, I want to be able to change the branding to email.
I have found a way to stop it coming up by making the text white and re-sizing to one but it would be great to be able to delete it and the invoice still run.
##### CLUSTER 15 #####
I bank with Lloyds and would like to know if i'm able to setup bacs payments?
I'd like to be able to specify how frequently a bank rule may apply.
I would like to be able to manually enter bank statement lines.
com, and it would be great to be able to reconcile their statement like other bank feeds.
I would like to request this because it's nice to be able to remove and redo bank transactions BUT it will also be nice to mark several items as 'reconciled'.
I like to be able to go through each transactions and reconcile with the actual bank statement.
##### CLUSTER 16 #####
Hi allWe've just signed up for the Xero tax e-sign feature.
Hi,We have just moved to Xero and I am trying to reconcile the transactions from Apr-16.
Hi There,I am just rejigging the departments/project tagging on Xero and wondered if I could have some advice.
Hi there, Just wanted to see if anyone knows for sure if Xero satisfies Australian requirements for legal trust accounting?
Hi,I have just set up Xero.
Hi,We are about to embark on converting all of our existing MYOB MAS ledgers to Xero ledgers ( those that we have not upgraded/converted to either a cashbook or a standard ledger)I am just wondering if anyone has embarked on a similar journey ( i would assume many have ) and how you went about getting the data out of MAS, either full transnational or more realistically as a conversion balance into a ledger.
Hi AllI have just started using Xero with limited accounting knowledge.
Hi all,I've just been using Xero for fews days.
Hi there, I'm just starting out with Xero and have a question about recording National Insurance Contributions.
Hi, I'm not sure whether this is a recent change to Xero or just a coincidence that I am starting to look at this feature today.
Hi Guys,I have just moved from Sage One to Xero.
Hi We have just moved to xero (from sage) and I have found the mobile app good for keeping track of my expenses.
Hi all,I've just started using Xero.
Hi,Hope someone can help me, I have gone into the banks to reconcile and the xero transactions are not loading, just have a little thing going round and round saying loading, but nothing is,
Hi Guys,I have just started using Xero as a sole trader.
Hi, i do the treasurer work for a small charity and we have just completed our first financial year using Xero.
HI, We're just in the process of changing over to Xero.
Hi guys,Just trialling out Xero at the moment.
Hi all,I just started with Xero and am learning how to deal with petty cash.
Hi Everyone,I've just released addons for MS Outlook and MS Excel (2007-2013) that integrate with Xero.
Hi, I have just started using Xero and have noticed that in the P&L Reports if there is a loss at the end of the year the heading still reads Net Profit, I have found in most other systems in this circumstance it will change to Net Loss, does your system not do this?
Hi,I have just finished my first year as a Xero partner.
Hi Guys,I have just moved to Xero from Sage One.
Hi all, I have just migrated to XERO and love the platform so far.
Hi everyone,I've just migrated from Wave Accounting to Xero.
Hi,I have just started using Xero and am reconciling bill payments.
Hi there, Perhaps I'm just being really thick (feel free to point that out), but to creat a 'fixed asset type' Xero tells me to:     Go to Settings, then click General Settings.
Hi AllI have just started using Xero.
Hi,We've just integrated Xero into our Training Management Solution (BluegemEXPLORE.
Hi all, I just recently started using xero for my bookkeeping practice, I am a sole trader.
Hi, I just had a few questions regarding Xero.
Hi guys,I've been using XERO for a while now and I've just noticed something that shouldn't be.
Hi We have just started using Xero and not sure how to set up the leave to automatically calculate based on hours worked each fortnight.
Hi everyoneI have just run my monthly payroll and for one of my employees Xero has not calculated the SGC.
Hi All,Let me just say that overall, I am very happy with Xero.
Hi All, I have processed our first payroll using Xero and one of our staff has just advised that I have paid them at the incorrect rate?
Hi everyone,I've just started using Xero, and we're looking into changing the format of the income  statement.
Hi All,We moved to using Xero this FY and I've just taken over the payroll duties this month.
HI, We have just moved to Xero and I have set up the opening balances for leave correctly.
Hi there,I've just recently started running Xero Payroll and have linked it with our NEST pension scheme and last month ran fine.
Hi Folks,Just started with Xero Payroll for the April Salaries.
Hi There,We've just started with xero payroll.
Hi there,I've just started looking into Xero today, and am on the free trial.
Hi All,I'm currently working with a small catering company in the UK where they have just converted to Xero.
Hi, i have just started working with a start up and chose Xero as the Accounting software.
Hi Just wondering if anyone has used Big Commerce and Xero integrated.
Hi,I volunteer for a nonprofit organisation and we have recently just moved to Xero.
Hi all,We've just completed our Xero link for Netfira Shop and would be grateful to anyone who would interested in testing it for us.
Hi i was just wondering if your going to put a calendar with xero, currently I'm using google calendar and there are plenty of accounting software with calendars , just wondering why xero doesn't have one ?
##### CLUSTER 17 #####
How can I find out what accounts staff member has made transactions/history/changes in payroll on other staff members pay runs.
The charter of accounts shows 'wages payable' as locked and automatically updated through the software's pay run facility(which we are not using).
Currently, we pay ourselves for these expenses by writing a check, thus wasting checks and efforts to deposit the checks in personal accounts.
Book-keeping and company accounts is a whole other world that I pay a lovely lady to make the pain go away, but I do have to at least get the data entry right, and I think I might have screwed this part up.
There is the ability to record a cash refund on overpayments, I would be fantastic if you could actually pick these up in an Accounts Payable Batch and pay them electroncially.
Ie, as the advisor, I have subscribed and pay for the accounts on behalf of clients and they reimburse.
Client has staff member that requires her weekly pay to be paid into two separate accounts, but instead of a nominated amount requires a % paid into each.
Anyone having issues with the chart of accounts liabilities no populating after posting a pay run?
I posted a pay run this morning and my chart of accounts still hasn't updated the liabilities at all as yet, some hour or two later.
I have a pay run that has posted twice to the GL accounts wages & salaries, superannuation, payg withholding & super payable.
So now each of these accounts is off by the amount of the pay run.
Is the old payroll program, under Accounts - Pay Run, gone?
##### CLUSTER 18 #####
I tried sales tax report under Reports and the amount is way off and does not show the TAX collected.
I have managed to extract the clients but not email addresses via the Sales by Item report.
The problem which I am facing is difference in sales figure in GST Return and GST Audit Report.
The sales tax report shows me a running balance, but doesn't factor in any instalments made, refund issued, adjustment to a previous reporting period etc.
Is it possible to generate a report under Zero that breaks overall sales down into the different branding?
Im thinking there has to be a way to separate money for different services/sales/products so you can report on revenue streams when on the Reconciling transactions page.
I am trying to create an income statement report that along with the monthly figures and YTD figures I have a column with a ratio of the expenses/sales.
Where I would normally get it from on the P & L of my previous accounting package says one amount and my total amount of sales on another report is about $20K higher?
If I sell for 100 and purchase for 100, the Sales Tax Report tells me that I owe +25-25=0 in "High Tax".
One way around this would be to choose a "No VAT" rate on your sale but then it doesn't appear on your EC Sales list report.
Cash Basis: I’m told there’s no current report for Sales by Customer for Cash Basis accounting.
In QB Pro this was simply the report ‘Sales by Customer’ cash basis.
When we run the Inventory Item Details report it show the numbers sold, the total sales price and the profit per item.
We notice that your Sales Tax report only generated the reporting currency, .
A tracking report on the dashboard would work, or sales volume by customer or SKU.
Currently we only see a sales report by product category by month.
Or is there a way to run 1 report or month on month comparison reports which summarise 'Sales' per customer of actual services performed.
In fact from PayPal's website: Starting in 2011, PayPal is required by the IRS to report the sales of goods and services for customers who, in a single year receive more than $20,000, AND 200 or more payments.
Because currency is a required field I am surprised that I can't seem to find a report that allows me to split sales out.
Also looking for a sales report by item category.
I could then run a report which would tell me how much sales had been generated from each source.
Is there a Sales report where I can nominate a period (week, month, quarter etc), compare it to x previous periods and have the options to view it at a summary level (lump sum), summary by customer and optionally a filter by customer.
Plus the Sales By Customer report?
Does anyone know how you can do a report of sales by item on a month by month for items over a 1 year period?
Whats the best, quickest and easiest Report/Layout Option to show your sales month by month so you can compare periods?
##### CLUSTER 19 #####
We have a $3,000 secured credit card with a balance of $1,100 which we setup like a normal credit card account.
Like we see tesco as vendor name and its account next to it
In the Journal, the account "payables" that we would like to debit does not show up.
I would like to get this sorted out fairly quickly and am seeking help/advice as to the easiest/best way to reconcile the CC account.
I am trying to reconcile an account but it won't let me split - it looked like theirs a bug : can anyone tell me whats happening.
I would like a way to track which "suppliers" are paid/unpaid without having to match up manual journal entry lines in an account ledger.
Also I would like to ask in the chart of account the donation of products will go under.
I cannot find an answer no matter how much I google :-)Clearly I am not treating these costs in the same way depending on which account the items are paid from and I would like to do it correctly.
How can I display or print a classic general ledger to include each and every active account - debit, credit, and balance - in chronological order - line by line - like what is available in MYOB and Reckon/QuickBooks ?
I have received a tax refund (australia) for Research and Development and would like some advice on what account to code it to.
I'd like to end up with an Expense account for Meals and Entertainment that contains the sum of all the per diem claims from the year.
But now I often see something like a Purchases account that is used for purchases of stock, instead of Stock on Hand.
So when charges come in for shipping etc that are related to my stock purchase should I also code them to my Stock on Hand account like I did when I paid my supplier?
Since "Prepayments" does not have payments to that account enabled by default, it seems like I am doing something wrong.
As it is a liability account I would have thought It should be without brackets as like other liability amounts in there.
Hello - I really like the Account Transactions screen although I think it would be easier if we could size it so all transactions details could be seen regardless of the size of the description or other info.
I would like to create an online account and hope to create 8 company files.
Would also like to create some pretty graphs showing income / expenditure month by month and itemised by account etc.
In essence, it works like a normal account with money being credited and debited.
It would be advantageous to have the option to include a running balance column in certain reports like account transactions.
I like the fact that I can specify the default tax rate for a client based on their location, but it would be great if there was some flexibility in deciding if item or account defaults have priority over that or not.
In looking to improve our checks and balances we would like to see every transaction in the Client Advancement account that is not marked as a Billable Expense.
I would also like to see 1 to 3 shipping account fields.
I would like to now breakout this Row (Legal Costs account) with additional Sub-Rows which are Contacts (Vendors) so I can see the Cost per Vendor each month.
I like having the Account Watchlist easily in view.
I would like to know which account was used in paying off this expense claim, but could not see any button which I could click.
I would like to have the ability to create another Transfer instead of having to save and then "manage" the account again.
References for payments out of our account have a lot of boilerplate text prefixed and in the reconciliation view they pretty much all look like this:0112 AUD000000001234;RETAIL PUR.
Looks like "edited bills" are not recorded as Pending Assets, when a Asset account is selected later on.
I setup a tracking category called RECEIPT NOT RECEIVED and i would like to filter the account transaction page based on this (currently you can only filter by the description, amount and date).
Exactly the same as we have the ability to link account in reimbursements and deductions, the ability to choose if you would like to separate out your leave from normal wages would be ace!
Lastly, I would like to see the removal of the payroll clearing account.
I understand optional fields not being included (eg payroll "Group"), although they would be great to have as well, but a field that is likely to be populated for all employees, like superannuation account details, should be included in the template.
pngIt's sorted into a custom Chart of Account that is setup like this: http://i.
The receipts are no longer available and I haven't kept the originals as it was all onlineIdeally I would like to have my account restored to midnight before I made the changes.
1- why some account arent set by default to be paid to, like I see general expense and office expense isnt set to receive payments, any reason?
I'd like to transfer this to the petty cash account.
##### CLUSTER 20 #####
How to account them?
Best approach to then reconciling GST to Balance Sheet account.
By trial and error I've reconciled a loan account and when it appears on the dashboard there is a little green tick with a note that says "reconciled".
I went into Manage Account and clicked Reconcile Account and it tells me the account is reconciled.
I was expecting my PAYE payable account show as zero but it is showing a negative balance of $100.
I reconciled as far back as the back account sync goes (which isn't nearly far enough).
Will it credit his account?
We cash account for VAT and have the correct settings in place.
We have a credit card account that we have had a couple of failed/returned payments.
I am having trouble working out how to reconcile my Paypal account.
then the inventory asset is up to date and correct, but its debit in Historical Adjustment and we want to balance that account (Historical Adjustment) to 0 after all.
Is it possible to set off items against each other within one account, e. g. Prepaid Expenses or Other Receivables?
They are generally fixed amounts per month paid direct debit from my personal account.
I have been debiting these withdrawals to (Equity) 310 - Loan from Owner which offsets owner's contribution account 301.
Is it asset or libility account?
£750 to cash account£200 to card account£50 to petty cash accountIs the above approach how it should work?
£800 to cash account£200 to card account£50 transfer from cash account to petty cash accountAs it's automated from the POS software, Not sure if there is a endpoint for the transfer.
How should I account for this?
I had the account 3140-Salaries, which had all the payroll movements since we started, and another account 3144-Termination Benefits, that was set up and used only in January 2017.
1) I set up each loan as a non current asset account in the CoA.
1 - Restriction - is the transaction in a "permanently restricted", "temporarily restricted", or "unrestricted" account?
We code the weekly charge to the prepayment account then transfer amount into same account.
Now i want to debit David's Account.
These 2 payments are showing up as separate lines in my company credit card account ready for reconciliation.
Between these dates payments from clients went into my personal account.
I also paid around 6 bills from the same personal account.
Another related question, several cash payments from Clients never made it through either account.
However on the cost of goods account it's showing the wrong cost:Total Sale (No Taxes or shipping):£22.
My question is, which is the best nominal account to assign this to?
Looking at the help / forum my thought is to setup a "Directors Loan Account" for the property so the purchase costs & buying fees & redevelopment fees (if they aren't being paid from my normal business account would be "credits" in this Directors Loan Account" and then likewise the proceeds from sale would be a big "debit" in this "Directors Loan Account.
So my question is, what is the purpose of account codes if they are not used for reporting purposes or, as far as I can see, for filtering of any sort?
This appears to be a locked account.
Yesterday, I tried to change the conversion date to before any of the imported transactions from my checking account (starting in December 2015).
I did read something about having to set up a clearing account for Paypal but I wasn't quite sure how that would work.
I also transfer all GST to a holding account so BAS payments are hassle-free.
but when I go back to look at the customers statement of account it still shows as unpaid under "begining balance".
But I see two problems with this;1st - it would show up as a debit in the Insurance Premium account (which would be sitting under liabilities).
76 into our account for a $970.
One is the master account where the statement lists all transactions for the other 2 employee cards.
Are we supposed to setup a separate asset account that represents a piece of real estate that has its net worth increase accordingly and then do annual reconciliation on it by manually calculating the net decrease in owed principal based on the loan account?
Netting out carried discount account to COGS.
I have $1500 in a discount account that is being carried forward.
There were several expenses prior to partnership opening their checking account.
I have a payroll earning item setup for this bonus using the 'Wages and Salaries' expense account.
Amount due is obviously less the ongoing payments on account.
How can I account for that?
I want to zero this balance by "paying" out of the dividend account.
The website accepts payments on behalf of these companies i. e. Customers purchase the companies services via my website and the funds get paid into my online account (not that different to how Airbnb works).
However, this hasn't taken in to account the VAT so isn't reflected in this quarters VAT return.
and in turn messed up some other reconciled transactions for the current account.
I have lots of receipts which have been entered under the wrong account.
Some have been allocated to one account called Telephone and the others have been posted to an account called Telephone answering.
0  (prints to PDF except account column) line 2:  item 1501 To Clear Revenue   1 @ -$500.
I took some cash out of our current account to provide a cash float for a work trip some of our team were going on.
50 to the "Payroll Tax Expense" account and $1147.
50 to the "Payroll Tax Expense - 941 FICA" account).
Would I put that down in the same account?
I want to record a debit of £90 in client account, and £10 debit to petty cash.
OR should I record entire cash advance to client account, and then record a £10 credit to client and £10 debit to petty cash on return of receipts?
The only other VAT account is the VAT liability which is where the payments of VAT are manually posted.
In QB, I had an account for PayPal Credit.
Have a client who has been locked out of their Wells Fargo account for over a week now.
I am unsure how best to account for Amazon payments from EURO zone countries (e. g. Amzon FR, IT etc.
But: How can I account for Amzon statements in EUR.
As such, there's little point me adding a formula to denote how much I should put in the VAT account each month because the figures ignore VAT thus leaving it in the kitty.
The account shows 100% reconciled unless you added the transaction fees manually (unlikely).
Inventory Donated - I see this as an extension of above, requiring an account to balance things out, but perhaps a different one?
I'm trying to reconcile the account in the meantime.
what account do I reconcile it to?
I don't want the client to see how much is allocated to which account.
My question is related to the 980 Owner's drawing account.
I have coded all such transactions to the 980 Owner Drawings account.
I believe this is the correct set up for this type of account.
An example of a transaction will be as follows:Account.
Im assuming the DR in account two gets matched to a bill or expense.
How to account for when a Customer gets cash out on eftpos transaction.
Is it the "830 Income Tax payable" account or would it be a different current asset?
Which nominal account should per-mile motor expenses be assigned to?
If so where to I specify from which account it came out originally (and is it even necessary)?
- Create a bill - to yourself (Jonny Lastname)- Record the expense in the line item, to the appropriate account - fuel, materials etc- Attach the image - AuthoriseOnce authorised you have the option.
We invoiced a client for a project fee, however the project came in under budget - how do I return the underspend and account for it properly?
How do you post a journal to a customer account?
Or if possible an A/R, A/P account for the client and then some type of classes for each of those sub-projects.
Record a Transfer from the Checking account to the Checking account to the Credit Card       In accounting terms:  Debit (decrease liability): Credit Card & Credit (decrease asset): Checking account2.
Receive Money in the Checking account from the Shareholder (equity or liability account - I happen to be using a Shareholder Loan Payable account).
and a Credit (increase of liability) to the Shareholder Payable account.
We are trying to complete a control account spreadsheet.
I checked the 'enable payments' box on directors loan account.
I have yet to see the documents splitting the amount by intangible/tangible assets, but when I do, I'm not sure if the coding should be to an asset account, or some form of equity.
I've already setup her inventory as "Tracked inventory", Issued Purchase Orders, and Reconciled the Charges on our Checking Account to the purchases.
Paid for the home + closing + downpayment with personal account.
x,xxx paid via check from personal account.
I therefore needed partially refund the customer and in my online banking transferred $150 from my business account back to the customer account.
Amount paypal took from my account to refund the customer 2.
However in our loan account where the loan was drawn down and our loan payments are applied, the $250 shows as money received except as this is only a fee it doesn't change the principal balance.
I am setting up a client's account, and I'm a bit stuck on whether to set the conversion date at 5/1, for the sake of ease, or whether that's a bad idea.
Hey all,I paid the IRD my tax that was owing for the tax year ending 2013, I am unsure of what account I reconcile it to - my guess is '830 income tax' - is this correct?
Does this expense account have GST?
However when I started getting the monthly bill, it shows an additional 15% discount applied because there are now multiple organisations billed on the one account (i. e. paid with my personal credit card).
My Paypal balance NEVER matches the Paypal account balance ever.
So my issue is this - how do I reconcile the amount coming out (via direct debit) from my account - it won't be cost of goods as this would effect my P&L's a bit, so what should I mark it as?
Apply the social site transaction in the credit card account to the funds from the liability account.
I can't get my head around this- I transfer to a savings account and reconcile them together, If i transfer the money back for expenses then that income has been accounted for.
Regarding an unrealized gain, I would expect the '740 - Buildings' account to be debited by the amount of gain (or loss), but I don't know what the other side of the log entry?
How do I make sure that I still account for the &#163;20 that was sitting in my paypal account, and ensure the full amount of &#163;150 shows up on reports for this spend?
Normally we put interest and other financial income and expenses in an account type named "Finance" or similar.
But wonder should I be applying the grant funding to an asset or liability account instead?
I am unsure how this will then be treated moving it from one account to the other and to capture it as revenue.
But i had been putting money into the company via the default 'Owner A funds introduced' account.
I want to make sure I am selecting the correct Account Types.
I am looking at my income statement and I don't think I am selecting the right account type (Subcontractors).
I want to make sure my Rev/Expense Account Types are correct.
In addition to cash donations and grants, our nonprofit also needs to account for in-kind donations:  donated rent, services, and goods.
Could you help me with which account should I put to?
But how would we account for that?
how to edit an item that has been used cost account to historical account or another?
My accountant did mention I could set up a clearing account but I'm not quite sure how this would work and she is away for a week so I am seeing if anyone else has a suggestion/explanation?
I then have to withdraw my personal earnings from my business account into my personal account, but am not sure how to record this.
I have accounted for the private loan by creating a liability account in COA, that I can make the payments from.
We have some aged payable, a little amount left on few supplier account, no one chase on these payments for ages.
It's not very convenient if you want to make sure and have the cost hit the original expense account.
My PayPal USD account is sitting at $1,995.
My PayPal AUD account is sitting at ($2,567.
Transfer made to wrong account.
Now my loan is completely paid off, but the liability account is showing a balance of $800.
Likewise I charge any expenses to the same account so I always have a positive balance showing.
The closest account that I see available is the COGS account.
How the heck do I reconcile bills that have been paid from an account I have no details of or access to?
Then enable payments from account 7203.
I'm not sure how to account for this.
50 (to tax liability account).
50 discount (to tax liability account).
50 (to tax liability account).
84, 695 were paid by my associate through his personal account.
For example - Transaction - Shell Oil #1239545If I set rule Create rule Shell Oil - (Any text filed = contains = Shell) take it to this rule or this account, but it not doing it.
When I mark the transfer in my trust account as a transfer it then creates a second transaction in my operating account.
Hello,I have a American Express account that I get a rebate on FedEx shipping purchases.
2 clients Account where they accept payments on behalf of their clients.
I throw all the Stripe deposits into an asset clearing account (or should it be a liability?
The only idea I can come up with is this: create a "Prepaid POs" asset account.
I understand that inventory is an asset account,  however if I paid for these items,  shouldn't it show it?
I opened a parts account with a garage that reconditions my vehicles.
Does this type of prepaid supply account have a name in the accounting world?
I have a situation with an account that can be both a current asset and a current liability depending on the balance.
In my old accounting system, each line item was coded to its own expense account based upon the type of purchase it was.
The easy plan is this: Inventory account contains my tracked inventory.
Throughout the year as I do inventory make adjustments to my tracked items out of the Unallocated Inventory account and into the regular Inventory account.
Meanwhile I'm selling untracked items out of the Unallocated Inventory account.
We account centrally.
This means we can't get a realistic balance sheet for each tracking account.
I used the account 720 - Computer Equipment.
Do I get the funds paid to my account and then create a transfer between my Paypal account in Xero to the business account it has been paid into?
I cannot see where I can edit that transaction to correct the date, and it does not appear that I can do manual journal entries to correct either because it will not let me select the inventory account.
However I simply want to track it against the Directors Loan account instead of working through the Expenses FunctionalityThe reason being is that the Directors Loan Account has a balance.
I know the stock should be an asset and I have created an asset account.
Do I do a manual journal to move $2000 from the revenue account to tax liabilities (some mix of "230 - Employee Tax Payable" and "240 - Income Tax Payable")?
Money is wired into savings account.
Expense Claims: This feature needs flexibility to allow certain staff (e. g. accounting clerk) the ability to submit expense claims for others (e. g. senior level executives) using their own user account.
The current process requires having to log-into my CEO's user account and completing and submitting his expenses using HIS log-in information and account.
I cannot pass an adjustment into the UNREALISED Exchange Difference account to account for this difference.
2/ By this approach, the exchange difference would be deemed as realised and posted to the REALISED account.
At the end of the day, his cash account should be either nil or the amount of cash he has on hand, (in a perfect world).
The problem I have, is because these were refunded they caused a credit in our paypal account.
However, in this way we cannot see the interest payable account in our balance sheet.
Sage shows the correct P&L account balance (3200) as my accountant stated.
Is the only way to do this via a journal to the Directors' Loan Account?
)Is prepayments a good solution to this issue (and if so, how to go about it), or should I create a manual journal entry (and if so, for which account - accrual?
If I follow the rules for a Contra offset using the Suspense Account, the remaining amount stays in the Suspense Account and remains lost which is useless.
Seems fairly simple, but the Suspense Account doesn't allow for this.
I have an account to track our employer contributions, but am wondering how to code the employee's portion?
I have an Inventory account set up that I have used.
I have disposed of assets against a shareholders account.
We have recently set up the Auto feed from our Natwest Bankline account which seems to be great.
9% APRBreak point at 3 years where 50% of original price is guaranteedI'm trying to work out how to account for this?
If that is so, what account should that be allocated to?
Option 3 : Can we simply create a Revenue account called Discount which will always be in negetive?
The balance of my personal account is affecting my Balance Sheet.
I added a credit card account, but I'm not sure I did it right.
I have an individual Chart of Account entry for each property and they are classed as "Liabilities".
Is it best to have a single "Chart of Account" for all mortgages and tag each transaction with a category tracker id - The same as I do for "200 - Rental Income"?
The closest account that I see available is the COGS account.
how best to code payments out to a seperate account.
Then both payments go into the revenue account.
The information I have imported is Date/Amount/Description/Account Code.
It came from my personal account and I am listed as a Director of the corporation.
The account is setup as VAT exempt and also the payments too?
My coworker was trying with his paypal account, and he found no such issue, maybe its a way my account is set up?
01 transaction and code them to the rounding account, but that's kind of ugly.
And the cost of the product in inventory only takes in account the purchase order from my USA supplier.
I was hoping it would be as easy as changing the current account number so it would re-sync.
If I reconcile to Federal Income Tax Payable, the transactions show up as liabilities (i. e. not yet paid), and the account is out of balance.
I've also opened my CSV on notepad and double checked the inventory account field has 630 entered correctly with no extra spaces or characters.
I am trying to figure out how to properly account for all of this.
I would almost rather delete my account and start over.
In July 2014 he began picking up other work (IT consultancy) and initially used his limited company account to facilitate payments for the first few jobs.
He has subsequently transferred these funds from the limited company account into his sole trader account (as the sole trader business expanded).
The reason being is I want to show on the remittance advise that each individual account is fully paid so I can't allocate a general discount (credit note) to any of the bills.
From an accounting perspective how do you treat Integrated Client Account balances and the GST, PAYGW and PAYGI on the balance sheet when BAS are lodged past the due date i. e. the March BAS is lodged in July.
I'm thinking:&#163;800 purchase of gift cards recorded against my Computer Equipment Asset account (710);&#163;0.
01 to my Insurance account;&#163;13.
75 (monthly for next 10 months) against my insurance account).
and there are two items I dont know which account should I put into?
I am not familiar with setting a tax rate for each account.
Question: I am not sure whether this should be a GST or non-gst account?
I have noticed that August 2014 transactions imported were imported by me into the wrong account - the PayPal named account and not the Westpac named account - I hadn't reconciled these.
Or another way to import the file into the correct account once its already been imported once?
One has a large balance on there account following a deposit refund.
Can I create a contra account, refund to it, then draw on it to the other?
I'm trying to figure out how to correctly account for Per Diem when traveling.
I give myself a "paycheck" biweekly, which reconciles against my Owner's Draw account, an Equity account.
We have a liability holding account for those monies collected.
We accidentally transferred some money to our personal account, which was then transferred back to the business account once we realised the mistake.
I now have two transactions to be reconciled, one to the personal account and then the same amount back to the business account.
To accommodate prepayments, I created a Current Liability account called "Deposits From Customers. "
Is it as simple as Debiting the inventory account and crediting the relevant expense account (via a clearing account? )
or do I enable payments from the inventory account?
I have a paypal account that dumps deposits into my checking account daily.
Past banking: Through the first half of the year I basically ran 2 businesses out of 1 account.
If I have purchased it on my personal account or credit card I code that as Owners Funds Introduced.
6 to Loss (Gain) on disposition account (difference between book value and trade-in value)Now,  how would I deal with the two older assets that have not been listed as sold in the Fixed Asset account.
Created a non current liability account, created a purchase for the amount which debited the liability account.
When I create a purchase for this it debits the liability account again.
I code my disbursements against various GL codes (typical example, i am paying for a Microsoft 365 account for a client and so code these costs to an IT cost code (under GOGS not Assets).
I am trying to setup an account so as to allocate the dividends the company receives from listed share investments in Australia.
It had an affect on a liability account and I noticed the change, but there may be others that would not be noticed.
but for the "Account" part.
36, I can't seem to get the payments assigned from cc account without having 'overpayment' created and no way to assign this to refund.
Should every unpaid expense be categorized in a liability account, or should they all be categorized as what type of expense it actually is?
The dollar box had the correct amount written in numerals ($110) and this amount ($110) was deposited immediately into our checking account account.
I have an asset account set up for motor vehiclesOur system won't allow for us to set this up as a credit card so we have to do a journal entry to bring the vehicle in (assets) and the loan in (liabilities).
They have said to make an account that is called "cash on account".
This usually involves a CASH or PETTY CASH account.
How do I reconcile the transaction on the reconciliation page in a way such that $30 goes into travel expense account and $70 goes into office expense account?
One of the places where he works collects the income on his behalf, from his clients, deducts their management fees (including GST) and deposits the remaining monies into his account.
He works on a cash basis, so only wants to record the income that enters his account (not the original figure before the management fees are deducted).
This is because he isn't reporting the total income, only the income that is deposited into his account.
Reconciling an account, there is a £200.
00 debit from the account to the skip hire company.
- There is also a Chart of Account entry of "200 = Rental Income"  Put each property as an "Acct = Property 1" (with the account name being that property address and in the COA Assets Section).
I have several rental properties and have started to tidy everything into one account.
Question:This one off transaction in this "wrong account" needs to be recorded for tax purposes.
I've made a mess of my Stock on Hand (SOH) account by not updating it with the original stock value.
This is great, but since I started with a zero balance in my SOH account it went into negative and has been going deeper and deeper into negative with every sale I have made.
And on that Bill I would code the stock purchase to my Stock on Hand account.
1. why isnt there a basic subsistence account for my coffee shop lunch etc.
But this means we can't account for it as an expense.
What should I show them as when they are deposited into my tax account?
And here is the other side of the transaction in my COGS account http://nimb.
Why would both transactions be showing as a credit in the SOH account?
However, it doesn't show up in the pull down account list.
Also with the interest - it is compounded back into the term deposit so I have been recording this as a journal entry against the term deposit account - is this correct?
I have made an account called 'opening inventories' under direct costs and 'inventory' under current assets.
I have credited the amount in the manual journal to the cost account and debited the account to the asset account.
While the funds are in our cashbox they are booked on an account named "Undeposited Funds" this account has payments enabled.
I'm having a bit of headache trying to account for tax credits (which for LTCs are passed through to shareholders).
withdrew much more money that they were supposed to from our account.
After a few days of back-and-forth, much of that money was credited back to our account.
The question is where is the best account to credit this under?
For the purchase account I used 140-Inventory.
So how does everybody account for unpaid cheques?
cant get what account do i put establishment fee, stamp duty, fee for registration of a document, account overdrawn fee .
The help file recommends to code it as an equity account (such as owner funds introduced).
I did this and it showed on the VAT account correctly.
I would have thought, for example, if your quarterly VAT return was in December, the amount showed owing to HMRC would match the balance in the VAT account as of December.
I have a client that has multiple credit cards with Westpac that are linked under a single account.
This account is a locked account so you cannot enter.
I have an expense account called "Income Tax Expense" and a liability account called "Income Tax Payable".
However, this week we had to transfer funds by writing a paper check on Account A and depositing that check into Account B.
I assume I don't allocate it to my GST account.
For "Account to debit for sale", I selected the house's fixed asset account.
If so, what account is credited?
Now, How should I account for to such a scenario?
To what account would I reconcile this as there are 2 issues that I see:1.
Basically i get a big deposit into my account and then i refund back to my customers 70% of what i received for them individually.
To take a live example - i paid a 5,000 deposit from my personal account to a supplier in china, and then the remaining 5,000 amount from the company business account (total was a 10k purchase).
Would i put 5,000 from the directors loan account into the company account, then show the company account as paying the total?
This is technically incorrect, because only 5,000 left the UK business account to the supplier, and the other half came from my personal account.
At the moment all the salaries go into one GL account and I can't find anywhere to edit it.
then record the purchase as a normal purchase using the liability account?
Question : I fail to understand where this “raw material” direct-cost should be written on the Chart of Account-Expense column.
My gut instinct is that "Current Liability" is the wrong account type for these kind of transactions.
In account A I've marked the payments as transfers from our checking.
Each has a current account with the regional franchisee (RF).
The monthly current account statement is also emailed out as a PDF.
When they start operations, each franchisee sets up a weekly AP for a fixed amount to be credited to their current account with the RF.
Account balance is based on credits / debits being switched.
Hey Guys,I recently added some funds into my business account as my cash flow was running low and then within a few weeks, transfered the same amount back to my personal account.
The situation is:For the year ending 31 March 2013 all of the expenses are under their respective account codes.
The transactions for each of these cards are summarized each month on the one Billing Account, as well as individual statements being sent for each card.
However the Billing Account also shows every single expense for each card, and I don't know where to code these to.
)Also, each month, the Billing Account is showing a credit for each individual card total and also a debit for the same total.
I understand that the general method will be - on receipt of cash, credit Unearned Revenue Liability account ($1320 or $1200?
Right now I'm doing everything thru my personal account.
and should I be using the Accumulated Depreciation account (as the credit account, and not our own furniture & fittings account.
Is there a way to export and import transactions from an account to another, or a simpler way?
In the Account Number column, I believe the format is wrong.
I would appreciate any suggestions - especially how to handle the liability account.
I transfer money from my USD to CAD account every month.
However, because its not a real ‘transfer’ (I write a check on my USD account, take it out, take it to the currency exchange and then deposit the cheque they give me back into my CAD account), the transfer option is not available.
00   The account code I used was 830 in the (current) liabilities section of the account codes.
- There will also be 1 or 2 statements lines which are from my business account sent to my personal account.
The employee will not do allocate an account code – but will be encouraged to allocate a job code as they should know what they are working on (Hopefully!
I have since found out there is another cheque account used as well.
In this instance, we will buy in parts for the customer (usually from business account but can sometimes be another account) and then charge them when the service is complete.
Hello,As we're closing the books, we realize that a number of expense claims have been using the wrong account when getting filed.
I have tried to set the VAT 720 account to have a starting balance of 7,144 as of the conversion date.
I have searched and searched and found no specific setup instructions for an account of this kind.
But will an account that will mark all my stock purchases be under assets/expences?
The credit card bill is paid from personal checking account.
Because we have a significant number of exchanges, I've created a liability account for the purpose of capturing these transactions.
But when we enter a credit note that hasn't been allocated, it shows as a debit in our liability account.
I have set the loan repayment account as an expense so that it can appear in the P&L.
Do I split the amount in half and put half in account 420 (Entertainment) and the other half in 424 (Entertainment non-deductible).
I now appears I have a different balance in the VAT control account compared to the filed VAT Return!
I have purchased inventory overseas and have reconciled to the suspense account.
Or do I have to go into each individual transaction and edit them all to the correct account?
My DL account is currently overdrawn3.
62 was paid into the petty cash account and the &#163;301.
70 was paid out of the petty cash account.
99 a month invoiced to "Letting agent X" to be paid to "850 - Suspense" account.
The reserve account feed won't connect at all.
On delivery date, in their current program, the order gets changed into a sale, the customer becomes a debtor, all monies are moved from a deposits liability account to the debtor account.
I can set the account up as a non-current liability so it appears correct on the balance sheet.
If I then transfer the £100000 advance to my business current account to, the loan account then only shows a liability of £10100 on the balance sheet.
I have been locked out of my account 6 times in the past week.
The account has only connected in the past day.
I have done this in situations where I may have been waiting on a remittance to arrive by post, or unsure of how to handle a transaction until receiving more info, but I can't find how to actually go back and reconcile these properly to the account where they should be, unless I can remember the exact transaction - date, client, etc.
to manually find it in the account transactions.
I have emailed support at 10:37am this morning about an issue with our account, I still haven't had a reply and have no access to the system and no way of calling to rectify the issue.
00 from Customer B. Step2: Manage Account - Received Money - Received as prepayment Step3: choose from Customer A $5000 allocate to Income Received In Advance account, GST applied.
choose from Customer B $2000 allocate to Income Received in Advance account GST applied.
now Customer A account balance is nil.
I think this needs to be clearly distinguished from normal drawing from the shareholder's current account.
I know I have to    DR   interest expense and CR the Integrated Client Account Liability.
This creates a few problems:1 - How do we code transfers/deposits from the business account to personal account?
This puts a credit balance on account.
I can't put them in a revenue account, because that would double book the revenue.
Hello, since I have a sole proprietorship company, shouldn't I be relocating the "Owner A Drawings" account to Equity instead of it currently being a Liability?
I also have cash in personal account sufficient for my living expenses for the next 12 months.
10 leaving a balance on the customers account.
What type of account should I create to show the cost of uniform that we supply to our staff?
What account should I be adding it to?
We have a few budgets for different departments which have transactions across various account codes, and it can be a bit laborious looking back to see what the "actual" payments were.
Is there a combined account list that will highlight duplicates?
I have had all my files disappear from an account.
The latest transaction from a client still hasn't been transferred to my account 6 days later.
I have created a number of receipts with attachments (photos of tickets etc) on my smart phone and they appear on the account when I log in.
This will make it easier to identify the transfers and you can also match as you go - code the transfer in one account then hop over to the other tab to match it (a refresh might be required).
I can work out how to post them and approve them but not sure how the entry gets posted to an expense account.
Now it's not showing up in the "rent" account so it looks as if I've not paid any rent for that year.
As a novice, I cannot work out how to change the account to which the sum is placed (i. e. moving it to an 'Expenses' account code) against now that it has been reconciled and is in the system.
I chose the account the money was coming from but nothing about where it was it go.
If the answer to my above question is no, then I plan to set up recurring bills and automatic payments to my personal account for each of these home office expenses.
Which is the correct account for it?
(Standard chart of account)?
I do most of my transactions from the statement account.
I have created one Chart of Account with "Packaging Related Expenses" as a Direct Cost, is that correct?
I thought for a ltd company it should be a liability, but the 'Owner A Drawings' account is an Equity).
In return, we offer a free account for a year.
I had made transfers to that account earlier than the feed goes back, so if I try to reconcile it, the newly connected account goes into a negative balance.
I record the transfer as a transfer in the saver account however it's not reconciling in the everyday account.
I have made a detailed account statement for a cash account.
I want to see an overall statement of this account with all in&#180;s and out&#180;sI generated a detailed account statement of the cash account.
I purchased six items, two of which belong in cost of goods sold chart of account, and four which belong in consumables chart of account.
(is the fact that I have accounted it the the bond liability account all that is needed to ensure that the $300 doesn't get recorded as income)3.
Normally in MYOB when collecting a rental bond it would be allocated to an Assets account as pre-paid bond and then once the tenant's holiday period is up the bond gets returned.
Setup an Inventory Adjustment account, which we don't want as it negatively impacts the balance sheet among other things.
So far we have- one biz account- one personal account, the credit card is linked to our PayPal account- Paypal USD- Paypal EUR- Paypal Pound- Paypal $Cadthanks
I haven't been using the Cost of Goods Sold account at all.
is it best to have this all categoriesed under a "home office expense" account, or should I have "power expense", "internet expense" etc.
This account wont be used again one i have reconciled the payments.
00 from my checking account.
Hello,I want to connect my HSBC Business current account to my xero account via direct feeds.
Now let's hope this means an end to the missing payments and fees in the VISA account.
Our VAT Account (820) now shows the incorrect figure.
I'm thinking about the best way to account for these differences, whilst solving a few other minor accounting/paperwork issues that we have.
Should I record the purchase of the domain as an expense (under account "Domain Names") and the sale of the domain a revenue under 'Other Revenue'.
Should I make a more general account (or other account type) for resale items' such as domain names that happen to be bought and sold every now and again, outside of normal business operations?
In MYOB we had set up a credit car account for the inter-companies loan.
We did something similar with ATO Integrated account.
I believe that I should create a rule to transfer them to a separate account, such as "PayPal Fees".
We haven't set up customer account numbers yet.
I have noticed duplicate statements being imported, seemingly at random, for our credit card account.
The difference seems to be transfers between account, but there are a quite a few months I still can get the Money Received and Income and then the Money Spent and Expenditure to balance.
Do i fill out a spend money transaction using the account "Liabilities-900 Loan"?
Which account should this be done to ?
I have given myself a separate Adviser account so I can change the lock dates.
My problem is that Budget Manager allows only one line per account code.
For example: my budget for account code 12345 has $1,000 each month totaling $12,000 for the whole year.
Account code 12345 might have 6  budget line items in it, which all feed into the single budget line for account 12345 in the Budget Manager.
I don't want to set up a separate account code for every item!
When entering the inventory item, the GST % shows up, but not the account 'freight'.
Tab over one more cell, enter the GST and the account 'freight' disappears.
When I reconcile under the Create tab it asks for - What - no problem, assigned to correct account code - Why - great because I can list who I met - Who.
and matching it to the outstanding balance in the AR account?
In QB, I have one master account that has the 2 credit cards under it.
I don't remember in which account, whether it was a part of an "expense claim" or whatever.
I am thinking Journal Entry to COGS & Inventory Asset Account?
I remember PayPAL used to make a 1 or 2 cent deposit into your account to make sure it was valid etc but that's not going to stop me from getting hit with a $7.
The benefit of one account for COGS is that once I've reclaimed all items the balance is zero.
For example:Microsoft Office 365 is $130/year on subscriptionAdobe Suite is $600/year on subscriptionSketchup is $700 one off cost and then $120/year subscriptionAutodesk Revit is $4250/year on subscriptionRendering Program $500 one off costXero $300/year on subscriptionHow do I account for these?
Whenever cash is taken out on the company account, I transfer this to the Petty Cash account, which gives it credit.
However, at some point it has stopped recording received money as credit in the account balance, even though these transactions still appear as being 'received'.
What account would I assign it to when reconciling?
The cheque account was set up by using the form but this has no section for credit cards.
Frustrating - we may have to manually copy, paste and send from a real account unless their is a solution.
All "trial" transactions have been deleted from the old account and the balance is $00.
I have read various things suggesting they should both be dealt with under account 970.
Surely however shareholder loans are not deemed equity and should actually be an increase in cash and increase in a liability account?
How hard can it be to pull out the cash transactions for each account on a weekly basis?
I have added all the purchases I have made from January 2013 until now (From my personal account & Business Account.
50 which are 3 days apart, thus the account isn't reconciled as it is $722.
I have one xerox account i have been using for more than 1 year.
The monies received go to our "Undeposited Funds" account.
I've created a credit card account and imported a CSV statement manually.
I'm struggling to reconcile my PayPal account which has had a direct feed for over a year.
I would assume that I would reconcile that $10,000 that I paid to the tax office with that 825 account.
But if it's currently showing a zero balance, won't I be putting that 825 account in credit?
Each has a current account with the regional franchisee (RF).
The monthly current account statement is also emailed out as a PDF.
When they start operations, each franchisee sets up a weekly AP for a fixed amount to be credited to their current account with the RF.
(We may be limited to one of these three as we try to open an account from abroad).
It would be helpful to search all emails in my Gmail account when creating a transaction, rather than only when managing a contact.
All 3 feeds are reconciled according to the month they hit each respective account.
It's a Euro account, but provides integration with Transferwise for cheap international transfers in other currencies.
My UK company uses N26 as it's far cheaper and better run than any of the Euro account offerings available in the UK.
This creates more work for the user since we now have to create a check style for every account.
This also could create errors if a check is printed to the wrong style with an incorrect account and routing number.
ORRather than matching payments to bills, the alternative would be to show the supplier account balance as total bills less total spent amounts.
When we issue a purchase order, every line item will be pinned against the same account and the tax rates are all the same as well.
If this is not possible as a general setting perhaps it could be added at an account level.
I understand from my account manager that there is no parsing feature, however I think this technology should be fairly easy to embed?
Some information I can think of that can be imported:Sale TotalAmazon's feesSales TaxSeller Monthly Subscription fee (sometimes Amazon takes this fee from your account balance *I think* instead of charging your card)There may be more.
It'd be nice to have a small line near the top of the customer/supplier page to note anything particularly important pertaining to that specific account.
When you drill into an account from the Income Statement/Profit and Loss and the Balance Sheet it would be awesome to have a running balance on that transactions detail.
Currently we can seperate clients into groups and have Name / Account Number in colums as well as every other line of data associated with that client - except for amount own.
We put all purchases for clients into a, Client Advancement Current Asset account.
It would be very useful if the when reports are exported, the account code was split into a separate column rather than being grouped with the account name.
That was the first place I looked and intuitively where I expected to find it -- recording a transfer is not an 'account management' action but a recording action.
Sometimes we ship via the customer's UPS, FedEx, DHL, USPS, etc account.
Please create an option of restoring deleted account transactions.
For example:Account -> in CRCBill -> In USDWhen paying a bill (in USD) from that account (in CRC), the exchange rate is listed as: 1 CRC = X USDThe bill is 1000 USD, and the account was credited 540,920 CRC.
But what if you have payments on account or deposits to process?
Well you can't post straight to the respective customer or supplier account, instead you have to cash code to suspense and create a dummy credit.
I guess you could reconvert it to draft but then does it drop out of the account ie no longer a liability that needs to be paid.
Reason being that account holders should be signing off the reconciliation 2 days after completion.
Also, it would be useful to include the account type (Asset, Revenue etc) as this helps when reporting P&L and balance sheets.
For example, I have a manual journal to an intercompany account, however I cannot export that journal in order to then import it to the other company.
Currently in customised reports notes can only appear on an account with a total.
I would have thought that something as important as an account code would be a compulsory entry when posting?
HiI think it would be more efficient to show the Grand Totals of reports (e. g. Account Transactions) at the top of the first page rather than (or as well as) at the bottom of the last page.
Or I could breakout this Row (Legal Costs account) with additional Sub-Rows which are Tracking Category so I can see the Cost per Tracking Category each month.
Improve the CoA list display to include Description, Show on Dashboard Watchlist, Show in Expense Claims, and Enable payments to this account.
(estimated % of tax to income the client should then save and transfer to a personal savings account)
At the moment you have to go into each individual account and redo the search.
I could transfer all unreconciled to being paid via a clearing account.
It would be cool if there was a screen you could enter your cheque butt data onto, such as cheque number, date written, what it was for (account code), description and amount.
This would be handy when using an account on a lower subscription level where entering and approving bills is not available.
If lock down is not generic enough at least have a default tracking set per user, all invoicing and purchased will default to their account this will reduce errors on capturing.
We have an issue with our intercompany account where there's a mix of both operations (payments made on behalf of other subsidiaries routed via our global parent company) and financing activities (funding provided by parent company and vice versa) where the DR and CR split will not work in this case since there are 2 activities within 1 account.
The temporary solution is to have 2 separate account for the separate activities , 1 for operating activities (recharges) and another for financing activities (funding).
Is there a way to tag these activities within 1 intercompany account rather than 2 for our cashflow reporting as it will be difficult to reconcile at month end ?
We have both an AU and NZ account.
If expense claims are mistakenly added to the AU account instead of the NZ account, there should be a feature to transfer/re-assign the expense from one account to another.
This helps staff select the correct account to place certain items in.
* The allocated ratios would link to the "Tracking function" rather than "Account"
com automatically imported to the bills section of my account.
If I am viewing the transactions for an account, I have to open each transaction in order to email a receipt.
However we are finding we still have to log into the terrible ATO Portal in order to confirm account balances.
Feature request is the ability to view or port through the integrated account transactions/balances to cut out the ATO portal all together!
* Expenses by category * Revenue by category * Pie chart/graph view with percentages and dollar values of spent and earned by category/account / vendor/customer * List view with percentages and dollar values of spent and earned by category/account / vendor/customer * Ability to see what was spent this month – dollar amount and % makeup by category of where most of the money has gone this month.
When I try to group them, then there's no longer a subtotal for each account within say Assets - they merely get lumped into assets, with one total for assets at the bottom.
- I cannot, as a company owner, re-gain control over an employee's login by changing the password or suspending their account.
It would be really effective if we could search contacts by account numbers.
Maybe if there was an account credit column on the customer search page next to 'amount owing' and 'amount overdue'.
It would be really handy if certain current asset codes and current liability codes could 'float' between assets and liabilities - depending on whether the account in question is in credit or debit.
as our customers are, for example "1 Anchor Close" through to "50 Anchor Close", and "1 Harbour Way" (odds) to "65 Harbour Way", as an example of two addresses, we give account numbers of, for example "AC01" and "HW01".
This would make it so much easier to adjust prices and GL Account changes etc.
currently we can put the VAT account on the watch list but this only shows it for 1 month.
It would be nice if the contact account number was also indexed.
We search for our customers by account number and we noticed that the global search doesn't find them.
This should be addressed by allowing account administrators to select permissions using checkboxes.
If you try and search for any of the additional email addresses on the account it does not pick it up, why is that ?
It's not currently possible to change this so that the payments get deposited into the suppliers account individually.
However as it currently stands when ever I finish with one account I get sent to another page, have to navigate my way back to the Find & Recode function and then enter all my conditions all over again.
Tick box selection and a generic 'reconcile transactions' button on 'Account Transactions page?
If you change the Account Code and then click the Save button  an extra line appears below the account code saying e. g. 41040 is available.
When running reports such as Balance Sheet or P&L you have the option to sort by account code.
For example Operating Account (1010).
However they came through PayPal, so I am struggling to account for the fee.
GL account allocation shown at each line item - currently it shows as column headings, so a 10 receipt claim with a different GL account for each expense ends up with 10 columns.
Currently when you go into any Account and select the "Account Transaction Tab", it defaults to sort by oldest entry first.
There is already a 'Sort By' dropdown, but it only lists account name or account ID.
Makes it easier to go back to the account you were working on.
Highlighting the account , account number,  budget and balance of account.
Is it possible to set up a system where the subscriber suspends an account?
I change it to from newer to older and want to see 200 items at once, as soon as I go out of the account again it goes back to default.
~Transaction account (so we can pull any bills that have a shipping line item)Improved export:~Enable unlimited export file size.
It would be great to have the ability to have more than one account number for a contact.
So My contact would be the "City of _____" and I have the option of account number 000001, 00002, 55555, 67777, etc.
I go into account details quite frequently and printing transaction details is bit inconvenience.
Frequently have problems importing contacts BSB+Account number as it is so long and it switchs to 546456+15 number.
It is assumed that all suppliers will have an 'Account Number' that can be used here.
I believe it would be very useful if there were a feature to allow for current quantity on hand to display in account watchlist on the dashboard.
Currently, the only measurement provided in the account watchlist is total value.
This simple menu option would save additional and wasteful navigation to the relevant Account screen.
This also puts you in the right place if you are paying a supplier on account or via pro-forma.
You could set up rules which would allocate each to a certain account if needed.
I'll probably manually input Spend Money transactions in the existing Bill Me Later account for now.
Currently I have to extract the information from two different reports and then combine them, which is difficult as some account codes from last year do not exist this year and vice versa.
Some transactions do not have any of the Rule criteria and it would be great to apply an existing Rule instead of trying to remember the account code and details entered for a particular Debtor/Creditor.
If the Budget Manager had the account number and account name in separate columns, we could have the master budget/other budgets sorted by account number or account name.
I am finding it frustrating that I am unable to have my acccounts appear in the budget manager in account number order.
Rename Overpayment to "Paid On Account"
The problem with grouping by Account Name is that it runs alphabetically, mixing income and expenditure codes.
It would be useful if different currencies were possible for other account types too.
The first is a clearing account, which is in USD (while my company is NZ based).
My client base is primarily lawyers and Trust account management is one of their biggest priorities.
It would be great to have a way to manage Trust accounting without having to create a separate organization or deal with Group account (Trust account and liabilities account. )
This makes it quick and easy to review the GST treatment of items in a particular GL account.
Also, the slider on the account drop down menu is a bit narrow :)Keep up the good work.
It appears that you can't export data of the Account transactions list.
I'm surprised there's an account number & name field but no sort code field!
inbox account and only attached files will show up there.
To Cash Code for these clients means relying on an eidetic memory or a spreadsheet of Supplier/Default Account Codes.
HiMany of my clients ask me to print out the financial statements and include the GL account numbers.
It would be very useful to have a check box for "Include Account Numbers" and "Include or Omit Zero balances".
Currently on the Income Statement, transactions are grouped by Account.
I have an account at an investment brokerage.
When I connect to this account using other Yodlee-powered sites (eg.
com or Yodlee's self-hosted platform), those apps recognize the account and download the deposits and withdrawals from the cash management portion of the account (the money-market account).
My account nickname, to my knowledge, does not have either of this strings within it.
If a rogue accountant/bookkeeper enters their own BSB and Account number prior to creating the batch file and the fraudulent information is uploaded to online banking, the transfer is made directly to the changed account details?
For no logical reason you currently can't save an account where a line item on a purchase order is $0.
It would save a lot of manual input to enable an "optional" auto fill feature in the check writing screen that would automatically populate certain fields, such as: Description, Quantity, Amount and Account.
Then manually sort customers into the groups that each account manager looks after.
I prefer seeing the A/P account--2000--in my bill page, or the ability to change it to another A/P account.
Initial I recorded it under a Costs account, so it did not show up under "Fixed Assets".
Can we at least have a filter by account group.
Matthew Addison • I would have liked the software to be performing its own mechanical check of the balance of the account.
This information would allow us to reconcile an account easily if there were any discrepancies with a sub-ledger in which the reference field was used.
30' for example, but, other than amount, no further information regarding the transaction appears – as you might expect, (while also expecting the actual transaction details to be imported in the PayPal account).
It will only account for transactions posted up to the current date.
By accident the wrong account was selected initially and then selecting manage and spend money we enter a bunch of check or debit transactions.
Now that 4 or 5 transactions were entered we notice the wrong account was selected for the expenditure.
The only way we have found to correct this is by deleting the transactions and then entering them from scratch in the correct account.
This would make life a lot easier, especially if i have to change the account that the transaction was assigned to once i receive the receipt.
However, unlike account codes, you cannot associate a default tracking code with an inventory item (or contact).
The following page from HMRC (UK tax office) shows a trading account which is first section of a detailed Profit and Loss account.
It has the direct cost account "Cost of Goods Sold".
It has a direct cost account "Purchases".
In the general ledger account detail view, there is a "Type" column which shows the type of document that the information comes from.
I would love a simple chart that shows my checking account balance combined with my credit card debt in a single view, that helps me understand my net position.
For a contact, one can define default GST, currency, discount and branding, but not a default account.
(I also have a credit union account at Mt Managanui Credit Union NZ).
When choosing Account Transaction in reports, a default error screen appears which is disconcerting.
Simple request for a search box (ajax enabled) to make finding a particular account easier.
I could scroll through clients in left column and see the important details regarding their account on the left.
The way I do it now: they show up in the account I have assigned to them which is my Other Payroll Liabilities account.
At the moment it is not clear and each person that comes along to review the Payroll Clearing account as it currently is, really has to start again if they want to identify the out of balance transactions.
Currently I have a standard reimbursement item on their payslip template,  the problem is I have to manually adjust this every month for every employee to match the different no of working days in that month and also reduce the allowance to take their annual leave into account.
Realistically, the only account that should be off limits is Retained Earnings.
(It could have a function for setting the daily parameters for ord hrs and ot hrs in the set up and customisation of each companies account settings, then a simple calculation would work out the ord hrs and ot hrs and give the totals as per usual then all we have to do is review and approve.
An employee advance is set-up as a Current Asset account.
"We have Spouses working for us and they only have the on eMail account.
The expense can be allocated to a cost or expense account, but it doesn't allocate the GST component of the expense.
At present you cannot delete or archive an account that has been used in the past by payroll.
How can we find out a balance at a given date on a foreign currency account?
Currently it only takes into account what has been accrued to date but sometimes employees book holiday in advance.
It has thus NOT taken into account their start date, but used the entire month.
I cannot find what I have been working on in drafts, client account etc
Can I change the account to which it gets accrued (i. e. a Vendor Payable account)?
One option is to go into the expense account and re code transactions summing to the private portion, which will remove the private portion and related GST from the account and the GST in the BAS.
This seems to have worked great, we have the logo and everything :-), but obviously now we have all our old transactions in the old PAYPAL account.
The main thing I'm checking here is that bills are coded to the correct account.
I have found where to amend the conversion balance however the Historical balancing account is locked and won't appear when I am trying to amend the balance.
At the moment I have:Employees' contribution liability account --> 808: Paye liability accountEmployer's contribution liability account --> 808: Paye liability accountEmployer's contribution expense account --> 532: Salaries & Wagesbut there are other options such as: 804: Accruals, 806 Net wages control.
I also have a USD credit card linked to the same account.
Your amount will usually be the same if you are creating a rule and you will want to allocate to say two different account codes, you will usually always do this as an amount not a percentage?
Hey Everyone,I was wondering if there's a quick overview of what repeating transactions are being assigned to a specific account ?
We have a trust account with very few transactions.
I have all this money accumulating in the BF account.
Is there a way to produce an Income Statement that is not in alphabetical order but in account number instead?
last year we paid selective licenses for the properties we manage through our office Expense account.
With tracking categories, can they be assigned to account codes, so that if a certain code is selected it automatically fills in the tracking category?
the error message is that the account number and Apca id on file have not be registered.
- PayPal initiated a debit to our account for $2687.
A customer has overpaid there account and requires a refund.
During reconciliation I have recorded the incoming money, assigned to this Non-liability account.
I have a question, when I record the incoming money as non-liability account, what does it mean to the cash?
Basically, exactly the same functionality that already exists (so an account can be set as a 'Current Liability', 'enable payments', etc) but instead of implicitly converting to the home currency, it will retain balances natively.
I'm looking at setting up a direct feed from Natwest for both my current account and a secondary, Business Reserve account.
Are direct feeds available for the NatWest Business Reserve account, despite this not being an  or do NatWest consider this to be an account equivalent to a current account?
When we click into the account, a foreign currency gains and losses reports has popped up.
When in Reconcile screen, I click on MANAGE ACCOUNT (top right), Find, Account Transactions, it displays results the earliest/oldest transactions first - in our case from 2011(!
we then exchange the foreign currency to GBP with Western Union and transfer it to our UK account.
Then imported separate currency specific statements to each account?
So if I have a Dr to a certain GL account, I want to see where the Cr went.
How do I transfer from my owner equity account to the cash account?
I have started using Tracking and am continually forgetting to select a specific tracking account when posting each transaction.
I have updated the API permission in my paypal account and after waiting the 24 hours I was told to by support (+ another 4 days) it is yet to refresh.
My company refinanced a real estate asset which it already owned and which had been bought for cash so as a result my company account received a lump sum cash amount.
So why is it that Money received into my account can't be reconciled with Spend Money items?
The have even tried updating via capsule crm but it does not sync account numbers or financial settings.
Delete the transaction from the account 2.
I now have a username (which is my email address) a password and an account key.
They are still sitting in my Paypal account as USD, and I cannot convert them via Paypal.
50 from our account.
00 from our account.
They have been invited to a test account to examine the behaviour.
The problem occurs when I press 'accept invite' and a prompt screen appears saying that I already have an account (which I don't) with that particular company an that all I have to do is to accept the invite and continue using the site.
A company has one credit card account with 3 cardholdersThe issue is:Charges for one cardholder is NOT showing up through the feed at all.
- However we found out that the monthly manual journals (P&L + Balance sheet) processed from 1 July 14 onwards do not take into account the opening balance from comparative Jun 14.
However, this sounds complicated, and perhaps unnecessary given that we won't maintain balances in any currency other than CAD - whatever currency my customer pays in, I have it converted to CAD and paid into my account.
The contact with no account number will be archived.
In XERO I setup a "non-current asset" account for the "Directors Loan Account", and recorded every loan made from my personal bank account to the business account.
We won't be making any transactions at all in this account, is there an account we can set up where we won't be charged for this?
So we set up a contact calledFuel, and attached the default purchases account as 434 - Fuel.
Ok so far so good, the remaining £324 I want to allocate to a directors loan account, it's as if I took the remaining £324 as cash.
I have an option to create a cash refund and it has a "Paid From" field, but I'm confused because the outstanding credit should be "Paid TO" my loan account not From.
A sample order:50 USB sticks - paid from an account in the U. S. , total US$ 30050 SD cards - paid from an account in the U. S. on a different date (different PO as well), total US$ 400The items were sent to me and I paid US$ 100 for shipping.
this has resulted in the transaction not showing on the company account but the asset is owned by the company and the receipt is in the name of the company.
Error 317651: The 'From account' details must be entered.
One of which is the petty cash account?
So to reconcile to the receipts I put the £43 to the suspense account, assuming I could create a journal later.
We have set up the account to have each credit card have its own transactions come through.
Right now we are "transferring" funds to each smaller account to zero out the balance through Journal Entries.
This solution is a bit ugly as it uses a temporary suspense account which needs to be monitored to ensure it always has a zero balance.
5. now showing that i have negative funds in my account when i don't.
Using a public application that has a 30 minute authorisation window, I get sent to the login screen then to the screen to ask which account to authorise.
csv file to populate a PayPal account.
I've played with multiple ways of entering the account code and tracking items with no success.
I've even removed the tracking items and simply have "Date,Payee,Amount,Reference,Account Code, Tax Type" and the one row of data with no success.
A client was trying to reconcile their credit card account an came across a transaction that they were unsure of.
At present it is only possible to set one email address as the default (i. e. your own logged in account email address or another one set up in the email settings. )
Through this tax year we've accidentally been using owner funds introduced + owner drawings + directors loan account to record personal money in and out.
We have a credit card account with two individual cards on it.
How do you set an account to not be included in a tally of deductions?
For it to be populated, I have to click the box under “Account”  Is this the way it works?
In the process I deleted all of the genuine account transaction and receipt records As a result: 5.
Also, my account is frozen / suspended and I can't update my credit card details.
-Our Paypal account uses multiple currencies and is linked to your debit card.
And I paid the total amount outstanding in the system account called "unpaid expense claim".
"Expense" 2: Insurance company deposited the value of the item, less the excess, into my account.
But I have only ever used Uber once, and there is only one Uber transaction on my ANZ CC account.
I reconfirmed the account number is accurate.
And I tried deleting the account and recreating it.
I can only get so far then when trying to categorise to an account, it won't find any in the search.
Can you have a VAT registered company alongside a non-VAT registered company held in one account?
Allow me to elaborate:When I buy inventory, we give out samples and then move them to a "Samples" COGS account.
I am an accountant I create account for our subsidiary company in Philippines, we try one month, the all data were set up.
We cannot apply the payments to the bill until after we have thoroughly coded all of the transactions from a holding account, otherwise we cannot change the tax rate.
This makes me wonder specifically if the retained earnings account is actually the retained earnings brought forward from the previous year?
I set up the back account in August 2015, however, its only imported transactions from December 2015 and onwards.
When I go to allocate which 'Account' it goes to, under 'Assets' there are only a couple of options: Prepayments (620), Office Equip (711) less Depreciation (720) and Computer Equip (720) less Depreciation (721).
When I registered my fixed asset (a computer I brought to the company) my expectation was that the value of the asset would be added to my  account.
Similarly if I set the Subsistence account default purchase tax to 20%.
The only way I can think of is to set up a shadow subsistence account for foreign transactions.
It will cause a big problem if I change our account email.
However, under the 'Account transactions' tab.
How does one now apply these against the actual account that they belong to?
I can search for and find Order #1234 if I search for in in our checking account, and it shows up, but if I search for order #1234 in our PayPal account it does not.
How do I get Find and Match to work with our PayPal account?
I've set up a VAT control account in my assets, but I am not sure how to allocate the tax rate for each expense to this count.
The important thing was that the vendor Gasoline was coded to the automobile expense account.
I've lost my suspense account.
(Now, this would be ideal in the real world) I went back  in and entered negative numbers when I write the check and that brings the checking account balance to where it should be, but am I doing something wrong.
Hello,This is probably a very silly question, but, which side of the transaction increases the balance of an account and which decreases the balance?
How can I account for those COGS accurately?
This is real money from our account.
I want to automatically apply discounts and tax based based of the settings off the account.
I have linked my Paypal account and all the payments show ok.
However I have subsequently found out underlying the employee's cards the BNZ have a billing account credit card.
I can see the only way around it is to setup a bankfeed for the credit card billing account and stop the individual card bankfeeds.
when you go to your contacts you can identify who has an account with you and who is a customer
I accidentally paid one of the claims in to the '980 - Owner A Drawings' account.
How would I account for this?
Because of this, I accidentally imported transactions into it from my most important account.
I thought I would ask before the cash hit's the account.
The only account I have that will allow international wires is my personal brokerage account.
I have my tax rates setup, and they appear to be going to the right account.
I would prefer to rename an old code and combine with some others rather than using a completely seperate account.
I now have this as a line in my account transactions as 'Recieved'.
Now in its place is this nebulous Account Type field.
Account Type is linked to Cost and Accumulated Depreciation, and is not importable - though it is mandatory.
This means that I, so far, cannot reconcile my account.
Or would the account have to be removed and added again if nothing happens after 24 hours?
We currently have a credit card account for which we enter Acct Transactions in a monthly batch using "receive money".
This account was opened in Oct 2014 and I imported all transactions from Oct to January in one ofx file.
The first transaction on this account was actually 30 October.
The money is received from the holidaymaker and kept in a trust account.
Unfortunately this posted an entry to P/L and loan account.
I needed to refund monies owed to a client of ours as their account with us was in credit due to returned stock.
Another idea I have had would be to do a manual journal to transfer all of the balance of the Direct Wages account to the correct Subcontractors costs account(there are little or no direct wages transactions).
Both linked to the same actual Paypal account.
I'm using a Cash on Hand account to model the contents of the till in my daughter's shop and I currently have two problems with this approach.
I am trying to customize my statement template to show an account summary area.
2: Up to date Account information.
The problem is that, occasionally, that deposit will also take into account a customer refund.
These two $1 charges never left the “pending” state and eventually fell off my account.
Or, sorting by account number would be fine, too, since that would result in the same thing.
I don't want to have to delete it as the account contains the years transactions which have been reconciled.
My issue is that he uses a Westpac AUD Foreign Currency Account for a lot of his Australian portfolio transactions.
01 - ACCOUNT: Home Office Expense - TAX RATE: 15% GST on expensesLine 2: QTY: 0.
If this is different to he 31/1 reval another entry is made to the fx gain/loss account.
I have a paypal account which has AUD, USD, EUR and JPY.
Do I have to manually split the account in four to do this or can I reconcile this multi-currency paypal account somehow?
When one sends a statement to a customer, I would find it extremely useful if the program automatically made a note of this fact on the account.
You can code them, and once you go to reconcile, it won't reconcile and all account coding is cleared.
This would be useful when you are reviewing the GST treatment of items in an account.
If I had the account I could then put in some logic to change Quantity to Hours and Unit Price to Hourly Rate depending on whether it was a service or a product.
My client has a dummy Petty cash account.
If I've spent money I enter a purchase order to account for the difference.
Click on Manage Account button, and there is no way to delete account.
However, when you have say $80USD in your paypal account and make a purchase of $200USD, the difference amount ($120USD) is automatically taken from your associated business account.
Also, why 881 is under 'current liability' account?
I found a bug when adding attachments to account entries when reconciling.
For example, I have a transfer dated leaving Lloyds on 30th April, but it arrived in my PayPal account on 28th April.
Importing fixed assets and there doesn't seem to be a column in the import file to specify the Accumulated Depreciation Account?
Unfortunately my account was overdrawn so it got reversed back into the account on 1st April 2014.
This is also holding up my second account NatWest, presumably because the first account never completes.
Unfortunately, the first run I couldn't process as the account holder (who the SMS goes to), was out of phone range in Sierra Leonne.
One change we made early on was to create a wage control account.
This means that we can grant access to the main current account to a range of individuals without fear that their colleagues' salaries will be revealed.
I was taking a look at Quickbooks Online and after getting a trial account and contacting their support, I found out they only have integration with banks in US.
However, in the Account Transactions page https://go.
accountID=XXXX) under a particular account the values under the Spent and Received columns appear correctly.
PayPal automatically converts USD to GBP and deducts the GBP from my account.
I've checked the account setup.
Analysis Code	Description	Transaction Date	Payee	Account Code	Transaction Amount	Tax typeBarclays	Transfer to Saver	01/05/2013	Transfer to Another Account	761	-904.
Whats the best way of creating a mirror account?
Could the problem be that in the A/R account set up, I didn't put a check in the box that says "enable payments to this account"?
Bespoke Software - Build (205) is not a valid account and will not be imported.
(line 5) Internet costs and hosting (345) is not a valid account and will not be imported.
(line 28) IT Consultancy (330) is not a valid account and will not be imported.
(line 29) IT Testing (335) is not a valid account and will not be imported.
See their credit card account (they are all linked cards but come through on individual feeds)2.
This account is kind of an amalgamation of both credit cards.
One of our issues is the best way to account for media invoicing.
I imagine I am not the only one out there who receives batch payments into their account daily.
This makes sense, however surely I would end up with a negative balance in the credit card account with nothing to reconcile these transactions against?
Hey guys,Is there a way to view all activity that's happened in a single account?
Im setting up a chart of account for an insurance broking firm and have two key challenges.
The reconciled transactions were still displaying the initial 50/50 in Account Transactions detail.
I am the owner of the account.
I want to set up a liability and expense account for this and record it in much the same way as superannuation is recorded.
E. g. currently have functions set up as 'group' option on payroll and then have to manually journal costs from the standard 'salary & wages' expense account to a different account.
We've got a few people here salary sacrificing into super (RESC) and have the templates setup to code to the super expense account.
What the MD is querying is why if the employee is salary sacrificing wages into super, why the wages account on the p/l still shows the gross value and not the net value.
Why is only the lesser amount going to the Liabilities account please?
55) goes to the Payroll Liabilities account.
It appears that this is happening because these people have the "Authorised to approve leave" option ticked on their employee tab AND they also have a personal email account attached to their payroll file and they have been given an invite to MyPayroll.
This is risky as users could accidentally select the wrong name when applying for leave via the app and have their leave request emailed to a personal email account.
I have been reconciling super liability account.
The super liability account is showing as owing $11,000.
We are trying to work out the budget and set up our payroll account in the charter to be split into 3 different departments - project (for project managers - so directly related to the project cost), admin (all admin staff) and director.
Is it the account number set up from employee's super fund?
That is if she were to return the "paid salaries" to the company, can the company assist to put into her Super account?
One of our employees provided incorrect superannuation details and two of their contributions have been refunded to our account.
Then I generated an expense claim and paid the expense item from the suspense account (850).
If I manually enter the transaction to the 850 account, it is out of balance.
So I've copied the below from another thread on a similar topic I've set up the first account mentioned - expense claims paid thru payroll - as a liability.
Its ridiculous to make it a two step process as it has to go to a Liability account.
I went to Reports > Account Transactions then had a look at Wages Payable - Payroll.
**The account for superannuation expenses is no longer active.
Similarly, I can't have accrued the amount in superannuation payable account if it has already been paid.
Should I have entered is rather into account Superannuation (478)?
3) Finally using click-super the $ move out of my account .
However, I have noticed that I can filter my COGS Direct Labour account by job but I cannot work out how to build job numbers into my payroll run.
IN MYOB I had them set in my payroll so that it automatically debited the expense account and credited the liability account for each staff member that is entitled to these insurances.
15 so still have the wages sitting in Account watchlist on dashboard.
There is also no apparent way to do a payroll journal and apply something against this account - it appears locked and won't allow any entries here.
I am not sure how I can fix it now, so all employees would have correct accumulated leave, Super and tax withhold and also "Wages Payable" account would be correct as well.
I usually have to go back a year or two and reconcile the out of balance wages clearing account to pull out all the problems and reconcile part payments etc.
She has managed to give people leave from a leave account that doesn't exist.
As I understand it, the Wages Payable account is to be used exactly for this purpose.
The transaction is appearing in a liablity account for wages.
I have checked that the correct BSB and Account number have been entered i. e. no spaces or hyphens.
My question is how can I account for her payments given our weekly payroll cycle has been processed / closed off?
When I have come across transactions that I have been unsure of what account to allocate them to, my bookkeeper has logged in and allocated them for me.
I want to post the monthly accrual to the P&L and divert the weekly annual leave taken to the Balance sheet provision account.
I wanted to find out how to handle the weekly wage payments and payments to our credit card account when it comes to reconciliation.
With wages is it as simple as creating a transaction on the create tab and assigning it to the wages account?
I want to send a portion of it to their primary checking account and another (smaller) portion to their Health Savings Account (HSA).
Problem is that the account is locked since it is payroll related.
So, I now have two transactions where payroll was 'spent' and that same amount was 'received' out of the same account.
Having to go back to our clients, multiple times, to request additional documents/information that Forte is requesting to approve their direct deposit account has been a great inconvenience, especially when we've already communicated to our clients that their enrollment is in processing.
"I wasn't trying to change the deposit frequency, but I figured maybe there's an error with that setting that's keeping from fixing the account problem.
I'm setting up an SEP-IRA retirement account (also known as a 408k) for myself.
We created an Asset account to accrue the amount advanced.
As I understand it, the Wages Payable account is to be used exactly for this purpose.
The actual amount debited from my checking account was $1,875.
so when I go into my NEST account and Manage Employees I can see two employees have been duplicated.
The account for the benefit type 'NEST' is no longer active.
"The account for deduction type 'Pre-Tax Pension' is no longer active.
The account for deduction type 'Post-Tax Pension' is no longer active.
As I understand it, the Wages Payable account is to be used exactly for this purpose.
The draft payslip however says that they have accrued zero holiday and taken 1 hour so are in negative account holiday wise.
This meant I had to resend them late to HMRC now my HMRC account shows  me as having overpaid them.
I have already set up an Asset  account called Staff Loans which needs to be Cr for each salary deduction.
Doesn't seem to calculate accrued annual leave into account when calculating final salary.
It would appear however that the YTD PAYE has not been taken into account when calculating PAYE deducted this period (weekly payroll).
6) If a deduction is made post tax - could you put that to other income as opposed to an expense account.
I keep getting the error message - 'check payee account details' and no export file is created (or offered).
For example, if salary for Jan is paid on 1 Feb. All the salary expenses are shown in Feb account, which is not so.
Pin Payments allows you to accept credit card payments in local or foreign currencies, no gateway or merchant account required.
9m t/o, 20 staff•	Café Bistro $1m t/o 8 staffCurrently the client has totally manual processes, spreadsheets and old versions of MYOB Account Edge.
Looking at my converted QB transactions in the Square account - it fits.
Although I don't have detailed accounting needs, this method also means from the funds deposited into our merchant account, I can't account separately for merchandise sale revenue and shipping costs - it's simply lumped into 1 revenue account.
Your merchant account and gateway fees still apply.
The client's main concern is having them deposit her incoming funds into their account first and not having immediate access will cause cashflow issues or if something happens to Austral Cloud she won't have access at all to her money.
The 'refund' account keeps resetting my saved settings.
csv format in such a way that it includes:Customer account numberInvoice numberDate of invoiceAmountIt doesn't matter if the export contains more data as I can delete it later on but it must contain these four bits.
Poor refund management directly impacts the inventory tracking and account reconciliation process.
com and we will provision your account.
However, we have 150+ clients on monthly direct debit through Ezidebit and it is an Ezidebit make payments to our account with sometimes up to three or more different client payments in a single amount, several times a week.
I've tried to go into inventory section and change each item, but now they don't tie to any account and left blank.
Can someone please help us  find how to do this in the Paypal account.
There are three tracking categories and reporting requirement is a weekly p and l account to compare with weekly budget/forecast figures for each individual category and as a total.
I have stripe setup on my account (haven't actually used it yet).
It's for a company that loans out money and borrows money and charge interest on account.
During the integration process I created a Stock on Hand account (SOH) and a Cost of Goods Sold account (COGS).
Should the revenue account itself have an actual tax code selected -other than tax exempt?
Connect Shopify store to your DEAR Inventory account.
I have had an issue with a clients account being suspended.
Within my COA I have set up an international Travel account with "No Vat" as the Tax rate held agaist this.
I cancelled my subscription and want to remove my account entirely.
To slow to restore my account.
That way the subscriber can quickly and easily reactivate their account so that they can access information as required.
I have now linked my Gmail account so that any email correspondence from the contact is automatically loaded up.
Of course we cannot get into her account as your whole permissions framework is so unfit for purpose, we are unable to have any control over her account apart from to delete it.
Therefore we created special emails which did not do anything else but act as a log in to XeroLastly, as I have also advised on countless occasions, you have *permanent* access to our account.
We can't do it as we can't access the account.
My Account no.
Instead of taking this into account you continue to make everything worse in the looks/usability department.
Now I'm told I no longer qualify for multi currency on the Med plan after testing my account settings for 5 minutes to see what features I would lose on the Starter plan.
So now we're considering deleting our entire account and starting again.
For the last week I have been trying to contact my Account Manager.
I have been trying for 2 days to activate my account searched for phone numbers to contact the customer support to only go round in circles to come back to email only.
1-6 I inform Lauren that the subscriber is no longer accessible by the company and she is not a director or nor has any claim to the company, therefore the account should be transferred immediately to our director.
Currently - 5-6 I still have no access to our account.
The option to select Account (Categorize to an account) is blank for me.
The MYOB account manager certainly got an email response from me!
Barclays data services are a little known feature of the account and so be prepared to end up speaking to a great many non-UK customer support representatives before you get any joy with this.
OVERDRAFT RECONCILIATION - Scenario: You have a checking account with an overdraft credit line.
The answer is Nowhere if you are logged into your account.
##### CLUSTER 21 #####
Might i suggest that when a New Sale/Invoice is created and the billable expense is added to a new invoice/sale, that the SALE value from the Inventory be used rather than the cost price from the supplier
We recently create an Invoice for a new customer from another country.
(later on 3 June 2016 the $1000 overpayment was applied to a new invoice).
Have been using the new invoice reminders feature which is working really well.
My understanding is if I simply make a 'credit note' on the invoice it creates a new transaction to reconcile, which I don't want.
I have created a new custom email template for a recurring invoice.
)I received an invoice from a new supplier in January for £540.
I put it through as an overpayment, but later found out my husband was paying for an upcoming service in advance and later received a new invoice for that amount.
So we have to modify the invoice to reflect the new units.
Another sidebar question or request is when you enter an invoice and create a new contact as a part of it, it would be nice to have a speedy way, or inline way to fill out details for that client.
When I go to create a new invoice, I see multiple template options from the drop-down box under "Branding".
It may already have been requested, but would it be possible, when entering a contact for an invoice or a bill, to have a link directly to Contacts, so that if it is a New Contact, all information can be entered directly from the Bill or document?
It would be great to have the option to taylor invoice reminders for each individual customer, perhaps it could be added to the page as an option when creating new customers on the system?
On an invoice, it would be great to copy/duplicate a line that is already in place instead of creating a new one for each line.
Love the new invoice reminders feature made available this month.
HiIs the a one click button where I can go to to create new items such as; Invoice, Expense, Quote, Credit Note, Bill, Employee etc.
When creating a new invoice, 'todays date' used to be automatically highlighted on the monthly drop down calandar.
The other options for + New invoice etc are there but not quotes.
I currently have to manually select the new due date to every invoice that this trade term applies to.
It would be helpful if when you merge/archive a contact it removes the name from the drop down list when inputting a new purchase invoice.
The new online invoice feature is great, but I'd love for the next step to be taken and to get a link onto the statements that we send out.
Sure, that's really manageable to have one invoice spawn new ones (at a rate of one per month in our case.
To carry on and enter the next invoice requires clicking on Bills in the tree menu then clicking on New Bill.
In my testing of this issue I also moved this invoice to a new contact (and then back again).
It would be great if we could copy an existing standard invoice to a new repeating template.
csv file into a new quote or invoice?
If I start a new invoice fresh, and enter line after line, I have no problem.
Or is the only option to void it and create a new credit note against an invoice?
Im finding once Ive made my changes to the new invoice, its not automatically updating the tax or final amount.
Even if it pre-dates the new invoice date.
So they issued me a new invoice and refund me £7.
Steps to reproduce:1) create new repeating invoice2) fill out "invoice to" field3) click on "approve for sending"It should pop up an email field but pop up is broken.
I recorded prepayment and overpayment through spend money section and invoice through new bill section.
A new client of ours wants us to put their reference number for us on each and every invoice.
I've gone into 'Invoice Settings' then Default Settings' and changed the existing 0001 to a new 4 digit number.
So if I have a customer who rents a forklift for 12 month and they started renting on 5/10/14, they would automatically get a new invoice each month stating the actual hire period they are being charged for.
You can't create a new invoice, bill or expense claim from this screen.
Began adding new bills to start the process and all seemed OK until we got to a supplier invoice for Product.
Also - It would be great if there was a way of copying an existing repeating invoice and then amending it for a new client.
New ‘Backordered’ flag on sale invoice to let your clients know that goods will be delivered later.
##### CLUSTER 22 #####
Hi Everyone,I am currently reconciling around 50 Credit Cards for ~20 different companies within our group, which takes a considerable amount of time.
Hi,We have contacted support on Feb 15, 20th and March 3rd with still no reply, I see other people have had issues with time taken to respond, we are still 'up and running' with this issue but it doesn't inspire much confidence if we had a major issue!
Hi everyone, I've been an Airbnb host for about 1 year now and now it's time to file my taxes.
Hi Everyone I have a photography studio and we take a $50 booking fee to secure a booking time with us.
HI,I think it would be beneficial, and a time saver, when you search (all) purchases the search also incorporates all the purchase orders you have raised as well.
Hi,Again a potential client who uses sage wishes to view a current nominal ledger at a glance, I know its fairly quick and easy to run a trial balance at a certain point in time.
Hi,first time poster here!
Hi there,Thank you for taking the time to read - I hope you can help and it's an easy fix!
Hi I'm setting this up for the first time today.
Hi,My client has full-time employees on a 38 hour week.
Hi AllI have a payroll calendar for Full time employees which I have not used in a few months as we only had casual staff.
Hi,My client has 60 mainly casual employees, so keeping track of when they are available to work is time consuming.
Hi, I have a part time employee who I set up in December last year.
Hi - this is the first time we have tried to submit the RTI and it has been declined.
Hi,We have 2 part-time staff that are on our payroll.
Hi,I have well over 100 active customers at any given time and am looking for an easy solution to track overdue / outstanding payments.
##### CLUSTER 23 #####
I currently use the physical receipts and have to code everything manually.
then use tracking to provide more detailed breakdown under each of these, or is there a completely different way of doing this that i haven't thought of?
Very efficient and easy-to-use tool that gives you data across all tasks, projects, employees and clients .
We will want to do a profit and loss for each house, my first thought was to use the tracking, but I've read that this is limited to 100 per category, is this true?
Or would this require an additional subscription to Xero for something I would very rarely use?
I can see how to log an expense claim, but don't see how I can use that to offset tax, it seems as though I have to take the accrued "money" out to repay my claim.
We use Stripe and TradeGecko.
People suggests to use Tracking Category for this problem.
When I transfer that amount from my USD PayPal balance to my AUD PayPal balance, use the PayPal currency conversion rate on that day, which should automatically record any currency gain/ loss.
AUD PayPal Expenses: use the PayPal conversion rate.
They would be set up as 100% tax rate and I would use these to enter payments, refund, adjustments, etc.
For quotes and direct purchases, I use Xero.
What steps/procedure would be good to use for this process of reconciling each month until we reach the current month?
i had to use my personal credit cards to make the purchases.
I know it might be overkill but I have multiple revenue streams and use it for my own personal budgeting.
Do I use an inventory adjustment to reduce quantity?
We have three members on staff that use their own cars for work and submit mileage claims which are paid monthly.
Last year the process was to use personal credit card and then use expense claim to claim the expenses.
It would be helpful to allow a nominated private use percentage to assets in fixed assets and track Private Depreciation on those assets.
We are looking to use the expense claims function in Xero.
Use the spend money function of xero?
My intention in future is to use transfers rather than bills as has been recommended in  other posts.
This would allow 'entertainment expenses' and 'motor vehicle private use' for example to be set to this tax code thereby automatically populating G15.
I use tracked inventory and have entered each inventory amount amount manually.
HiWe use cash accounting for VAT.
We use the freelancing website UpWork and also run marketing through Facebook and Google.
We use WePay (similar to PayPal) as credit card processor.
I use a payroll company to process my payroll.
We have multiple budgets loaded which we use as a budget re-forecasting tool.
We are a non-profit entity and use two tracking categories - funder and project.
I have an Microsoft excel spreadsheet set up as the accounting checklist we usually use on manual jobs.
HiWe use a Direct Debit service to collect payments.
I'm not sure what code to use.
I would assume that a majority of use cases receive cash upon disposal.
If I use the “GST on Capital” tax code in Xero, then these purchases will be reported correctly at G10 but not shown at G13 (when they should be), and worse the associated GST will be claimed at 1B on the BAS (when it should not be).
If I use the “Input Taxed” tax code in Xero, then these purchases will not be reported at G10 nor G13 (when they should be).
The complete order is shipped and they inform us as they use up the stock.
We only take payments in USD and use the automatic import, although i'm beginning to think it would be better to do a manual import on a weekly basis.
For mortgages, I use non-current liabilities (they are almost exclusively interest-only).
My client will then use the $5000 to put a deposit on materials he needs to order before commencing the job.
I am not sure which VAT rate to use.
Also is paying our water company for our water use exempt, zero rated or no VAT?
What difference does it make with what code I use?
24 in use tax that needed adding to the total paid to CA.
The use case is connecting our pipeline activity to the Financial and other Reports.
(for USA)Which should I use for Quickbooks and Xero subscription?
I was hoping to use Turbotax because it has great review and looks complete and very user friendly but apparently, it only integrates with Quickbooks.
We use the purchase order function to buy them.
And how do I know which one to use?
I have set up 2 tracking categories, Size and Colour,  to allow him to use these specifically for invoicing customers.
Should I use GST free expenses or BAS excluded?
I have small indirect materials and supplies that I use to make my product.
These use different tax years for reporting (calendar year for US and April-March for NZ).
I'm trying to use native Xero features, especially now that it integrates with Shopify!
We use WFM to enter jobs but the finalised invoicing part is done in Xero.
For assets I use in my motion graphics projects, such as stock photos, stock videos and 3D models, would this go under Cost of Golds Sold?
I am not sure how to use them.
Or is it possible to use the expenses function to enter all the receipts we have so far?
When I reviewed the transactions posted, I noticed that Xero did not use the exchange rate that we assigned for the transaction above.
Some have even decided to use other software because they were not available.
I have tried the 'transfer subscription' option but you cannot use the same email address.
I could do this manually but it would be nice to see if I can use the built in tools to automate.
we're starting to use Xero for my daughter's two small retail shops a couple of months into the UK tax year (currently she uses a mixture of hard copy accounting ledgers and a spreadsheet).
I don't use Xero payroll.
What user rights do I have to give an employee so that they can use the app to send in receipts?
We use MEMNET for our membership and event registrations.
We use Xero for cash basis accounting.
We are using Rezdy, but their direct upload is impossible to use as they count discounts given as money received.
Xero looks to be a more accounting focussed product, and the other two for personal / budgeting use.
I have an accountant and their Xero manager will be setting everything up, but I already discussed this issue with them and they are looking into it, and I want to also do some research also as they have not come across this yet with any of their otehr clients who use Xero.
Obviously, the credit card organization we use takes about 3% off the top.
He refuses to use Xero and says Quickbooks is the only software, so I'm on my own with this posting.
I want to use Xero to track several items I sell.
02 - Property Rates - InvestmentOR2) Use the same entry ("100 - Property Rates), and then use two tracking categories (Home, Investment Property).
I currently use Xero for 2 companies, one in the UK and one in Estonia.
They use stock but not for tracking and they don't keep stock on site.
I use a tracking code for all events.
For this I use inventory item code "DEDUCTION".
We don't use Doc.
0647 -	Base value is cost price $15,325 minus stamp duty $651 = $14,674-	Statutory cost rate for FBT year = 20% (under 25,000km) and no log book for Operating cost-	Available for use from July = 274 days-	Taxable value = (14674 x 20% x 274)/365 = $2,203-	FBT amount 2,203 x 2.
Xero won't let me use this code as a journal.
What number should I use or does it matter?
We use a 3rd party system to generate the information that we import int Xero's invoicing system.
How to make loan use Xero?
Is it ok in Xero to have 1 organisation and use tracking if legally both stores are trading as different companies/ABN's?
I'm going to use my Xero charge as an example.
Or gives examples on when you would use each different tax code.
In summary I wish to create a tax code that my client can use to input their purchases themselves into Xero which will claim the correct % of GST given their private use % of 7%.
I will then make the appropriate journal entry to that GL at the EoFY to apportion the private use.
Also is there a difference between "void" and "credit note" and which one is best to use if something has been incorrectly entered twice.
When we have expenses we use the petty cash therefore the expenses belong to the company not an individual.
In my attempt to go paperless, is there a way I could use Xero Touch for tracking receipts without them ending up as expenses?
I started to utilise the Expense Claim function and it was great, however my accountant has advised me this function is faulty and not to use it and revert back to a manual system to record these.
Their question was if you could use tracking categories to total up the contributions that each donee has made during a year say 1 April to 31 March.
We are evaluating Zero for use with our NFP.
The client, a haulage contractor will subcontract work and use the purchase order function to process this.
Actually, I use Xero cloud accounting for maintaining my books!
We use postalmate POS from PCSynergy.
It would be great to see someone write 'Xero PAYROLL for Dummies' for Australian businesses to use.
I unfortunately am forced to use cheques still (vendors still use them).
If I use the tax code zero rated EC income it will appear in box 8 of the VAT return and this is incorrect as services only are not reported in box 8.
I could use help from the community trying to extract my itemized taxes from all the expenses.
I could do a journal entry to cr the difference out(ie to decrease it,) however  I am not too sure what code I should use for other side (dr ) of the journal entry.
I think that this sort of USER cannot use the iPhone app – but this may change – I may be incorrect here.
Is it possible to use a quantity field (as well as a value field) to track inventory quantities within the Xero GL?
i know at the start you could use the import csv but is this practical every month?
One of our 'customers' paid twice for their tickets last year and wish to use this overpayment for their (same priced) tickets this year.
- if i use xero and then decide to leave how do i access my data?
I gave them access to Xero but they kept complaining that they couldn't use it, etc so asked me to give them an Excel extract.
comI use it successfully in one of my consulting roles
The use of GBP instead of the "£" symbol is very fishy but I think this can be altered in the template.
I'm putting that cost in Xero as "485 - Subscription" is that the correct item to use?
Do I have to use it?
I'm trying to use Xero for my small consulting company.
I've now got to reconcile this cheque in Xero, but no idea which code to use.
I use Mac at all my clients and all use English/ English (Australia) in their Regional Settings / Language & Region YET spelling seem to relect other than English in Xero.
I want to use the BACS file option in Xero to reduce keying-in errors in payments.
We are integrated with Square but have no option to use them.
My client will then use the $5000 to put a deposit on materials he needs to order before commencing the job.
I cannot claim 15% GST on the total $500 because I used a part of that for personal use.
I now have to go back and edit a year's worth of data and am wondering what code I should use.
It works for me but I don't really understand how to use 'Cost of Goods Sold' and I can't find any information for absolute beginners to help me understand it better.
I use intelligentpos for my till system which integrates with izettle for card payments.
I find this silly as I have now added all the correct expenses dates and can't use these.
Basically We use Simple Salon software for a Hair Salon.
I use tracking codes for property.
I label sole trader income and expense and recatagoried profit and loss to show sole trader and use a differnet set up for properties and use tracking codes to help.
I use the tracking function for different jobs my employees are on.
I do volunteer work for a non for profit community services group and we use Tidy Club to manage our memberships and members make payments through either Paypal or Stripe.
When filling out a quote, I have an inventory item I use for the bottom line, with a delivery charge.
I'm a start-up and use my credit card for pretty much everything, including meeting loads of people in various coffee shops.
We use Woocommerce for our online store.
After reconciling around 4 or 5 I got an error message that I had used up all my allowance for the month and did I want  to use one of 10 free "extras".
We are looking for an application that will;Use already printed product bar codes to be scanned with a hand scanner that will then;-Update Xero inventory-Print out price labels to suit product using a Dymo Label Printer-keep a basic stock on hand list for early ordering.
We can transfer your current accounting software to Xero and set up the Xero file so its ready to use.
I use Paypal for my payments and receipts and Xero for my accounting software.
This includes simple to use timesheets, expenses and approvals.
I understand that I should create an overpayment and use this to balance the refund but this is where I'm getting confused.
HiWe have recently purchased a Visa Prepaid Travel Card for one of our directors to use whilst travelling overseas.
Sadly, Unleashed doesn't integrate with WorkflowMax, which I use, so that's bad, but I can't really find any inventory management solutions that works with WorkflowMax.
Then go to Reconcile page and use Find & Match or approve the Match offered.
I am confused between 'spend money' which is easier and matches the credit card statement or use an expense claim.
I could use someone in the States available 7am to 4pm CST.
I am wanting a little advice on how to handle stock that I use as promotional giveaways.
Which tax rate is there available that I can use this for?
I will certainly be continuing to use their services.
Newbie question:- I use a third party application to process wages and PAYE.
This is possible and can be easily done, we use Harvest.
I'm hoping to use Xero to keep track of our rental portfolio.
Hallo, I do use prestashop and trying to integrate through intreg8soft.
In which case, the transfer itself would be quite straightforward but can anyone offer advice on how best to use Xero to determine amounts for setting aside?
Does anyone use Regonline events management cloud system and have you workout out how to import your events registration data from Regonline to Xero?
I thought I could use a prepayment, however, when I print out a statement for the customer, it doesnt count towards their outstanding or credit balance.
It made things simple but I decided I needed to graduate and use something a with a bit more control and precision.
I'm looking for something that will use my client list out of Xero.
Background: We use repeating manual journals to amortize prepaid expenses over the correct period.
The entire 'Reciepts' process on the apps is heavily biased to an employee  'claims' process that as a sole operator is not something I use.
HiThis is a limitation of a product we use but xero could make it easier.
They use a 3rd party service for their online banking.
We still have clients that use MYOB AccountRight, and this has the facility to create an MYE file for import into MYOB AE.
We use gocardless to process payments and we've had a few issues when dates have been entered incorrectly so having a simple way to scan these and ensure they are correct would be very useful.
jspWe use the same access to view the charge card but Xero wants a sort code but the charge card has no sort code.
As Canada&#180;s organizations we use cheque payments for purchases, refunds and expense claims.
We use Lloyds Cardnet as our card merchant.
So if we copy and paste it into other apps we use, those apps reject the number unless we edit out the dash.
If we could reimport the data and put the whole number into the number field, and not use the area field at all, that would work.
So currently we're stuck with manually editing all 1,500 number on the first occasion we use them .
The ability to use "Contains" logic as in (Reference contains "search term") instead of only having the choice of "is" or "is not".
I use the in box and subfolders as a way to manage my workflow.
It doesn't get repeated to the same customers obviously, but would be nice if we could have several such templates to use.
If users dont use it no problems, but allows users that rely heavily on different budgets within an org and simpler tool to work with.
It would be nice to see the ability to set passwords on files at a practice level not a client level as although only a few people have access to the practice login it would be nice to maintain the level of confidentiality has we have throughout the other systems that we use.
There are work-arounds (e. g. manual journal) but these are a pain to use.
Why I want this feature;I prefer to use Xero Payroll and don't want to confuse my employees, training them up on several different software packages.
I use Xero HQ, Xero Workpapers and Xero Practice Manager, so everything would be under one roof.
I see that the suggestion is to use the Reference field.
This is mainly because the rate does not show in the main window and I might forget to use the drop down menu.
But Safari has all my passwords, bookmarks and other shortcuts I've built up over years and years of computer use.
The integration between Adobe Sign and Xero has already been created and is in use (for practice manager) so why can't all Xero users have access to this feature?
This means that all the different branded themes we have for different trading names can't use this feature as the follow up reminder comes from a different name and branded logo and different email address!
Also stacked line chart will use lesser space on the dashboard - more information in less space!
We accountants use so many words for the same thing, it can be confusing to the layman.
This is very simple to do, other cloud software does it, and even the spreadsheet that many of my smaller clients use can do it!
I am sure it would've been suggested before however for those of us that already use Xero on a daily, if not regular basis, when it comes to Xero certification, can the system not pick up on all of the work we constantly enter and the types of transactions we regularly use to recognise that we're "doing all of the right things" and that our experience and hours spent on Xero contribute some form of credit to retain our accreditation?
For example, if you use Tracking Categories and are constantly looking for transactions that are NOT assigned to a tracking category.
Afterwards, we cannot use the search function in Manual Journal by description.
Also it would be great if we could use the Xero app to upload photo's of supporting documentation for these transactions.
We, and many of our customers use Kerio Connect for secure email, calendar and groupware services.
Sometimes it is quicker to extract the information as a pdf or spreadsheet and then use the better interfaces of Excel or Adobe.
We have NO mobile coverage where I work, so there are many features of Xero that I cannot use.
It would be a great help if it could be extended for use with Google Docs.
I've been travelling a lot recently and trying to use the mobile app to keep on top of things.
For example we don't use the discount column and if we had the option to hide the column it would mean more space for the item or description columns that end up too slim.
We would love to use it with Xero in mind, so wondering if you guys are planning to publish a gateway to the platform.
It would be much easier to use if block 2. was significantly larger - at least three times larger.
Currently we only have 2 tracking options but one of them has over 50 individual items - we are a transport operator and use our trucks rego numbers to allocated income and expenditure too.
Xero restricts the use of custom contact links to http and https urls only.
It could be that company with multiple locations also has the ability to select the "Use tax" tax rate.
Even so you could check your emails in the dashboard area aswell- quick send email tab- preview of your inboxFrom there it would be nice if you could actually BULK EMAIL all your xero contacts inside Xero, and use it for Newsletters etcSetup a Newsletter template in the settings areaWould be good to use the  'read receipt' functionality you use on the invoicing emails, to see if people have actually read your newsletters & get reports as to what percentage of people actually do read the newsletters & maybe even how long they read it for
We use BambooHR, it's awesome, please consider integration with them.
This would:- Use the information from the Quote to generate the Order Confirmation- Use the Customers contact information to get the email details- Make another form (an Order Confirmation form) available in your print template options186289
We use the tracking category for all our Consultant, to calculate their commission.
At this stage we have no choice but to use a separate CRM for these reminders, however within our finance department it would make sense for tasks/follow ups related to financial issues to be kept within the accounting package.
This system desperately needs to use a recycle bin instead of the deleted and lost forever policy that is in place today.
Actually - it would be great if most of the reports had an option to use the tracking.
Maybe with a client level configuration setting to enable/disable Private VAT use as not everyone needs it?
When I put the code in, I can't press enter, I have to use the mouse.
When more than One Branding Theme is in use.
We use  a clearing house for the majority of our suppliers (clearance house offers us and thousands of companies in the uk a service of sending 1 cheque for a number of different suppliers) - occasionally  we come across an issue where we have a credit from a supplier which is used against a different supplier through our clearing house.
These are all cleaner UI and much more robust, but still simple to use.
It would be so much better if the "Date Lock" function could be over-ridden with the use of a password.
We want to use images to make it look professional, or ability to edit text.
It would help if we could use Tracknpay (http://traknpay.
This is a frequent use case when transcribing transactions, especially when doing so 'in batch' from spreadsheets and other systems.
I use estimating software for quoting once the order is placed it automatically generates a .
But then they can't use repeating bills.
For example, I use tracking categories which contain dates.
I've seen how to use the mobile phone app to attach a photo (eg parking receipt) to an expense.
And no, I won't be paying $30/m extra to use a partner app.
I am based in Jersey, Channel Islands, so we use the Global version of Xero.
It seems to me as if each device that I use to log into Xero with keeps its details of last log in.
I use the Purchase Order rather than the Quote as this is the edited version.
It is requiring work to be done outside of Xero and not allowing the use of those built in reports and takes away from some of the efficiency's Xero is trying to create.
DO NOT use the 'Mark as Billed' button when creating a bill from a purchase order.
If I use Xero it automatically divides hours worked by 5 days a week.
They could then use the mobile app to analyse their credit card bills, as they currently do for expense claims.
If the screen is minimised on my Macbook air I have to use the maximise screen feature to see the "save" button.
We use xero for a preschool program and our contacts groups are grouped by each class.
Practice Manager really needs to the ability to use email templates!
I see that I can use MY Payroll to submit a leave request and have a manager approve (although I have payroll administrative rights) Great, glad this is up and running.
I don't go looking for features to vote on, but do search community for existing conversations on anything I am having issues with in Xero, either for answers on overcoming it, or to vote on an improvement to something that is directly impacting on efficiency of my staff and functionality we use in Xero.
Is it possible to make a drop down list or even for our Xero to pick up which customers we have that use Xero and send the access keys directly?
On XPM I have been adding contacts to clients however I have noticed that if I have 2 clients with the same contact I have to actually create that contact multiple times so I may have 5 companies that use Mr Smith and therefore I have to record him as a contact 5 times.
Excel spreadsheets and other accounting programs that I use will accept dates in the form 30jun15, where there are no spaces between the numerals and the 3-letter abbreviation of the month.
com for help this morning to ask for help to work through a current impasse to our forward use of Xero.
I have seen other requests for this feature and I'm sure every practice would use it if it were an option to do so.
Microsoft PowerBI is a great free tool that you can use to create dashboards and data visualisations with.
Power BI is easy to use and you can use "natural language" for queries & combine datasets.
This way we could use the left and right arrows in the file preview to advance through each file, renaming them on the fly.
Check writing is a very basic and common task that clients use their accounting software for, and I think it would be great if Xero had a user role that allowed this functionality without opening up basically the entire file to that user.
We use Xero integrated with a job management package.
We use Xero for our Accounting Firm.
docx template for each tenant, as we don't know who they'll be and I can't find a spare field to use to pull from in order to create a custom .
This I would then use to forecast future orders.
It would be great if I could access these PDFs through the mobile app when creating an expense claim, rather than needing to use a desktop computer.
Apple provides a Document Picker API precisely for this use case.
I certainly would use this feature right away as I have a range of training videos on my youtube channel.
Currently I must hit the letter "e" then I must use my mouse to select "expense" or "equity. "
We use our private vehicles for deliveries and normally charge 2.
It would encourage clients to open the online quote and use the accept / reject buttons if they had to open the quote to download the pdf.
I use a service called Quotientapp which sync's with Xero.
I use xero for mulitple entities that are ultimately audited.
Is there a possibility that there could be an intergration of withdrawal / transfer from inventory in Xero to WorkflowMax as we use items from inventory?
The only other alternative is to keep making stock / inventory adjustments in Xero for inventory items taken from stock to use on various jobs in WorkflowMax and entering these items into the 'Costs' for Jobs in WorkflowMax.
Xero could pick up the VAT number, quarter/month end etc and Box 5 figure within the software, and the email function would further enhance our ability to complete everything within Xero rather than use our email system separately.
If you create a bill and use a document from the library and then subsequently delete the entry the document is deleted with it.
For example it should be possible to set one email for use when sending orders (eg orders@vendor.
The basic response to us has been use a third-party application for now.
I feel this would be a good improvement to an already excellent Xero system, and would encourage more medium sized enterprises to use Xero.
For now, all untrack item we have to manually use a calculator to count from the summary which is superinefficient!
For example, we use DEAR Inventory to track inventory.
Additionally, <Item Name> is a valid field we can use in our branding themes but this field is not shown in the following help page:
Further to this it would be nice to see an enhancement of the Delivery address field to:> Also have the contacts email address as well as phone number (this helps my company send backorder updates to clients)> Use template placeholders for adjust the default placement of the delivery address; at present it will display as:"A2Z Corporation123 abc streetAnytownNSW2000Australia"This takes up space on our POs often spilling it to a second page, it would be easier if we could choose the order via placeholders or it defaut displays as:"A2Z Corporation123 abc streetAnytown NSW 2000"
but as a designer type, I don't use (or even own) Microsoft Word.
We use budget manager extensively to update the monthly reforecast.
Since I use PayPal, I must log into PayPal's Virtual Terminal and enter all the customer's information again to process their credit card.
We use the global edition of Xero in Ireland.
If you use a multi currency option within your company it would be better to not have GBP only items set as the default.
In the quotations module, you have to either use the drop down calendar function or 5/2/15.
Eg loan repayments where you cannot use statement information for some reason.
We use a rather long reference field that is critical to our customers and that reference field is truncated in the current portrait statement format.
I find the redesigned "receive money" page a bit frustrating to use, for a couple of reasons: 1.
However If I want to use some of that 80hrs between now and October it becomes confusing.
I mostly use Xero to create purchase orders.
A better way for them to check their budget would be to use a % of income instead
We use Tracking categories to allocate income/expenses to Jobs.
Both the CBA and ANZ use MIGS to process online credit card transactions.
The UK version of Xero handles the reverse charge for EU VAT automatically but this is not available on the Global version which we use in Holland and Ireland.
It would be useful to use logical functions such as OR and AND combined.
Now that Apple are allowing developers to use the Touch ID on iPhones it would be good if the app could use this instead of the PIN code entry.
Loads of accountants use AFS drafting software, especially where Xero's reports aren't sufficient and IFRS for SME's require loads more notes.
Sorting, which could use the same columns as for options 1 and 2Since these reports are yet to be published as standard, perhaps this suggestion could be reviewed for inclusion in the standard reports?
Dear Xero We use the tracking facility in Xero in almost all our transactions.
All software that Accountants use reports at the bottom of the Trial Balance the profit.
Even though we use very large monitors this is still an issue.
(we use them for debt chasing).
These staff will not use computers in office and so orders would not be entered in Xero.
Thereby reducing the code overload they would otherwise get when they see the hundreds the accountant needs to use versus the tens that a client needs to use on a regular basis.
They have overlooked that many businesses use PO's as an internal control function and to mange their budgets.
We currently run a golf club and a bowling club on Xero and use the contact groups for different types of memberships of which there are many.
there's a good feature in suppliers where you can allocates specific VAT codes to specific suppliers - however this feature isn't available in purchase orders so it makes the purchase order capability much less attractive to use (you have to manually alter every billed purchase order if you forget to do it manually at the order stage)
That makes it impossible to use sort to group payees and batch reconcile.
I think that the upload files functionality is a great idea, but it isn't very easy to use, and doesn't really serve the function which I think is most needed - storing digital versions of receipts against transaction items.
Then we taught them the beauty of accrual accounting and to use invoicing.
Having an alternate item code would mean that in our purchase orders we can use the "alternate I'd" (ie.
As we deal with customers properties the address are often what we use to differentiate between them.
When I have a bunch of paper receipts for expenses I find it very slow to use the Xero Android app to take a photo of a receipt and submit it.
Unfortunately at the moment this requires users to scan, save and then upload images or to use the smartphone apps (slow!
htmlSoftware developers produce software for retail use.
Many systems use predictive text either linked to the digits and numbers of the codes or the capacity to enter the description in this field, again with the predictive text showing a narrowing list of options as letters are added.
Could there be a way to use the default company as selected in My Xero?
I use Xero with my base currency set to AUD so I can generate and submit my BAS, tax return, etc.
I am frequently showing clients how to use Xero, and I have to hide the whole initial log on process in-case I open up to a past client I was working on.
For example, we don't use expense claims and don't want it on the dashboard.
Also we use comma (,) as decimal separator and period (. )
So when we export CSV files from our banks, they use this format.
Or at least have an option to use the correct accounting terminology.
For this reason I no longer use payroll functionality as it is impossible to reconcile everything which ends up leaving loads of unpaid bills and unreconciled items.
We discussed it in the office this morning and there is a growing consensus that, while the feature looks good, we are most likely not going to use it.
We could use these to send consignments.
On a related note, it would be great if we could cut and paste screen shots (or images in the clipboard) into a note and also use the iPhone app to attach a photo to a note.
However, we don't use it and rather use a clumsy Excel spreadsheet to manage our debtor follow ups because the reporting is hopeless on notes.
The products they use integrate with their Helpdesk system, so everything is ticketed and tracked the same way as email.
I can only use 2 categories and so have had to make a number of Item codes for each agent 30+ codes per agent in order to do this.
Someone else asked if there's a way to use BPay Reference Numbers.
I would be happy to use one of those systems if they could be integrated in with the rest of my financials, but if I have to manually enter the information from that system into the Xero system it defeats the purpose of using an automated system.
In MYOB we use percentage calculation.
I had set up the payroll using 1% for both employee and employer contribution rates as my client wished to use the minimum rates.
Therefore, you cannot use Xero to direct deposit an owners draw, inside Xero Payroll or within Xero itself.
I would love to see the ability to use my tracking categories under the PayRun Reimbursement section.
We use the Xero Me app to track hours on a job, it would be good to have a search bar at the top as we are doing lots of jobs and the employees are doing lots of scrolling to find the jobs.
The whole point of having Xero was to prevent duplication and create efficiency within accounting practices and companies that use it.
We use the second tracking category for different phases of projects.
This would allow us to use this within our company wide Google Calendar
I use Xero to handle transactions and all documentation except share trading and I use Sharesight for all documentation for share trading.
I didn't want to use an accountant and I wanted minimal interference from financial planners.
At least try and accept my financial reports and give me guidance if I had done it wrong and 2. one who could use Xero and would be ok with me putting all the documentation in Xero for them to do their Audit.
My suggestions is that the functionality of calculating the statutory amounts due automatically should be added, as this is currently taken for granted in Sage Payroll, which the majority of our clients use.
5 hours per day as an RDO accrual to be banked for use later in the month.
I use the tracking category for different jobs.
We use the field ContactID to uniquely identify the contacts.
Use case: Say I'm in the midst of email discussion with my client.
Is there a better way of doing this or better cloud system to use with Xero?
I want to use Xero from current financial year.
We've also set the customers into groups, based on the brand as we use a different Statement template for each brand.
APS have this feature and i use it on a regular basis.
I use a standard ANZ eftpos card that is now a visa and a paywave.
No way to sync :(I was thinking of setting up a dummy category called Budget Buffer, and only use it in the budget to offset the net income each month.
We use it for our US Inc and we are very happy with it.
I've no idea how to fix this, I know I can use journal entries but I've no idea where to journal from to make this work and balance.
I prefer to use Xero to manage inventory because it allows me to put in details, my cost, and my price, and reflects profit.
Is it a bug and is there a simple workaround I can use?
I use this as an easy way to get the 27 different detail lines in, the detail of which doesn't change, only the amounts change.
I don't think "I am both QuickBooks and Xero Certified, but I use QuickBooks to keep my own books" goes over too well, regardless of supplementing that with reasoning.
I use NatWest in the UK if this is relevant.
Hello,I have been unable to use the SmartLists function on Xero.
Also, when items value exceeds a certain amount, I have to use a commercial import broker.
We all studied accounting at Uni, and know a lot about how to use Xero.
I intend to use a third party ( onesaas i think ) to pull in my shopify transactions to Xero which all seems fine and dandy.
HiWe use GoCardLess to process Direct Debit payments here in the UK.
Surely must be others in the marketplace, Plaid for one is an awesome service and we've never had a problem with other companies that use it.
Currently we don't use the budgeting feature.
I want to use it for expense tracking in a startup.
I ask because I have an excel template I use to analyze financials.
We would love to find fellow Xero users in our supply chain and would even consider changing certain suppliers to Xero users for ease of use.
We are setting up our employees to use the expense claim option in order to process their credit card expenses.
Solution:  Use Microsoft Excel Viewer to open the file, then copy the cells as needed, using copy paste.
which we use rarely, and for which I don't expect to ever see automated uploads.
I currently use both Xero & Vend & have started using the cash management feature in Vend.
I've reconfirmed (multiple times) that I'm using the same username and password I use to successfully login to Chase directly.
It would be wonderful if, when using my mobile device, I could use the inbuilt camera to import documents directly into Xero.
The problem I have is that I use Transferwise to handle transfers of money to suppliers in Europe.
It seems that Xero doesn't offer this simple feature instead - after reading many forums I am going to use tracking.
We used to use Reckon and I could easily change the order.
I'm not an accountant, I'm a creative, and I want software that is easy to use.
We use Xero for both our businesses and it is fantastic as an accounting package.
All top Xero experts and advisors use various channels to spread and share learning with others.
I realised I can use the search button but still there are some that are not there for me to select.
In MYOB we could use identifiers to group our customers, such as those who paid by credit card each month.
I know I can use the browser spell check but that still isn't the best.
We use tracking.
Is there a theme that I can use as part of invoicing/delivery docket which will allow for receiver details to be hand written on documentation as proof of acceptance date/print name/signature?
I want to use XERO for an indian restaurant.
I am keen to use this.
Example: We use WooCommerce.
It won't recognise the transaction amount therefore how am I meant to use this system affectively?
Does any one have test/demo data of a company which comprises of simple as well as complex transaction that i can use for my training.
All of which receive use.
We have now come up with the idea of either continuing to use their software and importing the information into Xero every month, or vica versa.
Is it possible to re-use those purchase orders again or do I have to re-enter them?
Is it possible for Xero to use the same exchange rate on the transaction being passed through to Xero via the API?
Should I use 'create'  and code it to 881(owner A funds introduced)?
We do not use the API because 0CPAs is going where Xero has never gone before (and has no plans to go).
Sort by key words (different Rules must not use the same key).
You can even use this with QuickBooks and Sage, and it is all still free.
We use Santander UK corporate online banking which does not appear to automate feeds into Xero.
Might be missing something as this must have been a problem for everyone who's tried to use it.
com/#Settings_InvoiceBrandingFields) mentions that it is possible to use the ContactContactNumber field (which can be updated via the Xero API).
The solution is to use the "compare periods" option instead to ensure the full month is reported.
I know you can publish reports in Xero, but I generally only publish final documents, not reports I use for working papers etc.
This is the quickest and easiset method but this line from the help concerns me a little:Quote:"Direct payments: use for straightforward money spent.
The only way back is to use your browser's back key.
Xero can now import inventory codes, so we can finally align inventory or correct reporting for hindsight--or maybe foresight if you use some of 3rd party wizbang tools.
I've seen multiple people on multiple sites suggest this program for tracking money and such, but I had a few questions to decide whether I could use this program for my purposes.
Now, I want to use my USD overpayment to credit this bill, but Xero only shows up same currency overpayments.
They are a Golf Club who would certainly use the 'Group' feature in the customer list.
One of the main reasons I started using Xero is the fact that it integrates with many of the systems we use, including PayPal.
About 10 days after starting to use PayPal auto import I imported a manual statement for the period 01/01/2012 to 24/02/2012.
The current Invoicing system he uses allows him to use a Job Decription, as well as showing line items.
once I have worked out the amount of LSL leave my employees have accrued in days/ weeks, what formula to I use to revert this to hours to compare them to the balance in Xero?
I can't use the "employee groups" setting as I have a few employees that work over different tracking categories.
698 to use as an RDO or am I reading it incorrectly.
We use a third party to process our payroll.
I entered in all of the superannuation funds that we use including the SMSF's with all the relevant details.
The HR company that we use recommend that we do a portion for "overtime allowance" so the 38 and the extra are separated.
I am trying to find out details on how to use the Xero Clearing House.
I cannot use the 'multiple of employees ordinary earnings rate' as my staff are all on different award rates.
I can use 'ordinary hours' and play with the number of hours until it matches the paid amount.
We use tracking to differentiate them and also different Payroll Calendars for each branch.
We use the categories in the timesheets to assign the hours worked to the appropriate clinic.
My other option is to ditch Xero payroll and either use Keypay and Xero or the Keypay integration with Quickbooks Online.
Your Payroll feature was an absolute pleasure to use pre August 2014.
hiI use a 3rd party wages software (wages manager) and have been using quickbooks.
Believe it or not quite a few of our more mature staff don't use email.
It seems much cheaper to use Xero Payroll directly.
We use a third party to administer this for us as there are various compliance issues.
We use Paychex and not Xero (have MA employees.
We use the standard salary, FICA, Work Comp.
We want to use Xero strictly for accounting and not payroll so we want this part shutdown and hidden.
I found on your website that you use the annual method to calculate these taxes and I think this might be the reason behind the difference.
I use TSheets and Sync approved reports to Xero.
What options should we use to deduct this tax free amount from the employee's payroll?
We use a payroll provider and create payroll in Xero as manual.
Briefly, would you choose to use Xero payroll again or do you regret it?
But this function doesn't seem to do the job, or I am not understanding how to use it.
Use this thread for general questions, discussion and feedback.
I wish I'd not switched from Sage payroll which runs so smoothly and is so easy to use!
We also use Sage Payroll to do all 2015/16 year end reporting and the issuing of P60.
NOTE we use timesheet?
Fix this pathetic implementation and don't tell me to use HMRC's software as a solution or I'll be expecting a refund for the half of the system I thought I was paying for, but clearly wasn't receiving.
Is the Xero UK payroll capability good enough for us to use for this HMRC service?
They want to use the calendars on Xero too book their holidays.
It would be helpful as I don't want to use other software for holiday leave requests and recording
We currently use Mypaye, which does the job.
Our holiday year runs Sept - Aug so we are unable to use this facility.
This would allow more easy comparisons and visual use of the data.
Please can you clarify which I should use to ensure that the P45 is correctly processed.
At present if you use timesheets this facility is locked out.
Are there any teaching resources for teaching students how to set up a dummy company and use the payroll feature?
We have been using Xero for our payroll since mid-2015 and on the whole its been great to use.
We use Xero payroll for a number of different companies.
My experience with Xero payroll to date is that it is not particularly friendly to organisations that use variable hours staff.
We will probably use him again but don't know when.
How can I correct this as I am clearly doing something wrong and its a total pain having to use two systems to ensure I'm paying correct amounts.
The same would apply to other leave, such as Sick Leave - migrating existing use and balances.
I use clunky Flexitime payroll but at this point it is far better than Xero Payroll.
My plea is to keep it simple and easy to use and follow a simple logic to record holidays and sick days etc.
Easy-to-use, Property management system, designed to empower independent property owners.
Easy to use online system for HR and leave management.
FieldAware's native, made-for-mobile, cloud-based field service management software is easy to use and built with incredible flexibility.
The most profitable hospitality companies use Loaded Reports.
Unlimited use of 3 apps (Payroll, Leave and  Profiles) at a flat rate.
Award winning online POS & stock software that’s simple to learn and use.
Use Stripe, SEPA, EziDebit, ABA file, NZ banks and more.
Easy to use inventory and order management software which syncs with eBay, Amazon, Shopify, WooCommerce & Magento plus prints shipping labels.
Property investors use Portfolio Tracker to manage, build and optimise their portfolio.
Use a mobile device to show products to customers and to create orders even when offline.
Use Zapier to connect Podio to Xero and make your life easier.
Use Zapier to connect Magento to Xero and make your life easier.
Use Zapier to connect Eventbrite to Xero and make your life easier.
CaseFox is an easy to use Web-based timekeeping and billing software for attorneys, law firms, accountants, mediators, psychologist and consultants.
A powerful yet easy-to-use reporting engine that live integrates Google Spreadsheets with Xero.
Use it every day.
Sharesight is simple and intuitive to use.
Seamlessly integrates your customer database, opportunities and financial information in one easy to use system, check out .
Offers easy to use online tools for–ESS, leave, expenses, calculates tax, super & more.
Easy to use, yet powerful enough to run most retail and hospitality businesses, check out .
An easy to use, cost-effective online payroll/wages system for small-to-medium businesses, check out .
Vend is point-of-sale, inventory and customer software retailers love to use.
Delightful, modern payroll that is fast, secure, and easy to use.
We have read the recent comments and we use simpro service, it is very good but as your users say very inflexible.
We have had many issues since we started to use Veeqo and these have been addressed by the staff.
I have a small Fruit & Vegetable Retail & Wholesale market in regional Victoria and am in the market for an ordering system that our Wholesale customers ie restaurants, cafes etc can use to log in and submit their orders.
What would you suggest to use that would be compatible with Xero.
We currently use Cin7 as our inventory management system, and it is compatible with Shopify, WooCommerce, Neto & Magento.
I have looked at Xero Practice Manager but find it hard to use for the price.
We use Profit centre / Cost centre.
I am looking for a good POS tools to review and then use in conjunction with XeroThey have to be supportable in South Africa, simple to get up and running and simple for frontline staff to useLooking for practical experience in the use of this, can any one point me as to alternatives I can review?
We also use Insightly as a connected CRM system.
We currently use InvoiceASAP for mobile invoicing, but are looking for additional functionality found in more robust DSD apps.
We are going to use Xero for bookkeeping.
We use Xero and our employees are grouped into different teams.
Today, we use Paycom and manually enter our payroll data twice a month, for each department.
We have each of these for each department, and we break out subcontractor wages (1099) when use use them, which is not often.
He is happy to use his phone as he says it has a pen for signatures.
Or should i _only_ use the Xero/Vend and count on receiving all Shopify accounting info entirely from Vend?
I use A2X to post biweekly Amazon fees to Xero.
They use duoplane to import transactions into Xero.
They currently use MYOB and have no bar coding hardware.
Very basic use such as tracking and entering customers, emailing and logging tasks and notes for those customers.
We currently use QuickBooks desktop.
We use this file for our job costing.
We use this program as the backbone for delivering our services to our clients.
To be clear, when referring to 'consumable inventory' we are referring to items that we use in our production process to create our own products (ie.
At the moment we use paper sheets and manually plug into a spreadsheet.
It's designed to be easy to use.
We also use Xero to track our company financials.
I have been trying Epos Now which looks good but they are based in the UK and I am concerned at their very sparse documentation on how to use the system.
Any advice or examples of what bars and restaurants that use Xero are using for their POS would be greatly appreciated.
They are moving to Xero, and want input about what system to use, but I don't personally have hands on with either system, and there's been a lot changes since I last reviewed inventory.
Ease of use for frontline staff, Xero integration issues etc would be great to have input on.
We use an Enterprise version of  which we view as equal to or more powerful that the a comparable Hootsuite Configuration.
We use the official Woocommerce plugin to link the two together:http://www.
I use Xero for accounting, Woo Commerce for my web shop and Paypal to take payments.
What I am looking for now is some guidance on how people use both systems.
I use Square for my POS and Xero for bookkeeping.
What do you guys use to print out shipping UPS and FedEx labels?
Recently as we have expanded we have implemented the tracking codes in Xero to track a) our product lines and b)geography(offices)Expensify doesn't natively support the tracking codes but the team there have been very responsive about how we could use their tagging feature to implement and integration with zero to one of our tracking codes.
if you use Microsoft Word 2003 to 2013 then SnappyStamp will allow you to use your Xero contacts to do the following:1) Post letters from Microsoft Word.
Products are entered and grouped for ease of use on the 'cash register' (ipad).
We use the Inventory control currently on Xero but we require more.
I've been trialling Capsule, which is nice and easy to navigate and use, but I don't see it doing what we want.
I use Xero with Unleashed.
I currently use Harvest for all my invoicing and link it with Xero to reconcile transactions and prepare BAS.
I would have thought that this is quite a common set that most merchandising industries use.
It would be similar to what Harvey Norman and other big furniture stores use.
We use ShipStation to print shipping labels for UPS, USPS, Fedx.
We use Square to accept "in-person" credit card payments.
I'm on the lookout for an easy-to-use software tool that allows for me to budget on a project and a company-wide level, such that the information integrates automatically.
We are looking for 5 beta testers (using Shopify, outside USA) to use it.
Use Barcode scanner in Automatic, Inventory and Manual modes.
For small clients, the ability to use Xero as doc storage is really great.
Sage no longer support it and I am looking for an alternative to use long term in conjunction with Xero.
We currently use Xero and are now in the process of finding a suitable POS and Stock control system.
How we can use Checkeeper and Xero for Payroll and not have to reinput all the info into Checkeeper again.
The client is a manufacturing based company and will be looking to use the product to integrate with Xero.
Both MYOB products are not integrated and they find MYOB too difficult in terms of ease of use and reporting.
If you are not already a Kounta Customer and use Xero please feel free to sign up here: http://my.
We use Bento as a database to record all of our physical client files and where they physically reside.
I currently use XERO for my accounting.
At the moment they use stripe to handle deposits and celery e-commerce system, unfortunately these 2 systems do not integrate with Xero or each other.
The only sure thing that we want to use Xero.
He's getting a little tired of typing up quotes and glances at me with envy when I go on and on about how great it is to use Quotient.
Currently we use Xero as our main accounting system and Magento as our e-commerce platform.
We use Xero for the book-keeping and external software for scheduling.
If so, I would be very interested in hearing about the steps and procedures you use to ultimately get the costs onto the right jobs and expense lines (whether using POs or another method) and whether you have any useful tips?
They currently use CDA Grain Trader and Xero but we are having difficulty getting integration happening.
HiDoes anyone know of a CRM package that integrates with xero tailored for use by training companies for managing trainee bookings, booking confirmation, assignment of trainers, registration forms, certificate management etc?
Over the past number of weeks the Search function on the Dashboard (which is really handy and we use it a lot) has been very slow to show results and sometimes it does not work at all.
Never ever use xero.
BTW, I totally understand designing your website in a way that encourages users to first use search etc.
Or are you trying to push your associate services with getting us to use your recommended accountants?
Strikes me as entirely disingenuous to tag every reply from UK 'Support' (i use the term advisedly) with the Canstar Most Satisfied Customers Award.
It doesn't matter which browser we use, IE, Firefox or Chrome, the problem still exists.
I have a vested interest in getting this fixed as I use Amex and I do not want missing transactions in Xero now or in the future.
they dont use our type of reports or reconciliation reports.
Even Practice manger does not help and I use that a lot.
I don't want to use a third party explorer as xero suggests .
You have a good reputation for ease of use, I have yet to fully experience the brand promise!
I am trying to learn how to use Xero for my bookkeeping.
Had to use a different browser finally.
If I am storing a vendor's or customer's contact information here that is for my company's use, not yours.
HOW MANY OF YOUR USERS USE PAYPAL ?
And your Dash board it use to make sense you knew at a glance what was billing out last month this month and next month, now its all this week mumbo jumbo.
HiSince there is no way of contacting anybody except by walking into your Auckland office, I am having to use a support forum.
We have looked at a few different accounting systems and finally impressed with the depth of functionality of Cin7 and Xero which are really fast and easy to use when you have trained.
We use IE11 (in house policy) and it has been working fine until about a week ago.
I use Shipstation for shipping.
I think the customer service department could use Seth Godin's wisdom.
I have been sent the following link to an article comparing MYOB to Xero by our MYOB client manager (who is quite unsuccessfully trying to get our practice to recommend clients use MYOB rather than Xero accounting products).
They have overlooked that many businesses use PO's as an internal control function and to mange their budgets.
I also started to use tracking and am limited to only 2 tracking options, after a bit more consideration I wanted to change the tracking "category" and because I had multiple options on that category I decided to delete it instead of renaming and deleting the multiple options.
How many people who use other programs can say they've had such great support from their program support team?
The white background is headache inducing after a few hours of use.
Banks there serve companies from all corners of the earth; companies that could make good use of a multi-national and flexible Cloud based accounting system.
I've tried 10 other online accounting programs, and it's by far the easiest to use and most reliable.
I have two working but my daily use card is not working and I am going in circles trying to refresh, authenticate (occasionally) and reset login details constantly.
##### CLUSTER 24 #####
We have had our first large sale in our business.
as he brought this job into the business having done a great deal of the groundwork in a previous life.
Hi All,I have a VAT registered, small interior design business in the U. K. I'm looking to purchase some building materials for my private property through my business.
My (USA) business purchases supplies with its own business Visa, not my personal card.
50 per Business Transaction, but that it depends on whether the partner company is participating.
First of all a little to explain why im using a personal credit card for both business and personal transactions .
com/business/discussion/45706435Any help or advice much appreciated.
As such, 60% of my bills are chargeable to my business.
Hello,I have a very simple business in terms of bookkeeping, I'm an affiliate marketer and earn commissions.
It's such a simple business, but this multi currency thing is all kinds of messy.
Hello,My business occasionally generates expenses that we are not reimbursed for by our clients.
Our business has purchased an electrical item and donated to the local school - how do I enter this?
We are a small business and :1.
The nature of my business means that I will sell something, but not get paid until many months later.
We plan to build our cash reserves are with the intention of making some investments in public companies listed on the stock market on behalf of the business.
Up to this point, it's been my husbands SSN and his name or the legal name of the business on previous W-9s as this would be our first year we will file as a QJV.
There are also some other fees I paid out of pocket for, such as the business license fee, taxes, and some other legal fees.
The business has made so many purchases during the year and is really though going one by one unreconcile them> change the VAT> and reconcile them again.
I have a cleaning business where service providers provide customers with their services under a direct contract.
I suppose it would mess up my balance sheets and other important reports for business tax times.
i applied for business checking and two business credit cards.
(side-rant: of course, none of this can happen until Co-Op Business Banking comes back online as it's been down YET AGAIN for 3 hours now.
Please contact me if you are a one person bookkeeper who wants to work with a small business owner and let me know a little about you.
As mentioned, this is the first accounting system for my business.
the insurer paid the financial institution directly and the balance to our business.
I would rather not go back to the business who set us up as I was extremely unhappy with their service.
Our business is vacation rental ownership and management, so we also own the properties we manage.
Not using tracked inventory at the moment (because we're a service business who buys and sells labour, didn't seem appropriate.
I'm treating this as a small business loan for (non current liability).
I take all my customer payments through PayPal, and also sometimes buy supplies for my business from vendors who take PayPal.
HiMy client's business services/maintains clients' assets and needs to bill out hours spent working on them as well as oncharge materials costs/contracted out costs with a margin.
We borrowed money from a family member to buy a second tow truck for our business.
Our small business makes <$10mil a year, and it appears to be okay to do so based on the following page on the IRS website (starting with "However.
This is the reason given for it being declined;The submission of this document has failed due to departmental specific business logic in the Body tag.
17 of inventory from a supplier on behalf of the business.
Obviously I have spent quite a bit of my own money already to set up the business, do a photo shoot etc.
Basically we had an issue where one of the partners in the business needed to leave.
I am open to any and all suggestions for a solution to handle the above situation, as it covers about 15% of our business.
I run a greeting card business, and have set my inventory up with opening balances for all of my items.
We are a small business and fly very close under the GST required $60,000.
Currently using Quickbooks Online for my electrical business but it doesn't work very well for me.
Here's the situation, the business has purchased gift cards at price lower than face value and then used those gift cards to make purchases.
I want to resurrect an archived business, please.
We have 2 eftpos terminals in our business:Terminal 1 - $(167.
I have since opened specific ones for business, but its too late for 2015/2016 bookkeeping.
First question is I reconciled my personal non business expenses as a non current liability.
I want to treat both sums as loans, so one would be a loan from me to the business, and the other would be a loan from my relative.
As our savings are building up considerably we were thinking of withdrawing it from the business as Drawings and investing it in some safe investments personally.
That is - a transfer from the owner's personal checking to the business credit card.
I have a business purchased (as a going concern) via Vendor Financing - one portion paid as a deposit, the rest paid several months later from business revenue.
My wife's business sells clothing that is purchased mainly from a wholesale supplier.
Ive started a business as sole prop for rental properties and possibly flipping later on down the road.
-Business start up costs and office supplies - all paid with personal cc.
On my latest Business Activity Statement for April-June 2016, the "GST On Purchases" amount is $0, even though I have multiple expenses for that period listed as "GST On Expenses".
85 in GST, but this is not shown on my BAS when I choose > Reports > Activity Statement > Business Activity Statement.
36252) What if I started a second business and set that up in Xero, making three total?
3) What if I remove my own business from Xero?
I have reconciled all transactions except the 3 amounts we have put in to the business as 1.
Right now I'm stuck on taking out cash from line of credit, paying off that line of credit and paying off the business credit card.
We run a retail business.
We have a Company Credit Card for a small business and purchases are made by various people.
We have a VAT registered business customer in Ireland to whom we sell a service.
I have a business where I have contractors working for me.
We were running the business for the previous owner for a few months before purchasing the business in January.
The scenario will be a business with several thousand lines of stock, some brought to order, others held in stock.
I am in the process of selling my business and the car is listed as an asset in the depreciation schedule.
We are needing him to draw money from the business as a 'Wage'.
My start-up business is not yet large enough to register for v. a. t. Accordingly I have shown in Xero (Settings) as non-registered.
We're a professional services business (software and operations) so it would be nice to have in one place.
I shared a networking lunch with other business owners and we spilt the bill.
50% of the costs can be described as fixed assets and 50% of the costs are intangible/soft costs (e. g. staff visas, business setup costs, trial cooking expenses, the list goes on.
Our business how grown and we have now activated GST as of 1 January 2016.
Is there a way to reverse this transaction: (DR) Computer(CR)  Unpaid Expense Claim (201) Owner used her credit card to purchase a computer for her business and has submitted an expense claim which was then approved but not paid.
I have a client who has part paid for business petrol with coupons.
I have a small business (don't we all) that purchases a fair amount of inventory (in proportion to the size of the business).
Business still wants to record if clients are not making regular payments and how much is outstanding.
I. e. how long it takes $1 invested in the business to be returned as cash/flow back in.
I have also entered other purchases for the business such as office expenses, tools etc through purchases and as a bill, again GST on expenses.
My business provides professional services.
A few days ago, I started using a trial version of Xero and I'm trying to decide if it is a good fit for my service business.
Since tax is part of doing business it should be recorded as part of the expense.
The error can be found in the GST Calculation Worksheet but is compounded as the Business Activity Statement relies upon the calculations it provides.
However, we've identified a business opportunity in providing fulfillment services to third parties.
However, for a small business, it becomes an inconvenience and we've had to set reminders for our very busy CEO to approve payroll ever two weeks.
I run a motion graphics business and I'm not quite sure what to file some transactions in.
We have a medium business.
Car was under business name and was used for business purchase before selling it.
Buyer of the car is also a business (if that makes any difference).
I am a bit lost to how to best input the following:I run a consulting business, and I get referral for business which I then paid referral fees as agreed by both parties.
I also have a side business.
business owner) so I created a credit note and approved it for ($299).
Here's the deal:My partner is purchasing inventory with her own money, then handing the inventory over to the business.
I am in the process of transferring a IT network security business onto Xero and wondered if anyone can provide a reference site for using Xero in a similar environment i. e. consultancy business with aproximately 40 consultants?
We have a business credit card used for paying some expenses.
com/business/discussion/4433331/But it didn't get fully answered IMO.
Was really look for a best practice for a similar type of business.
5 for business code, 0.
My client is in a restaurant business.
I run an outdoor activity business - laser skirmish to be exact.
I am a Limited company and in October I added 500 Shares to my business when I registered it.
We have a holiday rent business.
I deliver consultancy services to a large company who send me multiple purchase orders depending on which area of the business I'm consulting for.
To get the company started i had to buy domain name/hosting, print business cards and buy some gear.
I can only change to BAS excluded, which is not really correct, as its a business expense, but a GST free one.
99 keyboard & &#163;159 for care plan)I have a business mobile/cell contract with O2 and I get &#163;75 off any spend over &#163;750.
My business rents out luxury boats for parties, functions etc.
I jsut recently start a business and there are a lots of up-front cost to record.
first is the cost of interior designs, and the second is the cost for lodging the business concent from the local city council.
BUT some expenses such as air flights are paid by the business up front I want to know whether the following would work1.
I also have my business acnt for my day to day business.
Anyways, I've noticed that my Xero Income Reports for my business don't necessarily line up with the Net Income numbers my accountant ends up reporting to the IRS.
However I have also taken some cash out of the business as Drawings.
My business is small and simple.
So, for sake of example, let's say gross the business makes $100,000 and I have paid myself a salary of $25,000.
Couple of general questions pertaining to a US business.
Purchases: When I have purchased something for the business I enter that as a bill.
I have the daunting task of entering all business transactions in to Xero to get ready for tax season.
Have purchased a vehicle for my business.
Will Xero work in Sweden, Romania and Switzerland (where we currently have business)?
We then plan to take the loans back out once the business can afford it.
My business is small but growing.
Good morningI am running a service based business.
Personally, I have never liked the idea of business and personal mixed together.
We are soon to be expanding our cafe/bakery business from 1 location to a 2nd (and hopefully more).
Here is the issue:1. Business card 1 feed came in great, created rules and posted all expenses perfectly2.
Xero is awesome and our business loves it!
When using a download from PayPal there is no way to tell which debit/credit card payments have come from which small business.
The system I built to manage my websites notifies each customer and small business via emailed order notifications when an order has been placed.
HiI'm trying to switch from a non-VAT registered business to a Cash Flat Rate Scheme in the UK.
I have been trying to implement opening stock journals for my business.
I run an eCommerce business selling through my website and eBay.
For a variety of reasons we have a client with multiple Xero files for their company which has one ABN and a "branch" ABN number for each business name under the company (10 and growing).
Hello,I'm thinking to using Xero for my construction business.
branch managers), is this possible in Xero business?
I run an online consumer electronics business on Shopify.
The business is in Australia.
We have a business cc with 2 users (myself and partner).
A very simple business to start with as we'll operate it from the UK to start with.
That is, a business gets no credit against amounts to be remitted unless they were paid in error.
As an example, if the cost of the business was $500kWe paid $100k cash, and the remaining $400k is a business loan which we repay monthly.
Hi experts, My business partner and I have lodged expense claims on our business for business expenses that we paid for using our credit cards.
Some expenses are split personal and business, for example, my cell phone bill is 50% personal and 50% business.
We're a small family business and we take draws instead of your classic salary disbursements.
I have a couple who have seperate business income and expenses.
I also want to take this opportunity again to request support for ASB FastNet Business feeds.
Recently, my friends and I started a small business focused on web design.
my business hasn't started yet and I am only using the programme for forecasting and due diligence at this stage.
We have a bread delivery business.
Small business that sells appliances and also repairs them.
Hey Guys,I run a business that sells cars and accessories.
We are after finding an external CRM software that could give us alerts and data on customers that haven't perhaps ordered in the last month when they would usually order monthly or something along the lines of alerts that would allow us as a business to follow up with them to see if they have any issues or generally a standard follow through.
au in year 2015. due to the nature of his business he perform in his investment property.
Expenses (general, often discretionary, expenses of running a business such as fuel, office supplies etc.
We own and run a small training business with 6 trainers and 20-30 different clients.
I run a small lettings and skydiving business.
I have tried speaking to Santander Business Banking about this and the response was totally not helpful (it was as if I was asking for the moon on a plate! )
My company has a best-in-class digital receipts solution () that we sell to mobile banks for their small business customers.
We are a small business exporting manufactured products to an established network of distributors and retailers (i. e. B2B) - mainly in the US, Canada and Australia.
I am operating as a sole trader, as a Digital Business Consultant, in Australia.
My business is not registered for VAT and I have "VAT Scheme" set to "None" under Financial Settings.
Our business is in South Africa, so VAT management is critical, I am the manager, accountant, payroll, no other person is here.
We are a business based in the UK which have recently taken over a small (ish) US based business.
He has been using his business card for personal living expenses?
I am currently running a business and have a client on retainer.
Beginning about a month ago, I started making several transactions getting ready to open for business.
We run a very small business, using primarily debit card purchases, with some hand written checks when necessary.
our business is a construction firm, we had a difficulties in making a bill, where do we put our customers name if we put payee in "from"?
Small business buys parts, sells on to customer along with services.
Is it worth the headache to only reconcile business expenses on the credit card and mark the personal expenses as such?
The accountant linked to this particular business doesn't know Xero well enough.
Since I essentially am the business, this is a bad thing.
I've also checked the business performance charts, but these don't really suit.
I am entering fuel dockets for the business owner, obviously already paid for and not needing to be re-embursed.
Lots of business that sell item want to track serial number in case of potential returns and warrantee cost recovery etc.
Hello,I have recently been asked to take over the bookkeeping position for a small business.
I have no bookkeeping experience whatsoever, and the business owner uses xero.
I run an ecommerce business and a store front.
Spouse has bought a work car for her business for $7500 cash.
As a small business, we have hired a location on a weekly basis to run our classes from there.
and I missing something that would allow me to link it, but not include it in my daily business accounting and reconcilliation process?
We are a boutique financial planning business in the UK for wealthy individuals.
I live in Colombia and my business operates here.
I have an in-house bookkeeper for my business.
I have a dog walking business and each client has their own schedule that I track on Google Calendar.
The business was on Accrual VAT scheme.
If I am doing an expense claim for my small business such as having to purchase materials from Bunnings is that classed as an expense or a direct cost?
My business allows patients to pre-purchase rehab consultations in bulk, at a discount.
Good morning,As I understand it, I can claim 45p / mile for every mile of business travel I drive in my car (up to 10,000 miles per year) here in the UK.
for small business clients, there should be option for calculating depreciation and disposal and addition for pooled assets.
I do the bookkeeping for small Interior Design business that usually charges clients hourly for their services.
He owns a car dealership in East Tamaki and during our initial chat I told him the first thing he needs to do is leverage Google Local and get his business on Google+.
In this famous 5 easy step guide I’ll be taking you through the exact process to get your business on Google Local which, if you take a glance at the picture below, you’ll see appears above the organic results and also has it’s own review section, Google+ section and is highlighted to stand out of the ordinary results.
Companies are spending $100,000+ a year to maintain that number one position on certain keywords and I’m telling you here today that your local business can appear above that!
Difference is Google Business has taken some serious steroids.
Once you go through this and type in your business name, hit the ‘I’ve correctly entered my name and address’ option and enter your details.
As the business grows, manually managing accounting numbers become tough.
It is hard when some business have different due dates and we are invoicing people wrong.
No matter where your business is based we have a solution to suit your business bookkeeping needs.
Our Key Xero Services Each of our clients has unique business requirements as such we try to make our services as flexible as possible.
au/xero-business-packages/
HiI have a small sole trader business where I drive round to shops selling sweets.
The NZ IRD allow GST to be claimed back on any initial setup costs paid privately / individually during the setup phase of the business, which can be claimed once the business is incorporated (we are incorporated now).
The items in question will be used 100% for business and will be entered on the asses register for depreciation.
And i will be getting more transactions as my business grows.
Hey thereI receive money in my business through Certegy or Take Home Layby.
I'm a small business owner that designs and sells physical products on various places on the internet (primarily).
I'm in the process of changing my business in the US from a sole proprietor to an LLC.
This is more a small business query rather than Xero-specific, but we'often get hit with a $7.
I run a small business, buying parts, selling on to customers with added services.
I have borrowed $25k in order to do an investment through my business.
Hello,I am a few months into my Xero and small business adventure now.
We are a small business with 2 owners and to start up the business we used our own money/cash to purchase equipment.
I have no employees, I own the business and I'll be the only one running it.
Hello Xero Community,I am attempting to record a recent purchase with my business credit card.
I have started up my small business mainly using my personal credit card, cash from myself and a loan.
Business runs on cash basis.
I am a sole trader as well as have another business name under the same ABN.
However one of my clients with 120 staff but an uncomplicated Architectural Business are concerned its too small for them.
In the first few years of operation, my business and I were interchangeable.
It is causing us allot of grief with running our business to the point we are now looking at migrating to alternative solutions.
I'm currently running MYOB AccountEdge for our small business.
10________Xero can't deal with this for two reasons:1) it doesn't handle more than 2 decimal places for amount2) it doesn't factor VAT into line entry - it sends off to line item which is irrelevant to non-VAT regd business.
Dear All,Myy business is in Switzerland.
Hello,I'm about to set up a couple of medical practitioners on Xero in the coming week, a small doctors clinic and a remedial massager business.
I have an old personal ANZ visa debit card, it doesn't work for that and NAB tells me their business debit card wont support feeds.
A receipt for a staff business meeting (let's say a strategic planning session) that has food and alcohol on itAll responses welcome for this.
At this early stage in the business I'm paying myself on an ad hoc basis, not on a certain date.
The car is used 40% for business purposes, 60% personal.
I have a business where we have a number of different labour and travel charges depending on who the person is doing the labour and where they are going.
One acts as trustee for our family trust, one as trustee for our business trust and one as trustee for our super fund.
My business deals with buying and selling second hand goods.
When I first set Xero up I had been running my business for awhile and had around 100 purchases of stock which I logged as expenses and paid the total expense claim out with Owner Funds Introduced.
Ok - Basically what we have is a small business - two owners with equity and one employee.
We're a UK business wanting to expand to Australia and NZ.
Every day I am looking for ways to do more, study ourselves more, and reach more so that my family small business can grow, grow, grow.
As a small business owner, the importance of invoicing is hardly news to you.
As a Bookkeeper who services small business, I have noticed a trend for businesses to move not only Accounting, but most of their office processing requirements to online options.
We love to hear how business owners are working with their accountant or bookkeeper beyond traditional compliance work.
Moving from a service based industry (web design and development), to a product based business (apparel) was a giant change, didn't realise how much work it would be!
Bearing in mind the two business must be have all their records completely separate.
I'm the epitome of bad business finances management.
What are your thoughts, ideas and questions on marketing and growing your small business?
com/small-business/credit-cards/Note: there are technically different Capital One banks that have different feeds / are different entities, e. g. , Capital One 360 vs. others.
Hubdoc is currently doing this but its another expensive monthly subscription for most business, so if Xero had the function it would be great.
* No not if we dont deal with that business** YES if you gave us a list of only the customers in our own database
the Cost of Customer Acquisition is one of the most critical business metrics.
HiWe have noticed that XPM only provides for 2 telephone numbers being 1) Phone 2) FaxUnfortunately our client often have1) business number2) mobile number3) home numberWhile these fields can be added as a custom field the contact section should provide for1) phone number - landline2) mobile number 3) faxThanks
At the moment, we consolidate all business activity into the one schedule.
I am in the IT services business.
For her business it is important that this memo field is populated.
Most of Australia has very poor mobile coverage outside direct city limits but has huge business and customer potential in none mobile serviced areas, tapping into this would hold a large number of future Xero business cliental eg .
Please develop this as this become really serious for my business and I guess for lots of businesses that deal with Property Managers.
Additionally, a sole trader business will be migrated to this organisation in the next 6 months.
My business is a winery and we distribute our own wine.
It would be great if the Adobe Sign feature currently available to businesses on Xero Practice Manager was also available on the everyday business plans.
In Quickbooks you can enter a Display Name (or Nickname) in ADDITION to the actual business name.
)The advantage: every business has different key items that it wants to track.
Often clients have their ABN registered under their business name so it makes it difficult to search.
It might seem an extravagant request, but would open up xero to be used in large partnership/company Forestry investment business, or Farming companies with off-farm investors/owners/beneficiaries.
In our business we sell our service to many individuals, not so much companies.
Our credit terms are 10 Business Days, (or 10 week days).
My business has 4 separate trading entities all under the one company banner (my Xero file).
We are a small business and are currently in the process of re-modeling our client database/s to reflect greater accuracy.
We have a number of clients that this would be beneficial for that are sole traders however it would be great if for other smaller business's (for example a director, manager and admin) if they could all see what each other had sent to a contact.
If this is not possible then limit the timezone search to the country the business is located with an option to extend to other countries if needed.
I travel up to 30 kms to some of my existing clients so could be missing out on a lot of potential business.
As a property maintenance business we often do jobs for the same property managers each day but for different properties.
)Some users have advisor status but not the knowledge to support it - we do not always have control over what status is applied to users - that can be at the discretion of the business owners.
We have, a parent company with a name unrelated to our various lines of business.
We have multiple lines of business which are recognized by our clients.
For example, for the income statement, we wanted to have the option to remove Meal&Entertainment, Business Loan, and some other categories.
com/business/discussion/71041/586 votes - being "actively worked on" - 3 years.
dropbox for Business Solutions Partner 7.
THIS IS A SUBSTANTIAL UNDERTAKING, HOWEVER WITHOUT THE INFORMATION, Xero can't provide the quality of business intelligence or analytics it needs.
We run a business in the UK that does charge VAT, however we prefer to view reports exclusive of VAT and currently there is no way of showing Xero without any VAT applied.
For example splitting motor vehicle transactions 80% business and 20% private.
Xero mobile phone app - "Receipt  or Purchase"  when submitting a "Business" Receipt, an option /choice needs to be added.
Therefore, making it much easier to submit photos of business purchase receipts on the go eg fuel for business.
At present the most basic access to Xero allows staff to see far too much financial information about the business.
It would be fantastic feature for our business!
In America the "Ship To" address is widely used in the daily business.
However, for our business it would be as useful to know how many individual orders we took in order to compare to the previous month.
Also as duty of care as a business and for our customers I’m sure it is a feature that Xero customers would welcome.
Perhaps this is a good deadline for Xero to roll out their own service, thus providing a comprehensive small business accounting and compliance package.
This is likely to grow as the business expands.
The choice of colour or identification of that special customer should be left to the manager of the business.
We work in a business where we buy produce from market daily and the price constantly changes .
It shows at a glance the health of your business and you can derive a quick profit & loss from it.
An example to explain our problem: Our business does work for multiple real estate agencies, doing repairs on rental properties.
It would be great if customers could quickly submit feedback on their experience with your business.
However, in our business, we have long product name.
My business manages services for our customers.
Seamless integration would be amazing for small business owners.
Allowing Standard User level is too far for people in the business if you want a separation of duties, but it would be good to allow them payrun access to approve payrolls and edit payrolls, since they are closest to the business.
For starters live plan helps establish plan vs actual and runs people and orgs thru business planning.
I want it to be queued and then go out during business hours.
Our tracking categories are already allocated to state and business entity.
This is the only downside of using Xero, everything else has been easier and better than Quickbooks, or MYOB online, for my business.
com/business/discussion/51511#answerThis is not done.
We operate a hospitality business where we take deposits on reservation.
In our business customers have the option of choosing to buy parts or buy the whole units.
This will only take a second to do, it will allow you to select who you want to e-mail and will give a professional image to your customers that their business is important to you.
I'm sure we're not the only business who would benefit from this!
Could either email link to interactive purchase order template or embed as a portal in business website.
I'm sure almost every business can benefit from this (seemingly) small feature.
Our business is run in various regions and we have moved our customers/contacts into corresponding contact groups to easily identify them.
This would make it easier for business owners to assess there cash flow without having to go into reports - having it a monthly total you don't see what you really to have put aside.
Feel free to email me at peter at business-express.
One example - a client who I controverted is very active on cash flow and knowing where everything is in his business.
Information would be accurate to country of business residence.
Cash is king as they say and we won't recommend Xero as an option for cash based business for this reason.
We service an aged care facility and direct debit the amounts customers owe to my business monthly through internet banking.
but Freeagent have a great dashboard for small businesses (as well as their business owner tax return functionality which gives an estimate of personal and business tax, and the ability to produce dividend vouchers from the system).
Great for year end, not great for business as usual.
A address field is needed as all of my clients are private and not business.
This would help ensure each business is showing the correct amount due etc.
We do recommend you contact your accountant to check the suitability of this option for your business before implementing the details below.
com--sent via the Xero network so that they appear in my business?
For example we have multiple fuel purchases for 2 different cars from the same supplier, each car with different % business/personal splits, hence 2 rules.
This would increase security and allow business owners to know that thee valuable information is only being accessed in certain areas
Cash flow is the crux of business & trade terms & conditions are massively important.
Is it possible for Xero to identify where mileage in the current business year has gone over 10k miles and to notify/automatically adjust rate?
It would make Xero look better and it would make my small business look better.
I'm running a small business reliant on purchases using PayPal.
Neither strikes me as a particularly efficient way of conducting business - particularly given that I'm running a small business and paying regressively for the services of Xero.
I am using category tracking for the different areas of my business (such as SEO, PPC, WEB etc), so I don't think that creating a category for each customer will work.
Every business has their own unique information and for them to create their own fields means that a lot of the feature requests such as: Customer codes, Purchase Order Numbers, and many others, could be self defined.
Inland Revenue now provide the ability for business to register online.
Which is good business indeed.
This is a really simple request and ties in with Xero's philosophy of empowering small business owners by giving them easy to read reports.
This is something that is becoming more and more essential for my business (taking downpayments on large projects and applying credits towards work performed).
It is frustrating to have to look for a particular business unit if the name of all of them start with the same words and the system only search according to the first word.
Got a little click happy when processing my business expense claims from my personal xero and now appears I can't edit or void it once gets archived by showing as paid.
SOOOOOOOOOOOO important to our business.
Becasue of this I am not offering a credit card facility, which I know is costing me business, but the potential for error going down the other path is quite large.
Maryann CarterSolutions for Your Business
Very quick fix - saving every business potentially 30 minutes to 10 hours in set-up of Australian payroll.
I've had feedback from clients that they have used payroll systems that have this and that it is an invaluable tool for running their business!
At the moment it shows: - Total Earnings - PAYG - Super - Net PayWhich is misleading for beginner business owners, as they mistakenly will think that this total earnings figure is the total cost of their payrun, which from a gross wages stance is correct, but as it doesn't include super, regularly catches business owners off guard.
He operates 2 business using the same ABN the second business is 001.
The Employer's Australian Business Number (if applicable)3.
I have a business with two branches.
As this is used extensively to track profit centres within a business, there now appears to be no ability to allocate wages to different categories, which will diminish the reporting that is available with tracking categories.
This would be a great addition to Xero as bookkeepers, accountants and business owners can often forget to do the two clicks to send a payslip to an employee.
We run our small business with Five employees and this will not change, we are restricted by our location and government requirements.
It is a natural progression and usual business practice to also allocate superannuation to tracking categories on a prorata basis.
Many of these business are currently using MYOB that has this functionality so its a hard-sell to switch to Xero without this functionality which is core to their business.
I'm a photographer and I'm finding out that a photography business is very unique.
I assume every business is unique in its own way.
The majority of our employees were set to this role because it's ideal for our business; they can create, approve and send POs and can upload expenses.
If I bought cleaning products at the supermarket which are tax deductible and these were easily identifiable then a lot of money would be saved by the business.
My clients have the business edition - not the partner edition.
Part of our business involves the sale of livestock.
com/business/discussion/42174625/3: Leave the bill reconciled with the original outgoing funds, create a second bill with a negative (600) amount, which it doesn't let you do.
I have a client buying another business which has a large number of employees.
We have several American Express Small Business charge cards.
For some businesses, I'm sure this is helpful, but for me, it doesn't really give me a good picture of my business.
My business is a music booking agency.
What integrated platform or 3rd party solution can you recommend for an accountancy business that offers optimal integration with Xero?
Basically, Small Business Development Center advise small businesses in a variety of topics including accounting and which accounting software that might be best for clients.
And reply sender is unlikely to ever receive a reply -  with potential negative consequences for the business relationship.
I have two business credit cards.
I'm working for a small business that is looking to switch to Xero.
We are developing a web application for  one of our clients to manage their business.
Being that these are credit card transactions (and Westpac has a terrible Business Online customer interface), I can't see a way of exporting these transactions for manual import into Xero.
We've passed along your request to our Product Team to include this in the Business Performance graphs.
Please take this request seriously, I have been an advocate to all my business partners and friends regarding switching from quickbooks to Xero, but am starting to regret this decision.
We are a UK base business so GBP is our base currency.
HiI run a retail business and have recently voluntarily registered for VAT.
This client only accepts cash payments given the low value/high volume nature of the business.
I have stupidly closed the wrong business.
My business doesn't really 'deal' in multiple currencies.
My business is based in Canada but has an international client basis.
I run a property business with Xero and I have this situation.
I have Barclays business acounts.
which isn't appropriate in our case because we want to change it based on business division.
My business has a very simple operation no different to hundreds and thousands of others but this EFTPOS thing has me stumped.
The specific example is purchased business cards.
We've used the custom tags to split the business into department and projects.
I have started work at a business who has run Xero alongside their previous solution this year.
com/business/discussion/37280114/Kinda similar to this chap.
As a firm, we have currently over 30 clients who have a Xero Business Plan.
I am in the startup phase of an ecommerce business.
Our business relies heavily on depreciation of computer hardware.
Our revenue is about $10 million per year, but our accounting practice isn't very different from a small business.
We run a small telco business with thousands of debtors.
I started using xero several months after I started my business.
The business also provides standard loans, as well as hire purchase.
One of our suppliers has recently transferred their business.
It is my business, but I only have cash coding permission.
This will make reconciling the petrol payments far easier in our business.
1. all statements on my business credit card are zero2.
I am running a business in the Netherlands and only have Maestro which is not accepted by xero, unless you are in the UK.
I have a repeating bill for a software licence which is paid monthly by the business.
I purchased a set of tempates for Xero from XeroPlusOne (they seem to be out of business now, so I'm hoping I didn't get ripped off.
Good Evening,I run a business selling Smartphones and Tablets; every product i sell i give away a free box, cable and headphones.
Xero direct debits my subscription from my Business credit card monthly.
com/business/discussion/12475701/but the first suggestion didn't give a number and seemed to be fore US and the second suggestion was from the UK.
I have a client with BNZ Business credit cards.
co. nz/courses/business/xero-an-introduction/
I am looking to change all the business codes so have consistency across companies.
With regard to the starter business edition.
Hi all,I am looking for a way to compile a list of customers that have not had business dealings with us for the past 6 months, in order to make a list of clients to call for feedback (i. e why we have not had repeated business).
Hello,I recently started using Xero as my accounting software for my business and am having a little trouble with the reconciliation process.
Morning, I work for a small business and we have recently started using Xero.
I purchased an item through the business, paid it as a bill and then reconciled it with the correct receipt.
70. Business is registered on GST non cash accrual basis.
We have several employees with their own Business Debit Card and primarily for general business expenses e. g. hotel, travel etc.
com/business/discussion/11090793/ it is not possible to change the Reporting date for an authorised and approved expense claim.
I've read a lot about how to record expense claims from my business, including this article, https://help.
My business is wholesale alcohol business and we have to do regular inventory counts in our multiple warehouses.
All paid for using the business credit card in seperate transactions or petty cash.
A business could have most of customers with standing orders.
For clarity, we're running a stonework business so the reference would be along the lines of: Smith Grave, St. Joseph's Cemetery, CorkHopefully someone else has done this!
I have managed to get  a rough approximation of what I want, but still have some gripes - for instance double line spacing where our business address is and the footer text defaulting back to Times Roman (I think) even though it is set to my preferred Century Gothic in Word.
We’re a small business with two directors.
However, for business reasons it makes sense to compare calendar years ending 31 December.
Have you guys ever actually run a business?
I have a lot of questions about how to run a business properly so forgive my stupid questions.
I'm the sole proprietor of my business.
So i have a client who has a online coffee business and sells gst and gst free items, as well as having an ebay stored.
Would this help you and your business?
This helps me assess the P&L appropriately for each business line and make a decision of when should I take this business activity out of my trust and create a separate company / partnership.
Specifically, my issue is a number of my expenses were correctly reconciled to the412 - Consulting & Accounting   expenseduring that reconciliation I classified the Tracking category <Business Line> = <Teaching>but now I realized it makes more sense to allocate these expenses to another one Tracking category <Business Line> = Trust this removes the expense from that particular P&L business line and reflects the true fact these expenses are not from one single business line, but actually incurred for the Trust itself.
I'm looking for the best way to save receipts for purchases made by my business.
I run a small business, with 2 people and an accountant.
I've been playing around the budget utility in Xero Business and I can't seem to figure out how to include capital items such as fixed assets and inventory.
We have a Paypal feed setup for our NZ business.
We have another business in Australia who uses PayPal feeds however this issue does not exist.
I have been importing and reconciling all my business's expenditures for the 2013 tax year.
I'm moving toward settings up our business assets, and wanted to check in about some best practices prior to setting this up.
Looking for cloud product that can be sustainable and efficient for myself, family and my business.
There is a debit value in the Paypal transactions for something I have purchased for the business via Paypal, but it ultimately comes off my credit card so the purchase is reconciled against the transaction in my credit card statement, so what do I do with the transaction in the Paypal statement?
We're exploring Xero for our business.
I am in the process of setting a business on xero.
I also want to enter details once, and have personal and business separated and categorised.
Would love it if you had a look at the coding of waveaccounting, and integrated your personal system into business.
I have a client who set up her business and is adding a second business subscription.
She only wants her staff to have access to one of the business subscriptions.
The Xero USA team is hosting a weekly webinar for small business accountants and bookkeepers.
Question: Is it possible to import the CSV files created by Xero to import into ASB Fastnet business?
For reasons that I cannot work out some of my wages payments haven't been allocated to one of two separate divisions of the business, so they end up in the "unallocated" column whenever I run the Profit & Loss.
Our business has been reimbursed by our workers compensation insurer for leave taken by an employee under sick leave.
Hello, we are a small business and I am trying to calculate our BAS.
We run the payroll for our Australian business from the UK using Xero payroll.
Within our business (Discretionary Trading Trust) we have genuine Personal Services Income (PSI) which I track for the relevant employee(s) and attribute 100% of the income accordingly.
As a small business working in the service industry we do multiple jobs per day.
I am setting up Xero for a client, and the business has loaned a sum of money to an employee in the past.
Hello everyone,I am an owner of a small business and we have been using Xero for only a month.
The owners of the business I work for are used to having accurate information on the wages costs for each of their retail locations.
However 3 of the employees have not supplied their TFN's and they no longer work for the business.
Hello,As my employees do not know the business' nor my twelve month plan.
We have 2 offices at 2 locations under the one business entity and are using tracking to keep transactions separated in Xero.
Customers and partners in Australian can now manage what's likely to be the biggest expense in their business, their payroll.
Hey there,     I'm looking into your payroll app for my business and I've been testing a few other software as well.
I'm trying to run my business but find myself doing their job so much I'm ready to change to manual payroll and give up on Xero all together.
This will help our business tremendously as we would only have to request that information once from our clients.
Our business is located on the VA/NC border.
The business is in California as are all the contractors.
As many of you may know, on a corporate tax return the Officers or Owners of the business list their wages or salaries separate from the rest of the employee salaries or wages.
reason: The submission of this document has failed due to departmental specific business logic in the Body tagIf anyone could help it would be much appreciated.
End to end Business Cloud based Data and Reporting platform capable of connecting to over 200 systems and databases and create beautiful dashboards.
Will Payroll Payments (to staff and IRD) work in the same way as Batch Payments i. e. there is a direct connection or will it require the download of a file and upload into ASB Business banking?
Custom dashboards, reporting & scorecards help you eliminate the data silo and view your Xero metrics along with all the KPIs that run your business.
Lulalend provides fast access to working capital for your business.
For accountants and business owners data integrity and peace of mind.
Liberis provide access to the funding your business needs to grow.
Grow is powerfully simple business intelligence.
Blend Xero data with other core business data.
Recount provides AI Financial Analytics at hand to tell you what’s going on, and explain opportunities to improve your business – whenever you want.
The Good Till is one of the UK's most intuitive and affordable iPad POS systems, giving you the power to manage and grow your business with ease!
Run your business in one simple app on the web and mobile.
Anytime access to your business with your smartphone, tablet or computer!
If you are a user of Xero and My Business Manager, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
The ultimate Dashboard, reporting, budgeting, cashflow, KPI, Consolidation bundle for Businesses and as a foundation for Accountants Business Advisory.
regroupTAX for xero is a workpaper app that reduces data entry and provides consistent, tax-basis workpapers for business tax returns.
DiCentral's Managed Services solution allows Xero users to connect and exchange critical business documents with their trading partner community.
Online business valuation for small business owners and accountants.
If you are a user of Xero and Business Importer, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Rich dashboards to explore and monitor your business metrics such as cash position, revenue vs. expenses, profit loss trend, debtor days and more.
As a team leader, business owner or consultant, you get a 30,000 feet view of all users and access rights to all your apps and documents in the cloud.
Your automated financial assistant for business owners and their advisors, communicating analysis, insights and actions on desktop and mobile.
Promis connects your accounting system to that of your business partners.
Business Managers and Advisors see performance at a glance.
Fast access up to $150k business finance with no obligation and no application fees.
Google Apps for Work is a powerful productivity tool that seamlessly integrates with Xero, so you can focus on growing your business.
Apply online and access up to $400,000 working capital for your business.
Get a 360-degree view of your business data across CRM, eCommerce, POS, Expenses & Accounting.
Receive short-term funding for your small business.
Replace your business documents with smart, interactive and mobile-friendly webpages that are as easy to build and reuse and they are beautiful.
Trusted by thousands of health, wellness and beauty businesses worldwide, MINDBODY manages your business needs online and on the go.
A cloud-based, all-in-one software solution used by spas, salons and medi-spas to manage and grow their business.
Moula provides fast access to working capital for your business.
Flexible business finance up to $300,000.
Full range of financial solutions for all business needs.
Sendle unlocks the power of big business delivery networks for everyone.
Monitor the performance of your business, track key metrics, and create data mash-ups.
In under 5 minutes show your clients how to improve their profit, cash flow and business value.
Plooto is the fastest, easiest and most secure platform for business to business payments.
BarTab is the iPad-based EPOS system that has been transforming the way pubs and bars do business.
Prioritized tasks on your smartphone to improve your business based on your unique financial data.
You can manage your risk and protect your business against unexpected events using CoverKit.
Compare and improve business performance with live customer feedback, net promoter score, and financial benchmarks direct from Xero data.
With features that cover all aspects of your business, MechanicDesk puts you in complete control of your workshop.
Ag Profit provides farm business intelligence solutions to accountants.
We’ll identify the debtors who pose the biggest risk to your business and cash flow.
Extend the value of your Xero investment with a solution built to empower your business decisions.
Everline provides fast, reliable working capital to small business owners looking to grow their business or fill a cash flow gap.
Grow your business with Email, SMS and Social marketing.
The easiest way to run your promotional products business.
Leading job costing & project management system helping agencies & consultancies take control of their business.
Business Advisory Software for Accountants.
Measure business performance against industry peers in terms of margins, cost structure, profitability, productivity and other key indicators.
It provides the tools to grow your business & give peace of mind with compliance & claiming.
Simple, Effective, Affordable CRM software, designed with the small to medium business in mind.
Business owners and freelancers can streamline their cash-flow.
Forecast tomorrow, understand today and action a better future for your business.
Take two minutes to see the cash you could free up to grow your business.
Simplify your multi-channel business and see how easy it is to succeed.
A platform to manage a service or repair business with job tracking (ticketing) and an emphasis on great communication - making you love your day job.
Business expense reports seamlessly integrated with Xero.
Complete 1099 compliance for business in the cloud.
The complete rental/hire business solution for all types of rental business from SMEs to large companies.
RentalSaaS will automate your business and integrate transactions directly into your Xero organisation.
A powerful cloud salon software to manage & grow your business from a single owner operator to a chain starting from an insane price of under $1/day.
If you are a user of Xero and Business Oxygen Lite, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
A complete, online, workshop management system designed to simplify the running of your business - for cars, boats, bikes and planes.
The quick & easy way to create your own business website or online store.
The proven advisory process to build trust, secure more advisory engagements and become your client’s your most trusted and valued business adviser.
If you are a user of Xero and Check Business, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
OneSaas connectors allow you to integrate Xero with a growing range of other specialized online software to manage all aspects of your business, check out .
com Business management and Execution Software.
A simple solution to achieve better business results.
Business analytics for SMEs and their advisors.
One page performance dashboard business intelligence tool for Xero - quick, clear business analysis and insight.
Web-based appointment scheduling and business booking system.
Link with Xero & you have true end-to-end management of your entire business.
Ideal is to have something very similar to this so as not to disrupt their business unnecessarily
com/business/discussion/45706435Any help or advice much appreciated.
As a business owner, does knowing depreciation on our computer hardware help us make strategic, day to day decisions?
I'm looking for data to help me manage my business not my tax liabilities.
We are a business with trucks working on construction sites.
The response to this was "These thing happen in business"Finally when I tried to submit a complaint it proved impossible to speak to a manger and after over a week of constant e-mails from us we finally receive a response that accepts no responsibility and no solution.
HiBeen shopping around and doing my homework looking for a user-friendly online ordering system that will integrate with Xero for my business.
I have current access to a business using XERO as their accounting software.
This business also uses Deputy to track their staffing.
Call it a one-stop shop marketplace for business services related to accounting and payroll maybe?
We are a distribution business, and hoping to find a solution to the job of creating an efficient run sheet for the day using Google maps or something.
The business is small (2 persons) but requires a system where you receive automated follow up call reminders plus in the ideal world the ability to email out in bulk with a personalised emailRegardsAdrian
The client currently uses Xero to manage their business and client list.
We are currently using Xero as our accounting software but have a MS Access database creating orders for the business.
We are a small business that manufactures & installs joinery type products into the commercial construction market.
I run a business that provides in home behavior treatment for kids with disabilities.
Hello,I am looking for either a business owner or accountant who is familiar with and knows in detail the pro's and con's of how certain programs work with Xero and can offer advice on a possible solution.
We have a small aircraft and car cleaning business that's getting busier and more complicated with more employees.
com (Premier +) and also Google Apps for business.
To see more click here  or to register and start using Recv'd within your business visit If you more questions, contact Adrian on 0412 377 877.
We also do a small amount of rental business with terms ranging from 1 month up to 36 months.
My Client runs a business through Xero.
We, as a company, run the business for selling and leasing.
As a business, we have been using Expensify in the USA for a few years with no problems.
Would love to hear from a similar sort of business to find out what combinations you have found that work!
They are are a advertising / marketing company so something bespoke to that type of business would be good.
We do not have an accurate overview of our current business position and manually entering is out of the question.
As I'd be keen to get something which can put booked event dates into my Google CalendarI'm only a small 1 man business so not looking for enterprise solutions, but open to suggestions that will limit me having to type details multiple timesThanksBarney
QB may have been a bear, but it allowed enough flexibility to create processes to fit your business workflow.
It works pretty well, but lacks the open collaboration that our business culture is based on.
Our main business tool is smartsheet.
Spotlight is nice for Business Intelligence views but I am a small business that the costs can't carry.
I have a business that has stock that will be stored in about 4 locations, but the stock is both sold and hired out to customers (depending on the customers preference).
The tasks will change and the business units will change.
I have a client purchasing a business.
com is tool that can extend the useful life of a Xero/QBO product until a growing business really needs a step up in platform and we usually migrate to Intacct.
I'm currently using vtiger as it was a free offering from a web host but the mobile app sucks, the sync feature is not reliable/automaticMy focus is on maintaining a fully cloud based business and offering cloud based solutions, I'm partnered with Microsoft for 365/sharepoint online, trend micro (worry free cloud based) and Crashplan (cloud based backups) and my clients love these solutions.
We are basically a merchandising business that sell B2B and B2C.
I have changed my business over to Xero this month and am finding it very effective.
My business is selling and Installing home insulation product and I am hoping to get some advice from the community on the best short list options for my needs.
Note, ShipStation is awesome for any business shipping physical goods in the US.
I have recently converted our business over to Cin7 using xero to process the accounting side of the business and cin7 to manage our 6000 parts in our two locations.
What advantages/disadvantages did they have for the business.
We are a mobile support business currently operating GeoOp for job management integrated with Xero for accounting and reporting.
I am looking to see how Xero & Kounta integrate in order to establish the best way to structure my business processes to get the most value out of the integration (and reduce manual inputting).
For a business with multiple locations, can Square have a unique identifier for each store's transactions that are imported into Xero?
I have been using the basic stock control in Xero so far for my retail business.
com's website, they reflect Xero as a 'business partner' - see http://www.
com/app/id814048454The app has become very popular among Japanese small business owners because of the simplicity and quick move.
Our core business is a print and design company.
Our requirements are a bit more complex as each print job we do is broken done to: Job Type (example flyers, business cards) Paper Weight (ie 130gsm gloss, 170gsm silk) Quantity (ie 5,000) Size (A4, A5) Turnaround (Standard, Express) It would also manage our workflow?
The business is very remote from both business owners and bookkeeper/accountant.
I've now persuaded my awesome husband to come on board with his business.
I have a product development business.
With our continuous efforts to make DEAR Inventory ‘small business friendly’ we have made a range of enhancements that will be beneficial for small food processing businesses, electronic and medical suppliers.
If your business process doesn’t include quoting, packing or shipping you can make it optional in DEAR Inventory as well.
We are a 2 user business and are price sensitive.
Currently our business does not have a decent CRM system because we cant find one that will integrate with both!
We are looking for xero addons  solutions to improve and manage our small growing business in commercial and contract cleaning, property services, junk removal and waste management.
Having the option to produce a business schedule.
So frustrating when your trying to run a business and having these frequent outages.
Thinking that Xero may not be right for our business due to the volume of data we process.
After attending the Roadshow in Sydney and having a talk to Tim I now have the confidence to start using this product in my business.
I am losing business through using the Xero quote system.
Considering that the business owner is waiting for the reactivation so he can process his employee's wages this was really disappointing and annoying.
We are not all Peter Pans and would appreciate sharing your timescales so that we can manage our own business plans and decide who we can work with going forward.
Having set up rules, with personal/business split, % calculations etc, which is very useful, again why would I bother entering repeating bills, if I cannot nominate for them to be treated by a Rule.
in real business world, things move fast and we cannot afford this to happen.
Xero is more a bookkeepers product than a small business  type " i dont know what I am doing" product.
CSR ^AD via twitter tells me if I click on "Business Owners" then, and I quote, "all the content is available without being a partner".
As a paying Xero customer, I want, specifically, to learn more about how book keep for my business.
Xero advertises to small business owners, and yet features, feature requests, support, are all geared towards finance professionals.
I am trying to run a business and it is being made very difficult when i cant send statements as clients have paid and i cant reconcile.
I am a business owner who needs to run a business and cannot justify a fulltime office admin.
Its the major omissions of key UX functionality and critical tools for business owners.
As they will be focused on business not on chatting online.
They still have the old business or contact name.
- Customers/previously invoiced contacts should be returned first (ideally we could turn off seeing suppliers at all, or they could at least be greyed out and lower down the list)- Searching should also drill down the customer details so we can search by human contact or business name.
com/business/discussion/64891/) hasn't had a lot of attention, but I believe it affects the majority of Xero users.
My wife and I own a small business and we've used MYOB AccountEdge since we opened 10 years ago.
As a very small business, we employ a number of different casual staff each week.
This view of the business model in Europe and actually other regions of the world is very short sighted and narrows Xero’s potential customer base.
Xero customers become too easily stumped by its often narrow and restrictive design approach - as if the system was designed by software programmers rather than authentic business users.
After working on clients' books all day, I tended to neglect bookkeeping for my own business and my husband's business.
##### CLUSTER 25 #####
It is important that we track the amounts given as grants and the balance still to be distributed at any period in time.
At the time I didn't think about the accounting implications of this, so I let the vendor repay the overpayment by credit card.
Due to a change in the layout of two of my employees, I filed they 'ordinary time' in the 'annual leave' line.
If you are looking for accurate tool for time tracking integrated to Xero, I recommend you TimeCamp.
It is a good idea to have your Paypal account open at the same time to match the transactions and find out which entries have been duplicated.
I have spent a bit of time structuring my contacts and categorising my clients, suppliers etc.
We want to extract the clients that has purchased this specific product from us in 2015 and send them a email to remind them it is time to replace this item.
My accountant recommends recording the annual up-front fee as a current asset, then depreciating it a little at a time over the next twelve months so that monthly operating reports give a truer reflection of what was really spent for website hosting.
I'm a little hesitant as it's the first time I've had to complete these in Xero.
It's a very useful feature and saves a lot of time re-entering details.
We don't want to lose the sale so we give a written promise stating that we will take care of what is needed on the car within a certain period of time and then we sell them the car that day.
So I'm taking the trouble to try and get things right first time!
I have this issue 3 times, first time, I could tell where was wrong, the issue was solved within couple of months, 2nd time, it took more than 1 year, this is the 3rd time.
If I do this, however, then I lose the ability to track specific projects such as unique events because Xero only allows two active categories at any given time.
Because of estimated bills, fixed direct debits and time of year the bill is £14.
How I can sort for have not Vat (anda balance) calculated 2 time?
The way we are doing now seems quite time consuming and it seems we are missing some leads.
hence spending time getting the coding correct.
From time to time I have had issues with all of them, but after a day or so they started to work again.
This has been happening for quite some time and even my bookkeeper who is training us in Xero doesn’t know why?
Well funded start-up looking for full-time accountant to perform full accounting cycle up to F/S.
I have been using supplier A for a period of time prior to October last year.
Does anyone know if you can update a repeating bill - i know you can edit the bill each time but that is painful , i know in other programs you get the option to save changes so the next time a recurring bill is used it updates to the last lot of info you had in it.
This seems time consuming.
The last time I reconciled was  .
As a bookkeeper of 20+ clients, I have to outline the most annoying time consuming area of Xero.
it is highly annoying and extremely time consuming.
The extra time I spend for a simple toggle is ridiculous.
Because I changed the default account allocations at the same time.
this is the first time in 40 years that software has defeated me.
However with the tracking options being limited to 100 we're worried we'll churn through these in no time at all.
Greetings Xero Community,This year I will be taking an owner's salary the first time.
I'm really convinced there is somewhere the answer but I really don't have much time to search and maybe the fresh answer is the best) please helpCan I have 1 Contact which will be treated by the system as Supplier AND Customer at the same time?
WF customer service rep hinted that maybe the logins from different parts of the country about the same time maybe triggering WF security to block access.
Thank you for taking the time to read my question :)
Then the consultant bills us for their time and we keep a cut of the overall amount paid by the client.
so i have taken to doing my own accounting and being the end of the financial year its time to lodge everything.
It will save me a shed load of time.
For software that is paid using a one-off fee, (for example buying Adobe Photoshop)  I have read that this becomes an asset and is to be recorded against "Plant and Machinery" so that it can be claimed as a capital expense and depreciated over time.
I sponsored an event and donated my time to design and market it.
Hello,I posted something similar some time ago but I wanted to see if there were any other options for taking care of this.
By the way, this is the second time that I got the mismatch message.
Hello all,we have been using xero since a month ago,Now, we have a problem at the time of inventory adjustment.
It would be useful to keep this information in their contact details so that it did not show up as overdue and I have to check the threshold manually each time.
To reduce my JEs in the system as it is time-consuming, I'm looking at creating a compound JE.
Every time I make a consumables purchase I will average out the cost and put it in inventory.
However some vendors charge tax at the time of sale because they aren't set up to handle resale customers.
first time this has come up.
For a conversion bill, do I have to go through the time to make all of those individual line item entries for their specific expense codes, or could I simply lump them all into one expense code since it is for purchases in the old accounting system?
HiNot sure how to find the info for this but;How do I split payments to a supplier for example I get invoiced for $1500 and will do 3 payments of $500 over a month's time.
Sorry, I know these are probably simple questions, but I have a hard time understanding them and want to make sure I file them correctly.
I have a full-time job which tax is automatically taken each week.
Since I have already paid tax on the full-time job I'm wondering what code I should put my wages under.
About 50% of the time it fails.
Would this mean we have to increase our liabilities as we give the credit away every time?
I'm in Auckland NZ, time here is 8.
However, every time i try to post the transaction, the system wants me to post to a supplier's account.
My God, they're useless, but let's leave that for another time.
When I am reconciling transactions, do I have to make a contact every time?
I appreciate your time and patience.
I have come in to do some long overdue accounting and can no longer download August 2014 from the banks online banking system - must be a time limit on statements.
I would love to know if you have had problems connecting in this time period (Dec14-Jan15) how you resolved it?
Most of the time the final value comes in lower.
However, there is no specific date required or planned at this point in time.
Apologies ahead of time if I don't make sense - I'm an idiot when it comes to tax stuff!
My intent is to sell every part from that dishwasher (obviously that could take some time though as you have to find the right buyer) so essentially all of the parts inside would be inventory items (by the way, I'm only buying one model of dishwasher here, so I would likely replenish my stock levels of parts I'm running low on by purchasing another whole dishwasher).
As you can appreciate this is now taking up too much time and creating late payments.
I have free time to learn and do it and I think Xero will help me tremendously.
Then they could immediately understand what they owed us, not have to look through their statements and past payments all the time.
I really don't have time for that.
That kind of manual intervention would require quite a lot of time if you got a few jobs.
Maybe a notification every time a bill is added?
This would save time a lot of time compared to having to open each one up individually.
All my goods for are paid for at time of sale.
I am trying to link my corporate account, but it fails each time.
I want to run a budget variance against selected classes and am having a hard time doing this.
It seems everything is now locked in cells which is very time consuming.
Normally we ask for this at the time of the deposit.
also, if a mistake is made on mental calculation of VAT, then it can be a very tedious, time-consuming task to figure out which line caused the problem.
When we initially setup Xero we did not totally understand the entire system as we are a small organization and needed something to simplify our process and get it going and did not have a lot of time.
And since I'm going back to the beginning of the year there are quite a bit to edit so it would save me a lot of time to do this in bulk.
That will mean I spend time doing journals and payments to & from each branch, not an optimal solution.
HiMy director withdraws cash from a cash machine from time to time.
I have the pleasure of entering parking fines and speeding fines for my employees from time to time.
The amount is set according to the size of the franchisee's client list, but can be adjusted from time to time if the current account balance is getting out of line.
However, I've taken on another couple of franchisees recently, and the overall process has become tedious and time-consuming.
Many employees work offsite (FIFO – Fly in Fly Out) for extended periods of time.
Due to a VAT calculation mistake last year I owe HMRC 7,144ukp ( this value was owed at the time of the conversio date ).
Now it's a fixed time of loan so the total loan w/ interest is all known.
I'm using Xero for the first time and processing an 18 month backlog!
I'm a first time user and not an accountant so my question might sound simple.
Please note that my priority is to record these entries (about 200) correctly, the time that it will take me is not important to me, as long as it is entered correctly, I will be happy - Cheers
Also, our capital investment account is considered 3110 and our Owner's Billable time is 3130.
Wondered if there were any accountants or businesses in the area that would be willing to give me a little time to coaching me through getting the best out of Xero either in person, over the phone, email support or Skype.
I can't seem to see if I'm actually required to keep their data for a period of time, but I'd rather not be liable, given that there seems to be a hard restriction on Xero allowing you to do that.
Every time I think I've got something set up I then can't find where information is stored.
I have a large number of expense claim items from the same supplier(s) and I have to enter the same options every time.
This is from scratch and the data in Xero (customer info) is a big jumble so time to sort that in excel to import nicely.
I have spent a bit of time on the phone with Neda in an attempt to devise a work around and she has been very helpful but there is still no simple fix.
I don't have the time to scroll down numerous answers from other customers.
Needless to say how time consuming is this task and frustrating.
Could there be another placeholder added where I could set the billing period the first time and then it will change automatically every month?
This means the feature is useless as i have to check every time to see if the address is correct
(note: the customisation is done in client's Xero file)At the moment we can only click the 'Done' button but every time we navigated away and come back to the Profit & loss page the whole customisation progress is lost and we have to start again.
that xero stopping me from providing accounting information to IRD on time.
As you can imagine this is a time consuming way of doing things, as well as being prone to error & duplications.
The combined cost of distributing e-payslips that way might actually be equal to or higher than using paper (due to cumulative unproductive time spent by employees).
I've spent a long time searching help but no luck.
Once again, I have an issue with my Amex feed re-importing transactions - this time from 21 - 28 March, and then skipping to 19th April.
I want to ensure its accurate for BAS Time.
First time I have a company so first time for almost everything.
I do not plan to operate with the OAuth of Xero, as I find it extremely time consuming to obtain a licence with OpenSSL and to go back and forth with the encrypting process.
I'm now concerned that she spends far too much time on bookkeeping and I could have her doing other things.
If i enter all my expenses is there a way  that i can see how much each job is costing separately if there is more than one project running at any one time.
Time tracking: crappy.
He thought I was wasting his time so I went out and did it for him because sometimes it’s nice to say ‘I told you so.
At the time was given a workaround but that no longer works.
However we are finding that the requirement to allocate each credit note is horribly time consuming.
The reason I take the time to enter a Bill is to see my financial position into the future.
However, they aren't account customers, or a lot of the time they aren't even 'regulars'.
These valuable receipts are time stamped with references numbers so on and so forth.
I'm a first time user of Xero and trying to set up GST return.
what do I do now as I want to show it as an asset, but also at the same time the purchase cost charged needs to be repaid one day?
When I am inputting purchases  often I enter an item that is supposed to be gst free and it  shows as GST inclusive, then I have to also go across and change this each time.
Log GPS location and time stamp on smartphones to ‘clock in’ on Xero Me to a timesheet.
That way, timesheet approval would be an easy process, and save companies lots of time and money.
At the time, I did not have an Importers number and paid all associated GST and PST at the time I crossed the border in one lump sum.
We have tour guides who take clients out for days at a time to various sites.
saves me loads of time!
It's driving me mad having to fix the addresses all the time!
The amount is set according to the size of the franchisee's client list, but can be adjusted from time to time if the current account balance is getting out of line.
However, I've taken on another couple of franchisees recently, and the overall process has become tedious and time-consuming.
I've imported a very simple credit card CSV file for the first time (6 columns, no headers).
Fifteen minutes ago, I tried again - this time shuffling pages on my screen so that the refresh feed would be visible in case it was requesting input.
Why does Xero make it such a pain and waste of time?
Their CSV files are not set up properly and would take precious time to reformat (as Xero Support helpfully suggested).
2) Time tracking.
How do I *nicely* explain to him that my time = money too?
less time in the office!
It would be great in xpm if the time clock could pause so when we started a job and get an interruption we didn't have to have a numerous amount of entries for one job that day.
I currently keep a running workbook of time vs costs and assemble all stats by hand.
Going through the option of editing the transaction would be very time consuming.
If xero could tell us how many transactions were in an export it would save time adjusting the date then trying the export again, still over 5000 so adjust the date again and try export again.
Thank you for your time and I hope the fix will be released soon.
I understand its been available in the US for some time now.
Any chance booked holidays, time off could be indicated on time sheets something as simple as blanking the hours out or putting a H next to the day.
As we have a time frame to apply for leave, so therefore we couldn't tell when the leave was requested.
Or the total Profit of all 10 organizations at any point in time.
Or the total Debtors & Creditors of all 10 Organzations at any point in timeOr total Assets & Liabilities at any point in time .
I find 25 lines way too few and find it frustrating that every time I look at another account I have to choose 100 lines.
If personal preferences could be built in it would save a lot of time having to choose the greater number each time.
If I happen to have a few of those cases, it takes up an immense amount of my office time.
I can customize the range as usual, but this time I can see the last 36 periods (better than only the last 11 periods as it used to be).
But please if there is an easier way of doing this than I do now please let me know because it frustrates me every time I have to do it.
It is painful and time-consuming adding this contact in for every single client and we will have 30 versions of this person in the Contacts tab.
Making the user spend a long time trying to figure out the solution.
It's extremely annoying at times - well all the time Surely there should be an option to turn this off.
I can do this manually by changing the default every time but this is so time consuming and clunky.
When importing a journal with Tracking codes it would be much easier if Xero identified the number and did not require the full title of the Tracking coded typed on the import file aswellThis would save so much time
I issue several purchase orders and the items I order are continually getting delivered to the office address listed at the top of the purchase order and not the job-site delivery address that is all the way at the bottom of the purchase order, it gets overlooked all the time.
We issue purchase orders on a regular basis, our PO's regularly have 20+ line items, it would save so much time if there was an auto-fill check box or option for the account and tax rate columns.
Surely I am not alone in wanting to know each and every time a period lock date is changed.
A lot of our employees make a draft of their expenses and then forget to submit them on time, besides reminders.
As an example, we have a separate account for savings which we don't want to include in a summery most of the time.
At the moment it can only be done one contact at a time.
When I lookup Profit & Loss, filtering by All Job Codes or by Group, there is only the following options available:Do Not FilterUnassignedAll Job Codes or Group and list of Job Codes or Group availableSuggestion:It would be easier if additional option provided to Filter:All Job Codes or Group only with transactionsThis feature would help to reduce time consumed to filter/delete Job Codes/Group with no transaction
Having to consistently fill these in every time is time consuming and painful!
This means you have to scroll to the bottom of the page each time and from the drop down box choose your page number again and scroll to the top to continue, it also causes RSI when you have a very large contact base.
This feature makes for very easy accounting and saves heaps of time that can be better utilised.
Drives me spare that I have to keep navigating back to the Chart every time I make a change!
This means a time consuming export and rework to summarise the total number of items purchased by a particular customer.
This could save hours of time and headache and room for error.
Adding this one filtering option would save a ton of time for us!
Every time I hire out a piece of equipment I have to readjust the inventory for each item back to +1.
This is very time consuming and rather wasteful of time.
This would be a big time saver for us.
It would be a great time saver if Xero remebered the gateway id and password.
When writing a daily or weekly work sheet all details to be added to contact details on Xero to save having to imput it twice and save time
Save time.
Time for Xero to pull its socks up, and give us the functionality that every other package I have ever used has had.
Often we explain to the clients what they are doing wrong but the mistakes still happen on a large scale and it is a very time consuming process to reconcile.
We would find it very helpful to have a time widget showing at the top of the PM / Tax screens to remind staff that they have started the timer on jobs.
It is very easy to forget that you have the timer going as it is not constantly on the screen, and when this feature has been used on other programs, it has been found to increase productivity as staff are constantly reminded that they are time billing.
Please Disable Real-time search.
At least give me an option to disable real time search!
Everybody was screaming to have that issue long time ago.
It was bad enough that there were spaces in the TFN which have to be removed every time we enter them into the ATO portal.
Because Chinese inputs require a bit of time to write, the search field pulls up all the data regarding the first character I've typed.
Considering how purchase prices change with every order (usually) it might be more suitable to have average item cost rather than Cost Price with is entered for first time in the main inventory screen in Xero.
This message actually waste my time.
All this does is give me worry that if i don't waste time double check with the client administrator I could be held liable if it is a rel breech of the file.
Now I may have to delete 16 times and reinstate at a later time.
It wastes a long time when I log in on app.
I realise the icon goes blue on the summary screen but an email notifying would be really good as a prompt to not have to manually check each time.
This way I can group the P&L not only by account but also by any othe field at the same time.
This would save processing time of returns.
The way the contact name is only one cell now, leaves it open to enter first name then family name and another time family name then first name creating thus 2 records for same client.
My suggestion is perhaps that holding the shift key and then clicking on the drag grip of each row that you want to move at the same time would select the desired rows, and then you could drag the group of rows all at the same time to their destination.
Would it be possible for the leave aprovers to sight leave reports  so for example Approvers can check if employees have enough leave to cover time requested.
If other employees have requested leave at the some time and their is enough staff coverage,If other Approvers have approved leave (sick ) ect to make sure all leave is recorded.
In addition, it would be good if Xero forgot the information that was entered into the  field last time.
Even then they may repay some but not all deductions at the same time.
csv file, we are prompted with a default of "Tax Exclusive"We want Xero to provide an option to change this to "Tax Inclusive" as a default so that we don't have to change this manually every-time.
The only reason why we want this feature is because we currently do alot of importing to Xero on daily basis and if we forget to change this once, then this will import incorrect prices and we will end up wasting alot of time figuring out the errors.
but it would be helpful to have the print/export options on the top of the page rather than the bottom so that we don't have to page down each time.
It might seem a little trivial but it would be very helpful and time efficient.
At the moment every time we create a PDF return we have to unselect show TFN.
It would be great if you have some way of sorting this out - another 5 second time waste.
I would suggest a screen that shows all the billable items and allows you to check the items you want to change back to non billable all at one time.
With large client groups moving to Xero, we are now finding that the task of adding various users, with varying levels of access across a number of entities is becoming an overly onerous and time consuming task.
This means that no country or territory officially uses UTC as a local time.
When I email the purchase order from Xero, I can post it in there each time as that Character Limit bigger - which doesn't really make sense as it's the same screen linked.
If you are clicking on a transaction, 99% of the time you want to drill down into it.
I do a lot of entertaining but waste a considerable amount of time split the transaction 50/50 with deductible and non-deductible when using the mobile app.
Such a waste of time when we have so many changes each month on our invoicing.
Especially when you are remotely supporting someone - and this is an area you will spend a lot of time.
This is unnecessarily time consuming.
This would give a picture of amounts still owed by us when there has only been time or funds available to process only a part of payments due and ensure none are missed.
This would give the assistant manager a wider view of the progress, movement, action, and whereabouts of his team at any given time.
Unnecessarily time consuming.
This would save considerable data entry time.
and the session hasn't time out.
A real time saver.
Salaried employees and their managers tend to think of their time off in days rather than hours.
This information in turn assists in budgeting/ P&L analysis and third party information requests by confirm costs the real time.
If the above feature was implemented, this would save me a lot of time.
There have been a number of occasions when it would have been really useful to amend an error and save without committing to approve the whole expense claim (primarily due to time restrictions).
My suggestion is to set the time zone automatically based on the address entered.
To avoid delay in real time reporting, all transactions are entered even if no receipt/bill is yet available.
are the same and it would save time avoiding double entries.
A Print Theme box with a dropdown to select from a different Theme if required, showing on all stages of the document, would be a great time-saving addition.
Since I started using Xero, which I love, by the way, the actual cost to me has risen nearly 70% over the space of 5 years, even though your price has risen only once over that time period.
This would save time instead of having to open each transaction.
This change would save a lot of processing time as well as make life easier for non-accountants trying to process their own VAT.
This can take a huge amount of time when you have a few hundred of them!
Times this by 20 transactions in one sitting and 1 hour of your life is wasted, versus this is something that should/could be completed in 5 minutes of time.
I am talking about changing individual transactions’ info such as the category and notes on the fly without having to dive into each transaction one at a time.
It is more logical and it is way less time consuming.
At the moment, you have to remove the Date Lock dates, do whatever data entry is required (think year end journals) then reinstate the date lock - in that time frame, when the file is "unlocked", any advisor user could inadvertently make changes to prior periods.
It is possible to drag and drop into alphabetical order at the client level, but this adds a lot of extra time to preparing reports.
Or alternatively, I can unlock the prior periods and post up to 12 reversing journals to put the adjustment back into the current month as not to adjust prior month figures, which is risky and time consuming.
I still waste lots of small amounts of time always having to do custom and retype the dates manually
It would be convenient if Xero Asset Register will have the ability to dispose multiple fixed assets one at a time.
Once I click outside of that time entry box, it is hidden from view leaving no indication that a timer is running.
A lot of people go on overseas holidays for four to six weeks and this would provide a more realistic time frame (especially over Christmas).
Ideally once you attach the original document to the rule a copy would then be automatically sent to the library and then a copy attached to the transaction each time the rule is applied / used.
What a waste of time.
It would be a great time saver.
Why waste time developing that?
But if your existing customers keep asking for some fairly straightforward things should you really spend your time on developing for Apple Watch?
The allocations were completely haywire because the mapping was terrible, so this was going to be the most time consuming option.
This would save so much time.
Too time consuming otherwise
Some of our users forget to choose Client Address as it defaults to Tax Agent Address which results in additional admin time forwarding them to clients.
Something that is very time consuming when clients have put transactions in places they should not be.
Hope to see an adjustment in the near future as it would be a big time saver.
If the e. g. 41040 appears at the side rather than below, it would not cause any problem, and I would have more time to go to the beach.
The addition of a 'Custom Text' option in the 'Set Reference' popup would save me (and I'm sure many others) lots of time each week.
manually scrolling though each item is incredibly time consuming!
However, we have several people purchase items, several hundred a month, and many times do not take the photo at the time of receipt creation.
Unfortunately, the only way to get a photo subsequently, is to find the paper receipt later, take a photo, upload the photo to a computer, then upload the photo to a specific receipt, one at a time.
Terrible waste of time and not something one sees in the U. S.
If a note is removed that shouldn't have been, or is now required, it can be very time consuming putting it back in to extent that it can be quicker to start from the template again.
Surely it would be easier to send it to our contact list rather than having to manually enter each email address every time.
This would save me a huge amount of time exporting the information to excel, playing out my scenarios and then coming back to Xero to action it.
In that time, multiple statements may have arrived or the client is asking information about the supplier as to whether it is actually up to date or not.
This is essential as we strive to become a paperless accounting office saving time and resources.
This is laborious, time-wasting and prevents us (and others) moving forward.
It is extremely time consuming to get the batch balanced to the approved payments.
Presently, I have to spend a lot of time producing several manual remittances every month then draft separate emails to each supplier.
HIThis would be a particularly useful feature as it would save time going to the Tax Portal and downloading the data manually.
This simple feature will save loads of time.
Presently I am looking to import a large number of jobs and if I have to open up each job to enter then save the budget amount, this will take  a ridiculous amount of time to carry out what is considered to be a data entry task that could be eliminated by allowing us to import the budget amount.
At present it is located at the end of the document, and requires scrolling to bottom of page each time.
This would be such a time saving option.
This would be a great feature and save a lot of time.
It will save much time instead of opening every transaction, clicking "Edit", typing in the details, clicking "Update", returning to the main transaction list again, finding the page and place where you left off before.
It would be really helpful if you could book time to a job that wasn't in your job list.
I'm sure there are many customers and potential customersthat would find this a massive time saver.
Xero clearly can handle more than 1,000 items so why are we restricted to only 1,000 items at a time?
While eventually Xero may be robust enough to do all this efficiently in the system, for the time being the best solution is using our Excel model.
I can export massive files using your reports tool, but only 500 bills at a time?
At the present time we have to click in and open each transaction to see where it is coded to.
Would save me HEAPS of time when I try to run commission reports.
I have upwards of 150 po's and click through each one to see the reference takes time!
It also helps for financial planning tremendously int he native planning app knowing that X or Y dollars are going to invoiced in 30/60 or whatever time period.
It would save so much time.
That the "not being used" time out function be extended.
Either of these would save me much valued time each quarter.
I don't have time to open each draft item and apply a branding theme before approving the document.
This seems to be a lot of double entry work and time consuming.
It would save manually importing statements and save a lot of time for big Trade Me sellers using Xero.
After a certain amount of time Xero logs me out - which is fine.
I have nearly 2000 inventory items and it would be a great help if they all came up at the same time, rather than me having to scroll through 10 pages of items to find the one I'm looking for.
Of course, we can create our own custom format, but that takes time - why not offer an Alternate Standard Format for paperless payments?
If you are dealing with one issue at a time, this is usually ok, however last week I sent off 4 very similar requests before leaving for XeroCon and now can't directly relate the response to the entities (meaning I have to respond and check who belongs to which one).
Making the MOSS tax codes selectable in one hit rather that having to create a county tax code set up for each one at a time and look up the vat amounts etc.
One of the staff members has contacted me to say that the theme has been defaulting back to the dircetors theme every time he saves the purchase order.
Nobody has time for HTML fade transitions.
Nobody has time to click OK buttons for reconcile actions that already match.
It takes some time, but the productivity benefits are worth the effort.
But most of the time the quantity or amounts change.
This would save a lot of time.
Manually adjusting each imported item is very time consuming.
Also comment about this page - if you scroll to the bottom - and click in a field - the first time it always flicks you back up to the top of the page.
We all know the attention to detail required to keep Tracking correct and the time taken to sort out a client whose Tracking is in a mess.
At this time only one reply email address is possible
It is very time consuming to open one transaction at a time to check and fix the tax rate.
Clients still have to open each attachment separately and save them together in their systems - which means a lot of processing time, compared to opening/manipulating/saving one amalgamated PDF file.
Save me re-typing all the details every time.
fingers crossed as it would save me a heap of time.
hence most of the time my SOH is negative.
It is very time consuming.
It would save plenty of time for either manually making entries, or making entries at the time of reconciliation.
I would have to navigate into each transaction one at a time to see if it contains a split, making it virtually impossible to review my bookkeeper's work.
Each time I have to remember to set to account for Vlookup ability,  Show Cashflow with Non Operating Movements,  YTD, Incl GST etc etc.
DETAILS OF DUE BALANCE AND                                      VEHICLE NUMBER DELIVERY TIME AND DATE.
We only know about this upon reviewing the P&L or Balance Sheet next time.
This is a very time consuming exercise - is there any way this could be changed so that all late claims are bought in to the next available return even if the box was unticked previously?
I sometimes do more than one quote per customer at a time (ie: different options) and I seem to have to send them one at a time?
would cut the cash coding time down more!
But very time consuming for such intelligent software when you have more than 200 customers.
Every time I make on, I have to change it from Tax exclusive.
If a client wishes to be set up from the start with tracking it would be a considerable time saver if we could load conversion balances with tracking breakdown.
It is very time consuming and frustrating that you have to start all over again.
As my is given pro-rata by the time I get to October I will have plenty of leave.
The time it takes to replicate 90% of contact data each time is very slow and prone to error.
For me, this is huge waste of time and mental energy.
it is slow, time consuming and increadibly frustrating!
The overall approach to expense claims needs to be rethought, because in its current iteration expense claims are: 1) very time-consuming to create (no templating, or copying from past claims), 2) time-consuming to review (grid summary instead of opening each line one by one), 3) cannot be kicked back to users for corrections when not approved (workflow needs to allow for this possibility), 4) cannot be edited once approved.
I know I'm probably wasting my time asking.
To export to excel and the split it manually wastes a lot of time.
(Very helpful if you have multiple clients to enter)This would save you valuable time in data entry.
This is very time consuming and error prone.
Every time my client sends a remittance advice, they have to select the branding theme from "Unbranded" to their branded one.
Currently the system only produces the date and time of lodgement.
I then have to manually change this to the physical address each time.
which is very time consuming.
So no time saved.
It would also be great if you could increase/decrease the number of transactions displayed at a time.
There is no easy way to ensure at any given point in time (notes at the bottom of the page is useless), what the balance remaining on the PO, and therefore the contract, is.
Then at any given point in time you would see the amount still committed to be spent.
One client I have in particular needs to look at the monthly tracking categories often and so every time they view the profit and loss they have to setup it up for their specific settings.
Our firm uses ledgers for tax work which is making the 'My Xero' homepage very cluttered and time consuming to find files.
I have created groups however each time you navigate back to the homepage, all files are showing.
Every time I set up a ledger subscription, I have to get the subscriber to invite an adviser into the file.
9% of the time it'll be for 31 Dec 2013. .
Any payroll service without this is UNPROFESSIONAL AND IRRESPONSIBLE, not only due to the time wasted, but due to the federal and state tax notices and penalties that will surely result.
This would save a lot of time when processing high volumes of batch payments in one go.
That would save a *ton* of time when reconciling with the Cash Coding interface.
This is extremely time consuming in Xero as I have allocate each and every receipt manually against the income.
are the same and it would a) save time avoiding double entries andb) make it easier to export existing contacts in a mail program or CRM program (e. g. Salesforce) into Xero
Having to manually enter WFM job numbers into Xero is a waste of valuable time and resources.
It would save a lot of time in resolving this sequence.
we have 1000's of inventory items stored, so it is impossible to keep track of exactly much each item costs at any one time.
It is time consuming to have to go into the inventory section to update this whenever a price goes up, even if it is only by a few cents.
It would be an enormous help if Xero also supported 6-18 month financial years - as the workaround is to export all the financial data for both years and consolidate them, which is time consuming and untidy.
This is a useful feature of many other accounting software programmes, and it saves a lot of button pushing - time and aggravation.
It would be really helpful and more time efficient if there was an ability to change the 'tax rate' used, for example changing from GST Free to Input Taxed, on a transaction that has already been reconciled.
This is a very time consuming process: you have to click on the item, mark it as reconciled when the item window comes up, and then reload your list.
That feature might even help users in projecting cashflow over a period of time.
To be sure it's a bug, I tried to re-enter a test bill with the same information, this time I selected the Asset account right away, and then it did show up in my pending assets.
This adds an extra delay and tap to the Xero Touch login process as I have to select my own company every time I log in.
I hope trial balance(exported from "Adviser" menu)  contains opening balance as well as current balance at the same time during export in order to facilitate interface with other software( such as our working paper: caseware).
I find it quite time consuming to create spend and receive money each time in Xero.
Considering that these can have many transactions, thats a lot of wasted time (especially when you are 1 cent out!
This is extraordinary useful for capturing my "real terms" position as currency fluctuation is taken into consideration over time, but it's extremely unhelpful for gaining an actual position in the non-base currency.
so my time in the US keeps my financial position stable in Australian terms.
It would save time during the reconciliation process.
Not only would this save data entry time, it would also dramatically reduce the number of data entry errors.
For those who don't know 2FA is an additional layer of security on top of a username and password, whereby a one-time password is generated for the user to input with each session (or even per machine).
Every  time such an action was taken, a warning message in a red box would ask the user to confirm the delete.
It is impossible to remember to close down at the demo company every time.
It will also make the take on of clients quicker instead of having to change the tax names etc every time.
I can refresh manually - but this takes a while, but which time I've moved onto other things.
This would save a lot of time.
It'd save me a lot of time.
If they knew it had to be changed from a particular setting each time, then they would learn to do it each time.
This is not the first time this has happened.
Saves me a lot of time :)
This is a real time waster, especially when we deal with rural clients that have less than 1mbps internet speeds.
a lot of time wasted!
Again a lot of time wasted, why do I have to enter a description?
This will save time and oopses (mistakes) happening when processing.
I know this would save me a lot of time!
We are spending too much time going back to repair errors where an incorrect tracking code was accidentally entered.
Having to type this amount in each time is time consuming and pointless when Xero already knows how much it is likley to be (It tells me how much i am out by) and could enter it in for me.
I wish Xero had time billing.
However, this creates more work for us while it's supposed to save us time.
I feel there are more examples in this vein, but many times after you commit to an action you are taken to what may be logistically the correct ad-hoc page for that action but most of the time you are not on the page you really want to be on, more than likely you were taken away from a working page.
This would be a great little time saver!
Please either make them work or show them as black so we dont waste time clicking
This would be a really useful feature until full livestock trading account calculations are included in the software (which I am told will happen but some time off), however, I can think of numerous other examples of where this information would be helpful, particularly for management reporting.
This always wastes time.
These few features would save me loads of time when entering data.
when Xero times out (from an inactive period of time) it logs you out automatically and shows a login popup.
It'd be nice, on time out, if any screen layered behind the login popup was hidden / blurred / not visible (especially for those us in open plan offices).
The current tab + page system is a bit painful and I tend to spend a fair bit of time here during setup :-)
This is quite time consuming.
Holidays Act 2003, ss 19, 29-35 requires employers to give 14 days notice to take time using only their entitlement leave.
Hopefully this makes sense and a function that can be added (time/date stamp when submitted and data pulled from tick box of person selected to approve).
If you have an employee, who only works part time, when they come to book a days vacation in Xero the system takes their number of hours from their employment record and automatically divides it by 5 to get a daily rate.
We feel this cannot be rolled out to clients who have part time workers until this is addressed.
I am have many questions re payslips from the cleaners re what hours they have been paid for each day, having the ability to show daily hours on a payslip would save me admin time.
When an employee looks at a time off request they can see the # of hours requested.
Having a 'untick all' button would be such a time saver!
Is it possible to enter multiple timesheets at the one time instead of saving and closing each one individually then selecting the next employee.
It is quite time consuming.
I have full time staff who work on Saturdays and have a day off during the week.
I also have part time staff working 3 days per week.
This becomes an issue when entering time off.
Similarly, with part time staff, it seems to assume that they work their stated number of hours over a 5 day week which messes up time off requests as well.
The employees who work Public holidays get paid time and a half + accrue alternative holidays.
One for Ordinary time and one for Time and a half.
This would be even better if the time and a half hours worked on the Public Holiday (recorded in the time sheet) are carried through to the leave accruals.
I'm setting up payroll in Xero for our company and have taken a look at the employee time off settings - it's nearly perfect for us, but the approvals part is a bit too basic.
Currently, as we discussed, I am required to do a full input - time consuming for both myself and the employee.
Part time employees write their start and ending working times on a paper time sheet.
It would be best if the subcontractor could log on and enter the time directly, as an employee would do for a time sheet.
TIME RECORD:DateDayStandard Hours (or Rostered Hours or Agreed Hours)Start time  i. e. 9 amFinish time i. e. 5 pmLess: Lunch i. e. 30 minutesLess: Personal break taken during work hours ( we all do this sometimes ) i. e. 1 hour= Net hours worked ( automatically calculated)LEAVE ITEMS:Annual leave ( in hours )Personal/ Carer leave ( in hours )Other leave ( in hours )RDO taken ( in hours )TIL taken ( in hours )Actual hours to be paid for each day ( is equal to = Net hours worked + Total Leave Items)Then, compare ACTUAL HOURS TO BE PAID FOR EACH DAY vs. STANDARD HOURS/DAY, remembering that TIL accrues only for extra hours worked 30 minutes or more over standard hours.
This would be very good and save a lot ot time.
We accidentally overcharged employees for PTO taken (the days were already set up on the holiday calendar, and were automatically charged, and we also entered the days a second time, manually).
Can we have a wages payable box on the dashboard so that we have an up to date amount payable in wages based on the employee time sheets.
I have some 25 employees and the timesheet entry is time consuming and clunky.
It would be great if we could have the details of when people are taking time off as an iCal Feed.
For accountability of staff and to get a more in-depth account of our staffs movements it would be more beneficial if you could rearrange the time sheets format, so they could login at the start off the day write in their start time (morning tea is accounted for but could have an area to put times in as they may break at different times due to job requirements) a start and finish of lunch break and a finish time for the day.
We import timesheets from a time and attendance program, which allocates hours worked into the relevant category (bar, kitchen, admin etc).
Having the weeks in Xero aligned to Harvest (where weeks end on a Sunday) would make it much easier to transfer the time collected in Harvest.
Every step extra is time wasted.
Basically I am asking to make an EXISTING feature more widely available to save time.
I find the 'all time off' selection in Payroll Overview restricting.
It would be nice to select employees and view time off in a graphical format .
i. e. on a rolling 12 month calendar, therefore making it easier to identify employees with overlapping time off requests.
This is the second time I have entered this info regarding my queries, as I selected the preview button first time and all details in my query were lost?
Allow the payroll administrator to see and over ride the employee's time card that has not been submitted.
It could also be used for the time in lieu issues other users have been asking about.
This would save 4 clicks and the associated waiting time per employee.
Can we have an option when setting up an Employee to assign a timesheet template to them, so you don't have to load the template every time.
All because they picked up Saturday - Casual instead of Saturday - Part Time!
change of employment status - full time to part time, part time to full time, casual all important in long service, calculations, or in cases of Fair Work Claims etc.
That time of month comes around again and there doesn't seem to be a simple way to show who's slow in submitting their timesheet for the period.
If so I would love to be a beta tester or something when the time comes!
Wouldn't it be great if you could select to print superannuation reports as separate pages for each employee / fund at one time rather than having to do so individually one at a time.
When will employees have the ability to complete their own time sheets in their portal - then submit for approval to financial advisor or administrator?
Also a leave calendar would be useful so the employees and managers can see who has already scheduled leave at any point in time to assist the employees in planning their holidays and mangers in managing appropriate staffing levels.
We often get requests from employees to resend copies of their payslips in two different circumstances, both of which are difficult and time consuming to deal with in Xero:1.
As an example, for a client,  the permanent sunday rate is double time for overtime whereas for a casual it is 1.
All staffs can access their own roster to check their working hours online when Logging in/out of their time sheet from any computer with an internet access.
Currently, select one employee at a time and save as a PDF file to a folder on the desktop and then email payslips as an attachment.
Because it is really time consuming to do this one by one for change the payroll calender.
We sell cars from time to time to our landlord who owns the car yard.
I started out using QuickBooks for a very short time.
I am having a very hard time trying to get my expense reports to match.
Software is suppose to make the job a little more time efficient than adding to it.
Only seems to work every 30th time you try it.
It would be a great time saver.
A big time saver!
If I am sending a transfer from ANZ(a) to ANZ(b) by coding this transfer I should code it exactly as it is starting from where I did sent it other wise if I am coding it from ANZ(b) to ANZ(a) I will as well have a double up, and big companies don't remember necessarly each of they transactions or transfers, this could save lot of time if the coding for transfer was done in either direction and from ANZ(a) and/or ANZ(b) this should be recognize automatically.
I can repeat this every time.
When on the Account Transactions and very often when reviewing a clients work, many times have not been reconciled where the transactions have been imported in and having to do this manually one by one is very time consuming.
We had Google employee's in the thread, then a policy change must have come through, and now they are refusing to respond to nearly 100 users who have lost hours of time and money.
Every time the date is manually entered in the format , the result is returned in the format .
I have received a tax refund for the first time this year after completing my 2011/12 tax return.
We plan on using Xero in earnest from the start of our financial year in a few months, July 1st, so we have a bit of time to prepare.
Turns out for a while they couldn't - Mint in particular had a time getting support.
would save so much time.
It has actually added a significant amount of time to my day by having to hover over with the mouse, select and delete each line.
At that time, the PayPal balance was $451.
The only thing I can do is manually change the Dec-16 figures in Budget Manager myself which is so time consuming.
whereby you can send multiple receipts at the same time, same as you would emails.
Rather annoying having to check it every time we send.
When we were made aware of the situation we went through the uncomfortable process of contacting customers who were invoiced around the same time.
No time to read them so let me be lazy.
Time to check if it is still the best option.
We are a gymnastics club and are currently using a CRM that does not integrate with Xero, this has been very time consuming and results in alot of double handing of data.
Every time an error is displayed.
this is the second time in 1 week this has happened.
I'm finding it takes an excessive amount of time in Xero to record the cheques as received, especially compared to Quickbooks Desktop.
Adam Griffiths from dmca will take you through all there is to know about getting started on Xero, the leading cloud accounting software, so you can focus on doing what you LOVE and spend less time doing your books.
Unfortunately every Sage reseller we have spoken to has not heard of Xero, so it will be their first time doing this.
It takes quite a time to open each bill and edit the supplier name, resave, call up the next bill etc.
Are there time clock systems that link directly with Xero?
I want it to overwrite it, and dont want to waste time in the CSV file if it isnt going to see this is as the master file.
A bit silly and a waste of time really.
I have to refresh every time I log into xero and the go make a cup of tea, do some washing, read the paper and then maybe it has refreshed.
Please can I have an update on when this is likely to be in place - a year seems an inordinately long amount of time to wait.
It's time consuming and turning taking about 30 minutes extra than it should.
First of all - my apologies if this has been covered before, I've been looking for some time but haven't found anything.
Its making using Xero very time consuming.
I know how to upload CSV "statements": it is a painful, time consuming and error prone way to enter 1 or 2 lines each month.
Probably a minor gripe to most but very time consuming!
Would save heaps of time during billing.
then we've gone to run the sync a final time and keep getting an error that the limit has been exceeded.
This method should work but it will take too much time to go into individual claims to mark it off as paid.
I have been using XERO for the last couple of years and have been recommending them to clients for most of that time.
Larger practices would have to find this time consuming also?
If your last reconciliation is 30 December 2015 - that is what show as the "date" next time you are in the Reconciliation screen.
It would save so much time if there was a feature to upload an excel file prepared with all the fields populated into purchase or sale transactions.
I'm used to Oracle with has that facility and it saves so much time.
This means that I have to delete this every time I'm searching for a transaction older than this, or when i'm searching for a transaction I don't know the date of.
I'm not sure how much Xero would suffer with thousands of contacts to load & sort all the time,Not sure which way to go?
This is my first time on Xero after coming from QuickBooks.
I was starting to send documents to Outlook and then sending them on from there, but now it's taking such a long time to receive anything myself, I feel as though I am running out of options.
Now that tax time is here I discovered this all over again.
I am rather alarmed to see that the figures have changed over time.
Have other users experienced slow server response times i. e. having to wait some time (10-30 second range) for a page to load, save or change in the last 3 months?
Hello,I have successfully used conversion balances before but now, tax-time of course, the balance sheet for YE 2014, which should be created from conversion balances, is all out of whack.
Reference:  input at time of rec.
Description:  input at time of rec.
The last time it refreshed was 2 days ago.
This would save a lot of time clicking to open the documents each time.
Is there indeed some process time limit in operation set at roughly 2 minutes ?
Even though it doesn't make much difference, it's very annoying that our previous employee's name comes up every time we log in.
Time consuming having to put in the slashes.
Anyone ordering for the first time is automatically put onto a list.
However a lot of the time the amount needs to be split between the 3 divisions, and by different percentages eg.
It has been out for a long time (previous accountant).
I could upload them all as manual journals but that can only be done 300 at a time.
However, when trying to reconcile, Xero tries to match paypal transactions without any rhyme or reason (including adding random names as a description) and it takes an inordinate amount of time to correct these.
It has cost me hours of bookkeeping time trying to figure out why my numbers don't match until I figure out it was changing the dates.
1 leave time was already showing on the payslip.
As it is, the re-reconciliation is an unnecessarily time consuming task.
We make test transactions on our clients ecommerce websites from time to time.
From time to time the client will refund the money to us before we have invoiced it.
We host a tree planting and eco-education festival in Zambia the same time each year.
00 -- Entertainment (non deductible) -- GST inclObviously this means that each time I have to go in, manually type $6 into the second line, then go back out and reconcile.
If one already exists, please link me to directly, it so I don't waste anyone's time.
So that any time I generate a P&L per program, I can see that each program gets a piece of the operating expenses.
Doing this dozens of time each month, every little bit helps.
I have attempted to enter the information three times but each time Xero returns an error message stating "Directors End Date needs to be entered".
I have some jobs from came from QB that have time allotted to them.
The feature in myob was a massive time saver for us.
This happens all of the time and I have, to date, made adjustments, but as I grow that will not be possible.
We didn't know this at the time so as far as eBay was concerned, there was no VAT.
Then these can be daily posted and also to have the possibility to map when they should be posted next time.
Thus all the special edits pertinent to a particular client  eg particular reporting % entered could be reused saving time.
I've tried a few times, and every time I import a .
First time user so still learning what xero does :-)ThanksJo
The date field is divided into three sections - day, date and year - and only one section can be active at a time, which makes it impossible to paste in a complete date.
I think the addition of this small feature would save a lot of time when recording journals.
I have to deliver reports such as my balance sheet for time periods that are not the end of the month.
So the long and short of it, is that our efforts if anything are promoting Xero every time we do a demo.
Has anyone noticed a change in the Session Time Out?
At present I have to go to Account transactions, open up the transaction and then upload the remittance slip which is time consuming.
If I delete anyway I end up with hoards of unreconciled transactions in that can only be 'removed and redone' 200 at a time (or usually less as Xero times out).
Having to go through two or three windows to make sure every transaction has an attachment can take a lot of time.
Hello,I'm a first-time businessman.
I am using this for the first time and probably I am used in a different accounting system.
Real time saver.
We're having a tough time with Xero - trawling the forums before we move elsewhere.
I have to do this all the time.
It is time consuming to have to enter the Payee and Ledger code to each transaction.
If their name popped up as you type it in it would save a lot of time and hassle.
I have accidentally reconciled an incorrect 'receive money' and every time I try to delete the transaction it comes up with Error 500.
I'm setting up Xero for the first time, and so far I have most of the historical data in place .
I have been working with computers for over thirty years and I also understand accounting quite well as I am a CPA and have been in practice for almost the same amount of time.
So I had to archive the customers (200 at a time!
And then restored my archived customer contacts (200 at a time!
Time sheets3.
Is this the case all the time, or was it down to my trial?
The only way I can see is to do these one at a time.
"2) Manually type a bill in in the Purchases > Bills each time.
Say for example i make a sale on June 1st at 2am, paypal records this as the correct date and time however this will get recorded in Xero as a sale coming in on May 31st.
Can anyone give me an applicable solution in a more timely fashion (xero support for us in the UK takes a LONG time! )
At the same time, this transaction must not show that the customer still owes us $100.
This strikes me as a bit of a waste of time.
Sorry, I have only been using Xero a few months and this is the first time this situation has presented.
they basically have not updated it in a very long time.
The current method is very time consuming.
This lets copy and paste save lots of time.
2) Will the time sheet automatically pick up on leave (having a quick test, I can't see it doing this).
Seems to calculate everyone as full time only.
Has anyone found a way to both record additional hours worked under flexible working arrangements, and record accrued time taken, preferably via Xero timesheets?
0/PayRunsDate (UTC):12/6/2016 8:55:25 AMUser Agent:Xero Payroll API - DataSavvyUser Agent:500 InternalServerErrorAccess Token:JV••••••••••••••••••••••••••6YResponse Time:149930 msXero Organisation:dh Appointments Queensland Pty LtdRequest Message<?
We started the payroll at 8:30 UK time and encountered this error all day.
At 6pm UK time the system seemed to return to normal, was there any maintenance been run on the system that would cause this?
I have two workers that work as permanent part time.
It is the first time I try to set this up.
Is there a way to approve the Christmas Break leave for all employees at once (For those Eligible), or do you have to enter it individually for each employee, which is very time consuming with large payrolls?
Now every time I visit the timesheet screen, these search criteria appear as a default instead of showing all timesheets awaiting approval.
Also, a rate setup for double time should be used for overtime after a certain number of hours worked, rather than the rate setup for time and a half.
Example: Jim has been working for Company A for 14 months, he hasn't had any time off for personal/carers leave, he gets sick and needs 3 days off so his personal leave balance should reflect 53.
HiIs there a way to display "Sick Leave" and "Time-in-Lieu" remaining balances on the My Payroll employee dashboard?
Going in and out of the time sheets to check them is very time consuming
Is it possible to get managers to approve time sheets for the group they are assigned to?
However, the two pays that occurred during the month changeover period did have HELP deductions at the time.
Tax appears to be the only thing I found that gets reset to the current Employee Tax tab settings rather than retaining what was deducted at the time.
I have set up an employee, but made an error and have approved 3 time sheets which show incorrect hours.
Rather than having to go in on a regular basis and approve it all the time.
She has taken more annual leave than she will have accrued by the time she goes on unpaid leave.
I found a discussion on this subject yesterday, but had no time to go through it all.
I am certain it was under AU Payroll "leave on ordinary time earnings"Can anyone point me in the right direction pleaseET
I was considering setting up a paid Maternity Leave at the same time (even though we don't have any employees that apply) to be prepared for the future, but with how often the Govt.
I think Xero changed something in Payroll about this time which i missed initially and had to go back and alter.
Hi we have Full time staff, Part time staff, and Casuals, When doing time sheets I dont know which they are on , only by going into there Card, Which is very time consuming  when you have a lot of staff ,  So when Pubic holiday s come around , I dont know who get paid Holiday pay and who dont , IS there any way this can come up in the Time sheetsThanks Eileen
As public holidays should be treated as normal/ordinary hours for full-time/permanent employees should these employees be paid for 10 hours when a public holiday falls on a Monday
(he took time off this year to go to a funeral so I put it down as paid compassionate leave).
I run a restaurant with numerous casual staff, and they cannot be trusted to submit their timesheets on time.
It would be very useful if managers could be given access to only time sheets of designated employees.
We have a Full Time employee who has resigned as of yesterday and been paid out, but will actually now be re-employed as a Casual employee.
I then created an earnings line being the following:Earning's Name : 'Uniform Allowance - Full Time'Earning's Category : AllowanceRate Type : Fixed AmountAmount : $4.
com/au/PayrollSubmitTimesheets$TimeUnitsHere's the content if you don't want to click the link------------------------------------------------------------------Earnings rates must have same time units as ordinary earnings rateIn Payroll Settings, you may have set up earnings rates using different units of time ('Type of Units' on the earnings rate screen).
Our full time employees work 8 hours days from which 0.
The employees complete a timesheet and it is used to do payroll and also to on-bill their time to the clients.
SCENARIO: Some of our employees' employment status have been converted from Casual to Part Time starting 01 March 2015.
This is the first time FBT is applicable for our client Kind Regards,Ashik Thomas
At present, I don't accrue sick leave because I don't want it on the payslips, so when part-time employees take sick leave I have to manually check they have sufficient accrued leave and then the leave will appear as a negative balance on their summary page and is shown in summation to the annual leave entitlement.
What effect does this have on the time sheets then?
5hrs in the fortnight as a part time employee.
The leave is calculated on this time to be approx.
We have come across from MYOB where we would manually deduct annual leave hours from the employee card file each time a director took leave, for employees this was no problem.
I have a part time employee that works 4 and a half hours a day.
We have had a full time employee on WorkCover and his annual leave has generated incorrectly as he is not entitled to Annual Leave whilst on a claim.
This is for full-time employees, working 38hrs / week, 20 days annual leave / year.
One thing I'm struggling with is catching up my Full time employees in payroll.
40-50 employees per week across four departments with a mix of both causal and full time employees, including juniors under 18 years who don't receive super unless they work more than 30 hours per week, with commissions and bonuses paid on top on an ad-hoc basis).
I worked through the payroll setup process a second time, but can't see what I have missed.
They are full-time permanent and entitled to Annual and Sick leave.
I have an employee who works part time 38 weeks of the year and takes 12 weeks of annual leave which is mostly unpaid.
I think it is strange that, at the time I approve leave requests, I can't schedule them simply and easily.
3333 hours per month for a full time employee).
Leave calculations for part-time employees are also wrong.
Xero assumes that a part-time employee works the same number of hours every weekday (e. g. someone working 20 hours a week works 4 hours every day Monday to Friday).
In reality part-time employees may work a different number of hours different days of the week and don’t necessarily work every day of the week.
We have a casual employee who has now become a full time employee.
I have recently setup a Time In Lieu Leave Type.
This is a huge disappointment because employee entered time sheets were one of the things that brought me to xero.
We have no payroll for that time.
For the year 2015 there was an error on Xero's part and it took me more than 90 days and 15 hours of time to resolve with the CA EDD and CA FTB.
Is there any way to link a certain Earnings Type to a certain Time Off accrual type?
2) Time off tracking does not allow for specific date of month accruals.
For example, our vacation and sick time is accrued on the last day of each month.
Does XERO offer where employees can check in and check out for the time worked for payroll purpose?
Gusto (previously ZenPayroll) automatically synchronizes with Xero each time we run the payroll.
I tried using the time sheet, however, it was confusing since the format of the dates cannot be changed.
First of all, I'm a former Quickbooks user, in fact I was a Pro-Advisor at one time.
If this is something you think you can help with let me know so we can have a quick chat at a time that suits.
We have employees who are salaried, paid OT and work part time hours, XERO seems to hate this.
This is time consuming and questions the creditibility of the actual payroll figures with staff.
I have set up NEST with all my eligible workers - but when I run a payroll it omits nest payments from two employees - I have gone over and over the information and cannot see how their records differ from others - but each time I try and run payroll nothing is deducted for NEST from the same two people - can anyone help?
In sage I showed this as a separate line under the deduction side as 'unpaid time off' and it was deducted from their gross earnings before tax was calculated.
However, I don't approve her timesheets because they are incomplete at the time I run the payroll, i. e. not the end of the month, and don't want her to be unable to complete it.
07% of the earnings to their 'holiday fund' which staff can see on their payslips and draw from when they take time of.
Can anyone help as I am rapidly running out of time and have had no response form Xero help yet!
From advice I've read on Xero, it says to ensure that outstanding holidays are filed as usual time off requests and put in before the end of employment date.
e. g. If she was to mainly only take Saturdays & Thursdays off, she's not getting as much time off as she would if she took Mondays or Tuesdays off.
I'm in charge of a pub and within that we have a number of part time staff who work different hours every week.
A great addition to timesheets would be to allow employees to select time started and time finished.
As well as the amount of break time/lunch time taken.
I have sent off a support request, but turnaround time seems to be 4 days at the moment, so I wonder if anyone else can help?
We can only see how to do a time sheet for the present/future.
So I tried a third time.
I had tried to set this up by adding a Time Off under the Employee > Time Off section, however it asks for number of hours they were off (some work 37.
Is there a time sheet facility on xero?
Last month they had 2 days holiday, which was entered via the time off section, xero decremented the remaining balance correctly.
And after reading some other posts on this forum I'm now worried that I'm at the beginning of a total nightmare where I'll be tossed in between HMRC and Xero both blaming eachother and me wasting days and days of my time.
Nevertheless I have done so 3 times and after 30+ min being on hold each time, I was told that there is a problem with submissions from our Payroll software and the onus is on us to ensure the software is submitting the correct figures.
Incorrect Employment Allowance calculations have caused endless problems and wasted time with Xero support even archiving codes.
Our employees annual leave entitlement includes public holidays - how do we show this on their payslip and reflect it in their leave balance -  as they don't request time off for public holidays.
Hello everyoneWe have done our payroll on Xero for the first time in April 2015.
How do I change the time off to "Paid Sick Leave"?
I have set it up on the time off area of settings.
It would save me heaps of time.
An employee is having to take time off to nurse a very sick child (will be a while before he returns) and i am trying to sort out what exactly we owe him.
25 gross ordinary time and $314.
I have spent a lot of time on this and at this rate I am very disappointed with Xero's payroll system.
We are looking at setting up Workflowmax for our time sheet and a way of recording mileage (currently such a manual process).
First time to read the overview on  timesheets.
Do we submit a leave application each time for the accrued amount?
)However, on the employees payslip it shows each line entry as "ordinary time".
Less mistakes, less time.
Resource scheduling, time tracking, CRM and invoicing.
Start saving time and money.
Save time & get accurate data.
One integrated platform to streamline your Expense Claim, Receipt, Time Off & Timesheet management and much more.
Save time by letting Zapier copy your data between 500+ of your favorite apps.
Paypr helps you get real-time receipts on your phone, whenever you make a purchase on the Paymark network.
Scheduling & time clock software designed for hourly employees.
A work schedule build and time clock that will cure your headaches.
With Infusionsoft's customizable bidirectional sync to Xero, save more time and get better insights from lead source tracking to transactions to customers follow-up.
If you are a user of Xero and Fishbowl Time & Labor, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Fuseboard integrates seamlessly with Xero to save time and make life easier!
Leading expenses management software provider helping companies save time and money with an automated, fully-mobile solution to manage employee expenses.
Powerful time sheet management in the Cloud.
Eliminate time consuming spreadsheets.
Gain accurate financials near real time.
Save time and email more customers.
The intelligent mobile app that tracks employee time.
Know when and where your team is working and drive efficiency with real-time reporting.
Reconcile Amazon settlements down to the the cent every time you get paid.
If you are a user of Xero and Time Tracker by EndGame, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Saves time, money and paperwork.
If you are a user of Xero and Time Tracker, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Time and expense tracking for law firms.
Track time from anywhere with pre-loaded ABA codes.
Easy, automatic time tracking and invoicing app.
A time management tool offering detailed and customizable task insights for data driven teams.
IODM provides a workflow to automate the entire AR cycle, helping you monitor and collect receivables, improve cash flow and reduce time & cost.
Save time and money on your international foreign currency payments.
Chrometa captures every minute of your time as you work on your PC and/or Mac.
Real-time order importing.
Practice management, time & billing and client collaboration for small to mid-sized law firms.
Costed rostering with penalty rates, online TFN & Super declarations, biometric time & attendance.
Dispatch software that connects you with your field workers, providing real-time updates on workers, work status & pending jobs.
PaysOnline Managed Payroll Solution integrates with Xero to provide businesses with a comprehensive payroll, HR, Time and Attendance and Rostering Solution.
Track time smarter - log time on the go or in the office, real-time monitoring & reporting and easy invoicing integrated with Xero.
The complete Legal Practice Management system with a workflow DNA, including matter files, document assembly, time-billing, trust accounting and more.
Real-time booking management system for activity, tour & hospitality businesses - accept bookings on your own website, check out .
Real-time information and monitoring from Xero combined with social media, CRM, analytics & lots more.
Simple time tracking, powerful reporting, and quick invoicing.
Manage rostering, time clock attendance & award interpretation with Xero payroll.
KPIs, Scenarios, automated reports, and more give powerful, instant insights that expand your services, strengthen clients, and save you time.
Get paid quicker and save time with data entry.
Possibly with time calculated for you.
So far, workflow has saved me a ton of time on my billing and time tracking, particularly once I adjusted my own workflow to fit the tool.
very time consuming.
This would be a greate time save with e. g. Microsoft and other suppliers who do not email a pdf for your monthly billing and would speed up data capture.
The ideal workflow would be something like this:- Quote for project in Xero- Quote accepted in Xero- Job automatically created in Project Management Software upon the Quote being accepted in Xero- Project workflow, schedule and tasks are developed in Project Management Software once this job has been created- Tasks, schedules, due dates and deliverables are assigned to team members (ideally they could maybe be integrated into our existing Google Calendar and Todoist - although a good To-do List withing the software would be fine)- Time is recorded and tracked in Project Management Software in a relatively automated way by tracking the time in software and dependent upon with project is open within that software- Tasks, jobs and due dates can be adjusted dynamically to update schedules and tasks as they are needed- Tasks can be completed, tracked and reported upon from Project Management Software to see how much time is taken, if we're on budget, etcIt would ideally also have good mobile apps and be fully compatible with both PCs and Macs.
PS: The Job Card, would hold all information related to the client and the job/project required (e. g. : OHS, Technical Details, Change Requests, Time Sheets, Basic Prj Mangnt, Drawing Issue Control, Issues Arrising, Commisisiong Details, etc, etc)Can anyone recommend an App or 2 for us to look at?
They see only the time entries for their project and they can approve those.
Is there a free app that allows staff to clock on & off when they come and leave work and the time updated to Xero timesheet for payroll?
I am using Harvest to track all billable expenses and time for clients.
So can Xero advise me how to fix this so this integration works and saves times rather than doubles my time doing a VAT return?
The goods stay on site in over 100 locations and the time period is unknown.
No way is that a time friendly option!
We are a construction company with approx 75 wages paid site staff over anything up to 10 locations at a time.
Looking for beta testers for an online roster and work schedule application with integration to Xero time sheets; check it out at .
At the same time I sell shoes in my office (cash and credit/debit card machine).
The goal is to to reduce the amount of time spent making purchases and keeping track of inventory.
So the Jeweller writes Job Number, store description, time taken, metal used (gms) and gemstones or other materials.
In WFM, we create jobs, and tasks; and assign our employees to those jobs so they can log their time.
co. nz/workflowmax-trav-xero-basic-workflow-setup/The client brief was to replace the current manual invoicing/project system and give their mobile users ability to record time and materials onsite.
We have 19 printing stations around the world who will print and post your word document addressed to your Xero contacts saving you time and money.
Alternatively I could have my accountant produce some but I want to spend time altering figures, looking at different scenarios etc.
EASEEsell save hours in processing time, removes data entry errors and enhances contract compliance for B2B users.
I'm looking for a cloud based CRM that connects to xero and does time tracking and jobs.
they are too feature rich, time consuming and expensive for my needs.
"I have found that the integration between LEAP & Xero has saved me so much time in my practice, less time on finance admin means I have more time for my clients - which is better for everyone! "
Part of maintaining a positive cash flow is making sure you get paid what you are owed on time, and in full.
So we’ve compiled a handful of staggering stats based on our customers and external research to show you how much money and time you spend chasing payments.
However, where I spend most of my time is producing reports.
This will save me so much time and accuracy.
We have 2 part time persons who are on hrly wages and have various work hrs.
and most importantly would they all share the same data real time?
I notice that, at time of writing, there are two obvious opportunities to sync between Xero and WHMCS (www.
We capture cost of material, subcontractors and effort (time sheet).
We want the loyalty program to collect points for each customer record, to a predetermined threashold, then issue a voucher via our thermal printer to give to the customer for next time.
I'm interested in doing timesheets mostly through some Xero addon to simplify that process, but I notice some addons seem to also do project time management and planning as well.
This has been talked about for some time but Xero has no plans to change it.
Also, it would be great if we can have a time delay on the email system.
That's a lot of printing and costly labour time I imagine.
No more wasting my time please.
This is the third time that I'm going to do a manual payrun for the reason that: "There was an error creating the Payslips at organisation Hotel Space.
No timesheets were exported at this time. "
Please get in touch asap as this is time sensitive.
You are going to have a hell of a time keeping customers and growing if you cannot support your technology.
Over the years, I seem to have spent so much of my time debugging and unofficially beta-testing the less robust bits of Xero's software.
I have 20 people to get through this - which is a bone of contention every time it comes around as no other software provider expects its users to do so in such a spoon-fed way.
Our company deals with other similar organisations and the turn around time is far less.
I have now emailed Xero about this 3 times, and I have had no response, waiting 24 hours each time for a response.
Error code: 500First time Xero has failed me.
This makes it really easy to look back at ad-hoc pricing and see what your cost prices were, and the mark-ups you applied at that time.
Time consuming.
Support clearly didn't listen to the fact that I indicated the transactions were there the first time.
I signed up to Xero to save time and not waste time.
The last thing I want to do is waste my time with frivolous support issues.
Why would I employ a book-keeper so that I can spend my time on routine enquiries?
number is # CX0003424694Can you kindly stop wasting our time and get it done?
This week on Monday I got email :"I apologise for the time it has taken for us to reply to you.
This is my first time using your product and I am as simple as it gets sole trader wise.
Why were the contributions not disbursed on the same day from Click Super and if there is a problem with a contribution why does not Click super contact me via Xero and/or directly to ensure details are correctThis is creating more work and I have a problem with Click Super holding onto my employees contributions for a long period of time without contacting me.
It also needs to be clicked on a second time after the skip.
This issue was raised a long time ago and NOTHING has been done!
The first time was more than 48 hours ago and have received zero response.
Payroll issue has been dragging out - now into 4th week; was promised update at the start of this week, particularly estimate of time to fix bearing in mind RTI and end of PAYE month is right upon us.
They were all setup at the same time.
Now i have to export to excel and cut and past my annual budget in each time I submit an income statement to clients.
You can make your feeds more intelligent over time.
it is frustrating and very very time consuming.
Each time the drag and drop feature is used the previous transaction has the photo attached to it as well even though it has been saved?
This is a great feature that saves me lots of time (e. g. , not having to search for suburbs and post codes) so when it isn't working it's very frustrating.
More often it is easier and quicker with a 2 minute call as oppossed to emailing and waiting an eternity for a response to the question rather than the automated message "WE ARE BUSIER THAN NORMAL TRY THIS" gosh another link to waste more time on.
A common example is the file attachment listing, it's slow enough to render every time that's it's noticable.
So we have now had both of our company directors, our accountant (which we are paying or his time) and myself all trying to solve what seems to be a VERY SIMPLE problem.
the first issue i had was because of bad programming left me unable to reconcile 6000 transactions before an audit, costing me &#163;4000 due to a missed appointment, excluding time trying to cobble things together, and all i got back was, we're sorry, itll take about a week for the issue to be rectified when we release our next patch.
I have two small start-up's both with Xero software, cannot afford time delays, very tempted to switch.
I would find this function very time saving.
Since xero does not have true keyboard shortcuts this feature is a big time saver.
I wasted a lot of time.
My point is it would be Excellent if you acknowledged problems with the best advice you can offer at the time.
When I have time to actually read your instructions on how your programmes work I will come back to you about any small things that could be improved but until such time I will correct my errors and enjoy Xero.
0 UI coming any time down the road.
It also takes 5-10 minutes to refresh each time, for each account.
Overall using your service has cost me time and money.
I have been a critic of Xero's atitude to fixing small but important issues, and this time finally it seems that a few irritating quirks have been done.
Find out what time that is for you - We expect to be offline for up to 1 hour.
A standard timesheet will allow us to enter in standard hours for a part time employee so that if a leave form is entered, xero knows how many hours to allocate for that day.
The standard time sheet would apply to all payruns and work in the back ground.
A payrun time sheet would not have to be completed every week.
Time to escalate this issue and get it resolved Xero!
There is no easy way to ensure at any given point in time (notes at the bottom of the page is useless), what the balance remaining on the PO, and therefore the contract, is.
I can this time lag be narrowed, hourly or less would be marvellous.
I wanted to capture the experience here in case it saves anyone else some time and frustration, and to highlight some issues to the Xero developers.
and we'll work out a time that suits.
This has happened on multiple occasions, and the computer has been restarted once or twice during this time.
would have saved me a lot of time and frustration.
I could have saved myself a lot of time and aggravation.
Has Xero or anyone been recording/analyzing the:* Amount of Voting* Time of Life of a Request* Time of Life per Activity Stage or a Request* Completion Time for Requests* # of Requests with Votes that Never Change Statusetc.
I'm not the only one saying it, but it appears more time, money and energy is being spent on marketing than in development.
Generally Xero is time consuming (except reconciliations), poor UI for quick glance info and some basic reporting, missing basic features that are part of nearly ALL other desktop and online competitors.
So many small but crucial features are not there, are not suitable, time costly or faulty.
Each time I launch the app I have to enter my email address and password.
This takes time particularly if I only want to quickly snap a pic of a receipt.
Real time software requires real time issue resolution.
##### CLUSTER 26 #####
There are many large unfiled amounts on the Report.
I added employees to allow them submit expense report, but not view other critical info.
A report that shows date of entry and transaction date.
As a user, I want to select a date range of "all" on reports, so that I can easily and quickly view all transactions within a report type.
We have a problem where, on the P&L report, our COGS are way to low.
- But we have no no "Adviser" links on All report link.
We've also tried to manually  create report pack template according to this guide:https://help.
Copy and modify an existing report pack template2.
I have print out of the reconciliation throughout the year evidencing the statement balance matched the Xero reconciliation report.
However the auditors have been in and have been looking at the reconciliation through the 'All Reports' > 'Reconciliation Report'.
Using this report the statement balance doesn't match on ANY of the months and the difference is different each month!
Thirdly, how do I report this on Xero to prevent it from messing up the UK VAT return.
I was using a report to take data and put into excel for coding purposes.
For example I can't see INV-0011 to INV-0019 on the report.
When I run a report for the Trial Balance as of April 30, 2017 - it doesn't match my conversion balance.
Similar report style to all medium and large companies.
3) When I run the expense claim detail report, will it only show expenses that have been approved and paid?
68Total cost of Goods Sold (in the report on xero):£20.
this doesn't exist in the report section.
my pervious software had this report and I am wondering why its not available in Xero.
This should be a standard report for accounting software in my opinion.
This means that my P&L report is not accurate.
I can see the filed return but only have an option to export the report.
The GST reconciliation report has been found by my team to contain errors.
Example:VAT reconcilliation reportInv 1 - R300    31/1/16Inv 2 - R400    31/1/16Inv 3 - R500    31/1/16Inv 5 - R1000  31/1/16Total R2200I click submit report for VAT and it then removes them from the report listing.
It would be great to have a reconcilliation report function as decribed above, as numerous other software packages have similar functions.
My tax software allows me to import a trial balance report for the tax year.
Xero only lets me run a report for a month.
It is painful having to run a separate report to get a at these numbers to key to my AP software.
Can i see all transactions on one report sheet for this one customer ?
What is the best reporting option to display ALL (tracked) costs (payroll, purchases, expenses) for each tracking category (so in tracking category order, then GL code order - not the other way round) and then is there a way Xero can produce the bill, or a report for producing the bill from, where a margin may be required on the costs?
Is there currently a report?
I have run the report for income by contact report.
The income by contact report is higher in both years.
The post indicates that the receivables and payables report is found within the summary report, but I can't  find it.
By default the P & L report shows before-VAT figures, correct?
Is it possible to run a P&L or budget varianace report which shows two budgets side byside against the actuals?
The ledger and the audit report to agree2.
The VAT amount in the audit report to be 14% of the gross amount.
I have already tried to upload this via the financial statement and tax report tab however it does not a) show the work I have completed so far within the excel spreadsheet andb) allow me to manually edit this as I go along.
If I run an Aged Receivables report on September 1, the date of the report defaults to September.
My suggestion would be to either select the required date/date range before reports run, or have three options in Financial Settings where you could select a Default Report Date as -1.
The NZ Charities Reporting regulations have changed, and all Registered Charities must report using the Tier 3 PBE Report Template.
Then closing balance at the bottom (retrieved from Aged Receivables report)So the closing balance should be the opening balance + all activity.
and run Job Transaction report with Xero?
how will this reflect on our report we are about to file in the coming days?
I guess XXX should show up on a balance sheet, and YYY on a P+L report?
The P&L report only seems to show movement on each account, so it won't show the brought forward cash funds balance.
when do the inventory adjustment (increase,decrease), we were wrong in select an account on the Adjustment Account, we selected Cost Account, which will affect the profit and loss report.
These receipts were then marked as reconciled using the Reconciliation Report 'show transaction' 'mark as reconciled' option.
Is there a report that I can run to show payments made by this method?
I have taken over a bookkeeping job on Xero and I have a difference between my VAT report and the trial balance.
The problem I have is that the report does not balance to the TB.
Upon examining the VAT Reconciliation report I have an "unfiled" amount.
Is it possible to set up a report in Xero that will show my final profit, minus tax liabilities?
Every application I've used in the past has had a 'summary report' or a 'detailed report' and it would appear Xero only have the detailed version which means the report takes AGES to run.
01 will not appear on every report?
Also these reports include receivable overpayments as well although at least one can see them on the report so they can be excluded after exporting to Excel.
Has anyone else noticed that if they were to report exactly as per the reports Xero compiles re Activity Statements that they are providing misleading and inaccurate figures to the ATO?
I can bring up an "owners equity" report, but how do I track equity for multiple partners with different contributions and ownership percentages.
As a side-note it's disappointing to see that Xero provides no way to submit a bug report directly.
The problem I have is that only 5 of the fixed categories are showing up in the Fixed Asset Reconciliation Report.
I would love to have P&L Compare Income and Compare Expenses report combined.
Maybe it is my system, I'm using Excel 2003, and I can't export the results of the Account Transactions report to Excel ?
I've tried creating a custom report, but the liability entries aren't even displayed.
Anything in the works for a Cash Flow report that populates from your AR, Quotes, AP and Purchase orders?
A comparative trial balance is a basic but essential report that should be available as simply as it is printing a profit & loss.
Has anyone used the Shareholder Current Account report from the Xero company report template?
Can you go into a transaction to change it, then go back to the report in the same place you left it?
(although they do show under the 'No VAT' section of the VAT Audit report)?
So is the report pack templates that Xero created are compliance to accounting standard?
I feel that the gst report has to much detail.
The current inventory report in xero is per inventory item, it doesn't allow me to filter by project (tracking item) and show the items acquired per project.
Please tell me an easy report is possible?
There have been changes in Xero which permit reports based on tracking information in the receivables and payables report.
00 balances in  field in the report.
I then mark up any changes I want, then go back to the report online to make any such changes.
I don't understand why, after I've edited an entry, it doesn't automatically go back to the Detailed Account Transaction Report?
So we can run a consolidated report on multiple tracking options?
Is the above report a Beta report and will it be upgraded as comments come in?
Management want to report and monitor performance of each location separately through Xero.
At the moment you can on select one ledger account to do a report of all transactions allocated to a tracking code.
Then when I go to reconcile my account the following months, transactions are appearing on the Reconciliation Report as unreconciled from previous months, where I know that they were reconciled.
Now I've got to the EOFY and I check the Report|Depreciation Schedule and the asset appears to have been depreciated over the 12 months; the "Less Accumulated Depreciation" fixed asset account is equal to roughly 25% of the purchase price of the asset - BUT there's no expense showing in my depreciation expense account on the Profit and Loss Statement.
Running a standard budget variance results in a report that runs from 1 May to 31 May.
I'm about to do my first VAT return and I'm wondering how to get Xero to report VAT purchases before this first period.
This appears to be because the GL report isn't picking up opening balances from the previous year end.
PS  - We report GST on Cash basis incase thats relevant.
There does not seem to be a report available which will be frustrating for them.
I was expecting for it NOT to appear in the vat return report at all.
Going all the way back to August 2012 in a reconciliation report in xero it shows that the closing balance between Aug 1 2012 and Aug 31 2012 is $6.
Archiving doesn't help, as the amounts still show in the report.
or are xero about to release this fairly basic accounting report that is required for proper trust accounting?
After doing this the "aged receivables" report shows the invoiced clients "Total" column to be $10,295, Paid and Credited is 0.
2nd question - How do you categorize items so you can run a report at year end to do taxes.
This gain makes its way into the profit and loss report and sits in the operating expenses as an income.
On my journal report I now have the following:Account             Debit             CreditBank Acc.
I can't find an audit trial report, or anyway of bring back deleted data.
In the Executive Summary report the very last ratio is Term Assets to Liabilities ratio.
because although X is an income account (and it could be a product too) there doeesn't seem to be a report that shows this.
I am looking for a means to create a profit and loss report per client.
80When I run the P&L report it only shows the cost without VAT but I would be expecting to see the whole cost.
I have also checked a report which shows that they have partnered with MYOB, Intuit, Sage etc to run their trial.
How does one make a report of all payments made to a single payee or vendor?
GST audit report by tracking or a GST report by tracking categories.
I report on earnings, losses etc to a trust.
I might be missing something or maybe it's not a feature but I think the GST report will be more helpful if it allows us (Sole Traders) to make a that adjustment for personal / home office usage of certain expenses.
Anyone out there have a solution on how I can export this information into Excel and present my staff with a report.
The end of the report shows $25,433.
The report shows Inventory Asset balance of $15,298.
We had to do a 6 month VAT return which we used the figures from our VAT Return on Xero however we had our backdated credit which we could go back 6 months from the registration date to claim back any VAT paid but vouldn’t reflect this on the VAT Report.
Also, I am looking at submitting the BAS report directly from Xero.
When I do a tracking report on each job it gives me the total wages for each day.
Ability to effectively record & report on variations & current % complete and invoiced-to-date– both client & sub-contractor sides4.
Contracts administration incl ability to effectively record and report standard Master Builders Contract information - eg dates, contract amount, penalty per day, retentions - amounts & dates, defects liability period, multiple progress claims and also to correctly update the retention amounts for any variations to the base contract (for practical completion & for 12 mth defect liability).
Ability to report on all sub-contractors & suppliers for a particular job – ie run a report for a contacts list by job.
at the end of the day i have print out z-report from POS.
IE running a report on all quotes by type along with notes.
We report on a Non-Cash (Accruals) basis.
The Profit and Loss is probably my most used report.
I was wondering if there is a way to create a report that is similar to a budget variance except has the annual budget instead of the YTD budget?
It would be great if the report also showed the total profit.
The Payroll Activity Summary report only gives me the gross earnings figure, it doesn't separate out the allowances.
The cash summary report should be a critical report for monitoring daily cash position, but due to this issue it unusable for the purpose intended.
It would be very useful if you could create a report in respect of the trade debtors and creditors where they were netted off in this manner
This would particularly help with items that have been moved from the Adviser tab (such as Report Codes, Adiviser Reports).
For example:The Company X has made a profit of € (Schedule Figure Report Field) for the year (Current Year Report Field).
It would be helpful if whenever you create and print a report by employee group if the report printed the Employee Group title on the report.
I am trying to create a report pack for a client where there will be multiple versions of the profit and loss report each month based on the tracking categories.
It would be most useful if the report settings could include the ability to separate the data into different regions.
We have about 10 organizations each with their own set of books;   I want to see the consolidated position of all 10 these organizations in one report.
The GST reconciliation report is a useful report.
In a nominal ledger report (account transactions etc) allow an option to see all 'ghost' transactions that have been edited / deleted - making audit trail review much easier
Journal report is purely text format in Web, not a linkable text.
The journal report is messy as it contains everything, including reversals.
However, Xero has already a good trail report for user access, and each transaction.
Whilst within the report templates, an update button would be handy to pull through any data that has been changed.
That would allow users to produce a GST audit report that would be only a few pages long, as opposed to 100s of pages as it currently is now.
Would be so much easier to reconcile the GST audit Report by simply looking at the invoice totals and comparing that to ONE line on the GST Audit Report.
That way the reports from Xero would be pre-populated with details such as Accountant practice details on the compilation report and director and  partner details on those reports.
When reporting actuals vs budget the budget total would be $1,000, however if you filter the Pnl report  to (Tracking 1=Commercial, and tracking 2=property1) the budget value for rental income would alter to $500.
This would allow for loading 1 budget file (csv), and depending on your report criteria the budget would alter accordingly.
Currently in Xero, the only way I know how to get this, is to publish a report.
Is there any way that on the reconciliation report page, it could easily show you the last saved/completed reconciliation date?
I have clients that would love the ability to filter the Inventory Item Summary Report by contact.
We had the following scenario (unresolved) which caused Xero to report an error:1.
With only 6 to 16 trans per page - that makes a very long, unprintable report.
Currently, if you are on the 1099 Report, you can select a contractor and edit their 1099 info will appear (Name, address, SSN/EIN,  email, and their payments).
Unfortunately the older ones still appear on the top of the report, even though they may be several years old.
Also, is there a report that lists all future dated transactions so they can be checked?
As a result we have inadvertently managed to file a VAT return and not capture the VAT audit report.
We don't actually believe we did go and remove the report, but of course can't prove anything.
Under the Standard role, a person doesn't have access to the 1099 report.
I find myself clicking on them to find which category that report has been put under and I have many clients that have asked "Where has this report gone?
These changes do not pull into the History and Notes Activity Report, nor the Assurance Dashboard.
In the meantime it would be best if any empty rows didn't print when  you publish the report.
It is also a great way for us to check the report before sending off to clients, to see if everything is coded in the correct place.
this report could also be taken from online and used by hackers.
If this additional field of information could be added, the report would be suitable to submit as part of this claim.
However there are a couple of fields missing that would make the report even more useful.
The G7 & G18 adjustment fields on the Activity Statement form are insufficient, as although they allow the correct reporting of the GST amounts, they don't allow us to report the correct amounts in the different field such as G2 & G3.
Having this extra column in the report would eliminate this manual process.
Is it possible to get the contact address field added into the Aged Receivable Detail report?
But of course that doesn't stop the client downloading the report from the Published reports tab without the stamp.
It would be great to see a '2014/2015' '2015/2016' and '2016/2017' report that is easy to jump into rather than selecting period dates etc.
It would be useful to have the relevant account code next to items in the aged payables detail report.
If the tables functionality was enhanced to allow custom alignment and say borders it would improve the product and allow adhoc (non-Xero held) information to be directly entered into the report rather than added subsequent to report production.
A similar formatted report for FA that have been added would be very appreciated.
I know this can be done manually by adding a schedule to the bottom of a report and adding a formula for the corporation tax, but it's messy,  and it has to be done separately for each client (as if done in the partner edition and rolled out it's only available for advisers to run).
If I am creating a report with a lot of condensed items, it would be useful if applicable notes could then appear on the group heading.
That way the headline information (often the most important info) is immediately visible, without having to then go to the bottom of the last page of the report.
The RAID should then be reported those back as part of the project progress report thereby allowing a comprehensive overview of project process.
It would be great if we (BAS & Tax Agents) could print a proper TPAR report out of Xero for us to submit to the client for signature.
This report isn't available for import into Practice Manager.
Would it be possible to have the dates option come up prior to the report generating so that the dates can be specified and reduce the amount of transactions loaded and hence make the process quicker?
com/Reporting/Report/Run/1109)2. enhance the billable expenses - outstanding report (https://go.
The Find & Recode functionality could be enhanced to do so - if it had 'Customer' field in condition, report and recode.
Lets say I take a P&L report and want to look at the full year, month-by-month.
Same as "Current Financial" Report, which gives month by month break down; but for last financial year.
We are currently preparing a Tier 3 PBE report for a client and have come across an issue with the Statement of Cashflows.
For example I make a year to date report template: April - July, with columns for Budget & Actual with custom dates April to July.
Currently you have to scroll all the way to the bottom of  a report to print.
It's great too because the billable expense report INCLUDES GST which we have to pass on.
I too love this report but could the date default to the oldest item on the uncoded statement?
I would suggest that the Bills report be altered to be named bills
All of these were available on the old P&L report which I though was laid out well.
No-one needs a Balance Sheet report for June 2017 in July 2016.
Currently to print the Billable expenses report, find an item and edit it takes at least 9 clicks per item.
Also, once you have edited the one item from the Billable Expenses Report, it doesn't take you back to the report, it takes you to account transactions.
Once you have saved a draft report any subsequent changes to Report Fields do not pull through the the Report Template.
To have this would be great and to go one up it would be even better if it only came through on pressing a "Refresh Report Fields" button.
You then had the choice as to whether or not you wanted the report field to come through.
In order to scroll you have to go to the end of the report and then you can slide rightwards.
However when formatting it - this report does not currently allow you to have income tax expense as a separate line item below operating profit so that you can show profit/(loss) before and after tax.
We budget & report tours on a city-by-city basis as well as an overall report.
It would then be amazing to export a Budget vs Actuals report that includes all cities broken down individually as well as an overall cost, rather than one report per city.
The Passcode would be registered to the Firm that represents the taxpayer and only by entering this code would it produce the requested report.
The Audit report is very cumbersome to check and you cannot drill down to only one or two tax codes.
MYOB has a great report to check Tax codes - "Transaction Tax Code" where you can review tax codes entered for a period for both the balance sheet and Profit & Loss.
Is there a similar report in Xero?
It would be great to have a GST report that is a "Summary with Tax" in payable and receivables.
Does Xero have an aged Payable's and Receivables's reconciliation report that shows if there is an "out of balance" amount?
A useful report (certainly for me) would be the ability to create a listing of amounts due to suppliers on any given date which takes account of bills already paid.
But alas, the GST Audit Report doesn't show whether there are any uploaded files for the transactions.
If more detail is requires on who is overdue then this can be seen in the aged receivables report etc.
This functionality would allow you to print out a report based on the customers ordering patterns so you can easily see which customers are not ordering within their regular patterns.
They get flagged to the report.
It is frustrating to have to continually change the period for any report or posting.
All our other reporting is on a cash basis, but there is no Cash Basis checkbox on the Inventory Items Summary report.
However, they can't print the batch deposit report unless we give them full banking rights as well, which we don't want to do.
Simple report of all tracking tags (specific camps or events in my case) with expenses, income and net profit by campAbility to display categories for each tracking tag (Camps in my case) by most earned and most spent, and vice versaAbility to SORT the Reports, Tracking Summary, Choose a Date Range, Account Groups, etc.
If there was a "non-reporting" report code which removed codes mapped to there from showing in any of the current reports we could prepare custom reconciliations and tax adjustments within the report pack and avoid having to enter manually.
The benefit from a reporting perspective is that any manual additions and customisations currently required to existing report packs would be minimised or extinguished all together, thus reducing the margin of reporting error.
The Inventory Report is a bit troublesome to download and filter - so having an export ability here allows for auditing specific items easier.
It is ridiculous how long the report takes to load, and I'm not sure its useful to see this for ever customer or supplier?
A report similar to a statement but for quotes.
Would also be great to have a feature similar to automatic bill reminders so the report can be sent to customers periodically to tidy up open quotes.
It would be great if the date in the report pack (V2) would update to the date that you are opening the report when in draft form.
The ability to email this report directly from Xero would be a super cherry on top!
Currently the report only shows the nominal code and the description.
Would it be possible to get some report codes that are specific to the expense categories in the PBE reports.
Could the Expense and Income report by contact be run on a cash basis?
Can you make a report showing deposits in transit and complete by month?
Income by contact report - useless - because it's alpha sorted.
Also put this report on the dashboard.
Can I have that report or feature before start running depreciation of monthly Fixed Assets depreciation?
We find we have to attempt the report 5-10 times before we can actually see it.
A feature to 'run report' or 'email report' would be great, then at least if its taking your system hours to process it will email it when its ready.
There appears to be no list report available.
We have a request to have the description in journals to be shown in the Journal Report.
one a Management report and the two mentioned above.
My report would  would look more professional if it was all on one pdf, or one printout with the coversheet and complete table of contents.
Dear Xero,It would be really useful if a report customised at client level could be used at practice level.
That way a report could be created at practice level, used and tweaked at client level and then moved back up to client level.
I would also be really useful if the report name could be altered at client level.
When we have a draft report and we are printing it to PDF so a client can review it would be good if it automatically put a water mark of Draft on the document.
Currently we print it and then stamp draft on to the report rescan and then email to client.
Can we make these fields available as if we can run an overall report for all of our clients Years ends we can set recurring jobs for the year and we can stay on top of impending deadlines and chase clients up more efficiently.
Why can the detail reports not be created in our standard currency, so that we can compay and sum up the numbers, this is the actual purpos of a report.
The quickest means is to produce the Leave Requests report to check off the leave, but leave that starts before AND finishes after the date range selected (a week) is not shown.
It would also be beneficial to have the Cover page customisable as at the moment it is produced by a bizarre format and the headings make little to no sense for a financial report you are producing for a client.
Many of my clients that I am providing accounting services are used to receiving a General Ledger report from QuickBooks in the traditional general ledger format.
is it possible to sort the inventory item report by quantity sold or total value of goods sold?
It would be great to have the currency symbol $ to show on report totals or column headings as per general reporting standards.
Often clients forget to save their GST report as final when they file their GST return and then any subsequent changes aren't picked up in the next return.
It could be additional check box in report settings
A report showing what billable items is still not invoiced to customers will make short term and long term losses a bit easier to manage
The ideal solution would be to have the ability to insert reports into a client report, rather than having to start from scratch and losing the changes that were done at the client level.
The ability to simply turn a note on or off within a report would be much more user friendly as you could easily turn a note on if it was now required.
It would be good to have the ability to control line spacings in report packs.
can a template be created for weekly report management reportThanks Krish
Hello thereI have been using the Income by Contact report to report on the total income received from each client analysed by month.
We also usually have a full footer at the bottom of a compilation report, which we cant do at the moment in Xero.
Whilst you can look at on screen in account order, you can't send the report to PDF in account order as it defaults to date order.
There is a link to "View All"When in a client organisation and the View All link  is actioned the adviser should be taken through to the client organisation report fields not the master report fields in green Xero.
I've customised our standard P&L report into relevant groupings however I want the default view to display Account Codes alongside the name.
This can be done by using the Compare Periods report, running, then clicking "More Options" > "Sort By>Account Code".
Yeah I can run a profit and loss report for each tracking category, but I cannot easily see what transactions are included?
Only way it seems is to run a p&L report and drill down on each nominal code then print?
The Budget Summary report would be great as a customized report that identifies the grouping efforts produced from the customizations of the PL, BS and Budget Variance reports.
The only way i have found of doing this is to pull down a master report pack again.
The headache I have dealing with a multi column P & L report that outputs in the wrong chronological order is a nightmare.
I have come across the issue that my Taxable Payments Report has too many lines (greater than 2,500).
According to Xero I have to create two Taxable Payments Reports, but the problem arises when lodging the report electronically with the ATO as only one TPAR file can be lodged.
This report should have the same pagination options as other lists.
We had looked at using the report templates in our firm last financial year and it was lacking to many things for us to think that it was worth implementing.
One thing that it still does not allow is the ability to change the font type and size of the report text.
With organisations who run multiple divisions/tracking categories it would be a fantastic idea to enable the GST report to show the audit trail by tracking category.
Reports such as- Item Profitability Report- Invoice Profitability Report- Customer Profitability Report- Best Seller Item Report By Quantity and Dollar Amount- Inventory Tracking from Multiple Location within the Organization.
A report showing the items (and item qty) required to fulfill accepted quotes.
request for a report showing value of inventory - preferably number of items and total value of items.
In Banklink this report is available at all times and you can pull the report for specific dates e. g. 1st of the month to the end of the month.
Maybe there is another report or document I can easily view this info I am not yet aware.
It would be great if when you run  this report one of the 'Report Settings' could be to NOT include inventory items that have zero (0) balances.
Ideally the ability to create report codes would be at the practice level (green Xero).
aka check print settings, report settings or custom reports.
*A report for the pension provider by employee showing employee and employer pension contribution.
HIThis is a great report to find expenses created for a contact in one place but it would benefit from a search by contact and/or amount.
you can provide a quick and easy Job profitability report.
All a user would have to do is enter their internal job reference code into the "Reference" field for each transaction and then see that grouping in the P&L Report.
It is not a report , it is a key managemnet activity to know that the VAT return has been filed.
It would be so helpful to review the GL Detail and keep that report up while I create a Journal Entry.
tb report defaults to current day date in error.
When publishing a reconciliation report have the option to upload the actual statements.
However, I cannot utilize the tracking category feature on any report.
HiWould it be possible to create a report for budget vs actuals  on a month by month basis.
Currently the budget report changes the figures to the actual figure and you lose the amount of what you had entered in the budget.
If expected delivery dates could be incorporated this would be even betterThe majority of this information is shown on the home page for each tracked item so I would hope this would be an easy report to create
If we could then run a report showing all items that have a current stock below the minimum so we know what to purchase.
Can Xero condensed management report?
It this was a customized report where you could choose what fields you want in the report and then choose pdf as report type this would be excellent.
MYOB used to save report formats?
Based on this configuration, Xero should automatically assign each of the receipt date as the report date for each of the receipt.
Is this something that could be added to the Trial Balance report?
pdf Expense Claim Summary Report with the photos of my receipts that I’ve attached to it.
We have a number of clients asking for a report that shows all the payments received by a customer.
I generally find the default schedules in the Notes section of the Report Packs unsatisfactory.
In the final report, the name of a schedule will be a sub-heading below the heading of a note item.
It would then be very useful if this report format could be chosen for our Client statements, so that they can easily see what is outstanding Period by period.
Furthermore allow contacts to be grouped by contact type (eg retail contacts, wholesale contacts, overseas contacts etc) within the report.
When it comes to year end and the Return of Trading Details needs to be submitted to revenue this becomes a nightmare if at day one a number of Vat codes were not set up to trap all the different variables needed to extract this simple report.
The report expenses by contact ability to filter by tracking catagory
Previously used Sage where the detailed VAT report was instantly clear which transactions make up each VAT Box total.
The budget is entered in monthly but on the report itself the period selection would allow these more granular selections.
I want to do a report of Income by Customer.
Itemized listing displaying each item and then a total cost at the end of the report.
I realize that it may be some kind of accounting blasphemy to do but most of my tax clients report on a cash basis and so having that report as an option for the trial balance and its export would be helpful versus manually building the trial balance in excel.
Then perhaps some kind of report showing all customers sorted by average no.
Currently, if I reconcile these using Spend Money, instead of going into my 'suppliers' and creating a bill, then the transactions won't show on a report if I pull up all transactions for a supplier.
The previous feature request was entitled "Profit and Loss Report - easily select 'last financial year' as a period".
Is there a report that shows Assets purchased on a monthly basis?
A report that gives you the figures required to complete your Self Assessment form (Kashflow has this)
For example, I ran a monthly Cash Summary for a client and wanted an accompanying Account Transactions report to show the detail should it be needed.
If it was possible to start this at a nominated number, this report could then be inserted as part of a report pack.
They wish to track revenue and expenses through each division but report in a consolidated statement.
Could tracking be added to a checking account to define each division's revenue and expenses, and report on each accordingly?
To have;Task TitleTask detailsTask creatorTask AssigneeStatus (Open, In Progress, Done)Due dateMaybe even a report of tasks (open, done etc. )
Also, there must be 3 separate columns for Name, A/c Code and A/c Category used, in the "Account Transaction Report" & "Detail Account Transaction Report" along with the separate columns of Date, Reference and Description with multilevel account grouping and filtration.
it would be great if the schedules within report writer had the same features as using groups within the report menu when you are editing a layout.
This is essential  for annual reporting and was the whole point this standard report was requested in the first place.
First tracking = our Sectors (ie: Administration, Secondary school & Primary school)Sec tracking = Cost centres / departmental budgets When I run a profit and loss report for say Secondary sector and select "All cost" in tracking 2 - it produces a huge report with all the Cost centres whether they have transactions or not.
The account transactions report is great.
But if it has sorting by branch or funder functions under report settings, it would be better.
It seems redundant to have to manually create one, considering the numbers lodged with the ATO should have come from the published report.
I required to Generate reports as showing Description Column and with Multiple currencies alsoDo we have such report for Aged Receivable Report which is not showing at present Description column.
This would also be helpful when looking at other clients too, an extra tick box in the option of the P&L would be my wish, but an additional report would do the same.
to get back to the same report I started with I have to do start the reporting all over again !
As many people report or consolidate using excel or another external program, it is very helpful to have these features.
Each month I send the manager of each of our tracking categories/cost centres a profit & loss report and detailed general ledger.
The account transaction report does allow me to do this for a single account but this will be a long process to do it for each account.
What's the point of including the contact phone number on the report if the contact name (greyed out in options) cannot be included?
So despite having these on the report, it's still necessary to go into the contact record to contact th customer.
It would be really helpful if this was an option we could toggle for this report.
It would be cool if we could have a report that allowed us to see approximate taxable income at a glance, with a feature that allows us to input settings that calculate book-to-tax differences and see the resulting "taxable" income statement.
HiWas wondering if it was possible to have a running balance column added to the detailed general ledger report, much as seen in the MYOB and Banklink systems?
At present the only way around this issue is to export the report to excel and then manually update the report.
It should be possible to run a payables / receivables report, including payments or receipts since the date of the report.
I might be missing something, but why do the report dates (e. g. P & L ) default to the current month?
Then I have to muck around with the report dates or the compare period.
It would be great to have the ability to run a report that will show you all the transactions that have notes under the discuss tab in the reconciliation window.
Would be great if you could choose a preferred setting and save the report as a favourite or some form of quick link.
The standard P&L report displays the current month to the left, works backwards by month and then has YTD on the far right.
I would love the see the following suggestions incorporated in the Activity Statement report, specifically the GST Audit Report.
Have the GST Audit Report available in 'Detail' and 'Summary' versions.
Have the the general ledger account number in the GST Audit Report in a field of its own.
Ability to set a report as repeating and set it to send out automatically every month.
After setting the account details etc and date range it would be good to press enter to Update a report.
It would be great if the Statement of Cash Flows (GAAP Indirect Method) were a normal report.
Currently I can only run my tracking summary report for a specific account group.
Considering many countries trade rules, when multi currency transactions are involved many times we have to report in transaction currency.
Is there anyway we can get a report of these?
This is frustrating because Xero has provided a means of collection information that I can't report on.
Simply click a column to header to sort report data by that column (a la Quickbooks).
Would be good if you could edit the Cash Summary Report layout.
This should help also help distinguish these transactions within the VAT Audit Report.
It would be great if you could save or choose default when you change the options on a report.
Here in British Columbia, Canada, the Ministry of Finance needs a report that shows all transactions outside our province.
Xero Team,Would you please create a General Ledger Detailed Report so that we can have a nice Xero standardized report instead of having to export to excel and print from there.
So I think that could be very usefull that Xero has a report of operative cash flow.
So would be a very usefull report if you can generate a cash report basis on estimated / planned date of invoice and bill, because this does permit to bussiness owner a great visibility and control over your real operative cash flow.
When publishing a specific 'custom' advisor report pack I realised a few problems I am having:1.
Should be a feature that is set at Advisor level not each individual report.
This should also be an option at advisor level not each and every published report.
These notes should be read in conjunction with the attached compilation report of (Accounting Company Name). '
We have to download a report on trust balances on certain dates.
So if I could filter an income report for a contact group.
The problem I have is that the US treats me as a resident for tax purposes, which requires me to report to the IRS my entire world-wide income regardless of origin.
This would allow market fluctuations in USD relative to AUD to properly reflect my assets/liabilities and income/expenses in Australia in USD-terms so I can accurately report to the IRS the same way Xero lets me report to the ATO.
I would suggest the ability to set the report dates myself.
A report similar to the Aged Receivables report would be great.
XERO then starts to control and report VAT paid and received seperately for each specific VAT registration.
This report is extremely helpful if you have a lot of customers who are answerable to a committee and require detailed reports of what has to or has not been paid.
I find I often can't recommend Xero to my clients as they want to do simple customer reporting so that they allocate expenses & costs to a specific customer and then run a report each period to check that they have invoiced on all the expenses & costs to that customer.
Even the ability to do it manually would be good if it can't be done automatically, e. g. empty boxes for text next to each line on the report.
For many businesses Gross Margins are one of the most important figures to monitor and it is disappointing that Xero does not display this on any P&L report.
I was also surprised to learn that one cannot put this field into the Report Builder.
The one in the middle is taken from the Demo Company (UK)'s P&L report.
As part of my personal BAS agent process, I complete a site report for each visit to my clients.
Wait, there is no report that shows notes!
It's hard to tell without running a report.
This way we could potentially see sheep, cattle, alpaca, horse transactions with category subtotals all on one report.
The ability to choose whether a report says profit/loss or surplus/deficit - we are uncomfortable using "Profit" when we are a not-for-profit.
In other systems this is a standard report and is very handy when checking inter-company transaction history across a group of related entities.
Client runs multiple locations (Newcastle & Coffs Harbour) and uses tracking to report on the two locations.
HowdyWhen printing or exporting the "Inventory Summary Report", only the Item field is displayed.
Any chance we can have the option to include the "Item Description" on this report too?
Also, a similar report for the profit and loss appropriation showing profit for year, income tax expense, dividends paid, retained earnings from prior year - for companies.
The Executive Summary is a very informative report.
It would be good if the GST report displayed a warning when there are unreconciled transactions in that date range.
Currently it requires the report to be exported to Excel to caclulate totals.
Is it possible to have an additional option under this button that is called "View all reports" that strings them all together and allows me to print them in one go rather than selecting each report and then printing the document.
When using Tracking for Employees the Leave Liability Report should subtotal by Tracking category.
This report serves a purpose to capture staff with high leave rates (summary or detailed) by location and cost center.
The labour and leave flash rate report depicts staff in three categories.
Low = Staff With No Entitlement LeaveMed = Staff With Previous Years Entitlement Leave + Accrued Leave BalancesHigh = Staff with Plus Previous Years Entitlement Leave + Accrual Leave BalancesAll balances are shown by financial year to identify non-management trends of the excess leave liability report.
The Bell Curve Roster Calendar allows you to book future leave and projects a financial four year forecast bell curve report as well as assign rosters with ease.
This report depicts the following:14 Days Excess Leave Report (summary and detailed)- staff with excess entitlement annual leave by financial year.
This report enables managers to identify staff that may regularly book leave in advance and then request to cancel leave.
For example: tipped employees collect cash that the employer has no control over but the employee is still required to report it for tax purposes.
A Superannuation accruals report and 2.
Whereas with MYOB the superannuation payments report is actually the amounts paid to the super funds which obviously differs from the accruals report.
It would be helpful if the leave transactions report could be displayed in columnsleave accrued, leave taken and running balance.
If this could be in a landscape report similar to the P32 report this would be very helpful.
Can I please have a report so I can access this information.
But when I run a profit and loss report and select to view compare categories, everything shows perfectly except there are no values pulled through for staff salaries.
In your payroll module, is there a capability to handle this kind of report by hours segregated between normal hours and overtime for each project?
Due to government reporting requirements, our 401(k) provider requires us to report 401(k) Standard and 401(k) Catchup plan amounts as separate lines.
The P11 is such a key report, it must be somewhere - can any kind soul point me in the right direction?
It would make sense that this would appear at the top of the report.
It would be great to see a payroll tax feature built into the payroll employee summary report whereby the software would calculate the total wages/salaries & superannuation and multiply this against the organisations payroll tax rate.
It would be great to see this as a report in Xero
BUT wouldn't it be great if the name of the Group was displayed at the top of the report.
I believe this Detailed report should also show leave details - it is called the Detailed report after all.
Currently, I download and save each report and then attach them in an email and send.
I have a number of clients, where this must be completed manually, card by card, after first exporting the existing report to excel.
I THINK IT WOULD BE A GOOD IDEA TO HAVE THE REPORT WITH THE EMPLOYEE NAME ON IT.
Surely Xero could take this info and have a report to say a) super accrued B) Super paid and C) Super owing per employee for a particular period?
This may fall under the "Report Writer" request.
It could be incorporated into the existing Leave Requests report as an option to include the "details".
Leave Request report to include option to select active employees only.
An audit report available to include leave balances of terminated employees.
This report would allow these figures to be easily and accurately reported.
A summary report listing a total for each group,  but still have the ability to do individual groups
In the past 4 to 5 months we have issue downloading Detailed Account Transactions Report for an entire month.
It frequently times out before the report has been generated.
Can we have a report for creditors showing the coding to mark off against invoicing what is owing or in the payments batch,But having the code - COA coding visible would be helpful, especially when there is heaps of creditors in payments batch
Is it possible to refine the Aged Payables Report to print an "as at date" that excludes those since paid?
As I understand it, the Xero Budget feature (specifically the Budget Variance report) only allows you to compare actual/budgeted income and expenses over a specified period.
We're UK based and our clients are charities that report to the Charity Commission.
I cannot see a bug report button anywhere so I guess this will go here until I can find a better place.
In the the report I have set it to be Custom, with a start date of 01/04/2016 and end date of whatever month I have currently selected.
I cannot find one report that will show me the split coding.
Is it possible to get the sort of report I want out of Xero?
I don't want to have to drill into each transaction to do this, I want an overall report that I can run for a month, or a day, or a week which shows all transactions posted in that timeframe.
Whenever I input my figures, save, then run a report, the budget variance reports show completely different figures!
Instead, the report treats the quantity as positive and the value as negative for items on a credit memo so while the total value is accurate the total quantity is meaningless.
I'm not sure why this report is written this way as I would consider anything on a credit memo to be negative in terms of receivables.
In the standard report Income tax appears as an expense amongst all other trading expenses.
As this information is required when reconciling GST on clients that report GST on a cash basis.
Sometime the reference number is not appear on the report 3.
I see you can print a Xero profit and loss you can compare tracking (job numbers) and this report is not the easiest to read compared to the MYOB report.
Is there a way to print all tracking items as individual profit and loss reports in one report (so they are separated)?
tt/aT8YRTFVIs there anyway to replicate this in the Xero dashboard or at least a very simple report I can run.
Is it possible to create a Monthly PDF Expense Report in Xero that includes the actual receipts?
is it possible to run a report in account number order (not nominal account) all our clients have a postcode as their account number and i want to see the aged receivable report in account number order.
Run the Account transactions report and its in reverse order?
Trade creditors balance in Balance sheet should equal to balance of Account Payable report.
When I run a Budget Variance Report for Current Financial Year the current month shows zero balances for everything.
Can someone tell me why manual journal entries do not appear in the account transactions report?
Does anyone know what I have done wrong and how I can make this stop appearing in my report please?
A few weeks ago there was an excellent balance sheet report which showed net current assets but it seems to have disappeared.
One of these is to take an import of the Profit and Loss Report so I can cross reference it with the live data in Xero.
23 - if we run a report/statement it would only show £22 or £23 and not the full or correct amount.
I used to visit the Balance sheet report to find the suspense account but (i guess) because the suspense account is "balanced" it isn't coming up.
Request an Item Costing Report to Include report fields for:  - Item ID/Description  - Date  - Qty Received  - item Cost  - Actual Cost  - Qty Sold  - Remaining Qty  - Remaining value
so say in mid December what I want is a report that shows actuals for July-Nov and then our forecast of costs and revenue for Dec-June.
Is there an existing report that displays both item & category?
Would be great if the GST Audit Report showed Gross $.
It would be great if Xero had a report that showed GST on aged payables and receivables.
Currently it takes a large(ish) number of clicks to get to the phone number of a customer from the Aged Receivables report.
It would be great if the "Contact Phone Number" was added to this report.
Is it possible to print a report, with a contact group, such as credit card customers that will show their balance owing as at at date.
How do I configure my Annual Report to have the correct Notes and Information for a "Look Through Company"?
I want to generate account payable report that shows all these prepayments grouped under that supplier so that I understand my net position with that supplier.
I went to Report>Account Payable Report and generated AP report but could not generate a report, this report did not pick overpayment transaction.
For example, a report that shows January budget/January actual, February budget/February actual in one large report.
I would expect to only see my income from my clients on this report and not my expenses per vendor.
When I click on it to drill down and see whats inside, it takes me to a Foreign Currency Gains and Losses report where there is nothing matching this amount.
I Can't seem to get the right report and format it correctly for import.
EG Columns in a report for two FY side-by-side:May-14      May-13      June-14     June -13 etc etc
The report could be requested for a fixed period or all records.
My client uses the Profit and Loss Detail Report extensively and I do not see this option in Xero.
Client wanted a monthly profit and loss report for several months, ending in November.
It would be great if there was an option to Export a PDF of any report to your Box account from the Export Button (Currently there are options for PDF, Excel and Google Docs only).
If you could describe such with reference to their titles in the GST Audit Report that would be perfect.
I got rid of the duplicates, but I'm concerned that the reconciliation report didn't alert me to this problem.
We still have the issue of the reconciliation report being incorrect.
Does anyone know how to print a report that shows all transactions entered to the 'BAS Excluded' code?
I am trying to generate the report for a GST return.
The option run a report of total hours/dollar amount worked for a  selected period.
What´s the best way to see solely my cash movement as I´m not interested to see any non-cash movements in the report.
This is sort of OK, but there is no reconciliation function, and also you can't run an account transaction report far enough into the future, so you can't see whether the prepayment account reconciles.
I have read the guide, searched community, downloaded every possible report from "All Reports" section to no avail.
Updates to NZ Report Packs for our partners.
Thus I can run a report which totals my overall Motor Vehicle expenses and then break these down to MV:Lease Payments, MV:Insurance, MV:Fuel, MV:Service Expenses.
The Employee Contact Detail Report included the employee Hire Date field to avoid having to review each employee individually to locate their start date - 1 report, instead of accessing each file individually.
BUT only the PAYGW amount is showing on the Activity Statement report.
I'm running the Payroll Activity report and notice that the Pre-tax Voluntary Contribution (RESC) amount for my employees is marked as Excluded from W1.
The one concern I have is the ability to prove to the ATO via a printed report of superannuation payments made if the ATO looks to do an audit.
I've spent literally HOURS on emails (no phone contact by either Xero or Click) trying to obtain a simple statement report showing:1.
I have tracking categories set-up in my file to track payroll by timesheet categories however annual leave, sick leave and superannuation expenses relating to my employees do not get assigned by Xero to a tracking category and instead fall into the uncategorised column when I prepare a P&L report.
I am currently looking for a quicker and more accurate way to report my super contributions.
when we run the payroll employee summary report, all of these deductions appear as a total against the employee in the Deductions column.
I've tried using the Employee Group function, however have not found a way to make this report on the Profit & Loss properly.
When using GovReports we get a great lodgement confirmation report that I keep with my clients records.
I ran the Superannuation Payments report from the PAyroll tab for each fund, but there doesn't seem to be a way to filter this report by employee.
This  report  is  essential  to  determine  if  a  staff  members  Long  Service  Leave  is  due  and  if  an  Accrual  needs  to  be  made  for  financial ReportingWe   record  for  Annual  leave  unpaid  and  Personal/Carers  Leave  unpaid.
It would be great to have age and DOB in the "Employee Remuneration Report" and the other employee reports.
I am wanting a report that tells me each employee deduction and the amount, preferably by general ledger account for a specific date range.
The problem however is that these figures appear on the Cash Summary report.
So if your super payable for a month was $1,000 you have a negative $1,000 appear in 'Superannuation Payable' on the Cash Summary report.
As it stands the Cash Summary report is very misleading.
Hello,When attempting to send PAYG Withholding Annual Report to the ATO via Xero I am having issues selecting my Auskey.
I have tried to customise a P&L report, but it still doesn't show wages.
I can't find a report which lists Unused AL on Termination (probably because I haven't set up a payroll category for it!
I did double-check the payroll history report and I was paying payroll in 2015.
I know this can be found in the Payroll > Transaction Listing Details report, but you have to dig.
Is there such a report in Xero.
I am trying to reconcile the Net Wages Transactions against the Gross to Net report for the Year End, I have a discrepancy - Now I can see that Reimbursements to employees have been put against Net wages, should they be separate?
Then when I was going through the Xero payroll year end videos it shows a report called Gross to Net (under Reports).
Presumably there is a report somewhere, but I can't find it.
We're having a bit of difficulty with the auto-enrolment pension filings report, staging date at the beginning of February with the payroll run weekly.
This was the case up to the week beginning 4 March 2017, the pension filing report shows both employee and employee contributions, however from the Week beginning 11 March onward it only shows employer contributions.
If so, how do I journal this to show correctly on the profit and loss report?
We are implementing a clocking in system whereby our staff can clock in and out, and the system will automatically produce a report to say who is to be paid for what hours.
5) To bypass the hourly rate (for salaried staff) can you create a payitem that is "Salary" fixed amount and does this the report correctly on RTI?
From the last leave paid report (Ace Payroll), for example:Start date: 24/06/2016James, Bond Sick $63.
My questions are: firstly, is there a plan for these journals to happen automatically, and secondly, can you tell me how to report on this so I can do a MJ to rectify the missing months.
We've never had the problem resolved and only ever have the current report we have issues with fixed - not a guarantee that we won't have issues in the future.
I cannot seem to find anything on the Guide or Community regarding how to report and find our liability due at the end of each period for Annual Leave Accrued for all our employees.
I run the report .
If you are a user of Xero and Report Amigo, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Winemaking software to record and report on your vineyard, winery and warehousing operations.
I want to display a xero live debtors report in SharePoint by adding a page viewer web part to display the page but all I get back is an error "This content cannot be displayed in a frame" and additionally "the publisher of this content does not allow it to be displayed in a frame".
I had also thought about using Xero's description but its not searchable an again I can't report on the NOT condition.
I am looking to do some forecasting at the tracking category level which will then report on actuals to forecast and potentially original budget.
It would be great to only have to enter the orders once, ie into an app that then feeds into Xero, rather than setting up a second tool to generate the report he needs to go to market.
It is very frustrating that a simple monthly report cannot be generated directly from xero without much data manipulation and sorting in excel.
thanksJanetshow Opening and Closing balances for foreign currency amounts in the Account Transactions report.
If there is a problem, whether it be defective goods or simply charged incorrectly, the app allows you to flag the item and then creates a discrepancy report.
I prefer this for each receipt opposed to the Expense Report.
Now, we are mandated to file 1 financial report in 1 country, for let say 5 different countries.
They are not Jnls but I cannot see how to report them.
I am aware that xero gives advantage of reporting P&L and Balance-sheet in various currencies, but is there any ads-ons that produces each and every report in multi currencies.
Report on customers who have bought particular products.
Report on customers who have not bought anything for 6 months.
Report customers email address & telephone number to do a marketing campaign.
- Have you found a way to split up a single Expensify report into individual expenses in Xero?
•Added UOM, Family (hidden fields by default) and “Volume on hand” to Product Availability report.
Our current idea is to have 4 tiers, the project, the sub project, the task then the report.
I can see how we can schedule them to get a list that would be what we would give to the client, but no report that I can find for this.
Backorders report now shows all outstanding shipments for a given product.
We run a unique consignment model that requires this report - our warehouses that we work with on consignment cannot have access to our database.
The cash received by account per the report, would net off against the single receipt into the main bank account, that I would transfer over from the main account to the Worldpay account.
A bulk of payments(lets say 100) will be in one report and the payments related to once report are received in 5 or 6 batch payments.
It used to be displayed neatly in separate columns the Report Title, Period, Who prepared it, the Date the report was prepared.
We require / well i require a report - PER CUSTOMER OR SUPPLIER.
For instance, you can search by a "Name" (Contact), for a certain "Account", within a certain "date", with certain reference "numbers", etc, etc, etc and also factor in what information you want in the columns, and print this as a report that gives a total.
Everytime I struggle with a Xero report not showing what the customer wants, and spend 15 minutes mucking around sorting and deleting and using formulas in Excel, my MYOB-loving-workmates laugh at me and say "you can do that in MYOB".
Income Statement - To show month to date vs budget, year to date vs budget & Annual Budget Started by Stacey Yalenti - 27 Oct 2014 in Feature Requests | Not planned I would love an income statement report that shows month/quarter to date vs buddget, year to date vs budget and then a column on the far right showing the annual budget.
Seriously Xero, it is almost 9 months and you have only released one report?
This problem is exacerbated by the fact that a Contact page has no link to a report of all financial transactions with that Contact (see  and ).
A direct link to that report (say, clicking on the otherwise useless financial activity graph) from the Contact detail page would be amazingly helpful.
A $10 report here, a $20 service there.
##### CLUSTER 27 #####
I have several invoices "bills" that show as Awaiting Payment.
In doing this we lose the ability to see which individual invoices are due for payment.
I have customers that process a single payment for multiple invoices.
Is there a way of saying this single payment must go against multiple invoices instead?
I have some invoices where a payment has been received for one of the line items, but not the others.
I provide the original invoices with the payment batch for tick off and it is easier if they are sorted alphabetically.
is there a way I can have these options on my invoices as payment method?
That part of the process I've got down pat and will be very convenient as we have many sites and each site is responsible for their own invoices in terms of authoirising them for payment.
I have set up the Paypal option on my invoices to receive payment via credit card and this incurs a transaction charge.
I have clients asking me to amend the statement template to show the payment they have made in the previous month on one line, instead of it showing as a split over multiple invoices.
Batch Payments are for uploading into your internet banking and 'Cheque Batch Payment' is for multiple invoices from 1 supplier that are being paid.
Also for construction industry this works well as we often have progress payments so I can easily see the invoices for each stage being passed on to the client for a progress payment.
Each month I have to record over 600 receipts from a large batch payment received into individual client invoices.
as it is a one payment for a couple of invoices for the same supplier or client.
However, when we process the batch payment, the invoices paid are displayed in a seemingly random order.
Also, if the feature to modify the payment terms could be added to invoices, it would be really helpful also.
At the moment I email the relevant director/manager a copy of the batch being paid and then hyperlink a file that holds all the Invoices which relate to that payment batch.
No more waiting for payment and chasing up invoices.
Also it would be great if all the outstanding invoices each customer be displayed as often I have customers that miss a payment.
This would help when a remittance or payment confirmation is received early and covers a bulk of invoices.
Late Payment RemindersSometimes invoices "get lost in the mail" (ahem).
Those with “Adviser” status cannot allocate a payment to invoices.
More importantly as we typically match a single month/customer payment with a number of purchases made during the month by that customer (Invoiced individually), there can be up to 20-30 invoices to select.
We therefore often have 100 plus invoices attached to that one payment.
The invoices History & Notes shows "Payment received from Joe Smith on 8 March 2016 for $16.
The issue is,,, Transaction is appearing in paypal transactions but still showing as due in awaiting payment in invoices.
They all show , however I remember reconciling a payment received from them on 1/1/16 where 3 invoices were paid for a total of $3000.
I have no troubles with one payment to multiple invoices if they all match up.
This will allow part payment of invoices within the batch.
However we are an electrical company using SimPRO as our job costing package but it doesn't handle payment of the the supplier invoices which is fine.
For example our main supplier JAR has about 300 invoices per month for payment plus 30-40 other suppliers each month.
Get your customer invoices paid immediately, without waiting 30+ days for payment.
Track legal invoices, review and approve for payment.
A typical payment batch will include payments to 10 - 15 suppliers each with between 5 - 10 invoices.
especially when trying to reconcile a large payment of 237 invoices I have been waiting for well over 10mins for this to process, it has taken me pretty much all day to un-allocate a dozen credit notes applied incorrectly as it was on our biggest suppiler and I had to wait at least 5-10mins everytime for the page to load.
##### CLUSTER 28 #####
I pay it.
My question is - if I pay a wage to the director (me) through payroll does that reduce the $15,000 or increase it?
Now: I have entered wages going through pay run.
We have set stripe to pay out every Thursday ready for reconcilliation on Friday.
For example I pay every month USD 100.
I pay a large sum annually for website hosting plus an additional recurring monthly fee.
I did our company's March pay run and correctly entered the details for each employee.
This comes out of what I pay myself!
For e. g. I pay commission to David.
I've finally been paid by a client and could really do with a chunk of the cash sooner than then, and quite possibly more than I normally pay myself each month.
In the end of every quarter, we pay the Charities and Card-holder the actual amount they owe from us.
These we pay in two or more large payments.
I am self employed freelancer and have a one client who asks to pay super directly into my fund.
Today I processed a pay run and paid each employee for their share of the bonus.
The VAT to Pay Customs is showing as the full amount of VAT collected over the year.
They then pay the woman biweekly using Chase Quickpay.
Afterwards, I pay 85% of the monies to the bus company, and keep 15% as our commission.
I was told that I am initially supposed to pay GST on 100% of the money we collect.
We pay some of our suppliers a weekly amount, and currently we are in credit to at least 2 of these.
HiI invoiced a client in USD and they paid in 2 x AUD installments,This is because they paid the USD amount in AUD, and because it was short of the total they had to pay again to make up the shortfall.
I'm not an accountant and am approaching this from a payroll perspective so I know what to pay each person each month.
My colleague has created this interesting problem for me (would have been nice if he checked before doing it but hey ho):We have made a cash advance to a freelancer, in order for them to pay accommodation expenses.
The PAYE amount for the first month ended up being negative (to the order of hundred pounds), and HMRC guidance is that 'the company pay this to the employee and offset from later PAYE liability'.
My two-month reporting period in March - AprilI pay VAT on a cash basis.
A few of our clients pay by credit card, via Stripe.
We have to pay our accounting firm to prepare our statements, something that we thought we could do ourselves by swapping to Xero.
Will be used to pay Loan #1 with better terms.
I do have a personal travel expense of $1000 coming soon, and I could charge that, offset the $1000 with the $500 credit, and then pay the credit.
We then have to pay back a minimum amount every month depending on the cumulative total we have loaned at the end of that month so the amount is never fixed, always variable.
One of the employees used his card to pay for a hotel in April but was subsequently charged incorrectly, he argued the balance with the hotel and received a credit on the credit card statement the following month so we now have a credit to process as part of his expense claim but no way of processing it.
The only way I can think of managing this is to pay all the money generated by the contractor to them and then invoicing them for their fees.
I pay the fees on my side.
In the other platform wages and dividends and director paid expenses all went into the same pot, so I'd often pay myself out of that pot random amounts as long as it was within what the company owed me.
I have a medical supply company and I pay a third party biller 10% of collections for our billing.
Nor does it cope with the 50% limit, so you would have to be careful if your employees’ pay is dominated by a benefit in kind (for instance, if someone is paid £1000 a month, and in one tax month has a benefit worth £5000, you can’t take more than £500 in PAYE, even though the combined pay on which tax is due is £6000; Xero presumably will think that the limit is £3000, 50% of the total, whereas it’s really 50% of £1000).
The company will pay the remaining 140.
I used some convenience checks from a credit card to pay some vendors.
I pay $4000 in total on Jan 1 for 8 tickets, each relating to one week.
How should I apply future payments to this credit card to pay this off?
i have to pay my supplier before i receive the item.
For example, if I bill a client for $1000, I am required to pay 1.
To be more specific, I am using Currency Fair to pay my suppliers.
Payments will mostly come in via check, but many customers will pay via credit card.
I have a different card but your 'Pay Now' does not work.
We are a debt management company and we have monthly payments in from clients and we pay their creditors on their behalf.
Some customer pay cash and some in via credit cards.
I had to pay &#163;24.
At the moment, when I pay one of my suppliers in China, I book it in as a purchase of stock and set it to 'No VAT'.
When I travel, I generally pay for meals in cash, and it's not tracked.
And then how to I "pay" that claim?
It looks to me as though I would have to pay this so am I recording these amounts in the wrong way?
I am doing my my first pay run and the PAYE, Employee NIC and Employer NIC have correctly deducted from the final amount in 'Step 2.
E. g. current balance -98k, place order for 10k and have to pay 8k up front.
Client will not want to pay me to allocate 1000's of entries already allocated in the previous accounting system.
Should I delete that feed and create a manual Journal entry to pay off the cards separately.
3 - Installment paymentsFinally, the company has to pay taxes installment every semester.
I want to record a regular deduction on pay run.
We have recently attended a trade show, we used the company card to pay for hotel, meals etc.
I pay him $1000 upfront and two months later he delivers my products.
When we do a collection on small sites (one machine Ect) we pay the shop commission in cash straight from the machine.
We run a small residential program where youth pay a monthly rent.
As we are a construction company, by law we have to show each week on our employees payslips, what we  have to pay their Coinvest (long service leave) & Protect & Incolink (redundancy).
Has anyone tried to implement the April Employment Allowance (£2000 NIC) in a Xero Pay run yet?
I do not want to pay taxes on that deposit OR see it as income for me to spend until I've "earned" it by completing the work.
I paid for this personally and the company will have to pay me back for that.
Gross earnings were &#163;480Tax (&#163;42)Net pay &#163;522I can't get Xero to accept the negative Tax figure - how should I get around it ?
I am a service based company and have completed some work for another company ($1000) and I incurred ($500) worth of expenses that they agreed to pay for.
My client tells me that they would sometimes pay over 200 lines for an individual supplier on occasions.
The customer pays me directly, and then I pay the third party a commission 60 days later.
Therefore, I want to make sure that i can pay myself back this amount of money (10k) at a later date, and not get hit with a tax bill for it (which would be particularly annoying as i spend 300 days a year in Hong Kong and am a HK resident paying HK tax).
Would this still mean i can then pay myself back the 10,000 and not get hit with a tax bill?
A client uses an FX broker to pay a number of suppliers in different currencies (they are using multi-currency).
These transfers are never 'lending', they are passing personal money to pay for something (for one reason or another).
However, the local law requires the tenant to withhold a portion of the rent and pay it to the tax office directly.
In the pay run, I tried to record the fact that money was withheld from the employee to repay the loan.
Reasons for this were to pay amounts in and hold for GST etc.
Hello,we had to pay a supplier a deposit which he will give us back in 12 months.
My question is can I pay the debt off before tax from my salary?
My thinking is that why should I pay tax on a tax debt?
We then receive a statement at the end of each week and we pay on the total of that statement.
We pay certain bills with our personal Credit cards.
why there is  a balance of a large amount of fund The scenario is:  Customer is asked to pay some fund upfront for a Auto Repair Job.
We're happy to pay you for it.
Instead of a refund they have said to pay less this quarter on our activity statement.
3 - How do we treat payments made by the company that are used to pay off a director's vehicle loan?
HiI engage several contractors that I am required to pay super to.
I'm going to start selling website maintenance services via subscription, ie customers pay me certain fixed amount of fees each month.
I am tired of having to pay my accountant adviser money to resolve my Xero questions.
I have an number of clients that have an annual fee but pay it on a monthly basis via standing order.
Also, do we have to pay VAT on the cashback?
Is this functionality not available yet in Xero as I could only find a way to pay employees via direct deposit?
HiWe have a volunteer who has had to incur a moderately large amount on expenses, and which we agreed to pay in advance in three tranches when we could see the work being done.
She will be submitting her receipts this week and if she has underspent, the overpayment amount will be charged back to her, and if she has overspent we will pay her the difference (within reason).
Rate of pay to be discussed but will be worked out on a 'per job basis' rather than an hourly rate.
Each tier is based on how late the customer has chosen to pay.
We only pay about 1% for payway but  would be happy to drop this for a better solution.
I've been told by many people that it's best to pay myself a minimum wage and the rest in dividends.
Sometimes we pay in advance for these orders.
Otherwise we pay the bill within Suppliers terms and the transaction date in Xero will be the date the goods are received by the customer and not the bill date.
An amount was lodged with solicitors to pay pre operational expenses, of course these were invoiced to the company.
Hello,How would I typically record, as a pay item, insurance that I pay annually on behalf of the employee, so that (s)he benefits from medical insurance?
HiAs HMRC has been telling me different figures to pay from the figures that I have been telling them and entering into Xero, I have been using the prepayment figure to try and match the amount paid to the amount owed.
I was hoping I could then push a button and generate a completed self-assessment form stating how much tax I have to pay.
We did change the template slightly to say to view and pay rather than to view and pay online.
I run a company in Portugal and with several people I pay, I have to retain a percentage and pay it to the Tax Man the following month.
)So I pay the landlord = €750 Then pay TaxMan €250 the following month.
Members request my services and they pay me in trade dollars.
For example, for every week's worth of transactions, i have to actually pay the credit card about 6 weeks later.
I have clients who pay me a retainer up front.
In reality, we are selling items from a supplier and then pay the supplier when customer pays us.
When I order dashcams from them, I pay them via wire transfer.
5 days before their event, the customer is requested to pay for the second half of the total price for the service.
I'll pay hourly or flat rate, your choice.
People come in, receive a service, pay for it and leave.
Lets say I pay myself a wage of 400 EUR for the week.
Last year in May, we started using the payroll feature in Xero to pay our directors a salary.
Rather than pay the WHOLE amount of the bill .
say a bill comes in for $8000, they pay $800 every day for 10 days.
I am trying to pull in ADP pay run data into Xero.
If I wanted to create a pay run, but not keep track of Superannuation and have it paid manually (say a regular amount each month), can I still do this somehow?
I charge hourly so i entered ordinary pay and pay rate to calculate the total pay in the payrun.
I started trying to set up a pay run, but that seems to want me to set pay dates.
When I am out and about and get the opportunity to promote Xero, there are some potential customers/clients who do not want to pay their subscription under my organisation.
Entering into this agreement Philip Fraser would pay the bills and we would in turn pay him.
We then approve/reject their claim and pay them.
So if they opt to pay using PayPal they pay, for instance, $105 dollars, but if they send me a check, they only pay $100.
I easily pay several bills on one check.
If you forget it pays the employee twice, 8 hours pay and 8 hours holidays.
Xero currently shows Gross Earnings, Employer NIC, Benefits, Reimbursements, and Total Cost along the top bar in the Pay Run page.
Here's a link for Amazon Pay.
This then had a knock on effect when trying to pay other creditors and my card declining
Each month we pay for our energy bills by direct debit.
We then create a pay run.
It would be great if we could pay bills directly from Xero.
Today we create bills on Xero and then go over to Paypal and pay them manually.
There should be a feature to allow you to part pay or split the deposit batch to allow the next statement line to be applied against the deposit.
Ability to post a pay run via the app would also be fantastic.
For example:At present, if Joe Bloggs is given "Approve & Pay" access, he can see and approve all information on all employees expense claims.
If your contact buys from you but also supplies to you a contra transaction needs to be made in order that you only pay/receive the net amount.
6) Receive bill from my vendor7) Pay vendor’s bill8) Receive payments from customersThanks-Tom
I have a client who has to pay annual leave on Mon-Fri, Sat and Sun rates for the same employee.
The UK Xero version has an option under Payroll to :Deduct an attachment of earnings order (AEO) from an employee's pay - https://help.
Revenue in Ireland lets companies pay in periods of 4 months.
All my clients pay via EFT - either Wire or ACH.
com we can have clients pay on our own sites.
We do not want our clients to pay a few cents more neither do we want to take a few cents less.
Then we have to bulk pay them off.
For Example: In a weekly pay run a standard employee works a total of 38hrs.
Once an employee scans a receipt via the app and assigns it to themselves it should automatically process and pay with the next payrun.
As users, we pay a good chunk more for multi-currency, and so expect better automatic matching capabilities than currently available.
My client's won't pay for the e-file service when they have always mailed them out.
Available dividends to take per monthDividends to take per director Salary taken  (added manually)Any other est income  (added manually )Estimated personal tax the client will pay.
PAYG Tax and HECS is currently calculated on an individual pay period.
This could be achieved by taking an average of all pay periods and then working out the PAYG tax and HECS payable.
Do you pay suppliers 30 "Working Days" after being invoiced or 30 "Calendar Days"?
I often wait until I am paid by the client before I pay the supplier bill.
- Increased functionality to set tax and social security as a % of gross pay, as well as other deductions / allowances as a %.
EG different cost codes for different pay run types
We reconcile Xero leave requests against leave taken by all staff each week as we process the payroll, to check that the leave is accounted for before we begin the pay run.
This includes- Pay calendars- Pay items- SuperannuationIt would be good of having some way of showing clients why these items are locked.
When you pay a utility such as water or electricity, you cannot send them remittance advice so there is  no work around to this.
when I click on Post Pay run, nothing happens.
I pay a lot of different electricity suppliers by BACS.
On our previous system it would give a basic monthly pay value, showing hours and hourly rate on the payslip can only lead to unwanted/unnecessary questions.
We don't pay all our employees every month.
Client does not want to pay additional fees to file 1099s electronically.
Would be great to have Pay Run Summary by Employee, listing employees down the rows and pay type across the columns (with date range options).
For example, there seems to be no easy way for me to see historically how many days late (or early) my customers pay me.
Include the nice big green button, 'Pay Now', when sending links to clients to view there QUOTES online.
After selecting a number of supplier bills to pay via check (in the USA), I would love to have the option to send remittance advice emails to the intended recipients.
This seems to be available if you pay each bill individually, but not in the batch mode.
For example, if several contacts are expected to pay today, we can then generate a summary (similar to those tracking summary) under today's date that we would know which contacts are supposed to pay by today.
I was unsuccessful in  removing the Planned Pay Date of the 'batch' once it has been entered.
They have the option to pay me in either currency.
However, it is likely to be ridiculously costly, because it does not include direct deposit, e-file and e-pay options.
For example:GoCardless & PaypalThe client could choose to pay via Gocardless or pay via PayPal.
Suppliers also offer trade terms: ie: purchase a product, pay 50% on delivery, 50% within 30, 60, 90 days etc.
Another point is that I would prefer to charge the customer's credit card directly, instead of asking them to login and pay.
You have upcoming bills, their expected pay dates.
Client PortalFreshBooks is for small businesses, and for those who pay them, too.
Quite often for clients, this means having to jump in and out of the pay run to show leave taken by an employee.
It'd be wonderful if leave taken could be done during the pay run - by adding the different leave types as 'earning lines' within the individual employee's pay run details.
However if I have posted two or more pay runs on one day this morphs all of them together.
For example, it is nearly 30 June and we have an employee who salary sacrifices super payments each pay.
When I run a pay run it would be great if some changes could be made to reduce the likelihood of error.
Note in particular "Contact your accounting software provider to make sure your software can collect the correct tax due on the registered benefits directly from your employees’ pay. "
It was a few months before we realised what had happened, and we had to pay Interest on the underpaid amount.
We pay forms 943 and 940 (not 944 and 941).
If your employee has a period of leave without pay, and no salary is paid, their salary YTD earnings will be included as "Other Previous Earnings".
Can you provide a field that could be ticked to indicated the employee is a variable hours employee,  If the field is ticked then the annual leave hours calculation be changed to take holiday pay total and divide it by the hourly rate to provide the number of hours leave the employee is entitled to.
Alternatively, could you make it possible to pay holiday pay other than only at termination?
It would be great if you could copy the pay item change the multiple and make it applicable to a group of employees.
Sometimes a pay run contains extra ordinary items and it would be great if we can track them with a note in the pay run to identify why that pay run is different for example if an employee is leaving, has changed hours, started salary sacrificing arrangements, etc.
Rather than constantly monitoring my employee's net pay every single pay run, it would be better if there was a payroll setting in deductions that only allowed the payroll deduction to deduct up to an amount that would still keep the employees net pay to be equal or above the PEA.
When entering timesheets would be good to have the employees age next to their name so its easy to know what pay rate to put in.
When we have a n umber of employees i have to go back into their employment details to find out their age then go back into timesheets to fill out the correct pay rate.
Repeat above for Year 1 to Year 4 and see the reduction in your ALA (Annual Leave Averaging), ADP (Average Daily Pay), RDP (Relevant Daily Pay).
A great feature would be to limit the number of Earnings Pay Items that an employee can see on their timesheet by only letting them have access to the Pay Items specified on their Pay Template.
Xero needs to know what to do when there is no longer any funds from the check to pay taxes with and follow the procedure as listed in the link below:http://www.
Include a facility in payroll to have an unscheduled pay run - i. e. not on the usual pay run dates.
It is tedious checking on a long list of pay items.
When doing a pay run it would be ever so useful to have a deselect/select all button on the top left above the check boxes.
It would be very helpful if Xero would automatically generate 'bills to pay' to employees (with the correct GL codes) when we finalise a wages period - or has an option to do it.
It would be very helpful if Xero would automatically generate a 'bill to pay' to IRD (with the correct GL codes) when we finalise a PAYE period - or has an option to do it.
Our workplace has several different pay rates for different areas, as well as training level wages.
That would save my company the monthly fees for payroll we pay now through Square.
Square, however, has partnered with AP Intego to provide pay-as-you-go workers compensation insurance.
8% and things are looking correct now for this weeks pay.
We have a number of staff who work in different departments  who are paid with the 8% holiday pay inclusive of their pay rate.
$27 worth of ordinary pay gets coded to Wages Motel Dept, the holiday portion of this is $2.
16 and this gets coded to Holiday Pay.
So the issue is that the holiday pay should show in the respective departments as do the rest of the Gross Wage.
Currently in payroll settings under 'Pay Items' and 'Leave' there is one Holiday Pay 'Pay item' of which one code can be allocated to it.
When you 'sort' a column on pay run (ie.
to choose that the order be by 'employee group' instead of alphabetical, it would be great if this sort function 'stuck' so that when you click into an employee, and then enter their pay details, and then you click 'save and next' it would take you to the next employee as shown on the payrun (when sorted in that method) - at the moment, it reverts back to alphabetical, and takes you to the next employee who is alphabetical.
This is extremely helpful for businesses having to calculate holiday pay due to variable pay employees.
Currently Xero calculates Holiday Pay dollars but not hours.
However the Unscheduled Pay Run - will only let me go back as far as 13 April 2016.
However the Unscheduled Pay Run should allow me to go back to any point in the pay year period.
We are unable to delete a pay item we have created by accident and have been advised  it cannot be deleted.
It would be very handy to have the ability to either customise/remove some of the system locked pay items in payroll.
Id love to see an automated feature for employees who are on the same pay every week.
Right now, we have to create an unscheduled Pay Run, manually enter the negative check amounts, and Complete the Pay Run.
It would be very helpful if the pay run had a section to say if the payslips have been sent or not when you go into the pay run.
Quickbooks payroll from Key pay has had both of these features for over a year.
However, I've already come across a problem: Our pay periods run on the last Friday of each month (eg next pay run is 26/2, then 25/3, 29/4 etc), which means it doesn't fall under either 4-weekly or monthly calendars.
We have a very transient workforce and are not prepared to pay people in advance as they may not come back to work (sadly it's happened before).
There is a feature in software called Key Pay which allows you to set up and pay your Payroll PAYG automatically with your payroll ABA file.
I enter timesheets to pay items and tracking codes for all employees.
This throws my superannuation accruals and payroll tax calculations out as I have to take that particular pay item each quarter and divide it by 1.
So say they buy $1000 of tools and wish to pay this off at $100 per week.
Allowing multiple 401(k) deductions on a pay template would allow us to manage this process much more easily, especially since we are adding more and more clients who offer 401(k).
This is a particular problem with one of my clients who runs a pub and so can have a high number of employee leavers and starters in a pay period.
If the Pay Run is Week ending 05 Jul 2015, and the employee is recorded as starting work on 5 Jul 2015, that employee will not appear in the Pay Run, which seems incorrect.
Include an archived tab on pay items to remove obsolete pay items
Also a warning should show if you try to pay a staff member beyond their entitlement.
Staff who work Tuesday to Friday for example had Queens Birthday pay added to their wage slip even though they don't work in that day.
For an employee paid monthly, 5 days a week and 8 hours a day, NZ Payroll in Xero currently defaults the hours in a pay slip to 173.
On the NZ Payroll - Pay Run Overview Screen provide totals of the Total Cost and Total Paid (posted and unposted) for each Financial Year
HiAt the moment Fair Work legislation requires for all allowances to be shown separately on pay slips, this includes casual loading.
The start and end date of the relevant pay period4.
If the employee is paid an hourly rate, the payslip must show the employee's 'ordinary hourly rate' (generally the rate excluding loadings, penalties, and allowances), the number of hours worked at that rate, and the total dollar amount of pay at that rate7.
If the employee is paid an annual rate of pay, the rate as at the latest date to which the payslip relates9.
There is a serious lack of reports available to print following processing of pay run.
It accrues every pay.
It would be great if the leave area could show at least one entire pay period.
If a manager approves is (but does not schedule to pay it), it shows "Approved" in green as its status.
I'm unable to read the earnings name in the Settings/Payroll Settings/Pay Items/Earnings due to some of the names being up to 50 characters.
Helps to ensure correct number of hours/days per pay period are accounted for.
RE: Draft Pay RunIt would be helpful if the hours worked were displayed along with the Earnings, Taxes and Net Pay.
Can we include validation of the Earnings Rate entered by employees in their Timesheets against their Pay Template?
Is there a possibility to have a non-employee contract category in payroll to both pay these employees and also more importantly pay there super thru clicksuper.
I know you can do it manually but this has to be repeated each and every pay run and it's too easy to make a mistake and miss someone.
The Pay Run Reports do not give you a cash-basis option.
I think the ability to pay an employee maternity leave without that employee counting towards the subscription would be a fair feature.
At present, one payslip message goes to all employees on that pay calendar for that pay run.
Employee list in pay runs have maximum of only 50.
Ability to search large list of employees by name in order to easily select to include in pay run.
So, when an employee is on annual leave for a week, their entire YTD pay items get lumped into 'Other Earnings Rates' because their ordinary hours, overtime etc are not active in that pay period.
Sure, if you added up last weeks YTD column, + this weeks pay, you would get the sum of this weeks YTD column - but an employee shouldnt have to do this to ensure that the YTD figures on their payroll make sense.
In xero this must be tracked manually on a pay-by-pay basis, leaving a huge margin for operator errors and potential fines from the tax office.
REQUEST:Xero should warn you if you are attempting to create the same Draft Bill more than once or if you forget to create it (say, if not done 48 hours after the Pay Run was posted).
For example, if we want to setup Groups and assign each employees to a Group, or if we want to change the assignment of employees to a different pay calendar.
The option to Pay In Advance Leave.
This way the leave booking will reported in the pay period the leave will be paid.
So, for example, if the Pay Boss is going on holidays they can have the pays all scheduled, including the emailing of payslips.
It would be great if we could get a reminder pop up when it's their birthday so that we can check to make sure they're on the right pay rate for their age.
This would minimise the risk of underpaying staff and having to back pay.
When we do a pay run, xero calculates the employee worked 23 days worth of hours, instead of 18.
We have a work around, but it is to net the refund against another employee who has a tax deduction greater than the refund so that you get correct tax figure and then make an equal and opposite adjustment to gross pay so that the individual employees net pay is right.
2) Pay the expense claim outside of wages.
This will be good to have when there are pay rate increases, change in addresses etc.
Not only that, I see from the role  that they can also Approve and Pay their own and other's expenses.
We are looking to see if an option exists to allow customers to pay by eCheck only vs the current option of paying with a credit card or eCheck.
Sometimes it is appropriate to get clienst to pay more than the standard uplift, but you dont want to estimate as that puts them into the UOMI regime.
I've come to find that Xero is calculation its average days to pay for individual customers incorrectly.
My customers pay their subscription by standing order.
I was wondering if there was any way to include my equity in the budget, so I know I have the cash to pay my budgeted expenses, even though I may not be receiving any income that month?
I manage a number of organizations, and they all have to pay bills to the same suppliers.
I have numerous expenses in USD, which I often pay on my US$ (personal) credit cards and then expense the company.
This works great because I collect the cashback rewards and I get to pay things in the native currency of the expense.
Then, once in a while, I batch together all the money my company owes me, and pay off the card.
I've been creating Bills for each bill we pay, before then reconciling against the transaction.
View and pay your bill online: https://in.
for Bill Pay.
I have too many bills to go thru one by one plus I pay bills in 3 currencies .
HelloWe were recently overcharged on a hotel bill, we were given the wrong room bill to pay!
I have entered the details of 2 employees in Pay Run and one of the transaction were reconciled.
Depending on the cost of items, I may or may not have to pay GST.
Or unscheduled pay run in prior period to get closing leave balance correct and zero out the rest?
adding up the number of hours from each individual pay run)
Plenty in Xero about how to pay expenses, nothing on how to receive them as a company.
This is their way of claiming the excess from me without me having to actually pay it.
Hello,I've made two separate payments against a single PO as I needed to pay half of the cost up front to the supplier before they would deliver my goods.
Currently my financial advisor is the subscriber, I pay this "advisor" a monthly fee to access Xero.
com/US/XeroAndroid-BillableExpensesWhen I pay a parking bill with plastic and the tip in cash, I cannot find a way to assign a Receipt for the cash outlay, submitted as an Expense Claim, to a customer.
For example, we pay in january a utility bill of the month of december.
Then you pay bill $100 for this bill, this bill become closed status.
As now, in myob,  I checked my myob desktop program,myob did not allow to export pay bill transactions.
Upon completion of the pay run, PE imports a $0.
I am now working jobs and incurring expenses on my clients' behalf that they have agreed to pay.
The customer had not paid the balance and I hadn't worried about it because I didn't think they were going to ever pay the balance, until they contacted me this week.
However, I don't have enough funds right now since some clients still have to pay up.
Given this scenario it seems unreasonable for us to pay for a full license to overcome trial limitations.
What would be good would be a special type of license that permits us to integrate with and demonstrate all the integrated features of Xero and our TMS without having to pay the full license fee.
Paying multiple bills "manually" but not using Batch upload or Pay by check.
People pay for that through Stripe.
We are selling physical product and trying to figure the best work around to manage invoicing customers to pay a deposit confirming their order.
Can Xero automatically pay out all approved expenses?
Some customers pay a contribution and the balance is setted through social services funding.
Is this feature available in the trial or do I have to pay first?
We are happy to pay if we have more than 5 employees moving forwards.
It is the first pay so it should be the same as 'This Pay' column.
Rather than repay it, we thought he could offset it against his next pay as an advance.
Her pay is different each week.
Is that limit something that we can pay extra to have lifted or is a technical limitation?
We pay the total in full by direct debit each month.
I have entered payroll information for multiple employees and approved the pay run, I have then noticed that one of the Tax lines are out by 1p.
There are 4 Pay Runs recorded, but XERO does not create accounting transaction for wages paid (and I was so happy that MYOB did this :)).
It can't be a proportion of the days worked in a year, else the full month (i. e. 22 v 21) would not result in the same amount of pay.
Option to automatically leave salary (populated in pay template) in payslip when processing pay run after creating a timesheet for the same employee.
3% pay rise (they are all on different rates) 1.
Do I break the payslips into 2 parts with pre and post July 1st, as this happens during mid pay run?
Finally employee numbers make it much easier to sort/organise the pay runs
However, we recently gave him a pay rise, and to make things less confusing renamed this pay rate 'Ordinary Hours @ $88.
99 per hour' to reflect the pay increase, and then selected this on his subsequent payruns.
I moved from MYOB to Xero about 2 years ago now and I have made sure that all of my sick and annual leave balances were correct however, I am now wanting to pay close attention to long service leave balances.
I created an employee, and a "Pay Run".
Nothing actually paid yet, the net pay is still unpaid.
The amount for Gross Pay at W1 shows nil.
When I do a pay run I want to see this come up as a liability, and when it is paid I want it to be moved to expenses.
so say I am paying them $25 per hour including super, do I put their pay template hourly rate as:$25 or$22.
The payslip indicates that we have deducted too much tax, will this automatically adjust in the next pay-run and how do I adjust the tax in the next run to compensate the employee.
As I understand it we would not pay Super on the $217 claim for work in January and so this is incorrect.
Instead the employer is going to pay her for 3 months maternity leave.
I only have a couple of casual employees on a weekly pay run.
I post the pay-run and email the payslip and that's it.
In the Pay Template I have added "Ordinary Times Earnings" and Super.
When I click save it says:"Pay template must contain at least one earnings line containing the employee's ordinary earnings rate.
Is it possible to change the Rate Type in a Pay Item from 'Fixed Rate' to 'Rate per Unit'?
I have added his superannuation details, added the line under pay template and ensured it says Statutory Rate and SGC.
due to cashflow on a few occasions over christmas i haven't paid myself (all others where) but the pay was lodged via payroll.
I have a small number of employees and their pay does not alter week to week - can I organise pays to be done automatically?
The exercise started as of January 1st 2017, with our pay week ending on a Friday.
I tried entering leave as normal working hours under the assumption (mistaken as it turns out) that this would be converted to leave in employee pay slips - i. e. the system would act on the leave instructions previously entered in the employee's files.
Is it when employee leave is approved in Xero, or once a pay run is drafted/posted or at some other point?
We have an employee who is owed lots of holidays and would prefer to take an extra week pay rather than the weeks holiday.
However when we have checked our pay runs, we have noticed that annual leave and term break (Preschool emplyees) has not worked correctly.
some of our employees have doubled their pay with extra annual leave days added to their pays.
An employee who gets annual leave has to be paid their base pay rate plus the higher of:a 17.
15%,  however I have still recorded each pay run with the old rate.
As it was back in July to now, the unscheduled pay run will not allow me to back date this far.
450 - 150 = net pay of 300Any help would be appreciated as I have been unable to find a suitable solution.
We are trying to pay an employee’s total superannuation (SG and voluntary contributions) for the financial year in advance, directly into their self-managed super fund.
00 per week and each week when I do a pay run I have to manually change this employees information in their employee details - making a change to the wage stated, i. e. $450 - I change this $1200 and then can advance to posting the pay run.
Is there a way around this without having to create a separate pay run and period.
We have decided to change the pay cycle for our employees to run from a Thursday to a Wednesday on a fortnightly cycle in 2 pay groups.
I want to view timesheets for all employees so I can do a pay run but somehow there are two employee names stuck in the "Employee'/s" drop down box but I can't clear them and I can't find any way to choose all employees.
We have a few employees so it isn't practical to select each individual employee from the list each pay run.
Is there a reason my pay runs are not showing?
(i have set the pay date to todays date 5/10)Any advice is appreciated, thanks :)Amanda
The leave had been processed through a pay run already.
In his Pay Template, I have added 'Car Allowance' as an earnings rate, and in the Fixed Amount section, left it blank.
50 a hour for regular weekdays, however we choose to pay $23.
I have an employee who’s Superannuation Guarantee Contribution (SGC) changes by 1 cent each pay cycle, where no other employee’s does.
We have fortnightly pay cycles, their annual leave entitlement is set up the same as everyone else on the payroll as are their payroll calendar and Ordinary Earnings Rate.
I have an employee who has two ordinary pay items.
I found out superannuation was not calculated on the final pay of a terminated employee (on paying out his annual leave).
After the PayRun the Payslips shows a different lower hourly  rate of pay from that on the Pay Template and the employees pay is calculated at this lower rate, resulting in the employee being underpaid.
I have checked that they are above the threshold, the are on a weekly pay run and all other settings look correct.
I've entered myself in the employees section but I suspect I must be doing something wrong on the employment tab or pay template tab.
My question is, should the pay item be assigned to 477 or 804?
I have added these all to pay items in Settings.
I have an employee who has had $504 extra PAYG tax withheld in her current pay cycle compared to a previous cycle in the same financial year with the same gross pay.
I have an employee that started on the 18/06/16 that gets pay weekly.
Their final pay of over $4000 includes a deduction for HELP debt.
This was prior to using XERO to pay employees.
To remove both the allowance and the deduction I entered an unscheduled pay run to reverse the amounts out on each employee exactly as they have been entered.
5 hours per week (no more and no less) and the salary we are going to pay her  - including the extra hours over 38 will cover her in the award she is under.
Xero calculates the PAYGW each pay period as per the TFN declarations,  so where staff have advised they have a HELP debt the calculation of PAYGW will be based on their gross taxable earnings.
If they are salary sacrificing that would be as follows:Gross Pay:  $1,500Sal Sac:       $300Taxable Gross:  $1,200So the PAYGW within Xero would then be based on the $1,200/week,  allowing for additional HELP withholding at that rate.
I have employees with different earning rates and have set up their pay items as Rate per Unit.
Is it a function of adding a pay item as inclement weather.
On the last couple of fortnightly pay runs I have noticed that a couple of Hrs of Overtime have been put through as Ordinary Hrs.
So, I reverted the pay run to draft.
I discovered this as we have removed the HELP debt checkbox on one employee recently and the most recent pay was processed without the HELP deduction.
Were I not to have picked this issue up, I would have reposted the pay run with the incorrect tax deduction.
To me, reverting a pay run to draft should still leave all pay run details exactly as they were posted regardless of any changes after the pay run.
Is it because Xero does not allow to enter payroll for current periods and then go back and enter historical pay runs for the same financial year.
why when posting a pay run it shows no employees included
At the moment we don't have the finances to actually pay ourselves but what would be the best way forward?
I have deleted an employee timesheet but not processed the pay run yet, I want to go back into the timesheet to enter the correct details but now that period can't be selected, only the next pay period is available.
I changed the default Annual Leave Pay Item to have 152 Hours Normal Entitlement and 17.
After a few months I've realised the Leave Category is Unpaid Leave and this can't be changed in this default Pay Item.
Next Pay Run Date shows as 25th April - I only ever want to have a pay run done on last day of the month - how do I set this to be so?
The employees have correct start dates, but the earliest date I can enter for them is the first date of the fortnightly pay period.
Should I have one large pay period, then switch to fortnightly?
I dont want to change it manually, I thought it would automatically change the pay?
I have started to pay ourselves a small owners remuneration amount using  normal Payroll as I thought this would be best if I wanted to resume paying some superannuation .
I did not want to enter each pay using Payroll as there were quite a number of pay runs to enter and would have been an a lengthy operation.
We have already processed 2 pay runs and I am only now getting a proper handle on all of the differences.
His pay rate has changed, I have created a 4th yr earnings rate.
The payrun is as per usual and has been posted from the pay period from the timesheet.
or can I only reimburse when she is receiving pay as well.
So when they enter there hours, they pay rate (entered by using their name instead of using a generic "ordinary hours" and this calculates their pay based on their own individual pay rate.
Till nowI recently gave a pay increase to two of my employees and changed the earnings rate under payroll settings, however they are still being paid under their old rate.
how I used to re-credit hours was; process a zero balance pay run with -# hours .
92 (thereabouts) each pay run but with the l/l box ticked he us accruing 3.
Any ideas on the best way to set up this pay item?
Could explain as I have it set up in Pay Items.
I have set up a Pay Item called Public Holidays with OTE and Rate Per Unit.
Previously sole trader and never had to worry about pay slips to pay myself.
Trying to do first pay run in Xero.
Would it be easier to pay a salary of $12 to each director ($1 per month) then pay out the monthly takings as a bonus each month, based on however much the company earns that same month?
HiI want to pay staff for a three week period and I am unable to find that option - which is not a surprise!
The pay cycle in question would be; 1 weeks normal pay and two weeks in advance due to the Christmas break.
5. in the pay run, I added a deduction line and entered the amount of the invoice6.
i posted the pay run on pay day.
The comparison between last pay's details to this details is fantastic.
For example; a member of staff is set up for Ordinary Hours for Weekly Pay, 38 hours per week with an annual salary of $50,000.
It has an option of "Based on Ordinary hours worked" but it is asking me how many hours are worked annually and each pay period but this is unknown.
Could this data be captured on the pay run output?
Every one gets their 4 weeks pay (inc Loading) and the 3 public holidays.
We pay fortnightly.
This fortnight I have the correct rate, and an overpaid amount from last fortnight has been agreed to be deducted from this pay.
I have processed a few pay runs & realized it was going to the employees old superannuation.
Now I move that person over and was hoping that in the pay run it would show how much was occurred since the change however it hasn't.
Also, I found the below article on reversing over payments in pay runs and have executed this guidance as also attached.
Or because only 1 pay run happened in July 2015 should I have only reported the first pay run?
Hard to compare tax/net pay between periods without seeing this breakdown.
In the past staff have added this as a deduction in their timesheet so that it can then be deduced from their after tax pay.
We have three employees and I've successfully run pay runs each month since July 14.
Both pays can been seen in the Pay Runs within Payroll for these two months.
We only have one calendar which is fortnightly bu the overview is showing the next pay run is one month from our last pay run.
(was told by my client that they would)So now, the pay runs are from 10th May (starting from the free trial) and I'm stuck at 21st June where I have annual leave to configure.
Bring forward my pay run to 24th July.
I have set up my two employees correctly in Xero (or at least I believe so) in terms of Annual Leave in their pay template in that they accrue 160hrs a year and have 40hrs in their work week - I selected the Based on Ordinary Earnings option.
When I do the unscheduled pay run no employees are visible to select for the pay run.
On further inspection one of the employees' termination dates was stated as 30/06/14 however his last pay was made on 7th Jul 2014.
We are required to pay two types of insurances for our construction staff.
The balance has arise from several past pay runs.
PAYG deductions MUST be cacluclated on YTD earnings and not on the assumption that that the pay is for the Week/Fortnight/Half Month/ Month or Quarter as there is no facility for an annual payroll calendar.
:-(I've created some pay templates for my employees.
I thought I'd worked it out by making different pay items which works in draft mode but once I approve it the amounts disappear and he is on 0 hours 0 dollars.
In the instructions for leave accrual for termination pay it states.
However, although this has reduced her tax for this month, it's also reduced her pay, which doesn't really make sense as she's bought the laptop and it's hers.
I am trying to do my pays but I am missing employees when I try and do a pay run?
I cannot see a way of paying the same employee wages worked on 2 categories on one pay slip.
Then go into the employee field and change their category of where they work and do another pay run for their hours at location 2!
I have to pay a real estate agent commission inclusive of Super.
Despite her timesheet being approved, the Pay Run is showing 0.
There is no 'ordinary hours to pay' that has all been paid.
5hrs out of Annual Leave to pay back Annual Leave Loading, without affecting pay rates etc?
This director does not have pay slips and only takes Director Fees which are reconciled as an expense, not as wages etc.
I create a leave application for 38 hours, create an unscheduled pay run, it asks to select week ending, I select it, check the amount of pay, tax and post it.
Same week I create another pay run for everyone else's pays for the same week ending.
We have manually attempted to fix this by entering into his pay slips the amount suggested by Fair Work Australia.
Annual leave in Settings > Payroll Settings > Pay Items > Leave is set to 152 hours.
In the employee pay template, I've tried "Calculate Rate - Fixed Amount Each Period" and "Calculate Rate - Based on Ordinary Earnings".
I have Approved the timesheets but I do not see any payroll data once I select Pay Runs.
If you wish to record your public holidays as a separate pay item you have 2 options:1.
Now I can go to "Payruns" and select individual pay periods and find the individual, then print their payslip out.
I've tried deleting leave balances and unscheduled pay runs but nothing seems to get the balance correct.
I pay for this service but you're not giving what you promised…Pleas help!
I know from experience we end up with far more unnecessary pay queries simply because the payslips are difficult to read and/or understand.
It would be good to have the line entered and the amount entered on the Employees pay template so that we do not have to re-enter it each week.
Is there anyway an employer nominate to pay Super with SuperStream requirements when they have less than 20 employees.
This is a feature I've used on previous Pay Runs (a few months ago), but now appears to be missing.
We have processed successfully 2 pay cycles.
What would you set the start date and pay date to, considering our employee start dates?
(Remember that only leave dates up to and including your pay period end date will be included in the pay run.
)Modify the number of hours you want to pay out.
Record  it as manual pay, so it won't pay it again in the normal paycycle.
To make it even easier to manage adjustments to previously processed pay runs, we are introducing the ability to process a negative pay, which could help you avoid having to revert pay runs to draft.
Thought it would be a function in the Pay Template - but cannot see it?
From this point on I am not allowed to revert the pay run to draft.
Am I the only one who finds the Pay Run process a touch clunky?
Even after that, I would think it simple to have a list somewhere of leave requests due to be scheduled, rather than having to individually schedule employees leave from their employee page, then return to the Pay Run screen, only to have to shoot back off to the next employee taking leave's employee screen.
I have double checked the pay item but cannot see any box to tick to say the leave balance should be reduced by the amount of leave taken.
What have I missed in setting up the pay item?
I am hoping I don't have to go back and manually adjust all of the pay entries.
This most recent pay run, both of them (by coincidence) had some hours sick leave.
I have posted all of the weekly pay runs and they all show up in my pay run history but they don't show up for reconciliation.
But we pay twice per month.
I have done my first pay run.
Employees (and their respective Pay Items) can only be assigned one Tracking Category.
Ideally every pay item for every employee could be allocated its own Tracking Category 1 and Tracking Category 2.
Either its not possible, or I can't seem to work out how to pay them based on their salary rather than hours.
Surely a very simple answer - but I am at a loss as to how to actually pay annual leave in Xero.
I have noticed this is an option in the Pay Template, however I cannot find any guides on the best way to set it up.
How is it when you view your payslips and it shows your SGC but is not deducted from their net pay?
So does that mean we manually subtract it from their net pay.
I've processed a pay run for single employee for one weeks pay (all rdo's accrued).
Have created purchase for pay.
Does Xero have the capability to let me know that a staff member has had a Birthday so Pay rates can be adjusted?
We have to pay into a redundancy fund for our employees that really is not an allowance etc.
The result is that the Leave Balance is showing as the total from only this weeks pay - which amounts to 2.
Have run  a few pay runs.
If you want us to apply the update to auto handle the SGC rate, check your employees Pay Templates to ensure super lines are setup.
I have a client that has switched to Xero and they pay CoInvest which is a LSL scheme where by the employer pays 2.
Using our old system we put this all on the one pay advice.
and have made the move from Pay Run to Payroll.
To order the pay items in correspondence with the company's payroll summary.
Each month that I do payroll, I have to reorganize the way that each pay item is stored.
It will likely take 8 pay periods for her to pay back the loan this way.
I had to run an unscheduled pay run on May 5, 2017, for the payroll period of April 1-30, 2017.
My employees are not paid hourly or salary, but based on commission and Piece work pay.
Since I'm switching after the first quarter of the year I'm having to manually enter the pay history of each employee before it will allow me to do a scheduled payrun.
I initiated a pay run and added all the hours, etc in for my employees, but when I hit the 'pay employees' tab I get two errors:(1) 'Contact name already exists.
Since those payments were missed, whenever I go to pay my payroll taxes and such, those old missed payments show with how many days overdue, etc.
When I run a general ledger in accrual vs. cash basis, I see some discrepancies with some of the pay run generated transactions.
Therefore the pay amount is a commission that is not the same amount every month.
Hello,I have completed several pay runs for our employees.
I believed it to be about 17% of their pay and it appears that two other employees who made more than she did had about 17% Federal Income tax withheld.
We haven't done a Pay Run.
It's still on the welcome, complete your first Pay Run screen.
The Pay Schedule is locked as well, so I can edit or change that either.
I went to do payroll this morning (thinking my employees would be paid on the 3rd because that is what my calendar was telling me) and the pay run is saying it is ended on January 31st.
I improperly posted my first pay run as Manual.
Does your payroll service still electronically file and pay these?
The pay runs were reversed in Xero from the last processed/paid period however, those pay periods still show a Paid status, preventing TSheets from exporting (see error message above).
I reversed a pay run earlier this year, and the reveral ended up crediting Wages & Salaries instead of Wages Payable.
I can't pay my employees until I correct this.
Additionally nowhere it shows whether the pay run will run automatically.
3) No options for Pay Items to be set for specific payrolls.
I am processing my first pay run for the year and have no prior payroll, so no opening balances.
That means Xero won't let me create pay runs that reflect the current quarter pay runs from Wave, so I'm stuck.
I don't see a way to do unscheduled pay runs for these.
In fact, the only pay period available to him is for 4/10/2016.
I could reconcile the net wages and taxes we pay through Gusto to this ‘bill’, but that way I would not be following proper accounting standards.
I have assigned the Holiday Group to the employee, processed a pay run that included the timeframe for the holiday, however, nothing shows up on the payroll run for holiday pay.
I do not want it to recur in the regular pay runs.
When I completed all of the Unscheduled Pay Runs, I found a few State Tax Filings coming up as unpaid and late!
-Initiate and pay via direct deposit for $3100.
HiDoing my first pay run and my employee is exempt from state withholding tax due to not meeting the income threshold but it is deducting the withholding tax.
All of our clients on payroll using direct deposit for the employees pay had a major problem this week.
"And can't revert it:"You can only revert the latest pay run for each payroll schedule to draft.
74 taken from the employee's pay.
Anyway, I set up all the deduction amounts on the pension settings and added a line to the pay templates for each employee for a benefit and deduction.
I try deleting the pay run and try all manor of methods to get the payslip to save.
The saddest part is I actually pay extra for this functionality on my Xero subscription!
Assuming these deductions are automatic shall I assume I pay them the Gross then next month they will have deductions?
Having run our first pay run this hasn't been carried out and I cannot work out how to amend the settings so that future pay runs will separate and post these items correctly.
I am not sure we were meant to pay any taxes as we both only earned £5k for the year 2016-17.
• Assuming I am wrong, and there are NIC contributions to pay, I can't seem to change my EYU to draft and update to put in the correct details• There was a duplicate submission for April, so HMRC thinks we paid ourselves double the amount.
Is there a way to show our company address on our payslips and other pay documentation?
I have set up xero payroll, and set the employees hours, ni, rate of pay.
Having set everyone's holiday group to none, I know find that if I record annual leave taken in Xero, the monthly salary is split to show pay for working days and pay for leave days, which is unnecessary and confusing.
We pay directly into a directors SIPP.
Our employees are setup on weekly pay with regular hours of 42.
First I couldnt get the timesheets to align with the pay week.
Managed to work things out by reading pages and pages of community posts and guide pages (not what you want when your staffs pay is due and you are panicking about sending the FPS in!
Another issue that I am having is that I have always sent a copy of my payslips to the employee at the beginning of the week so that they can check that it is correct before I pay it.
The HMRC asked me how much my fps was for week 1 and 2 so they could check the amounts, I couldn't find a way of finding this information in the payroll - apart from looking at the individual pay runs and adding them up manually.
In setting up our Workplace Pension scheme we have most employees whose employer pension contribution will be based on a percentage of their gross pay and some for whom the employer contribution will be a fixed amount per month.
Also, the last pay date for our fortnightly payroll was 30th March and the next one is today - 13th April.
I've been running Xero payroll for about 8 months now with two seperate pay runs, a weekly pay run for the majority of employees and a monthly pay run.
I added this salary sacrifice deduction by going to Payroll Settings > Pay Items > Deductions.
I'm trying to do my first pay run, which is due today.
It is staircasing scheme where depending on what you earn you pay more of a % income.
I cannot change or delete it from the employee's records, the pay template or the payroll settings.
We pay our staff monthly so only have 12 payroll runs a year.
We entered information about each employee ahead of doing the first pay run which would be towards the end of April 2016.
OR, do we have to bite the bullet and pay for HSBC NET ?
I was about to pay my HMRC employer contributions, but noticed a discrepancy between what they’re telling me to pay and what Xero says I owe.
2) In a Draft pay run, the Employer NI comes to about £193 but £8112 is the annual threshold so it should be £0Can anybody help?
(no employees for a month and the manual said send a scheduled EPS - because you can't do a pay run with no employees.
And so to that effect I've put in a maximum level of holiday pay to accrue which I've set at the equivalent of 28 days per year (it's realistically only the full timers who will actually reach this).
Instead it is taking the normal hours they have submitted on their timesheet and multiplying that figure by ten rather than applying their usual pay as being yearly figure divided by twelve.
The pay run has been completed, paid and RTI submitted to HMRC.
We have an employee who, effective from the beginning of this month's pay period, has had his salary increased from 37k to 40k.
The gross pay in the draft payslip for the pay run ending 5 January 2017 is only £3,289.
She started part way through this month, and I'm guessing Xero has pro rated two weeks of pay over the whole month which puts her below the earnings threshold.
HiI'm setting up my employees on Xero, but we pay some people a gross amount and some net.
We have a front office system that employees are recorded on along with their rates of pay.
is taken from their gross pay on June's pay run.
And there does not appear to be a Pay Item for pension contr.
I then realised this would put their gross pay out as the original pension cont.
I have added a Benefit pay item to the employee templates for the employers pension contribution.
in order to pay the employee we effectively gave him a loan against his pay.
Is it possible to do one for the past and adjust the pay for the "loan".
Guaranteed pay is &#163;1200.
Monthly pay is GBP2333.
I have put all of this through Xero payroll as a salary sacrifice deduction and his first payslip looked great - the gross pay, net pay and deductions all worked out.
PAYE for my employees is incorrect in the draft pay run stage.
They are set up in Xero payroll as monthly pay frequency and I want to change it to weekly as from this week but it does not give me that option.
In a nutshell, our payroll period is from 1st to the last of the month however our pay date is 5th of the following month.
I am attempting to run an Apr 16 pay run after following the instructions for closing 2015/16 payroll.
Can someone advise on how to implement this as it seems counter intuitive to not deduct it despite still having to pay it after manually calculating the deduction.
From a draft pay run, click the employee who needs a reimbursement.
Post the pay run.
I am having a problem setting up the payroll for myself in that the system wont accept that the payroll calendar should start from the day I started trading (a couple of weeks ago) whereas the date that I became a director was back in Sept 2014 - it says that the date of directorship cannot precede the start of the pay calendar.
However, due to the difficulty in assigning the benefit accurately to the employees, many employers choose to include such items in a PAYE Settlement Agreement (PSA) and pay Income Tax and National Insurance contributions on behalf of the employees (see PSA1050).
Most of our staff are on fixed pay rate but their hours vary from week to week.
My pay date is 15th monthly.
Then I have to process my pay run and get another "Successful Receipt of Online Submission for Reference 951/XXXXXXX" email.
My RTI filing page shows two submissions per month, one EPS and one FPS, though my Pay Run page tells me only the single run is being posted per month.
HelloOne of our employees has to pay student loans.
I deleted this and set up 1st Oct-31st Oct - thinking I would manually adjusted the pay.
Now for our first payroll under auto enrollment the software calculates contributions on gross pay instead of the eligible pay.
Looking at the data entered the thing that I think might be making this error is the directorship start date which it won't let us enter as a date prior to the date of the next pay run.
I created my first pay run and posted it correctly to Xero.
The client then informed me that some of the payslips showed a different net pay figure to the figures in the July payrun on Xero.
com the pay is considerably lower than it appears on Xero and the people who have been paid have said they have received more than they should.
This means the rate will change monthly and if they are using Xero to book holidays they will be paid different holiday rates of pay depending which month they look their holiday.
I have entered brought forward figures for the employee, gross pay &#163;3000 and student loan deductions &#163;8 - which relate to April/May salary (processed on my previous software).
64 Now my accountant has explained this is because we have a member of staff off on Maternity leave but she gets Statutory Adoption Pay.
It's incredibly frustrating that:1)  There is no obvious choice to help with this on the "Options" button in the Pay Run screen;2) This is not covered in the training videos.
To revert and delete a Pay Run in Xero please:Go to Payroll > Pay RunsClick into a posted Pay RunClick Revert Pay Run > YesClick DeletePlease accept our apologies for any inconvenience this issue has caused.
With this tax code entered into their TAXES we are unable to get to the PAY TEMPLATE menu option for these employees.
Potential problems recording and calculating SSP pay.
317708 and Net pay of GBP55.
I made a mistake in my first pay run.
Now I see that my employees did not receive pay for those days.
The problem is, the next pay period is showing as 1 May 2015 – 31 May 2015.
If I click on the drop-down for Next Pay Period the first one it shows is May.
4) Tracking - with tracking on (say by department) can you then track individual pay items?
My old pay runs have disappeared!
i dont really want to pay for the upgrade only to find its not suitable.
uk/workplace-pensions/what-you-your-employer-and-the-government-pay"The law says a minimum percentage of your "qualifying earnings" must be paid into your workplace pension scheme.
"I'm trying to put the first pay run through for this month - March 2015 so  bit confused by this?
Where you entered the gross pay and deductions.
How could I show her balance of Holiday Pay in her payslip please?
Can we spit the payruns or copy our company file over to a 2nd company and pay some under that file.
Holiday pay, annual leave and alternate holiday days when working stat days, plus sick leave, so specific online videos/help on this topic would be great.
Also would mean that those using times sheets would have holiday pay, Kiwisaver etc allocated to correct tracking centre instead of being unallocated.
Take home pay is correct but superannuation is coming with double amount.
If I try and do a payrun no employee has any hours - It is important that I get this sorted as soon as possible because i cant pay the wages .
The pay period runs from Monday to Sunday with the pay day falling the following Wednesday.
His ordinary weekly pay is $1500.
I understand that that his final pay would be made up of 2 parts;1) Annual Leave Entitlement (up until his most recent annual leave anniversary)- this should be calculated at the higher of his daily rate or his average rate, so this part would mean 3.
From our interpretation;a) his alternative holiday = 1 x $300 = $300b) his remaining days from the last pay period to the termination date (29/03/17).
08 x $300 = $24Thus this would total to be $5,128 ($300 + $1500 + $300+ $2,560 + $420 +$24 + $24)And his total termination pay would be $5,250 + $5,128 = $10,378If someone could give us any help that would be greatly appreciated!
so at the moment i have holiday pay showing as $483 owing, which amounts to 19 hours (there abouts).
if i pay him annual leave of the 19 hours will this take his holiday pay amount back to 0.
Also his holiday pay is showing 144 hours, is this the amount the hours we owe him now, or is this what he is owed in general if he stays employed until his next annivarsary date (01/18).
I am attempting to explain to our client the difference between annual leave and the holiday pay in Xero.
Our Client stated that he understood this, however said that there would most likely be queries from his staff as well in regards to how much annual leave they actually have owing to them with holiday pay being in a positive figure but annual leave (for a lot of his staff) being in a negative figure.
Staff member X is set up as a standard 8 hr/5day a week worker but often works more than 8 hours a day so I am expecting a higher rate of pay for the public holidays and annual leave.
His standard rate of pay = $16.
Any ideas where I can find the employees average daily pay so I can calculate this manually?
Can we put them into xero but exclude them from the pay runs?
How do I go about setting the accrued Holiday Pay back to zero as they are not entitled to this.
While there is still Holiday Pay owing we cannot remove them from our payroll.
Before the changeAnnual Leave -56 hoursHoliday Pay $9,658.
Have been trying to figure out Holiday Pay opening balances.
Payroll only up and running from July so effectively the holiday pay has been working since then.
Have tried to enter in opening balance amount, revert the pay run that occurred in the week of his anniversary to see if Xero would pick up this opening balance and re-adjust.
The others all have anniversaries coming up so easy to adjust their holiday pay opening balances.
However this has not happened; they have a very positive Holiday Pay balance, but still no extra annual leave hours applied.
The next pay run is at the end of the month, so wondering if the Holiday Pay > Annual Leave allocation occurs automatically at this next payrun, rather than on the employee's anniversary date?
Same with kiwi saver with someone who wants to pay more increase is showing on template but not on payrun?
When we did the pay run only one rate was reflected.
Employees also dislike the holiday pay - it would be easier for staff to understand if days were shown as they accrue on their payslips.
He will soon be taking 4 weeks off without pay (which we knew about before hiring him) and as such, we will be changing his anniversary date for leave by 3 weeks as we are entitled to do.
It is asking me for each employees total Gross Pay, PAYE, Kiwisaver deductions etc.
Holiday Pay is still showing as dollars and Annual Leave is in negative.
I pay a mix of PAYE employees and W/T contractors.
I keep a spreadsheet of leave owing for our staff which is a combination of the annual leave hours and holiday pay accrual value.
Everytime i try to click on the 'create' button it comes up with a warning that "The timesheet already exists for this employee and pay period" have checked payrun etc and cannot see one.
This leaves room for error, Holiday Pay and Annual Leave are not linked so you could easily go over the accrued amount and give the Employee extra Paid Leave.
Our employees salaries are Employer Contribution of Kiwisaver inclusive however whenever I complete a pay run this seems to calculate this on top of there salary.
I cant seem to make a manual amendment to their pay slips either to enter their correct pay.
If its is paid during a normal pay run the whole amount is taxed at the highest rate.
We calculate our PAYE monthly and pay it in one lump sum for all 3 of us.
At the moment, we are making it work by entering 0 days, 0 hours and a pay rate when setting up employees.
This works fine because our pay run starts with a list of staff, and $0 beside their name, (aside from one or two salaried staff).
This makes it so easy to make an error - to pay someone who never worked that week, or overpay someone their hours.
If you look at other payroll systems, they have 3-4 different methods to processes holiday pay.
In this case you would want the pay to show in the prior month, not the month it was paid.
I can't see where I can make him a casual employee so he receives 8% holiday pay and he hasn't earnt any leave because I haven't processed a payrun for him yet.
I checked include holiday pay in every pay against the holiday pay leave type.
30 which is the amount of the previous holiday pay accrued.
Is there a way of showing average daily pay?
Also, we pay out 8% holiday pay in each pay cycle.
I have gone in to the leave tab and ticked the box to pay holiday pay each pay run but this doesn't seem to be working.
I was hoping that in the "Pay Items" setup there would be an option to include/exclude the amount from the holiday pay calculation.
93 and the holiday pay rate to zero, but that's far from ideal.
Holiday pay is accrued at $500 per month ($6,000) per year.
They have reversed the accrued leave of $5,550 as at 31st March 2015, Based on Holiday pay accrued before the current pay run for April (being 31st March 2015) then accruing the $500, leaving a balance of $500 for Holiday pay.
Xero's response: balance of Holiday Pay should be $500.
Xero answer this: If my staff member was to leave on the 30th April, would I pay him out $50 or $500 in holiday pay for 3 days work?
holiday pay and sick leave.
Wen processing a pay run, I notice Xero automatically populates the employee's earnings with public holidays and other approved leave that falls within the pay period, and reduces the ordinary hours accordingly (nice!
We have had several issues trying to finalize last weeks pay.
I have had issues with Opening balances (there should be an import option from your previous payroll system), entering employee Holiday Pay/Annual Leave balances when Leave has been taken in advance (which is all of my employees due to an annual closedown), not being sure of how/where to reconcile the pay run, and now having issues with a Final Pay.
It also does not seem to recognise that as a final pay it should be paying out Alternative holidays, there isn't even an option for this!
There is no visibility on IRD PAYE payments after each pay run either.
Could you please clarify for me - If we allow employees to take annual leave in advance (either within first 12 months of employment or if annual leave has been used) do we enter this as annual leave, allowing this to go into negative, or as holiday pay?
Please make builtin PAYE calculation on Pay Run.
If you are a user of Xero and Bill & Pay, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Pay RIGHT AWAY, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Monitor your customers and find out how they pay their other suppliers.
POLi allows your customers to pay you via Internet Banking.
POLi enables your customers to pay via their internet banking.
PayPal is a safe, easy way to pay and get paid online.
An online booking and appointment system - allow customers to book and pay directly from your website and Facebook page, check out .
We run a system where we don't hold stock on our floor anymore and clients must confirm orders and pay a 50% deposit in order for us to start the order process.
Our customers pay for goods on delivery, from orders which are taken 1-2 days previous.
We import all of our products and pay in USD's with deposits paid and the balance 30 days following arrival.
Clients pay me in one of 5 ways.
Read more about Bill & Pay and sign up at .
20▪	I pay via TransferWise (TW) on 05/10 &#163;308.
(Signup software) Their VAT status is verified and they pay the resulting price online (probably Paypal, Stripe or Braintree)4.
We started using Pay Suite this year and have been having some issues.
They then pay out the commission through the Payroll module.
Why not pay some clients to give you UI and productivity feedback?
Got this today from Xero:"As you’ve posted a pay run in the last six months, we’ll move you to the plan in the table below.
"Erm, we gave up with Xero payroll 5th April 2016 (as it didn't calculate deductions properly and the email, wait, prompt, be ignored, prompt, "try this" cycle was ridiculous) so no pay runs this tax year.
I pay for this service.
The issue is related to super payments failing so it is very important that we resolve this problem so that we can pay our employee's super.
Can I not have a backdated pay period which I then pay now.
I pay for Xero.
I will pay $500 through PayPal or any other method you chose if you can get our feeds working again.
I have little confidence that any problems will now be responded to with a "tough, we can't do anything, suggest you pay us extra for the direct feed".
Normally we finish up with about 6 different people working for us in a month, but over the year we pay about 24 different people.
Internet Explorer and SafariIt's an important problem because I recommended the switch to Xero and I don't process pays today, how do I pay the Client's staff and explain the problem.
So instead of $600pa, we now only pay $2200 pa. .
with all of the technology available today, and the subscriptions that we all pay, why is it the systems are experiencing pitfalls?
##### CLUSTER 29 #####
If I had been able to quickly 'indicate' the bills I was paying at the time of paying then the reconciliation would be reduced to hitting OK. .
I think that as a customer I should be able to discuss my queries on my time, which I consider to be valuable.
To be able to allocate multiple credit notes in one go rather than one at a time.
If the transactions match rules or transactions, I should be able to quickly checkmark multiple ones and reconcile multiple at a time.
Currently BPay payments have to done individually - it would save time to be able to batch up Bpay payments and export.
If we were able to import every line as tax inclusive this would save a lot of time.
Our challenge is that the majority of travel occurs outside of Australia and we are only able to submit claims in the home currency, rendering the feature useless for us 80% of the time.
Plus I'd be able to apply a different discount next time if necessary.
Being able to do a global search on amounts, descriptions dates etc would save me hours of time.
We also have part time employees who work 3 days (always including a Sunday), so being able to individually assign work days would be great!
Employee able to select the allowance code (small, medium car rate) and enter kilometres traveled via their time sheets.
It would be great to be able to select a batch of items which require to be reconciled at one time.
It would be really handy to be able to move costs from one job to another job as we can currently do with time sheets.
I have two other employees that were able to enter time for 3/20/2016 with no problems.
Mainly, no time tracking to be able to compare quotes to actual worked billable hours.
However, it is very time consuming and we aren't able to keep track of what clients owe us very well.
We require the facility for real time recording of services to clients (including photographs of displays and completed store reports) via an internet portal and/or smart phone application with clients also able to access those reports via the same methodology.
my main needs are to be able to take client details on the mobile app, create tickets on the mobile app and to record time when onsite easily.
We have found the transition to be extremely smooth due to all the help and support provided by Unleashed dealing with Rogan the team member from Unleashed we have been able to answer and provide help with multiple questions to enable us to become trained and educated on Unleashed  in a very short time frame.
##### CLUSTER 30 #####
I've just reconciled a transaction account but there's no little tick for that account on the dashboard.
FYI, I used the Suspense account as *Some Account*, but this is just unnecessary.
I'm just converting over from MYOB and wonder whether I set it up the same as I have in MYOB with both a Term Charges Asset Account and a Term Charges Liability Account, with the main Loan account set up as a credit card?
Alternatively if we have the option for the account in the payroll item to be more than just a liability account as is presently the case.
For example, everything under the account code "cleaning" always goes into the same cost centre, so it would be useful if that would auto-populate just by selecting the account, as it's not always the same supplier?
I've just transferred an amount from a savings account to current account.
I have changed the account for both of these to another account I know works, I just can't get these two sorted out.
##### CLUSTER 31 #####
I would like some help with the PAYE transactions and how to reconcile them.
I'm attempting to make a 2-part customer statement, think like your credit card statement or utility bill, where the first page shows a summary of your opening balance, total debits and credits and balance due, and the second page shows a detailed transaction listing much like the default statement template.
I would like the income side of my budget to show hours as will as total income.
It looks like I have a Directors Loan (me) which has personal transactions against it.
Is this automatically calculated like the GST payable?
I'm in Australia and therefore would like the date to come up as dd/mm/yyyy when I manually type this in.
We run a company that looks a lot like a dropship model.
I know some expenses are not 100% deductible like food but maybe it can be because it's cost of transporting the item in.
I'd like it to display the full cost of the project, the amounts already paid, and the amount currently due.
It's very common in the industry that someone comes in and looks at a car and wants floor mats, windshield wipers replaced, or maybe the car needs something repaired before they pick it up, like an o2 sensor, brake pads, etc.
It doesn't look like I can enter a negative -$69.
Therefore, I would like to know if it's possible to do the above question.
something like a packaging slip that goes with the product.
I would like to track how many individual visits I make every year and how many shoots I do for video throughout the year, so I can get an estimated cost of insurance for each list to figure out my COGS.
Hello,I'm wondering how best to record an expense and I'd like some assistance.
I've e-mailed the accountant but it looks like they are on holiday for 2 weeks.
I also don't like the certified directory.
It looks like you can't change the currency rate on payments.
At the moment we have a lot of NoCodes123 and would like to have some consistency with our COA item numbers.
At the end of harvest i would then like to increase tracked inventory via an adjustment, taking the balance sheet 'WIP' inventory to zero.
I'd like to know how and where I record this?
We would like to convert an existing payable into a shareholder loan.
In reviewing year end, I noticed a number of problems that I'd like to fix, is there an easy way to do any of these:Inventory: we started tracking, but decided it wasn't wanted.
I'd like to make it go away.
I basically feel like someone is dangling a carrot in front of me and everytime I try to grab for it the carrot moves.
I'd like to know how much I spend buying a particular item compared to what I earn selling that item over a particular period.
Alphabetically would be preferred, and seems like it would be the obvious setting.
HiI'm UK based but not VAT registered so there's no issues with Cash Accounting or the like.
I would like to find out how to associate purchases and expenses to a customer without having it show up as billable.
It's like the other $20 completely disappears, but of course it was spent on supplies.
Looks like I used the wrong card to make a purchase.
All the capital investment has been already consumed and we would like to record the past capital expenses before we go in operation.
I have 2 entries like this.
We have taken a monthly owner draw for reasonable salary for each of our work at:Member 1: @X amountMember 2: @2X amountWe would then like to split any income left over at end of year 50/50.
When she returns receipts and any cash I would like to record the accommodation expense to our client category, and the cash back to petty cash.
Ideally i would like to track how much money i make through supplying labour etc.
I would like to enter these items as reimbursements or loans that would eventually be paid back to me, however I would also like to keep track of what categories these items belong to.
I would really like to "get rid" of it.
it would be AMAZING if there was a tax code set-up (like in MYOB) that can record this tax and input it in a separate area on the BAS (W3).
I would like to know how I set the vehicle repayments up?
i would like to ask a question regarding payments received.
It doesn't seem like anything should go into COGS until I actually realize the sale?
Below is the way I would like to recognize revenue.
My accountant said it seems like it is reversed but she isn't interested in looking at it so Im on my own.
I will transfer it all onto this service in the near future though as I like to keep control of the books.
and that is what I would like to track.
I like to keep things simple.
I'd like to see how others deal with customers who are on a subscription basis (we sell software) and have annual renewals.
this doesn't seem like a best practice and messes with projections.
Appreciate that would still give the correct year to date figures but would like to have the full analysis/breakdown on one system if possible which surely it is?
So I would like to split that $4000 expense over each week.
It sticks out like a sore thumb on my income statement.
If there is anyone who has had prior experience and can direct me to some of the discussions about how or where to enter some of these items (like payments from our subscribers, money the owner is paying himself, money being paid to an outside firm for the one person who is ON the payroll (I'm considered 'contract', self-employed as bookkeeper), etc.
US Payroll: Seems like there is one step too man when setting up an on-going direct deposit.
We would like to see more flexibility in this feature.
We have multiple owners at my company and I'd like to track each owner's contribution and draw.
What I would like to do is to make a journal ex.
I don't know if this matters but it seems like it should be zero with debits for each credit entry.
I'd like to avoid using an additional service right now as there aren't many transactions each month.
This seems like an indirect owner contribution to me.
I would like to allocate everything as best possible.
It sticks out like a sore thumb on my dashboard, which makes me sad.
I would like to switch to a Cash Basis.
We would like to monitor what the monetary amount of the donations would be.
It looks like we are still holding the money when we are not.
Or is this generally done in a separate program like excel?
As an example, I already have an expense item like "Property Rates".
If so, what would it look like?
Seems like the logical is that my equity base is that example $15,000, is it not?
I would like to change them all to Tax Exempt.
It feels like a large undertaking but I'm sure once I start I'll be good.
We'd like a clear association between these in addition to managing the deposits properly.
They feel generic to me -- I'm no accountant, so maybe that's incorrect, but they feel like "tweaks" or cleanup-fixes rather than standard-process stuff.
It doesn't seem like changing the conversion balance would be correct.
This looks like a bug to me, or am I missing something?
com - This is for the inventory management and it can be club with various sites like amazon, shopify etc see the link below and the working of this in video in that link.
Further to this I have other costs associated with the purchase, like $200 shipping costs associated with getting the goods from the supplier to my warehouse.
I would like to have the ability to run consolidated profit & loss reports for multiple tracking categories.
I feel like this is a simple thing but can't for the life of me figure it out.
I would like a view of the running balance looking forward to when those transactions come through.
I would like to allocate certain payroll transactions to the head office (eg.
If i go back to the purchase order portal its like they never existed?
Given that I have already coded them, ideally I like a way to fix it so that all 52 transactions gets reallocated automatically.
I tried the following, but it seems like I'm doing something incorrectly.
We would like to set up a control.
My company has been using QB for decades so I'd like to keep as much as possible but as simply as possible.
I would like to know how to fix this please.
I had to do everything manually if there wasn't a rule in place and now I've got some but I feel like I'm starting from scratch.
It would be great if we can import employees data like customer/supplier data.
seems like a journal entry to me ?
I would like to ask how to get about the accrual reporting correct for our setup.
We would like to take a distribution, however doing so has a tax implication because our basis will go negative.
01 every month, but I would like to track the letting agent fee.
A while ago I came across an option to send statements automatically, I ticked it but would now like to uncheck this option and cannot seem to find this again.
Like the jobs systems in MYOB.
When a customer comes in, they say I like X bed, but he does not have it so he has to order one in.
HiI would like to upload payments taken on a daily basis.
I feel like I have been tricked into joining!
I would like to know how to fix this as it looks odd.
Everything is about unit prices, inventory and it feels like it is made for a big organisation selling products.
I read things like "" and my mind boggles.
My construction client spends hundreds every day on cash expenses which never result in a bill but I would like to assign them to a customer.
Something like Date _/_/_ -  _/_/_, it will be really helpful.
I'd like to suggest a more obvious error alert when a VAT submission fails.
I would like to get copies of these to re print and file.
My apologies in advance if this has been answered, a topic search that includes the word 'expenses' returns 1700 odd results - I read through a number and didn't find anything like what I am asking.
How do i mark them off with doing it manual (per one)Please help as i feel like i have taken a back stepThanks
I would like to see this over a 2 year period.
If you have similar experience, I would like to hear from you.
That being said, I have learned so much over the last year - and I'd like a fresh start.
Me but many of my frequent clients did not like it, and I feel the experience is lacking.
I would really like to discuss some of these issues with one of your design analysts.
I would like to know if we can do that ?
However, I would like the buyer to purchase the domain from my company.
It looks like .
I am coming from a manual system and would like to manually enter my opening qty and value for inventory items.
as you can imagine there are hundreds of lines, i would like to close down the less complex 'fees' line in bulk.
For example,  like this:Workshop Revenue - Kate - AutumnTeaching Revenue- Kate- AutumnSales - Kate - Autumn
I would like to discuss advice and/or accounting services for a subsidiary there.
Is it good or bad practice to set up generic Contacts like - "Cafes and restaurants" for any food related expense?
Seriously… the answers range from ‘the government’ to ‘magic’… I really like to think of myself as a SEO wizard but the answer is actually a lot more simple.
I like to read our finances using graphs/pie charts/trends, etc.
Or does it take it down to £995 like it should?
Like some customers we sell item A for .
We would like an automatic way to know when balances are getting low.
There are a couple of small things that bug me which I would like to request to be updated.
I'd like to know what I should do and why so I can get my head around it.
I would like to change this set-up.
I would like to delete these and upload my spreed sheet which is better.
On occasion, we will purchase a small amount of food on behalf of the club for things like, filling split orders that our members don't quite have enough orders to fill.
We would like to track these internal orders.
I can appreciate that this is difficult to manage; as the banks would have their own systems and implementation of the data feed service - but is there any way that obvious things like this could be corrected?
Also, I'd really like to see the actual vs budget broken down by month so I can look back and figure out what  was spent against a budget in any previous month in a period.
I would like to change the name of the email attachment, is possible?
But from now on I would like them to enter their expenses and attach receipts.
While it'd be great if you had a Company as an entity that then had some sort of relational employees that were contacts assignable I doubt there is anything that CRM-like within your contact database.
Have a cafe who like most, receives mostly cash payments from customers (some eftpos & credit card) Some small expenses are paid out of the till.
Now that a great deal of catch-up bookkeeping has been completed, I'd really like to have a means for allocating funds in anticipation of the next tax return.
I read the thread titled "Where do I categorize something like Estimated Tax Payments? "
We'd like to hear from businesses (and accountants) who have to wait to get paid and find it hard work to find the right lenders and provide all the information needed to apply for financing.
I would like the ability to see all transactions posted to each customer/supplier and the nominal codes they were posted to!
Our financial year runs from November and I would like to compare Actuals against remaining budget till the end of our financial year.
As of now, it seems like the only way to get rid of these is to go into each repeating journal to delete it.
Sounds like something small but surprised this slipped through the net.
It's absurd that we have discussions for things like "this financial year" or "next financial year" and there's no clue as to whether it is from 2012 or 2017.
We would like to identify our top customers and would like to see their revenue at a glance.
Removing the datestamps on this forum to disguise your lack of development is like putting a sticking plaster over a severed leg.
When creating Purchase Orders would like the Attention and Telephone to auto populate  when you select the delivery address from your contacts.
I would like to see a function that can show all members of a group's tax position/estimate for the year side by side on one pageFor example, you may have a simple family trust tax return and two assocated individual tax return's.
I would like to know if in the future there could be an "insertion" created to the lines in the bills.
I'd like an audit trail for all changes to a client (email, address etc. )
I would like some way that I could make it less likely that I accidentally click "ok".
Perhaps it could all start with the click of a button labeled "Write a Check" and then a check pops-up like a real check book.
Then the form itself *looks like a real check* with all the correct fields, in all the same sort of places on the actual check I'm writing.
It would take one step out of the process which does not sound like much but i feel it would be more efficient the way i process my jobs.
The support tickets don't group together like other emails in Gmail, meaning that sometimes I have 15 separate emails on one ticket in my Gmail inbox.
As we have to send out delivery notes, this option would be useful as we do not like the customx.
I'd like to request adding a feature that allows the user to sort the transactions by multiple headers (or conditions) which will make finding a transaction you don't know its exact details way easier.
Ideally, this would simply be a merge field that I could include on the custom template DOCX; that way it can appear wherever you like.
I would like the ability to reply within my email client to a message sent regarding a quote.
It seems like this feature is hidden somewhere, or has been looked over.
See example of screenshot here from what it looks like in Gmail: https://cl.
It seems like most programs tolerate spaces, but dislike dashes.
I would like the option of creating a rule - where they do disappear. )
Quite often they have simply used the wrong category and we would like to save the back and forth by simply correcting the timesheet.
The interface is blissful and the app works tremendously well, HOWEVER, for people that want to detail out 'what was it for' and put in notes for a transaction, it is a nightmare to type in (Each Word Capitalized The First Letter Like This) and it is is impossible to copy and paste in text, not only from other applications such as SMS, e-mail, or notepad to the app, but even internally within the app.
I'd like to see an option to include 'all' contacts and export as a csv.
I would like the notifications of sent/accepted quotes etc to be send to two email addresses i. e my email and the works controllers email.
(Proceed/Cancel)This would really help to prevent me from looking like a fool to my clients again when invoicing them.
However, it is not like there are a lot of reports.
What we'd also like to see is a separate discount section at the bottom of the page where you can automatically adjust the discount.
I would like a field (or fields) in the inventory database that links a given item to a supplier (or suppliers).
Our employees would like to have a calendar view in My Payroll, identifying who is on leave and when.
We would like to have an expiration date on credit notes that we send out.
I would like to see history notes at the bottom of the screen in the budget manager (similar to those on bills/transactions), and details of changes being pulled through into both the History and Notes area, and the Assurance Dashboard.
Would like the ability to apply a rule within a split transaction when coding
I would like to see Credits added to this function.
I would like to see, if possible, this come up automatically to reduce the fiddling when paying annual leave.
would like to print checks directly to printer rather than:Print checkConfirm check printPrint nowopen PDF fileThen print PDF fileHow about:Print CheckYes
However to check each transaction like that is a very lengthy process.
I'd like to attach the notes to # the Dashboard# the Help menu dropdown# specific screensCurrently the option are Post-it notes on the screen or some independently hosted web pages.
I have tried by sending blank values, null values(its throwing an error like "Input string was not in a correct format.
I'd like the ability to make notes on a contact.
I would like the link to the online bill in the actual email to look the same as in the attached PDF copy, so instead of the long link https://in.
Along with how much I would like to be allocated.
I'd like some idea of when this might be made available?
It is a way to process ACH-like payments without revealing routing and checking numbers to either parties.
We would like one of our employees that is based in the US, to have a payrun in USD.
Tracking name 'department'I'd like to register 500 in marketing department and 2.
Would like it to be populated with general text and about 300/400 count.
Like all the big tech companies (Apple, Google, Facebook, Amazon, SAP, Oracle.
On the email templates we send to clients, could we put our logo on these emails, as some people think it looks like spam.
I would like to request a feature.
Would like the ability to scroll to the next, or previous, GST return in sequence.
I currently have an Excel file that I enter all my journals in and this looks like the FORMS we would fill out in the "OLD DAYS OF PAPER"  I then run a macro over this to import it into MYOB, HANDY TAX or WhateverThe Manual Template to be imported could easily be formatted to look like a Journal
as opposed to other reports like P&L filtered by Job .
ideally if you could build custon ratios then we could calculate the rations we like.
I would like to see an acknowledgement when I send out payslips via email.
I would like to search by "Date".
It would be great have more options, like Quarterly, Yearly, or Irregularly.
I would like to see this annoying limitation fixed.
We would like to lock down that all purchasing and invoicing done by that user the tracking is set to his tracking field per line.
Ideally I would like all users, or nominated users, to receive an email notification of the changes made so any unusual activity can be flagged.
Idealy we would like to integrate certain tools and automate some services, this is not possible until the databases are right.
At present if you attach a word document as a file, it cannot be previewed like PDFs.
Specifically tier 3 in my case but I'm sure others would like access to various other reports
I'd like to see three or four columns of dashboard columns.
If the leave is a week away send them every twice a day then when the leave is 3 - 2 days away send them like every hours (bug the hell out of them.
We'd like to see the Date update automatically to the date the document is sent to the client.
It should be like this.
I really like the fixed asset tool you have for depreciation!
Instead of that field being completely blank on the form, could it show as something like "TFN recorded"?
Given the explosion in SMSFs, this would seem like a great market to get on board, and as the SMSF grows into more complex investments, it might upgrade to a higher level plan.
Seems you cannot sort this like greatest to least, least to greatest, etc.
I would like to have the option to post the whole disposal in the current month.
For most cases this is fine but in some instances if the heading is something like Less in a calculation it looks a bit strange to have Total Less and it would be great if we could edit the total headings for these circumstances.
Would like to see flexibility in modifying the Income Statement Display.
I would like to see this feature expanded to the US region.
Couldnt find anywhere where I could recall the document before it was opened, like you can with an ordinary email!
I thought if I put it up here I wanted to see how many others would like to have this feature available too.
I would like to request that a secondary Credit Card be added to the subscription in case of problems with the current Credit Card such as obtaining a replacement card.
I would like to suggest a grace period of 45 days.
I would like to receive payments from clients through Venmo.
I would like to recheck Fixed Assets calculation of each item of fixed assets code.
I would like to see who the approving Manager is.
Ideal for things that are renewed annually but paid monthly by direct debit like insurance, novated leases, loans etc.
Good DayMy client needs to track divisions and farms and when reporting they would like to select certain items under the above tracking categories.
I also get a bunch of emails from many fake/spam sites that look EXACTLY like this.
A bit like the recurring transaction feature in MYOB desktop.
For example like budget v actual variances.
Seems like an obvious one, so I'm surprised it's not already changed and makes me wonder if it's a local setting managed by our admin.
A simple option like that on the income tax return would be fabulous.
Would like to see a Lay-by section.
34 it would go like this:Key Press   Data Shown1          12        123     12.
We would like to request the ability to run inventory reports excluding inactive items.
Things like: "Expense reporting deadline is 10/30 at noon" or "2015 mileage reimbursement rate is $.
First world problems - but it wreaks havoc when you're entering data like a speed demon.
We would like this to be optional.
Ideally we would like to only send statements to a different contact.
However, if there was an extra field available in that list, being Group, or a switch to turn on and off something like "keep group clients together", that would be helpful.
All jobs for clients not currently assigned to a client group could simply be listed together under something like "unassigned".
Would like the ability when entering multiple line Items on a purchase order to allocate whole purchase order against one tracking option instead of having to enter on every line Item.
We would like to hide disabled (archived) customers from Aged Payable/ Receivable Reports.
Would like to email customers with a attached document, given there is no function to attach an external file when emailing statements.
Today is the last day of our financial year and I would like to archive away Oct 2014 through to June 2015 folders.
I have a client who would like the ability to send two different versions of statements, or at least two different covering emails when items are overdue as opposed to within terms.
Would like to see a button to elect to not show comparative balances within the Financial Statements, most probably at the publish stage.
We used to put some important information in Description filed, like asset location, suppliers purchased from, any reference number and etcNow it is impossible to allocate an fixed asset easily from a list of more than 100 assets by searching description.
First, I would like to say I love your product.
For example attaching a photo as a reference to a query and the like.
Would like to attach a screen shot to better illustrate.
I would like you to improve the parsing capabilities of the boxes where users enter a date to specify the required reports.
we currently have agents that sell our products for us, I have created their own customer lists however they like to see who owes money and for how long it has been owing.
When using third party document management services like hubdoc, the file inbox can quickly become a mess of unhelpfully named images.
Hello,I would like to see a feature that allows multiple Fixed Asset Changes to be made at once and also selecting multiple Assets to Register at once.
I would like the ability to do analysis on Debtors and creditors on an individual level.
If you like, I can provide you with the JS code to do it.
Would like a less lengthy clicking process to see an individual contacts bill list.
I would like to see more employees in the drop-down list under employee name at PAYROLL/EMPLOYEESPresently you hit the dropdown list and only 4 employees are listed after which you have to scroll down with the mouse or wheel.
I would like to export a spreadsheet with all products listed.
Or, even better, permit variable text formatting in the email template so things like email footers etc can look their best.
I would like to start typing immediately.
A client of mine has asked if the following is possible and if not would like it as a feature request.
It would be very useful to have other options such as round(,), Integer(), Absolute(), rounddown(), roundup(), average(), plus text formulas like left(), right() , Mid(,,), etc.
I'm sure there are a number of partners out there with YouTube channels they would like to link to their profiles.
Can it be removed, or auto sum like the other total.
I have some clients that like it attached, and others who are fine with the link option.
The ability to classify Items into Groups or Types already exists in other Inventory management systems like SAP, Unleashed etc.
I would like the library to rank the emails received by the oldest date first.
What re found to be missing was the ability to decline a purchase order submitted for approval like you can do with expense claims.
2 things I would like to see.
I would like to see this option introduced
: width:100%, height: auto;Browsers like Firefox and Opera and Chrome have available an addon called "Stylish".
If the untrack item will also reflect the quantity on hand like the track item, this will actually solve the problem!
We would really like there to be a tab for “Declined” quotes.
I would like to include the description field when I view the inventory list.
This would be like sub folder creation and storage of documents to make it easier for Accountant at year end.
I would like to see the negative stock on hand.
Would like to have the feature added to edit repeating bills.
I would like to see a step that enables us to receipt the product into stock before we have to bill it as they are 2 different stages to the process.
I'd like to see a checklist on the Dashboard, so that at a glance I can see which clients are up to date.
They do silly things like insist on reporting fair value measures of assets in spite of the fact that none of the assets are measured at fair values.
Sometimes it doesn't recognise that an employee has worked on a Saturday or Sunday and applies the mon-fri award rate - (under paying the employee) for this reason I do not like to tick all timesheets and approve in one go so I have to click on each employee, check the rate is correct and then approve and then close and click on the next one.
But when it comes to purchases from companies like Amazon, while the  and (usually)  will most likely be the same, the  is almost always different.
If you had a company with multiple locations and would like to allow location specific access with granting full access this feature would really come in handy.
I would like to see the ability to set the Default page you reach within a company after you login.
I would like to see the following:1.
My client creates supplier credit notes everyday, like 10 minimum a day.
Often we have additional, variable charges for our customers, like support tickets.
We would like to view Activity Statements for bills the same way we have view them for customers.
Has anyone ever needed to have different colours on the stars like gmail has?
Do you have anything like this in the works already?
Clearly there would be no financial details on this, what would be great is if there was a "Job notes" section to put any information specific to the individual job, like "be careful of the dog!
Seems like you guys have the resources to setup same sort of system where I could have an online purchase order template customers could access, choose products, and submit an order.
Clients would like to put their logos onto the reports along with ours.
I suspect a feature like this will become particularly important when the (very useful sounding! )
When sending statements to our clients I would like the date to automatically open at the actual date of sending and not the end of the month.
I would like to set up all those client contacts within the one 'customer contact' page to avoid having too many unnecessary pages.
The tracking feature looks like a good fix for this except it is way too labor intensive.
Makes it look like the reports our of our own firm, rather than our clients!
As the principal of a practice when a client adds me as an adviser to their file I would like the ability to delegate that authority to staff members under me.
Also even with months I like to see the month in the previous year (i. e. run a P&L for Sept and see all previous months including last Sept).
MANY other Saas systems that email on behalf work like this.
00 but if its a leap year like 2012 or 2016 it will consider $1,002.
Like employees when they send leave requests they can choose whom to send and the authoriser gets notified via email.
I would like to see a third type of statement added.
I would like an email button alongside print button once bills are approved (similar to buttons on statements)
We would like to compare actual figures with budget figures from a specified date range, i. e. 1/07/2013 to 31/05/2014.
We've found this to be one of the top 10 requested User Roles - as seen in the main  and we’d like to get your feedback.
If there’s something else you’d like to see, feel free to  too.
I would like to see the program return to the start point after editing a transaction.
I would really like to see an app specifically designed for purchase orders.
Like, part cash and balance by credit card.
A few things I'd like to see:1.
would like a desktop short cut and some snazzy icons
Would like to see a function that would allow others to refresh.
This seems like it should be a completely standard feature in receivables / payables reporting.
even something like exporting the orders into a CSV and then uploading this into one purchase order?
I would like to see the Budget Manager to have a Cash Basis option.
Looks like a lot of people want a quick login.
Would really like to see a Daylite (CRM) connector
I would like to see a lot more user options.
My staff write things like "", "" or worse in here because they are forced to enter something.
We are an environmental company and really don't like wasting an entire sheet of paper for each check we print.
I would like to have a flat tax feature as a dollar amount.
Suggestions:  (1) Short date entries like "31/12" should default to the closest 31 Dec (past of future 6 months).
I'd like to suggest a Filter feature where I could enter a string in a search field and filter the list of transactions.
I would like a way to alert my accountant or bookkeeper to individual items that I would like them to review.
Like your many other feature requests have asked for.
I would like to see this offered in the AUS version as well.
I might be missing something but I'd like it if the inventory items cost was listed as including GST or not.
I would like the ability to not apply discount to certain inventory items by default; e. g. carriage/delivery.
Maybe also a marker on statements like (D) by the side to show it is disputed.
I would like a Print Address Label option similar to the send statement option where you can check off the clients you wish to contact and print the address labels.
Because I rename the 4 areas provided in the title page it then leaves me no other space to input any other detail I would like to have on the title page.
I would like the option to drag and drop/insert lines anywhere.
I would like the  same options with Spend & Receive money.
For users like us with hundreds of PayPal statement lines every single month, this means that what used to be a simple click and confirm now requires at least 5 clicks through different screens.
I guess this is priority for people like me who train, but I imagine it must happen to few others too?
Instead, we'd like more options, like a menu of dashboard items which can be added.
Also, it doesn't have a way to exclude any payments made by credit card or 3rd party network like PayPal to accommodate the 1099-K exclusion.
Ideally, I'd like a couple of words, as an option to a calendar.
I would like to see a very simple communication system implemented under the Adviser tab.
If there was a note section, the accountant could write something like "Have extracted FY12 data.
For example, if ordering a large number of items, our supplier might give us a 10 per cent discount that I'd like to apply in a single line after the subtotal.
I would like to raise this request in these forums and see if there are any additional users out there that are needing API functionality for Overpayments and Prepayments.
I would like to have the ability to have the words OVERDUE on a statement to be in red and maybe bold as well.
Perhaps a feature like Excel's Split Screen or a sub window that fits the users screen would work
It would make sense to make this screen behave like a spreadsheet with familiar shortcuts etc.
Looks like an interesting alternative to PayPal.
I would like to see unique receipt numbers which I can enter onto the paper copies of receipts submitted with expense claims so that I can track back from files to claims.
I'd like to see a faster way of editing transactions.
(2) make the edit function a client-side java script option so that we don't have to wait while the screen is refreshed with the edit screen (I like this option).
I would like to have the option to select the area that I am Tracking when I look at the Trial Balance.
Systems such as Recurly or SnapBill automatically send out reminders, track payments, and in some cases have an ongoing authorisation to take payments automatically like a Direct Debit.
If you'd like to vote for .
Another thing we'd like .
How about adding a "like" or +1 button to save people having to write posts with no content.
I'd like to see this also link directly to the transaction for simple editing.
I'd like to edit the payslip template.
I'd like to see a workflow for payments.
I would like to suggest that the payroll deductions would only allow deductions up to a certain net wage limit.
It seems to me like this would be information that employees would benefit from, yet it's not available to them.
In particular, I would like to see the Tax Filing status - especially if there are overdue payroll taxes in the list.
Currently, we are opening a branch and we hope to put a different tracking category but it seems like the payroll setting does not allow two employee group to be selected.
We like to track the employees assigned to other location and which division they are in.
It would be similar to the Superannuation Contributions so it shows your employee that you have made a weekly contribution to the Redundancy, Long Service Leave Fund but these contributions are not part of their weekly gross wages so shows up as a separate total exactly like the superannuation Contributions.
I'd like the ability to track not only hours on projects but also the second tracking category which would be the phases of the project.
I like to record the details of any important conversations I have with staff in regards to their employment.
Can you re-align it like you recently did with the payslips?
We would like to have access to the 2 Tracking Categories in Timesheets.
Would like to see a flag / error message pop up for common errors such as incorrect National Insurance numbers when we first enter the information into the employee tabs.
I would like my manager to enter timesheet's for my approval but I don't want them to see what anyone is paid etc
If there isn't could we look at getting something like this in the near future.
When you type in an employees date of birth, it would be great like other accounting software it shows the age of that person, so much easier to work out rate of pays for junior employees
(Like you can in MYOB) Take seven times longer for seven employees, twelve times longer for twelve employees, nineteen times.
We would very much like to see the limit of employees greatly increased from the 100 mark.
We sell a finished product, which is made up of quite a few components, each of which I would like to track in inventory.
It seems like such a basic requirement so I'm wondering if I've missed something?
I would like them to appear in my profit & loss reports that go to my accountant.
I would like my document numbering to continue from where I left off.
Very frustration and seems like a pretty silly flaw.
We tend to like to check our GST this way (seeing what has been coded to each code, rather than by 'date'
However, looks like too many steps for every statement.
Like the Partnership Program.
The only way I can think of is to redo the PO/Bill as tax inclusive, but it seems like maybe there would be a more correct way?
So I'd like to make refunds over API too.
Hello All,I'd like to archive some old contacts.
I set it for sometime in December and I would like to change it.
Workflow Max seems like it could work.
It would be great if we could sort it by the various columns and print in the order we like.
I would like to get rid of everything prior to April 2016; I know I've entered everything correctly from this date onwards.
We have a portfolio of 50+ units, and I would like to automate the book keeping process and allocate expenses to specific properties.
It acts like it is searching but nothing.
If any Manager or anyone who actually can help me would like to contact me and resolve this issue, I would be happy to work with them.
I assume it has been as it seems like a common potential issue.
In the profit and loss page under compare periods, I'd like to have a feature which I can view or select 2 or more branches.
It looks like my credit card expenses are coming in as both spent and recieved:https://www.
I having trouble with trying to get my Purchase Order to look the way I would like it to.
I've got a several customers on old pricing and would like to set a default price for them.
My customer makes lots of repetitive purchases from petty cash, and it would be really helpful if we could have an import facility - like we have in purchases.
I like to complete a description of a completed job on the last row of this table.
Seems like that would be a useful feature so that you (or your Advisor) wouldn't have to remember to run the depreciation each month.
I have asked support if there is a quick way of selecting say 10 bills under the wrong supplier and moving them to the correct supplier (like I can do at the click of a button in another package).
Things like pressing the reconcile button it goes grey and then goes back to blue and doesn't reconcile so you have to refresh the page and then it disappears.
We would like to identify what items each clients have bought.
Now we would like to refund only the tax amount.
I feel like we must be missing something obvious.
i send remittance advises to my suppliers every month like below:https://snag.
It looks like that the entries may be going in in reverse?
So a rule like: reference contains MH-EXPENSE  does not match  'XXXX YYYY HM-EXPENSE ZZZ'This is an extraordinary bug that seems to have been reported on several occassions recently.
What I would like to do is have a bill that is generic.
We are currently exporting as a csv, manually formatting the file, and uploading to Barclays, but I would like a more robust solution that doesn't require manual intervention.
I like them all to have their own user access for audit trail purposes.
But I want to make a universal change like say a price increase to all products?
I would ideally like to show both.
Can I archive it like it would be if I’d created a bill from the inbox?
So whilst in practise, it appears to be more like a 'Spend Money' transaction, I'm inclined to still class this as a Bill.
I would like to suggest a drop down box  being available to see more information on that particular contact, for example email address, address & phone # without having to save, go to contact list, search for contact.
Do like the program though.
Now I would like to split them up - which i have done.
Would like to review the occasional email for extra details I may have added.
It looks like it can't be added yet though.
I would like to keep this automated if possible.
So with that in mind we'd like to track the virtual cost of those replacements as we go along by way of a skinking fund or similar arrangement.
I would like to delete them all.
I am trying to clean up a mess I inherited and would preferably like to void these the easiest way possible.
I would like to get every expense that happened on that "project" all at once so I can go through all of them in an excel sheet later.
I would like to get it "below the line" and have an adjustments to net income line item.
We have not categorised our contacts like this other than the country they are located in.
For a company I'm working on, they would like to know how much of their advertising category was spent on their launch party.
Not sure the official accounting term for this, but maybe called something like Service Date Range.
We have the occasional problem if a client comes back with a faulty product and would like a refund.
I'd like to create a grouped Profit and Loss in one of the companies and export the layout to the other companies.
I would like to resolve this issue if possible.
Something like the followingCard Number: _ _ _ _ / _ _ _ _ / _ _ _ _ / _ _ _ _    Expiry:  _ _ / _ _
I would like to move to a more automated system where the person doing the inventory count scans a product barcode and types in the number of items in the warehouse.
We have a 2 page pdf of terms and conditions and I'd like for this to be included in the email that goes to the client.
So rather than email an online link to these clients, we'd like to preserve our process and run the card ourselves.
This is an action I have performed many times in the past without problem so it feels like something that may have crept in the recent update.
Sad to say, it's not tracking that I am looking for, because tracking is like, for segment reporting.
This seems to be available from the Contacts screen but if I'm dealing with invoicing I would like it to be available from the invoicing screen.
I'd like to see a third option for "customer refund".
Also the ability to tick the first item and hold the shift key, click the bottom item and have all items in between ticked - like in cash coding.
Is there some kind of <<GotoNextRecord>> option, or something like that which will allow me to print multiple records on a single page, using a DOCX template?
I would like to see the contacts name.
05 but I would like that multiplied out so it also gives me the $6.
These include items like Hosted Email, Backup Products, Anti-virus and IT maintenance services.
I would like to know how are my expenses splitted according to few different VAT rates.
I would like to scan documents to be held in notes in the contact sectionAn example of this is I would like to scan current REGO papers to be held in notes in the contacts section
I have little knowledge in terms of Portuguese Accounting Policies so had to go on what their accountant said, but would like to see if anyone has worked out a way around this, or any other useful information.
Are we better off using something like WooCommerce for WP which can also integrate.
I would like to suggest a feature whereby I can import transactions; and not having to enter them line by line.
I would like to request that manual journal  can also be exported to excel as well as PDF - would definitely make my life easier!
We’ve a number of great resources for your students, like videos and case studies, and we’ll share them here.
But it doesn't seem right as that would make it look like I've earned the £11.
We would like to pass the 2.
HIMy client would like to ensure that more goods are not shipped to a customer, if they are above their credit limit.
I know there are services like Zapier which may or may not help, but i'm finding with Zapier that should it miss a transaction, it cannot go back and pull it in later.
If I want to charge let's say a flat fee for an accounting service, it should not have to be "rigged" to look like an inventory item, when it is not.
I'd like to see all payments and total sum of to a particular vendor over the past year.
something like the check register in QuickBooks.
Like we have two types of discount methods:1.
I would then like an email to be sent to the client when the timesheet has been submitted and the client to log in and authorise the timesheet.
Basically I would like to compare budget to actual from a cashflow perspective.
I'd like to know how much we are spending on each project and how well are we planning/executing.
If anyone has any ideas on what might have happened or similar experiences I would like to hear.
I'm assuming that it must be a purchase that has at least a certain amount of value to it – something like a computer – or could i include small purchases such as filing cabinets or furniture?
Is there some way to split a transfer like that in 2?
What this means, is that I like to keep things extremely tidy and have my 'best-practice' set from day 1.
I would like the option to reset the demo company file with 1. no transactional data2.
What I would like is a list of cheques and transfers.
Some clients and their bankers do not like the fact that current assets are put on top of the fixed assets.
Like a pre check before sending the auto Super Batch
we would like to deduct the payments from his payroll by applying the fact that this is a deductible expense for a programmer in an it company.
I have set it up EXACTLY like a previous employee, who this one is replacing.
Also, ideally, we would like to have both automatically calculating the same as for everyone else?
This seems like an obvious question, but I'm struggling to find the answer.
Does anyone have any advice (that a newbie like me can understand) on how to find and fix the causes of this issue?
At the moment it looks like it is lumping three months together as if I am paying my super quarterly.
Would like to make this as attractive as possible to get the staff to participate
I don't think this is right at all as for example (maybe not the best example) there might be 2 people in organisation that don't like each other and one is trying their 'best' to perform better than the other person.
We have a staff member who has been with the company 7 years  and would like to setup long service leave in Zero for this employee and transfer over into zero her current long service leave balance as she is now entitled to pro-rata.
I have a few employees that would like to salary sacrifice to their superannuation using their hours worked and not a percentage or a set dollar figure.
I would like to get some input on how to setup a novated car lease as part of a salary package.
Some super funds like AMP have numerous funds all with very similar names but different SPINS.
The hours accrued are much higher than they should be and I would like to make an adjustment.
I would like some clarification that the leave accrual method is correct for the client?
After doing some calculations - it seems like it is adding the leave balance and all leave that would have accrued since 1st July.
I would like to input how many hours were accrued.
It is far harder to read with the smaller fonts used, the sections are less delineated and, personally, it looks like a payslip you'd print from a old budget DOS based payroll system.
I would like for us to be paid based on an annual salary and to be paid at the middle and end of the month.
Would you like to include supplier details to the ATO?
Once we have agreed and discussed all the pros and cons then I would like to enter it in to the Leave section.
After the fact puts me in an awkward situation, and it was never like that until these portals arrived.
I would like pop up options for admin that has a block effect in this case.
It is sort of like Superannuation.
I think I can change the initial PTO balance by hand as needed, but that seems like a bad kludge.
Hello - I am setting up a payroll which I would like to parallel run with my existing payroll software for June ready to go live in July.
It's getting close to payroll day and I'd like to get it sorted.
It seemed like more than a little bit of a coincidence that the staff letters were all dated the same day as my week 1 FPS.
I haven't seen an NI hike like this before, can it be right?
We would like to track revenue and expenses on a project basis and we were thinking of using a tracking category for this.
This seems like a bug to me.
00' is too large</Text>Looks like a bug in the NI calculation for directors.
The issue here is that i don't want to be on an annual method and I want the NIC deductions to be made monthly like they were for 2015/16.
In general, I would like this to be covered by more documentation but specifically I would like help in filling out this page so that I can proceed!
Its like the tax codes mean nothing?
These all seem like fairly basic changes and alterations but I cannot find how to alter.
I'd like to split the wages costs between employees and directors, which doesn't seem possible during the initial set up.
I'd really like to fix this as it causes problems with public holidays falling in the wrong week now.
ReportAmigo can:- produce collaborative reports including charts, comments, and notifications- distribute them daily, weekly, monthly, and quarterly through email & SMS- measure engagement, store historical reports, and moreIf you'd like to try it out, please sign up at:https://www.
I would like to have her do more of the purchasing as well and I was hoping for advice on how to do this with workflow.
My thoughts were something like generating purchase orders and setting up an automatic alert email for my wife to grab a PO and order the parts, then receive them and hopefully an automated alert to tell me and my subs that the parts are in.
But it seems like it should be possible to do what I want.
It took me to a blank page that has address like this: my domain name /wp-admin/post.
We would like to produce reports by customer, not a sequential list of successful payments.
I'd like to take payments online with TransferWise
we have a client that is a MOT Centre and would like automatic emails sent when their renewal is coming up.
interested to hear your experiences, looks like what I am after.
The lack of control over this sort of thing makes me feel like we're still in the Wild West.
We would like to have the option for an inventory component.
We're aware that we can do this manually however there's something like 50,000 orders each with different VAT codes because we do a lot of overseas trades and to be honest it's a bit of a daunting task.
We would like to offer a free 6 months subscription or 300 bills if you help us validate our product.
Contact me if you would like to discuss further or see www.
I have 2 thoughts on how to better handle this situation neither of which I like all that much, I am hoping for something better!
Seems like a lot of work.
Ideally we would like something that accepts predetermined stock codes, uses barcodes or QR codes and, in effect, handles multiple warehouses because each employee would be a stock holding site.
I run a growing music school and have been looking at apps like timely, booking bug.
We will continue to design and develop intuitive Point of Sale solutions, with the ability to extend functionality through integration partnerships with all leading online and mobile services like accounting, payments, loyalty, inventory, e-commerce and more.
What I am left with in PURCHASES are those that I have paid for in cash or with a private credit card and I would like to send them to EXPENSE CLAIMS.
We would also like to ensure our clients can login & have up to date progress reports/pictures of the job.
I do like the idea of all-inclusive system.
I would like to edit my expense claim details, mainly the applied code, due to mistakes in my bookkeeping.
He would like to have the aged debtor reports generated fortnightly instead of monthly.
In particular I'd like to know how well RentPro or PocketRent run the client accounting side.
So I'm looking for feedback like "We setup eWAY and it was easy, and works well" etc.
if we used something like Unleashed etc.
Currently it all seems like a manual process (Export & Import CSV).
Would that be recommended over others that seem to offer similar, like ProWorkflow from what I understand?
I would like clients to be presented with boxes to complete (as in a Simplex D book) for daily takings and  cash payments.
Also have a client who would like to track commissions owed to suppliers for selling their products online and wondering how to efficiently streamline this process.
ideally would like this to be automatic.
We'd like to hear from businesses (and accountants) who have to wait to get paid and find it hard work to find the right lenders and provide all the information needed to apply for financing.
It is like the person reading my emails is on another planet!
That is one example but it seems like it applies to 90% or more of the documentation.
It has been like this for the last couple of updates.
When someone interested in transitioning asks me how I like your system I tell them to go with QB instead because you refuse to address basic functionality like check printing.
I don't like Intuit as a company and QBO is full of bugs but I'm starting to feel I may put up with it all.
If you select 'I would like to receive email updates about this discussion" .
It really feels like a 'computer says no.
This may not seem like much, but when you have a backlog of receipts to go through, speed bumps can quickly get annoying.
Seemed like a good place to start.
It is Saturday, so really would like to know if I will receive any help over the weekend?
I don't like to appear sarcastic but I AM TRYING TO GIVE YOU MONEY - WHY ARE YOU MAKING IT SO HARD FOR ME?
Your search only works up to something like 12 characters and then displays NO RESULTS.
We received a reply from "Sam" : "It looks like XXXXXXXX Ltd has never received an Early Adopter Pricing Adjustment, this pricing adjustment was only made to specific organisations with specific set up's.
We would like to know if there are other users in the Phillip Island area to enable us to meet/share ideas to enable greater effectiveness.
really question if the change was worth it as I spend like 6 hours every month to adjust, previous software I could bulk adjust   and was done in about 1 hour.
It seems like niggle, but page after page it's enough to notice and be frustrating.
If this is the case, my request is, as a paying customer I would like access to help.
The problem goes like this:1.
It doesn't work for businesses like us that we required customer to prepaid before we proceed to buy a goods.
I would like to say that after having received our first file back from Jet Convert, we are very impressed.
ETC: After a google search it looks like an all-caps address without punctuation is required by the UK and preferred by the USPS (where have I been?
01So even though you added the facility to charge for little items like SMS messages at 0.
My husband, who is  a very experienced programmer, has suggested that this looks like a 'floating point' calculation is being used in the background, rather than a 'decimal' calculation.
There must be a fairer way to charge for your service than to pretend that a small company like ours is a medium sized company.
It feels like the matching is getting misled, though, and I think it could be improved.
How many users would like to know that.
I have done an online webinar, bought a book, but with software, there's nothing quite like sitting in a room at a presentation and sticking your hand up.
Feel like there are some good aggregate data points that could be pulled from that type of knowledge.
I like the latest round of updates.
We have over 200 regular customers who we like to treat somewhat individually - often order fulfilment needs to be completed very quickly and this would help us avoid oversights and other mistakes.
I'd like to know what's coming up and how I can then incorporate that in to the service I offer my clients!
I like the feel of the system and the fact I can access it from anywhere.
I like the fact you now have this community forum.
I like the enthusiasm shown at the Roadshow.
##### CLUSTER 32 #####
To record it in Xero, I created a bill for say $100 and coded it to PAYE Payable account.
I have recently setup Xero and notice there is a Tax Payable liability account.
I spend hours trying to get info from GoCardless yesterday, they made me set up a 'GoCardless for Xero' account and only later told me it doesn't have the same functionality of the normal GoCardless (plans) so had to cancel it and start again.
So if I bought books to be sold through our website, I reconcile the purchase into the COGS account in Xero (=direct costs).
However, is it for Directli to set up the Direct Debit Account in Xero from which we can import the Client Payments to us via GoCardless?
When I assign a fixed asset account to a bill, Xero makes me a fixed asset, which is great.
When money comes into or leave Paypal, the transactions appear on the Current Account in Xero and it is then 'Transfer' in the Paypal Xero account.
So now it says in the Credit Card account Balance in Xero : £1600I then manually import a CSV file, with all the figures negative into the Credit Card account.
This means no GST data including assessments will be uploaded into your Xero Practice Manager account.
Personal credit card account is not linked in xero.
Subject: Xero Support - reconciling my account - CX0004168133  ref: 00Do0biwC.
Would I do a transfer transaction from the account I actually paid from to the account I told Xero I paid it from?
I'm wondering how to account for that in Xero?
I have setup a director loan account in Xero and have now transferred £5000 from the company account (registered in Xero) to my own personal account.
So, on the Xero account this customer owned us $25.
Hello Everyone,Is it possible to account for multiple companies under the same Xero account using Tracking Categories?
Earlier this year something happened to our Xero account where the balances had "matched" up until one day then something changed and suddenly the balances were out.
I was wondering how to reflect that in my Xero account?
I have customised the account headings so that Xero correctly shows the various categories of receipts and payments.
We are looking for a multiple office account management solution using Xero.
In Xero I have a fixed asset for this piece of equipment and a non-current liability account for the loan.
How do we properly account in Xero for carrying forward the restricted funds to 2015-16?
Xero will not allow me to enter to the "cash account".
Again, Xero has calculated some numbers in the Historical Adj Acc and Unrealised Forex Gains account which makes my take on trial balance wrong.
My Xero account has been suspended, I have now idea why.
The balance sheet in Xero is taking account of the May entry and adding into the balance sheet total.
If it can be worked around some way, either through manual transactions or any specific account I will definitely migrate to Xero for this and all the added features.
I can't see a Work In Progress nominal account (and searches keep taking me to things about accountants managing their clients) - is it called something else in Xero?
For some reason when we started using Xero there were 2 account set up - one called Westpac and one called PayPal.
I don’t have the loan account loaded in Xero.
I really don't know what to do to reconcile my account in Xero.
I have added this account to MY Xero profile and will reconcile transactions.
For this deposit in Xero do I create an entry assigned the "VAT" account?
I have transferred the money back but not sure how to account for this in xero.
Is there a way to enable the "Auto Fill" option in Xero where once I input the vendor/supplier, the expense/revenue account associated with the party will automatically filled in, unless I change the account type myself?
Why doesn't Xero suggest the dividends come from an Equity account?
Im not sure since I would have expected to have it by default on the default “Chart of account” proposed by XERO.
Hello,I must be blind or crazy but I think a few updates back Xero had the feature to reconcile several account transactions at once.
I am setting up Xero to work with my shopping cart WooCommerce - I have all the settings right but it is asking for an account for Discounts to be processed into.
I cant seem to find a relevant account with the default Xero setup that will be relevant so I will create one.
Also, it seems odd that Xero classifies a credit card account as an asset account on the balance sheet.
For months, I have been unable to figure out why my "balance in xero" and my "statement balance" for my checking account balance(s) are way off.
Also i have got my xero subscription coming out of a overhead account titled subscriptions is this correct.
I want to account that money in XERO as owner's equity.
It's showing in Xero as an expense to be reconciled however the money hasn't left the account.
I'd be particularly interesting in hearing if you have multiple cards and therefore multiple feeds on one Xero account too.
Let's say there are ten transactions on a credit card in any one month, I will enter those transactions into the credit card account on Xero.
I'm looking for something that fully integrates with Xero's paynow button, and reconciles automatically with my transaction account?
The problem we seem to be struggling with is how to take a receipt from a supplier and allocate it to a client's account in Xero.
I saw a thread on it from 2014 that said there were no plans to implement it in Xero but offered a workaround involving setting up a payables account.
Most of our customers are on a 30 day account from EOM, but this has never been set up correctly in our xero file, so when I send out the statements it is telling the customers they are overdue (customers are not happy) what is the best way to fix this ?
At the moment, I have to do it all on a spreadsheet and then do a summary which totals each account code, then I have to import the summary it into Xero.
I have my Paypal account linked up to my Xero account.
I did see someone else asked the same question but Xero then set up the account for him.
And all in all, using these two names on a same Xero account?
A partnership which sells decorative supplies such as paint and runs workshops through the retail outlet in point 1Both businesses have registered ABN's and are setup as separate Xero account.
It would be great if the major dividend payers (including farming co-operatives) could be authorised by clients to automatically send copies of dividend advices when issued, to the email box associated with the Xero Account.
We would love to have a way for these suppliers to input their bills into our Xero account so we could then review and approve these bills.
I being recommended by my friend on using XERO, and after 1 months of test trial, i found it fit nicely to my daily operation account and most of the transaction can be recorded and sentimentalize properly.
I am requesting that Xero implements a way to attach files directly from the Account Transactions screen by allowing users to drag and drop supporting documentation in each transaction item.
Unlike MYOB, Xero allows you to create quotes and send quotes without the input of an account code.
I operate two businesses through one Xero account using Tracking.
Mail tab functions as an email client, for you setup your email account, to send and receive your emails inside Xero itself.
I have lots of clients in the same industry, and I get sick of setting up the same Xero account again and again.
All it would take would be setting up the user account details with in xero and using the Company mail server.
Xero would then automatically do the manual debits and credits to the expense items and the accrual and prepayment account.
Couldn't the xero dashboard have a small area which flashes when an account goes over budget?
Xero currently prioritizes Tracking Category Reports by the GL Account Code.
We track them through separate account lines so I imagine it should be reasonably simple for Xero to be told to take that account information for a specified period and create a donation receipt.
Thankyou Xero for adding client/contact account numbers - this will make things easier.
If Xero accepted emails without attachments or converted the emails to PDFs, that would allow me to set rules for my email account to forward all my receipts without manually converting them.
Since her account settings are different from our settings, Xero looks a little different for her.
If I can do it from withing Xero, it should reconcile the account automatically.
Having this extra from and two option will help us, and i am sure other Xero users to produce more accurate management account data.
Does Xero have the capability to record and account for the wine equalisation tax (WET) in Australia?
Why does Xero BAS not account for Fuel Tax Credits?
If an employee captures leave from the 24th Dec to the 28th Dec, Xero will take this as 5 days of leave as the 2 days of public holidays are not taken into account.
Not surprisingly, when I download into my Xero feed using my "master" American Express account, ALL transactions are downloaded, and all mixed up, so there's no way to tell - as far as I can see - which transaction belongs to which card/person.
I'm an accountant with a Partner account and starting out with Xero.
How can I benefit from the Xero Billable Expenses system AND get it to correctly charge account for VAT (i. e. charging those expenses GROSS for travel and accommodation or NET for other expense items).
Is there a way to reset xero account and start again?
However as a practical matter I would prefer it negative in the QIF so is shows up as a Xero "spend money" in the credit card account.
Recently our check numbers stop showing up in the xero from our Wells Fargo checking account.
Now I have a permanent "pending" in my ASB attached to that account and no history of it in Xero.
I have come across some Paypal transactions in USD where my Paypal account has not converted them from USD in to AUD (which it normally does automatically), therefore I can not import these transactions into Xero.
We have a very simple fixed asset account and we depreciate all of them on a monthly basis, but couldn't tell if Xero automatically runs the depreciation at the end of each month?
Does Xero auto code those contacts that have been attributed a default account.
Sometime between December 2015 and January 2016 something has happened in Xero to make the Cost of Goods Sold account balance incorrect.
The card was compromised and cancelled and the subsequent card was connected to xero correctly via the account number not the card number.
Essentially, I have Vend posting cash out for banking (cash clearing) to a specific account in Xero.
Ideally we would have all three of these held as separate companies but all within a single Xero account.
So Vend only allows sending petty cash to an expense account in xero.
If the checking account feed is working Xero takes the checking account feed login username and password and populates the credit card login feed with those details.
I have added these into the system by using the Fixed Assets part of Xero and have assigned these assets to the computer equipment account.
"Now i have tested the file on our demo account and it works fine but when trying on my clients Xero account that error occurs.
I imported a csv paypal statement into my xero account.
I've decided to print the transactions for the whole year for this account but I can't do this on Xero without it taking upwards of 40 pages, even though there are only 400-odd transactions.
I am the the person who set up our Xero account and am the primary user.
So I now have a £ and a $ paypal account in Xero.
However, on the Xero dashboard and in the reports, the Cash on Hand account is presented as being positive !
I have amended my stripe account in xero to be 20% VAT on income but feeds are still coming in gross.
The balance on the VAT account is correct based on the starting balance and the transactions entered into Xero when compared to the VAT return that _was_ submitted.
I have two businesses in Xero and it would be useful if I could switch between the two straight from the account link at the top right hand corner (which shows the profile and logout buttons) - similar to the way Google allows you to switch https://support.
The only way I see that may be possible in Xero would be by treating it as an expense claim and matching it with the credit card transaction when reconciling the account.
In fact, this was one of the reasons I wanted to get a Xero account - to theoretically make the whole issue of currency conversion easier.
Whenever it downloads a 'transfer' transaction (where money has been moved from our paypal account into our company cheque account) the transaction appears twice on the Xero-downloaded statement.
This doesn't seem to be a feature as Xero only allows allocation of one expense account for all wages.
We have 8 or so Accountants with Advisor access to the Xero account but only two people with Payroll access.
If this is the case should I be doing something else within Xero to account for this?
Can we code this credit balance as 804- Wages Payable Account to offset the wages that has already been paid through Xero Payrun.
Xero should allow the deduction to be coded directly to the income revenue account and not to a liability collection account and then have to remember to clear it at the end of the month.
We are looking to integrate Vend with Xero so each staff member would have an account that at the end of the week would be paid out.
I deal with a number of employees that work for 2 businesses under different locations, the wages are tracked through 2 categories on the one XERO account.
As far as I can tell Xero only allows you to set one account for Wages expense and one account for Superannuation expense in the Payroll Settings/Organisation tab.
'I have no idea where this contact name is located as it isn't in the settings portion of my Xero account.
It appears that Xero is creating both credits and debits in the payroll taxes payable liability account netting to zero.
I am the manager of the Xero account with full access.
I have recently noticed that Xero Payroll has not been reconciling my tax payments correctly and this is causing my Fed Tax Expense account to be overstated.
When I process US tax payments through Xero, the amounts are being posted directly to my checking account as 2 separate amounts.
Our Xero account is linked with our NEST account.
Having called Lloyds, they tell me their system is not compatible with Xero, unless I have a corporate account paying around &#163;30/month fees plus other charges.
The Zendesk App by Cloud Elements allows customer service representatives instant access to your Customers' current account status in Xero.
Create quick budgets, plans, forecasts and comparative reports for your clients in the Cloud using their data and account structures held in Xero.
Fully integrated with your Xero Practice Manager account.
Scanned and Emailed Receipts are automatically pushed into your Xero account for Expense Reporting.
Simple, Fast, Free & Secure cloud based Mobile Wallet, which pushes your Receipts (scanned and emailed) into your Xero account for Expense Reporting.
Xero can't show the opening and closing balance for all foreign currency at Account transaction or general ledger section.
I have our iZettle account linked to Xero - and so far the information flow from one to the other is working well.
I imported a csv paypal statement into my xero account.
in/460292There is no Payments account in Xero.
I am sure it is pretty simple but at present my xero account seems to be getting into a bit of a mess!
First I went into Xero Accounting and looked everywhere - Help (the uber obvious place), Settings, Account, thinking that surely somewhere there would be a method to contact support.
I have sent another support email today but would really appreciate some help from team Xero to help me reinstate my account!
I was lucky I only did this for one account to transfer a contact between two Companies we run through Xero.
23-5 we contact our accountant, and xero, as the subscriber was summarily terminated from the company and the relationship was not left on good terms therefore we could not contact the subscriber to get access to the account.
I have tried:logging off and back inopening other Client's Payroll sections, non of which would openopening the Xero account on a Mac and on a PCopeing in Chrome.
##### CLUSTER 33 #####
Hello, I've just started with Xero and imported all our old invoices from another system.
I just found out I can upload photos of invoices to Xero using my webcam, then file these images linked to the expense.
Xero already have similar template "Awaiting approval" for Invoices set up and it appears it would be a great solutions and just something extra in their software package that could attract a national market.
Xero has far too basic a security model with basically just advisor, standard and Invoices and PO access.
HiI have just entered a batch of invoices generated prior to Xero.
Is it just so that the links to these services appear on the invoices we might send out via Xero?
Would Xero just leave out the older invoices?
We've just sent out our first batch of invoices using Xero.
##### CLUSTER 34 #####
My problem is that I now have 80+ invoices that Xero thinks is overdue (all are paid ages ago).
I haven't encountered this problem myself but Xero Partners might find this info useful from LinkedIn  Cathy J Kendall DOR, Indiana Department of Revenueregarding duplicate invoices.
A2X exports amazon invoices into Xero.
And Xero support have confirmed the invoices were created as GST exluded.
Reason for my question is because I started using Xero in mid 2016 but I had asked my bookkeeper to enter all my invoices for 2015 as well and now they are appearing as having payments posted in 2016.
I'm thinking it will be best to transfer these into xero as recurring invoices so that we can see who's paid and who hasn't more easily.
We understand we can import data from the Opera PMS directly into Xero which we hope will allow us to reduce the level of manual work however I am struggling to understand how we could align the systems so that the correct payments received are allocated to the correct invoices.
Invoices are issued out of our job system while statements are issued out of Xero.
for example, I had to make an item called "shipping" since xero doesn't have a category on invoices for shipping specifically.
Xero Friends,I am using a separate billing program that automatically feeds my invoices into xero.
Xero does not link directly with Moneris and I am wondering if there is anyone that has found a work around so that invoices would show as paid once collected through moneris?
Does anyone know if we can download the invoices which have been imported to Xero?
When I put their invoices into Xero I manually assign the due date as T+30 so that I can see when payments are due.
These orders come into Xero as Invoices.
We are having trouble importing our existing bills, invoices and such from the old service into Xero.
And to reiterate, the invoices and bills (as far as Xero knows) will consist of two line-items only: the aggregate parts costs, and the core deposits.
If it's possible to delete, would Xero allow this if there were still open invoices including that item?
(We only raise a few invoices each month, so it would be easy enough to calculate our cash VAT each quarter outside of Xero.
We have to bill many of our customers the same amount each month, but when it comes to reconciling these invoices to payments Xero seems to be no help at all.
So far, I have obtained copies of the invoices and monthly statements from each client at the end of each GST period, analysed the invoices on an Excel spreadsheet, and entered the results into Xero by a manual journal.
I've been using the Xero Touch (iOS) to send invoices to customers.
Finding Xero very easy except when I complicate things by part paying Invoices or sending test payments!
Also do the payable invoices receive a individual number on Xero for filing purposes?
Hey all,I'm looking for information on how to import historical invoices from previous years that have already been paid from my previous accounting software and into Xero.
I have no idea which invoices I reconciled and XERO have not gotten back to me.
Can any one suggest a suitable app/software that will link to Xero and help me to, manage my customers, create nice invoices or quotes and manage web order financials in one central hub.
We manufacture food products and sell them to stores via purchase orders and invoices from Xero.
(we do generate invoices directly within Xero too and we get the same issue).
The invoices come from Unleashed, to Xero.
When invoices are raised, to have a record easily accessible allowing to view the specific discount or information related to a customer without recording this information on a note book or on another program not accessible through Xero.
I've done some back log accounting of all our invoices since we moved to Xero.
I review XERO Client information more thoroughly and find the email address has now populated into all previous quotes and possibly invoices issued to different clients.
Clients ignore my invoices sent from xero.
She used them for a while and then stopped using Xero to record her everyday transactions, and used Xero only for producing and sending out invoices.
I also then require the invoices I have created to be automatically uploaded to xero to make my booker ping easier?
I issue both invoices and quotes from Xero.
A workflow power tool featuring:   *Contact synchronisation   *Quotes & Draft Invoices directly in your emails  *Xero Calendar showing upcoming leave and birthdays  *Task alerts showing overdue invoices and outstanding expense claims The reporting power tool featuring:  *Easy access to the Xero API, click a button and get your data in a preformatted table  *Switch companies on the fly to grab data from different sourcesThere's no subscription fees and even a free trial.
So far, I have obtained copies of the invoices and monthly statements from each client at the end of each GST period, analysed the invoices on an Excel spreadsheet, and entered the results into Xero by a manual journal.
I would change the content only in one place  but it would mean I can't recreate copies of past invoices out of Xero and id prefer not to edit templates as it doesn't make sense.
All of the features available on Xero Touch for iOS are there – creating and sending invoices, 4-digit pin access and submission of expense claims.
Also my client wishes all invoices (and numbers) to be created in Xero as it is their accounting system (makes sense).
The client had uploaded various invoices and receipts onto Xero for evidence.
At present, all financial data is imported into Xero, and I have to manually void all invoices in Xero that were generated by the sole traders (Site 2) in Coreplus.
I've successfully imported invoices from our own database into Xero but I feel that the " *ContactName " field should be named "*CustomerName" which would cover both Businesses and Members of the public.
This is particularly helpful when reconciling payments for foreign currency invoices which cannot be paid as "batches" in xero.
We have used Xero for a number of years & often receive regular weekly invoices from some suppliers & this has built up a huge history of invoices.
Xero allows you allocate receipts or payments to invoices, or cash code them to your general ledger.
Repeating invoices can currently be pulled from the Xero API, but not created or edited through the API.
I know ApprovalMax can assist here but it is still possible for bills/invoices to be created and approved in Xero.
Xero to email a daily action/task list of invoices and bills due on that day.
We have noticed that when we import invoices to Xero via .
If possible, Xero can remain"there are duplicated transactions if you approve drafted invoiced that you have reconciled" or can match these invoices automatically.
At present Xero has a minus line when removing services from invoices, this is great when removing a line.
When you send a receipt after batch depositing payments, it would be very useful if Xero included any outstanding invoices (and their balance due and due date) at the bottom of the receipt.
We send our Quotes prepared in Quotient to Xero to create draft invoices.
As a lot of Xero clients will be in the TRADES and could be part of the No cowboys members, it would be great to have this so that Xero can handle this logo and link on either the email that we send with the invoices and quotes or embedded into the invoices and quotes.
We send large volumns of invoices through a trade software and we then import over into Xero.
I then have to manually mark all of the invoices as sent in Xero.
Wondering if you could have the invoices that are charged by Xero available in the online xero Partner login.
XERO should automatically change the period of the monthly/quarterly/yearly invoices sent by email to  clients.
This means that Xero still uses the contact name as the unique ID to link invoices to contacts.
We have a lot of invoices on Xero and on Xero Touch there is no way to search them.
Instead, once again, Xero actually causes more work than it saves, and most of our loyal repeat customers now have their monthly invoices two days late.
I think it would be a great feature to have statements hyperlink back to the invoices within Xero so that debtors could print as required.
One to email a invoices to all clients that happen to be in my Xero Medium group automatically each month and a second for my Xero Large group.
When importing invoices into Xero it would be good to import the "unit amount" as tax inclusive.
Apologies if this is frequently asked but it's difficult to search for without getting drowned in topics about invoices sent between Xero customers.
Ideally, we would receive all our  Supplier Invoices as PDF's via email and Xero would check the following 3 things,1.
For instance, the invoices are due to be created by Xero on 15th August but the person will be away for most of August.
I think it would be great if we could set a default tax set up for receivable invoices, rather than Xero defaulting to the last setting used.
Surely it would be in everyone's best interest for Xero to hire some ridiculously talented graphic designers to help develop some better looking invoices!
When entering invoices Xero can work out the due date by inputting +14 (for 14 days).
It would be great if Xero could generate invoices showing decimal commas rather than decimal points and point thousands separators rather than comma thousands separators.
Better still, adopt the method used by a competitor of Xero, and that is to show everything outstanding, and also have two options - a)  to only show invoices on which there are outstanding amounts and b) a date chooser.
Payable invoices are renamed, uploaded to xero for processing, and renamed again to mark them as paid, then filed.
I wanted a quick and easy solution to uploading invoices into our company on Xero.
This is standard on most accounting software but on Xero I can only see a list of invoices and not the payments or credits that might have been allocated against them.
I'm using Xero API to create Invoices and apply Payments to these Invoices.
The client will be generating all the invoices in our application and wants to import the invoices into Xero.
Is there any way to access data from xero that can be used to run reports with more specific parameters eg A list of Donors (whose payments are recorded as invoices) showing amount,  date Donor name and donor address
Could somebody please inform me on how to make these visible when sending invoices Xero to Xero.
For such items, Xero doesnt let me create invoices.
I am trying to bring in a bunch of invoices from the past 18 months into Xero.
We attach all our invoices to Xero so that they are visible, however the attachments have suddenly stopped working.
I receive the invoices from Xero billing me our companies month charges for using Xero.
These payments maybe invoices I have sent out or as a result on received money which is entered into Xero.
as i'm populating xero with more transactions i'm finding that i have to scroll down further when looking for the newer invoices in individual contact bills and invoices.
com/au/Settings_InvoiceBrandingTShootingI created a custom DOCX template and uploaded it but it seems to be ignored by Xero when printing invoices.
Xero did an update about 6 months ago and changed the bar graph for Invoices owing to you from a monthly view to a weekly view.
Xero is using its own exchange rate when invoices and payments in foreign currency are being passed through from an addon.
It seems that Xero has miscalculated the sum value of the invoices I have entered.
If Xero could issue pro-forma invoices that would also resolve the problem.
I bill my client, with invoices created in Xero, every other week and my client pays me, usually, every 2 weeks.
I email to the Xero Inbox any receipts, invoices, etc.
Can i import my wholesaler prices who we buy our electrical gear off into xero and complete my invoices in xero?
HiHow do you Export Customer Invoices data  from Xero to Excel?
We are trying to become a paperless office so all invoices and reciepts are scanned and entered into Xero.
We have almost everything ready, imported all the invoices and bills of this financial year,even used xero for the wages for the last two weeks.
Automate Import Invoices, Receipts, Payments, Items and other entities from Excel to Xero.
Automatically sync contacts, invoices, items & payments with Xero bi-directionally – sans duplicates.
Web EDI Xero Integration allows you to seamlessly synchronise invoices directly into Xero.
Xero invoices created instantly with professional and compliant claims documentation attachedFor more information, check out .
Automatically extract the important data from bills, invoices and receipts and push it straight to Xero.
Integrates with Xero to create invoices, view visitor details & more from chat window.
Accept credit card payments and create invoices in Xero.
Quickly create invoices on your mobile device, using your customer and item list from Xero.
Breadwinner brings up-to-date Xero Invoices into Salesforce, allowing for receivable reporting by company and opportunity.
Orders automagically converted to Xero invoices.
Automated data extraction (with line detail) to Xero from scanned/digital/photos of invoices & receipts.
PostalMethods is a web-to-post service that enables Xero users to send invoices to customers directly from Xero, as easily as sending it by email, check out .
Send agreements, forms, estimates, and Xero invoices for signature.
Stripe makes it easy to accept credit card payments for online invoices sent from Xero.
CustomerSure automatically checks for satisfaction when you send out invoices from Xero, check out .
Connect Xero to your Google Calendar - create calendar events from Xero Invoices or create Xero invoices and contacts from Google Calendar events, check out .
Automates entry of supplier bills & invoices into Xero seamlessly.
Sync invoices & payments, and track staff profitability in Xero, check out .
Seamlessly create linked Xero entries from scanned and mailed invoices.
Create invoices and contacts in Xero from Wufoo form submissions, check out .
Comprehensive conversions for MYOB and QuickBooks ledgers to Xero, including transaction history, invoices and contacts.
I am using ReceiptBank to send receipts and invoices to Xero.
I have invoices that were created in Freshbooks, then imported to Xero, then edited in Freshbooks.
I raised this with Leap support and was informed that invoices do not push through to Xero if operating on a cash basis and in fact only push through once a receipt is entered.
As you can imagine, this is sub-optimal as it means running reports in Leap for unpaid invoices and Xero for paid invoices and spending in parallel to check the forecast availability of cash for particular liabilities etc.
I cannot figure out how to apply customer payments made via Square to invoices in Xero.
- Xero network keys will be used to share these invoices between different Xero organisations.
I love Xero but not so much the customers that still want their invoices posted to them via Snail Mail.
We are a Xero customer but also a software company so we have hooked up the Xero API to our global printing network so that our invoices can be sent via snail mail in seconds.
It offers three way data collection, a Cloud based secure storage for all your invoices, integration with Xero and free sharing with your colleagues and a bookkeeper.
If I do this I would move my quotes out of Xero as well and would want a system that provide subtotal functions in quotes and invoices.
We include purchase order numbers and strata plan numbers on our invoices in IMS and because they are custom fields they cannot carry across into the XERO invoices.
When a customer purchases more than 1 item of each product, they receive a bulk-buy discount (a standard WooCommerce plugin), however we can't export those invoices to Xero as it doesn't recognise the discounted inventory item.
For example:Current integration does not include payments to invoices in Xero when made in Clio.
We love shoeboxed and this could work to create the invoices and push to Xero.
If invoices were emailed into a system, data extracted, pushed over to Xero (with a copy linked to the bill) and then the scanned image sync'ed back to Dropbox etc, that would be a cracking service.
DELIVERY ADDRESS (should also be implemented in Xero)Have already created cards, don't want to have to re-type or copy and paste information for delivery addresses for purchase orders or invoices.
ITEM CODESWFM does not push these to Xero for Purchase Orders or Invoices.
Export invoices and credit notes to XERO.
Export invoices and credit notes to XERO.
I. e takes crm opportunities and creates xero invoices.
It would also be good if Xero could allow for contacts to be added to specific invoices so different project managers contact details can be attached to different invoices.
We want to reduce the paper storage and one way would be to destroy the invoices that we scan into Xero once they are paid.
We employed this as Xero was unable to understand four years ago that we would not wish to send invoices out by our personal email addresses if we used those to log in.
Xero monthly subscription invoices are emailed out monthly.
##### CLUSTER 35 #####
Hello,I have 113 monthly repeating invoices which I have set to save as draft on the 1st of each month.
Or a or tick box to tag invoices as submitted to Revenue before published report3.
We are trying to retrieve some of our invoices via API request.
All of our invoices were created via API and we specify the AccountCode always.
I have been advised by our accountant to put through a number of invoices from a client as a 'bad debt'.
Our company have few maritime invoices from trade payable (Green Palm).
And some invoices were paid by our trade receivables (Posh Fleet).
I have 2 separate invoices from Amazon.
Our invoices arrive into us which we auto process through a third party software.
and the amount is slightly less than the actual invoices total because of fees.
Invoices owed to us appear on Dashboard in AUD, though these invoices were issued in USD.
How can we let them be shown on Dashboard in USD (the total of "Invoices owed to you").
The invoices we paid did not display any information about tax.
Then today, after adding a few custom settings on customers ALL my invoices are tax exclusive when viewing or printing.
Currently I have numerous Invoices under there Contact for what we have supplied and also invoices i have received from them for goods purchased.
My clients receive invoices for packages of 10 lessons.
All I had to do previous to Squareup was match the invoices to the total amount paid to me by the merchant and I was done.
I send my invoices a PDF attachments, so I print the PDF or send the email with a PDF attachment.
I have a client that has created two invoices with the same number.
I have now deleted the repeating invoices but found that this only deletes the invoices from today's date onwards.
We are a charity and have regular receipts coming in, not based on invoices and also regular standing orders going out.
For example if I have paid a supplier $1000 but the invoices are $500.
We have a problem with capturing of our invoices.
example invoices to our debtors to show on Profit and loss.
So I have for instance 500 000 outstanding invoices, but my balance is 600 000 as there is 100 000 from the previous year.
We are a builder and have a large number of small invoices from wholesalers.
I have a question regarding payments on invoices not showing as paid.
I have tried to enter it as a total amount as unpaid invoices at 30.
I have a supplier statement (newsagency)that lists all of the invoices owing.
Most of the purchases i make are from VAT registered companies, so on the invoices and receipts they list VAT.
We have a number of clients who have multiple contacts with regards to raising invoices.
For example we will send invoices to three (3) different contacts at the same client.
HelloI am wanting to generate invoices that are non-item based.
My invoices are usually fixed rate buyouts based on client's budget.
On dec 1st (the following calendar month to November) you owed me + 20 reconcile statement lines + 5 invoices and bills.
And also on the 1st january 20 lines + 5 invoices and bills.
Therefore as of 1st January you are in Debt to me 40 Reconcile Lines + 10 invoices, + 10 bills.
i. e. to have the VAT on payable invoices included in the transactions for Balance Sheet/P&L ?
There is a warning when allocating payments against future invoices, but nothing to note that it will make your GST timing in your return wrong.
I don't know why exactly, but it worked and I knew that the 4 really old unpaid invoices were nothing to worry about.
SellerShipping and transportationCustom AgentThere are three different contacts, three invoices and the three different dates.
Amazon sends monthly invoices for fees and fulfilment.
Then look at what additional inventory we "Should have" based on Square invoices.
At the moment I have set up repeating invoices to be automatic but I will have to edit them individually some months.
HiI have a company that has had a handful of invoices from one supplier sent to a debt collection agency.
My problem is paying the actual outstanding invoices in Bills.
Thus I still show v. a. t. on bills in (whether included or excluded), but not invoices out.
Once this is finalized, they pass on the details to the Finance and Admin person creates all invoices (with draft only permission).
The issue I have is, the Finance and admin will still have to create some invoices and bills, and because they have the approve permission it means potentially there are no "second eyes" to check their entries.
Regardless of the number of invoices, I will create individual JE per deposit and auto-reverse them on the month it is scheduled to happen.
They email me the invoices every month.
Law firm is calling it dummy invoices.
Basically we are banking on 100% retention when we're automatically sending invoices and "hoping" customers will renew.
Each subsequent refill will equal the parts cost, and could be recorded also as purchases tied to the associated (prepaid) parts invoices.
As they are on cash accounting for VAT, FreeAgent has a "deferred VAT" code where it holds the VAT on outstanding invoices until they are paid, when they then get moved to the usual VAT liability code.
HiI have a number of purchase invoices for sevices in the EU.
For the inventory supplier I have paid three invoices (an initial deposit and two final payments).
For the 3PL I have paid two invoices which includes various disbursements for importing.
However sending  invoices that have the  logo and trading name is incredibly confusing for clients and appears very unprofessional on our part.
That would give us 3 difference list of invoices.
You must identify wine equalisation tax (WET) and goods and services tax (GST) separately on tax invoices for GST purposes.
Has the system been modified to address this and related problems pertaining to foreign currency denominated invoices and payments?
Is there a way for me to either temporarily change the contact information for this client and their invoices (which I can change back if, for instance, I get audited)?
We are a largish company with several hundred invoices per month for entry and approval.
A supplier forgot to send some invoices and now in June he sent me invoices from January, February and March.
In my previous accounting package (that will remain nameless) I had a VAT summary table on all my invoices (It was impossible to get rid of it!
I've previously used SAGE and QUICKFILE and all have a very useful bookkeeping function when loading supplier invoices.
Invoices, credit notes and statements are all produced with company branding.
I have 2 invoices and made two payments, but the amounts for each do not correlate.
I received a single cheque for &#163;75 to cover 5 invoices of &#163;15 each.
When I try to reconcile the &#163;75 credit via "FIND AND MATCH" I only get 4 invoices coming up i. e. for &#163;60.
I tried looking up for all the invoices under supplier Bunning warehouse but i cant find it.
I email invoices to my stylists weekly.
My invoices show a total dollar amount.
This text file displays all creditors / invoices and amounts paid.
The company is VAT-registered, and purchase invoices have VAT on them.
I figured out how to setup the Conversion Balance for outstanding invoices.
Supplier invoices are payable on 28 day term.
I didnt realise this and had gone ahead and closed the invoices as fully paid.
These are bills from other companies that invoices me after doing work for me that were part of client projects.
The accounting is looking fairly complex and I'm hoping to gain some insight into the best way to address refundable deposits and ensure everything stays associated with the right invoices and bills.
We then issue our buyer that same refund, probably also likely to apply to multiple invoices and only partially applied to some.
As we have many customers with many invoices I don't want to bother them with the entire overview of their activity.
I have a couple of invoices paid via EFTPOS and then this refund on the same day.
Sorry for posting numerous postings about recurring invoices, but I guess I was too specific.
eg: we might have two invoices - 001 and 002 - for $10k each.
We have quite a few double up invoices entered in purchases is there a way to void or credit note them together or do I have to go into each one and do it that way?
Invoices are raised as the default of Tax Inclusive, but when viewing them after they are raised they default back to exclusive with GST Line showing at the bottom.
This is supposed to mean the end of PDF and paper invoices and the end of manual entry or faulty automatic extraction.
From about 20 suppliers, 10 are sending me directly invoices through my access point.
This articles says that "it is customary to include a tax identification number (TIN) on invoices".
HiWe became VAT registered on the 1st January 2014 and I will soon have to complete my first return (6 mth period to 30/6)  I have a number of invoices that as per HMRC rules I can claim the VAT on relating to 2013.
I'm trying to find an efficient way to enter purchase invoices for a Sole Trader.
We are a start up company so knowing who we are paying and when is more important that knowing that we have eg "$5000 Production server fees" made up of 6 expense invoices for the month.
Suggestions for reconciling daily batch merchant deposits to invoices?
All these people hold ABN's and are a mixture of:3 x employees (managed through Payroll)70% sole traders/partnerships/trusts with some GST registered and some not (all these are now entitled to Super)30% Companies all GST registered and they are not entitled to SuperI have started entering their invoices as BILLS but come to a halt.
Upon entering the invoices from suppliers, I include the GST I was charged right?
Every month the RF invoices each franchisee for their monthly franchise fee, advertising share, and other regular items such as Finder and Referral fees.
Not all invoices have been entered and we will soon have these up to date.
I would have to log on to their website in order to view the invoices.
It will only show invoices that are still outstanding.
There isn't the facility to have an automatically increasing number when entering the purchase invoices and although it's possible for us to keep track of the numbers and manually assign them, it's clearly open to error on a grand scale once we have a couple of people working.
If I file them alphabetically I lose the ability to pull the previous months physical invoices (in case of an error), if we create numbers as we go along, it's bound to go wrong.
I have pre-payments (in myob) against invoices dated 14 April 2013.
We are in Australia, and have may repeating invoices, so it would be nice to have this done correctly.
We have past unpaid invoices from 2012 using a different system.
On the P&L "current financial year" it only shows historic incvoices as "actual" but does not show "any" future invoices.
How can I properly write-off invoices so that they are not tallied in my income reports?
I then applied the CN to the invoices.
My understanding is that supplier invoices should be entered with No VAT.
Or should their invoices be recorded in a different way?
The invoices included VAT.
Subsequent invoices have all been out of order by one.
I searched for their name and found several invoices missing from the list.
I have 2 invoices from a client who has paid by cash and wants me to send him a receipt.
Sorry if this has been asked before but - I receive payables invoices for periods that are locked - ie.
and you can either set it to create the draft invoices or auto approve.
In the dashboard for matching payments I have some old invoices that are still showing up in there that have been written off.
he has got his property cleaned for 3 times with a total cost of $480 and he has all 3 tax invoices issued by the austral cleaning services under the heading ''complete house cleaning''.
The customer has two other unpaid bills and I wanted to allocate the overpayment to one of the invoices.
The company issued 2 separate invoices.
70 and the two invoices but it tells me I am £4.
"Enter invoices sent on or before Jan 1, 2017 that have not been fully paid. "
And gives me a list of invoices entered on January 1, 2017.
There are no invoices to enter.
I have been advised to create a bill for these contractor invoices and insert Contractors Super Expense and Contractors Super Liability into the bill.
We send invoices to parents for daycare fees weekly.
So we have several customers that logged into the old system and paid invoices, or invoices were automatically paid.
Therefore we generate bills and invoices for this client.
We may work on 5 sites for one client during a month and we have to place this on our invoices for them to reconcile.
I recently lost all the original  invoices sent to clients I had saved on my laptop.
I don't want this to happen as these invoices are either write offs or they would have already received reminders from Freshbooks.
Especially on really old invoices this would not be good.
When I look at overdue invoices, they are overdue by the terms we specify but often they are not past when the customer normally actually pays.
I've been using my mobile app to enter purchase invoices on the go in my van.
They even transferred all invoices from the previous financial year and have been very helpful.
My accountant is extremely reluctant to transfer across any more invoices, however without them I will probably have to move back over to myob.
I inherited a bit of a mess and it has to do with outstanding invoices from 2015.
Deposits, which should have included these same 2015 invoices, were not created by batching said invoices together; they were simply added as a deposit.
Fast forward to 2016, when I reconcile I balance but I still have about 200 outstanding invoices (all from 2015) in my reconciliation.
After creating invoices recently I applied all the credit notes.
Since sending out the invoices, some customers have asked me to amend their invoices for various reasons.
I've looked at the template for importing invoices but this seems to only work for outstanding invoices.
I realised afterwards that I may have reconciled outstanding invoices as well.
We are in a food industry where we purchase items that are GST and GST free, these items are on the same invoices and separating makes it difficult.
The invoices are large and I don't think I should have to enter every single item on there manually (I hope)!
I had three Gocardless payments that had been reconciled against the wrong Invoices.
This refund included invoices and credit notes.
We often take deposits as well then apply them to invoices once the invoices are generated.
I must stress, this never affects clients paying, they always receive the invoices, so that is not the issue, the problem is the invoices are simply not showing as sent in searches.
I wanted to get some feedback from everyone to determine how they are reconciling their cash deposits from their merchant service provider to outstanding invoices.
My merchant services will deposit payments in large batches and I struggle to reconcile between cash receipts and outstanding invoices.
I then added some invoices and even matched these to receipts, but nothing is showing in the dashboard.
The statement is showing these invoices as unpaid.
One of my clients uses Lloyds for factoring invoices.
HiI have created docx templates to customise quotes and invoices.
I have already been entering the Marketing option in all invoices.
I have imported the last 6 months of open invoices from MYOB but this still won't give me a true reflection.
8. ability to work on a cost-plus basis 9. timesheets are irrelevant in the charging of invoices to us as we charge on a quoted value.
It would be great if we could have a free format text field for invoices to allow recording off any special instructions.
I have to manually convert my US payments and receipts into AUD invoices and because of the high volume of transactions this is neither practical or economical for me.
We have several customers who give us a purchase order and then apply invoices to it.
We currently create our invoices on our database.
I want to input all supplier invoices and track whats owed or paid invoices and overdue etc etc what is the easiest way to do this.
I have read all of the support and found this process regarding invoices confusingThanksCraig
The other side is book event consulting and she regularly invoices clients as payments come through in one large amount of are wire transferred in.
We create invoices for all of our members and purchases for the bill we get from the supplier.
Is there a way to make progress invoices and track how much I've invoiced on a project?
I have a question about invoices, in particular when for the tours we sell.
Every month the RF invoices each franchisee for their monthly franchise fee, advertising share, and other regular items such as Finder and Referral fees.
and not the individual invoices that make up the total.
Otherwise is it a module within the software that can be released to users such as we have for invoices?
The closest I got to is Basecamp+Harvest and before that - Aceproject (but that one doesn't have invoices feature).
At present he writes out paper invoices, and gives these to customers.
I love that I can set up recurring invoices for weekly childcare fees.
Is this possible, I dont want to create 4 invoices with the total split 4 ways.
Making Billable Expenses appear in RED BOLD on the invoices so that anyone who sees it knows that it is a cost to us.
If a customer owes money against invoices it clearly shows this.
So you can easily see recent invoices that have been paid.
I send recurring templated invoices and it seems there is no "Day" placeholder.
I am autoimporting invoices from woocommerce with the Payee name and all other details.
We have annual recurring invoices for our customers and require a facility to request the PO number prior to invoicing.
I am trying to look at invoices for the date paid to see how long it took to decide if a customer should go on stop or not & am having to scroll through loads of stuff before I can find the invoices.
Currently emailing invoices to clients looks very average.
Seems strange how this is not available however you can sort Invoices or Purchases by all headers.
Hence, it would allow to easily sort invoices by planned date when reconciling payments.
My Recurring invoices are my basic service plan and labor is extra.
I would love to see a feature where you have batch transactions to corresponding invoices or bills in a batch format, similar to the cash coding facility.
For instance, when an invoices gets to be more than ten (10) lines, it becomes quite onerous to move lines around in the right order.
Our biggest problem is that clients keep denying that they have received the invoices.
However, as with most contractors I would presume, I am always required to provide a scanned copy of the receipts relating to expenses that I claim (which are a regular line item on my invoices).
A user could search once for multiple invoices and then check all that apply and reconcile.
Many of our customers prefer to receive invoices via email, but many still require them to be printed and posted.
When I go to make batched deposits and have multiple pages of customer invoices to go through it only keeps the ones from the current page that I am on.
This is particularly useful for contractors that are required to deduct withholding tax on their invoices.
This is because some of our clients have separate email addresses for their tax letters and invoices, to separate these specific notifications from their primary email addresses to avoid overlooking them.
This would be highly beneficial in order to create repeating invoices in bulk.
It would also allow solutions to be created where users could adjust the prices in bulk on their existing repeating invoices.
Logo dimension constraints for invoices capped at maximum of 400 pixels wide and 120 pixels high.
Is it possible to change this feature so it is valid only for the current invoices.
He found the two headings "invoices" and "receipts" confusing.
Therefore - I have a lot of tedious work to do in terms of converting all of my Dutch Income and Expenses ON THE ACTUAL DATES the invoices were paid or the items were bought.
We have well over a thousand invoices which we found out was paid but for some reason our admin team who we had to sack was not doing her job.
Our invoices sometimes go to 2 pages, so a scheduling option would be amazing.
Rather than sending out separate emails for separate invoices overdue it would be good to have all overdue invoices consolidated into a single email.
It would be great if invoices automatically defaulted to the tracking categories assigned when setting up the contact.
Would love to see it automatically assign invoices to the default set up regions.
This option is available when creating invoices or spending money but not in expenses claim.
I have over 600 repeating invoices, this could be done within 1 hr  if I could export them out, but takes days to edit them otherwise
I am unable to do multiple invoices with zero at the moment.
The only work around is to raise all 'in the field' invoices as draft only and have someone double check entries before sending to customers.
This would make it more obvious that the emailed invoices are official.
The context here is music students for whom invoices are issued at the end of a term.
Could a feature be added to prompt users of any invoices that share the same reference as an invoice previously approved, when bulk approving invoices, to avoid invoices potentially being duplicated?
My client creates and receives invoices with multiple transaction lines, and each line requires the tracking/project code to be selected, which has resulted in human error.
It would be great to have a branding column in the invoices lists (especially repeating).
You end up with, in our case, pages of unnecessary data of invoices that are not due to be paid.
I used to send invoices to my clients using drated invoices before updating Standard Package.
The other option was to export all and then remove all other invoices but the period in question had thousands of invoices from dozens of different contacts, so wasn't really practical.
I recommend the attachment list pop-up (for invoices etc. )
Let's say I edit an email template under SETTINGS > GENERAL > EMAIL SETTINGS, I notice that my updated version is not used on my existing repeating invoices but rather the old version of that email template continues to be used.
Would it be possible for such email template edits to automatically update on the repeating invoices using those templates?
This would be super helpful with a heap of bulk paid invoices with no remittance detail.
This helps in management of invoices on both sides for consulting services - especially where we bill in week blocks as opposed to month
It would be really useful if under the Assurance Dashboard > Invoices & Bills, you could sort or filter all of the invoices that were created after the financial year end but posted before.
I began a few invoices and asked him to continue them.
We have thousands of repeating invoices.
But can access invoices.
For instance if we want to change the day we want a batch, or all, the repeating invoices to pop up on.
There tend to be few transactions or invoices and no employees.
I think if a further filter option were added to the Statement Page called "Branding Theme" that behind the scene pulled all of one particular client/brands invoices together with the ability to issue statements under that theme it would be great and would prove most useful for some entities.
Then we could easily select the invoices we are paying instead of having to click through and filter ourselves.
I can get the invoices that are fully paid, but it doesn't involve all the invoices that are partially paid.
It's impossible to raise invoices from a quote now without going through each one, one-by-one.
We have a lot of monthly repeating invoices and want them to be generated and sent on the last day of the month.
Invoices are sent as PDF files attached to emails.
However, many of the "invoices" produced by a property company (statements from letting agents) aren't really invoices.
This means that for no invoices raised at all, such a company could exceed the limit of invoices per month for that subscription level.
So, if searching on a Customer name for example, where a long list then appears - if  "Invoices"  could be collapsed up we could quickly get to the "Quotes" list.
Tax adjustment in Purchase Invoices is possible, but it not available in Expense Claim Receipts.
Ability to send invoices and reminders by sms as well as email
With this level of access they cannot see a list of issued invoices in the customer screen.
We have a number of customers who have made partial payments towards invoices rather than paying the entire amount at once.
When we go into the List of invoices/Bills it lists from oldest at the top to newest at the bottom.
Before we could see "at a glance" the actual dates the invoices were raised.
In WFMAllow custom fields on invoices and contacts https://community.
This feature was important to us as some clients have several invoices per day or at least one a day.
We import large supplier invoices with sometimes hundreds of items on them.
When entering items into invoices, bills or purchase orders make it so that if you double click on the item code it opens that item's detail page.
so that you avoid sending draft invoices to clients.
Instead us peasants with suppliers who send stone age invoices on something called paper are reduced to the following horrid sequence when changing a purchase into a bill.
Generally when entering invoices/bill you enter more than one so this would speed up the process.
When looking up invoices of Purchases form a Supplier -eg.
It now displays overdue invoices first and you have to scroll down to the newest ones.
Matching payments and invoices in different currencies on the app.
Instead of emailing your self invoices from within zero, adding attachments to them then re- emailing to client.
A much needed and simple option is to allow them to see only invoices created by themselves.
We often send invoices to customers which incude one amount e. g. for one year.
This will be good when posting batches of invoices for the same suppliers.
This  would enable them to enter our monthly invoices.
That way you would know that people have received your invoices and reminders etc?
We would have much more control that way, all your clients who are used to nicely designed invoices will rejoice and much happiness will come into the world.
That way, you can tell when a customer last paid you, rather than having to drill down into individual invoices to find the date they last paid.
I've had several customers asking for a receipt after fully paying invoices.
This feature would also help us to identify quicker the paid invoices from the open ones when we look at a printed stack.
Invoices and credits are raised direct to the branches however the Mother company will apply credits against any of the branches with outstanding balances not neccessarily to the branch issued with the credit.
For example, I approve all invoices.
That would help to have great control of all bills with matching Invoices .
There should be a way to submit / edit the amounts being invoiced & leave the rest of that quote in either 'draft' invoices or a work in progress option.
Is it possible to order the paid invoices by the vendor name?
The invoices I've already created2.
We have had a request from one of our South African clients, that they require any invoices/credit notes etc sent to them by PDF to be issued in 128bit encrypted PDF file format.
With the prevalence of electronic invoices I’m sure it won’t be long before it is a requirement by all tax authorities internationally.
We have around 60 recurring invoices (some monthly, some quarterly) and we are adding more each month.
However, this will mean the entry of purchase invoices could be quite labour intensive as the first tracking category will have 8 category options to start with and the second will have several as well.
Currently we make batch payments that involve a large amount of invoices being paid.
Invoiced do not copy to quotations as drafts but only to invoices also frustrating?
This special identification would not be printed when printing the invoices.
If you have invoices for three companies that start with an S it autofills.
However we cant copy previous invoices and have the current prices updated
Currently I have 100s of repeating invoices with the customers name in the reference.
This is one of the most common things we do - search for invoices and bills.
It would be helpful to have a TAB on the Invoice screen for UNSENT invoices - to pick up only those that have been APPROVED (not DRAFT invoices).
I approve all invoices my staff create anyway so I have no concern with them creating an incorrect tracking code.
t want to have to write out 2 or more invoices I am wondering if an extra/s column could be added to accommodate multiple currency?
Most real estates request that invoices be sent to their address, but care of the tenants on the property.
Our invoices are generated monthly via simPRO and are often dated the end of the month, but they may only be sent a week or 2 weeks later.
It would be great if we can 'edit a batch of invoices' in one go rather than individually when there is a large volume of invoices to go through.
I have over 600 invoices from one supplier in the system now.
One of my clients will never have payroll, but has 0-5 multi-currency invoices (billing) per year.
With the inventory tracking, it would be very nice if these invoices were itemized so that the inventory is updated from them.
I have recently noticed in my Repeating Invoices that the "Every 1 Month" and "Every 3 months" setting are not working correctly.
15 repeating invoices due to fall on July 1st.
So frustrating doing invoices and being restricted to 200 items per page.
That way it would be easy to spot incomplete invoices or orders.
In other words we have a bunch of hours accruing in Harvest that haven't been imported as invoices yet.
In particular I have clients with multiple addresses (registered, postal, shop etc), and where invoices show an address that is not in the settings page we get different addresses appear between the online view and pdf view.
I want to see all Approved invoices - regardless of whether they have been paid or not.
Therefore when I produce these reports i have to go through each customer's invoices one by one, work out what they were invoiced for each respective product line, and then collate this info onto a spread sheet and email it off.
It would be great to receive this same prompt when approving bulk draft invoices.
I see that in all your invoices and other forms is a field called "Reference. "
It would be great if we could, within Custom DOCX branding themes, have the ability to also set a standard branding theme that would be used for online invoices.
The reason I ask for these is because I have literally hundreds of invoices repeating every 4 weeks.
;o))Set me about thinking it would be cool to extend this community to a more interactive social one so follow users could meet up on a day entering invoices (or whatever) and share tips/tricks.
On the 1st of every month I go to draft invoices and all my invoices to be invoice are there.
I think I will find it very useful to have a direct link to "Repeating Invoices" on the dashboard.
Much the same way you up load invoices to purchases
Is it possible for the Aged Receivables list to only show invoices that are overdue as at the date of printing.
If you multiply this action by 50-100 invoices weekly, suddenly having multiple attachments means more headcount to process.
It would be great if Invoice Only users could have access to the 'import invoices' feature in addition to entering manual invoices one-by-one.
We have different contacts within one company for sending invoices and quotes to.
There is an option to set a default branding theme for everything but i require a different one for invoices and quotes.
It would be nice if we could tell what invoices we have printed and what we haven't.
When I send those invoices again in case they have not received them they appear twice in their Draft Invoices screen.
It would be good to have a warning that the adjustment note/credit note has already been entered - the same as when entering creditors invoices.
We have the ability to send multiple invoices so don't see why it can't be the same for Quotes?
I regularly have to chase VAT numbers from clients and we have quite a lot of invoices.
In order to not duplicate my work, it would be great to have a way of colour tagging invoices so I know what I've done - eg) blue means that I've contacted client once for VAT number but am waiting for them to get back to me, and yellow means I've contacted the client twice with still no response.
This saves  & confusion generating multiple quotes/draft invoices, also it would provide a more accurate estimate of what dollar $ quantity of work you have in the pipeline.
The current search only appears to search the invoices.
This would show a tab of invoices on the invoices page where we are simply waiting for the PO number in order to finalise the invoice ready for approval.
Line numbers are typically used on B2B quotes, invoices and packing lists.
I have found some of my customers get confused by the due date being displayed on paid invoices.
so for those of us without a nifty integration set up, it would be wonderful if we could set invoices to generate with a greater number of lines by default.
Maybe a good place to show this would be in the Contacts>Customers>View Recent Invoices.
A lot of our suppliers email their invoices direct to the files library, and other staff scan or forward their direct invoices to it.
Have they only added it Invoices?
Not invoices and Statements?
It would make my job so much easier when it comes to managing invoices.
My example I am allocating one credit against 77 invoices.
I want to search all Invoices from Inv# 652 to Inv# 9863.
Under the Customer Invoices Reprots also Description column not showing.
However, we are used to sending STATEMENT TO CUSTOMER FOR ONLY THE OVERDUE INVOICES.
We have a few people who complete invoices.
The reference tells me if any invoices were part paid, or paid with two different methods.
We have a large number of repeating (monthly) invoices that are set to automatically approve and send at the beginning of each month.
Dashboard integration for purchase orders (similar to invoices integration)3. app purchase order support4.
Ever since your upgrade on 10/12/2103 I can no longer send multiple invoices at once.
This only happens when I email multiple invoices, emailing single invoices is fine - but VERY annoying as we send lots of small invoices every month.
The problem with the Approved PO list as it currently stands is that it's a list of invoices only.
After having thousands of historical invoices/payments imported from StitchLabs, I realized that, in trying to process Approved invoices and marking them as paid, I am unable to mark multiple invoices and move them to Paid.
However, today I found out that despite changing the email, my automatic repeating invoices are still getting sent to the old email address.
This is helpful when invoices are are sent out, a copy can goto an email group.
This could also be used for invoices?
When voided invoices exist they should be recorded as zero $ and therefore not active so they do not effect the contacts listing.
The dashboard widgets for money coming in and money going out currently show draft invoices and overdue invoices.
We have over "many" repeating invoices (over 100 per month).
At present it only sorts the invoices by date.
It would be great if there was a faster way to print invoices etc.
I don't want to let them know about invoices that are paid or not even due yet.
Many invoices are longer than can fit on 1 page.
It would be helpful to have a page number on invoices that run over more than 1 page to help the customer know they have all the pages if they print etc.
Firstly, so many invoices from suppliers come via email.
They have deleted a number of invoices and made so many changes that the file is close to irreparable.
to text in invoices etc.
If, when I fill in the 5th line, a 6th blank line would automatically appear (and so on), this would make producing invoices more smooth and efficient.
We have a many recurring invoices which are raised as drafts monthly.
This needs to be fixed as some customers rely on Item Codes, and these are essential in doing Item invoices.
The SAP user  DEMANDS that all correspondence (invoices/statements credit notes etc. )
From your help pages, I see the item "InvoiceTaxTotal" but this is only available on invoices and crrdit notes.
It would be a handy snapshot to know how much the recurring invoices are adding up to each month outside of other invoices.
The address details should also automatically be shown as well, in case the details have changed on supplier invoices.
On the mobile App, invoices, and many other places it only shows Item description.
And, eliminate invoices being paid twice etc.
I was really excited that my printed PDF's and my online invoices would match up perfectly.
Businesses love using the auto-creation of supplier invoices by clicking the link in the email, however this function is void if they are using WFM.
For some obscure reason this isn't possible to do with all invoices (both paid & outstanding) which makes it difficult to supply a client with a full year's invoices, for example, without doing the operation twice.
Not sure how i managed to do it - maybe too many drinks whilst completing the invoicing :) hahaBut it occurred to me that there should be a way or an option to block the sending of draft invoices.
Additionally, we receive documents from our suppliers that are named both "bills" and "invoices".
We also send documents to our customers that are labeled "invoices" (but occasionally also "bill").
Normally input purchase invoices and credits by supplier.
Creating invoices doesn't really make sense for direct donations.
The date due field in the invoices would still be open to allow changes.
It is a bit of a chore looking for invoices that have been automatically created but not sent.
Maybe repeating invoices could at least be created to the 'awaiting approval' tab so you have some kind of indication when these require dealing with
The ability to issue progress payments on quotes /invoices to percentage claim certain items or expenses.
But sometimes we send invoices out way before the travel date.
Based on the terms you set, your invoices will be automatically updated.
HiI have found the method for importing invoices but there doesn't appear to be one for credits.
We send out recurring invoices 15th of every month to our contract clients, for services to be provided in the following month.
The deleted invoices stay visible in the All tab which is a pain.
I changed the contact record assuming that it existing invoices that are linked to it would be updated but that was not the case.
Our third batch of invoices each year is sent out 2 months before the end of our financial year however, we want to register the revenue in the subsequent financial year.
It would be great if there was the option to attach a file to credit notes, as per invoices.
Currently Invoices track revisions — a log message is added when somebody changes something.
Client send out 75% of his invoices
The contacts could be enhanced to hold trading term variables (qty and period) such as 7 days (7 x days), 30 days, 1 month (1 x calendar month) etc then this could be applied when adding a debtor or creditor invoices to automatically calculate due date.
At the moment I am using 'draft' and 'awaiting approval' 'payable invoices' as a makeshift way of generating and tracking/managing purchase orders.
My company's invoices often deal with line items using multiple units of measure --- Days, Miles, Items, etc.
It would be much easier to have a proper quotation system where you can turn quotation's into invoices and still retain a copy of the quotation.
This feature currently only works with invoices and statements, and not with payslips!
GST on invoices and Quotes is set at 10% but calculating at slightly above
this is the only way to approve my purchase invoices, how can I change this.
Hello, I'm writing to express my concerns regarding the email feature to send my invoices.
I can't figure out if there is a way to remove directly the Credit Note from the Invoices or to remove the Allocation, using the API.
HiWe have some suppliers who have up to 70 invoices required for paymentTo avoid having to enter these all individually we create one purchase for the supplier, and in the body of the purchase, enter all the invoices.
When you have 20 invoices all from this supplier these extra 3 clicks and screen refreshes beyond what normally happens is so frustrating.
Our invoices generally include line items for our fees as well as line items for reimbursable expenses.
Where entering description lines in Invoices there should be a right click "insert a line" so an entry can be entered in the correct order ie date, customer or times.
This is especially needed in Repeating Invoices where minor changes are needed weekly to Invoices with large descriptions.
I have around 60 repeating monthly invoices.
I am being asked more regularly to send invoices and statements to different emails.
I generally copy invoices for clients on semi regular basis as I only have to change the quantity of items and perhaps had additional descriptions.
Besides, we have several hundred outstanding invoices so there was no way I was going to re-capture them all.
For instance, i have 5 outstanding invoices with one customer, they have paid 4 of them in full and part paid one of them.
To clarify:Let's say the five invoices are:INV-001 - £1000INV-002  - £1000INV-003  - £1000INV-004 - £5000INV-005 - £1000They have transferred £5,500.
I am trying to change the look of my invoices for a particular customer and no matter what I try to change in the edit branding theme window it cant save.
Unit Costs/Qty on bills/invoices could receive input of "=18+4+28+6" and would show TOTAL when field is confirmed/entered.
I have included voided and deleted invoices.
Similarly there isn't any option available on the invoices via any route I've found to void it.
Also, do the invoices have to automatically go into drafts rather than approved when they're imported?
I would typically select the invoices relating to the last month by left mouse click on first item, hold shift key and then left click on last item.
I'm on a flat-rate accrual VAT scheme, so I can only claim back VAT from fixed assets on invoices over £2000.
You have to put them all in as invoices or bills.
The data-entry of invoices is on a different cycle than the Inventory Q/A checks.
I can enter the invoices, but cannot email or print.
If i dated all the invoices 1.
This works great except it converts the AU customer invoices into NZD (my base currency).
I have been told that this is because the invoices on the system are not coded as inventory items (ie the Item Code field is left blank).
she is currently entering all the purchase invoices from October - present.
I am trying to email out statements and invoices to clients but they are going to my email address and clients not receiving them?
This is due to depositing invoices and paying bills manually and reconciling with General Ledger.
I created a credit note and all their invoices were allocated appropriately.
In order to do so I have asked to extract the whole set of invoices/bills loaded, with the maximum level of detail available.
Having sent out the latest monthly invoices, several have bounced back having been rejected by Symanteccloud.
I am having problems with trying to put information into the quantity and pricing fields in my invoices and bills .
I am using the functionality of inventory's to aid with pre-populating invoices for each of the services we provide.
The problem is that these invoices are already paid in different date.
I connected izettle last night and can now see that their is paid invoices for each days taking up to 17th of august, were is yesterdays data?
Is it possible to leave the Amount Paid field blank permanently on the bottom of invoices instead of the prefilled total amount?
We have recently VAT registered and are obviously now charging 20% VAT on our invoices.
We have instances where a client has been set up more than once in the system and both clients have jobs, wip & invoices against them.
I have noticed that one days worth of transactions (happened to be a day where we had several invoices paid! )
Approval everytimeWhy are my template invoices not approving?
There are multiple invoices and credit notes each month.
So we could be missing invoices and credit notes.
Currently trying to enter Invoices, purchases page loads, that's itNo Cursor, cannot make an entry, cannot type anything onto pageUm Why.
We entered all the outstanding invoices and bills at the 31st March and have recently found out that the balances were not locked/stored.
Trying to keep record keeping with copies of invoices/credit notes.
Basically, the import will only import some of the invoices (say, 160 out of 200).
So I have to delete all of the draft invoices and import again.
1) by actual cashflow and 2) by raised bills/invoices (trial balance)?
Project		Cash		Trial Balance——————————————————————————————Project 1		&#163;(1056)		&#163;3250Project 2		&#163;10,450		&#163;10,450Project 3		&#163;2,500		&#163;1,900This way I can see which project's cashflow is negative, and which one has outstanding invoices or bills.
Currently we are using ReceiptBank to capture all receipts/invoices, including cash, debit card and wire transfer bills.
To speed my invoicing up, Im copying draft invoices each day.
We are a service company who raises invoices monthly and 3 monthly.
Each morning I have 30-40 invoices to churn out, sometimes with very minor changes.
Go to an individual customer where you can show the status of invoices to 31st March 2016 as of a different date.
They are a larger organisation and have to chase different people in different apartments about processing invoices - I imagine this is common behaviour.
A drag and drop function would be so much quicker for adding invoices from emails.
Currently they have to be saved to a folder before they can be attached, you often end up opening and closing invoices to find the correct one.
We process about 460 invoices per month across about 140 customers (total customers in our database are about 500 to 600).
last night we were running our sync to create invoices, we had to recreate them a couple of times due to some issues we were having.
there was one thing that helped with dates on invoices or anywhere a date had to be added and that was using letter t for today and y for yesterday instead of having a calendar popup and click on a date.
It doesn't seem right to create invoices for these, so I'm wondering if there is a different way of accounting for these?
Essentially, I have created folders to separate my invoices by supplier.
Is it because I'm working with recurring invoices?
Whether it's sending invoices or PO numbers, less and less of our customers and suppliers are receiving anything.
My invoices have $?
Deleted and voided invoices should not be included in reporting.
Within the invoices, I am invoicing for a booking fee, a deposit and then a final balance, with different due dates.
Many of the purchase invoices I input have a different value VAT than exactly 20%, usually due to rounding differences.
We have thousands of invoices though, so this is not ideal.
There really should be an easier way to apply credit card payments against customer invoices.
But the paid invoices don't map or isolate the fees.
So when I reconcile those paid invoices, I have to Find & Match and then adjust for Stripe's fees.
Can someone suggest a way we can set up our mapping for paying invoices online via Stripe?
This money is spread out between 8 separate invoices, all with varying amounts.
FYI these mainly seem to relate to recurring invoices.
Often my invoices have close to 100 lines and working with that inside a browser gets confusing - much easier in Excel.
With many of our customers have only part paid a number of invoices.
Am I doing right by importing the invoices as if they were not paid and then going through each one and entering the payments that we have received on each one?
We normally counted the total invoices for one month and deducted the amount from their deposits and keep the remaining credit for next deduction.
All invoices from October 1st onwards were added into the system.
They request that all my invoices are made out to "Jill Jones c/o Acme property agents" and "Jane Gunn c/o of Acme property agents".
I am worried that the reoccuring invoices may not send in the future.
My invoices are usually 2 or three line items.
It is very frustrating that it seems you cannot seperate one users to approve purchase orders but cannot approve invoices?
We have repeating invoices that are set to save into draft on 1 October 2015 ready to send but it has not done this today.
Our invoices are very plain and lacking colour and information about our company.
Hello,It may be a simple question but nowhere in the interface i could find how to transfer Awaiting invoices to a Paid area.
This would make it a great deal easier to include on docx templates for invoices etc.
Currently on repeating invoices, our customers have no idea what service period they are paying for and this is causing confusion.
I had deleted my logo (since it was embedded in the DOCX) so as a test, I uploaded my logo again and sure enough, it appeared (fuzzily) on my invoices again.
At the moment the earliest is at the top of the page and it requires quite a lot of scrolling to reach current invoices.
we're doing testing and should receive about 5 emails between 3 different email addresses for invoices/receipts, and not one email has come through yet.
but why isn't this option available within the invoices page?
I would have expected the balance to be shown with brackets representing a negative balance (as in the invoices).
I've also checked the invoices I'm trying to reconcile for any abnormalities but all looks OK/usual.
We receive invoices from suppliers that require a deposit to be paid "before" the service date.
1) Pro Rata invoices - where a customer starts a service part way through a month or a quarter.
We have a few clients that have one address for invoices and then another address for statements.
If I change to outstanding @ eom it shows invoices from the previous month which have already been paid.
For example I want to send statements @ 31/12 so I only want to show what is owing eg November and any previous month outstanding invoices.
However if I set @ 31/12 the statement shows invoices invoiced in December which aren't payable till January.
If I set it @ 30/11 it shows November invoices owing but also October invoices showing still as owing even though they have been paid.
I would love to see a view for SKU's on the invoices.
At the moment with repeating invoices I have to manually enter the anniversary monthly dates in the description field of what the customer is being charged for.
It appears to me you can only upload invoices for the purposes of converting data from legacy accounting programs.
When I attempt to reconcile a cash deposit against a number of invoices for work done that week.
This is because previously when we set up each staff member separately any invoices that they created got sent from their personal email address.
We send out thousands of invoices and we have thousands of clients.
Hello,I have a member of staff who can create invoices and bills for approval.
We have had 19 invoices through June and July reflecting prices less GST, this has now miraculously reverted to the correct pricing as it was prior to June 13.
However, you must record collections against open invoices before using 0CPAs to OK entries.
My studio mates and I will have expenses and invoices going back and forth to each other.
All of the contacts in question have the first name field filled in and if I click 'Send anyway', the invoices are sent and the contact's first name appears at the top of the email anyway so there isn't actally any error.
I have repeating invoices for my clients, a few have changed their email address.
I have «UnitAmount» on my invoices.
I have imported over 600 invoices that were issued and paid in 2013.
However, there seems to be no facility for importing payments - so I have all these invoices showing as unpaid.
I got rather (very) behind with it so I've paid someone externally to input hundreds of purchase invoices and expenses.
Having already sent out our invoices for December 2013 and awaiting payments on 20th January 2014.
Can we have greater capacity to modify the look of Invoices/ Purchase Orders etc?
The invoices have the green tick and are marked as sent.
My art gallery client includes a picture of the purchased artwork in their word invoices, is this going to be possible with a .
I can create and send invoices fine for work that has already been done.
I notice the client pays multiple invoices in one hit.
And if so, how to manage the vat return so that these (now paid) invoices do not show up on the current vat return
com and this is used as the from email address whenever I send invoices from either company.
It has taken my a while to provent invoices from displaying the accountants details, rather than mine.
However after emailing an inoice, I have checked the online link to the invoices that it sends.
We have hundreds of repeat invoices set up and we find it difficult to identify repeat invoices when there are multiple invoices for one customer.
However we're rapidly going to hit the 500 invoices-per-month limit.
It would be extremely helpful, especially with clients who have had multiple statements sent RE unpaid invoices etc.
they have only been using it to generate invoices and nothing else.
This  then makes those invoices look incorrect as they have had GST applied to them.
They have AP and AR open invoices.
In traditional accounting systems you had a menu of all your open windows so you didn't have to lose your 'place' when needing to switch to another part of the package e. g. looking at a customer's invoices part way through doing a reconcile.
working for us and we paid them via their invoices.
I have no problem entering invoices, reconciling or generating reports etc.
Currently only one company has a PAYE system, which runs a 4 weekly payroll and then invoices the other company for 50% of the gross wage.
Managing your documents and invoices is still as simple as ever.
Accept ACH/eCheck payments from online invoices at a fraction of credit card fees.
Link4 delivers invoices instantly from one cloud accounting system to another, with nothing to install and no additional processes.
Chargebee is a Recurring Billing platform on top of Stripe, Braintree & other gateways to easily manage Tax Invoices, Subscriptions and much more.
Connect your deals, contacts, and invoices with automated workflows.
Automatically sync your invoices, payments, and products.
Create invoices automatically from your Volusion store.
Chase overdue invoices automatically by email, SMS and letter.
We'll also set your invoices as paid in XeroFor more information, check out .
Get an immediate advance on your outstanding invoices and free up your cash.
Manage your schedule, notes, invoices, payments and a lot more.
Know when invoices are paid, and optionally pass along fees.
GoCardless powered by Directli allows you to take control of your payments, ensuring your invoices get paid in a timely manner via Direct Debit.
Synchronise Clients, Invoices, Payments and Procurement, check out .
Quotes, schedules, invoices, timesheets, GPS tracking and seamless integration, check out .
Seamlessly exchange invoices with your customers and suppliers.
Or else some way of sending the invoices and statements to Outlook?
This would make it 100% manual to match invoices to expenses, and again I would have no client reporting capability, but it would save me tens of hours every month.
My client raising invoices on a programme called Midsoft which then imports direct into their Sage.
The client can have up to 100 invoices a week so it would mean a very labour intensive job for 1 guy.
Here are the key issues: I import 100% from overseas with long lead times, so working out costings and creating purchase orders and Invoices months in advance is a question.
We have a client that invoices based on weight x quantity x unit price.
Currently, the company I work for is using QuickBooks and Excel to create appropriate invoices for the logistic service we provide.
Since invoices can have partial payments.
I can't think of a good reason to try to match hundreds and potentially thousands of these invoices to the biweekly deposits from Amazon.
This setup required too much duplication of data entry and manual production of invoices, reports and documents instead of system production of these and single data entry.
MANY people want detailed invoices (say to handle inventory tracking, per customer invoicing, etc) while using Square for processing payments.
HiWhen entering costs into a WFM job not all of them have PO's and Invoices such as mileage.
Track invoices to customer in GBP, EUR, USD.
- Builds and sends quotes and invoices quickly and easily.
Changing the "invoices" created by Square is a bit of a mission as we have to remove and redo the payments as well for both the cash and card invoices.
Besides tracking your invoices Easy Trace can also help you keep track of your warranties.
ZapStitch automatically imports orders as invoices, creating payments and inventory items.
ZapStitch automatically imports orders as invoices, creating payments and inventory items.
We have successfully processed GBP payments using stripe but have a problem when clients want to settle USD invoices.
Datamolino is a web that helps you to capture supplier invoices and receipts.
We are having trouble with the link, it won't bring through unpaid invoices from the previous financial year.
So, that means it doesn't want to take payments from this financial year that relate to invoices from last financial year.
They require a lot of detail on their invoices - more than the standard custom.
Here is why this came up: I deal with service providers who bill large, infrequent invoices, such as doctors, web developers, attorneys, etc.
Greetings - We've built a late fee/service fee tool for managing past due customer invoices as well as customers that carry an ongoing balance.
First of all, let me say, i love it, as it has automated a lot of my work as we have 22 locations and about 20 invoices a day from each location.
Every now and then same thing happens with Invoices.
It would be great if updates were given to invoices automatically when Debtor Daddy reminders are sent out so they can be more easily tracked.
Eventhough it should be rather simple, there certain areas that would required a clarification:Payables Invoices and Inventory.
I'm doing invoices through Freshbooks now and want to move to a full-featured hosted accounting system.
You seemed to have made changes to the To field in Invoices.
Getting too many monthly invoices for a system we have not used for ages.
In our contact data base we set a branding theme for our clients with our customized templates, which should show up when writing invoices.
We care about how our invoices look to our clients, and so should you.
Billing HistoryIt's kind of beguiling that a book keeping platform doesn't contain a way of retrieving your previous invoices.
I tried re-logging, different invoices, organisations and in another pc and nothing.
That is a lot of invoices av invoice being approx &#163;100 each This is what my client are saying ( in other words STOP sending invoices this way!
We have multi level approval process for the teams to raise the PO and invoices that have to be approved by the department managers and once approved, it goes to Finance for final approvals.
Most invoices are emailed to us which we attached to the Bill.
##### CLUSTER 36 #####
If my business has a data base of 40,000 customers and 10,000 active ones can I still use xero?
’ Generally business use only required to delete duplicate statement lines.
so i frequently use the tube for travel related to my business.
However, he took the item out of the business to use in the business, so effectively as a fixed asset.
We don't use the inventory within Xero as it doesn't suit our business needs.
90) on 15 July 16 for business use.
We use a personal credit card for the business and for some personal expenses too.
How do I input pro-rated expenses into Xero that are shared between private use/business use, e. g. let's assume half of my internet traffic is business related, and half private.
I've got a computer that I use for the business but I bought it before I opened the business.
I have a credit card that I use for business and pleasure.
33 (50% GST to be claimed based on business use).
The vehicle has business and private use, I believe this is required, but I may be wrong.
We operate a race horse training business and use Xero as our accounting package.
I currently use xero to manage my business, but as a business registered in Israel I must use an invoicing system that is legally certified locally.
In my business we take a lot of cash payments, which go in the till in variouse denominations given to use by customers.
My question is regarding a truck (business use only) that was purchased in 2012.
We do a lot of business in France, and although Xero's native VAT treatment is slightly lacking, we have managed to work around any major problems (We use separate Cost codes to keep track of French TVA).
Or should I keep the personal contributions on business credit card as 'owner funds introduced' and use Inventry write off for items i've purchased?
They all make the business money apart from Xero (which will save money if I use it correctly), so are they assets or purchases?
Hello all,I am a sole trader and I use my vehicle for both business and private use (mainly business though)When I have motor vehicle expenses (such as Petrol) , is there any way to only claim a percentage of that for the business (example 75% for the business and 20% for private use)Regards,Paul
We don't use invoicing for this side of the business.
HiWe have jsut switched the business over to Xero but our Bookkeepers are against the idea of allowing us full use of a Standard user role.
90% of the use of the car is for business.
We do things very differently to for profit organisations and although you have the small business area this still won't cover most of what we do and how we use Xero.
We are a small plumbing business and use Xero to send out Quotes to our clients.
We use Mavenlink for business and it is a great PM tool.
These are any business's secret, and it is not possible to make this available easily to user who use the data entry for Expenses and Income.
Many contacts use multiple names for their business.
Currently I use xero payroll for a labour hire business.
We have a business credit card that has now changed to a personal use card, Im unsure if I delete the card that it will affect my balance sheet and past transactions.
I have personal card which I use for all my business transactions and I can't get a data feed.
We run a small hospitality business and one of the distribution channels we use involves an agent intermediary.
I use a tracking category named <Business Line> to split the different business activities of my trust: Corporate coaching, Teaching, Consulting, etc.
Was wondering if anyone has tried or knows if we can use the Expense Claims area to manage Business-sponsored credit cards.
But having to have two separate systems for personal and business is almost a dealbreaker to not use xero.
For the Labour hire business I'm using tracking categories to allocate an employee number which gives me some handy reports at the end of the month, but I would rather use cost centres as a tracking category but as I can't allocate two tracking categories in payroll, I have to choose.
CoverKit allows you to extract your business information to compile a financial profile that you can use to work with your broker to get the right insurance solution, for your business.
A set of easy-to-use business management software tools that will help you manage your business workflow more efficiently and effectively.
An easy to use, online solution for the small to medium sized business who wants to manage their own payroll at low cost and with full support.
Almost all my expenses are non-UK (even though I am a UK management consultancy business), and to help the reporting to my clients I put all receipts through Expensify and use Expensify to generate reports to validate the costs I pass on to my customers.
We currently use Keep it Easy for scheduling, as we inherited it when we bought the business.
Interested in hearing from anyone in a similar business and what works for them to track jobs and associated costs and to use inventory via accounting software.
I have been building a small business accounting software program (not double-entry bookkeepping, by any means) and have been getting feedback from some clients / accountants that use Xero.
We use Xero without any plugins at the moment and it works fine for our normal business.
We use Xero for a lawn and gardening contractors business.
We are a small retail and service business and we currently use MYOB RM.
##### CLUSTER 37 #####
Naturally, Xero sprang to mind, however, they don't want to link Xero to a bank account or track expenses and I'm not sure if Xero would work under such a circumstance.
Hello,On 1st May my usual daily bank account statement feed into Xero from the ASB did not occur, i. e. the whole day's transactions from April 30 (the previous day) are missing from Xero.
There is currently a bank account attached to Xero as all monthly reconciliation and VAT is done in Xero.
I have connected my bank account to xero so the statements flow into my xero dashboard for reconciliation.
I've seen the Xero recommendation that in order to keep everything nicely reconciled, I should maintain a virtual bank account for each currency within Xero.
In addition to this, I am trying to reconcile Xero and the bank statement but I can't because one of the transactions in Xero (which has been imported directly from the bank account) is inaccurate (wrong amount), so i can't reconcile because Xero is wrong!
##### CLUSTER 38 #####
So we need to go to PayPal and reconcile the four items.
Need help to sort this out please.
Also, we need GST recorded correctly for BAS (which is collected on outgoings too).
I need a tax feature that allows me to input tax lines that reduce the amount of money I owe the person I am buying from.
Do I need to split the charge each month?
Need to make journal entry for Cash, A/R, A/P, and then to Retained Earnings.
So I assumed that we would need to declare this with the next VAT return, same as with EU acquisitions.
However, 20% of card transactions are deducted before it is sent to us for a cash advance, so these fees somehow need to be recorded as Loan Repayments.
We need the 2017 data to be 100% accurate but we have to do it on the company file we currently have.
In order to check that the coding of the transactions is correct we need to access each transaction individually and adjust if necessary.
These items will not be sold, and need to be removed from our tracked inventory.
I need to refund that client $200 for returned goods.
HiI need to charge a client for airfares and accommodation.
It is fine, I accept it, they need IT to run all the different test.
I assume I need to split it and code each item differently.
We need to put through adjustments to claim on past services.
I would appreciate a prompt reponse, we have the audit 2016 starting next week, and I would need to sort this out before then.
I need all these fields for the accurate import of a batch into my online banking profile.
So i voided this transaction and now on the VAT return screen for my next VAT return in May it is saying I need to repay all the VAT claimed back on that transaction.
Is there anything else I need to know / do?
Really what I'm looking for is a clear guide of what I need to do and what I need to be aware of when making this change.
Now one week later with much more data entered into the system, I need to revert this back to the original format with only inventory movement directed to Direct Costs on the P&L.
do I need to transfer the withdrawals first to petty cash or and than?
If the service cost $500, I need to reverse charge $50.
I have expenses that I need to pass on to the landlord.
If you are the one, or maybe you think you are but need more details - hurry and reach out OFFICE is SITUATED IN MONTREAL
We would often lend stock to retailers to trial but we need a way to manage it so we know who has what and when it's due back.
For GST returns assessed by IRD you will need to click into the return and manually mark it as assessed.
I need to reconcile the statement.
We are a construction sector company who need to ensure we have sufficient stock levels to complete jobs.
The complication is that this is in the last financial year, so I'm going to need to carry this over to this year.
But I need to annul it, otherwise the VAT return will incorrect again!
We also need some bookkeeping, and someone for year end close and Annual reporting on finances.
Now, i need to revalue the inventory on a particular date.
Or I need to have 2 different Contacts in this case.
We would need them to be individually dated as we reconcile the till down to nil each day.
But I need a way to do all 50 updates in bulk.
Wasn't sure if we are set up as 50/50 partners then everything would need to be equal?
I then need to record the purchase to our supplier.
All good, except I need to ensure I am also passing those costs on to my client.
Each month I need to allocate our staff costs across these two categories.
I would really appreciate any input on this as I obviously need to make sure the VAT reports are correct for the VAT return.
I'm not sure categories is the right option here since each project name would need to be its own and only relate to the client it belongs to.
Or have I completely misunderstood what I need to do?
That said, I have a few transactions I need help entering into the system the correct way.
Morning,I need some advice on how to correctly input vehicle registrations.
The fact of the matter is that unfortunately my own ill health has repeatedly prevented me from spreading the word and drumming up the support and sponsorship I need to achieve my gaol ….
I need the debit to show what we spent for the customers, and credit to show what we got from the customer in terms of cash and there will be a running balance/closing balance at the end.
The total for these show as a historical adjustment for £986 on the Balance Sheet and I wish to know where I need to enter these figures to reduce this adjustment as I have been warned against it from accountant friends and our Balance Sheet doesn't balance!
Do I need to create a bill or only Reconcile the money that is spent?
I still need to track exactly what's been sold for inventory tracking purposes and reporting, but creating a bill for each market seems strange as there isn't a customer and that's a required field.
Do I need to worry about it,  or is it a bug.
I do however have a list of assets which I need to input into the system and start depreciating?
This client also overpaid on 5 march 2015, so I need to include in conversion balances for overpayment.
However, at some point I may register and need to re-claim v. a. t. for the previous twelve months.
We had not been intending to enter any transactions prior to the accounting start date, so am not sure if we need to do this with a Conversion Balance or something else.
I need to convert from Reckon 2015.
I need it done yesterday.
I need to enter every single transaction.
I need to enter comparative figures for the previous year by month.
So I need to defer the expenses and then later recognize the expenses upon recognition of that revenue.
What do I need to do to reconcile these two payments?
The customer's requirements changed and they no longer need the work done, so no deposit was paid.
There are many large payments in my reconcile area that need to be broken down into smaller payments.
I need to increment and decrement equity based on profit and loss and also percent ownership of the company, and that needs to track to specific different initial contributions.
However, I need the feed to show everything starting from 1st July 2014.
We need to complete our UK tax return.
I need to track expenses to each event.
I need to get some historic data!
do I need to unreconcile.
The customer has since cancelled and I now need to issue a full refund.
Example of what I need:I have upcoming subcontractor expenses.
This because I need inventory tracking and automatic inventory/cost of goods transactions operated when purchasing and selling my products.
I can't see that these transactions can be imported by the feed but still need to reconcile the payments.
If I am reconciling a small charge to "Taco Bell" as an example, I obviously don't need Taco Bell to be a contact.
The CSV file is less than 1000 items (about 650 lines total) and the only items that return errors are the items indicating they need to be tracked inventory (non-tracked stuff has imported fine)I have e-mailed support, but as this is EOY we need to get this working fast so we can enter opening stock values in the system and get invoicing again!
I need urgent help as i have to complete my balance for submitting taxes before April 1?
For example:Membership Fee : $500I need to split that incoming amount into 6 categories:Cat 1 : $150Cat 2: $50Cat 3: $50Cat 4: $70Cat 5: $30Cat 6: $150If anyone can give me some clear guidance that would be great.
It is cumbersome but does the job we need.
On the RTA car registration notice, there are two components need to be paid.
Therefore you are not sure of which ones need to be selected to unreconcile.
Any help would be appreciated as the client has around 20-30 transactions that will need to be reimputed if the only way to fix is to remove and redo.
Do I need to file an expense claim for my per diems, then?
Now I need to Dr. Asset ( Furniture) Cr.
Therefore, I now need to submit a short return for the period 1 September 2014 to 31 October 2014.
We need to cover this period to then be in the normal 2 monthly period again.
I need to go back an enter all my transactions from the 1st of the year to date.
Does this need to be a manual GL adjustment?
Comparatives - we need more options on comparatives, particularly the prior year amount or the corresponding month in the prior year etc.
All I need to do is update the 'from name' for the system generated emails.
I have been advised this is possible but may need a plug-in.
Is that not important or do I need Stitch Lab's program to do all that portion of things?
I need confirmation and guidance here.
I need to know how to apply this whole thing.
My accountant has said we need to reclaim it in the next VAT return.
When we say we haven't received the second check they ask which check we did receive and we need the check number.
Have replied on his discussion but need a reply as soon as possible.
As you can see, I'm unsure and need some other peoples opinions!
I need to create an overpayment on a payroll tax bill.
Do I need to record it as part of the asset price, and if I have more items, do I divide the delivery cost?
There are a number of things we need to adjust with our Fixed Assets also.
This would be incorrect as I need to know what my P&L is on actual goods sold and not on all goods bought and still sitting in inventory.
I need to work out gross profit by using FIFO method of Inventory valuation.
I have banked the cheque and now need to reconcile this.
On a monthly basis i receive money from a third party and need to pass on some of this money to my customers.
we don't need to consider VAT as our client is outside the UK.
If so I believe i need to journal this.
32 that has been paid to Paypal is there a simple way to do it or do I need to include the fee in my Sale somewhere?
As a result of using paper-based cheques, they get lost, and sometimes need to be VOIDED.
We've had one good offer but we need a comparative quote.
What records do I need to keep from Quickbooks?
Its simply an Asset issueIt the last thing i need to fix so that my balance sheet is right and i can do my BAS properly, would really appreciate any help.
even though there have been several transactions that I need to process immediately.
I need to have only the current period's rwt in my balance sheet and not accumulating the prior years.
I do not need to produce a credit note document for the client, as one has already been made from our old accountancy system.
I need to file this today .
Is that sufficient, or do I need to enter other documentation?
- Is there anything I need to consider in regards to VAT in that case?
AT the moment I still have all the depreciation information on an excel sheet and then I calculate the 40% claim I need to make for income tax purposes.
Is Paycycle now fully integrated or do we still need to do payruns in paycycle and transfer?
bearing in mind all the exchange rates will need to be set as the correct date each transaction occurred.
However, this quantity would need to be increased manually and I am not quite sure how to go about it.
I am so out of my league and commencing an accounting/bookkeeping certificate next week but we really need to repay this debt ASAP.
I mean i need to submit my return and the last month is April 2017. if i put 16.
I need to show the $50 spent coded to "produce" on my income statement as an expense AND reconcile the expense.
We are already upto date and didn't need this and having many transactions this was frustrating.
In Sage all I'd have to do is go to departments, select the right one and view 'activity' choosing the month I need and this would show me all activity.
Do I still need to file an Expense Claim?
After now doing 2 months invoicing on it I need to know how to put titles or site names or notes on to it.
Now they need to return some of that capital to those family members.
Do we need to be concerned with regards to the security of your program?
I need to post mileage to claim the fuel.
We dont need items and prices all we require is a description box and total box.
I need some help and a solution.
We supply products to customers that we need to resupply periodically every 12,25 or 50 days.
basically we have paid for such items as fuel, stationery etc out our our own money and need to off set the receipts agains the drawings.
Or do they need to be copied individually?
Can you tell me if we wish to track a particular dress style that has different colours and different styles, do we need to have separate line items of inventory for every colour and every size?
Do I need to apply an adjustment to inventory?
And if I do that "conversion" thing, do I need to delete the transactions I entered manually?
Each item will need to record different refurbishment expenses against it.
I have raised a support tick but really need to rectify this asap.
If so, do we need to do a return in order to claim?
Presumably we need to be GST registered in order to do so?
What if I need to do both?
Do I need to make it some kind of liability?
A simple list of 'Open orders' which has been created automatically is what I need.
I have been entering them into expense claims, but how would I follow this along, in terms of do I still need to approve and mark as paid?
The reason why this would be different is becauseI don't need to produce receipts and of course it's not a physical 'thing'.
I’m pretty dumbfounded that I even need to search for a workaround and weak email support and not come up with any workable solutions.
Hello, We have a number of unpaid volunteers who on occasion will incur costs that they then need to claim reimbursement for.
xml files might suffice but I can't be the first person to have this need.
I need to record both numbers.
So for example, we need are invoiced for professional services 3,100,000 COP.
I dont know if I really need it there.
It's a nuisance if I need to change it.
we do however need the timesheets & values to be recorded against particular jobs/budgets and variances reported on.
So here is something I need you to realize now:Google is trying to make it easier for you to get on the front page!
All you need to do is head here to submit your application!
I have entered some expenses and approve them but then I realized some of them where incorrect and I need to edit them, how can I do this?
our bookkeeper is away this weekend, and here I am with a stack of receipts I need to enter myself.
I really need it to go onto 'Wine Club Income' that I've created.
I need to:1. allocate income to both individual customer & wine club income accounts2.
I need to get a grip!
Which means you either need to know your codes or you need to insert some sort of description when you enter in the item codes.
If I do work for clients outside the UK but in the EU do I need a further nil rate to be applied?
I know we need an RTI-ready system and want a cloud-based system rather than a local computer-based software.
We don't need to be reimbursed however we have been told by someone that perhaps we can be reimbursed somehow down the track.
Is there something else I need to activate before I can set up and print cheques?
This is probably a really stupid question, but I cannot work out how to easily enter general journal entries - which I need to do regularly.
I need the amounts being deposited to reflect the ACTUAL amounts being deposited, otherwise reconciling would be a nightmare.
I am in Australia and need to know if this data goes offshore.
I see the Tracking option, but there only seem to be two tracking options, whereas I need about 15 in order to do this, surely there must be another way?
I suppose I then don't need to put an expense claim since the cash was provided by the company itself right?
What we want to do is make it really easy for our customers to know and understand what they need to do to avoid or limit these problems.
Do I need to do a manual journal?
These are the features that we need - 1) Team collaboration tool by project.
So far I think we will go with Basecamp on this one as others are too complicated with Gantt charts, tasks etc - we don't need those.
In general what we DON'T need1) For team collaboration - we don't need any sophisticated project management tools (gantt charts, tasks, etc.
We need to make sure that we've built a tool that works for everyone.
I need to reimburse myself an expense claim, which I  want to be recorded in this current year 2012.
All you need to do is share your thoughts on these questions: Everyone who responds before 31 August 2012 gets a shot at winning an iPad!
Then I need to cross off payments on my spreadsheet for each of the four people.
I need to file a VAT return ASAP, as need help FAST!
I need it to do email merge.
HR Executive Solutions provides assistance to small businesses that don't have their own HR resource but need help with employment agreements, disciplinary issues, restructures and redundancies and general HR.
I don't have a need to 'claim and approve'.
This would allow me to create reports where I would only need a figure that would be liable to change, placed within a paragraph.
If we need to update a check style template, we need to update it now on multiple check styles.
I frequently need to visit my inventory list to find an SKU I am missing.
We all need to operate from the same database due to patient records and calendar management for reception.
This removes the need to manually update those fields.
Even better would be to have a flag capability on certain receipts where attachments need to still be added would be great.
I need to track items with four decimal points.
We need this.
As a working holiday maker, the employees with working holiday visa always want to know how many working days they have already collect because they need 88 days to apply for their 2nd working holiday visa.
With superstream compliance, it would be good to touch base with our clients to remind them to process super and offer them assistance if they need it.
We need the 'diameter' symbol mostly (a circle with a line through).
When doing client's band reconciliation, if we need more info we write in the request box however we then need to notify the client that they need to check the Discuss box.
At the moment we need to download a reupload to the draft bill, this could be streamlined a little.
When doing a taxation reconciliation, we need to know what SGC have been paid, or still outstanding.
I need the ability to do 'delayed charges'.
I need a feature to track each users quote numbers; how much are they quoting per month etc.
Don't get me wrong, there are people in my firm who do need to know this - but we have systems in place to tell us this sort of thing.
We need more access levels.
You then need to export the content and do a bunch of manual work.
I need a feature that can rate the work we have done.
We need a lot more flexibility in users roles.
My clients are tired of QB but this job costing feature needs to be fine-tuned, and reports need to be capable of displaying the detail.
We need your marketing support here to reach more small businesses.
We need the ability to change the e-sign short code when downloading documents to sign.
It is often necessary to either either email or send our customers a document by snail mail and then we need to either do a bulk email or print addresses on envelopes.
Names, amounts, dates need to be updated regularly.
but I am in desperate need of a way to automate these tasks.
I also wouldn't need any of the 'wealth management' features that some apps have, e. g. tracking portfolio valuations, etc.
With less than 18 months to go, we need to start advising our clients.
The activity column in comparison doesn't need to be as wide as it is.
You would need the opportunity to exclude.
For example if you have 2000 entries for the entire year and you are given information for only December and January that you need to code first it makes it very laborious to sort screens and have to scroll through all the screens.
At the moment, if you need to get to a prior period GSTreturn you have to click the drop down box and then click the final return you want.
You would need this if your organisation type was Company or potentially Trust and Superannuation if a corporate trustee was involved so a couple of questions on the organisation page would sort this.
We often need to go to both of these but have to go Reports - All Reports then Drafts or Published.
There is no need to send reminders to, as I have already sent several statements and collection letters .
There is a necessary need of keeping record of opening as well as closing stock every month.
That's only useful if you need to know what needs to be ordered, but the list may grow as models change2.
I need a way to print out the 1099's at the end of the year.
We track jobs and projects but both can change so we need the flexibility.
When someone has added many items that are billable and they need to be edited to not billable there is no efficient way.
We need a feature manually adjust the hours.
You need to put a reminder on the save button to remind to click out of description box.
I need to post Terms and Conditions into that field so they automatically are sent with each Purchase Order, but the Character Limit is too low.
This would also need to be an option as part of the tax return lodgement process.
You then need to go back and reconcile the whole batch again.
I type my scenario and query into the box, and before clicking "Send Support Request", I check on the drop-down to ensure that I do really want "I need help to do something".
So that if a few accidentally got missed, it would be easy to pick up which ones need to be amended without having to go through every single journal
We need it for reporting purposes.
Why do we even need to enable it in the first place?
If I am going to buy something I need to if it falls within the budget I have set.
We ship wholesale orders to several customers and need a secure way to save each customers' credit card information on file for continuous billing.
We need a field to record the name of the expenses claim i. e. "November 2015" or "Project XYZ" or "Trip to Georgia".
Many bills have multiple items which all need splitting, to gain the detail we require.
Most of my customers do not have email and we do not need a customer email to place orders or take payments.
You import a bill then find you need to make an adjustment.
We'll need to do manual payslips until then!
I often need to change the Theme - for instance to produce an 'interim' document, Delivery Note or similar, and it is very laborious.
The practice dashboard brings up all the clients whose GST returns and due and we need to manually go through and dismiss those for which we are not a manager.
So the "Process Inventory" function would need the user to specify which inventory is being processed, and which "type" of processing should take place.
(Happy to provide consultancy for you on this if you need it ;) )
If you need suggestions on how to resolve this technically, I'll be glad to provide support.
Currently when doing trading reports in V2 we need to manually enter the Net profit figure in the overall profit and loss.
Recently I need to remove tracking in 300+ transactions and I don't see your find & recode function helping in this case.
(Not for BAS purposes at least)  As a former CPA this is incorrect accounting treatment (Unless I need to go back to Uni and do a refresher course).
It has come to our attention that this is becoming a lot more essential as we have now two very big clients that need this.
"We really appreciate all the feedback so far and understand the need for this feature.
Most of my bills are created using repeated transactions, but then I need to set the reference number and a few notes once I get the bill PDF from a vendor.
We have some customers and suppliers where we have hundreds of transactions and when you click on one and need to go back, it can take forever as it's loading the 'whole' company transactions.
Need to manually do tax calculations from Old reports spreadsheets.
Sorry, folks, but hardly anyone has indicated the need for Apple Watch functionality on these forums.
Perhaps you need to have apple watch functionality too look current.
This request need to go for vote for the Product team to review and take serious consideration in implementing it.
Basically I need to setup separate creditors for each supplier for each grant that is issued.
This would reduce the amount of clicks to quickly go to the screen I need.
The contact details are limited with only address and phone number tabs - some contacts need various different details on this tab for example date of birth, ethnicity, sex, affiliation numbers.
we don't really need other CRM features.
, so you have a choice to either submit it as a "Purchase" (history traceable) or an everyday Receipt/Spend Money eg drawings that does not need traceability.
When I quote more than 1 quantity for my client, I need the cost to be shown as zero or give an option to click on a specific quantity to show that particular value.
The latter 2 aren't so important, but you really need to have date ranges.
So I need to input over 750 memberships from PayPal.
If you click on "Date" to sort by that column, it will initial then activate the Date field to sort by, so you are STILL looking at the oldest transaction, then you need to click it again.
Therefore we need the option to delete these now obsolete doubled up Asset Types, once we have fixed up all the miscoding.
Currently we need to download and print out our client's end of year Financial Statements for our Director to manually sign Statement of Disclaimer.
That is all I need to save a lot of work.
To change the tax code, we would need to undo all the payments.
For Chinese-speaking clients, the notes also need to be in Chinese.
Right now it appears the every user gets every email alert without regard for whether they need/want it or not.
When searching for payroll addons, we need to sort through many options that are not specific to a country (in our case USA).
For example, I have 10 transactions, 5 I can easily code and want to post and the other 5 I need more thought to correctly allocate.
I need to attach .
Then I need to ensure I advise my customers in the notes function that items are on back order.
"Some reports that are preparing my need "As at.
and some may not need either of these titles.
For example if there was a journal entry that you need more information on, you could go to the notes module, search on a nominal code or other identifier and see further notes (and files included within that note) rather than having to record them separately outside of XeroJust an idea :)John
SInce I need to chack them sometimes.
For example, sometimes we will need to follow a client up for something when they don't have a job open.
If we could create a milestone under the client then we could set reminders to follow clients up for things that didn't have or need a job created.
It is great for me as importantly in my industry we have a set of Terms & Conditions we need a customer to acknowledge and accept.
This results in numerous duplicate contacts when you only need the one.
I find that at times I need to edit the cover, such as making it "DRAFT" or had to change the date.
Need a Discription Header under Inventory so you can see what customers buy from you instead of clciking on to the item, it should be all there to see.
So that we can reduce the long list to those 10 to 20 customers we need to focus on (i. e. Due Date > 60 days).
Chargify has an integration with Avalara, but we really don't need all the other features Chargify provides.
Data entry would be much quicker if a date box would accept and recognise a six digit entry, without the need to enter the forward slashes.
Hence to enter 9 April 2015 you would only need to type in 090415 instead of 09/04/15.
When creating a customer contact form, a great field to include would be the rep on record which populates from a Group titled Reps. Of course the rep contact would need to be added to the group.
The customers or our staffs do not need to enter every single parts that needs to build one whole unit, Assembly Inventory do all of this and even let you know if you don't have even parts to build the units.
We don't want to do allocations post-banking, we need to actually create the deposit slip first and preferably not manually either.
Also sometimes you need to click twice in order to activate the cell and write in it.
I need to create reports that aren't strictly filtered by dates.
This would allow clients to only need a single receipt that presents all info as opposed to multiple pieces of paper.
It would be really handy if you could see leave requests on the dashboard so you know which ones need to be approved
Occasionally there is a need to send out email communication to suppliers and customers.
but there are a couple of significant issues that need to be sorted out before this is done and dusted.
We need a counter to show if we hit the limit or not!
We need more clarity on the transaction limit.
Currently we need to click on each individual paid amount.
I am trying to edit multiple inventory items and as I have so many inventory items I need to search for the item number to get back to the spot I was at to continue editing.
If you want to play with the big boys you need to get this part of your program up to scratch
We need a feature to restrict Access to the CONFIDENTIAL SUPPLIER LISTS, and also the cost of goods that are sold.
Why build plugins for every e-commerce interface (of which there are hundreds) > when you can get everything you need directly from the gateway?
Often there may be additional specifications or plans that need to be sent to the supplier with the PO.
I currently have two situations currently where I need "Current Assets" balances in a foreign currency.
Especially if you need to run various versions of the TB.
We have several employees who need to generate PO's on the go and this would be ideal for us.
If a cash-only client knows what they don't need/want (assuming I have done my job well!
In my opinion, cash-only accounting clients neither need nor want a constant "upsell" of non-applicable features or services.
Obviously, this would need to be stored under Supplier Contacts.
And since my team need to post journals they have to be given Advisor rights as there is limited choice of user access.
When I'm on the road, I need to see how much a customer owes me on my phone and to see when they placed their last order and what quantities they ordered.
In other words, I need a list of recent transactions and current balance for each contact.
This feature would be very helpful specially if you have more than 20 transactions that need clarification with your accountant or client.
I currently need to do a journal to include the depreciation at year end.
That's fine for GST-free items, but very disconcerting for taxed items when I need to double-check the line amounts against the till receipt.
We don't need vouchers.
SEE WHICH TRANSACTIONS HAVE RECEIPTS   - in the transaction list, the transaction would need to show a visual indicator of which transactions have attached files and which do not - this way I will know when I've forgotten to upload a receipt.
my bookkeeper might review all transactions once a month and see a full list of areas they need to review and comment on.
When I generate aged payables or receivables, I need to identify each line item by these codes.
I know it's a few clicks to turn them off, my point I guess is that they don't need to be turned on in the first place.
These then need editing to correct.
It would be good to have a search option when I need to print one statement instead of paging through all the debtors to find the one I need
In order to file a T2 electronically, you need to export your GIFI codes to a file which you then import into your tax reporting software.
htmlRequirement Need output in XML to submit GST return XML Schema can be requested from Canada Revenue Agency http://www.
We have several credit cards that need to be paid on specific dates.
I am sure that other markets have their own special needs and they need to be addressed as well.
I believe that you need to have a team that will address each market specific needs.
To rectify this I will need to delete an entire statement that has already been reconciled and then re reconcile it.
It would be great if that could be done from IOS or Android and those users would not need to login to a computer at the office.
They could do all they need to do from their iPhone.
We need to track their commission for each sale they make.
This is in fact very common as you need to register for VAT in other EU states as soon as certain criterias are reached.
It seems crazy that simple issues that need instant responses cannot be dealt with.
Sometimes, they need to be split.
6) specifically you need to allow one to do bulk changes to move transactions between P&L and balance sheet.
For example, one may need to capitalize a bunch of expense transactions.
Under the IRS rules only the checks if >=$600 would need to be reported if not a corporation so would need an intelligent way to separate the two.
We need a way to accept checks online that does not charge the 3% transaction fee.
For example, when I need to search earlier today for our payroll taxes due to the government, I apparently needed to click on "Purchases" to find it.
I don'f think product enhancement votes should need to be used to try and get action on fixes.
We need this with reporting options to enable reporting via contact type.
Not sure if I am the only one who would need this, if yes let me know.
I don't really need all the features of the upgraded membership and would prefer at minimum 30 transactions per month.
For small businesses, that only have 1 type of stock and only a few stock purchases a year,  clients don't see the point of paying extra for too little added value (that they need).
I don't have an accountant and I shouldn't need one.
The problem being is that I need to scroll to the bottom to see the horizontal scrollbar but then I can see the headings.
It often makes it difficult to impossible to find the help you need, resulting in many extra Community posts and support emails.
We need much more flexibility with User Roles.
A product I've been using extensively for my personal finances is YNAB (You Need A Budget), which has a fantastic budget manager.
It would be handy to have a search button on the statement screen to find a customer as I often need to print a statement for a customer & have to scroll through 10 pages to find the customer.
but I certainly need it!
Need same functionality as Sageline 50 ie terms and ability to store credit scores (in future you could link this online to a credit rating agency).
There are a couple of issues that need to be addressed:1.
As managers we need to ensure staff are taking the required 4 weeks leave entitlement for their health and safety requirements as well as an option for reduced ACC levies.
This means i either need to guess or scroll through all my staff pays.
We need the ability to accrue entitlements based on a percentage calculation.
Can consideration be given that in the last two weeks of June, and up until 14 Jul, that amendments to payruns previously posted to not trigger a need for subscription upgrade.
Whereas previously they wouldn't need to do this as the used Sage Payroll.
Many businesses need/want to track their employee entitlements through the balance sheet.
I need to keep a record of passport details, contracts of employment, qualifications etc.
I don't do staff in alphabetical order so I need to click save, then wait and then click close.
When I process Leave Application I need to enter dates which is not really applicable being a total of Leave Balance to be paid off (in hours).
You need to date hime/her to have started work, a day prior to that date.
We have clients who need this info for audit purposes
Need the ability to calculate Australian Payroll Tax.
When SUBMITTING the TFN declaration in payroll, we need the popup to INCLUDE the details that are being submitted, so we can confirm exactly what is being sent for correctness.
I find it unacceptable that I need to manually adjust something that should be automated!
(It may need a separate feature request but it would also be good to have multiple approvers)
This is very frustrating, as we need to access the people who have access to the administrator/subscriber login and cannot dsitribute the login freely to our staff.
These item need to be sorted.
Every year this user (or their amazing accountant) has to complete the Workers Compensation Actual Wages Declaration and the wages need to be separated into the various categories laid out in the legislation.
I have studio management software that has all of the reports that I need to see.
I'm not really worried about them being an exact match, but I need them to be as close as possible.
I am confused as to the process I need to undertake to recognise these transactions.
I need a month by month statement of last financial year.
Plus all I need is a monthly total figure (so importing CSV's is overkill).
(from memory these always need to match up with a statement line in order to reconcile? )
What setting do I need to adjust to turn these off?
It makes it very easy then to identity, pick up & batch all bills that need to be paid at the end of the month, as they all have the same reference.
Do I need to try again?
I think I need to go back to Quick Books.
Each brand has its own email templates, we need to email out using the correct email template,  we are currently manually doing this.
What do i need to do?
Otherwise we need to do a lot of back tracking to find the original service call and determine when the equipment was pruchased and if an extended warranty was purchased or not and if there is any warranty left.
But more "beautiful design" would eliminate the need for this ;-).
We have put this down to operator error, probably not clicking Save or Approve, but need a way to cross reference.
*** However, I need the T&Cs to be locked to print on it's own page.
I want to keep all my paperwork in order, and quick find the bill I need to reconcile on the screen, instead of "next page, search, next page search.
I'll try and explain simply and I mainly need help in coding my transactions and moving money around.
Surely I don't need to adjust every transaction?
We need to import the data into the accounting software: the customer, what they paid for and when, amount.
We also need to import the commission paid to the third party on these transactions.
I'm not really happy with it and have no need for it.
I'm assuming these are defects that need to be reviewed and fixed.
I'm creating an online form/questionnaire to help my clients decide what product they need.
If you need, below is a more detailed explanation.
Or do I need to enter manually?
If I need to manually enter the opening balance how can I do this?
Now apparently I need to deselect "match" on every single transaction in order to reconcile it under the "Rules" I created?
Do I really need to OK every rule?
I would love to hear from anyone with any tips and advice on anything we might need to be aware of, or handy hints about the changing over process.
I have expense claims which I need to void.
From what I've read here I need to 1.
I have read through the communication guide and understand the size guidelines etc but do I need to submit a sample for approval?
Youll need to log in again"
It was for a hire car we didn't need.
Do i need to delete and start again?
We are a training organisation and require the need to train and assess students in the financial and payroll functions of an accounting system.
I have about 600 statements I'm going to need to delete and iv been avoiding my tax return all year because of this problem.
I believe I need to make sure all the transactions up to the VAT registration date are up-to-date, then I should go into settings and switch, is this correct?
In order to be somehow compliant to the legislation, we need few customisations, mentioned below.
I've got a couple of incoming statements (credit) that I need to match with one outgoing statement (debit).
Although the issue has been fixed we now need to correct the contact database.
I do have an accountant but I need to gain more knowledge of my financials.
It seems the questions you need to ask are different and I do know the answers!
Customers need to see this for their records.
However, not long ago I cancel my subscription because back then I'm not sure I need an accounting software.
I believe I need to.
I have created a bill but I need to void it.
Find out what you need to do so you can enter this transaction'I know a few of the inventory items will go to zero, that is fine, but it does not tell me which item is the one causing the barrier so that I can figure out how to remedy the issue.
This is a problem for us, as some of the older people we work for don't have email addresses, so we need to print them and send them out via snail mail.
So I need to go thru and sort and individually tick.
If I want to review this, I would need to see the amounts the client has paid.
This eliminates the need to go into each transaction manually to reconcile.
Would I need to run through creating Summarys?
I paid for and took physical possession in June and need to deduct it in that year.
But that's what i need to do somehow.
split each transaction into 3 items:The actual purchaseCurrency conversion Foreign currency tax feeThis leaves me with 3 items to reconcile against each Bill - these all need to be done manually as 1 Bill will never match 3 transactions.
Don't want to start importing until up to date so need to enter manually.
I need some help to fix this mistake.
I need help with the SGC calculations.
So anyway, I'm preparing what I need for 1st April, and by way of practice was trying to enter comparative conversion balances for the previous year (Y/E Mar 15), for which I already have a full P/L and balance sheet.
I need to re-assign all income transactions to newly created divisions.
We need experienced user from Turkey especially from İstanbul for taking professional support.
A couple of weeks later we need to select the remaining items that haven't been shipped and create a packing slip for them.
I had it set up to allow me in with fingerprint ID, but hit cancel by accident one day and now need to enter my details manually.
Hence I need a manual method of reconciliation.
Need to post some general expenses such as coffee, lunch etc should i post in general or direct ?
I need to change the date on one particular credit card purchase for an asset, purchased around Jun 28th but which appears on the statement on 2nd July.
We need to also setup the daily revenues as well for statistical purposes.
Most companies we deal with have several staff and we need to record this.
I need help on how to enter the following:Insurance: For example,Premium - $8370GST - $847Stamp Duty - $920 (GST free)Admin Fee- $100Total is $10237However, instead of paying the full amount of the premiums up front, we have taken out a loan for the insurance premium funding.
I've got some work I need to do and I'm pretty sure I don't want to do it until the sync is over.
Or does something else need to be done?
What i mean is i have a dress it comes in three different sizes and i need to track how many of each item i have?
I need to amend the PAYE Tax code for a Director.
It is being created due to a perceived need for an active forum for the discussion.
We need everyone's participation to make this work.
The masters do need nip and tucks with different clients.
I need to set up a check system for my company.
Multiply debits and credits need to balance to zero so a total as you tick items - as in batch deposits - would be really helpful.
I need to therefore reconcile £500 to #3052 and £9,500 to #3050 for both of these.
Basically i assigned some receipts to "subscriptions" and they need to be in the "Office Expenses".
So this means they want to see things excluding GST at their end but we need to see it inclusive.
:I need to merge two (or more) inventory items.
I need a workaround to classify my contacts by contact groups with a searchable code.
• So I need to open the Files Inbox again.
Re cash coding, sometimes I need to email the outstanding uncoded transactions to the client to provide me information.
I've looked at restricting permissions but the user roles are nowhere near flexible enough to give them the functionality they need whilst hiding this data.
I need software to:; their contact info and also an area where we can log notes relating to that client, with an ability to take online payments (via PayPal etc).
Travel and expense reportingWe need budgets and actual cost tracking for a software company, (what Oracle would call Projects)For example let's say that we have  the following items  100:  Software Module 1 (project 1_120:  Feature x (project 2)200:  Project 3etc.
Part of my itemising is that I need to provide a date the service was provided.
Even the simplest task need hours and hours of reading and orienting.
As such, we need to access the historic information, that has now been locked.
I am a part of an organization with ~120 members, and basically I need to keep track of their dues payments.
I need help on the following issue, if anyone can help, you'll make me very happy!
i. e 2 x 35sqft container = £34 The issue i'm having is that I need to multiply that £17 or £34 charge by the number of weeks that the container is being used.
Or will I need to create a custom DOCX file?
i need to post opening balances for current year & that too cost centre wise.
Do I need to turn the refund into a credit note or similar?
All reports should include BOTH tracking references when exported (they are used in journals so all reports need to have them)3.
They are not horrendous but many pages seem to take up to 4 seconds to load and to strive for a desktop experience you need to get that down to around 200ms.
I think I need to apply $4,500 to "830 - Income Tax Payable" and credit $500 to "820 - GST".
To be actually useful I think they need to show a longer term view than 1 week.
I've entered quite a few transactions against one category code but realise that I need to re-assign them to another category code.
Is there a quick way of re-assigning a number of transactions or will I need to go through them one-by-one?
More info/features would be helpful so you don't need to login via go.
Hello dear all, need some assistance with the payroll that was done on 30 June 2017.
We need to change our payroll end period.
So I need to create no work payruns for Dec - Feb to bring this up to date.
We have apprentices who are entitled to accrue annual leave, personal leave & rostered day hours for days that they attend TAFE, we have set up an ordinary earnings rate called TAFE and it does not appear to be accruing leave as I need it to, the balance of the week is paid from ORDINARY EARNING RATE.
We need to show the hours that they attend TAFE on their payslip.
I'm guessing they will need to update the employee cards for any backpackers.
When they have a birthday I need to update their award rate and this would be very helpful.
When entering their leave I need to manually adjust their leave hours.
Before i change the entire way of doing my payroll, will that let me get the answers i need?
I need to know the best way to deduct this amount from their wages and then allocate the money received correctly.
when creating salary sacrifice i need to create salary sacrifice  for a tax deductible item.
My problem is, my weekly transfer I need to reconcile against also contains owner drawing, contractor and sub contractor payments.
I also need to adjust Leave loading payable for the same reason.
If they plan to offer support then they need to SUPPORT their customers.
or is there a process I need to do.
I've got a few things I need guidance on please.
I need to change 2 employees payroll calendars but the below messages come up:Payroll Calendar may not be changed while the employee has unprocessed leave.
Do we need to tick if the person is on 457 visa or temporary resident.
1. we're hosting an external Christmas Party - staff partners are welcome, but they need to pay2.
Under the leave tab in employee tab you need to drill into the leave to see the hours whereas prior to upgrade I am sure you could see leave hours next to leave applied for.
I need to recitfy this immediately.
When I process Leave Application I need to enter dates which is not really applicable being a total of  Leave Balance to be paid off (in hours).
I need it to be clear on his payslip exactly what I have done.
We run an Agriculture enterprise and need to have our ordinary hours taxed as per the attached schedule for our Crop Farm Workers (13%).
How to process the final payroll for an employee, need to include leave balance as well.
If you need to include any final leave accruals, click on the Leave Type, change the 'Calculate Leave Accrual' rate to 'No' and click OK. Next, you can adjust the hours field as required.
Given this, we need to show in their payslips how much Annual Leave they have accrued.
We need to create a system that makes the application easy and stores the data in the one place.
Sometimes my employees need to purchase items with their own money and it would be a lot quicker if they could submit their own expense claims.
I need to then make a manual adjustment to tax to make sure that they are not overpaying their tax.
Each year as HR Manager I need to review each employees details to verify they are correct and current.
To get around this I changed the super % to zero in the third quarter, I will need to change it back to 9.
au/Forms/Medicare-levy-variation-declaration/Therefore I need a way to adjust his PAYG downwards by 2%.
I need it to calculate at 9.
If I make payments by generating a bill, I assume that I would need to enter the following additional lines:- 478 Superannuation Expense- 826 Superannuation payable (as a negative)- 825 PAYG withholding payableIs that correct?
it would be extremely helpful if someone could advise me today as I need to process the payroll today.
This will be the leave balance, plus any hours that you may need to accrue for any unpaid wages as noted earlier.
Do I need to do one?
That says "Your employer ass per company policy will need to speak to you before holiday/Leave entry times are requested".
I need to include the amounts paid as Termination Payments ie the amounts paid as Unused Annual Leave on Termination.
Do we need to?
I need a bit of help setting up Payroll to record Not for Profit Salary Sacrifice payments.
You are now done and don't need to bother with step #8.
Figure out which pages you need to make an individual PDF.
It has many more features that we need.
It misses recording wages and taxes payable that need to be stated individually.
We need to show net wages and all taxes paid through the books.
I need to generate 1099s for my contractors.
HELP, I may  have screwed things up and need help in figuring out (1) how to fix it and (2) how to do what I need to do.
Until recently there was no need for the US Company to employee anyone directly but this has changed with 2 employees now working for us in the USA.
I am setting up payroll for a California corporation and need to create both a benefit and a deduction for our health insurance plans.
I need to change this as one that has been assesed as non-eligible is acutally eligible as shes on maternity.
The nearest I get after trying to connect and getting an initial trip to the PensionSync log-in screen is an amber bar saying that I need to authenticate to complete scheme set-up.
I've gone through masses of online tuition but am still having problems and need urgent help as a payrun is due today.
Can you suggest what we need to do?
OR, do I need to login to my online banking system and manually input the data for each employee, as I used to do with SAGE OR, would this manual input go away if we paid for a Direct Feed?
We're concerned we need to submit a balance showing zero to HMRC, but this feels unlikely.
This is now urgent as I need ot run Payroll today, I cannot find any help on this anywhere.
I need some help how to do it.
We postponed our auto Enrolment to 30/09/16 so I now need toprocess the payroll to include pensions.
To do so I need to configure the pension auto-enrollment aspect.
The Pension Regulator told me that I should only need the staging date, which I have.
I need the payslip to show:Service Commission   xxxxRetail Commission   xxxxTop-Up to Guarantee  xxx___________- NI, PAYE etc.
Do I definitely need to ask him his earnings to date/tax paid for his 'opening balance'?
Hello,This is a UK Payroll question and i need help pls.
Hello,This is a UK Payroll question and i need help pls.
I need to run his payroll this week, and need to make a decision fast.
I need to process my payroll today!
I will also need to correct my RTI filing too.
It will also need to cope with irregular hours (ie 12.
Hello againThe RTI hours don't need to be actual and need to be categorised by the following optionsActualUnder 16 hours16 hours but less than 2424 hours but less than 3030+Other - this is only used though for exceptional circumstances.
I need to reverse that transaction on our payroll but not entirely sure how.
I need to sort out the issue urgently.
Please help as need to do payrun today.
How do I enter opening balance for an employee who has worked the previous 6 years, surely I don't need to enter every weeks wages & leave details?
Accept card payments wherever you need to with a Yoco card reader and your smartphone or tablet.
Build the reports you want with the data you need using the power and flexibility of MS Excel.
Tells you what you need to know about your customers to make smarter marketing decisions.
Fully customised online stores to suit each customer’s need.
I guess what I need is a calendar which plugins into APIs and has forecasting capabilities.
Does anyone have any suggestions on the best option as many of the inventory apps look more complicated and more expensive than we need.
We will need multi level BOMS.
will i need to do anything else?
Then I need a field to show the source of the job (internet, word of mouth, existing cust, etc.
We will manage deferred revenue in excel, though need reporting with service period fields.
However, for a lease, we need to depreciate the value of products while leasing.
We also need seamless and easy integration with XeroCurrently we are encountering multiple issues with many of these, and any advice/help would be great!
We need it for our monthly reporting but at the moment am manually entering it which is painful and at risk for errors.
All this will need to be implemented in the conversion.
The task of contacting customers is a shared role within my organisation and the recorded information would need to be visible between various personal.
You don't even need to share your credit card details while signing up.
We have approx 300 costs centers we need to track the active for each one.
Is there a way to do that, or will I need to enter those manually?
We buy our metals in bulk and generally the other materials we buy as we need them.
We need at some stage, in the next few months to self-bill as we have to credit Consumers ( Non Vat registered people) for small amounts in potentially large volumes.
I need to import their deposits.
What I need:A system that tracks stock movement and provides running stock on hand by item,  total, qty and value.
They sell large equipment and need to track orders.
This is not very flexible and does not actually track stock volumes and as we grow, we need a more effective method of managing inventory.
I need to reclaim costs associated with driving the car in job relation and I need to oncharge clients, aswell.
Probably, I need to make Taxnote handle it before exporting.
In order to get digital filing of my federal and state documents I'd need to enroll in the $70 plan.
Need to make a decision as to which one to adopt in our Practice (c25 clients), and obviously want to get it right.
Hence the need for flat-rate ACH transaction processing.
They need to keep a track of the raw materials, packaging, etc as stock items.
I need to make a decision in the next week or two, so any feedback would be great!
Probably we need an inventory management program as well.
We need cash machine in the shop, that is reason why we were thinking about the POS software, but we do not know that it is enough for us.
They need to submit duty and vat returns.
However, i then need to generate reports by delivery date, brewery, beer, and more.
We need the stock to be shipped directly from the supplier to the customer.
I need to reflect amount each line showing the figures inclusive and exclusive of GST and a sub total and the total amount.
We dont need inventory managment though3.
Targeted at agencies and professional email marketers who simply need more automation around billing for campaigns and related activity eg template development.
- Need a tick box to allow permissions for ability to assign manager or assign staff.
We need multi currency and multi location capabilities.
I know ADP integrates, but I need a low cost method for this company.
These always need to be redone.
We are having to move very quickly because our current loyalty program is closing down in a month and we need to have something to replace it.
If not, I will need to integrate it myself using the API.
We have a conversion as at 1 Jul 2012, and need to bring existing WIP into the file.
the point I have made in subsequent emails is that WE NEED OUR PAYPAL FEEDS FIXED.
I only got the last 3 months of transactions whereas as need the last 16 months.
I need to get all these matters resolved ASAP.
You only need to look at your own community page to see that this is desperately needed.
I have authorised this once, and I only need to authorise it once.
I need to see a total amount invoiced for a specific customer.
I need the total amount the customer paid since they've been with us.
I REALLY need to know.
People need to know basic information, such as:1.
5) We don't have the need to get quotes signed off by customers so we manually mark each one as sent then manually mark each one accepted.
Really only need to see the company name.
Firstly, I'm not sure what's different about FreeAgent's relationship with Barclays, but the feeds work in FA without the need to re-enter Pin Sentry details, so it *can* be done.
I have 3 scenarios which I need help with AND COULD BE WIDELY Helpful TO OTHERs.
I don't understand what I need to do in these situation.
We need the support of a single financial institution to support our operations.
We need to have a way to automate the upload of banking transactions.
We really need phone access to oyur support area.
##### CLUSTER 39 #####
Hi, I am trying to setup my bank acc in Xero.
Hi folks,I'm a beginner Xero user and I have some questions relating to the reconciliation of certain items on my company bank statements.
Hi it would be great if the Xero app had the functionality to create a bank rule in the app.
Hi guys,I'm getting settled in to using Xero and I'm importing quite a few bank statements as CSV's.
Hi,Has anyone successfully used Yodlee with the Aldermore Bank (Known as "" in Xero)?
Hi there, I am trying to import a bank statement manually into Xero.
Hi all,I have a big problem with my balance in Xero when it imports the feed from my bank.
Hi everyone,As of this morning I can no longer refresh the bank feed coming in to Xero.
Hi,Im looking to start using batch payments from Xero and then import them into my Bank for processing.
Hi there ,I have been using receipt-bank successfully with free-agent and now we are transitioning to Xero am trying without success to create the integration.
##### CLUSTER 40 #####
I am new to the system and I have a small building company which is quickly expanding.
Reckon I could dr AP and choose the suppliers name & CR the new commercial loan facility.
I'm certain that this is not a new experience and that there should be some history to learn from.
HiI am new to both accounting and xero.
Paypal credit is a fairly new online credit card.
HiI am very new to Xero.
Will the change of details mean that the new VAT accounting method will get picked up straight away?
29or do I leave it as is and then do a new journal at the next year end?
I don't want to carry forward any details into the new financial year - I will take the c/f from a TB produced from our existing accounting system.
I have a new client that has been using Xero for over a year.
Basically we want a clean slate but cannot start a new company file.
Too many implications in starting a new file.
I made a donation to the 'New Zealand Police Managers' Guild Trust' but the receipt doesn't actually say 'donation'.
We are winding down Trust A and starting a new trust, called Trust B.
I was thinking of setting up two new tax components: GST remitted and PST remitted.
Hello, I am new to Xero and I have a few questions regarding expense claims.
HiI am new to Xero and I am currently adding in my conversion balances from my previous accounting system.
Since moving to the new Go Cardless integration in Xero, I am having issues with reconciliation.
Purchased a new season ticket on 17/02/2017 for &#163;676.
I'm very new to xero but I'm trying to get it all setup correctly but I seem to come across a problem that I'm not sure how to fix.
New to xero, & a user (not accountant or developer).
It's all a new language to me.
Tried with import/export but that creates a new contact.
Maybe a silly question but I am very new to this all.
I am new to Xero this week so still trying to find my way around!
Hello,I have a new PayPal working capital loan and I'm not sure how to reconcile the transactions.
New to Xero and VAT in general.
How do tell Xero it's been paid and not to show up on my new statements?
I've been using Xero for about a week so really new here but I think I'm getting the hang of it.
I am setting up a new partnership.
I'm very new to the Xero so I'm little bit confused.
I didn't pick this up at first, as I was new to the program.
Trying to restore an archived employee I get an "Error 500" I cleared the cookies, new restart but still no success.
I myself & fairly new to the system so still learning.
I've read  Xero blog post about some of the new Contact Transaction reports.
I am new to Xero and accounting.
They said they never received it, so I voided the 1st check manually and issued a new check.
I'm new to xero and have a pretty basic grasp of accounting.
I'm new to Xero and tax.
Goodwill is set up as a "Non-Current Asset" in Xero, or I can create a new asset type if desired.
This year i have got a new accountant and while he is trying to finalize my year end he has told me that my end balance 2014/2015 and opening balance 2015/2016 are different by quite alot of money.
Hello, I am a fairly new Xero user and am setting up processes for balance sheet reconciliation for month end.
I've been adding these expenses to Xero via > Dashboard > New Receipt in the Expense Claims section.
For example, if we replace the guttering or purchase a new air-conditioner or renovate the kitchen at the residential investment property, then these capital purchases must be reported at both G10 and G13.
I'm new to Xero and am trying to get set-up.
We do not want the General Ledger transactions as it is a new identity.
I am new to Xero.
I have some experience with ecommerce and retail, but I'm new to the accounting side.
I'm new to Xero coming from QuickBooks.
We will have customers in New Zealand and overseas.
I am a new user of Xero, and have recently run my first VAT returns.
Still pretty new to Xero.
New to the Xero layout.
HiI've inherited a new client from another accountant.
I have started working for a new company and my boss asked me to set up new accounting software for him which i chose Xero.
I'm totally new to all this and appreciate the help.
I have an employee with a new wage garnishment.
I own a cafe and we are installing a new POS System that integrates with Xero and the supplier has asked me for some GL codes for the system.
Hello All,I am new to Xero and accounting.
The complication is that technically I loaned the money to one entity (the old sole proprietorship) but it will be being paid back by the new company (the limited company).
I wanted to keep an original "copy/backup" of our data up to 12/31/2015 and then roll over a new copy/database for 2016 and make the changes there.
I recently purchased some new gym equipment for our facility on a credit card.
I'm new here and hope to learn!
However, we have recently changed volunteer treasurer and now some of the small staff team - who are fairly new to accounting - are trying to pick up the threads while we work through the transition.
We have, at the year end, £10k in unspent grant funds that are allocated to projects in the new financial year.
I am going through the Setup Guide for a new Organisation and I have a question on opening balances.
I discovered this is because Xero is now using a very slightly different exchange rate for 31 March 2015, as recorded on the new balance sheet as follows:Figures converted into United States Dollar using the following rate:0.
I have a new client that owns a Hair Salon that we have recently migrated to Xero.
Despite better judgement, I went ahead and used Conversion Balance again for a new client.
I was wondering if there was a way to relate new bills to previously created checks?
My problems begin with the new inventory system.
I didn't do my end of period journal prior to loading up the new stock opening balances ( alarm bells ringing) so am in a pickle, as left with previous balances on balance sheet plus the actuals.
I'm a brand new user and have run into a problem that has me somewhat concerned.
New user to Xero.
I assume this is bookkeeping 101, but I'm new to this and trying to do things the "right way".
Do any items that are added to the new fixed assets register automatically get picked up on your Trial Balance?
Do we have to subscribe each restaurant as new organisation/company?
New to Xero.
My company recently purchased a new fixed asset and traded in two older assets of the same type to put towards the purchase price.
We are based in UK but have dealings in New Zealand.
We are new to Xero and so far we love it!
As a new user to Xero, I'm a little frustrated at some of the unwieldy functionality.
This is all new to me, as I have always have always done our accounting using spreadsheets and did not do a good job at keeping up with it.
I am new to Xero and have switched from QB's desktop.
A brand new user of Xero here.
He has started a new initiative for the the motel he has booked and made arrangements for charge back from local restaurants for his customers.
HiI am new to Xero and I want to set up a budget that includes details of expenses rather than the summary of the expense categories as per the Budget Manager.
I will give myself a new start date of 31 MArch 2014 and keep the MYOB for records so the final quarter will be in Xero.
I am a new user to Xero setup via my accountant.
We are a small non-profit and are new to Xero as of this year.
I'm looking at a balance sheet from a small company new to using Xero.
With the first bill done, I will:4) Create two new bills, with due dates of Jan 25th and Feb 5th.
Apologies but I am new to Xero and only strated using the system this year.
New to Xero.
I am going to set up a new accounting system by using Xero.
I have created a new Fixed Asset without any issues however it will not appear on the Balance Sheet.
I'm pretty sure that it shouldn't be via creating a new Bill.
We are new Xero users, coming from MYOB.
Conversion balance won't work as the file has been running for awhile so it isn't a new conversion?
We have a new US company and require a Xero accountant.
Im sorry, im pretty new to all this.
We've recently transferred over and we're all new to Xero.
Sorry I am new to xero
I reside in New Zealand and my Tax is due tomorrow,,,31 March.
At the end of the week, they issue us a Return to Vendor note in respect of any returned stock (we support new products for a week or two  by taking them back if they don't sell).
I am a new user of Xero.
HelloWe are an accountancy practice new to Xero.
New to Xero/Accounting today.
I am new to this software and I have looked everywhere but cannot find an answer.
I am new to Xero and therefore getting problem.
My client has purchased a new shop sign, the cost of which will be capitalised and recorded as a non-current asset.
I am new to Xero and am still finding my way around (MYOB convert).
I'm new to Xero and am helping someone with their company return.
I am completely new to Xero too!
We have tried the latest but the new layout still does not display the fixed assets.
I've recently taken goods in part exchange for supply of new goods.
My question though relates to Xero (I'm a very new user).
I am new to accounting and Xero!
New role for me, new company, new to Xero; basically a noob.
We often claim millage and some times other out of pocket items (such as new papers and coffee) without a  receipt.
We have customised the new profit and loss for one of our client.
This is not a problem on the old profit and loss however this new P&L does not seem to have the option to save the layout.
I am quite new to Xero and a little confused by expense claims.
I am a property investor and looking for a way to record the new market value of a property in addition to the book value after substantial capital works have been done.
A very new sole trader here with no book-keeping knowledge.
I'm totally new to accounting (and I actually love it! )
I am new to xero and my organisation is new to xero.
Quite frankly, I'm new to accounting as well.
For instance, the new 'spend money' transaction would have your actual Credit Card statement date however within this you might have multiple transactions for that period all with different transaction dates.
We are new to xero and trying to find the easiest and most automated workflow to allow us to handle employee expenses and recharge costs to customers, most of which will come through an expense claim.
Good afternoon, I'm the owner of a holiday rental property however I'm new to Xero (moving over from MYOB).
New to Zero and I have numerous small balances , under 10p, both debit & credit that were transferred from Sage.
Then I incur another $210 in charges over the next month so I get a new bill that says I owe $420.
HiI have setup a new proprietary ltd company.
Im completely new to the world of Sole Trading.
As a new user, I have no idea.
love the new feature but would prefer opening default to statements rather than statement lines
In a new initiative we recently completed integration to Xero and are now looking for customers to test with.
Customer B c/o Customer AStreet AddressSuburb P/CI don't want to create a new contact for Customer B because a. )
I have lock date to Feb 2015 with a view to start the new VAT scheme post 28 Feb 2015.
REALLY new to Xero, still learning so excuse my silly question.
I am new to Xero & accounting software.
I get a sense of how to do this, but  I am new to zero, and I am not getting a proper sense of "how to" at this moment.
I'm fairly new switching to Xero from Sage and am struggling with the whole customer ordering process.
I am trying to change two users but one is sending to the trial site on acceptance, the other is rejecting the password selected by the new user.
Here is what happened to us when we leveraged local SEO in one of the most competitive industries online…We went from the 9th page to the 1st page for the terms ‘local seo nz’, ‘local seo New Zealand’ and ‘New Zealand local SEO’ in one week… Again in probably the most competitive industry online, these results are absolutely insane!
I'm new to accounting and xero so apologies if this is a simple question.
Fortune Innovations Auckland is a New Zealand Based Web Development Company.
I am new to xero, and only because of my bookkeeper.
The phone is an iPhone 6 valued at around £700 new (as the unit was).
But if she modifies it or uses it to create a new template, she cannot import.
I am starting a new company that sell's name brand IT products to schools.
He's also going to help me with setting up my new software after I so choose it.
I intend to grow that significantly with a new product that should be successful and earn about 10 times more per product ($600 ea).
The new dashboard that is about to be released, it looks very pretty, BUT.
We are always looking for new ways to improve Xero, so I've let the Product Team know that you are interested in this feature.
Hello all,I am new to Xero and accounting as a whole really bar the month or so I have been using it.
I was thinking that it's probably much better to have everything in Xero as per the new financial year.
Hello I am new to Xero.
My new client is a gymnasium and most of their revenue comes from subscription billing through the service called ezydebit.
With Xero still relatively new in the UK in this area, it's still Sage and other desktop/server programs that are on everyone's CV (even those CVs belonging to people under 20).
I'm quite new to XERO as my accountants used to do everything for me until I started winding down so please assume I'm an absolute novice!
Should changing a PO, cancel the original PO, and issue a new PO number?
I am new to Xero having migrated my file from MYOB.
New to Xero.
I go to Purchase>Bills and enter a new bill.
The issue was the blank opening and closing lines at the beginning and end of the file (a new "feature" St George added recently!
We recorded the HUD-1 in our previous accounting system whenever we purchase a new property and I'm trying to find out how to record it in Xero.
Or do I have to start a whole new organisation?
Once someone has the status of Financial Adviser + User Manager + Support Provider then the XERO folks in New Zealand will do very little to help you out.
I'm new to Xero and bookkeeping in general so forgive a newbie please.
You will have to go through numerous hoops which include getting new ATM cards and PINs and setting your internet banking up all over again!
I'm somewhat new to bookkeeping and was using outright.
We're about to move to a new accountancy firm and I'm wondering whether anyone has any recommendations of accountants, and also some pointers on what to look for in a good Xero accountant?
The new check style feature is missing a critical component.
A new 'widget' for the dashboard called 'Recent Payments'.
I had one staff member not tick the box so nobody new.
When we create a new contact, can we have the ability to upload files of contracts & credit applications & attach these to a particular contact?
This is a technical tax issue resulting from the Christchurch, New Zealand, Earthquakes.
There maybe already a quicker way of adding new timesheet's ready for processing, so please  advice me if there is.
When entering a new contact you suddenly have this huge list of businesses we dont deal with come up and makes it more difficult to see the businesses we do actually deal with.
I noticed that the tickets numbers changed around then, so assume a new system was put in place, and hoped that eventually it would be sorted out.
I don't really want to create new bills for them all.
Setting up a new rule for the car fuel as an expense and including all of the frequently visited stations will make reconciling very fast.
In New Zealand or in some other countries, every year NFP organisations have to issue donation tax receipts to their members so the latter can claim from inland revenue a third of their contribution as tax refund.
It would also be great if the groups were already set up as a default so that you could choose that group automatically when setting up a new supplier, contractor etc.
With the New Flat Rate Scheme of 16.
So I have setup a new Contact called Staff and merged all of the employee contacts into the Staff contact.
Here we are again at the start of a new calendar year and we have the problem of Xero defaulting to December  without warning when we want December 2016.
You have added these new reports, such as the Payroll Detailed Transaction Listing, but it does not even total, so it still has to be exported to Excel.
'If I instead go to 'New transaction,' I am presented only with 'Spend Money' and 'Receive Money.
It would be so much easier if we could copy an existing bill into a repeating bill without having to create a new template where you have to enter all the details .
The "New Update" in xero includes replacing the clients TFN with the words .
Xero 101 TV used to have captioning options and the new Xero training program begins with two introductory videos about the new training program with cc captioning button in the corner.
I'm stumped to why the new videos have removed this feature .
Telling us to toss the check stock that we have into the garbage and buy new checks that work with your proprietary locations is terribly wasteful.
i. e: New field 'Custom P&L': When AccountName is 'Wages & Salaries' AND Departament(TrackingCategory) is 'Marketing' Then "Gross Margin".
I'm new to Xero so forgive me if this feature is available and I've missed it.
I have a new contact who is elderly and without e mail.
If I don't want to allocate at this stage I press skip and it takes me back to the approved Bill rather than to a 'New Bill' page.
Could you change it to take me to the 'Enter New Bill' page instead.
The description is illogical: New Transaction is not the same as New Spend Money.
Why not call this button what it is, "New Spend Money", and have a second button next to it called "New Receive Money" and another called "New Transfer Money"?
When adding new transaction with multiple lines - after adding each line - it needs to show the balance to be allocated.
Currently you have a list of names that appear but if you don't select the right one or click on it, the system creates a new name.
In the Chart uploading the last file only serve to replace the previous file instead of updating the current file with the new information.
It is great to see the addition of custom columns on the new Financial Reports.
Would be great if when you are creating a new bill or sale from the inbox if it opened in a new window.
If you have many options, I instinctively click the button at the top of the list (a new category) only to have to remember to jump to the bottom of the page.
It would be helpful if it showed straight away It also doesn't tell you if the Supplier is NEW or currently in the database.
It would be great to send a link out to a new clients / suppliers.
The only way around this problem is to right click on the item and open in new tab or window.
Restrict user from creating new contacts
Currently with Xero Practice Manager with Google Drive integration, we can upload a file and any new file will override an existing file.
(when creating a new contact/customer to enforce a branding decision at creation).
When will page numbers be printed on any of the reports generated from the new reports section?
We are a construction and training company doing new builds and renovations.
If the change order could be created in a way to modify an existing quote without having to create an entire new one that would be preferred.
You then save and you see the new total within your imported draft screen.
HiI really love the new reports.
However, in the new Fixed Assets module, the disposal tries to reverse the historical journals relating to the disposed assets, and throws an error if the prior months are locked.
1) login via desktop2) disable two step3) login to the mobile app and enable touch login4) go back to desktop and enable two step5) generate a new code and pick three new security questionsIt would be great if the mobile app could prompt for the two step code if it needs it.
The worst thing possible for me is signing up a new client then finding out days later that there was a promo happening - and they could have saved some money!
It's really tedious doing this process, especially with an existing client who is new to xero with and existing COA (eg they may have come from MYOB).
Why is the new aged receivables is landscape, aged payable is portrait.
This is a new problem brought about by the common ledger phenomenon.
New Xero user here.
Dear Sirs,Regarding the new layout to the system.
Currently, you have no option but to enter new categories at the bottom of the list.
If it's possible then that could be very neatly implemented to launch directly into a new expense item - or even better start pre-filling the expense fields using OCR.
It would be extremely helpful if defaults could be set directly when creating a 'New Bill'.
As the terms, conditions, amount of the item / loan / direct debit etc change then the new document(s) would be attached manually to the rule - repeating the process.
New reports slow to display and a little strange sometimes.
We're loving the new global search feature.
Member US State CPA Societies - Illinois, Texas, Florida, New York and California18 Other Credential CGMA, CITP, CGEIT and  CISM.
A step up in pricing would suit so many of my new Xero clients of $20/month.
The new profit and loss reports have editable functionality which allows formatting to suit a specific client.
The management reports have very limited formatting capability with no ability to set up new top level headings and amend formula.
The new billable expenses feature is great however, it would be even better and much more helpful if we could attach the tracking category or a project reference to each billable expense!
When entering a bill for a supplier who you have more than one purchase order for, it would be helpful if, instead of receiving a message that says "view as list" and having to go into a new screen and re-entering any information (especially annoying if you are entering the bill from a file in your in-box), you instead received a list of outstanding purchase orders.
It is a little arduous to after each quote to go Quotes - New quote - especially when creating alot of quotes.
New FRs could require selection of the menu item if it exists, so they end up in the right place.
When clicking on your profile can the setting be changed so that it opens in a new window.
The new billable expenses feature is great (if a little behind the industry).
so I could vote on a new issue which is important (it was already @ 25 votes).
The "assign expenses to customer" option for new purchases is great, can it please be added to new credit card and petty cash spends as well.
A feature of QB:   If you type in the name of a new vendor and it is not there, in QB.
We have people entering their expenses on their phones but each one they are entering as a new claim.
I am new to Xero.
I think that it would be a great idea if you could enter a company name into a field when setting up a new user - It would be even better if you could group your users by that company!
We import our new client details in to xero in bulk once a week.
It would be really helpful if the import contact tool listed each contact in the file and indicated whether new or existing prior to confirming the import.
A number of accounting packages have a "Print Super Choice Form" under the new employee's Superannuation Tab.
At the end of every financial year we are currently required to post journals to carry forward into the new year.
We have published some new template reports and the client has requested some minor changes.
We're always testing out new applications and integrations.
However when adding a contact to each entity it only lets you create a new one not select an existing.
However, we notice that Xero has already created a new inventory item from this incorrect data thus messing up the neat inventory structure we have.
one) that will make XERO NOT create a new inventory item and/or contact?
Hello Community,I am using the new and improved quote feature and really liking it so far.
We are using the feature to email bills from our company email to the xero inbox to then attaching to new bill.
Xero needs to look into this new feature.
It the employee has applied for a new tax file number from the ATO they have 28 days.
Having expired quotes in sent tab doesn't make sense as they have expired and a new quote should be drafted.
Date function on entering new quotations.
Instead I have to click on the correct name before I can continue - that is if I have say, only entered the first few letters "flet" and I hit tab it creates a new contact called 'flet' .
With the new Quotes feature, is it possible to give someone access to only do quotes?
A diary that interacts with xero for i pad Edit/ enter new contact for I pad
Do a Quote from the + New option in contacts from the screen where you view a customers details.
This seems to be fine but when there are changes to inventory items (price increase for example) she can change it on new individual purchase orders or bills but cannot access the inventory item to change it there for all future purchase orders.
I inadvertently changed the depreciation start date thinking that i needed to change it for new financial year depreciation postings.
When entering new spend money transactions it would be extremely useful to edit the actual amount of VAT charged.
As a result it is almost impossible to find a feature request that you are looking for, and so you end up creating a new one, most likely duplicating others that are already there.
Only option currently is to insert a new line at the bottom of the bill.
For some reason Xero allows you to create a new contact on the run.
When entering new contacts there needs to be an option as to which contact group you want it to belong to.
It would be very handy to have a column within purchase orders, to note any items that are on backorder, then for that purchase order to automatically update with a new PO (same number perhaps with &#228; on the end etc) that contains those items on backorder.
Maybe a new column, in parenthesis after the file name etc.
We can’t promise that new User Roles will be added in order (if at all), but you adding your vote to a thread helps us with the prioritisation.
It would help me when creating a new bill if the "description" field had a drop down box of my previously used descriptions.
At the moment, you're unable to copy a custom created Profit & Loss layout and save it as a new layout with another name.
Adding a new Xero Response section would take one programmer less than a week.
I keep forgetting and creating new Bills from scratch!
So right now on the 1st April, if I choose P & L, current financial year, it shows all zeroes because we are in the new year.
I have been playing with Xero's nearly new purchase order module and one thing that would definitely help an accountant at month-end is the ability to generate a draft journal out of the P&L data included in the Approved PO list.
New Capital It, Repairs & Maintenance, Donations.
In New Jersey, we have a flat tax on tires.
It would be useful to create a new purchase order here too.
After a couple of weeks using the new Files tool ( which is awesome by the way ), a Global Search for Files is an absolute must have !
It is also essential because no one should now enroll any new clients (or renew existing clients) in Xero payroll.
LOAD AN IMAGE AT THE POINT OF PURCHASE, RECONCILE IT TO A TRANSACTION LATER   - what would be a killer feature, would be at the point of purchase, when I have the recipt in my hand, to have the ability to log into the Xero phone app, and create a 'new receipt' file, where I could take a photo of a receipt (as per above) and enter the $ amount, to be saved for reconciliation.
Everytime I set up a new Xero for a customer I'm confronted with these wonderful green boxes.
com and Xero creates a new bill or expense claim with the email or attachment attached to the new bill/expense claim?
I'm a new user so I aplogise if this is already an option, but I can't see any instructions for it nor does it work in practice.
I would have liked to see a simple function whereby an additional GL GST COA code can be set up (done, say 821) but with the VAT functionality of a/c 820; thus a new GST tax type could be added and attached to COA code 821.
With this new feature, the workflow of before would be replaced with:1.
So the new payroll user roles could be something likePayroll reports only2 tick boxes in the general user settings - Authorised to approve leave- Authorised to approve timesheetsThanksMichal
com)The new feature: http://blog.
I recently started a fairly complicated new organisation and had to do lots of experimenting to make sure it worked the way I wanted.
I have to copy the last one that was similiar and enter the new information in each appropriate box.
When adding new tax codes, the admin has to assign it a specific VAT registration (see point 1).
I am not an accountant, yet I find the new terminology makes everything mentally harder to parse.
Starting a new feature request for this on behalf of customers wanting cheque printing in Canada.
My new client has 2 different trading names with different branding themes and have been using different invoicing numbering systems for each of them.
I'm eagerly awaiting a response on this as our new contract with this customer will be in place in the coming month and it will be more complex than ever.
There is a facility to Group contacts, but it would be really great if you could print statements for a group, or print the Aged Receivables with new page and totals for all groups, or print a specific group.
That way I can review the transactions and approve or decline without having to wait or be told that I have to review new transactions.
So I get an error message after trying to save and have to copy the new total into the top box manually.
We are building a lot of new workflows and so on and if the name field on contact records and transaction details are inconsistent, that will likely cause a problem.
The workaround of saving a PDF and creating a new email is very tedious, especially where we are doing large parts of it from an iPad.
The ability to reorder journal entry line items or insert new line items between existing line items would be a very useful feature.
I think a little clarity on the field name would help new users and avoid this.
For year end taxes, employee w2's should show up in the my payroll site, perhaps as a new tab in addition to the paystubs.
I am new to Xero and was excited to see that they included electronic Payroll in my area.
Apparently there is no way to make an adjustment that can be tracked -- such as reversing a previously charged PTO event, or creating a new entry with negative hours.
I am new to Xero.
Hello, we are a new and young couple running a manufacturing shed.
We are trying to bring the industry new ways to do everyday tasks with the advancements in technology.
If a staff member goes to a new tax rate Xero should automatically reset this tax rate.
It would be helpful to have a "reemploy" option in payroll so we don't have to create a new user record for an employee who has left and come back, and have the past employment history in once place.
Would love to see it in the new module!
However, with all the employee data that is gathered it would be great (and probably relatively easy) if Xero Payroll could populate a PDF for local storage and/or transmit the relevant new hire reporting forms to the appropriate jurisdictions.
I'm new to using Xero, but I keep putting in the PO Box postal details for a customer and clicking Save, but it doesn't save.
Is it possible to either have it as a pop up window within Employee Overview or alternatively have the capability to right click and open in a new window.
Standard windows functionality allows one to open a new tab on an item by using "Ctrl" & "mouse select".
My new boss tried to send me an invite again but the option is gone.
what can i do so i can lodge my timesheet/access all the required payroll stuff for new job?
We have setup a new employee, set the start date as 5th November 2012 3.
This transaction created a new fixed asset in Xero that I have since registered.
With the new balance sheet, it would very useful to have the ability to compare balances to the end of last financial year.
Hey, I am still new to Xero and couldn't find info (or I didnt search hard enough)The situation is this.
I am pretty new to this.
WE are taking over the bookkeeping functions and I am new to Xero.
I am a new starter on Xero and have been told by my accountant that the Inventory tracking is not that good.
I tried entering them by adding a new line within the transaction entry and entering them as a negative amount but it didn't seem to recognise the GST.
I don't want to go to the effort of doing a new COA using this format for it not to work and have to reverse my changes.
I am unable to run depreciation on a new asset purchased in the 15/16 year because the last fixed asset was disposed of back in 2012.
I am new to Xero and have setup PayPal for automatic statement import.
Ideally, I'd have "ABC Janitors" entered once, then I could select them in all my organizations when creating new bills.
I'm very very new to Xero so bear with me.
Some reports have the same name and are only distiguished by the word (New) after the name in the Reports page.
The problem is that, when you favourite them, so they appear in the Reports drop-down menu, you cannot distinguish between the old one and the new one.
has anybody found a solution to this problem as I know its not a new one but it is most definitely a very important one!
I'm a new user of Xero and I admit I found paying bills in MYOB very easy compared to this.
Without this function, it means that we have to manually go into every new product and format the description.
Brand new to Xero.
As part of franchise agreements we sometimes give free clothing to new franchises.
To do this, we had to open a brand new database in Xero, export all the data from the MUR database and then import it again into the USD database.
That allowed me to then finalise the database creation and get into the new database.
In my mind it should work in this way:1) If I am asked for a quote on some items, I create a new quote.
(i. e. is the new person improving our arrears collection?
However, we have wrongly charged that VAT at 20%, this should have been exempt of VAT as we were supplying to a new build.
I'm fairly new to Xero (and really new to accounting).
In the New Year we are changing to a new CRM (Links) that does integrate to Xero.
This was responded to by introducing a new balance sheet format.
Hello, I am new to Xero (and bookkeeping), and all is going well, but I am stumped by a hopefully simple scenario.
Hello, I am new to Xero (and bookkeeping), and all is going well, but I am stumped by a hopefully simple scenario.
I am new to Xero, please help.
Also, when trying to import new opening balances(for new stock) it says that this renamed incorrect item will have less than 0 in stock, and a value of less than 0, no matter what I do to the CSV file.
If not, can I cancel I maybe re set up Xero as a new user?
I'm new to xero and have a pretty basic grasp of accounting.
I have a new situation.
I am new to Xero and know very little accounting and bookkeeping.
I'm new to XERO.
I wonder though do I first cancel/delte the feed with yodlee before setting up the new feed.
Will the new feed import everything back into Xero ?
Currently I'm using untracked inventory and enter every item in as a new item, assign the purchase cost and sell price.
Very new to Xero and dont know if i have overlooked something.
Then, make a new credit note to record the return $4,2000USD.
Suggest pasting cells to a new spreadsheet, highlight the full spreadsheet, select format cells, then alignment.
I have entered new transactions in order to reconcile however these no longer show what's been billed to clients.
The auditor suggests it would be easier to start with a fresh set of data in the new financial year (01 June).
There was no effect on incomings as old BSB redirects to the new one.
But there is 10 days worth of feeds missing since and no new feeds have come in since this change has occurred with my bsb.
Started the company in that same financial year, so new to things.
Please don't say this is a new feature!
in short it won't create heaps of new contacts.
I'm not sure if I should bother syncing 1,000+ new customers a month into Xero who will most likely never purchase again.
Is there a way to create a new bill and then allocate all the past payments made to that bill,  so I have an accurate record of the balance owing?
New Xero user so apologies if this is a simple question.
Since the name is the same, the amount is the same, the day of the month is the same, and the reference is identical, why doesn't xero automatically match this new transaction with the previously reconciled one?
With “suggest previous entries" checked, why doesn't xero suggest matching this new transaction based upon the reconciled one the previous month?
What do you suggest to do as a new user.
To get the ball rolling as I mentioned , we’ve released some new functionality today to allow you to export Fixed Assets, and delete unused asset types.
I have a new client who has a number of credit notes sitting in Purchases (from 2014).
I'm now thinking of shifting to Xero for my new FY in April.
Can you create new expense items for the what columns when reconciling items in Xero?
disclaimer: Very new to Xero so learning by doing and reading.
Obviously these don't fit the item, so I was wondering if maybe I am meant to enter the new asset another way?
New to Xero.
Was other Xero uses in New Zealand experiencing the same?
I am new to Xero.
I type in the A/R conversion balance at year end, and then pull up a balance sheet, and the new number is not reflected there and the journal entry for conversion balance still shows the old one.
I am relatively new to Xero.
I am new in xero.
For example,In myob,You create a new $ 100 purchase bill  , it status is open status, because it is not paid.
However, if I then type in the 'g' nothing comes up except 'New Contact'.
Hello-I am a fairly new user to Xero.
HiI'm fairly new to Xero and struggling with something that I'm sure should be easy.
So the new year starts with no Draws.
The work they did was useless and we have recommended the best option is to start a new subscription, and allow Jet Convert to migrate the old file in.
Hello and Happy New Year!
I'm new to Xero.
I'm new to this.
So as it gets used those hours build up and when we hit 2000 for example we have to throw out the engine and get a new one regardless of it's condition.
I'm new to xero.
(I'm new to Xero and the Community.
The new structure will contain two separate categories for each of those areas.
My plan is to convert the existing category to projects (since that is the majority) and, if possible, move the departmental options to the new category in order to retain the historical data.
New user here.
After 22 months and 1300 odd replies, I’m moving onto a new role in the Xero Marketing team as a Product Video Specialist.
While I’m moving on, Brittany will still be here, along with our new Community Manager, .
NO depreciation or new assets to March 2015.
So you create your new Asset Type (from settings, because it can't be done from the asset screen).
Absolutely nothing except this pointless new field is now selectable.
Xero's new release has now created dozens of duplicate undeleteable asset types for you.
I am pretty new to Xero and still under training to be honest.
I'm quite new to Xero - so apologies.
Our book keeper advised us it would be best to have 6 months of previous data entered before we begun the new financial year and completed our conversion into Xero.
We have a new client who manages holiday rentals for owners.
New Xero set up, 5 months ago, We included a Starting balance in error, having found the issue today, we zeroed the amount in the conversion balance screen.
I'm new to Xero and trying to determine the best way to enter foreign currency payments.
I'm new to Xero but it's going pretty well so far.
There isn't the option to create a new spend money when reconciling money received, only a new receive money.
I now have a 2 new investor who are investing £20,000 which splits as £1,000 #3052 and £19,000 share premium #3050 .
I am a new Xero user.
Ideally you'd also then load new transactions at the bottom as I save matches.
New comer to XERO from MYOB here.
This new feature is great:https://community.
If you're wanting to attract new clients to your practice you might find promo codes a great way to do this.
Complete the details of your new organization and click .
Click to complete the setup process for your new Xero organization.
I am new to Xero so I apologise if this has been asked previously (I could not see it while searching).
I'm new to the Xero experience and have a simple question I'm sure.
Hello,We're brand new to Xero and we're stuck.
When I select a "New Purchase Order" and enter the contact name the Branding Theme is not changing to the default for that contact.
o I end up reeking information into the new transaction.
Good afternoonI am new to setting up in Xero.
A new client has come across and I am not sure if all his transactions are in Xero.
For example, let's say I have three inventory items:* tshirtLar* tshirtMed* tshirtSmaand I want to prevent users from creating new (and redundant or inconsistently formatted) entries, such as:* Large t-shrit* Med tshirt* Tee Shirt SMALLCan I do this?
This would be a real easy way to setup and send welcome email's to new customers etc.
I setup a new customer in Xero.
I am a new user in the US.
I have recently brought on board a new performer, who will soon be going out on jobs.
I'm relatively new to Xero and love it!
Here's the Xerocon trailer from Jamie Sutherland, President US OperationsAnd hear from Xero Partner  who attended Xerocon in New Zealand earlier this year
I am new to the forum.
I have a new client.
I was given a one month full trial and was planning on using xero going into the new financial year.
21-24 April ~ San Diego, CA 1-2 May ~ New York, NY 4-8 May ~ Los Angeles, CA 7-8 May ~ Chicago, IL 13-18 May ~ San Francisco, CA 15-16 May ~ Secaucus, NJ 16-17 May ~ Online 17 May ~ Baltimore, MD 3-4 June ~ Los Angeles, CA 5-8 June ~ Nashville, TN 10-12 June ~ Las Vegas, NV 13 June ~ Seattle, WA 27-28 June ~ Orlando, FL 16 July ~ Danville, CA 19-20 August ~ Kansas City, MO 27-28 August ~ Chicago, IL 20-23 October ~ Indianapolis, IN 3-6 November ~ Las Vegas, NV 3-7 Sep ~ San Francisco, CA 21 Oct - 21 Nov ~ Xero Roadshow - see the We'll also be at the 2020 Group Seminars in the following cities (see their site for the ) 13 June ~ Chicago, IL15 July ~ New Orleans, LA19 July ~ Austin, TX22 July ~ Parsippany, NJ23 July ~ Pittsburg, PA25-26 Ju
Our release today updates how reports are generated in Xero Payroll (Australia only) and adds 8 new reports taking the total number of reports to 14!
We've also updated our  with a new video about payroll reporting.
I am new and exploring Xero from Australia network.
Rather than having to right click - open new tab, it would be useful to have a 'open in new tab' icon sitting alongside the dropdown menu item.
I am a new Xero user and I am a bit confused.
I love receiving the Xero update emails - something new and shiny to try out on my favourite accounting software!
HiI am new to Xero and I am wondering how I should deal with per diems.
I've chosen my conversion date to be 1/1/13 so I can start the new year off correctly.
We're new to Xero -- and love it so far -- but we have a web app with lots of customers.
Currently I have to times the gst amount by 11 with a calculator and enter that, then subtract that from the total for the next line and with this new change there is actually 2 more calculations added.
We are only new to using Xero - so far so good, but a few suggestions :)1.
I am new to Xero, having come from MYOB, and was wondering if i am missing something?
In the meantime everyone can have a play with the new functionality by changing their Xero Demo organization to the US ().
Check out the new features released to Xero today:Budget Manager – import and export budgets!
Many thanksBeing new to Xero, I have posted all customer receipts currently as 'Receive Money' and thus duplicated the transactions.
I have a new client that has over 250 Bills outstanding in their MYOB file at conversion date.
No new transactions have been imported since that day.
We are thinking of visiting New Zealand in Dec/Jan (we're from the UK).
I'm new to Xero but have never seen this behaviour in a payroll system before.
For some reason, the leave that is accruing for the 2 new employees is not accruing correctly.
I have a new employee whose annual leave and personal leave is not accruing, it shows an amount of 0.
I made a bit of a stuff up with the new rules for working holiday visa holders.
I'm guessing we will be seeing a new TFN declaration in the future.
I've had a new employee supply incorrect details for their superannuation fund.
A new employee record has been created for each employee and an invite sent.
Hello, Im new to xero and trying to wrap my head around it.
I have a new employee and had insufficient details when processing my payroll.
HII have a new client where the payroll was previously set up.
I have a new Xero user (who has previously maintained manual records) and is a cafe owner, they allow the staff to ring up their staff lunch values which appears on the 'Z' reading for the day.
I am new to XERO.
I am new to XeroThank you
I am launching a new company on 1 july and in the process of setting up payroll.
Love the new function of Activity Statement populating automatically.
In addition, I'm new to Xero!
New to Xero.
I want to move an employees leave balance from an old imported MYOB category (Salary Sick Leave) to the new category that now applies to everyone (Sick Leave).
I have stopped and started his leave on 31 dec, 1st jan and created a new leave application.
Upon re-opening in the new year, I have had a few employees come to me to advise that they worked a few hours over the break.
I find the new annual leave request format quite tedious.
As a new company and because our amount of work goes up and down every month, impossible to say that a salary is going to apply, as at the EOFY we will either be over or under it.
Now It wont let me create a new timesheet for last week.
Xero appears to allow us to record the same email address in the new record.
When we attempt to invite the user to their new record we receive the message:employee can't be invited to Xero Payroll - Employee <<Fname was here>> <<Sname was here>> cannot be invited as there is another employee with the email address <<old email address was here>> with user access to this organisation,Any insights?
And have a new Xero database.
I have created a new payrun calendar & allocated the employee to it, though they don't show up in the payrun as it was in the previous financial year.
We are based in Australia, but the new employee will be working in China and I understand that he therefor is a Chinese resident for tax purposes.
I have a new staff member who I have paid successfully once.
I am new to xero and I trust this is something really simple I am missing here?
I'm not sure if I've missed something or how I go about getting his new start date in.
It would be amazing if I could somehow extract a file at closing March 30 and import it into the new company 1 April and not have to re-enter and cross match reports into a different format for the reimport.
We added a new line under "personal/carer's leave" is that correct?
I'm sorry, but the new standard format released today is a step backward.
My new client converted to Xero about 18 months ago.
I have an employee who is changing super funds - we have both funds set up, and both show on his employee record, however I can't work out how to get the record to default to the new super fund.
It's frustrating me, because there is no difference between this employee and the rest (apart from the values entered for hours etc of course)This is only the second payslip to be sent out, but short of deleting the employee from the system and starting the new employee process all over again, I don't know what to do!
Bare with me, as I am new to xero :)
Two new employees were added for this Payrun.
We're doing a release of Payroll in June and we'll be introducing a new Calculation Type for superannuation called 'Statutory Rate'.
I am using the new payroll function.
I am new to Xero and seem to be having trouble with figuring how to setup a payroll with the following items:Sample Earnings:Wage/Salary Amount $2,750Dividend  $2,000The Wage/Salary Amount is taxable via Federal, FICU, State, Unemployment, etc.
I made a mistake on a check so I created a new one under an unscheduled payrun.
So this might be a dumb and basic question, but forgive me, I'm new to this bookkeeping thing:Is there a standard practice or a best way to record Payroll entries in Xero?
Logging in now I perhaps naively expected there to be a fresh set of holiday hours to take since it's a new year.
We thought that the opening balances would be zero as this was for new tax year.
It would be great if the Employee Number option on UK payroll was automatically populated when a new employee was put onto the payroll sequentially.
I've input the new salary, with an effective date of 6 Dec 2016, which Xero shows as active, and the old salary has disappeared, as expected.
Hello,We are looking at moving our payroll over to Xero from our new financial year early next year, can anybody give me any advise with the move.
I've got a new employee on an eligible salary and in the right age bracket - I think she should be an eligible job holder and automatically enrolled.
I've entered new salaries for staff this month.
Most worked fine, click the button "Set New Salary & Wages" under the Employment tab of each employee, enter the details, click ok, then click save and the employee refreshes with the new salary set.
I heard that Xero were working on new functionality to make it easier to set up auto enrolment firstly for NEST and then for other providers including Legal and General.
Apologies if this has been covered before or indeed (worse) recently - am a brand new user of Xero.
Our annual leave entitlement is due to start a new year and I'd lie to track it in Xero.
I am adding a new employee onto the system, who works a basic 17.
I also want to set up payroll for a new client.
Sorry, I'm new to this and getting confused!
I've put in the tax codes for the new employees (they didn't have P45's so I've gone with the A,B or C selection from the starter pack on HMRC).
We have recently gone from being sole trader to Ltd and had to end employment for all employees and set them up as new employees.
Hello,I am a new user of Xero and have an issue with cash reconciliation.
HelloI'm self taught on Xero and currently learning a new job role.
can you tell me if new tax codes for employees are automatically downloaded from HMRC?
I have tried with the new system but it is adding Employer NI, even though I am claiming the initial allowance and not adding Employee NI when it should.
I have set up a new payroll for a client.
I can see the new payroll menu but it doesn't seem to do anything at all when I click on it.
We've read the Employment guide over at Employment New Zealand (https://employment.
I'm a bit confused with the new balances on payslips.
I have noticed the new feature giving to option to combine accrued hours with "due" hours for annual leave.
We are new to Xero payroll, and getting really confused with it.
In New Zealand this isn't a requirement so I would rather not have to find out birth dates of all employees.
we has a draft payroll running , and when checking the payslip, the annual leave does not accumulate it, even though we have put the days in the annual leave fields for the balance before we kick out the new system.
I have completed my first payrun using the new Xero Payroll and paid the employees manually.
Easily sign up new or existing clients, get authority to act for them (IRD, ACC, Companies &amp; more) - e-signed - then click to upload to Xero XPM/WFM.
travel is a new app that streamlines the process of booking, managing and reconciling travel spend, saving hundreds of admin hours annually.
Become a financial storyteller and build new revenue streams for your practice.
Webform Lead Connector adds new leads to Xero Practice Manager automatically.
A Lightweight CRM designed to help you easily, simply and efficiently track new leads and existing customers.
Tradify is the smart new tool helping tradies get their nights back.
Sharesight is a new generation, online share portfolio management system designed for DIY share market investors.
Allows users of MYOB RetailManager® to quickly and simply import accounting journals, purchases and new suppliers into Xero.
Premier provider of software solutions for the vocational training industry, trusted by hundreds of Training Organisations in Australia & New Zealand For more information, check out .
I have a coffee at Starbucks in New York.
I am very new to bookkeeping.
We have now moved to a new Inventory control system (slightly more expensive) and have already seen a massive improvement in service.
I'm new to Xero.
I'm new to Xero and had high hopes after using MYOB for the last 4 years.
It's a great way to find new leads.
I'm new to Xero so may be missing something obvious!
We are currently looking for accountants and professionals who have strong skills in Excel and in Xero and are looking for a new revenue stream.
So this would start a new job from new, or take it from Xero quotes.
HiI have had a request from a new client for a recommendation for an inventory system that adds onto Xero.
We are NEW to XERO.
We require a record keeping, order processing and email system that will allow single data entry of new clients, contractors, employees and suppliers’ details that will automatically populate the Xero records.
but the receipt never appearsi'm not really sure where to start looking as a new xero users  to understand this, i would expect it to be in the expenses area?
Requirements are GPS tracking of log on and off, android and iphone app for log on, ability to programme our new EBA with it's various allowances, easy download into Xero payroll.
We are trying the new Shopify Xero integration app.
I have a prospective new client who run a pub.
HiIs anyone in a position to comment on the pros and cons of the above two systems to help a new client of mine make as assessment?
I'm with a new hotel in the Philippines.
New to Xero, converted from Quickbooks.
If you are new to Xero/CLIO feel free to message me with questions.
Now these are NEW and old customers if that makes a difference.
I have a client that has an Engineering busines and is looking to move to Xero in the new Financial year.
The system only needs to be single currency as we are only operating within New Zealand.
I have seen thinksmart has launched a new app musicbiz and was wondering if anyone has had experience with this (or  other thinksmart programs) which may be of assistance?
Hello, I am relatively new to Xero so still trying to get to grips with many of the features.
Heya,At , we are working on our new app to provide you  a seamless integration between Shopify & Xero.
•New “Ready to Pick” filter for Sale List.
Or best to go for an all new project management/job costing tool.
Go create a brand new All Transactions in PayPal, then come back to Zapier.
HiWe are a new mechanical workshop and have started using Xero.
Kounta's long-standing partnership with Xero means businesses in Australia, New Zealand and around the world have access to an integrated accounting and POS solution.
I'm new to both Xero and Harvest, and I'm a little confused about how to handle this situation.
We recently start a new fashion retail shop here in Australia and never used the Xero before.
I am entering in a new purchase order into Workflowmax and then it goes over to Xero fine.
New “price discount” feature allows users to seamlessly create and apply discounting to a range of products, customers and customer groups.
I have come across I-Farmer which is a phone application that allows you to track livestock figures as well as recording weight and other costing, and will integrate with Xero, but as I-Farmer is a New Zealand product I don't know how it will work with the Australian GST system.
We are looking to create new opportunities to better server our customers.
I have a new Xero client who runs a virtual office and although they do occasionally work on an hourly rate, 99% of their work is per audio minute based.
I am looking to integrate these for a potential new client.
I want it to integrate with Xero customers, so that any new customers added in either system are synced.
Today I get the message when I sign into Xero of this new feature.
However, it came to our attention that some of my clients received this a couple of minutes after midnight on New Year’s Eve.
If they copy the email address from the quote into a new message, I never find out.
The previous versions were much easier on the eyes and didn't take as much screen real estate, while the new versions are harsh to look at and take up more room.
Have you recently employed new staff yet to be fully trained or are you simply under too much pressure?
we have relatively fast 4G internet service, and can access Xero from a laptop ok but not on our new server/thin client configuration.
I am new to Xero.
I am starting a profit share agreement with one of my managers for one of my businesses starting the new financial year.
The new quote view makes it impossible to quickly see a quote number without going into each respective quote.
Customers have been complaining about the new looks/usability of xero since August.
I think there should be a little more action to make the existing features work before asking for new ideas.
I'm fairly new to Xero, but already it's clear what it needs - urgently - in order to better meet community expectations and avoid customers looking around for something better.
I'm not a trained accountant so always a bit daunting taking on a new package.
Obvious areas would be the Search field in the Contacts screen, not to mention the Contact Name in the New Contacts screen which would pre-empt duplication.
I can create a new quote quite easily from several places.
Clearly I am happy to see the new feature.
Come on innovative Xero make it easier for us to start a new org!
I protested, and it seems many others did tool, as two days later we received an email saying that, due to customer feedback, there would, after all, be a choice ot taking the new feed or sticking with the Yodlee feed.
I am relatively new to Xero after crossing from MYOB.
I hope this heralds a new chapter in Xero listening to its customers when they say something needs fixing.
I'm a big fan of the new drag & drop function, however I seem to have regular issues with it.
Looking forward to using this lovely new resource regularly.
##### CLUSTER 41 #####
Many of my business clients prefer to send a check that comes from their banking account.
Now im not sure what to do with the payments into the account as there will be some from the business (which shows on a business cheque account) and some from personal.
I have one Credit Card Business account but they are split into several different credit cards.
I understand that we will be providing a Directors Loan to the business, but how do we account for it?
When we first set up our business we had all payments going to our personal account.
We have separated our business from our personal and formed an S-Corp but some of the payments are still going directly to our personal account (I'm working on fixing this but it's a slow process with some of the insurance companies).
When I first started my dance business I put all my income into my personal account as well as paying for expenses out of it.
I finally realised my error and opened a business account.
To ensure business bank account has ALL business transactions recorded, I am paying back my personal credit card each of the transactions.
Eg: bot a product for $50 from personal credit card, I do a transfer from my business bank account of $50 to my personal credit card.
This will avoid having to move the money out of the business account and back in.
- The owner also pays his personal income tax every 3 months from the same business current account.
An option would be to transfer this income out of my business bank account and treat this transaction as an expense to balance out the income.
Would I get him to make repayments in my bosses personal account and then transfers into the business under directors loan?
Is their any other way to account for the Business Promotion gifts.
The finance company paid the van dealership directly, &#163;19,800We paid a &#163;200 deposit to the dealershipWe paid the VAT, &#163;3300 to the finance company from our account, the VAT money was however a partner loan to the business.
I. e. my director has his home phone and internet coming out of the business account so as far as I'm aware we cannot claim this VAT back.
However, I have since added my Business bank account which received the combined payments from stripe every 2-3 days and now have a dilemma.
These will go right into my business bank account.
I have a business account and a business credit card account.
The refund was sent to me in the form of a cheque and I accidentally (and rather foolishly) deposited the cheque into my business account rather than my business credit card account.
Now I have an amount in my business account which I don't know how to reconcile.
eWay settlement into our bank account usually occurs on the next business day.
In order to obtain some petrol/gas money-off vouchers I purchased &#163;800 of gift cards from a local supermarket and paid for these via Visa Debit from the business bank account.
I set up my business checking account.
This money sits in my business checking account.
A lot of times in the past I have paid for a business expense with my personal funds because I didn't have the money in the business account.
I have a bank account for my business, to which I've linked the business' PayPal account.
Once I have deducted the commissions owed to me by each small business I then send the remainder of the monthly debit/credit card payments that have built up in my account back to the individual small businesses.
Small business 1 owes me a commission of (£10 + £10)*5% = £1Small business 2 owes me a commission of (£20 + £20)*10% = £4Small business 3 owes me a commission of (£50 + £50)*25% = £25Now that the money is in my bank account I can transfer the small businesses back their money.
I have them moving out of the main business account as owner drawings.
This seems to be very helpful to keeping a better eye on cash-flow, and monitoring the main business account.
I charged a personal item to a company credit card,  Then we paid back the money by transferring the amount back into our business account.
Then the other person paid back my share to my business account.
When we started out we were using my personal bank account as the primary business account which had both business and personal transactions going through it.
1) My personal account was basically used for a full financial year, and the business income was my only income.
I have recently established a company in the UK, for which I have drummed up several expenses up to now when i finally have a UK BUSINESS bank account.
It was my personal tax refund which was incorrectly placed into my business bank account.
My small business has a credit card facility with a bank, whereby two employees in the business have individual cards - each accessing 1/2 of the available total credit card limit.
I have paid this amount of money,  which came out of my business bank account, so my debit and liability for this amount has been extinguished.
I currently have listed:- Business Bank Account- Business Credit Card- Business PayPal AccountI have not listed:- Personal Bank AccountI've nearly completed reconciling everything and transitioning to Xero, except the following:- As a (typically bad) sole trader, there are just 3 or 4 statement lines which are transfers received from my personal account.
When I sight the bank statements I find that on several occasions, he has spent money out of his personal account for business purchases.
I changed my email address on my account yesterday and now I don't have access to my data - it is critical to access for my business on a daily basis so could you help me please?
Our business works as an intermediary between two parties where only 25% of money in our account belongs to us.
£100000 is advanced to me and appears in my business bank account.
All expenses come out of the business account.
80)What I am not understanding is that in the year of 2014 when I moved to Xero, I added my share holder loan account and the money the business owned me which matches this amount.
We paid for the formation costs out of our personal money (as the business account didnt exist before this).
We now have a business account and this is linked to Xero.
My banks are in a mess, i have been using both personal and business acounts for business and personal transactions, whilst I have stopped this now, in order to reconcile should i just allocate anything not related to the business as a drawing regardless of bank account and allocate everything business related to its correct account code ?
My business is doing well after 2 months of trading - if I look at what is in my business account I could get very excited.
I have a Business Credit Card set up as a "Bank Account" and the transactions flow in and can be reconciled as expected.
I have invoiced my business account for expenses accrued on a personal credit card.
I have a business bank account and a business credit card, both tied to Xero.
I registered the business and set up a bank account for the business.
However, prior to setting up the business and the account a friend of mine loaned me 1850NZD as a start up cost which i used to buy inventory to build my products.
I have a business credit card account with Bank of America that has 2 employee credit cards.
All payments (minus fees in the case of Paypal and Amazon) get transferred to my business bank account.
I am starting a small business in the architecture/design field and am wondering how I account for purchased software, which can vary greatly in price and purchase method.
My issue is, when I was starting up my business, I bought things I needed from my personal account.
I then opened a business account to which I was given &#163;2000 which I put into this.
I have NAB for transaction account and ANZ for business Visa.
Also sometimes i will transfer money from PayPal to my business account if i can't make a stock purchase using PayPal do i put this transfer under the same category as my other transfers?
In business you have one credit account with several actual card holders.
(draft tax percentage of turnover = estimated tax the client should then save and transfer to a business savings account)This will then allow us to look at Funds left over:.
If you are a business that does multiple intra account transfers then your totals show wildly different to reliaty.
I have two business trading names (eg: company1, company2), both run from within the same Xero account, because its the same ABN and business entity.
Recently, a couple co-workers and I were discussing an account of a business that we recently added to Xero.
It would be useful for Xero to have the ability to account for depreciation on both business and private portions of an asset.
We would love the ability to have the bank link work for our Westpac business credit cards, with 14 card holders, this would be even more useful than the main business account.
Same business, same ABN, same bank account but two separate ledgers for Payroll?
If anyone could please give me an idea as to what these 3 things mean / what account I should be using for each of them I'd be ever so grateful; when I signed up for xero I though it was good for small business owners such as myself but I fear it's really for accountant's does anyone have any experience of Freeagent - would this sort of thing be easier with that software?
5 years of data so that the Xero account accurately reflects my business since beginning operating.
I am taking my personal funds and putting it into the business cash account.
But I can't find anywhere on my dashboard and page stating that my business account already connected.
I synced Xero with my Chase business account, which is my only business account.
However, there is never a transaction collected from the credit card feed which shows the card as paid (card is set up to be cleared to nil every month through my business bank account).
The reference for the feed is "Principal Credit" but the credit card is not linked to their normal business account and they can't seem to find that same transaction with the same amount on their bank statement for that transaction date.
How to code for personal expenses from business account and credit card?
HiI'm trying to refresh the bank feed (Co-Op Business bank account).
Owing to a policy they have put through which I fundamentally disagree with I demanded a refund and they have sent a cheque for &#163;1,000 which I put into my business account.
Hello, my company actually have one customer who would deposit money directly into our business account regularly in advance.
I really can't find my business account.
I have a business checking account and a business credit card.
We have a number of employees (<10) with Business credit cards that all link back to one master card account.
We have a business credit card account with two credit cards attached and each month we receive a statement showing the total spent on both cards, plus the line-item details for each transaction.
I am trying to enter a transaction where a client's wife has paid a lump sum into his business account.
reconciling the $600 amount paid from the business bank account with the net amount of $450 that they should have been paid.
HiSome of my nursing staff have purchased Medical Equipment (for themselves, not the practice) through the business account we have with our supplier.
When paying super previously through the small business clearing house I have had to submit bank details, that is BSB and account number for staff who have super funds with, for example, BT Super.
I assumed at the very least, the funds would be taken from the business account.
I plan to transfer the value of the two payrolls from my business checking to my personal checking via my bank account.
Neatly connects your Xero account to view a wide range of data important to your business and compares next to a diverse choice of metrics.
I have set up a petty cash bank account as the business always runs with around about a £100 cash float.
I have a client who is starting a Chauffeur business, most of their jobs will be on account with the customer being invoiced in total at the end of the week/month.
Specifically, it syncs your Xero account with Red Flag Alert, the business information database with records on over 7 million UK businesses.
15c in my bank account over a week after I have cancelled my subscription and deleted my business.
Our Capital One checking account bank feed (which is our business's only bank account) has not been working for over 6+ weeks!
Feeling a little powerless here to fIx it and I am unable to manage my small business finances without access to my account.
Small business owners who do not understand all the obvious things that account type people do.
##### CLUSTER 42 #####
Being able to add contacts straight from the dashboard.
I have been able to add it using the following code &#171;InvoiceDueDate&#187;.
I wish to have the ability to be able to add an inventory list per customer.
I would love to be able to select multiple files from the inbox and chose "Add to .
It would be ideal to be able to add and invite a user once and select their access levels across different ledgers.
So instead of only being able to add a placeholder for the two tracking categories, their may even be tracking placeholders for the tracking options.
Would love to be able to add a digital signature to the annual reports.
Being able to merge in extra contact details, currently it only gives the contact name, it would be handy to add the VAT number (required to give in every quarter for vat charges you made) and/or country, email address, .
Any support for being able to add additional metrics to the graphs already presented?
it would be great if you could also export the docs to word -  we want to be able to add other word based documents to our reports.
Would be great to be able to add additional costs (for additions) to existing fixed assets.
As well as being able to add more customisation in terms of the dashboard (which I've seen in other posts) it would be great to have more information re timelines and payables.
It would be nice to be able to add a defined CC email address(s) to a specific email template.
I was adding some expense claims and I noticed that I was able to add the same reference for more than one expense claim.
It would be very useful to be able to add attachments to leave requests for medical certificates or other such documents.
I'd love to be able to add some features to the month end statements, specifically if sending statements after the last day of the month.
I have found since starting up the Westpac Credit Card feed there are always lines missing so I have to add them manually to be able to reconcile.
It would be really useful to be able to add employees to the Employee contact group so that the amounts that they have been paid remains hidden.
HiI am looking for an add-on that will send a purchase order to the supplier when a customer order is processed, and be able to convert the item numbers for different suppliers.
does anyone know any add ons that facilitate contract management (i. e. sending a contract to a client for them to sign, can be a simple PDF or in an ideal world able to be digitally signed).
##### CLUSTER 43 #####
Where we need to raise repeating invoices or bills in advance or arrears it would be helpful if the placeholders were more flexible.
I need to correct some Purchase Invoices (aka "bills") that have all been entered incorrectly.
Due to the nature of my product I need to show inclusive prices on my invoices or my customers will be totally confused.
We have raised a Purchase Order to a supplier, and now because of the way the project has been programmed, we are getting several supplier invoices coming in that all need to be allocated against the original Purchase Order.
I'm downloading invoices individually as I need to pass them on for records.
If I import all the invoices I will need to then allocate all payments throughout the year to reconcile  as at 30.
We need to import our invoices from CSV.
However, I need to enter invoices in order to reconcile Square Batch Deposits.
I now need to enter my historical outstanding invoices.
00 and that I need to write a credit for all my open invoices.
Do I need to create these purchases as if they were invoices?
I need to make Recipient Created Tax Invoices.
I need to make some manual journals to unpaid invoices that were paid to a third party.
Since they are two separate transactions with two different parties, I think I will need to create two invoices: one for each party.
Do i need to create 2 recurring invoices?
Now here's my question, with the Subscriptions in place, will I still need to send out invoices?
We also need to allocated specific hours from timesheets to specific client invoices.
We run a photography business and have 3 different invoicing scenariosProcess 1 - invoices to clients for work already delivered - this is for invoices that are due for payment now and I need the 5 reminders to go out at weekly intervalsProcess 2 - invoices to clients for jobs approved but not yet delivered - these invoices need to be paid before the job - which could be next week, next month or 6 months away - so I need 5 incremental reminders based on the due date - so if the job is a month away the reminders need to go our every 4 days and if the job is 5 months away then the reminders need to be monthly.
We need to send quotes to specific property managers and invoices to another address and statements to another address.
I sometimes have 50 invoices I need to send to one customer, must annoy them to receive these all individually.
This will be especially useful for people who are migrating from other accounting platforms and need to set up hundreds of repeating invoices.
We need a box for our 1300 number on invoices and statements.
I often need to generate a sequence of invoices for one customer.
Sometimes we are paying 200+ invoices at once and almost all of them need to be manually changed.
This way when entering invoices that may be split only the amounts would need to be populated.
Or give some kind of warning that you will also need to change the email on repeating invoices.
This functionality would make the creation of invoices much quicker and easier and eliminate the need to have hard copy catalogues, or to memorize codes.
Is there a way to, or do I need to upload their invoices?
So I now have 18month's worth of invoices I need to reconcile.
I've got my head around brininging the conversion date forward to July 2016 to basically start again, and I know I need to ensure AR and AP have matching pre conversion invoices/bills to confirm.
Need help urgently to send invoices!
We are issuing quaterly invoices and therefore we would need to apply placeholder accordingly.
We have yearly maintenance clients, so we need to send out invoices yearly.
Given that no option currently is available to select the branding theme we now need to go in to all invoices manually and choose the correct branding theme.
As a band we need our Band Camp web site listed at the bottom of invoices along with facebook and twitter.
2) Need to track renewals process - IE be aware of what services are due for renewal, what renewal invoices have been paid, what has expired.
I know all of the invoices that I need to move across to last financial year but am unsure of how to do it.
We have several clients who are also suppliers and I need to offset the payable against the receivable, ideally avoiding using credit notes instead of supplier invoices.
Invoices are attached to bills so they need to be exported too.
It's a bit of a shame as I don't do payroll, I don't have more than 5 invoices per month nor do I need multiple people to connect.
##### CLUSTER 44 #####
I'm ok that they are there I just need a chance to somehow hide them or have them appear on a separate tap maybe.
Than I wanna create my VAT return but it just offers me to go back until March 2017, but I need January 2017.
We just need a couple of beta testers to make sure we have a solid integration.
I am a contractor, 1 person with a ltd company and I think Ive been doing it wrong paying myself just to a directors loan, is what my accountant suggested, but do I need to do a payroll instead?
For example :Customer 1 - 30 days - 36 daysCustomer 2 - 60 days - 59 daysCustomer 3 - 30 days - 104 daysCustomer 4 - 90 days  - 80 daysWe just need to work out who are good payers and who are bad payers.
Do I need to import all the data from day 1 or can I just begin from today?
Are they "just another creditor" with GST and nest under overheads or they need "special treatment"?
Im sure I need to have a Cr: for my paypal fees to show them being paid but I just cant figure out how to do it?
It's just way easier at this stage when I'm living paycheck to paycheck and need to keep things simple.
Do we just need to enter the detail in say excel and then upload the file.
com/au/Q_OwnerFunds and have not got my answer from the below thread as Owner capital refund is a big amount not normal expense claim, just need a better understanding to get my head around this thing.
I have just become aware of France's need to keep TVA records separately for audit purposes (called F. E. C requirements - Fichier des écritures comptables).
If this already exist, I just need help finding it!
I receive a lot of email receipts which i need to screen shot and manually enter into expenses, however the standard data (ie vendor, date, amount etc) should be quite easy for the app to pick up if I could just fwrd these emails and then fill in any additional required fields?
Some of my Clients continually need to know how close they are to the UK VAT threshold (some purposely running just under it).
I get that we need to look at every transaction to avoid omissions, but can that pls be done on a separate sheet/tab, so that we can just print the nuts & bolts of the return, not the excessive clutter.
This would also help when the contact details need to be updated - instead of having to manually update each and every contact, you could do it just the once.
But i certainly don't need any payroll for what is simply just myself visiting clients, doing work and getting paid.
I run a cafe and we work in weeks not months so I need reports to display upto 52 weeks not just 11.
I just need at a glance to know what's coming in and what's going out overall.
We'd just need a way to input the actual budget numbers for CAPEX and OPEX items.
For many clients we really need just basic stock control.
We just need a simple option in the Inventory Items to say "Inventory This Item".
I don't see this being a difficult request, as your development team just need to run a query on currently available information.
I need each line to have a date column instead of the date just being at the top.
We just need the amount to be zeroed out.
We have just converted from MYOB to Zero & need to import the outstanding balances of our suppliers & customers.
This week they released their Storefront addition which just grates my nerve because they need to finish making their CC service interoperable with finance packages.
If you need any info about what we're doing there (sometimes we speak, sometimes we demo, sometimes we have free tickets) please just ask.
Or do I just have to remember that I need to go back to the employee after "x" months (once they have paid the required total) and remove the deduction?
If I delete something it should just disappear, allowing me to make the corrections I need to make and keep the employees record tidy and accurate.
We don't need the company to also provide free HR advice/legal advice, just the HRMIS for recruitment, training, WHS, policy etc.
In order for my employees' payslips to make sense from July onwards, they need to seeOr should I just do dummy runs for April & May to bring YTD figures in to line?
Also he is paying the max into the SIPP and certainly does not need to be in a workplace pension (we have just reached our staging date).
I just need to know now, how to delete the posted payroll run for April.
We just need something smaller, cheaper and simpler, a no frills - does what it says on the tin kind of thing.
I don't need stock purchases or anything else - just invoicing.
##### CLUSTER 45 #####
I do not believe that you are able to select a faster payment option and there is only an ACH batch payment file able to be exported through a .
I am able to record the pre-payment.
For invoicing options, I would love to be able to have a "payment due upon receipt" option, instead of having to choose a date.
i. e.  be able to select multiple suppliers but make individual payments that would be matched as individual payments rather than a "bulk" payment.
It would be very useful if you were able to filter the "Awaiting Payment" listing within the purchases screen by a contact group.
You should be able to assign a bill payment to more than one customer and be given the option of using % splits.
I then want to be able to include the payment on their wage slip.
In MYOB, we were able to receipt in the payment, allocate to undeposited funds and then when we banked those cheques, we could select what cheques were being banked from a list of cheques that were held in undeposited funds.
Be able to attach files to a Payment that is paying Multiple Items.
It would be great to be able to give a name or reference to an Auto Super Payment.
I have been able to setup a Pre-Payment Spend Money Item To the Loan Company and I have also been able to create a recurring bill payment which can reduce the Pre-Payment Spend Money amount.
Is anyone able to advise me as to how I can remove these allowances from the payment summaries
I am trying to lodge my payment summaries, but one of my employees is coming up with an invalid TFN (I am unable to contact this employee so she has been set up with 111-111-111) can you please let me know how I am able to fix this?
Am I able to merge the employees to then provide one payment summary?
I am slightly concerned that if we are only able to send an email that should I encounter a more significant problem that my staff will go potentially a week with out getting paid or I end up submitting an incorrect payment resulting in a correction or a fine from HMRC!
##### CLUSTER 46 #####
I hedge all invoices I issue and change FX to hedge rate on invoice screen, I can also apply hedge rate for Proforma Deposits using Overpayments but have no option to apply FX when receipting against invoice?
How do we send an invoice for that deposit given that the amount will be held (as an asset or unrecognized revenue) and then applied toward a future invoice (or set of future invoices).
Currently if a staff member has "Invoice Only" access they have the ability to turn off invoice reminders for individual invoices.
We issue out several invoices yearly and at the moment I am having to go through each invoice individually when wanting to identify one particular invoice.
When trying to edit invoices and quotes, the "reference number" on the invoice/quote keeps coming up as the invoice number.
In creating invoice batches of a 130 invoices per batch we required each invoice batch to be created against a different branding theme.
Yes I could go into all my invoice and select a different date, this would be a very large job for a company that invoice 100+ invoices a month.
##### CLUSTER 47 #####
We have just joined Xero, and have around 130 properties we manage.
Just trying to find a way to manage this within Xero that helps the director as well.
Just wondering whether anyone has tips on how to recognise the following entries in Xero.
should I just leave Xero altogether, who is with me?
We're just getting involved with Xero - reconciliation, cash coding and rules all look designed in such a way that they make reconciliation pretty fast.
I emailed Xero support, and they didn't answer my question about how to remove conversion journal entries, they just sent me to this help article, which also doesn't answer my question: https://help.
Is this possibly a system glitch after all the downtime we've had through Xero lately because otherwise it just doesn't make any sense!
HelloI've just discovered an error in the way the transactions from my website have been exported to Xero.
Hello, I just converted a client from another program to XERO.
This issue applies to just about all accounting reports in Xero.
Hey there,I've just started using Xero and have a few questions.
Hello all, I've just run my first quarterly tax filing using Xero's payroll.
Nothing happens Xero just freezes.
My concern is if I am digging myself into a hole by importing my fixed assets from last year into Xero using double declining balance, just to then have to output another number using MACRS during tax season.
Hey folks ,If there are any Marketcircle Daylite users out there I would be interested to here from you, I just started using the Daylite Xero Connector made by "pure-mac" based in NZ.
I have just switched over from Quickbooks to Xero.
When we tried to "remove and redo" Xero don't let us and just keep on giving error messages.
I have just entered our tracked inventory opening balances from our EOFY stocktake (we have just started with Xero).
Just started using Xero and have noticed that customer statements show a credit balance in brackets.
I'm just getting started with Xero and have a few questions.
My challenge is just ensuring it is properly and clearly recorded in Xero.
I looked around and I just could not find anything that would get me to where I could upload the xero api code to paypal.
I'm just starting with Xero.
They currently don't have to reenter any details in MYOB it just creates the PO from the CO.  We have assessed their current processes and if they were to change to Xero they would increase their work load because they are duplicating the CO manually.
Hey fellow accountants and Xero supporters,As per title, just cant seem to work out what went wrong?
I just wanted to know if it's possible to set an individual charge rate for customers somewhere in Xero?
I'm not asking a question on basic accounting, I just don't know the best way to do it in Xero.
Xero just get's PayPal's overall charge to the customer and the fees we paid PayPal.
I Just signed up for XERO trial, after recommendation from my friend.
I have been using Xero for a year now and just doing my first reconcile and return and come across a problem.
So I am just starting off with xero and I am a little confused.
Just started with Xero, hopefully this question is an easy one?
I have just converted to Xero and setup the conversion date to be the first day of my current financial year  (1 Sep 2012).
We're just getting going with Xero and have hit a snag.
I just had a review with my CPA today and he was very surprised to see that credit cards are treated as assets in Xero.
I'm just getting started with Xero, and have a question about salary/directors loan.
I have just started using Xero and sorely miss the built-in calculator that MYOB has.
I'm just getting started using Xero.
We've just switched to using Xero.
Sage makes sense and Xero just doesn't at all.
I just want to know in Xero what I should put this as when reconciling?
I have just converted over from MYOB to Xero.
I am just entering all the data to start using xero from 1 July 2016.
Just adding my very first expense claim (fuel dockets) into Xero for my employer.
I just wonder if it is feasible to connect the database (LibreOffice Base with MySQL) with Xero via ODBC or JDBC.
I have just shifted from MYOB to Xero and have an annoying credit for an old phone bill sitting as a Credit Note awaiting refund.
I hope someone could help with this as I have just started using xero.
I have just signed up with Xero and working on setting up my inventory values.
Am I best to not enter these in Xero at all, and just manage this initial return manually via IRD?
I just started working with xero.
I've just started with Xero and want to get it right from the start!
I've just started using Xero.
We've just switched to XERO, we love it!
Is this because the payroll for June was conducted/journalled in xero but the copied months are just data so don't populate the IAS and BAS reports properly?
As a small Sole Trader, I've just been going through a difficult transition from an ad hoc system (ie scrap paper) to Xero.
We just want to import our company data (Site 1) into Xero.
I have been using Xero just over 1 month now.
Hey it would be wicked if Xero could push out a notification to a contact's owner that they have just surpassed a lifetime revenue milestone (say $10K).
We can export just about everything else from Xero to sheets, why not the GL?
Just saw there is a Xero apple watch app available.
It would be great if when you export contact details from Xero that it shows the details of all the contact people rather than just the primary person.
I don't think this is an essential feature Xero needs - just letting you know it was requestedHeather Smith
Our office already has/uses Xero and am just needing a simple way to import client codes perhaps from our old system (Sage HandiSoft) which makes searching for clients much simpler.
I just wonder why Xero hasn't developed its own similar technology.
I just had a client's QuickBooks data converted to Xero.
(i. e. not just the end-of-year Financial Statements, which aren't a bad template I must say, from my experience on Xero thus far).
There was just a box to tick on Iris, I cant find one on Xero payroll.
Xero is essentially just columns and rows of numbers and should easily fit into a window 960 pixels wide.
I think that the My Xero screen in the partner edition should come up with just a search box rather than a client list.
I have just started to have a play around with Purchase Orders as the subject came up with a client that's not currently on Xero and I thought it could be another feature to convince them to move.
I have just switch to Xero from QuickBooks and getting into it.
I have just moved to Xero and there are a couple of things which would be REALLY useful.
I've just started with Xero this year, coming from years of working with Quickbooks Pro.
We don't really want to jump up to the next tier in Xero and was wondering if there was a way you could just "buy" some more transactions for one or two months?
net help page say this needs to be the 56th letter in the information line (56 may not be correct but just as a reference - I cannot remember the exact number) but instead of all the information I have put into Xero's batch the barclays.
I was just wondering if anyone knows if the Expense Claim function in Xero can be accessed by employees directly so that they can then be approved by Management?
I just started using Xero in Nov 2016, and my balance sheet is showing some retained earnings for the 2016 year.
Hello I have set up a Limited Company recently and have just joined Xero.
We've just started using Xero so are feeling our way around it.
HiI've just started with Xero after using Kashflow for many years.
Hey Guys,Just started using Xero, so I'm still learning the ropes.
Hello,I have just taken on  a few more clients on Xero but have to log on seperately for them all at present.
Have just had my question answered (which has been of great assistance) on how to zoom in and out to make xero fit on my screen.
Hello, I am considering moving to Xero from Clearbooks and just comparing bits and bobs.
I tried to do it by way of finding transactions during the reconciliation process and ticked all the expense claims and clicked reconcile and this took way too long and nothing happened, it seemed Xero just froze.
We have just purchased a property, typical transactions appearing in Xero are:- property deposit- solicitor fees- searches fees etcas the purchase is complete, very soon we will also start to see transactions linked to property management (tenant rents, repairs, mortgage etc).
All other internet related activities where working  100% - Just not Xero.
Hello,I am using Xero from last 6 months and just facing a problem.
I have just started a group for users of Xero.
However, even if you try to import it as a reference, Xero just puts this under the description on the left hand side.
Other apps are fine - just Xero.
Hello , Can anyone help pleaseI have just set up Xero and my conversion balances are correct and agree with the closing balance sheet.
I have just set up Xero from transferring from my old MYOB.
I'm evaluating Xero and just want to confirm - it appears PO functionality is pretty basic and there is no way to receive items against purchase orders?
In three years I have been using it, Xero has come leaps and bounds but every so often I just have to shake my head in disbelief.
Just wondering where I can view a list of all upcoming webinars Xero is hosting so I can book them in?
I'm just setting up on Xero and am adding Users.
Normally, I just change the dates on any reports I run in Xero which isn't a big issue.
Hello, we own a pub and are just starting out in Xero.
I have just started using xero.
Just trying to make the change from QBO to Xero.
In Xero, I then get 3 transactions associated to this, one is the GBP amount (which I can reconcile against a bill) but the other 2 are just related to the conversion and cancel each other out.
I'm using another system for payroll so just recording PAYE payments in Xero (to 825 code).
However the data can't be just imported it has to be cleaned from Square to Xero to allow for importing.
We have just moved to Xero and are trying to import and category all of last year's transactions in order to do taxes (I know, bad on us!
I have just started using Xero and am operating as a Limited Company in the UK.
I have just started working with check printing on the US version of Xero and have a problem with the alignment on the voucher portion of my checks.
When I enter the unit price I have to enter this amount minus the GST where as last week I just entered in the total amount selected GST on Expense and Xero would work the rest out.
just took over someones Xero database.
I have just set up xero for my property rentals (I have 12 properties).
We’ve just released a feature for our US customers to allow them to print professionally styled checks right from within Xero.
We're just now starting to track leave through Xero.
I just checked his leave balances in Xero and for Carers/ Personal leave its up to 133 hours?
I have worked with other payroll systems but only just started to work with Xero.
We are just about to start using Xero for 6 of our businesses.
Hello, we just start using Xero this month.
I am only a few months in to usin Xero and only just discovered tracking and that you (apparently) can allocate staff wage payments to tracking groups.
I've just noticed that some employees have leave accruals set up and other don't, however, no annual leave or personal leave has been entered into Xero as it has been recorded separately.
HiWe have an employee who has just been paid out his annual leave hours and when I enter this, his super amount (which is usually and correctly calculated by Xero) does not equal 9.
I have used a bookkeeper for years although she is an old school MYOB user that just isn't coping to well with one client (me) trying to get her on to Xero so I am doing as much as I can on my own.
Xero won't allow me to just put in an Annual Salary.
Xero Payroll users - I have just started a small firm and am making my accounting, payroll etc service decisions.
We've just released Payroll fully integrated into Xero for customers in the USA.
I'm just paying one employee and it's very simple and straightforward, but I didn't know how I should handle this and code this in Xero.
my client is setting up Mth 1 payroll and the pension contributions are coming off the total salary including commission and not just the basichave raised 3 support tickets, but Xero failed to supply any responseany ideas?
I've just switched to Xero from Quickbooks and everything has gone smoothly so far until it came to setting up pension scheme details and paying my staff!
I have just taken over this role and am bringing payroll into Xero.
HiI have just started using Xero for payroll from April and have had so many issues its been a total nightmare.
I've just moved over from using HMRC's Basic PAYE tools RTI onto Xero Payroll.
Not so Xero of the 12 "Scheduled" submissions, 4 have been psych outs, that just sit in the queue with no means of cancelling or revoking.
We have just switched from another software (PAYROO) into Xero.
We have just moved over to Xero from a 3rd party and for 5 employees they have provided us the incorrect employee number so HMRC believe they are employed twice by us.
I have just run September’s payroll in Xero and the pension calculations are not working correctly – they do not seem to be calculating the correct %.
However, we have just run July's payrun and Xero has calculated the pension contribution (of 6%) on the qualifying salary minus the salary sacrifice amount.
We have just started using Xero and this was the first payroll.
When I look at my L&G details page I see informatoin such as:Scheme informationScheme name: XXXX PENSION PLANScheme number: XXXXXProduct reference: WorkSave Pension PlanThese are just three fields but Xero has a total of 12 fields to fill out in this area.
I have set payroll for my own company on xero with just myself as a director and submitted to HMRC and all seems ok.
Somehow Xero assumes that managers should just approve their own leave as if organisations were all just completely flat.
I have today gone back to using HMRC's Basic PAYE tools, which took 2 minutes to submit rather than the 3 hours I have spent on Xero today - all for just one company director.
I am using a third party payroll software and previously just entered the figures into Xero to make sure the payments to HMRC etc.
I am not aware that Xero supports piece rates yet and while it has been suggest that we just push through quantities and rates eg 6 @ $30 as if they are hours, I'm concerned that this will peroduce strange results if in for example in the same week, a worker does say 2 days on piece rates (say 6 bins each day) and 3 x 8 hour days at minimum wage.
(it should be the other way round)Employee has just passed his 6 month anniversary so Xero gave annual leave.
Pairing Friendly Manager club manager software with Xero just makes sense.
Just take a picture of your receipt, we scan it and process it to Xero.
A modern CRM with features to manage customers & projects, designed just for small businesses and integrated with Xero, Google Apps.
I'm just stuck on one balance it leaves in the Xero Balance Sheet - a Current Asset called 'Cash Float'.
I've just started a trial with Teamwork and it seems ok so far, but I can't see a way to automatically create a project once a quote is accepted in Xero.
Hello - I have just setup WooCommerce / Xero and I have an issue that I can't solve (and I can't seem to find it in the search).
Xero is just so inflexible.
I just set up the xero woocommerce plugin: https://docs.
Just looking for feedback from any one who uses DanceBiz and XERO, and the sync function.
HiWe have client who has just converted to Xero.
I just wondered if anybody was aware of any software (cloud based) that allows me to create pre-start financial forecasts which once complete and trading I can import as a budget to Xero.
Hello everyone,We've just completed our EASEEsell to Xero integration and we are now looking for beta users and testers.
We have just developed a Xero integration with our vehicle logbook web app: LogbookHQ.
I just don't want to get caught by Xero's limitation on the number of transactions per month for non API transactions.
Xero will not recommend one or the other so just asking the community, if anyone knows a company who provides this service.
We are just migrating from MYOB to Xero.
Hello, I am just wondering if there is a facebook ecommerce program that integrates with Xero?
We have just come on board with Xero and love it.
Just getting started with this great combo, Xero and shoeboxed.
Just a very annoying feature of Xero but something I would of thought was obvious from an accounting point of view.
Just started using Xero today.
I have just discovered the email & notes link for contacts on Xero.
As we have just moved to Xero I have not paid the Directors(us) since the move?
Just don't trust xero-amex to get it right!
When we have a problem with XERO it is "NOW" problem and I cannot have someone 'farting' around the internet looking for answers inside this forum, just in case someone has hit the same problem!
I'm in Brisbane, Australia and I find navigating around Xero is just a little slow generally - page loads are OK but just take a bit too long (over 1s) to be fluid.
Since we've signed up, we've seen all the cracks and just how difficult it is going to be to move Quickbooks to Xero.
Just wanted to suggest an improvement to your 'My Xero' interface.
The tagline, "beautiful accounting" seems a bit of an overpromise, having just taken a look at Quickbooks Online latest design, which is by comparison leaps and bounds visually above Xero.
Hello,I just started using Xero after evaluating quite a few solutions and nearly settling for Wave (also a great product).
Not sure if Xero have made changes to this or if it's just coincidence.
Just wanted to say that I LOVE Xero.
I just wanted to say that Xero has already paid for itself.
##### CLUSTER 48 #####
The account we were trying to transfer from the payments never processed in this account so nothing comes up on the bank statement (this is a Bankwest acc).
Also, GoCardless has set up a 'direct debit' account, where the payments are actually going, then from there the reconciliation shows 'transfer from direct debit' on my bank account.
Something happened and somehow the transactions in these two accounts have been swaped, so all my payroll movements including the ones from previous years have been moved to the account Termination Benefits (3144), and the only transaction I should have on this account is standing on 3140 Salaries.
my physical bank account, and 2. my PayPal account.
I withdrew cash in from my bank account in dollars, converted it to another currency and then deposited into another account.
By mistake a number of expense claims were assigned to be paid from one of the Chart of Account rather than an actual Bank Account.
At the end of the month I recorded this as a transfer from the bank account to our Petty Cash Account, assuming the balance would be paid back in cash and that I could then record the receipts through petty cash rather than as an expense claim.
To date I have only had to transfer a charge from the main account to a single credit card account and without bank fees.
Do I have to set up the Till Account as a bank account?
So my initial thought about setting up a clearing account as a Bank Account does not work.
I am following the instructions here:What Xero is suggesting is this:Debit *Some Account* for $1,000Credit Fixed Asset account for $1,000Debit Bank account for $1,000Credit *Some Account* for $1,000Or Debit *Some Account* for $1,000Credit Fixed Asset account for $1,000Debit Accounts Receivable for $1,000Credit *Some Account* for $1,000Debit Bank account for $1,000Credit Accounts Receivable for $1,000What should *Some Account* be?
Last week I asked how to account for items paid for out of a director's personal bank account without doing multiple journals and spreadsheet analysis.
The answer I got wasIt "Assuming you already have the Director's Loan account set up (if not, do it and check the Enable payments box), record a Receive Money transaction to the director's personal bank account to clear the balance in the bank account and post it to the Director's Loan account"which seemed very straight forward.
Previously I have set up a virtual directors bank account so my payroll when due goes into the virtual account to show a positive balance.
In review, the cc Account Transactions on the cc account screen shows a couple of "Bank Transfers From" transactions that are unreconciled.
With the flat chart of accounts, I cant create a food sub account to the biz Dev account.
I originally set up the "cash drawer" account as a bank account as the owner pays for some items from the cash.
I have this compound entry:Account name                                      Account type                           Debit                  CreditCash in Bank-UB-32nd Depo                     Cash                                      21,103.
Also, I cannot do a receive money transaction in the petty cash account from anything other than another bank account.
Should we set up the finance account as a bank account, or should we account for the transactions as manual journals.
I rarely have money in my PayPal account, and so everything winds up being deducted from my bank account.
I am still looking for a simple way to see the ACCOUNT in a BANK account transaction line.
Every week or so I withdraw the money that has built up in my Paypal account into my bank account.
In MYOB I had the bank account as a header account with each component a detailed account for each component.
There have been multiple instances where vendors would credit my bank account by a small amount and then debit the amount back to verify that the account information I provided was correct.
Should I simply run 2 reports and send these to him so that he can read the 2 of them and then give me a set of finalised accounts or should I be changing the account type to Overhead in order for it to show up (or is there a third option in that equipment is charged to an overhead account before being transfered to a Fixed Asset account)?
00 each month by bank account The thing is why Balance Sheet Income Tax Account is still $7500 even I have processed 10 month @$250.
The asset it will be paid from is actually the money already in the bank account (i. e owner’s fund)and it is not in the equity account, rather as a liability.
However, the Credit Card is technically paid by way of "Transfer" of funds from the main account to the Credit Card "Bank Account".
When setting up a reoccurring monthly bill, there is no way to select "Transfer to Credit Card Bank Account" as an account selection option.
When the company paid other's company bills, we did spend money from the bank account and increase the loan account balance.
If I was doing this in MYOB I would enter the receipt into a journal entry, attributing each of them to the particular account in the chart of accounts and then balance the transaction by debiting the Loan account for the director.
Some credit cards, such as Bank of America contain the parent account and a sub-account for each credit card.
You've reconciled all the transactions for this account" screen, how are you to know which bank account to jump to, to continue your reconciliation tasks?
We set up our petty cash account as a bank account.
Account Transactions is great, but could do with the following:Customisable Column Widths - the reports are way longer than they need to be because the column widths don't/can't be adjusted to suit the data in the columnAlso, it would be more awesome if we could have account options that included:Selecting a Single Account - ExistsSelecting Multiple Accounts - ExistsEnhancement suggestion:Selecting Accounts based on type - ie: All Revenue AccountsAll Expense AccountsAll P& L AccountsAll Balance Sheet AccountsAll Asset AccountsAll Liability AccountsAll Equity AccountsThis would save having to select every individual account you wish to filter by and streamline this process even more - I have a very stringent process I follow for BAS review and this would make it much more efficient and help capture typical data processing errorsThen if we could save as individual templates for future "Find & Recodes" that would be doubly awesome - let's face it, end users don't suddenly become bookkeepers/accountants!
While creating a fake bank account is a viable workaround for the clearing account, it isn't for the withholding tax.
So for example I reviewing my P & L for year end - I see an account that doesn't look right I click on it to get the detail ( transaction list for that account ) - I find the issue ( one transaction ) - click on it and edit it to correct the error once done I end up in a bank account transaction listing.
Would be easier if we could enter bank details in boxes labelled BSB Number, Account Number and Account Name in Batch details.
So my dilemma is if I change that transfer to clear on 3rd January 2017, our bank account balance on 31st December matched, but our PayPal account shows a negative balance.
Directors Loan account transactions as seen in a google sheet:Background:- Initially made a directors loan of £3,000 which was deposited into company bank account on opening.
- Until I opened a company bank account, all my company expenses and revenue were done on my personal account in EUR, HKD and in THB, what's the double entry?
Hello,I have a cash account (bank account) and an owner funds introduced account (equity).
She uses one bank account and PayPal account companies.
When you go to SETTINGS -> CHART OF ACCOUNTS and click on the YTD amount of an account, it brings you to a list of all the account transactions.
I had a credit card account set-up, wrongly i later found out, that had the bank feed set-up via the actual credit card number rather than the credit card account number.
My bank balances on October 1st were &#163;1000 (current account)  and &#163;500 (savings account).
This created journal entries moving the tax liabilities through the the payroll wages payable account and then into the accounts payable account.
HiI have to reconcile a cash account which is set up as a bank account but obviously only has manual entries.
However I find that moving from Account A to Account B uses 2 of my allowed bank statement lines, and then moving funds back another 2 statement lines are used.
This meant that wages would be transferred from the current account into a separate bank account in one lump sum, from which they are then paid out.
by having the pal pal account and my normal bank account and accounting for the same transactions again arnt i a) double handeling and b) confusing my accountant and possibly be taxed more?
A little bit confused as to how to account for NHS superannuation, etc as these amounts will be deducted before they are paid into the bank account.
I read the help files and forums and they suggested using tracking for the accounts (eg a Rent account, a mortgage account, etc,  with a tracking category for each property name).
One of the employees wages was sent to wrong account no so I paid him again into the correct bank account.
Our payroll service provider makes about 5 withdraws from our banking account: one is net paycheck despoted into the employee's bank account and the others are various federal and state taxes.
We current take cash receipts and then put into petty cash account and then xfer 1-2x per week to bank account.
##### CLUSTER 49 #####
Long story short she batch pays our invoices once a month so included in the transfer is payment for invoice numbers 1, 2, 3 and 4.
When creating an Invoice, I want to disable the online payment option for some invoices and make it available for others.
This shows recent automatic payments on invoices e. g. when a user makes a payment on an invoice via Stripe or Paypal.
So we could REALLY do with an option to tick multiple transactions , and then match to one invoice (and the other way around - one payment and multiple invoices).
I thought one of the advantages of using this would be that the reconciling would show against the correct invoices - rather than "match"ing each invoice against the DD payment by hand - but it doesn't appear to be doing that.
I expect overdue invoices to be included in the total of invoice waiting for payment.
If invoices could be edited after receiving funds this would allow us to get around the problem by using a single invoice and listing multiple payment dates in comments.
##### CLUSTER 50 #####
Hi, Complete newby  - can anyone please tell me if I have an expense transaction that has not been reconciled will it still show in my profit and loss report?
Hi,Currently I have small "unfiled" amounts in each quarters GST reconciliation report.
Hi I find this report really useful but would benefit from a filter option being added for "Description" in the "spend money transactions" view, to help identify from other transactions.
Hi It would be great if the ABN was on your Payroll Activity Summary Report.
Hi thereIt would be a huge help if supplier credit notes would appear on this report.
Hi We run weekly management reporting cycle and find it very difficult to run weekly report.
Hi, On the management report it would be nice to have more flexibility with the way it is laid out.
Hi The Executive Summary Report presently only shows the current month and the previous month.
Hi, Is it possible to get expenses or income by contact by clicking on the contact itself instead of going to:Reports-All reports-Income by contact which will give you a list of all your contacts and then you will have to look for the contact you are preparing a report forThank you.
HI, I'm sure this report must exist already but I cant find it.
Hi,As you already know, we have been experiencing problems with aged receivables report generation due to our large database.
Hi,Can we please get an Aged Receivable / Payables Detail Report?
Hi,In my previous accounting package there was a report call General Ledger Detail.
##### CLUSTER 51 #####
Hi there,I am from Australia and have a Paypal account that charges USD.
Hi,I have a negative balance in the directors loan account (835).
Hi All,I have a question in relation to reconciling a paypal account which has AUD & USD going through it.
Hi, Took out a paypal working capital and don't know how to account for it.
Hi Folks,Wondering how I deal with moving money into a "tax account" for future tax payments.
Hi,I've got an Escrow account in which I hold money for different purposes: customer deposits, pending transfers.
Hi,How should I account for a tax refund that came into my LLC?
Hi,I want to enter an opening balance for my current account.
Hi, We were recently notified by the ATO that we had a $915 credit on our companies account.
Hi I've allocated an overpayment to a customer (they paid twice), I know it's against the correct account as I can see it in the customer contact screen marked as an overpayment.
Hi, I work online and most of my money comes from the US into my UK account.
Hi all,To what account should I reconcile my Income Tax and National Insurance payments?
Hi,While I tried to send statements to our account customers at the beginning of this month, I have found the balance of the statements includes the amount already paid.
Hi,As a nonprofit charity we receive many donations via cheque or cash that are deposited directly into our account.
Hi allNot sure why this is happening but I have a double entry in Account Transactions I have used 'spend money' for money withdrawn at a cash machine and given it a description > name and ref.
Hi,Im trying to import several items that has no purchase account, for example consulting hours.
Hi There, I have a client who has an amount in their 'Foreign Currency Gains and Losses' account in the P&L and I have no idea why!
Hi there,Every month I assign my staff salaries to:and my salary to:However i've come to look at both of these account today and they're showing up as £0.
Hi all,I've recently taken on the finance role for a company and have discovered that the wages payable account has had a steadily increasing balance for the last 12 months.
Hi There, I'm trying to complete the payroll settings but can't get past the setup in Organisation Setup, Wages Payable account selection.
Hi,My account defaulted and I wasn't getting notification emails.
##### CLUSTER 52 #####
we are not paying the full amount, just any recurring transactions like subscriptions plus an amount off the initial balance).
Instead of having two contacts we would like just the one on our system.
If someone has a solution I'd love to hear it but it's looking more and more like I'm just going to have to go to Intuit to get real-life solutions to things (and that's sad).
Looks like something went wrongDon’t worry though – it's likely to just be temporary.
Error code: 500I have deleted the cache, cookies and even tried a different browser just like the help page suggested.
I feel like I just have a small typo that is preventing me from getting the correct formula.
It might sounds a little confusing, I just would like to make everything clean and perfect.
Who decided it should only be once a month - the transactions are happening daily just like any other?
We would like to keep our tracking records up to date so we know where our assets are when this happens however, Because of locked periods we are unable just to change the tracking of a fixed asset with out unlocking the period for ALL USERS!
What I mean is we just Prepare documents like BAS and Tax return and send it for signature after sending to clients it will be look after automatically !
I would like it to be just one click.
Just like you have a "remove and redo" button.
Just like the google/ apple calender.
We have just discovered that the fines we were deducting from our employee weren't be paid like we thought.
I would like to see the integration of a smart bills feature similar to what MYOB has just introduced to their AccountRight product.
It would be best if it worked just like cells in Excel.
Just like the BAS.
Dates - I've seen people put in the date, and then start typing the reference number in the due date field, which just turns that into an obscure date like 3015. .
It'd be great to have some reports available on iOS devices, even if its just basic ones like P&L.
This means we can't keep track of stock balance or adjust it (just like in QuickBooks).
just simply a tab for 'Expense Claims'Delegation of Authority - We have probably 5 people who sign off expenses for the other 25 and I would like to see the ability to assign people to certain authorisers.
As our list gets bigger I would really like to only see the shorter version and not have to go over pages and pages of names just to see the current employees.
It starts with the mobile app, and then moves to the browser and at 50 seconds says "just like the mobile app fill in the expense".
Except from what I can see, it's not just like the mobile app.
Looks like something went wrongDon’t worry though – it's likely to just be temporary.
I thought cash coding remembered your reconciliations just like the reconciliation tab?
The ability to select all the unreconciled items on the front screen (just like the remove and redo option) would make the process much more efficient.
But surely the P&L needs to include this just like it does staff salaries?
I would just like to have everything in one place.
Do I just let this keep accruing in the negative as it's not like we're going to be putting hours back in there?
Can I not just approve them all on one screen like previously?
The help system is basically useless and just states unhelpful things like 'Fill in the fields'!
Looks like something went wrongDon’t worry though – it's likely to just be temporary.
I just have one question will you be adding the feature like quotient where the client can accept the quote so you have a record of it?
##### CLUSTER 53 #####
The reason for this as we are a fairly new business and having to maintain cashflow.
I'm trying to reconcile a credit received (as a capital injection/loan to be repaid) from our new business partner.
Hello,My husband and I have new business this year, set up as an LLC partnership.
Hired some AV equipment, as I was a new customer they debited a $500 deposit from my business credit card.
I am a sole trader, brand new business, not paying wages etc.
com/blog-tax-and-business/new-form-1099-k-filing-requirement-for-merchant-card-and-third-party-network-paymentsThis link is about federal agencies, but Q-32 I think still applies and explains it: https://www.
Situation is this:Incorporated a new business, whereby doing so, there was a requirement for $50,000 paid up capital.
HelloI am a new business and not registered for VAT (UK)I manufacture my products and they are all VAT zero ratedI have been recording the VAT paid on items such as fuel, Amazon purchases etc as 'Tax Rate 20% on expenses option).
I have a small business and I am adding a new source of revenue.
The parts work is a new line of business.
So I understand the accounting equation; but I am a new business owner transitioning into the accounting field.
New business here.
I have set up a new company in partnership and we together have put some amount in the business (50% each partner).
My business is new and has no credit facilities at this stage.
Quite recently (within the last month) I have started a new business.
I have a new client who is a start up company and their general business is an Corporate Event Company but as they will be taking delegates overseas as part of incentive programmes they will also be operating a travel agency .
I have some concerns with the new format of the Business Activity Statements.
It would be useful to new startup business owners to easily see some profit, loss, revenue / turnover / y1, y2, y3, with some this week, this month, orders in the pipe might be a nice touch.
We are in the Real Estate Business and are always adding new entities.
The staff are transferring to the new business as is their entitlements.
from a small new business
Hello,We had a sale of business in Feb of this year and a legal requirement in Victoria states that the new owners must take on all staff entitlements including long service leave.
I have started a new business with a partner.
I am starting a new business in the UK and i want to sell both retail online and wholesale in person.
We will be deleting 3 of our business units and adding 3 new ones.
We plan to map everything to the new business units.
I have recently purchased a new business.
I am involved in online marketing, building websites etc, and one of the things about that business is that it's always evolving and there's always new information or software.
##### CLUSTER 54 #####
He was coding each of the line items to codes in the chart of accounts like 'Subscriptions' and including tax amounts.
When I click on these accounts, I would like to see only those items that are still open, i. e. that have not zeroed out yet.
None of the standard accounts seem like a good match.
I'd like to see a trial balance that can easily be pasted to accounts production software which accomodates the entire detail required regarding fixed assets in UK statutory financial statements.
They are 'off the books' but I would like to tidy up the accounts.
I would like my accounts to reflect that these payments are not income, but repayment.
An idea for implementation would be that the contact default rate doesn't apply automatically, but there would be an option for items and accounts to choose from that's something like "rate based on client default".
I would like to see the ability to tick a box, to allow accounts to display as either Assets or Liabilities depending on whether they are in debit or credit.
QBO have a good feature like this in their accounts package.
I would like only Users with Adviser access upwards to have the ability to make changes to the Chart of Accounts.
Reason we like to receipt in payments (and allocate to Undeposited funds) when received is so that our Accounts Receivables are always reflecting accurate figures.
I would like to see the completness of my accounts and records.
I would like to see the PO functionality fully integrated with "Bills", aka purchases/accounts payable and the ability to monitor unfulfilled or unspent amounts.
but I'd like customer invoicing queries to go to accounts@.
For example, we've got regular income from a contract and every month I'd like to assign money to different accounts such as training or equipment purchases.
I would like to suggest a button that you can press to automatically move all the accounts back to alphabetical order, rather than having to manually move them into order yourself.
I like to copy/paste into it, and if all accounts, including zero balance ones, are included, there is no manual manipulation needed after pasting into my template.
However, I would like to sort the accounts within that group and the program won't let me.
I would like to put the accounts in a custom order by salaries, then benefits, then payroll taxes.
I would like to order specific accounts with their code rather than alphabetically.
Allowing you to profit from your accounts receivables (AR) much like a credit card.
##### CLUSTER 55 #####
REWARDS :) Ok so im using a personal credit card to pay for for business transactions.
Hello everyone - I have a business that's required to pay an excise tax on items that we manufacture ($10 in our case - it's technically a 10% tax but with a max cap of $10, which for us will always be maxed out).
In my business clients pay for entry to a dog agility event.
I often purchase supplies from a handful of vendors, that sell on credit and mail me a monthly statement that I pay using a business check.
The owner of the business that we distribute for sold us a certain amount of stock and gave us a 3 year loan to pay for this with interest.
Hello All,In the state of Washington (USA) I am required to pay a tax on my revenue called the Business & Occupation (B&O) Tax.
If I do it as introduced funds etc then does the business not have to pay me back?
So I am submitting expense claims and will slowly pay myself back as the business builds revenue.
This doesn’t seem quite right as I thought I could offset all my business travel expenses against my profits to reduce the amount of tax I have to pay, regardless of whether I charge my clients for my travel expenses?
Our business often issues credit notes, mainly because we ask our clients to pay a deposit on the container we deliver the product in.
For my own pay, I received a $10000 bonus for 12/13 (as part owner of the business) which needs to go on my group certificate.
comNo monthly fees for the business, pay as you go fees (short of $2 per DD transaction) and perfect for collecting recurring payments for services.
In our business we pay a weekly amount into their Redundancy fund and a weekly amount for CIP insurance.
In AU Payroll, Under Settings > General Settings > Payroll Settings > Pay Items > LeaveThe default Normal Entitlement for both Annual and Personal/Carer's Leave is based on a forty hour week, though I think in many instances here in Australia the business will work a 38 hour week.
I can work around the problem by adjusting the number of hours after doing a pay run, but this is clearly undesirable and error prone (especially as wage costs are a large part of our business and getting these wrong is costly)
Because business is using the loan money to pay for operation expenses, etc.
##### CLUSTER 56 #####
Can i just code them as normal to the specific expense accounts/columns or do they have to go into some sort of journal first then get allocated ?
Just a bit lost as to where to go next, I don't want to continue entering data if the opening balances on accounts are incorrect!
I have just taken on a client who set up their own chart of accounts.
I have just tested the app as I was going to have our employees start submitting their expenses - however when I submit an expense it brings up ALL of my GL accounts to be selected from for coding.
Is it just a case of making the VAT rates and assigning them as defaults to the right accounts?
I'm just doing my year end and I've noticed that my balance sheet has a positive value for "Accounts Payable" under current liabilities.
Not just accounting firms and accounts departments"Really don't understand how each roll out has features not requested, most useless or with minimal voting.
would be great to see the reconciliation status of all accounts on one screen, or even just all those that are out of balance.
This includes:- Team Leader- Operations Manager- Accounts TeamI'm suggesting and voting for multiple people to approve timesheets submitted, rather than just one.
Is it just the demo accounts or is it me!
This may lead you to think these accounts have no balances when in fact  they do just no transactions for the period being reported on.
I just don't get it, even those using any third party accounting software would have the same problem trying to balance paypal accounts.
Not just the chart of accounts but everything.
Is this just a filter for other COGS accounts that does not work on direct labour?
##### CLUSTER 57 #####
We issue weekly invoices to repeat clients with an option to pay by stripe.
How can this $100 be used in the future to pay future invoices?
It covers a week's invoices and the credit notes, less 1% which they take for being so good as to pay in 30 rather than 60 days.
Some of my clients prefer to pay the invoices by credit card, which is fine.
I pay multiple invoices weekly to our supplier and they send us separate credit notes each day for the returns that always show as a negative.
Some of the larger companies are notorious slow payers, sometimes getting many months in arrears and when they pay invoices do so out of chronological order.
Currently we are creating invoices for the orders and booking them to an internal user, but of course this money is never actually paid, because we would pay it to ourselves.
We then approve/reject their claim and pay their invoices.
I email all my customers their invoices along with the URL "View and pay your bill online: https://in.
We have a rigorous verification process that goes through a few people before we can pay invoices.
I have a few clients who are using automatic payments to pay off invoices by small instalments.
Ability to edit PAY NOW text in custom PDF invoices and ability to replace it with an image.
It's great that the dashboard shows a visual indication of Bills to Pay and Invoices owed to us however, as this is a self scaling visualisation it would be much better if a scaled, graduated Y axis was displayed also.
Our clients are allowed 30 days from the 'date we send out our invoices' to pay.
Every client I have has both annual invoices (e. g. insurance and council tax) where they then pay it off over 10 or 12 monthly instalments.
Then as we pay for invoices the money is deposited into the specific cash exchange.
Most invoices have a date and then a "please pay within 14 days" etc note.
My question is say I have 10 invoices to pay 3 for one creditor, 2 for another creditor, 4 for another creditor and 1 for the final creditor.
PO's from customers, send invoices, pay bills.
Enable the 'pay online' feature for draft invoices.
To correct this I'm having to send VAT only invoices to some of my clients (who have all agreed to pay them thankfully).
I want the details to automatically appear on my Invoices so people can pay me by direct transfer.
Company invoices by IBANThe majority of clients pay using the first 2 methods.
Does anyone know how I remove the ability to pay by credit card from my invoices?
So is the Paypal "pay now" on invoices a "checkout experience" or no?
I've gotten complaints from several customers that the invoices we sent out are missing the green "Pay Now" button.
##### CLUSTER 58 #####
Stripe takes up to 13 days to transfer funds which means that when a clients pay via stripe upon receipt of their invoice, their position in Xero and therefore their statements are not going to be correct for up to 13 days.
In these instances we tend to pay the proforma, await the invoice before processing into Xero.
I assumed I could invoice customers through Xero, they'd pay through Square, and everything would be accounted for.
if I create a Xero invoice and pay it, my profit will be double counted.
I'm wondering if I can have a "pay now" button on the website that generates a Xero invoice.
Now, when I pay the print invoice to my print supplier, do I allocate that as an expense in Xero?
I want to reissue the customer an invoice and pay the balance against inventory so I have a record of the sale of each product in Xero.
Sure, Ezidebit now integrates with Xero so customers can pay a single invoice by clicking a link.
Also why can't you enable overpayments on batch deposits - do Xero not understand that if you have multiple pay clients that their payments will not always exactly match the invoice (we so wish that they did).
##### CLUSTER 59 #####
Or do I need to recognise it as a liability at the start because I have to pay it back if they settle a loan.
and also the charge you pay to companies house when you update your recordsI've found the corporation tax one but guessing it's not that, and that I need to create a code for disallowable expenses but not sure where the put themcan anyone help as I can't find anything in the filesthanks
now i need to pay my drivers, i charge my drivers 8% commission fo all the work, how i can record this?
I've found we have and old bill we need to pay.
Do I need to pay myself PAYE now?
I need to enter a inflow of cash into 881 (owner funds introduced) and a subsequent cash outflow to pay salaries.
We need to pay someone back $5000 for a loan, the company has the money there.
Now that I'm earning revenue, I need to pay myself back.
I need to know from scratch how to do a pay slip please.
Now I need to pay back part of the loan and interest.
My understanding of this setup is that I don't need to pay any PAYE or National Insurance on payments to myself.
(I will need to pay tax on div payments to myself later, of course.
When I click "bills I need to pay" or "payments", I see a nice pretty graph that doesn't have any function so it's a bit of wasted real estate.
Key points for fully integrated accounting with payroll:1) Need more / flexible functionality with Global payroll:- Global payroll is designed for businesses who pay by the hour, and not necessarily fixed paid staff.
In the "Bills you need to pay" bar graph, when the ratio between the smallest and largest bills is too great, it becomes very difficult to notice the small one.
This could then show on the bills input screen and also on the aged creditors list so I know which bills I need to pay and which will be taken automatically by direct debit etc.
We need the ability to manually change their pay template from the automated percentage to a dollar value for the KSE, KSR and ESCT to be based on the base salary only.
We regularly need to provide reprints of payslips for employees over a given periodThe ability to print payslips for an individual for pay runs that fall within a selected period.
The amount of contributions made during the pay period (or the amount of contributions that need to be made)12.
When entering a payrun, the screen for entering an individuals pay is too spread out and you need to scroll to save and move on.
One of our employees went on Maternity Leave and we needed to replace her for 18 weeks, however we need to keep our Maternity Leave employee on the system to pay her the government payments, including PAYG.
Currently, I need every bit of money I get to pay my bills including rent, household bills, petrol, food, etc.
I'm thinking I might need an unscheduled pay run in the pre conversion period to zero it all out?
So, we need to pay this bill again.
I need to post a pay run.
I pay lease rent to the landlord and certain times, need to make some payments on behalf of landlord, which I deduct from the Lease Rent and pays the NET AMOUNT.
Also there doesn't seem to be a way of deleting superfluous pay items that I no longer need?
However, I do not want to do this as all wages are tracked to different categories for the purpose of recording wage expense in different capacities - therefore I need to input their hours into their timesheet and then pay accordingly the different wage bracket.
Now that I have returned, I need to revert the pay runs back to being a draft in order to create the associated timesheets.
Do I need to setup my own Pay Item with similar attributes but a Leave Category of Paid Leave to correctly calculate this income in Payruns?
We need to back pay our employees for previous financial years.
Normally it's very straightforward, so I'm a little concerned I need to pay closer attention to different state holidays.
I also need to pay them their uniform allowance once per week.
Help, I need to pay them today!
I need to break down the wages expense into the various pay items (recruitment, teaching, finance etc), and have these as separate entries in the P&L - preferably in different locations around the statement.
I have a client that will need to pay staff in multiple currencies.
Has anyone else had this happen and what do you need to do to correct it and stop it happening for future pay runs?
We totally understand you need to process adjustments to historical pay runs.
We need to tailor payroll to each state so we can offer a brilliant payroll experience allowing our customers to process payroll and file and pay their payroll taxes easily without fear.
I have raised this as a support issue but really need to process my pay run by tomorrow lunchtime at the latest.
And as there is still an option to run run weekly pay runs and post them as a zero balance, do we still need to do this or can we ignore?
I fall outside of IR35 and therefore don't need to pay employer NIC.
Do I need to revert my pay run and re-run it?
I pay an employee &#163;18K pa for work done, XEROs payroll seems to need to convert this to hours to work, when of course a salary does not really reference hours done.
I need to correct his last years holiday pay so that his annual leave that was transferred over is correct.
I have processed a pay run before putting in a leave request, so need to delete the draft so I can put a leave request in first.
Every pay run now completes itself with figures, and we need to go through and change each (already completed entry) into the correct hours.
I have an employee that owes the company some money so I need to make 8 deductions of $50 from his pay each week.
We need to pay April 15 salary on 05/05/15.
Pay only for what you need.
All the features you need to pay your wages.
From the proceeds we will need to deduct between 5-10% commission for our service and the pay the remaining funds to the host.
I have numerous questions relating to auto enrolment and need them answering today so I can process the pay run for our employees.
ARRRGH I need to pay my staff and its not working!
It shows the remaining balance as a Bill You Need To Pay on the dashboard which is frustrating.
And was quite surprised (annoyed) that they do not show in the Dashboard Graph "Bill you need to pay" !
sgI want to ask, is it possible to pay more for a more personalised support service - having someone to call when there's a need?
##### CLUSTER 60 #####
I'd like for you to fix the date formatting as per time zone.
Also we would like to ad several other data from infusionsoft wich we did not sync the first time.
I'd like to know the best way to allocate expenses across different time periods.
I might be interested in upgrading to a paid version some time later but for now, I'd like to check out how everything works.
Its been a known issue for a long time now, and I would like to know if any progress has been made in having it resolved.
Alternatively, is it possible to put more pressure on the banks so that things like this can be corrected over time?
I'd like a way to prevent a job averaging out hours across the whole scheduled time.
I know we can group them, but I would like my practice at the Top instead of scrolling all the time.
The "paperless office" is supposed to save time, but I am finding that things like this are taking 3-4 times as long as it used to with our old accounting system.
I would like to see the ability for subcontractor time to be entered on a task-by-task basis for detail billing to the client.
If it could be changed to be more like the payrun process it would save a great deal of time.
We would really like the ability to reprint or resend payslips from multiple payruns and/or by a date range, rather than having to select the individual payrun each time.
The back office function of the Staff Roster should have variable fields that is linked directly to each staff's profile (hourly rate, max work hours, over-time rates, including extra costs like super & workers comp exp, etc. )
In our case these items are commonly purchased and I would like to set up an "Item" for them so I don't have to keep typing them in each time I reconcile one of these bills, but I am reluctant to set them up as an Inventory Item.
Let's say we have 25 developersLoaded costs could vary for each let's say $120 to $300 per hourThe managers define a project and let's say they budget $50,000 for a project (e. g. Project 31)We'd like the team to enter their time and associate it with a budget item number (100, 120, 200) etc.
We have moved one person and are hoping to move a few more from casual to full time and would like to give them those entitlements.
we would like to have available leave balances in advance for forward planing staff leave so they know if they will have accrued enough time.
I would like a timesheet module where an employee enters their time against different projects or clients.
This happens a lot and I would like to save this time.
To be honest, it feels like the support member is not taking the time to read or understand my problem, and I am being brushed off with a quick, off-the-rack response.
There is a huge difference between a company employing 10 people and a company like ours with ONE employee and ONE trainee and a number of very short-time casuals.
##### CLUSTER 61 #####
Hey Guys,I just need some clarification about how best to arrange my Paypal Credit payments within Xero.
Do I NEED to transfer all my past paid bills from years past over to Xero, or can I just have a spreadsheet of them saved for review?
I am just starting with Xero, looks good if anything more than what I need but everything is there.
And for the Xero community: I really just need a customer database to keep my USPS mailing list up to date (we do a lot of postcard mailings).
Sometimes you only need to split 2 things and with banklink you would just code the remainder to whatever code, with xero I have to get a calculator out to work how much is leftover.
But couple of weeks later, I changed my mind and decided I need it and signed up for a free trial just to play around with Xero and familiar my way.
Please note, I don't need support to reach out to me, I'm just reporting this as a bug in case Xero wishes to take action on it.
Have just discovered they have not been paid through Xero and need to create a payslips dating back that far.
Can anyone recommend one of Xero partners that have discounts for nonprofit and for an organisation that need just a quite simple membership database.
##### CLUSTER 62 #####
Currently we have a manual process for checking delivery notes against invoices before paying and it is very time consuming.
However: the invoices aren't paid at the time they arrive.
I'm on cash basis accounting and I want to clear and track certain unpaid invoices (never to be paid) as bad debts, I know it doesn't have tax advantages but I want to the historical totals over time.
I really don't have the time or the mental energy to break it down to the individual invoices.
QB allows you to assign a Customer:Job to every item in a Bill and then in Invoices you click 'Time/Costs.
Hello, I have over 300 repeating invoices monthly and Im having a hard time matching the placeholders.
For some time I have been getting emailed invoices back without being delivered.
You currently have this feature available for Invoices and Bills and I think it's time Quotes should be there too.
So this means you either have to wait for a month with 31 days to set up the repeating and manually enter invoices until this time or enter the repeating for the last day on a non 31 day month and go back to change to the 31st for the next month with 31 days.
With over 40/50 invoices each day, this is time consuming.
Can we make it also work for non-repeating invoices as this would save me an enormous amount of time.
When you've got several dozen invoices to approve / check, it would save a lot of time.
Our invoices are imported from there with the "WC" prefix and since our paypal transactions have the same prefix in there, it would be an automatic, perfect match instead of having us to "OK" this every time.
Across 100's of invoices a week this would save users hours of time totalled up.
When doing large invoices it can take some time to ensure the tracking categories are set.
When you have hundreds of invoices this takes a lot of time, but most importantly is open to errors.
{set a html email with wildcard entries}This would be a fantastic feature that would save me a lot of time and ensure invoices are promptly followed up as I cannot always get around to it.
Time consuming when I have to do 100 invoices in 1 hit.
A project management tool that lets you organize work, collaborate with your team, vendors and clients, track time on tasks, and issue invoices.
Track your time automatically and create timesheets and invoices effortlessly.
It has created incorrect invoices and costs me time in deleting the lines if I don't get to the 'undo' link before it disappears.
##### CLUSTER 63 #####
Hi all,I would like to record all outbound payments within Xero.
Hi, I spoke to a guy at Xero support about this but I feel like he didn't really grasp the problem.
Hi, I am struggling using MYOB and would like to move to XERO.
Hi Guys,I would like to start using Xero, but have few questions and couldn't find the answer.
Hi,Our annual leave year starts on 1st April and I'd like to know how to set this date so Xero keeps all holiday balances up to date.
Hi Xero,I'd like to make some of the Payroll Reports "Favourite".
Hi ThereI very much like the Fixed Asset feature in Xero.
Hi, I would like to seek some clarification on how would Xero update our withholding rate for Payroll.
Hi, I'm a fairly novice user of Xero and would like some assistance in correcting the Annual Leave accrued in Payroll.
Hi folks, apologies for what feels like a dumb question, but Xero doesn't display any details of how this number if being calculated.
Hi,I have a client that would like to upload bills on to their mobile, code the transaction and automatically enter it into Xero without having to re-code the transaction.
Hi All,Apologies if this question has already been posted however we have a client who has 6 companies in Xero and would like to run a consolidated profit and loss from all companies.
Hi,I have a client that we may be moving to Xero but they are needing to track their job costs and also would like a basic CRM system also.
Hi There,We are only trialing xero at present but like what it does.
Hi, Emailed Xero Support to get in touch asap as we would like to change the authorizer to process super payments.
##### CLUSTER 64 #####
I just contact the banker to hedge currency Yen and deduct from our US$ account.
It is just sitting in account transaction page as Unreconciled.
Or do I just credit the Loan account?
I have just created a Loss on Disposal of fixed assets expense account to write off some of our old fixed assets.
Eventually, when I close and empty the prepaid account, I suppose it would just be recorded as a refund from the garage to myself equaling the initial deposit/purchase?
I cant reconcile that account because that transaction is just sitting there.
Am I right to assume I just code the refund to the same account (140 - inventory) as it was originally coded to?
Or should I just code the payments to and from the account as funds introduced and owners draw?
At one point when people were paying me I was just depositing it in to my own account.
Or am I just being "afraid" of creating this own account by myself ?
Personal expenses from company account - Is this just considered salary/wages?
Is there a way that I can just see everything in the "suspense" account so I can go through one by one and make sure they are all correctly allocated so it doesn't throw out our profit and loss?
Or do I just setup 1 rule to the same account and that's all?
Just account is so simple can't tell every transactions.
I just want to maintain the rental property related transactions in this account.
Normally in online account, I just delete the transactions other than rental property transaction.
Often this is just one user on the account.
this way the most recent cost will come up when entering purchases, not just the cost we initially entered when started our account.
Which is the right account type for it or should I just make one for that
In the mobile app the user can assign expenses just as I'd expect any expense app to work, by assigning them to a category ("meals")  also to the account it was paid from, i. e. a company credit card or by the employee etc.
We have tried:importing small filesImporting just 'Account Number' column & 'Contact Name' columnsTried various usersFollowed the help guides to the letter.
My accountant says to just put the income to shareholder’s cash deposit (501 account) and the expenses in drawings (504 code).
3) just ignore the pre-July transactions and somehow manually reset the account balances at 30th June.
Otherwise I will just reissue the overdue account, I guess.
I can enter just the balance sheet figures (fixed assets, cash at hand, receivables (debtors), payables (creditors), retained profits (profit and loss account) and equity) and make it balance, no problem.
Should I discontinue reconciling the deposits square makes into our account and just delete those lines?
In my old accounting system, when I reconciled my credit card account, I coded all gasoline purchases to a fictitious vendor called Gasoline just to make things simple.
Since this money is being taken out of retained earnings in theory, would I just leave the money in the "Owners Draw" account since it will balance with the retained earnings?
In short we literally just want every account, customer, transaction, etc.
Reconciling the monthly returns was a breeze as they just balanced to the liability account,  Job done.
If we create the batch, then export that information, changes aren't as straight forward as just deleting the disbursement and going back to the clearing account to create the batch.
##### CLUSTER 65 #####
** I can't be add Yen bank account in Xero due to no REAL Yen currency account open in the bank.
The only way to load these in Xero is to 'Add Bank Account', which slots it into the Bank section of the Balance Sheet.
So we've created another PAYPAL2 bank account using the "Add bank account" option and selecting Paypal.
How to add bank account without choosing pre-selected bank account?
So far I have gone into add-ons in Xero, added receipt bank and connected it to my receipt bank account.
##### CLUSTER 66 #####
I just filled all my data in, receipts, invoices .
Should I just recreate this years invoices for P/L purposes and leave it at that?
I've just tried to set the default due date for invoices but the form won't save.
The situation is that I paid a bunch of invoices without creating a bill for them and just generating a check directly using "Send Money".
And for invoices I just typed them up.
This is massivlky concerning as I dont have any other log of invoices im owed so more might be missing i just done know it, and if thats the case im not set to lose out on money unless I go through all my emails and re create the missing ones.
We had clients complain about that why can't they just see all of their previous invoices?
Eg just look at last months invoices due and overdue and not this month or the months to come.
For a number of people, sending reminders for just invoices will do the job.
Hello- It would be really helpful if my customers could see all historical invoices, not just the unpaid outstanding ones.
Just discovered the vast majority of our monthly repeating invoices - which were supposed to be sent automatically on 1st June, having been set up with status "Approve and Send" - are sitting in the "drafts" folder.
By "recurring billing" I don't just mean repeat invoices which then have to be manually reconciled and chased when they're late.
I just entered multiple batch deposits for open invoices.
However, if an amount is directly paying off a bill it doesn't appear on the Contact activity - it just lists the many invoices as 'paid'.
I am in a bit of a mess now as I don't want to go back and credit c. 200 invoices - as it won't let me just delete them.
Currently, we just bill that one-off item separately but this can create a lot of invoices for clients.
At this stage we don't have invoices to attach (they may be sitting with the appropriate person for sign off or just on route by post).
I was just sending sale invoices in excel prior to that.
In MYOB, I could just click Find Transaction, Card, type in the name of the contact, and within 5 seconds I have a FULL history of every single transaction relating to a specific contact, whether the transaction has originated from Invoices/Bill/Spend Money or Receive Money.
Seems to me that I should just delete all those (expletive deleted) draft invoices from Stitch.
I have just processed a batch of 90 invoices that were scanned on my computer and uploaded directly into RB.
##### CLUSTER 67 #####
Hi,I'm considering switching from QB Enterprise and trial out the xero to see how things go.
Hi All, Another newbie to Xero here and I'll apologise in advance if there's a similar question already asked!
Hi Guys,I want a solution of this issue, how I can record these deductions in Xero if my employee is coming late and I deduct a small portion of his salary on late arrivals and over take leaves on the leaves allowed.
Hi everyone,Our charity has elected to move from a glorified spreadsheet system to Xero.
Hi,How to raise a debit note in Xero.
Hi Xero Team,I found that GL Exceptions not agreed with GL Summary.
Hi,At the moment a CSV statement is manuually uploaded from Paypal into XERO.
Hi All, I've been using Xero for a couple of years now and consider myself pretty savvy on it.
Hi,I started with Xero in 2012 and being a newbie and noob, I entered bills in AFTER I had reconciled the transactions.
Hi AllNew to Xero here.
Hi guys, I'm searching for a bit of advice, and a RE specialized Xero consultant to get started.
Hi all, A client has started using Xero from 1st April 2016 so put in all balances and started his accounting.
Hi,We're looking at implementing Xero to handle the bookkeeping, stock control and job profitability.
Hi Xero users, Hopefully some else out there has come across this issue and found a solution!
Hi, I'm moving from another accounting platform to Xero.
Hi all,I'm interested to hear how people are using Xero to track CFD or Forex trading transactions?
Hi, I knew how to record this transaction in MYOB however, in Xero I am a little unsure of the process.
Hi, We're a small charity in the UK getting to grips with Xero which we started using last year.
Hi everyone,I've been using Xero and WFM since February this year and still getting my head around entering info.
Hi There,How do I transfer the subscription/billing from one 'organisation' to another within my Xero?
Hi,I'm a non financial person who started using Xero for bookkeeping of my consulting revenue and expenses.
Hi I have entered into Xero 8 different categories of fixed assets.
Hi,Looking to get Xero working properly for the upcoming financial year.
Hi, I'm an importer/wholesale distributor from GuatemalaI'm deciding if I should migrate from Wave Accounting to Xero.
Hi,Anyone knows how to enter non inventoried purchases in Xero.
Hi,I am currently implementing a system changeover to Xero.
Hi all,We have a seperate billing system to XERO with a lot of debtors.
Hi Everyone,Anyone experience loss of data on Xero?
Hi I have used Xero for 12 months and it's going great.
Hi,I am currently testing Xero .
Hi Xero,Please advise why we cannot drill down on the balances of the UNREALIZED GAIN and why this is UNREALIZED GAIN when the balances are already 0.
HI, I wanted to know when Xero will be integrating APPARELMAGIC, It shows it's coming soon on their website, but I wanted to double check before signing intthanks
Hi,Can anyone confirm if my clients lose the GST credit for Xero Fees if I am billing them through me as a partner and I am not registered for GST?
Hi, love Xero easy to understand, may help that I first learnt book keeping back in the early days of my career.
Hi allJust wondering if anyone is using Xero for look-through companies (LTCs)?
Hi,I’m looking at Xero for a NFP.
Hi All, I've been using Xero for a number of months now and its been good but I've hit a bit of a problem.
Hi Folks,I have an issue here regarding how Xero is calculating my VAT returns.
Hi,In Xero, if a customer has ordered some items let's say $500 and then he paid $250 as deposit towards those items.
HI Guys,have signed upto Xero over the last 30 days.
HiHas anyone successfully imported debtors from MYOB Retail Manager into Xero?
Hi We are UK based Xero Gold partners.
Hi We are UK based Xero Gold partners.
Hi thereI am wanting to enter my home office expenses into Xero.
Hi xero forum,im currently preparing the company's end of year statments.
Hi All,I'm in the process of migrating to Xero and have a question regarding Inventory items.
Hi,We are developing a website to take donations on behalf of charities and using the Xero API to post transactional information across.
Hi Guys,Another Xero newbie.
Hi,I have been migrating for another product to Xero and have brought across the last two financial years years of data.
Hi,We are a small charity based in Lincolnshire and using the Xero system.
Hi Xero Community.
Hi,  I have a credit card with debt used for start up costs and at the moment this is not recorded on Xero.
HI I have been using xero for 6 months and on the whole it is fantastic.
Hi,I am trying to upload a credit card statement into Xero, but it keeps coming up and money received and not money spent.
Hi, I am a newer to Xero.
Hi,We have been using Xero successfully for the last couple of years.
Hi everyone,I am newbie to Xero.
Hi all, I'm starting off with WorkFlow Max for a client with the intention of it ultimately interfacing into Xero.
Hi, does anyone have issues with adding a large number of items that they sell and then xero slowing down as it has issues with finding items when raising purchase orders?
Hi, I'm trialling Xero and come with very little accounting knowledge.
Hi,I have recently moved from MYOB across to Xero and I am a bookkeeper.
Hi guys,I am about to start using Xero, but not sure in something.
hi, anyone know how to reconcile a bill paid by cash in the XERO?
Hi I am an MYOB user now and thinking of switching over to Xero.
Hi Everyone,I have a question in regards to what you can do with the Xero reconciliation feature.
HI all,I have been using Xero for five months.
Hi,Xero is a live system, so why does the statement default date only goes up to the end of the last month?
Hi Xero,With all the features on the app, would it be a value-added feature if we could access customers statement and balances from the app.
Hi team,One of our clients uses CATProjects, which is a project management/job costing system that integrates with Xero.
Hi Xero Team, I would to see if you guys can looking into developing an achieve feature inside the tracking categories,Thank you,Brandon
Hi XeroAs a long term user of Quickbooks software prior to using Xero.
Hi,XERO has limited integration with HRM software.
Hi Xero support people.
Hi I have been with xero since Jan 2014.
Hi Xero Team!
Hi Team,The Xero Me app for Android and iOS is a simple and effective way for our employees to enter their timesheets and sync this information across to payroll for me to approve.
Hi All,Have you ever been working in Xero, and something changed unexpectedly before your very eyes?
HI,Would it be possible to receive read receipts one someone has viewed your emails sent from Xero.
HI we have moved accross to 100% Xero and that lack of attention being given to the workpapers is unacceptable, More Improvments and FastAlot of improvements are needed to make them more user friendly.
HI Xero,I have created all my inventory items to include a dynamic reference as the customers get invoiced monthly for their contracted period.
Hi Xero!
Hi there,We have moved from MYOB to Xero and find it brilliant.
Hi,It would be really helpful if Xero would alert when a customer's purchase order number has already been used when invoicing.
Hi I oversee all assets for Freight Assist Australia Pty Ltd. i am finding the fixed assets in xero very bland and not alot of features to allow reporting of assets for the company.
Hi I oversee all assets for Freight Assist Australia Pty Ltd. i am finding the fixed assets in xero very bland and not alot of features to allow reporting of assets for the company.
HI,It is excellent that you have added this field into xero.
Hi,I'm wondering if Xero has any intentions to provide a feature for Malaysian users on the GST.
Hi thereCan I lodge FBT return via XERO?
Hi Xero,I'd be excited if you developed an amnesia tool.
Hi All,Don't you agree that it would be GREAT if Xero had the ability to allow inputting of 13th period adjusting entries.
Hi Xero-ites.
Hi xero,Would love the ability to override per line item the gst calculated rather than have to figure how much the gst inclusive cost is and then subtract that from the total to the amount with no gst included at all.
HI there,I cannot believe the online filing of VAT direct to HMRC still hasn't been added to Xero, nor can I see it on any roadmap.
Hi Xero TeamThis should be an easy one to implement (hopefully)!
Hi Team,I’ve been using Xero now for a while through the advice of our bookkeeper.
Hi I've been using Xero payroll for a year now and as always try to be a bit patient with requests for features, knowing fine well they will come eventually.
Hi,This is quite a simple one (hopefully I haven't missed it in Xero).
Hi Xero,Here's a very small styling request for the UX/UI team.
Hi all,I'm wanting to move a client's payroll over to Xero and cannot for the life of me work out how to record the opening balance for EmployERS (not employees) pension contributions, so that they show up on the payslips.
Hi AllI'm looking at moving from MYOB to Xero.
Hi allI've been asked to evaluate the suitability of Xero for one of my customers.
Hi there, I am a Xero user with three organisations (companies) under one umbrella.
Hi, we started using Xero at the start of this year.
Hi Xero Community!
Hi All - I'm looking how to export certain information from xero.
Hi FolksI'm a recent convert to Xero from KF and liking it but there was one piece of functionality that I liked and wondering if there was anyway to replicate that.
Hi,We have the Xero App on our Apple phones and for some reason it is always out of date and very misleading.
Hi EveryoneI keep getting a spinning ball icon on the OK button when I try to save transactions in Xero.
Hi,I've had to import one of my credit cards into Xero using a .
Hi, I've recently come across to Xero from Myob.
Hi, only been using xero for a few days.
Hi AllHoping someone has an idea on how to manage the following scenario in Xero.
Hi everyoneWe have only been with Xero for a month, and finding my way thru the system.
Hi there,I have iZettle set up in Xero for cash and card payments.
Hi there,Has anyone ever been using Xero Inventory Tracking, and then moved to another external program when their needs changed?
Hi there,I'm still learning xero and accounting so bear with me!
Hi, I am trying to set up tracked inventory in Xero and I'm not sure if there might be an existing way to do this or a simple workaround.
Hi,Is anyone else having issue's with logging in to Xero with error message "an error occurred while processing your request Reference #30.
Hi,We have a team of about 8 people and I want to give them access to Xero to upload their expenses only.
Hi there, I am trying to find a way to create labels from xero.
Hi,We've recently registered for GST, and only started working on Xero after.
Hi - I run a small company (~5 employees) and am considering switching from our old QuickBooks software over to Xero.
Hi,I am, having an issue with subscribing the standard monthly package with Xero.
Hi there,We're using Xero for our clothing company and have multiple shipments per season that are usually delivered over the space of two months.
Hi All,We are switching over to Xero currently and have a question.
Hi there,I have some assets that were brought before we started using Xero.
Hi All,We have taken on a client who is now a little weary about Xero.
Hi there,I am migrating to Xero from a simple ledger system that can outputs all the debits and credits since record began.
Hi There,I have a quick question regarding sinking funds in xero - or how best to capture this info if at all.
Hi all, recently, the NAB switched their Xero feed service to one that is apparently more 'direct', but it has had nasty complications.
Hi there, I transferred to Xero on 1 January 2015.
Hi, Does anyone have experience in managing holiday lets in Xero.
Hi,This is a more general question about physical inventory management and not necessarily related to Xero (but I figure that this is probably a good place to ask as I can't be the only person selling physical products).
Hi EveryoneI am going to set up Xero file for one of the client in Ireland.
Hi does Xero has document control tracker for audit trail purposes?
Hi,I am a user of Xero.
Hi Guys,I am having a huge issue with paypal integration and xero.
Hi Everyone,We hear so often from Xero partners and customers on how much they'd love eWAY and WorkflowMax to work closer together.
Hi,Is there anyone using Xero in Brazil?
Hi there,   We have been asked by a major client to support Xero accounting here in Arizona, USA.
Hi,We are seeking any advice on the best way to import data from MYOB into a Xero general ledger.
Hi Xero,I have accidentally publushed my acitivity statement for 1 Janaury to 31 March.
Hi friends,I am using Xero accounting from 1 week.
Hi,Preparing first BAS from Xero.
Hi, as it is coming up to the EOFY - I am wanting to reconcile my long service leave balances in Xero, before the 30th of June.
Hi,I'm moving my file from MYOB to Xero and having a issue with payroll YTD figures on payslips.
Hi,Xero me has stopped working for timesheets.
Hi,I have only been using Xero for a couple of months.
Hi Xero forum,I have a question regarding superannuation payments, and would really appreciate some help.
Hi Xero community,Hoping someone out there can help us.
Hi All,We recently used a converting service to move from Myob to Xero, when viewing some of our staff it has their annual leave listed as "---" when I view their profile.
Hi,First end of financial year for me with Xero.
Hi Xero Community.
Hi,I have colleagues who are applying for Compassionate or Carers leave which they are entitled to but I can't seem to find such leave in Xero.
Hi there,I have inherited the payroll setup in Xero from my predecessor.
Hi,I am wondering how Xero will calculate annual leave for directors.
Hi everyone, in the company I work, we want to set Xero up to do something specific.
Hi allI'm converting a MYOB client to Xero and have hit a hiccough with paying out Annual Leave.
Hi,I received a mail from The Xero Team regarding the subject.
Hi Xero CommunityI am hoping that someone can shed some light on the following issue I am having.
Hi,we switched to Xero starting March 1, and during the transition phase we continued to process our Payroll through our old system.
Hi,I am setting up Xero Payroll.
HI,Does anyone know how to apply a  super salary sacrifice in Xero?
Hi,Has anyone using paycycle (about to be integrated into Xero) managed or thought about how to allocate wages as a cost of sale (direct cost)?
Hi thereI'm trying to allocate federal and state tax payments to the existing liabilities in Xero and cannot do this.
Hi -I am currently evaluating Xero.
Hi all,After using Xero Payroll for several months for employee wages, I decided to make the jump to using for reimbursements/travel claims as well.
Hi is anyone else having an issue with Xero's lack of a response?
Hi allCan someone tell me if this is a Xero issue?
Hi, i started using Xero a few months ago.
Hi,I am having a very annoying issue with Xero Payroll.
Hi,Since we started using Xero Payroll in the UK we're seeing salaries being reconciled twice.
Hi,I client of mine is moving to Xero for accounting including payroll for a number of staff who are paid weekly.
Hi Hayley,I have got a question on transfer from Ace Payroll to Xero.
Hi,We started using the Xero Payroll functionality during the mid year.
Hi Xero,Slightly confused with the Payroll System you have in place.
Hi all, I am currently trying to set up Payroll to start using Xero.
Hi We are considering integrating our bespoke CRM and stock control system that we are developing with Xero.
Hi EveryoneWe want to set up a Xero test environment to test a CRM Integration tool with out affecting the live company data.
Hi AllI've been ploughing my way through the accounting transactions created in Xero once Vend closes a Register each day.
HI We are starting a bouldering Gym (climbing Gym ) we currently run xero but are looking for any one who has had experience with http://gymrealmmanager.
Hi Xero community.
Hi all - we're trying to find out if there are any Xero-connected apps that would allow us (a rice mill and packing plant) to manage our inventory from stock coming into the storage warehouse, through the milling and processing processes, into the packing plant, and then out to the customer.
Hi guys,We've been doing some work with the PowerBI connector for Xero and in theory, it's great.
Hi allI am using WooCommerce and looking for a plugin to intergrate into Xero.
Hi everyone,I am having trouble with connecting Xero to Pipedrive using Zapier.
Hi,bought this xero plugin and have followed instruction to set it up.
Hi there,I have iZettle set up in Xero for cash and card payments.
Hi,I'm intending to activate the Xero - Shopify integration.
Hi guys, I'm a wedding entertainer and currently using two systems; my booking management tool and Xero.
Hi there,I recently migrated to Xero from Quickbooks Desktop.
Hi I am currently looking for a cloud based software that integrates with Xero.
Hi,My client is looking to set up on Xero and they also require an order system.
Hi all,I'm trying to improve our integration between Xero and Checkfront.
Hi thereCan anyone recommend someone who can export all data from Xero for a small company?
Hi Xero Community.
Hi all,Quick background: my team and I are searching for a hospitality SaaS solution that integrates with Xero.
Hi there I am looking to connect Tableau to Xero to create dashboards and reports does anyone know if this is possibleThank you in advancePeter
Hi there,Our firm has got a client who is with Xero.
Hi,I am needing an inventory system that integrates with Xero.
Hi Does anyone have experience of using Xero with Ebay trading.
HI Everyone, Everytime I sent email for requests to Xero Support.
Hi there Xero team,I enjoy using your software and have done for close to two years now.
Hi Team, I have checked from Xero’s web-site.
Hi Xero,Sadly I'm considering moving back to QuickBooks online, despite having good reasons to move AWAY from QB 6 months ago or so.
Hi,Is Xero down as I keep getting a server error messageReference #3.
Hi GuysI was one of the people banging on about having Remittance Advice for Xero, i'd come from quickbooks and it seemed such a normal requirement, anyway you have now implemented it so its only fair that I now say thank you.
##### CLUSTER 68 #####
Sounds like the right approach, I simply do not see how, in Xero, to go about doing this.
The standard Xero cash flow reports include things like Accruals and Prepayments as if they are cash movements and they're not.
I would like xero to automatically record an auto expense whenever I bill a client for mileage.
I have recently started doing some book keeping and although I have recently completed my Level 3 in accountancy, I have never used a system like xero before.
My company has been using Xero for about 6 months now, and I really like most of it.
I've read a few different solutions on the Xero Community, most of which center around the idea in this like.
Curious whether anyone else has faced this dilemma and would like to hear how other people have their xero set up.
I would like to track the amount paid the biller in xero.
Our CSV doesn't contain the email addresses, but it seems like Xero should recognize these people by their names.
I would like to track the items with xero.
I'd like to work out how best to do that in Xero.
To reduce errors, we would like Xero to get this information directly from the contractor.
We are envision something like: 1. contractor is given a unique link 2. contractor clicks on link that takes them to Xero.
I would like to know how other people are accounting for Stripe fees inside Xero.
I was hoping that there'd be something like the Expenses module to deal with credit cards, but it seems not (most users only have the least access to Xero allowable).
I’d like to eliminate them, while keeping my ‘Balance in Xero’ balanced.
I guess this situation makes the fx difference a bit hard to calculate so maybe why Xero doesn't like it.
I thought I'd got Xero pretty much sussed now I'm feeling like a total idiot.
Xero seems like it can do everything and I like that it shows money coming in and out and reconciliation is easy.
I would like to set up a directors loan in Xero for £10k.
I've been reading through Xero's help pages etc, and it looks like all of my employee data has been wiped forever, meaning that I can't help him.
The homepage URL of Xero read something like:https://www.
However, I have several receipts which were missed off my last VAT return (not done through Xero) and so I would like to include them in my next VAT return.
It doesn't feel like Xero is designed for a small charity like mine at all.
5 mutli store (US, France, and Australia) and I would like to know how is xero managed those different stores?
I am looking to contact a legal practice in the UK who I can contact as we wish to start using Xero and would like some advice on a couple of specific legal matters.
It seems like 2 of Xero's (very many) gaps in service are now combining to make it almost unworkable for me.
After all, xero is aimed at small businesses like mine that deal in a lot of cash.
If you are a Xero Bookkeeper or Accountant I'd like to invite you to a facebook forum which you can join at https://www.
A number of accountancy firms have praised XERO highly, but I'd like to speak to actual users,(as opposed to users in accountancy firms, if there's anyone out there willing to take a phone call.
I really like what I see with Xero.
I am currently using MYOB, but have heard great things about Xero, and would like to trial it.
I called ANZ in Hong Kong and they acted like they had never herd of Xero.
As it stands the name you enter defaults into the Contact, not the Contact Name, so as we move forward with connecting to a setup like OneSaaS, we are bound to have horrible duplication between our CRM (Batchbook), Shopify and Xero.
I would like Xero and Barclaycard to put in place a direct feed for Barclaycard transactions.
Would be great to allow users to have a default set of reports/ settings they'd like to see for ALL clients Xero files, rather than having to select them in each file they open.
Also, there are many, many threads that have comments from Xero Staff like, "" and "", which are now utterly redundant.
I like Xero and it seems to be a good product.
With GST returns due two monthly and BAS returns due quarterly, i would like a prompt in  Xero before these fall due
Request PO number through Xero; ie like the existing statement facility, or2.
I would like to move my accounting to XERO.
I would like to request that Xero makes downloading to Apple Numbers available as well.
I don't feel it's appropriate to ask a client for their direct Amazon login information, but I feel like working with Amazon to create some sort of Xero feed (similar to paypal, maybe? )
I would like to see improvements to the contacts database in Xero.
For example, one could do something like:These e-mails would have a short summary what happened with a link into Xero for review.
We would like to send quotes direct from Xero but would like them to be imbedded into our word document that has the photos of the products and a full description of the services we are offering.
I would like to request the development of the API feature to allow Quotes in Xero to automate with other programmes.
The Manual Journal "Xero Template" looks nothing like a JournalWhy not format the File to actually look like a Journal that we would normally Fill out.
When accessing Xero, I'd like to see all 7 entities that I have files for on the drop-down list.
Xero should make a virtual stock entry tab where hardcore manufacturers like me who purchase 100’s of different different raw material and sell only 2 or 3 finished goods can accurately enter their stock every month.
This feature will also give Xero a competitive edge over their main competitors like Freshbooks, Quickbooks etc.
My client would like their staff to enter their timesheets into Workflowmax and have that information automatically populate payroll in Xero
Is Xero planning on bringing in this feature like sage one
I would like to set up separate passwords for each of my clients files within xero.
I'd like to suggest to enable Xero to display Balance Sheets to exact dates (similar to the Profit & Loss) rather than end of month.
It would like it if Xero.
I like Xero because you make a good system and give good service.
Hello,I'm in the very early testing stages and really like xero so far.
Her reasoning is that - Her employee's fill out manual timesheets and or 'bundy' cards, and they would like to keep a soft copy of them against the Xero Timesheet - If her employee's are sick and require a doctors certificate, she would like to keep an electronic copy against the specific PayrunThanksTamsin
Therefore, I would like Xero to link through the Purchase Order and mark the Quote as Invoiced.
Why does Xero send emails like this?
For example, notifications when Bills are pending approval:But I would also like to see email notifications & Slack integration to be notified of approvals in Xero via Slack.
Xero currently requires you to figure out the discount and apply it, because of the way it rounds up numbers sometimes give away more money than you would like.
With the release of basic Xero Inventory this month, we would like to see the creation of a feature for multiple warehouses and stock movements between these locations.
Auto-suggestion is one of the many things I like about Xero, but it could be improved.
Also Id like to hear from other Irish XERO users
i would like to make a few suggestions to be added in xero.
i would like to make a few suggestions to be added in xero.
This will help people like me who manage multiple organisations within Xero to distinguish the organisation easily.
I'd like to import prepayments into Xero from a CSV file, rather than create each manually.
I would like Xero to automate prepayment and accrual postings.
At Xerocon in SF the question was asked, which tax programs would we like to see Xero export to and there was a large request for TR's Ultra Tax.
Xero prices are now LIKE A like a STOPPED CLOCK, which is ONLY RIGHT TWICE A DAY.
OK, lets see how many users would like XERO to seriously consider SA next after NZ, OZ, UK and USA -  can we host a mini XEROCON in Bloemfontein - right in the middle for all of us.
I'd really like to see Xero introduce the option of two factor authentication as Google and Dropbox have done.
I would like to enter my closing stock along with stock purchases and Xero should calculate COGS.
I'd like to see a slight change to the way leave is handled in the Australian version of Xero through payroll.
I would like a feature similar to this in Xero if possible.
Sage 50 Payroll showed a single figure for monthly salary and I'd like Xero to do the same.
I have a client who pays there staff a net amount each month but Xero doesn't have a feature to do this and gross it back up like sage payroll did.
I would like Xero to automatically recognize when a timesheet has overtime in it based on a set work week.
With more people integrating their payroll with the likes of Deputy & Tanda using codes for award interpretation, I'd like to see Xero have the ability to have a display name for an earnings type so that the code used doesn't appear on employees payslips e. g. "4 Saturday First 2 Hours (SAT)(0~2)()()"
As  Xero is all about not using our old paper files I would like to see a tab added in the employee  that would allow me to document when I change the employee's employment status i. e. named Employment History and could be used for  documenting the following items:.
We would like to roll xero across our client base, but most of them have more than 150 casual employees, some have over 1500.
I think I like Xero better.
And where does Xero post changes to user roles like this?
I often recieve receipts and remittances via email and would like to upload them to xero as quickly as I can Reconcile.
This can either be something like a simple viewing setting but this is the one thing that Sage did well and I think that Xero could benefit from it.
I would like to suggest that Xero go down the same path.
I've tried renaming it(like xero help center recommends) with no joy.
I am already struggling with Xero because it is pretty limited, but small things like this are really irritating me.
Xero doesn't seem to like me entering a negative value line item.
I'm testing Xero and I like what I see.
should I start again (id rather not as I've reconciled things in details, even giving descriptions on many itemsalso, my Xero Balanced don't seem to match up eitherI hope someone can help me as I really don't want to be now going back to excel as this looks like great software.
It's lack of information like this that is irritating me with using Xero.
This has concerned me so I would like to check all other purchases inputted into xero.
With Xero Im not sure where I log my day to day expenses, like fuel, postage, stationary etc.
I would love to know why Xero set it up like this in the first place.
I am trialling Xero today and although I like the file attachment to a bill, it seems you can only preview jpg's and not PDF's.
We would like to know what does Xero recognize as accounting period.
Hello, We are a small/medium company based in Spain and we are looking into softwares like Xero.
I would like to convert a client from MYOB Essentials to Xero.
Or if possible, allow us to integrate with other financial softwares like Musoni System with Xero.
Right off the bat, this is the main thing I don't like about Xero.
This article is all about my favorite reports that I like in Xero and why I think they’re great.
I would really like to get clarity on the finances and thought it would be a good idea to implement Xero, as its been such a success with us in the UK.
Ideally I would like to move all of my clients to Xero and have a single platform but the current entry method for checks is too slow to do so.
The Physical  Address field doesn't seem to be used for anything in Xero (although I know the API uses it for 3rd party apps like CRM).
This requirement expands when you consider things like purchase orders, so I can't see how Xero can avoid re-working the whole area of contacts and addresses.
I contact Square about every quarter and beg them to either make an API accessible so that services like Xero can tap into it for at a minimum read-only access to the data.
Can anyone recommend a good xero accountant who has a good experience of dealing with dental practices and its tax planning issues like incorporation?
I would like to create a custom layout in XERO that is identical to my previous XPA template.
If you'd like Xero to record and produce checks for you, it would be good to hear what sort of check stock you’d like us to support next or whether the US voucher format currently supported would do the trick.
Round trip data between Xero and Excel using online tools like Microsoft Office 365 - check out this Check register & printing – first up for our US customers to get those bills paid quicker & give you better management of your .
I have a client who has a few casual employees and we used to assign a job codes in MYOB but it looks like this is not available in Xero :(
We would like to have everything setup in Xero and were thinking of setting ourselves a salary of $1.
I was wondering if Xero Payroll can calculate workcover expense like MYOB payroll.
I'd like any suggestions / insight that fellow Xero community could offer me before taking the leap.
We have 76 employees in a company and would like to look at Xero for the Employee Self Service and Payroll.
At this point I'd be willing to UNDO all of my recent actions and revert to what my system looked like yesterday (with only 3 employees on Xero).
Obviously NEST/XERO doesn't like this so it's rejected the submission.
Very disappointed as i wanted to like Xero.
After processing April payrolls I have changed my mind about using xero payroll and would like to reverse what I have done and continue on the way I was doing it before.
I understand that I am not being forced into using Xero payroll but as a fan of the product, of course I would like to!
If other smaller companies can figure it out, why can't such an awesome, massive, international company like Xero figure it out?
Slice and dice your Xero data the way you like.
Improve your rostering like Xero has improved your accounting.
Quick access to all your Xero Contacts (Customers and Suppliers) to send documents like letters, brochures, etc using Alive Docs Mail Merge.
If you are one of them, I would like to know your experience (good, bad ) and if the integration with Xero is seamless.
Other ERPs listed in Xero's marketplace are focused on certain industry (like Manu Online and MRPEasy).
It looks like its missing the reference number i initially let Xero get from Pipedrive.
In everything that we bring over to Xero, the merchant is turning into 'Expensify' so it looks like all of our expenses come from expensify, whereas in reality they come from all different locations (coffee shops, stores, restaurants, airlines etc).
Like Fritz, I had hoped Xero's integration with Square would make our lives easier.
But it turns out like a lot of Xero - it was designed with a single workflow in mind and there is no flexibility.
Ideally we would like a product that flows through to Xero with no added input and has support avaiable during UK working hours.
We run a small maintenance company where work orders are received from clients - I am looking for something where I can enter the work orders and have the job scheduled like a run sheet for the technicians - in addition I would also like this to integrate with Xero for invoicing etc
And we would like to fetch data from  Xero for one of my clients.
I would like to be in touch with Xero users who have had recent experience processing credit card payments from their customers.
The client is keen to move to Xero but this Invoicing requirement seems like a stumbling block.
Client would like to move from MYOB to Xero.
They require:Job management Material monitoringthe ability for different users to enter purchase orders and monitor partial payments and maintain retention accountsI would like a solution like BuildLogic for Xero - do you have any suggestions?
So would Xero like me to submit what I believe to be an incorrect RTI so as not to get a penalty from HMRC?
I can not believe I left Quick Books Onlkine for a P. O. S. company like Xero.
I am so frustrated with Xero support I feel like screaming.
It's been 5 days we've waited to hear from Xero support after being told we would be contacted within 24 hours, so doesn't feel like a great start.
You now have  to spend on the features or improvements that you’d like to see in Xero.
If anyone is making the switch to Xero, having someone like her to hold your hand and keep you from going down rabbit trails is invaluable.
##### CLUSTER 69 #####
Hi EveryoneThere are two scenarios I would like to discuss.
Hi, our not for profit organisation has several fixed assets that have very low books values (less than $50) that we would like to fully depreciate in our current financial year to 31 March 2017.
Hi there,I am on the trial version as I´d like to try few features before purchase.
Hi I am in the process of finalising the above-mentioned and If anyone would like my work, I am  willing to give the *.
Hi, I sell hampers and would like some help!
Hi I would like to know the best way to record a personal expense as one amount at the end of the financial year.
Hi GuysI would like to know if we have done so far it's correct.
Hi there, I like limited the amount clicks and mouse movements I have to do.
Hi, I would like the ability to do a transfer via the mobile app.
Hi guys,We would love Docusign to be available for Special Purpose Financial Reports like it is for Tax.
Hi Guys,I would like to give the 'draft only' role to my team members.
Hi,To give our clients peace of mind about being paperless for bookkeeping, we would like to limit which users can delete documents from Files.
Hi,I would like to allow someone to create and approve and send quotes.
HI I would like to request that after using the find and recode option, there is an option to return to the same search.
Hi there, From looking through other posts on here it seems like quite a few people are in the same boat as I am but I was hoping that someone had maybe found a workaround solution.
Hi allI am currently a little disjointed in my processes and would like to streamline a little.
Hi AllHas anyone experience with Spanner planner they would like to share?
##### CLUSTER 70 #####
My total banking included payment for an invoice plus cash from canteen sales and raffles.
Having migrated from another cloud accounting package on the 1st of December I was surprised and disappointed to find that it is not possible for my company to process a card-holder not present card payment by clicking a button next to a sales invoice.
The problem I have is that I have to manually apply a payment to each sales invoice.
On the list of sales awaiting payment, it would be great if there was some sort of an indication that there have been manual notes entered instead of having to open up the invoice to check.
If I create a refund transaction (spend money) to a member/contact for example for $50USD for example, and a sales invoice with a payment transaction for another member/contact for $100USD both transactions are not available to me using the Find and Match feature.
##### CLUSTER 71 #####
What I would like to be able to do is log my miles into Xero on a monthly basis, so I have a clearer idea of any tax liability, to ensure I set aside funds.
Hello,I would like to be able to advertise  services to other Xero users.
I'd like to be able to automate my recipts being submitted into Xero and the API would be the best method.
i would like to print fiscal receipts with a fiscal printer but using xero would you be able to assist
When I go through my Xero inbox, I'd like to be able to delete a file when I am viewing it.
I would like to be able to put the reference as a placeholder in the subject field of an email within xero.
I would like to have an unlimited number of votes, as I want to be able to put my vote to every and all features I think Xero needs.
I would like to be able to do the same in Xero.
We would like to be able to copy an organisation template within Xero as we have a franchise of companies that we wish to create.
I would like to be able to see a full and complete audit history of the transactions, created, approved and edited in Xero payroll.
##### CLUSTER 72 #####
Hi all,I have a VAT registered limited company, through which we purchased some business supplies from outside the EU.
Hi,I run a professional services business where gross profit is a key measure for our management team.
Hi,We borrowed in our personal names to purchase our small business and inject some working capital into it.
Hi, I a, not a small business owner and not an accountant by trade.
Hi there,I have brought some equipment for my business over the previous financial year.
Hi,I run a small business providing Acupuncture to clients in the UK.
Hi,We are a small business with one product   Each large customer has their own nominal code ( to facilitate budget and forecast reports).
hi folks I run a business that has split payments on a per client basis.
Hi, I have made some purchases from my personal credit card for the business.
Hi All,I am into a business of ready-made garments.
Hi,I am running a small business which is into manufacturing on a very minute scale.
Hi, Can anyone help me with this scenario:We are a study abroad business.
Hi everyoneOur business provides consultancy services and none of our consultants are employees.
Hi, My client runs a business in the clothing industry supplying clothing to schools, clubs and businesses.
Hi All,My client operates a seasonal tour business.
Hi,We have an online retail business and a warehouse that fulfills the orders received.
Hi guys,I've made a few business trips by private car (meetings, etc).
Hi,My business is to do with Medical Practice.
Hi there — I am starting a business that is pretty straightforward wholesale distribution.
Hi,I run a small online software business (on cash-basis accounting, located in AU).
Hi,We are a holiday let business.
Hi,I have sold my business (consists of stock - $8,500, and goodwill $16,500).
Hi all,My partner is self-employed and began her business in late 2010.
hi everyone : )our client has a nursery & landscaping business.
Hi All,We run a vending machine business.
Hi There AllWe are a small business in NZ and have payables that require to have WHT deducted and sent to IRD monthly with the PAYE return.
Hi thereI have a NZ-based business which is retailing on Amazon.
Hi, I run a business in which I receive payments upfront.
Hi all,I have a business i work for were we stock to about 500-600 locations around NZ with a rough 20-30 customers ordering in daily.
Hi, we have a sole trader business.
Hi there,We are a small plumbing business.
Hi There,If you provide services from the UK to a business in another EC member state the place of supply is the member state of your customer and so the sale falls outside the scope of UK VAT.
Hi,I started in the business nearly a year ago and our BAS has always been lodged by an external accountant.
Hi there,My husband and I are running a small business.
Hi there,We are running a small business and have been for over 12 months.
Hi, I'm a freelance consultant in the non profit grant writing business.
Hi, We run a bread business.
Hi In our business we have a number of Standard users and 2 Advisors.
Hi,I have my business set up with 2 departments, and every customer contact set up as one of the two departments in my contact settings.
Hi All,We run a psychotherapy business that accepts medical insurance.
Hi All, I made a mistake and purchased something on my business card which was a personal expense.
Hi Everyone,I have a client who has two companies with IRS EIN numbers, however she operates the companies under one business.
Hi there,I have four employees who are drivers for our business.
Hi everyone,Due to a change in my business structure I had to cancel my workcover insurance and was paid a partial refund.
Hi, We are a small business in the Idaho, U. S. .
Hi there I have set up a tracker for a part of my business that is starting to take off.
Hi,Our business employs casual staff who only work a few hours per week at the moment.
Hi,I have completed the online application form for a small business I work for to start using auto super.
Hi Everyone,We are an event based business that only had sub contractors (Checked out the ATO rules and no, they are not employees! )
HI,We are a busy Hospitality Business in NT, Australia.
Hi there, we're a small NZ kitchen design/manufacture/installation business.
Hi, our business operates on a fee sharing model.
Hi We are a small to medium sized business that has an online Ebay store.
Hi, I make an iPhone app called Taxnote which concentrates on registering business expenses very fast.
Hi I have a client who owns a food product distribution business.
Hi All,If you had this business setup:-1 Main building that stocks goods-Multiple restaurants which both get supplied by our own main stock(above) and supplied ybt third part suppliers.
Hi there,We are a rapidly expanding business that sells lighting products.
##### CLUSTER 73 #####
We need an accurate account of the revenue that comes in minus Stripe fees.
Since I paid the bonus I (obviously) need to find a way to have the liability account debited so it now reflects $0.
I guess I need to debit the 820 VAT account by &#163;1870.
Need to setup an account because it gets muddy with refunds and fees, etc.
I'm at a loss as I know we purchased something, and I know what we will have today, but I have over 80 account Transactions between inventory purchases and Income deposits that i need to reconcile.
- Does this need a credit note or which Account type would it be processed against.
Also I'm a sole trader and made a loss last year so I need to account for this somewhere as i want to offset it against the profits i make this year for my self assessment tax return.
ive looked at our account today and there are suddenly 291 items that need to be reconciled.
I only paid $100, but I need it to reduce the tax liability account by $101.
According to the help page, I need to update each account's tax setting.
I need to reconcile these transactions, but to which account?
The one I need to delete is the liability account.
I also still have the other liability account that I need to adjust out.
We need to account for development finance which is taken in stages throughout the build.
We need to show the outstanding balance on the finance account as a current liability, interest is paid monthly on the balance, and the load is repaid on the sale of the property being built.
I need to know how to account for this.
I've been trying to setup our account for days now and really need it going right away.
The other transactions on that account do not need to be recorded.
I need to code them to standard rated 20% but don't want to account for the VAT - how do I do this?
Can I enter conversion balances by tracking category or do I need to go back and make adjustments to each account and how do I do this?
Some of the main issues floating in my mind are:1) Do I need to set up an account for each online cusomer?
If I've got it right in my head I'll be coding the stock purchases somewhere then I'll need to periodically make an adjustment to that account using closing stock cost figure to give me an accurate cogs and p&l.
Do I need the Capital In/Out account?
also put my account on hold while I need accounting data the most for IRD requests :( .
We created a credit card account, then spend money when we need to enter the GST, PYG, interest etc and transfer money when the payments were done.
When I enter it into adjustments i need to code it to an adjustment account, what should I put it under?
However I have some private expenses on the credit card this month which I need to account for.
We need to reconcile this account back to our float amount each week.
This is very important for high volume lodgers that need to see the RPTRS reports to come through at this end, meaning that hours and hours and hours are saved from Trust account deposit identification.
We need it for a client who has to produce day book reports for a section of factored customers and these could be identified by the Contact Account Number and then sorted in Excel or reported on as a Group.
We need to have more flexibility for the base currency and be billed for all these multi-jurisdiction companies to our UK account in GBP.
There are only thirty or so transactions that need to be moved, so is it perhaps easier to change the source account for each of these transactions?
HiI need to export a TB with the account code & name in separate columns in Excel.
I have a need to display, underneath each Account, the amounts contributed to that total by the various Contacts.
However on a day to day basis clients have no need for these Chart Of Account Codes.
When I asked my account manager, he said that no-one else had asked for this reporting which I can't believe as it is so fundamental & it can't only be my clients who need it?
I need to move them to different account code.
Would I need to restart my account?
Good dayI have a 100% VAT adjustments that I need to account for.
I really need it in a consistent format with each account in a reliable row.
Does this mean I need to enter those expenses under my credit card account manually?
I need to make deposits into our Undeposited Funds account (transferred from QB Pro).
But, I need to account for the purchase of my ingredients, as well as cost for bottles, etc.
You need to have an asset type for each separate cost/accumulated depreciation account.
or do i need to go into my online banking account and physically transfer the wages to my employees myself ?
I guess I need to do a journal to transfer the PAYG collected into account 825, i. eDR 505 - Income Tax ExpenseCR 825 - PAYG Withholdings PayableI'm not using Payroll because it's probably overkill.
When I go into reconcile, I've got an expense I need to reconcile (their wage leaving my account).
We need an app that can account for goods received notes and goods despatched notes.
For example, if  entity A paid for an expense for entity B, we need to transfer the cost of that expense from A to B via the intercompany account.
I have been through the videos and need extra support to get this resolved, I have send several message to support and my account manager to help me get this resolved without a response.
##### CLUSTER 74 #####
Everything I've seen states to create 3 new accounts:Expense: Promotional Expense - GrouponCurrent Liability: Liability for Groupon CouponsCurrent Asset: Deferred Promotional Expenses - GrouponThe customer pays $35 to Groupon for 3 treatments (acupuncture clinic), Groupon pays my client $14.
I was thinking to create a new chart of accounts in both Revenue and Expenses and call it say Dummy.
Therefore, the new company's accounts start as of 1 October.
We have created new liability holding accounts for Checkfront.
I'm thinking of creating Direct Travel and Direct Accommodation as new accounts, recoding and using these in future.
How do I get these new accounts to show up?
I am tidying up a new client's file, and some of the accounts have been entered incorrectly.
I have several accounts in the U. S. and New Zealand.
I'm looking to create a mirror of my current accounts and run them parallel as I train these new book keepers.
HiI am new to setting up chart of accounts, after doing some reading.
E. g Accounts Receivable (x)  - where clicking (x) would automatically open the link in a new tab.
We have moved our Australian company to USA and had all new accounts and credit cards.
##### CLUSTER 75 #####
Hi AllI'm new to Xero and not an accountant.
Hi Everyone,I'm new to the discussion park of Xero.
Hi,I am new of Xero, and I am adding paypal to it.
Hi,I am new to Xero and accounting in general.
Hi There,I seem to be having trouble when I Edit or Create a new or Existing item in Xero inventory.
HI thereHas anyone filed their GST via the new link once GST return has been finalised in Xero?
Hi I am new to Xero but after reading 20 or so pages of comments around this subject I am still confused.
Hi, I am new user of Xero software.
Hi All,I am a new user of Xero and I am NOT an accountant.
hi guys,I'm fairly new in using xero.
Hi - I am an ex MYOB user, new to Xero so I am having to re-create (re-learn) my procedures.
Hi,I am new to Xero, can somebody help me and suggest me how would i book a new bill in Xero and on which date.
Hi,I'm new to Xero.
Hi AllI'm new to Xero.
Hi I'm new to xero and pretty new to accouting too.
Hi,I'm new to Xero and would be grateful for some advice.
Hi GuysThis may sound stupid, but I am new to Xero.
Hi,I have been using Xero for about 9 months i. e. the start of our new financial year.
Hi,I am new to Xero and new to accounting (Bad combo?
Hi,I am new to the UK, VAT and Xero.
Hi all, I'm a new Xero user.
Hi all, New to Xero and loving it so far.
Hi all,I'm new to Xero and all the specifics that go alongside it.
Hi, I am new to Xero.
Hi,I'm new to Xero.
Hi,I am new to Xero.
Hi EveryoneI'm new to Xero.
Hi, New to Xero, so my apologies if this has been asked.
Hi,New to Xero.
hi there,I am new to Xero and trying to get my head around the best practices.
Hi guys im new to xero so forgive me if a complete newbie question.
Hi all,I am fairly new to Xero.
Hi everyone,I am a brand new user to Xero so apologies if this question has already been discussed.
Hi Everyone,I'm new to Xero.
Hi there,I am new to Xero.
Hi all,I am relatively new to Xero (and accounting in general) but looking for some assistance with adding expenses to my file.
Hi Im new to Xero, Iv come from MYOB.
Hi communityI'm new to accounting and Xero.
Hi,I am new to xero and still trying it out on the trial.
Hi All, I'm fairly new to Xero and am hoping you would share the best practice on inventory item coding.
Hi all, I'm new to Xero (and accounting), and setting everything up.
Hi all, I'm pretty new to Xero but am learning fast.
Hi,I'm new to Xero and have a a couple of issues on Credit Cards.
Hi I am a new user to Xero it has been recommended by my friend to me.
Hi there, i am a new xero user and am having some teething problems.
Hi Since the 'new look' Xero.
Hi Xero,As I have noticed that new feature is included such as to assign expense to a customer.
Hi,We are new to Xero.
Hi,I am a new user of Xero, and am surely liking it.
Hi,Don't know if anyone else has asked for this but import function is really important feature of Xero for new clients.
Hi,I am new to XERO and to the organization.
Hi,I am relatively new to Xero.
Hi,New to XERO.
Hi, New to Xero and can't seem to find a way of amending the price of an item I have already input.
Hi Guys,New to Xero and was trying to set up inventory, and in error, did a stock adjustment prior to importing opening balances.
Hi everyone, Im new and a bit clueless with Xero.
Hi all,We are new to Xero.
Hi AllI'm  new in Xero, and can not find the way to assign cost incurred to a tracking category.
Hi I am very new to xero.
Hi,Im very new to Xero.
Hi all, new to Xero.
Hi,New to Xero but I couldn't find an obvious solution to my issue.
Hi I'm a new user and its all so new for me.
Hi, I am a new Xero user.
Hi,I'm really new to Xero and still finding my way around.
Hi am new to xero but i gather than unlike sage poas  overpayments or prepayments wont show in a customers ledger is that correct ?
hi community,I'm new to Xero (and very much new to accounting as well, oh the joys).
Hi - im new to xero, i went to do my recons and i see theirs no Particulars or code fields in the concon cash code list!
HI there, New to Xero self taught!
Hi,I am quite new to Xero.
Hi all, new Xero user here.
Hi forumI'm new with xero, and trying to finish March BAS form.
HI All New to XERO.
Hi,There is a new feature in Xero payroll which allows delete notes not only your own but also notes written by someone else.
Hi,I'm new to xero.
Hi,I am new to Xero and I am having trouble working out how RDO'S are deducted from weekly hours.
Hi We are a new Xero user.
Hi,Love the Xero program and happy to see the new notes tab on employees file ( have noticed though that the employee is unable to see this area).
Hi, we are new to Xero and had a quick look at existing posts and we couldn't really find the answer.
Hi everyone,I am new to Xero.
Hi guys,I'm new here in Xero, and my boss asked me to reduce the wage of the employee through journal.
Hi I'm new to payroll in Xero and am having a issue with leave taken.
Hi, I am new to Xero and could not find anything on these issues.
Hi, I'm new to Xero.
Hi I have set up a new payroll in Xero and in the work place pension tab, the pension scheme has defaulted to "other" I am having a problem in changing this to NEST so it will link to the pension scheme set up.
Hi I have added 6 new employees this month to Xero, and none of them have received their P45.
Hi,I am relatively new to Xero.
Hi I am new to this and was wondering in our old payroll it has leaving owing in days how do I xfer those over to xero in to hours owing
Hi there,I am a new user to Xero and love it apart from the following.
Hi,I work for a training and development company and we’re looking at the possibility of purchasing a new event management software and want one which would be compatible with Xero.
Hi, I am a new Xero user.
Hi, I'm new to Xero and I'm currently using the trial period to see if it's going to meet my needs.
Hi,I'm very new to Xero (currently transitioning a QB client).
Hi all,At , we are working on our new app to provide you  a seamless integration between Bigcommerce & Xero.
Hi Xero Community,I am quite new to the community.
Hi I am new to Xero.
HI guysI am new to Xero and still getting my head around everything in comparison to Reckon.
##### CLUSTER 76 #####
He has some old, unmatched bank transactions from a previous year - so irrelevant - and wants them to just go away.
I then tried to import our bank statement in CSV format just so I have something to work with until I can figure out why online banking won't connect.
I know that if I just code these expenses on the bank reconciliation page, they will move my Profit and Loss for FY 2015.
The bank statement just says "GC C1" for each one, which is nigh on useless.
I've though of just deleting these transactions from the bank statements, but was wondering if anyone has any other ideas.
i just imported 4 transactions that include 1 deposit for 6000 (equity) and 3 bank fees (expenses) for 70 dollars.
Ive just trialed myob essentails and it seems to be a lot of double handling, enter bill, allocate or match then recon bank statement.
So, is there a smarter way of giving this money than just doing a bank transfer?
Are these people accessing more than just 'intercepting and changing bank details' on emails?
My thoughts are just go my general bank reconciliation to get the figures of all cash receipts we received for the previous quarters.
After three days of trading I might go to the bank to deposit just the notes (we go through a lot of change so never deposit coins).
Or I am thinking of disabling the bank feed and just importing the statements each month manually.
Just added 10 term deposit codes with Bank and TD number on it.
e. g  just searched for all bank receipts for $15.
Having used quicken for many users for the preparation of my Quarterly BAS I just loved the way you could pull up your bank acct or credit and see rows of lines with date , description amount AND category (COA).
So Yodlee just added support for my bank which we were reconciling manually.
It is slowing down productivity having to open the desktop version just to get bank feeds updated in my mobile app.
She has been using it since Oct 15 and has just over 600 bank transactions.
I have a CSV download of all transactions from the bank, I am tempted to just delete all the transactions and start again ?
They were just reconciled along with other bank transactions.
when trying to reconcile multiple payments (just 2 in this case) which include an adjustment for bank fees.
Not just the bank downloads.
I seem to be experiencing two main problems:1) When doing bank reconciliations the right hand side of the reconciliation view, where the banking rules are applied just keeps on 'loading.
##### CLUSTER 77 #####
I need help recording payment fees deducted from income.
I need to set up a recurring payment for a client of £10 per month plus VAT, so £12If i set it up in PayPal, and the client pays the £12, PayPal will deduct 3.
We need to split this payment and file a portion of it in 'plant&machinery' and another portion in 'VAT'.
Would I need to unreconcile the transaction, apply the payment to the bill and then re-reconcile?
I need to record the payment and then return it to them, how would I go about doing this please?
I need to reduce the inventory but similarly record the "payment" and/or the original expense.
Now I need to make a payment to it, part principal part interest.
I have created and approved the payroll and paid the employees, now I need to record a payment to the tax man.
I may have mixed up a repayment of capital and and expenses payment and I need to recode.
In our case we have a number of departments with staff working on a range of projects, but all bills need to be approved by the department manager BEFORE being submitted to Finance for payment.
Currently I need to remove the payment in order to re-assign a billable expense.
When a payment comes in from a customer and you reconcile it, you would need to manually send a message to confirm receipt if you wish to.
We need this feature to allow to print a month in a row, and having in this query BOTH PAID AND AWAITING PAYMENT.
Also unsure of which amounts need to go on the ETP Payment Summary?
So I need to delete all payment transactions.
2) We need to show that the customer does not owe anything as the payment was taken by the agent.
Then I now need to reconcile this payment with all this individual expense claims.
Do I need to process the 2016 PAYG Payment Summaries before I do the first payrun of the 2017 financial year?
Do I need to reflect the payment on my employees payslip?
HiI need to lodge an amended payment summary with the ATO.
When I create an entry to match the super payment with, do I need to split it, so that I can record it for the two different super funds that are used?
Payments put through on workshop software create more work when reconciling as you need to delete the payment to reconcile it.
I need to place a print order and want to make sure the client's payment was successful.
##### CLUSTER 78 #####
We currently invoice on the last day of the month, however we pay our employees every fortnight.
I have entered a supplier invoice which our company will pay ($4387.
HiI sometimes have ongoing clients pay an invoice twice by mistake or overpay.
So they pay a monthly retainer and then every quarter, I issue an invoice for whatever I'm owed depending on what's happened in that quarter.
I pay local government rates on a building we own and then invoice tenants for their share as per the lease agreement.
I have many disbursements for clients that I pay on their behalf, and periodically invoice them to recoup the funds.
and i actually received the item on 25th sept 2015. according to xerothe day i created purchase invoice/BILLS (to pay 70% and 30% instalments on 2 sept 2015 and 25th sept), i received my inventory items.
Option 2 : Pay the invoice with Liabilities.
I received a VAT only invoice where I had to pay 100% of the amount to HMRC.
for example they will pay 95% of the invoice and hold 5% for the defects period which is usually 3 months.
The amounts are:1) the GST component of every invoice I receive2) the PAYG component of every pay run I make3) the Annual & Personal leave component of every pay run I make4) a percentage of each invoice paid to me as "profit" to accumulate to cover large purchases etc.
I have received an invoice for £500I want to pay it in shares rather than cash.
Because of this, we then pay the invoice amount as it is written at .
Once Client A pays, we pay a percentage of the invoice to SalesPerson A.
I sometimes convert to AUD on day of invoice and hope that they pay quickly and that there is no major currency fluctuation.
I take mine through Director Drawings (as I am) the other person is technically freelance and issues me with an invoice every month to which I pay her.
When setting up Users to approve expense claims, they have to be given "Approve & Pay" access under the "Invoice Only" access.
etc to say 'Pay online now (you will be taken to the online invoice)'
I often have to pay an invoice with various amounts due to the different methods of till payments - cash, Credit Card, Amex, Voucher etc.
This would then allow our customers 30 days to pay, and would mean not automatically adjusting every invoice that needs to be approved on the day.
At present there are User options on "Invoice Only" role limiting to "Draft Only" or "Approve & Pay".
When sending a client an invoice it would be nice if they had the option to edit the amount they were wanting to pay.
Unfortunately, the 'pay online' link cannot be added to the invoice until it has been approved.
We process and pay the "bills" on the customers behalf, and in turn we "invoice" (AR) those customers to be reimbursed for those "bills" plus any savings we have achieved for them since managing their services.
The training was split into to section users with invoice draft only setting and then with approve and pay.
This way, you could get an invoice, pay it, scan the QR code and chuck the bill in the bin.
I have a user that has invoice only with the ability to approve and pay.
My customers always pay me up front so I normally reconcile their invoice quite quickly.
I invoice the product before supplying as often the software is very expensive and if the customer does not pay I would go under.
Eg / They pay $5,000 and invoice 0001 is $2,000 so your balance available is $3,000.
In the case where I receive an invoice for 3 months of electricity, Jan, Feb, Mar totaling $300, I pay this all in one month (Mar).
Either starting at the Timesheet or Invoice to Client section, this could then fill the Pay run section, which would then generate the Payroll and Super amounts.
I am wanting to create an invoice for a client to get them to pay us for travel expenses we incurred on their behalf.
View and pay your bill online: cannot go online from this link to the invoice.
I sent my customer an invoice though, and there's no way for him to pay online, and I can't seem to find anything that's not turned on.
We have a situation where we both invoice and pay bills to the same company / person.
A contractor who I normally pay had an invoice owing to me (she pays a base rent when doesn't bring in any income).
I have invoiced a customer and he popped in to see us to pay part of the invoice by card.
Do I log an invoice then pay it or put it under the Bills section?
I want to pay a Euro supplier invoice within their terms and take advantage of the 2% early settlement discount.
I'm a tradie, often doing multiple short jobs in a day, and most clients pay cash (although a small number are property managers or absent owners that require an invoice to be emailed).
a small portion of our clients pay their invoice through automatic CC debit.
For example, I've received an invoice that we're due to pay in 12 instalments.
I have invoiced a customer and he popped in to see us to pay part of the invoice by card.
They pay immediately on the day and I enter this into Cliniko and the invoice is marked as Paid.
Due to the wrong numbers our customers accounting system can't proccess this invoice correctly -> they can't pay (it's a large corporation, asking them to adjust manually doesn't work and they don't care).
##### CLUSTER 79 #####
We need to be able to enter our annual budget for the whole fund and then pull our actual spending into this (for both tracking categories) and see how much is left to spend for each code and each category.
I need to be able to track the deductions by type as well.
I need to be able to specify the date / month range and show both total budget and actual expenditure for that period.
We need to be able to format the formula answers.
We need to be able to record Expense Claim items against Costs of Goods Sold not Expenses.
Also if Supplier delivers same order in 3 separate deliveries I need to be able to reuse the same PO - currently cannot do this.
But this is messy (sometimes files are too large, we need to be able to quickly navigate through different projects etc.
I need to be able to load opening accumulated depreciation to an asset purchased in the current income year.
For example if a customer has made a warranty claim with one user we need to be able to print this for our records.
We need to be able to export a detailed general ledger to Google Sheets, as opposed to Excel.
I need to be able to include loan repayments in the budget but cannot do this.
We need to be able to get a list of the assets for stocktakes and audit purposes.
Users need to be able to delete entered and saved receipts from the mobile app also.
I need to be able to see how my staff are progressing with training.
Two of them I usually need to click a button (in an overlay) to be able to login again.
It would be nice to be able to group fixed assets - e. g. properties with related assets that need o be depreciated.
It will need to be able to be emailed to the supplier straight away so the client receives their copy immediately too.
Currently I can  in  however my bookkeeper would need to review every item to be able to pick up that there is a note for them.
and be able to see at a glance where things are at, and which clients might need to be followed up.
We need to be able to change the branding theme to print different forms after payments have been received.
Month end works for 80% of the reports I run but i need to be able to run an AR mid month, midweek etc
I need to be able to run reports on numerous payroll items - e. g. .
We need to be able to enter our annual budget for the whole fund and then pull our actual spending into this (for both tracking categories) and see how much is left to spend for each code and each category.
If it does so, you will need to supply it before you will be able to start your feed" and that it never then connects.
I need to be able to   trace the transactions he entered.
For instance, I have lots of mobile banking transfers in my credit card statements and I need to be able to reconcile them quickly.
I'm a solopreneur, and it would be very helpful for me to be able to tell if, for example, I need to increase my travel budget in certain months compared to others.
Need to be able to calculate these amounts.
I need to view VAT returns going back 12 months, but only appear to be able to go back to January 2013.
It seemsfrom my research that I need to be using timesheets to be able to pull that information out.
I understand I need a BACS SUN to do this - and the Lloyds website talks positively about being able to do this for payroll, salaries etc.
I need to be able to attribute the costs of printing items to various expense categories (rent, electricity, labor, freight) and inventoried items both tracked (substrates) and untracked (paper, ink).
We also need to be able to provide job reports to back up the usage.
I need to be able to do stock movements between warehouses with reports that show codes, descriptions, quantities, wholesale cost per item and total wholesale value of the movement.
We need to be able to bring up any customer in our CRM when doing a receipt in Vend.
If ATO want to conduct an audit one day, we need to be able to provide them with printed evidence.
##### CLUSTER 80 #####
Is it possible to generate a report showing which account the bank transactions have been posted to?
In that report is a bank account that is fully reconciled to 30 April 2015, but it has an unreconciled item from, say, May 2015.
For instance, I may want to produce a report showing all the transactions in a particular bank account (AKA a "check register report") and to which income statement or balance sheet account they are coded.
HiWe find the GST Audit Report useful as a reporting tool when reconciling our bank account every month.
The Cash Summary is probably the easiest report to change as I assume that the reporting engine already reads the bank account transactions.
Even if you print a detailed transaction report, all you get is the transaction Name (which could be incorrect for that bank statement line) and the account allocation.
I had to go into the Bank Account and search for payments to that supplier, and alter my Excel report and make appropriate entries there so it worked.
In a perfect world, I would hope that it would be possible to see the cumulative cash account as a report which would include cash takings paid into the bank.
##### CLUSTER 81 #####
By having a report that shows where each transaction has been coded we would be able to tell at a glance which ones are incorrect.
I seem to only be able to run this for one month (eg April 2013), or for a period (eg 3 mths) but not for separate months on the one report.
Essentially I want to show Jan budget, actual, variance, % variance AND Feb budget, actual, variance, % variance, on the same report, to be able to see Jan, feb, etc across the top.
Our company works on many projects and we are wanting to be able to track income and expenses (wages, direct costs, travel etc) for each project and then report on those in order to see the profit that we are making on individual projects.
I want to be able to setup a daily profit and loss report.
I may be missing something but I can't see if/how I am able to view a report of actual expenditure vs budget for a specific budget (rather than the Overall budget).
It would be great to either be able to filter by dates (e. g. put in 1st of the month to end of month) and show all the super that would show up if you ran those same dates in the payroll employee report.
Additional filter to be able to report and export contacts added after a specified date
It would be helpful to be able to see a report that shows all expenses and which items have been marked as billable and which items have not been marked as billable.
It would be great to be able to run a report to show all or selected history sessions at a glance, rather than having to drill into each individual session to see what has been recoded.
It would be a handy feature to be able to have a report that could show which of those branches are purchasing what products
It would be great however to be able to easily report on FX gains/losses by customer.
It would be nice to be able to export existing report layouts in order to transfer it from one client to another.
It would be very helpful be able to see the uploaded file from the main screen when you run this report.
Be able to drill down or filter the Journal report.
When selecting budget reports it would be very helpful to be able to select a weekly, bi-weekly, or 2x monthly budget report.
Would love to be able to run a report where we can group the tracking categories!
To be able to produce a Purchase Order report to show was Costs will be coming in within the next month.
I would love to be able to see a single report that shows month by month the budgeted P&L vs. the actual P&L.
Ideally the report should be able to select by period etcListClient, Amount, Line item detail.
It would be useful to be able to run a report that displays the current timesheet and leave authorisers.
As a user I want to be able to see on my balance sheet my tax liabilities separate from my ordinary supplier liabilities, so that I know which is which without having to run a report.
I have printed the return and the audit report (using up a couple of tress in the process due to not being able to remove details).
Whilst doing a transaction report, to be able to have more than one code per search would be great.
It would be really helpful if the cash summary report was able to be populated using a custom date range.
Setting up the category if fine however, what report should I then run if I want to be able to print a list (export in excel) of all transactions (bills in this case) where a job has been allocated.
I reply on this report to then be able to enter transactions into my data base.
Basically I want to be able to run a simple report showing what we have owing without needing to run multiple reports to show it.
It would be useful to be able to print a payroll report with all employees down one side and all their payroll activity along the top.
Such that I will be able to pull out a report.
##### CLUSTER 82 #####
We would then only need to access that particular transaction and not every transaction on the bank/credit card account.
HiI need to reconcile several term deposits with our bank as these have been deducted from our account.
@ the bank fee that they also included, has not been charged into any credit card, so I'll need also to create an extra line to allocate it into the main account.
To summarise: Bank Transfer to another account was coded as a transaction durring the past BAS year, I need to re-create the transfer to the bank account while removing the funds from the incorrect coded account.
My Questions are:1- Bank Account Number : We need to put the Sort Code & Bank Account Number without any Dashes.
For example I need to post entries to a bank account to correct bank balance (Asset account) but Xero won't allow me to.
They need to go into my Merchant Services bank account instead (not integrated).
This would allow me to quickly and reliably track my bank account balance and statements without the need to manually import and edit statements via export files.
My Accountant, Managing Director and 5 management staff don't all need to be told about every single bank account change!
Often need to check if paying to correct bank account.
At present I need to export the unreconciled transactions of  each bank account and send as separate spread sheets Priyan Rajapaksa
I'm switching my bank account to The Co-operative Bank UK and I see there's a feed available for (Personal Banking) which I need.
I need the other bank account number to be detected.
##### CLUSTER 83 #####
All the Purchase Invoices have been paid correctly from the bank account.
I charge them invoices in USD which they then wire to my AU bank account (where it is converted to AUD).
We send invoices in NZ$ and have a NZ bank account.
it is also annoying, when you are allocating invoices and the amount is the difference of the credit note, you have to come all the way out of the bank, allocate the credit, go back into the bank account and find all the invoices you want to rec.
We also have a Western Union bank account for accepting and paying foreign currency invoices and bills.
In MYOB this was a simple Spend Money to the Undeposited Funds account and then reconciled through the Prepare Bank Deposit and depositing the total of the invoices and the purchases in to the bank account.
##### CLUSTER 84 #####
Hello,When I started my business 11 months ago, I had to purchase an insurance policy that cost me $1,500 at that time.
Business started 3rd week of July last year and I'm told the amount of cash on hand is somewhere between 5k and 10k at any given time.
I run a professional services business with no physical inventory (we deal with subcontractors, paid for time worked, rather than employees with potential downtime), and I am looking for the most accurate way to calculate our Cash Conversion Cycle (CCC).
Our business uses both inventory and time billing.
he thinks his toy assembling business makes the property messy and due to his long working hours he cant find any time to keep his property cleaned and needs a professional cleaning company to do the hard part for him.
Or having to manually enter the business name in each time.
We prefer to spend time adding value to the client business, not finding and recoding line transactions for them.
Not sure if this will be implemented but think it would be a great idea for all business that are using the time sheets to have so if ever there is a reported accident the questions have been asked and answered.
Web-based time clock software redesigned for your modern business.
Because every business deserves to be paid on time, in the simplest way possible.
However, it is incredibly time consuming to get a response, impossible to speak to someone by phone, and became evident that although we went through several induction sessions to discuss the workings of our business Veeqo had not understood our requirements.
The business has 6 full-time employes on salary, some fortnightly and some monthly.
Frankly, it seems it would be better to spend my time looking for another provider before my business is actually launched.
I run a small practice and becoming a partner wouldn't fit my business model (at this point in time).
How does a bookkeeping business prove to their client that its been lodged, time stamp and receipt (eg.
I will definitely update this thread and find the time to write a letter with a few suggestions when im done setting up my business and dealing with launch of our company.
If they are not then we can make a wise business decision and move on rather than waiting on promises and vague time frames.
##### CLUSTER 85 #####
but when I login to my new account.
I was thinking of creating a new account on the B/S – Insurance Premium (Current Liability).
I know I could start a new account, reset up the feed, and let the old one wither on the vine until it no longer appears in reports but that is extremely messy.
Goodwill does not have a Taxable Amortisation Benefit in New Zealand, and is also not depreciable, so I can simply set it up as an account and skip the Fixed Asset register addition.
If we start a new Xero account, can we import Payroll, Supplier, Customer data and General Ledger codes?
I’ve created a new Fixed Asset account called Rental Equipment to allocate these purchases to.
I’ve created a new Fixed Asset account called Rental Accessories to allocate these purchases to.
I bought X created a spend money for X then returned it so i was credited back into the account and have a new transaction to reconcile.
This means I now have a new account number and it will now replace the old one and act as the tax savings instead.
Should we create a new liability account for the loan repayments?
I have read at this link, that it is better to create a new account under Assetshttp://tweakyourbiz.
Reconciled another company's books with a new Xero account today and realized that I didn't remember a transaction.
Would I create a new account with that name and if so would that be in the "Expenses" group?
I made a new Expense Account for write-offs and created a Credit Note for the amount I was writing off, and assigned it to this new account.
Is it going to be possible to go back through the earlier reconciled items and correct them to the new more 'specific' account I've created in my CAO?
Entered by new bill / Purchases - Income Tax 2016 allocated to Liabilities - Income Tax Payable Account 3.
I have a new XERO account and this money is used for running company operations etc.
Which liability account would I create my new security bond under - Liability, Current Liability or Non current liability?
Would I be better to start a new account and archive this one?
Should I record it under "Revenue" perhaps as 'Other Revenue' or shall I create a new account.
In the new reports Display fields, it would be useful to have the Contact Account codes as either a column field or in the drop down for the "Group By" setting.
)It would also be interesting if there's a way to create a new Xero account and pull some information from one account over to it (for example if a person is creating a new entity and needs some history imported in.
If I make a new Rule up while reconciling and you take me to the Rules screen, give me a breadcrumb back to the account I was reconciling.
Hey, i have a xero account with my old organisation as an employee there and started somewhere new.
Hello :)I’m new to Xero, and while I was setting up my account, I created a dummy purchase and marked it as paid.
I am setting up a new banking account in Xero for our new Allegacy Federal Credit Union account.
We really don't want to have to close our feeds and start new ones when the account numbers didn't change.
I crated the new account 1000 - Izettle.
I have now gone into the Edit account details and put the new BSB.
Surely it wouldn't take much to set up a prompt in Xero when importing to give us the option of setting up a new account or not?
There are many new transactions that have posted to our Chase account.
I've had to create a new Xero account as our software integration was pushed back by a quarter.
Actually, while I am typing I wonder if I should set up a new inventory item for 'Event Discount' with this being a minus £ to account for the difference.
So I changed my email address in Xero and confirmed the new address that should be associated with the account by clicking on the link in the email that Xero sends out, the new address is now associated with the account.
Love the new Account Transactions reports.
I have setup our new Xero account to allow for payments through Stripe.
Please select a new account for superannuation expenses in your payslip.
I am new to Xero and are preparing out Account in readiness to start on July 1st.
Please select a new account for this deduction type in your payroll settings.
Please select a new account for this deduction type in your payroll settings.
Please select a new account for this benefit type in your payroll settings.
Please select a new account for this deduction type in your payroll settings.
Please select a new account for this deduction type in your payroll settings.
As such I have to account for this "benefit allowance" - how would I do this under the new payroll package in xero?
##### CLUSTER 86 #####
What is the best way to handle time delay between payment for inventory to China factory and actual receipt of inventory into saleable stock at warehouse in Auckland?
Each payment comes through, one at a time, minus the collection charge.
I paid a supplier a deposit payment for office rent invoiced at the time, which was held until they needed to release the deposit back to me.
but the second payment was - the money that was over paid the last time.
Then it's easy to target those that are late by their normal payment time.
This would save them having to have PayPoint open in a separate window each time they take a payment.
We have several suppliers issuing several bills and credits, and we never know how the credits will be applied until we receive a notice near the time of the payment.
Also, my state gives a discount for on time payment.
That way there would be plenty of time to make a salary payment, get the paperwork back from the Pension Regulator, complete the forms in an un-harried way, and all would be well in the world.
Your FREE personalised Payment Page has smart features that save time.
Payment records from Stripe have not been useful for us to satisfy this problem and is far too manual and time consuming for our clients with a large volume of customers.
##### CLUSTER 87 #####
Hi,I'm being audited for the first time using data from Xero.
Hi,we have a part-time employee who has a negative PAYE amount on our latest payrun, and I can't see how to get it into Xero without fudging the figures.
Hi All,Anyone had problems with your payroll opening balances (ie, YTD figures at time of converting to Xero) appearing in Payroll Reports & Instalment Activity Statements?
Hi everyone,This is my first time using Xero to submit BAS statement and I have done it.
Hi Xero,It would be great if there was an option to retain conditions on the Find & Recode function so you didn't have to re-enter these every single time you wish to do multiple Find & Recodes.
Hi Guys,Was wondering if someone could help shed some light - first time Xero user.
Hi,I'm using Xero for the first time for payroll.
##### CLUSTER 88 #####
the Bills and Invoices are changing the numbers in accounts it is sitting in.
I made a change to my conversion balances and it's saying my open invoices do not match the balance of my Accounts Receivable.
I do have an Accounts Receivable current asset setup in my chart of accounts and its balance is exactly the sum of all the open invoices.
Currently, I have been postdating the invoices, which has led to a negative accounts receivable.
Up until now, we've always put the invoices through our accounts in GBP.
Invoices would then go into accounts payable once they have been approved.
Ideally, this would be a branded area for your customers and suppliers to log into their accounts and view all their invoices to date.
Hello,I have input all conversion balance, my accounts receivable & payable balance as well, when I click save it takes me to next page where I have all my outstanding invoices and bills entered to match amount to accounts receivable and payable however, GBP accounts receivable balance shows 0 and its asking me to remove all my outstanding invoices & bills to come to 0 balance ?
Batch receipting of accounts receivable invoices would also be required.
A robust and flexible integration for pro and enterprise Salesforce accounts, importing opportunities as accounts receivable invoices, check out .
By doing this we would no longer have duplicate invoices going to the revenue accounts.
##### CLUSTER 89 #####
I'm a small business owner in the UK and I'm relatively new to Xero.
2) My understanding that as it’s a new business I should not have any conversion balances, but Xero accounting software still shown & keep asking me to enter conversion balances.
With the new Xero business directory will links be SEO friendly.
I am new to Xero and my company started business January 1, 2017.
Hello,I am new to Xero and I am currently trying to understand how best to make it work for my business.
HelloI'm new to Xero and run a small business with approx 300 customers.
I'm new to Xero, small business, and accounting.
Hello,I am pretty stoked about using Xero for my new business.
I am relatively new to Xero and running a small business.
Hey folks,My name is a Quin, and I'm a small business owner new to Xero.
In the first month of a new business, before Xero was properly set up, the Director paid himself twice via EFT (he paid himself net of PAYE and super) - this was in Feb.
Flash Convert migrates you from your existing accounting or legacy software to  Xero and lets you quickly integrate new apps into your business.
Xero was brilliant software and still is in a class of it's own even know the other big competition have reshaped their companies to enter the new 'everywhere' business rather than having us shackled to our desks.
##### CLUSTER 90 #####
For the first wee while I've been happily able to view and print tax inclusive invoices.
The only option that I've been able to find so far is how to enter reimbursable expenses so that they show up on invoices.
Likewise I don't seem to be able to get a simple list of invoices or credit notes raised, regardless of whether or not they've been paid.
Please let me know if there is any way to find out if our other invoices have been affected or be able to restore there.
Am I able to import invoices from before my conversion date that aren't outstanding?
We set these up in contacts so that the name field is filled in as either Statements or Invoices etc so we are able to label them so we know which is address is for what purpose.
In the name field we would be able to put either the recipients name or a reference for invoices, quotes or statements.
It would be really helpful to be able to see the split between gross and VAT on the invoices table.
I would love to be able to directly attach invoices/credit notes etc from my customers that are sent by email rather than have to save them first.
I want to be able to see how much of our invoices were actually paid last month, but not include the proportion paid towards billable expenses.
I get that there might be invoices that were due in the past (i. e. unpaid) but wouldn't it make more sense to be able to see further into the future so one can see how much cash is going to arrive next month vs at least next month + 1?
It would be great to be able to look up all invoices for one contact on the app (and also get a grand total).
I often want to see the total a customer owes or a customer asks me what invoices they have outstanding and being able to check this on the app would be ideal.
It would be great to be able to change the same field on multiple invoices at once.
It would be handy to be able to select individual credit notes along  with invoices when reconciling payments made.
I am spending a lot of money on taxis and want to be able to assign this to my invoices.
I would love to be able to control where lines of text break on invoices.
It would be great to be able to mark invoices as sent without having to go through the printing process.
On the contact supplier and customer section when clicking into a certain contact we should be able to choose a date range before all the invoices load.
Is it possible to consider applying limits on the $$$ that particular users are able to apply to transactions when approving purchase orders & invoices.
If we were able to send it directly to a Folder, the invoices won't get mixed up other departments and can be managed easily.
would be great to be able to select an option to have invoices print automatically once approved.
To be able to send out service invoices ie date column, description column, hours column, hours cost, Total.
Alternatively, it could be managed by being able to edit the details of the inventory items directly from the purchases screen (and preferably from the invoices screen), whilst they are being data entered, rather than having to go into the separate inventory section.
Would LOVE the option to be able to include custom fields and tracking columns on invoices.
I often enter multi-line invoices which are in alphabetical or date order and would love to be able to insert something in between lines
This has been happening since Monday (maybe last Friday) but we have all had issues of not being able to see documents that have been attached to supplier invoices when using Chrome.
If this IS possible, I should be able to create a DOCX template that will allow me to generate mailing labels, along with my whole-page-per-record: invoices/statements/checks/form-letters or whatever.
Should be able to batch send out invoices.
We require the system to be able to host document templates that can be produced and editted for orders received and /or services delivered ego	Training Confirmationso	Training Attendance Recordso	Training Certificateso	Installation Work Orderso	Merchandising Store Reportso	Draft Invoices and/or payslips10.
I want to be able to assign supplier costs and client invoices to specific job numbers.
Not being able to send multiple copy invoices by email is a MAJOR flaw in an other lovely piece of book-keeping software.
##### CLUSTER 91 #####
It works for Lloyds so I wouldn't change bank if it didn't with YB business.
The Business will take up the payments as they coming in to the bank as prepayments.
I sold my business car and buyer of the car paid directly to bank loan.
From bank I have only amount paid by business card.
Our business banks with Allied Irish - Great Britain and I was wondering if there are bank feeds available?
I was hoping HSBC Business Internet Banking, our current bank, would allow this, but you still have to re-key everything- there's no way to upload a file that I can see.
It would be very much appreciated if the American Express bank feeds could be expanded to:American Express Cards (Germany)- Small business cards
I have two business credit cards (user card 1 and user card 2) and bank feeds for each.
##### CLUSTER 92 #####
I was surprised to find out that Xero contains single account for Accounts Receivable and Payable.
I would be happy to make a manual journal in Xero to "zero out" the liability account, but I am not sure what accounts to code that against.
For our clients that are sole traders or partners that have trading names, it is difficult to search/link their Xero account as clients name their accounts under trading names and Practice Manager uses their legal name for Tax Returns
When using the trial account to test a transaction, it would be useful if we could somehow copy one of 'Live Xero Accounts' details' into the demo company.
I have a client using Xero starting this financial year and we are facing problems with batch payments for any accounts with less than 9 digits in the account number.
I have setup my xero accounts in a similar way however from my 'undeposited cheques account' there is no 'deposit' button to create a deposit slip (I'm doing this manually in word).
##### CLUSTER 93 #####
I now have a payment of $120 in items ready to be reconciled and $80 in unpaid Sales.
This number is going to grow drastically as we accept more currencies and also begin breaking sales down by payment method (paypal, credit card, etc).
Disappointed to see they have access to the totals of sales awaiting payment.
This may be a silly question but when reconciling cash and eftpos payments should I be receiving money and allocating to sales or creating a batch in contacts to receive the payment?
BUT this payment is the sum of ALL sales for that day, minus any charges they make.
I reconciled a payment from AMZ and recorded as sales.
Can an unpaid customer payment be entered to the sales ledger to show on a customer statement
Petty Cash balance of £240 (£100 balance plus today's sales of £140)03/01/16: Cash payment to buy fuel of £10.
##### CLUSTER 94 #####
I need to export a xero Trial Balance at 30 June year end, so we can prepare an Annual Financial Report using a professional reporting package.
How do I enter these into Xero as obviously it will need to be done in such a way as to show on the VAT report.
This isn't "beautiful" accounting Xero, we urgently need a cover page that looks professional OR the ability to modify it ourselves in our report templates.
Xero should have a logically set out aged report, or give us the option of how we want the columns as we and our clients are the ones who need to read and act on the reports.
Currently the payroll reports only have the options:- Excel- PDFFor those of us using a Chromebook we need the ability to download these reports into Google Sheets as with all other Xero Report.
I'm not quite sure how this can be changed but Xero need to look into this and find a propper solution to make the Tax report correct.
##### CLUSTER 95 #####
ACCOUNTSHave 3 separate accounts within Xero: USD PayPal / AUD PayPal / AUD business bank account.
Many of the costs and the income will NOT flow through my (Xero linked) normal business account but will be from / to my personal bank accounts.
I have setup my Xero account to include by personal and business bank accounts.
Currently Xero supports Bank of Ireland personal customer account integration, but not business accounts.
Before I started using Xero, there were quite a few "wage payments" I made to myself and the other director, paid direct out of the business bank account, transfer into our personal accounts.
##### CLUSTER 96 #####
Hi Team,Is it possible to show the foreign currency balance in their origin currency in Bank Summary?
Hi, I import my bank statements and have, unfortunately, paid my boss twice in error, funny he hasn't told me though!
Hi, seems the feed to get bank info is constantly updating / breaking.
hi guys,i have a fixed deposit with a bank.
Hi All,Anyone know why I can't run a Bank Rec Summary for prior months?
Hi everyoneis it possible to reconcile a spend and receive money against one bank transaction?
Hi ,A couple of questions with regard to Bank feeds.
Hi I attempted to reconcile some cash payments with a large amount I deposited into the bank.
Hi CommunitySorry for another simple question:Bank pays me interest, deducts "tax on interest", is this an expense?
Hi,is anyone else having problems with AU bank and Visa Card feeds?
Hi there,We are starting to interact with a lot of different (AU) banks from the direct bank feeds interface.
Hi,I am having trouble setting up my Bank of Ireland Feed.
Hi,An automatic Post Date feature for sending Remittance Emails on the same day as the Bank Transfer would be very handy.
Hi,Cash codding is fantastic feature to reconcile bank feeds but there are few more features required.
Hi all,We are having big headaches with the poor data (mainly duplicates) coming through the Yodlee bank feed.
Hi,I'm having trouble setting up a bank feed.
Hi Everyone, I repeatedly tried to import a bank statement with transactions dated 10/06/2017 (6 June 2017) and formatted the date column into English (Australia).
Hi could somebody help me out with my yodlee NatWest bank feed please?
Hi all,Seem to be having regular problems this week with HSBC bank feeds refreshing.
Hi I have a serious problem with bank information that im downloading as a OFX.
Hi,I seem to have missing transactions that haven't come through in my bank feed.
Hi there,So I'm reconciling my bank feed and I'm getting around to some purchases of equipment I've made.
Hi, I have bank payments that a combination of a Drawing and Wage/Payroll.
Hi,I have reconciled also bank statement for past financial year from 1st April 2015 to 31st March 2016.
Hi,Has anyone setup a Coles MasterCard to receive automatic bank feeds?
Hi,Our bank feed hasn't updated since Friday.
Hi All,Before one of the director's signs up for a personal ANZ frequent flyer black card, I wanted to check whether this type of card could get a direct bank feed by selecting 'ANZ (AU) - Personal Credit Card' when setting up a credit card.
Hi, I'm having an issue with my kiwibank bank feed.
Hi,I have decided to stop the Paypal feed for a client and have about a month's worth of bank statements, some of which are reconciled, that I want to delete.
Hi all,My Citibank bank feed stopped working for some reason.
Hi - is anyone doing bank reconciliation of their iZettle card payments?
Hi Everyone, Was curious to get some insights on the experience people have had with Hubdoc and Receipt Bank.
Hi,In the past week we have had several issues with PayPal and Bank feed imports:- PayPal importing duplicate transaction for different values.
Hi there,Have anyone encountered this before that American Express's bank feeds are being imported more than once.
Hi, Got a serious issue this morning when trying to open old files uploaded in AP by receipt bank.
##### CLUSTER 97 #####
The invoice I send the insurance company should only reflect the monthly rate that is recurring and a one time charge for installation.
We are an IT company and the time that the staff put in their timesheets is then used to invoice our customers.
Unfortunately I have already incurred an issue which is very frustrating…I have entered an invoice MANY time via my Mac and after hitting the approve button, nothing happens.
It would save time if the user could manually re-order invoice items so 'most used' appear at the top of menu instead of scrolling down everytime, or the software could do it.
It would be helpful to see a record of every time an invoice has been viewed.
This would save lots of time having to edit the invoice.
This would save us a lot of time if we can edit tax code on the invoice when it has been paid (or partly paid).
From what I can tell, the only way that I can enter in the correct invoice number is to go into each bill an manually enter the bill number - which is 'very' time consuming.
Only other option is to go through page by page and that is also time consumingOther alternative would to have statement branding automatically attached to the customer name in the same way as invoice branding is
Another item--------------------------Design time-------------------$100 (hidden line on printed invoice)
This was a nice time saver as I didn't have to touch the invoice date on every single one that I entered.
The problem is technically we buy the "stock" from our customer at the time of the invoice (which is actually before the job starts) and sell them to a "supplier".
I have spent much time attempting to reproduce the standard theme invoice behaviour where it displays the discount header and line detail along with the subtotal "(includes a discount of xx.
I don't want to have to email the client to confirm they received the invoice every time I send one.
However, when I invoiced that client in QB, I sent a general invoice and didn't pull the time from particular jobs.
What do you do so you do not have to change it every time you enter an invoice?
There will be a time when they have an invoice and owe me $200 and I have a bill and owe them $400.
MinuteDock is an online solution to help people who bill by the hour track and invoice their time.
Each employee can generate up to 8 such 'job records' per day, so creating an invoice (manually) from each record is time consuming and prone to error.
Each time I try to poush an invoice from Geoop it is giving me this error This error (HTTP 500 Internal Server Error) means that the website you are visiting had a server problem which prevented the webpage from displaying.
We run two completely different services / brands using Freshbooks to track time and invoice customers, with one set of accounting books.
The thing with &'s in email templates has been fixed, it used to always change to '&amp' and I would have to manually change it back every time I sent an invoice.
##### CLUSTER 98 #####
Hi, Ours is a Building/Construction Company and throughout the past 3 months we have hired plant/tools and when doing so have paid deposit amounts which are then put against invoice totals and where necessary the remaining amounts have been refunded.
Hi,I have an invoice that is out with a client but has not been paid yet.
Hi We have 2 deposit dates and then our final invoice needs to be paid.
hi there i am wanting to know when doing an invoice there is an items list i want to delete fields out of this how do i do i?
Hi,During the previous year (ending March 2016) I bought 2 computers, and was given a discount so dutifully put this in the spend money transaction so there are 2 lines in there (as per the invoice):Laptops  x2   1397    720 - Computer Equipment   $2794Discount  x1    -70     720 - Computer Equipment   -$70The problem is, in the asset register the computers went in at the full price, but the discount doesn't appear anywhere in the system as far as I can tell.
Hi, I have a customer that paid a deposit for a stock item, and i created an invoice (Via Tradevine).
Hi,I have made a custom branded invoice using DocX.
Hi,Anyone can help me to export Fixed Asset invoice list?
Hi, I have come across an unpaid invoice from a supplier dated in the last financial year.
Hi, I have recently imported goods into NZ from overseas and have paid a DHL invoice for the import GST.
Hi allWhen I'm on-site and I have completed a job, I log in and create an invoice for the customer.
Hi,I invoice my customers GST exclusive.
Hi GuysI have few invoice who will be never be paid.
Hi Allwe are currently looking at invoice financing as a way to borrow money instead of taking out a loan or overdraft.
hi CommunityDoes anyone know of a subcontractor who can help with creating customized docx invoice templates?
Hi, my issue relates to invoice templates.
Hi,I cannot seem to change the size of the PayPal Logo in a custom invoice template.
Hi,I have had some requests for a dynamic merge field that removes the decimal place for whole numbers, but adds it when a fraction occurs in the quantity field of an invoice.
Hi,Is there any way to provide discount at the invoice level and not at an individual item level?
Hi there, I paid an invoice that I now found out I should have as we were getting the services for free and never should have been billed.
Hi all,I am trying to invoice to a customer group.
Hi,Is there a way to create a purchase order where the delivery address (my customer) is different from the invoice address (me, the seller)?
Hi all,I batch invoice a group of contacts each term.
Hi folksI have checked "show registered address" in my invoice branding theme.
Hi,I have a invoice/layby that has payments made.
Hi - Is there anything that allows us to set a unique reminder for every invoice?
##### CLUSTER 99 #####
I have been adding invoices as GST Excluded, therefore GST should be added to the invoice at the end.
Is the only way to delete the previous invoices by manually deleting/voiding each individual invoice?
I've been reading the help docs and they clearly state that Invoice Only users cannot create recurring invoices.
Have imported a load of purchase invoices where there are some instances where different suppliers have the same invoice numbers.
Sometimes we have issued another invoice before we have reconciled the older invoices for a customer.
I will be sending some invoices by email but some customers require paper copies and I really don't want to choose between sending something that looks messy and sending an invoice without a contact email address on it.
That means to produce the correct invoice you have to go back and redo six invoices, not easy during a busy week.
This means there are no invoices to allocate them too, and I can't seem to work out how to allocate them to a supplier rather than a specific invoice.
HiWhen I produce my invoices each month I often find it easiest to copy my previous invoice for that Customer and amend the details.
I don't think the help link on online invoices is relevant to the receiver of the invoice so shouldn't be included
- Invoices - Cannot select a photo to be included with the invoice.
Good Evening,Monthly we run the aged payables / supplier invoice reports to check off invoices.
It could be something that is a tick box in the customer setting,(Customer prefers invoices to be emailed) that then shows on the invoice screen once the customer has been selected.
They are a nice feature for paying invoices online but shouldn't be so predominant on the invoice itself.
Also it means that we cannot enter invoices at the correct invoice date if we are awaiting their approval before they hit the GL - they will be entered subsequently with the next month date (because they have missed approval before month end entry cut off which is absolutely fine) so this is clearly wrong and makes tracing and reconciling more difficult.
The batch select invoice/print PDF creates one long document with all invoices.
Is this something we can getI have tried the " invoice receivable summary" , but it doesnt reconcile with the p&l monthly figure, as it keeps in any deleted or voided invoices in that month.
On the starter subscription level, invoices should have a check box that will make the invoice "non-printing".
This means that only "real" (printable) invoices will count towards the 5 invoice limit.
When we have queries and someone quotes the date the invoice was raised we cannot see which one it may be as it does not show on the list of invoices outstanding or overdue.
In preparing a batch deposit, unpaid invoices may be sorted several different ways, primarily by invoice number or alpha on name.
We would also love it if email addresses for Invoice Reminders could be linked to individual invoices rather than to the customer in general so we wouldn't have this problem!
3. that the user is automatically presented with the option to void the single invoices from which the merged invoice is created.
We were wondering if it would be possible to have an 'on/off' switch for Paypal on invoices of a certain size to avoid paying these large fee's, without having to create and select a different invoice template?
They save me from having to remember and the grind of raising recurring invoices however for fixed term programs I often miss when a repeating invoice sequence has ended.
I think it would be very helpful(and more efficient) if one could export selected invoices that have been checked off in the unpaid invoice list, rather than being forced to filter down to a select result set then further remove line items from a CSV.
I have customers that pass my invoice on to their clients, I have to change the address line to reflect this as a c/o However when I change the address this changes all the address details, on all the invoices - which gets very messy.
My client uses repeating invoices and occasionally a customer cancels their contract and it is necessary to end a repeating invoice.
My suggestion being a tick box to allocate full invoice against the credit and maybe top box to tick to allocate all invoices against credit - (similar to batch payments / deposits screen).
We want to see a feature that will allow us to allocate a credit note to multiple invoices in one click rather than having to manually enter the amount against each invoice.
Recurring invoice don't work for this, because the amount may vary somewhat, and recurring invoices require an exact amount.
If there is a space for the supplier invoice number and an internal reference number it would make filing of invoices quicker as I have been filing alphabetically in order to make it easier to find in the future.
If it sorted by date and then invoice number it would make it a lot simpler when checking off statements to ensure all invoices have been entered.
Enabling 2 references to be entered when inputting purchase invoices would help me check if I have a duplicate invoice.
We can also do a one off group invoice to send multiple invoices to all members of a contact group.
It would be great that when you send more than one invoice to a client (and write an email) that it can attach or link all selected invoices for that client rather than that one client getting 10 emails with the same message.
On quickbooks, if I changed an address for a client it would only apply it that invoice and not retrospectively to old invoices.
This doesn't help with emailing the invoice to my customer - I don't ever post invoices as it delays customer payments too much.
I've got a bunch of recurring invoices and the Client "Name" field is absolutely massive (way bigger than it needs to be) but the "Reference" Field is absolutely tiny (I can't actually see what each invoice is for).
We send our multiple invoices daily, send out statements weekly and DD weekly in one lump sum of what customers owe us rather than each individual invoice amount.
I have few invoices that was paid through Stripe and has "Paid" stamp on the invoice.
The standard invoice template doesn't allow me to do proper invoices.
If I create an individual invoice, I can select this file and enable it to be included in the email - however I am struggling to find this option when batching invoices to a group!
I went to invoices paid and went through all the amounts paid on that day and still no missing invoice.
I'm looking for a more efficient way to set these up as invoices, or as 1 invoice template.
For example, I'm entering some invoices directly off my credit card statement and don't have the invoice in front of me.
Without manual data entry on your part, Datamolino creates a comprehensive archive for your supplier invoices and receipts - it has also the ability to publish invoice and receipt data into your accounting.
When producing invoices on workflow max you have the option to choose which fields are printed on the invoice.
#1 when paying bills and doing batch payments you have to tick each individual invoice for several different suppliers (contacts) , so I may one hundred invoices to 20 different suppliers.
It's already screwed up our invoice numbering because we made a mistake and voided a couple of invoices without realising that you can't undo this.
When sending invoices from the system sometimes the green tick is not displaying in the list and neither is their the notification at the foot of the invoice page.
##### CLUSTER 100 #####
I am too scared to add or send any further invoices and lose further money at this point.
At present we add the freight line to the invoices as we go, and change the value and quantity depending on the brand.
We currently capture all the expenses on excel and than add them to invoices by manually.
I think a simple solution would be to add a third choice "no date"  in setting repeating invoices, but am not sure whether it is technically feasible.
Add Title Placeholder to options for invoices
We approve invoices and add notes for the office to then edit and send or other options.
E. G. If I have 10 invoices I want to add to purchase ledger I would click all transactions, then click create "Bill".
We mostly add Repeating invoices, and so a one click from the home page would be much quicker, as its only available from within submenus currently.
When posting invoices there is a Approveand add another shortcut.
Add the ability to view and edit partially paid invoices in the iOS apps?
HiCould you add a feature were we can generate a "collection letter" for outstanding invoices.
As it is, I'm continually having to go back and add tracking categories to invoices after the fact.
Until we implement a more sophisticated add-on for inventory, we are using Draft invoices as a way to queue orders for packing until they are finalized.
b) add additional invoices for extra interest charges.
Could we add a feature to download invoices as CSV files?
Why would they add validation to this, it was doing no harm and gave people more flexibility with their invoices.
I have 2 invoices for 3200 each, and 2 payments that add to 6400 but are 3000 and 3400 each.
This would allow us to add items that we already carry on hand to invoices significantly faster than the methods currently available.
The add-on will enable users to select currency invoices, purchase foreign currency and send currency payments to suppliers quickly and easily.
##### CLUSTER 101 #####
We use to be able to do this in the pass.
I do my own tax return and I use eTax every year so don't want to go into an Accountant and have them do it on their computer as then I won't have the information for the following year to be able to it over.
But this causes issues if we use a company card, as we won't be able to reconcile the individual transactions!
I want to be able to use the Smart List feature to fins clients that have purchased a "type" of item.
I can use Find & Recode to search for a specific value but would be really nice to be able to do it from Search
I (and my bankers, etc) are used to seeing say an Income Statement in a certain form and look - including specifically the ability to easily run an income statement for any date period I want, have columns by day/week/mth/qtr/year (whatever I want), be able to 'collapse or expand' (to use QB terms) to see more or less detail, show percentages of income.
We want to be able to use Windows Azure Active Directory to federate security.
Today we have not been able to use the scroll feature on the mouse to scroll up or down on any page!
Currently the only way I've been able to reconcile these transactions is to use "minor adjustment".
##### CLUSTER 102 #####
Hi Guys,I have problem with my bank account reconciliation.
Hi, I'll deposit checks usually once a week, so a check might go a week after being received before it is actually deposited into my bank account.
Hi Can someone explain where I am going wrongI have bank feeds and credit card feeds, at the minute I am paying the credit card transactions off to the relevant expense account, ie fuel.
Hi there,We got a bank loan recently and there was a setup fee of $250 taken from our cheque account as a fee.
Hi Everyone  One of our employees gave us a wrong bank account which was closed.
Hi there:My bank account is connecting with bank on 20/08/2014.
Hi all,I've set up my petty cash as a bank account.
Hi all,A client's auditors pointed out a 1-cent difference in a foreign currency bank account, which I can see is due to a rounding difference in "Currency Adjustments" applied at year-end.
Hi all,Several months ago, the amount of money in my company's bank account was quite low, so I made a few payments to my web-hosting provider out of my personal bank account.
Hi, For the past couple of days my bank feed in Zero has not updated, there has been changes to my bank account and they are not showing up on Zero.
Hi,I have received a refund into our bank account to cover broken stock that was received.
Hi there,I am trying to reconcile two payments into the company bank account.
Hi,      I am from Canada and I also have a USD bank account linked to my main bank CAD account.
Hi All,My Issue: possibly accidentally double accounted for director's loan by entering it as a conversion balance in addition to directors loan account + bank transaction.
Hi I have set up a petty cash account (bank).
Hi,We have a POS machine that takes card payments and a few days later the payments are sent to our bank account, however the card payments taken and the amount transferred do not match up.
Hi All,I wanted to find out how other users reconcile deposits from a merchant bank account?
Hi Currently we have been manually going into our company Bank Account to do the Payroll Payments to our employees.
##### CLUSTER 103 #####
Hi there,I'm new to Xero and I realised I made a mistake - I've approved invoices too quickly.
Hi I am new to xero, I am having trouble when raising invoices.
Hi,I am new to xero and setting up our invoices in DOCX.
Hi there,I am new to Xero but had a question/issue with invoices.
Hi Xero users,1) Xero holds all our annual recurring deals/invoices that have been won, and our CRM holds all this info also, along with any 'new & possible' deals.
##### CLUSTER 104 #####
This means that I then get an overdue invoice notice for all accounts not paid in full.
Sometimes its minus their commission or sometimes its full amount and then they issue an Invoice to client A which will be for their commission and recorded in proper chat of accounts.
But then how do I reconcile the invoice when it comes in, because I have claimed the expenses under my accounts but I didn't end up paying for them.
Currently, I have to enter everything twice:1) I enter students' name, etc in QB then in PaySimple (an accounts receivable system)2) In QB I create an automatic invoice.
Initially I raised an Accounts Payable Invoice for the amount, but it is showing up in my balance sheet under liabilities as (10,000) i. e. inside brackets, and when I repay myself, it adds to the total instead of reducing it.
When sending an invoice this goes from the Accounts email address.
When I enter a bill or invoice it would be great if only the accounts that are in that particular budget linked to that job come up.
It would be great to have the facility to have multiple contacts within an organization that we can send quotes to but once accepted the invoice goes to the accounts or primary contact.
They invoice and ship to each individual store however the accounts are paid on statement by a head office.
##### CLUSTER 105 #####
I cannot use a recurring invoice as the amount will vary each month.
Or, should I use a credit note for the deposit and apply it to an invoice later?
Unless I ask them to use a numbering sequence for the invoice references e. g. OH1234 or CS1234 I can't see how this would work.
If I use the app to capture the receipt and classify it as an expense, then assign it to a customer, I can include those expenses on the customer invoice.
When we purchase the manufactured goods off the manufacturer (we supply them the ingredients), we use their invoice to bring the items into Stock on Hand.
So to make it simple, if you make existing field of "Summary" available at invoice, then I can easily use that field.
Another complaint last week that a single page invoice printed on two pages because despite their being loads of room in the footer area the footer decides to use another peice of paper to print it
I really want the same options on a quote, as what we use on the invoice.
We use the Invoice import feature several times daily.
We use our own Quote number format and Invoice number format and running number.
Every one of my jobs is in a different location and I use the reference as an address field for each invoice.
Right now the customer can view their currently outstanding bills, but only if they use the link that is provided on the online invoice.
To keep a copy of a quotation in the system, I save an invoice as Draft and use the template system to try and mark it as a draft.
I use tracking so each bill/invoice have common links.
Noticed that if you use the "Preview" button on an invoice thats been paid (and reconcilled) then the generated pdf shows a line saying it's overdue in red text when obviously it's not.
I want to recreate the invoice and resolve the issues, and use that file again.
I am trying to use the import invoice feature and generating CSV files for import.
Please don't suggest a combination of a draft invoice and the use of the prepayment money received function as I've this and my client is very unhappy with this solution.
I can obviously only use one of them against the invoice and i am not sure which one and then so what do I do with the other oneI hope this is clear as I could do with some helpThanks in advanceRegardsJeremey
However, when trying to use it in practice, we noticed that it doesn't seem to bring across all Invoice line items.
01p invoice and use my own debit card, but rather look for a solution if there was one?
We have several vendors that also use Freshbooks to invoice us, and this would increase our productivity even more!
##### CLUSTER 106 #####
Initially, the packages and invoices are sent through timely, but accounts are reconciled through xero.
I would have thought xero would flag this as a potential duplicate as it does with Accounts payable invoices?
A number of invoices per month won't import into Xero, throwing out my accounts and the ability to reconcile payments.
I have done a bit of a workaround by moving the accounts email address to the 2nd email position in Xero and having the primary contact person as the job contact but obviously this is not ideal when emailing invoices, statements and automatic reminders as I am having to manually check email addresses before each email is sent and delete the primary email address from any email before it is sent.
I'm trying to figure out how to make the accounts match in Xero once I've copied invoices over from Harvest.
We would love for Xero to pull "Received Invoices" from Freshbooks into our Accounts Payable.
##### CLUSTER 107 #####
Dear forum members,Is it possible in Xero to change the posted payment date for an old invoice?
Full payment will close the invoice in Xero.
Using XeroIs payment in Xero attached to Client Profile or Invoice?
I have created an invoice in Xero for the event management fee, but I have no idea how I am going to record a payment against it - given that the only transaction that will take place will be an outgoing one.
If you go into an invoice and click on the payment details, Xero will show a transaction screen.
If Ezidebit made all their payments separately, it would be much easier, but even then, less the Ezidebit fees, the payment amounts will never match a Xero invoice.
##### CLUSTER 108 #####
Hi All,Example: Purchase goods for resale on Amazon (U. S. ) and pay by credit card.
Hi there,I'm about to pay a lump sum for a radio campaign that went over two months.
Hi Ive started using a service called Payatrader where customers can pay by card, payatrader take a small commission for this on each transaction so eg: I do a job for a customer the cost is £100 in total the  customer goes online and pays via card, I get paid by payatrader less their commission (£1.
Hi have opted to pay off our last years and this years accountants fees by way of a loan agreement with a third party, organised by the accountant.
Hi,What would be the best way to enter the transaction if: We receive the items and pay later to the supplier?
Hi there, I am struggling to get my customers who pay by standing order their payments clearly on the statements.
Hi There,It would be great to have each employees total hours worked in the pay run period included in the Payroll Employee Summary.
Hi,When hiring a car, I pay a hire fee and a deposit component.
Hi,I have an employee who needs less tax taken from his pay.
Hi,I am trying to do a pay run.
Hi Guys,We have a unique xmas Pay Run scenario at my company and I'm seeking some advice.
Hi ,The Payroll Overview Screen is displaying the wrong Next Pay run date.
Hi Guys n Gals,I'm an idiot, wasn't paying attention and deleted an old pay run (from October last year) because I was trying to edit a leave entry that should have been put in back then but wasn't.
Hi,I have a client who wants to pay their commission only salesperson via payroll.
Hi, I'm trying to work out how to deduct price of uniforms from our employees pay.
Hi,We pay staff on a 4 weekly basis.
Hi,Does anyone understand how to set up a basic pay template.
Hi we have had a notification that we have reached our limit and we have to pay staff this week.
Hi, we have a casual employee receiving 8% holiday pay each week but has now terminated employment and is asking why she is not receiving the 30hours annual leave showing in balances on her payslip.
Hi there,I have only recently noticed that my employees have not got an increased annual leave rate to reflect their average daily pay figure.
Hi there,All our staff are contractors, not employees but we've been inadvertantly accruing Holiday Pay.
Hi,annual leave cash, I understand how to request it, but can not work out how to pay it as a unscheduled payrun.
Hi there,My pay runs are all going a week in advance.
Hi support I got issues to set up staff annual leave , holiday pay , sick leave hours accrued annual  and balance .
Hi,It would be great if when we paid out Holiday Pay to staff, it would automatically calculate the PAYE correctly, as in split it over X weeks.
##### CLUSTER 109 #####
One thing that has stumped me a little is where to add / how to treat a loyalty reward from my bank.
There are multiple reasons they are asking you for your statements:- Human Error- Bank to Xero transmission errors- ATO regulationsLet’s examine every reason separately: Dear Accountants and Bookkeepers, what reasons would you add to this list?
When I total the columns as they should be and add and subtract these from my opening balance I get the same balance as my bank statement, but on Xero it's not working.
I have been reconciling my bank statements and for certain items, when I try to add anew transaction to either receive or spend money, there seems to be a bug.
The ability to add multiple bank fees in this section would be extremely useful.
I see that Xero should include one field in Bank Rule forms in which you can add a set of "ANY" rules and another field that enables the user to add a set for "ALL" rules.
We currently type in the 'Add Summary' area 'Bank Statement balance sighted as at <insert date> $bla bla bla.
e. g. for Bank A, default contact from: Payee 2. add 'assigned to a customer' field on that screen instead of going through a second screen through 'Adding details' (actually 3rd one, with prompt dialog)The first request would save many of us from copy/pasting from an existing value on the left-side.
Can you please add a feed for First County Bank's credit card?
I have many Bank Rules whereby I simply want to add a short summary in the reference field when reconciling transactions.
Could you please add a prompt when posting a payrun when an employee does not have any bank details entered.
It would be great if employees could add their own information (address / contact, bank, tax, etc) to a newly created Payroll record, rather than have someone collect paper and key it in.
I am requesting to add Heritage Credit Union, a Wisconsin-based credit Union, to the bank feeds available.
then I click on add a yodlee feed read the instructions and it continues to take me round in circles as that tells me to click on get bank feeds which takes me back to the help page!
I am trying to update an existing bank rule (Child Support) and add the different criteria it can contain.
It would be great to create an add-on for each one (starting with USPS since it's probably the most popular) so that Xero automatically pulls in info and matches it with bank transactions.
I have a transaction in my bank statement to reconcile so on the reconcile page I used the "create" function to add the transaction to Xero.
I'm trying to add a bank feed for a second Chase card I have.
Add and Edit Bank Rules in Excel:It is incomparably faster and more accurate to add and edit Bank Rules in Excel than in Xero.
Is this possible without having to add all variations of the transactions to the Bank Rule?
Will having the eway add on and the feed that comes with that, make reconciliation any more efficient than it already is with the bank feed?
I have a client who receives RCTIs as a contractor; is there any add-on available to automate to receive money similar to what Receipt Bank does for spend money?
I realise I can change to "Zero Rated with adjustment" but this requires about 5 or more steps per transaction to fix what's there and would add yet more steps to getting Receipt Bank transactions correctly into Xero.
##### CLUSTER 110 #####
I have just completed my first financial year, and am confused about how to account for Corporation Tax in Xero.
My account friend suggested we set up this method of accounting for revenue, but I'm just not sure how to go about it in Xero.
We have just purchased a bundle of computer equipment that is over £2000, how to I account for this in Xero so that it is reflected correctly on my quarterly VAT return?
I just recently signed up with Xero and have integrated it with our Shopify account.
The account would be held in this piece of software/app and just pass the amount in £££ to Xero.
I have just yesterday opened an account with Xero since I am changing from MYOB.
Its from the same account that Ive linked to Xero, I just cant work out how to access these.
I've started to just create rules for each supplier transaction, so that when we get one from Xero, for example, it creates a transaction against the right account blah blah.
I just opened an account with Xero and cannot find a guide anywhere on how to set it up for rental properties.
Hello,I've just got started with Xero, and I've added PayPal, Stripe, and Square to my account.
Just looking at my ANZ credit card account in Xero and there are all sorts of discrepancies.
Just sign in to Momentum, connect to your Xero account and let Momentum do the rest.
Just log in to push your Automatic trips to your Xero account.
I have been using the xero software on a trial account for a couple of weeks now and I am just about ready to commit to going live.
##### CLUSTER 111 #####
If I want to report in the annual accounts, by division, how do i don this?
;-)My client's auditors have pointed out that certain accounts of the GL report don't match the TB.
What I want is to get rid of the accounts, so that their balance no longer shows up in my cash summary report, as it makes for a very un-true story.
the report pack does not have statement of beneficiary accounts, ie for each beneficiary opening balance, additions, profit or loss share, payments to beneficiaries, etc, closing balancedo we have to create these schedules?
In Sage you can have sub categories which are pulled together to report in one line in the chart of accounts.
Is it possible to have an expense report by Division and then have it group by Accounts within each division?
The same with the balance sheet, if you could select the accounts you want a certain report.
This report shows the opening and closing accounts balances, as an option.
I frequently want to run a report showing me all income accounts as a check for correct coding, and at present I have to go through and tick each one.
The Statement of Cash Flows report allows you to drill down to individual transactions for each of your accounts by clicking the value of 'Receipts from customers' or similarly, 'Payments to suppliers and employees'.
I don't understand why you wouldn't have extended the ability to move/reclassify accounts on this report to include items in the cash section.
It would be great if in the report fields you could have a field that is populating information from accounts, such a s a profit field.
They also choose which accounts to report in which schedule in ways that I find incomprehensible.
However, this report is still limited in that it is clearly triggered off by the chart of accounts settings.
Is there a report that shows all accounts.
I require a profit & loss report showing all aspects of our accounts, in the standard reporting of P&L I doesn't include wages.
##### CLUSTER 112 #####
In short, this method is designed to reduce administrative work for small businesses and allows them to pay GST calculated using an approximation of tax owed, based on sales, rather than based on the actual amount collected/paid.
I tend to move money onto my CC to pay it off, and into my savings to set aside money for sales tax remittance.
So obviously i don't want to pay GST on sales that are international.
We have clients who pay sales representatives (each representative is a tracking category) commissions.
Sales staff are paid on a commission only basis which means that they may only receive a pay every couple of months.
Our company partnered with an artist to create an app and I am looking for a simple way to pay the artist their share of app sales every month.
I asked your sales guy how I pay myself simply putting aside reserves for GST and income tax.
##### CLUSTER 113 #####
Hi all - we are currently designing and upgrading our Xero API - which connects Dragon Law's awesome legal document generator directly to Xero, alllowing users to agree commercial agreements and have the contract terms recognised automatically in Xero.
Hi Xero User,I have subscribed to the services of a  third party payrolll service provider else than Xero.
Hi,We have recently converted to Xero and, while the cloud-based nature of Xero has been great, in general usefulness, we are struggling to be convinced.
Hi everyoneI have been speaking to Xero representatives and I thought I would open a discussion on here to see what other peoples experiences are and also to give feedback to Xero.
Hi, all, I've been using Xero and Xero Touch for a couple of months.
Hi, I'm a newbie for xero, so I don't really know how xero work.
Hi,We're trying to migrate to Xero, and I'm trying to get my head around entering expenses into Xero as "Spend Money" transactions vs Bills.
Hi all,I've been transitioning a couple of businesses over to Xero, and doing so in a very bit-by-bit manner because I've really wanted to get a good grasp on how Xero does things 100%.
Hi The company I work for currently uses Xero as its finance system, but as the size of the company has grown and the demands for management information has increased, it is becoming harder to rely on Xero.
Hi,I am having issues with Vend and Xero, I have a lot of unreconciled items in Xero due to the fact that the EFTPOS and CASH amounts don't match up.
Hi There,I have sent 3 emails to the Xero Support email address (support@xero.
##### CLUSTER 114 #####
Hi therewe have a Directli/GoCardless/Xero account and link set up.
Hi My Manager deleted one of the Xero account by mistake.
Hi AllDoes anyone know if it is possible to do an Integrated Client Account Statement in Xero?
Hi allMy Paypal account is showing a difference in balance to XEROThere is a variance of £1500Im sure the Paypal is fine but as it has a direct feed to Xero and no body touches it except to reconcile Im not sure whats going on.
Hi,I have rental property for which I have created Xero account.
Hi,We have been given access to view a customers Xero account.
Hi,I have added my credit card account to Xero, which carries a negative balance at this point.
Hi, We have moved over from Ace Payroll where we did a manual journal in Xero to account for leave owing every month.
Hi All,I have an issue with Vend Integration into Xero with the on account function.
##### CLUSTER 115 #####
I am not opposed to an add-on to enable this, ultimately expenses will be being recorded in another app anyway, we're just not there yet.
FWIW: my backup is to just file it as two quarters and add the two returns together to make the filed return.
HiI am trying to add a product to my products list and overtime I try to save the product the system just freezes.
In the instance where another attachment is required for the bill you just attach it as normal using the "+ add from file library" option in Related Files.
Just looking to add the option for an (Overdue By) placeholder in email templates.
Currently, I just add it under the notes.
Yeah I could just add it to history.
On the Add Transaction page I fill out the form, click Ok, and then the OK button just sits and spins at me.
I think a more equitable solution would have been just to add the “remove & redo” button to the existing buttons.
Does anyone know of a way we can record this - I don't want to just manually add the hours I would rather there be a record of it.
Though, usually, I just add another earnings type in and it works.
I know we could purchase add ons for roosters but our current process is working we are just trying to improve our systems.
I have a client who is a milk man just wondering if anyone can advise on a good add on to handle customer orders and manage stock levels ?
##### CLUSTER 116 #####
In terms of background, this is for a consulting company (S corp) that I just set up specifically for a client who wanted a B2B business relationship rather than a 1099 contractor relationship.
I just started my small business 3 months ago.
Just a one man business here, so I keep it all very simple.
Hello,I just wanted someone to confirm my understanding on the following, re processing the purchase of a business where the purchase price includes Goodwill.
We have just started a business and have used our personal money to start up.
We're looking to recruit 15 small business users to just trial the app and give us their feedback.
I'm just trailing this package as my small business has previously been running on spreadsheets.
I work for a limited company but it's just one man who is the business.
The business is just myself and one other employee at the moment.
I've recently just gone freelance and I'm looking to bring this equipment into my business (operating as sole trader).
Just one of many questions I'm sure I will have on this journey into business.
We are a UK based company who have just started running the ledgers for our US based business.
Not just to run our own business but also to help others.
com/business/discussion/70181), just the ability to pick from a predefined set of plain colours.
accidents DO happen, systems DO fail and ultimately I'm just not comfortable with the idea of having NO other option than to sit tight and hope that their competence is enough to resurrect my data and get my business running again IF (.
Just wondering if other small business using Lloyds have had similar experiences or have I been given the wrong information?
I have just started a trial with Jobber in order to manage the cleaning roster for our holiday let business.
Look I am just a small business owner trying to handle my accounting.
I just wish you would be thoughtful enough to realize that small business SHOULD HAVE ACCESS TO CASH CODING BY DEFAULT.
##### CLUSTER 117 #####
It feels like there should be an entry showing $2,500 coming in, and then another entry for the legal and setup fees, and a balance being associated as a liability until it is matched against a future invoice or something.
I would like to enter the amount of the GST from the invoice rather than have it automatically calculate it at 10%.
We don't accept online payments, and would like to remove this from the invoice template, to stop confusion with clients.
Hello, We are trying to modify our accounting organization and we'd like to get 3 different Invoice numbers because we have 3 differents entities for the company.
However, when I print the invoice, the deduction shows like this (£1.
Looks like I have to resend the invoice, or do I?
Would like to see a reference (supplier invoice no. )
Have a substantial database of clients in my iPhone (and thus in my iPad) and would like them to be searchable as I create an invoice.
I would really like to set this up so that I only have to send them once invoice, which essentially has two due dates, with the requested amount split in between those two dates.
So for my current state, it would look like:1 Draft invoice 0.
We would like something on the screen that indicates that they prefer the invoice to be emailed.
Then when you bring up the list of payables you can see things like "manger said to hold this invoice until further notice" etc.
Unfortunately I have discovered that if you would like to leave a gap in your invoicing sequence, your invoice numbers will not increment correctly.
I would like to assign a colour for draft invoice lines to signify that they are pending further additions/edits.
Ie if I make a quote or invoice out to Acme Ltd, I'd like to show their name in the file name e. g. INV 001 Acme Ltd or Quote 123 Acme Ltd?
I would like to see a "would you like to save this customer/invoice before exiting" pop up screen as numerous times i have used the back arrow or clicked on a different home tab before saving a customer or invoice.
In some instances I would like to have PAYE deducted from my Invoice.
Preferably I would like a manually customisable address block at the top of every invoice so we can have the default (saved on client file), with the ability to change it to whatever we like for each individual invoice, as is standard in many other accounting packages.
I would like a previous balance field at the top of the invoice items list.
I would like a feature where one person's email address comes up when I am sending a quote to a company and another person's email address comes up when I am sending an invoice to that company.
If, like us, you generally have 30-40 products per invoice, the list will be very long.
Great feature, but I receive more then 1 invoice from some of our suppliers is there anyway that we can join them together so that when paying you have them loaded only once and gives you a total, like a statement but for our own records.
I would like to see the ability to remove inventory item pricing, so that it is possible to keep the descriptions of all inventory items, and only show a sub total, gst and total price on the quote and invoice.
I have a number of clients that would like to have the following to be displayed in their invoice without having to type them in the template:Organisation Email AddressOrganisation WebsiteOrganisation Phone NumberOrganisation Fax NumberThe email and phone number are particularly important.
I'd like to see a feature that automatically calculates a credit card charge and adds it to an invoice.
The invoice could/would look like - Total including GST  (amount owing if paying by cash, cheque, EFT) - Finance (creadit card) charge - Total amount owing (if paying by credit/debit card)
We would like to have the option for our invoice and quote templates to print as it looks on the screen inc GST for each line item.
For example, all of our products are packages so for a single inventory code the customer receives;1x Product A1x Product B1x Product CThis is how we'd like it to display on the quote/invoice.
• If you make a mistake, i. e like create an invoice, it's impossible to delete.
We have some customers that would like their invoice emailed to two separate addresses.
I would like to run individual supplier/customer reports detailing when an invoice was paid.
Doesn't look like it gets merged when printing an invoice to PDF.
When entering contact details, can we not have contacts already on the system pop up like they do when entering an invoice?
On the client authorising the timesheet I would like an invoice to be produced for the client, approved and automatically emailled to the client.
When you click on it, you get a basic looking invoice which looks like it has been sent by my accountant and not my company!
We would like something that would take care of a job from the Prospect - to - Quote -to- Sale (Purchase order/Job) -to- Invoice.
I have a free trial going and it seems to work ok, and looks like a good system, but havent' tried sending thru and invoice from it yet.
##### CLUSTER 118 #####
Of course, I also need to understand how to zero out this prepayment on a future invoice when the time comes.
Do i need to have an invoice each time I receive income?
Currently this process is very time consuming because we need to look up each outstanding payable/receivable invoice and look up the tax rate/code and create our own reports.
We need the ability to scheduled the time of the invoice reminder.
Every time I need to edit an invoice I need to remove any payments made, edit the invoice and then reconcile the payments again.
However, what I need to check is the treatment of VAT which means I have to go into each one individually, check it and then approve one at a time and then go back to approvals (as the screen does not take you back to the list once an invoice is approved)It would be great if more columns could be added to show Net, VAT breakdown.
Do I really need to re-enter this each time the invoice repeats?
##### CLUSTER 119 #####
They factor their invoices which caused a lot of confusion as to how to properly account for the transactions.
So, owner wants that 235 transferred to his personal account and the rest to reconcile with the two invoices.
I manage cash by simply banking it to a personal account and record invoices paid to "Owner A Drawings".
-Could I do it through a clearing account and put the invoices income to it?
My problem is that i have entered and paid off a number of suppliers invoices against the cheque account.
We recently noticed a few of invoices with past due balance have been deleted from our account.
We have cash customers as well as account customers and can process up to 80 invoices per day on a daily basis.
i have paid these invoices so I'll have to account for this as well.
The customer does not send a remittanceWhen we go to their account  we can’t seem to work out what invoices they are paying.
Today's example, I have 8 x credit notes and 143 invoices to post to the same account, in no particular order.
When approving draft invoices one by one you are prompted to apply payments if there are any available on the customer's account.
Most bills, statements or invoices arrive by email to a generic email account.
This could also provide more flexibility for companies / organisations who have multiple departments, brands, or account managers, and they want to provide a more tailored email conversation with their clients when it comes to quotes & invoices.
I want to post the amount to their account and then match off with outstanding invoices.
The invoices have been paid and were raised on the correct account.
I then mark the multiple invoices as "paid" and they also appear in the "account transactions" list to be reconciled.
So, I'm not any WORSE off than I was with QB *IF* I can figure out why payments received for invoices to the Square Account show up as debits.
Why do invoices have to remain "unpaid" when the account has plenty of credit?
##### CLUSTER 120 #####
We currently have a set amount we transfer to a savings account for rent, rates and service charge then each quarter transfer the coorrect amount into our account and pay it.
I have customers pay into the statement account and then transfer any balance over around $100 into my interest bearing account so that grows.
I pay expenses either out of the interest bearing account or transfer amounts back to the statement account if necessary.
Include an option of selecting a liability account instead of an expense account when setting up the above pay items.
The only work around at the moment is to process all wages as per normal and then do a manual entry from the existing wages account to another Directors Wages account every pay run.
My first issue i have run into is that when setting up the "Ordinary Earnings" Pay Item for them i can only select an Expense Account whereas our Accountant has advised me that all Drawings should go through an Equity Account.
An option would be to journal the balance of the wages expense account to a direct costs account after each pay run, but I'm not sure of the consequences of that (IE reporting).
##### CLUSTER 121 #####
Would you use minor adjustment, bank fee, or something else?
I use automatic statement imports from my bank so I want this to keep happening too.
Assume I can not use the automatic bank feed option, so i have to import CSV.
If I withdraw funds from an ATM, I have to use machines from other banks, as my bank does not have ATMs of their own.
Example: I use Bank Import to import my transactions and my bill for Internet would be $500.
Login To Online Banking Was UnsuccessfulThe bank feed was unable to use the supplied credentials to login to the online banking website.
It would be really useful to have the ability to use wildcards in setting up the conditions when applying a bank rule.
We use Cash Coding to quickly see which transactions have been automatically created based on rules and so instead of clicking laboriously each 'OK' box on the 'Reconcile' screen we do a quick scan over what's on the Cash Coding screen that has its details all filled in ready to post - then we 'Save and Reconcile All' - reconciles of all those items that have been created from bank rules - much faster!
Due to this, I think this is why a lot of people would rather use Receipt bank when you have a large volume to process.
For expense receipts I use 'Receipt Bank' app - whilst on the go you photo the receipt and send it straight off.
HiThere are times when I use 'Spend money' or 'Receive money' to reconcile transactions, for example if there are Bank Charges paid.
What control procedures do you use to ensure the accuracy and verify that correct bank information is saved in the aba and uploaded directly to online banking.
Would it not be possible to allow employee number credits to work much the same way as bank transactions work so that if an employer has a high number of changes in a month they can use these temporary credits to prevent having to upgrade.
I use a Discover card, and I set up bank feeds and have imported a csv file.
I had to use CSV files for the first four months and the bank feed started on 9th JulyI am really at my wits end trying to sort it -Any advice would be appreciatedBWChristine
In the bank reconciliation screen, I often use "find & match".
I bank with RBS in the UK and use Bankline.
What control procedures do you use to ensure the accuracy and verify that correct bank information is saved in the aba and uploaded directly to online banking.
I use the automatic bank feed option.
##### CLUSTER 122 #####
Im new to xero and we were not using an accounting software of any sort before we started with xero.
I'm new to Xero and wondering how people integrate their share trading into Xero.
Love using Xero, but a company vehicle and using Xero are both new to us.
Hello Xero community,I'm new to Xero and must say I have been very impressed with the community I've seen on here so far.
Hello I am a Chartered Accountant and Xero Certified Adviser and thought I would share my experience of the most common mistakes people make in Xero and tips to avoid them to make our respective jobs a bit easier :-)NOTE: This is for the New Zealand version of Xero but is probably applicable across all versions.
Our Xero Bookkeeping consultants are certified by Xero and ensure they keep up to date with each new feature released by Xero so we can simplify your bookkeeping processes.
I have started using the new Xero U and updating my training and noticed that my profile is not the same as my Xero profile.
WE CANNOT START ANY NEW CLIENT OR RENEW EXISTING CLIENTS AT CURRENT XERO RATES, even though  Xero seems to have the best payroll program.
BACKGROUND:I have a client who is a new Xero user and has unfortunately posted some payrolls twice to Xero and completely missed posting others.
I'm a new user of Xero, and have 2 queries that involve how to correctly input ecommerce payments through Xero.
HiI'm new to Xero but have previously used Quickbooks, so I'm finding Xero's reporting features to be significantly under powered by comparison.
HiI'm a Xero partner/Bas agent and I have an ongoing issue with new clients who come on board with payroll problems in Xero.
My question is, now that we have migrated away and integrated our new payroll with Xero's accounting, how do we close down Xero's payroll system?
I also sent a new support question to Xero Aust to see if they can help me get Xero USA to contact me, but i have to wait 24 hours to hear back from them.
The job sheet will bring client details from Xero, or details of a new client which will update to Xero.
That in turn has the potential to make Xero significantly more useful, and save Xero from having to build every new 'core' feature themselves.
##### CLUSTER 123 #####
We should then add on the non-deductible expenses (late payment penalties) and the P&L current year earnings is nil.
After clicking "add details", you can then split the payment into multiple lines.
How can I add these fees into the payment made to us?
Is it possible to set the Paypal payment process to add on the transaction fees to the payer?
Currently Payment Reference is not one of the filters to add.
So, is it possible to add the same "Cheque Payment" feature that Canadian organizations has to Argentina&#180;s organizations?
once this information is entered, I can click the green button "ADD PAYMENT" .
Cash Flow add-ons require users to enter and update expected payment dates and this has to be done manually at present.
:)So, instead of only 1 payment date, have option to add multiple dates & % of total, OR sums, to be paid by each date.
Automatically add an item to Fixed Assets when a bill or payment has been made to the Fixed Asset nominal codes
I am trying to add the 'payment date' (when we received money from someone) onto a docx format receipt?
How do I add reportable employer superannuation contributions to the payment summaries of employees.
This a suggestion for current/potential add-on partners in the payment processing space.
##### CLUSTER 124 #####
The long and short of it is that I'd like to charge a season ticket expense to the business in relation to a period of 10 weeks training.
And I would like the 'Business Perforamance' counters to work, specifically 'Debt Ratio'.
Previously I was paying rent, & a % of that was a business expense (like phone, power etc).
It also has several business like income streams.
So when I get  a good amounts of cash my business saver, I would like to move it to another saver with a higher interest rate.
So you’re probably beginning to understand the power of Google+ for your local business…We also made a video explaining exactly why local is important (0:00-5:00) and how to build your local SEO with citations (5:00-10:00)  Like we said before, Google wants you to sign up and get seen for local results.
I keep thinking of equity like housing equity, yet surely as a sole trader I own the whole business.
We would like the description to be "Retainer" or the ability to have the description customized to the business.
It must be a reasonably normal business activity so I would like to know if other customers have found a solution to this.
Like most businesses I tend to deal with a specific person within a business.
When I would like to respond to any of those emails, I have to go to community, then work out whether the original question was in Accounting or Small Business, then hunt it down.
My business fixes turf machinery like mowers ect.
They are way to big, expensive and cumbersome for a small maker business like ours.
##### CLUSTER 125 #####
Hi, how can i add capital entry into xero
Hi,I'm a freelancer film maker and website designer and I'm trying to figure out how to add my camera and computer equipment to Xero.
Hi all,I'm trying to add a custom formula in Xero.
Hi, does anyone know of any Human Resource Management Information (HRMIS)  add- ons  or  any companies that provide   Human Resource Management Information (HRMIS) that are compatible with Xero payroll?
Hi,Does anyone know if Fidelity can be an add on to Xero - as our client uses this system?
Hi There,Does anyone know of a recurring job scheduling add on for Xero.
Hi all, I am looking for a Xero add on to assist with managing the maintenance of our equipment.
Hi,is there anyone in this group who is familiar of any Add-On for "FINANCIAL CONSOLIDATION" that works well with Xero?
Hi,Is there a Xero add-on that can manage mortgages or loans?
Hi all,anyone using an add on to integrate Amazon Seller with Xero ( Amazon.
Hi there,Does anyone know a Xero add on which can manage fixed asset leases?
Hi there, We're testing our billing integration add-on for Xero and are reaching out for beta testers right now.
Hi,Does anyone out there know of an add on that can be used with Xero so that employees can clock on and off with a finger scaner?
Hi all,Is anyone aware of any add-ons for Xero that can be used for farmers to keep track of livestock numbers, including births & deaths as a minimum?
##### CLUSTER 126 #####
Sometimes I reconcile my bank and pay an item by Direct Debit (e. g. Mobile phone bill).
I made a bank withdrawal to pay for expense claims that were approved and marked "paid".
To complicate things I often pay bills, rent etc using cash from the till (due to being charged loads by the bank to deposit cash).
We pay some suppliers by electronic bank transfer (BACS), others are taken automatically by direct debit / standing order etc.
This total is important because it represents the total value of the transaction uploaded to the bank for the pay run.
A summary of the net pay would be great - I have looked for it and cannot find anything suitable - yes there are summaries but nothing with a list of bank details.
Without a BACS file we cannot import payments into our bank system, so are struggling to pay our suppliers.
Whenever I pay my staff I have the same bank transfer fee.
Prefered option would be 3. with maybe a link up to expense claims - so that reciepts can be photographed and then destroyed, then batch pay expense that creates a contra on the bank statement - maybe even clever enought to create rule.
Our employees are normally paid the same each pay period and they are paid in a batch so that only one amount appears on the bank statement.
The ARB file was extracted, but not sent to the bank 'cos we dont want the physical pay them again.
However, we now have the reversed PAY journals showing up in the unreconciled bank items but the PE journals are not to be found for us to match them to.
(My bank doesn't let a single user pay more than $20,000 in one day, so two different users have to import one file each.
5hrs bank holiday pay for Friday 14th April 2017?
##### CLUSTER 127 #####
A client has asked me whether it is possible to generate a weekly rather than a monthly profit and loss report, so you could (for example) compare this week with the previous 12 weeks, like you can with monthly reports?
Hello,I entered a conversion balance a few months back ago that I would like to remove since this is my first accounting system and I don't think it's necessary, and the conversion journal entries are messing up my P&L report.
I am wondering if a report I'd like to do is even possible.
I'd also like to get a report of those dealers, but remove certain items from the report.
My GST return always times out after 30 mins, I have to run it at like 2am to do a report when no one else is likely running reports.
I simply would like to know what exactly it means to  a report?
But I would like to run a report that shows me all of the prepayments currently outstanding for all patients.
Think of a monthly profit and loss report where as each month passes, you would like to show an additional month in the report.
This would be a lot like the "Current Financial Year" option in the Budget Variance report, but instead of displaying budget for remaining months it would display a forecast.
Would like the ability to change formatting in report templates and client level reports to round to the nearest thousand.
I'd like to know if you have anything in the works for creating a report for P&L by CLIENT.
we would like a bit help from your side, now we tried to print the journal report and found that the "reference number" that we have recorded is not show and in the journal report can't tracking back to the transaction that we have recorded.
The Journal ID should be the same like the ID in the Journal Report.
The concept is we wanted to have two versions of the report, one for internal review which includes everything like the current income statement report, the other version is for external report for example when we present to external investors, there are certain categories we would like to exclude.
I would like to suggest an infographic dash board dial style report (that can be downloaded as PDF) would be good when dealing with both non-financial types and experienced investors.
Rather than individually selecting hide decimal place within each financial report page we would like to see a button at the publish page to elect to select hide decimal place which will hide ALL decimal places within the report (pretty sure that this was available not that long ago and has now disappeared?
This would be valuable particularly for those who would like to quickly see how the balance at the end of one month compares to the previous month and have these figures side by side in the one report.
I would like to see this data exported in the "Income by Contact Report".
We would like to allow certain people within our organisation access to reports but know some will be overwhelmed with having to navigate to different parts to get that report.
Like putting the Notes in the same page with trial balance/profit loss, or better yet hide the notes in the report?
When I file my VAT return I would like to run a report (similar to the VAT audit report) that would show me every VAT entry in that VAT return with a paperclip next to it.
I would like to suggest the same in each detail report.
We would like to see the name of the client appear on the Contents page and on the second page of any report.
We would like a report that shows a month's actual figures, compared with last year's actuals for the month as well as the budget for this year.
Enhancement suggestion, either allow the screen/report to be filtered by paid/unpaid etc and also  provide a Top 10 Creditors on the AP main screen like you do in AR that drills down to a Supplier Statement.
I would like a employee subtotal on the Super Payments report.
We would like to see an option in settings so that employee entitlements such as LSL, annual leave and sick leave can be automatically updated in the balance sheet on a monthly basis rather than having to rely on the report out of the payroll reports window.
I am also using the automatic superannuation payments - I would like to see a running total as I tick the items off to match against my payroll report.
Would really like to see the Date Of Birth field added to the employee contact report.
You are missing an option to include a YTD column like you have on the old report.
I'd like to see a P&L report that compares YTD performance for the current year with budget and prior year.
I would like to view a report of all the expenses the company has incurred.
Hii can see how to get a report of all expenditure under a particular code (Advertising and Marketing) but would really like to see which of those had VAT and which did not.
I would like to produce a report that shows budgeted amounts versus actual amounts for multiple months.
So this report would have 12 lines that look like:{Current Month Name}PropertyA   £456.
I would like to run a report on a single payroll item for a given period, but am not finding it as an option.
I notice now when I print my Profit/Loss report the wages don't appear on the report so it looks like I have earnt more that I have which would mean more tax payable at the end of the year.
Ideally I would like to set this reference to reflect the title of the report in Expensify in some way.
##### CLUSTER 128 #####
Now I have a number of expense that have been approved and some pending and some draft that would reconcile to my bank accounts totally nicely, except they are in XERO as expenses and not as possible matches.
Can I upload bank transactions to prepare end of year accounts for previous years prior to joining Xero i. e 31st March 2016?
There must be a simple way to record 'Cash expenses" or expenses paid with "personal funds/accounts"  as a sole trader in Xero I had cashflow manager and it had a simple option you either placed the expense in the "Bank" Or "Cash" Column.
I reconciled all of my bank accounts before I sent the conversion file over to Xero.
405 ^imported into XERO bank accounts > Statement shows for that statement lineDate=30 Nov 2012 Type=credit Payee=DEBIT .
Currently the Xero balance displayed for bank accounts is as of the date you're in the system and does not include post dated transactions.
Not all staff have access to the full Xero suit and cannot access the bank accounts.
Currently, Xero does not allow manual journals to be entered against Bank Accounts.
Xero integrates nicely with Bank Accounts, Credit Cards, and PayPal.
I have completed this bank transaction however I am not sure how to reconcile this in xero against their accounts so it appears as zero amount owing.
Starting today you can reconcile your bank accounts using our mobile app, Xero Touch.
Looking to set up a client on Xero with two Streamline Merchant Accounts, are bank feeds available ?
Secondly - our casual staff are paid from different bank accounts - is this possible on xero payroll?
##### CLUSTER 129 #####
Hi,Just moving from another system.
Hi folks,Just started the using the system and have received a water bill.
Hi,Just wondering what other firms do with signed tax documents, ITR/Bas etc, once they are signed and saved to a secure electronic storage area.
Hi there, just looking for some advice.
Hi there, just a quick query.
Hi just a quick question.
Hi I've just been given a load of stock items which i would normally buy for free.
Hi,I have a client who sells antiques and secondhand goods and has just registered for VAT on the margin scheme.
Hi all, I can't refresh my feed to Barclays, it just takes forever and then times out and says there is a problem.
Hi All,Just having trouble in terms for presentation of the income tax expense.
Hi all,Apologies if I'm flooding the forum with questions now, I'm just getting my head around things.
Hi just wondering about the Bartercard feed - why it only comes through once a month instead of daily (or even weekly would be ok).
Hi,Just a minor suggestion that will help with the audit trail, is it possible to create an option to route a bill back to the Awaiting Approval queue?
Hi guys,We've just noticed that there has been a change made to the visibility of client's TFNs.
Hi All,Just wondering if anyone has a suggestion on how to manage suspending an approved bill.
Hi Just a request.
Hi I have just noticed that you have made a change to the layout for Contacts.
Hi There, A client has just suggested the ability to attach a file to a payrun and/or timesheet.
Hi,I have just authorised my first expense claim, but I have entered the wrong reporting date.
Hi I have just added an monthly payroll Employee effective 1 July 2015.
Hi,Just a couple of suggestions to improve the Payroll.
Hi,Just wondering is there a way that employees can send payroll a message directly from My Payroll without having to do a separate email.
Hi guys,Just changed from a Sole Trader to a Limited Liability Company last year.
Hi, I've just noticed that the 'Copy to' function has rolled out to my org.
Hi allI'm just trying to get a view of how you are all using this.
Hi,I've just realized that I can't change a user name with a same email address.
Hi, total noob here just playing with the trial to suss things out.
It is a place where you can connect with them, ask questions or sometimes just say hi!
Hi,I have just taken on a client who is a Tradie.
Hi all,Just wondering whether you include commissions payable on employees group certs?
Hi,I am having trouble accounting for some wage overpayments that were made to employees (just one of many challenges I am currently facing in my workplace!
Hi I have just entered all the details to run a payroll tot row for 1 casual employee.
Hi there,We have a few employees who don't just work the normal 7.
Hi There, Just wondering if anyone can help me.
Hi,Just noticed this.
Hi, I'm a small ltd co with just myself as director.
Hi Everyone,I'm really stuck and Just wanting some direction on what to do.
Hi there,I have just renewed the contract of a employee, with changes to be backdated.
Hi just wondering if anybody has tested the above and would love some feedback.
Hi Just wanted to see if anybody has a recommendation for an Online Roster Tool - that will allow me to post a monthly roster and allow for updates and notification to our team.
Hi,Just a little suggestion.
Hi everyone, Been trying to access employees for the past half an hour and I'm getting and error message: Is this just me?
##### CLUSTER 130 #####
I would like to import older client invoices into Xero - No problem there, but I want to Mark 99% of them as paid.
It looks like that the person change to Xero and the people who did that, forget some invoices or payments somewhere.
Xero invoices have URLs like https://go.
I would like to be the option of saving an outgoing e-mail regarding invoices or statements if I have tailored the narrative from the the template, without the hassle of sending it to myself and then back to Xero.
Ideally I would like to choose to see this in my Xero Dashboard, but within the Repeating Invoices area would be good enough.
But, to decrease inventory in Xero, and view details in Reports>Inventory Item Details, that I like, I have to create invoices.
I am finding that despite all the good intentions of people at Xero that I have contacted regarding the set up of invoices, and the referencing back to the help, screens, there simply is not enough good information there to assist in getting this vital step set up exactly the way I would like.
I would like to convert this client from Reckon to Xero but it does not allow for delivery dates on invoices.
Ideally I'd like to have the Stripe transactions recorded as separate invoices by customer (so we have customer history within Xero), including netting off the Strip fee as a separate cost of sale expense.
Can Unleashed create invoices like Xero?
##### CLUSTER 131 #####
I would like to use Xero, and plan on implementing the following approach.
I was going to use:Purchase VAT @ 23% not for resalePurchase VAT @23% for resaleSales VAT @ 23%Exempt VAT @0%And then repeat for Originating outside the EU for things like Xero.
So I'd like to use Xero in a way that assumes that any materials (timber etc) or consumables (glue, screws etc) are for a current or imminent project.
I did google for the same issues however no useful results showed up, maybe not much sole trader like me will use Xero I guess.
It is the only reason we are using Freshbooks and would really like to use Xero exclusively.
For folks like me with an LLC that compensates members via owner's draw, this means I cannot use Xero Payroll.
Looking at setting up a branch so would like to use Xero .
I like many others, have transferred from MYOB to Xero and have enjoyed the use of job numbers.
I have 4 small companies that I would like to use Xero for.
The issue: If you have multiple stores/locations with staff and you use Xeros timesheets feature you CANNOT calculate your bottom line on your P&L as Xero cannot allocate super or other areas of your staffing costs to tracking categories, like stores/locations.
We would like to use third party payroll software not the xero payroll.
We are trying to integrate Tradegecko with Xero for a retail client and would like to know if anyone is or could recommend a Tradegecko specialist that we can use to.
We currently have our own bespoke system but would like to integrate something with Xero as we now use this for our accounting software.
Therefore we would like our employees to use timebilling and push it through to Xero payroll.
I use and like Xero.
##### CLUSTER 132 #####
For quote orders, I use the default Xero invoice numbering.
We use Workflow Max to generate an invoice and that automatically gets fed into Xero as a draft.
If the customer could use the Xero Statement  to tick off the invoice numbers and email back.
We use Braintree on our website, and it’d be really great IMO if it was an option for Xero invoice payments too.
The current Xero invoicing set up only allows the use of product codes when selecting a product on an invoice.
Anyone have any ideas on how to manage the use of invoice discounting companies within Xero?
##### CLUSTER 133 #####
This has been fine to manage as I use bespoke reporting to show the extended P&L, but as I approach the new year-end I have noticed that my Balance Sheet is not correct, as the current FY is picking up Retained Earnings from 30/4/16, when my actual last Y/E was 31/1/16.
what use are you to a new user?
The two issues that I've come across with clients who use the SBE Pool are:1) Adding in new assets to the pool, and getting the 15% deduction in the first year - even putting the purchase date as 1 January, the calculation never gets to be exactly half of 30%2) Adding in items that can be immediately written off.
But if we use the new method of Editing the Dashboard no shortcut is shown.
Hello,At present when i create a new purchase order I use the '+ Search from contacts' option.
It would be great if the new ability to use your webcam to take a photo of your source docs was accessible through this dialog box.
One thing that is missing, and that we use a lot, is the function of dialling in to HMRC from within the payroll software to retrieve and apply new tax codes.
As it is now a new month I expected these to reset so that I could use my 20 reconciliations for the month.
I have set up a new Branding Theme for use by one specific contact.
They also had the cheek to tell me that I needed to get a new computer in order to use the Digita company secretarial software as mine was too old hence the reason it kept freezing!
##### CLUSTER 134 #####
We also need the ability to amend the invoice re stock details once codes / product lines are known.
I know it would be easy to single invoice but my need to track cashflow which would be about $100 000 per month would fall apart.
We need to automate or capture into our accounting system that 90% of activity that is *not* handled as an invoice.
I believe I will need to Invoice a family for each Qtr for the number of children they have.
I need to send the Invoice number related to each fixed asset to my Audit firm.
I invoice hosting annually but domain names need renewing throughout the year.
this will only cause confusion to the customer where they only need to see one invoice line, not multiple.
2. when we want to record receivable, should we create an invoice or do we need to record this kind of transaction in manual journal or spend money?
We now need to indicate that this invoice has been paid by the customer5.
But I need this invoice to be posted in August.
It is such a great tool if you need to split expenses on the fly or calculate % for invoice lines.
We need to have a routine created that will allow us to post the deposits without the existance of an invoice.
Hello,I need to invoice a refundable bond (which will be held for a couple of years).
Sometimes when invoicing there are special requirements or information that need to be added to an invoice.
That would be so helpful because currently I have post it notes all around and/or a notebook list with various things that may need be added to an invoice.
I'd never send an invoice without our full contact details on it as people need to know who to contact if they have any queries or if changes are needed.
My products are organically certified, and as a requirement I need to have the EU organic logo on every invoice.
Is there anyway to move/delete/archive them as most of them are a few years old and I don't need to see them, I would rather see my current invoice list.
We need to invoice say 80% of base $100k portion, plus 30% of variation A $20k portion, plus 100% of Variation B $5k portion.
I need to create an invoice showing 2 things.
However they cancelled a portion of their invoice and I need to refund them $110 (inc GST).
I put through the security deposit as an invoice and issue a receipt when the deposit is made - this can sometimes be 12 months in advance so I need to do this to keep track of what and who has paid.
They also need to create a separate excel document with an invoice for that number of days.
It would work as follows:Date:          Reference:                Supplier/Customer:            Details:        Gross:   GST:    Net:There is NO NEED to show the separate transactions and line items that make up each invoice.
Payments made on a different day would not be rule applicable but need to be matched to an ad hoc invoice.
I need this for a client with selective invoice financing.
That way it would be obvious which clients already have automatic invoice reminders going out, & which clients need a manual follow-up.
com/us/Receipts$ViewPDFYou need a print receipt at the same screen of taking the receiptThere's already View Invoice - Send Receiptbut if you want to print receipt, which why would I not want to print a receipt for the customer while they're standing right there in front of me, you have to go though a bunch of additional steps.
It is only very rare that I need to refer to an invoice older than 6 months - and I can reset the dates at the top anyway.
We have a lot of demand from clients who are set up on the invoice only user role who also need to view reports.
Sometimes, we need to modify the default terms for a specific invoice and it is annoying to have to go through the docx template.
Currently we have date, supplier, price etc but I really need to have the invoice number as well.
This works fine, other than currently, we need to print each invoice individually rather than in a batch mode.
This would mean that each invoice would need to have the ability to upload a unique image file.
For an UK company the Invoice issued in Euro currency for fiscal rules we need to show also the total amounts in GBP.
At the moment, my staff can enter an invoice, but then I need to approve and send it.
Ye really need to change the layout to utilise the space more efficiently as there is a lot of blank space available between the Customer name/address and the Invoice Date.
I need to invoice clients in ROI in Euros.
But this parameter is not set after import, meaning that you manually need to edit each invoice draft and set the Tax Rate again.
Do I need to push expenses through the Invoice module?
I have an employee who posts invoice on the system for me to appove, however he doesnt need approval for purchase orders.
I need this function when we email sale invoice, I always attach receipts to support the charges for client.
Do I need to also do something with Joe X's invoice itself?
Do I need to generate an invoice ala the Payruns or something else?
We don't need inventory management, GPS tracking, scheduling, invoice generation on the spot etc.
An Invoice to then be generatedThere are high volumes of transactions daily, so would need this to be automated.
Would also need to easily reconcile cash collected with each invoice.
Basically i need to fetch my clients invoice details.
Each invoice would need to list every job by date, pick-up and drop-off destination.
Why would we need to see the email address of the person at the company when we are creating an invoice?
##### CLUSTER 135 #####
Hi there,I was hoping someone might be able to help me with the best practice for reconciling my National Insurance Contributions.
Hi,I'm hoping someone may be able to offer some assistance.
Hi everyoneI wonder if you might be able to help me.
Hi alljust wanted to run this passed a few people who may be able to help with suggestions.
Hi team, It would be great for employers to be able to generate a Gantt chart of all employees and their requested / scheduled leave to assist with deciding whether to approve leave etc / keep track of staff movements.
Hi team,Likely a silly question, but I have not been able to find the answer myself.
Hi,I've searched for hours now but haven't been able to find the help needed on the forum so apologies if it has already been answered.
Hi, i'm hoping someone will be able to help me with this.
Hi , it would be helpful when you search for a prospect or customer to be able to see any quotes in their contact page
Hi,I'm hoping someone might be able to help out.
Hi The classic reports had a nice feature of being able to save views.
Hi,I hope someone might be able to help me with this.
Hi All,I'm hoping some one will be able to help with this tricky problem I have.
Hi and sorry if this has been answered before but I have not been able to find the right thread.
Hi,I am hoping that someone will be able to help me.
##### CLUSTER 136 #####
I guess the proper solution would be to have two xero accounts - one business and the other personal but then I have yet another monthly bill.
We are planning to switch our business accounts and Xero integration is an important consideration.
We are a small business and we have been using Xero for accounts for the last year.
I have a business that has multiple branches and each director has a login to Xero to see the accounts.
I assume though that Xero does work with Chase US Business Checking accounts?
We have been running our small business accounts using excel until now and are trying the xero trial.
We are a dental practice and in the process of setting up xero chart of accounts relevant to our business.
I have two Xero sets of accounts, one for my own business, the other for a client.
We have 4 separate entities operating via separate Xero accounts and as a combined group (commonly controlled business) Payroll Tax is now applicable.
##### CLUSTER 137 #####
It is a real bear to reconcile the bank feed credit card deposits to the individual invoices.
Therefore this causes a big discrepancy because my invoices would never match up with my bank deposits.
Because the invoices are closed, they do not appear in the bank rec screen.
I've done my first bank reconciliation and entered VAT amounts for each invoices we've paid.
I can import the bank statements from July, but I have no invoices to reconcile with.
It would be great if there was a condition where you can search for invoices that have been marked as paid but have not been matched with a bank feed item.
For example paying off 20 invoices for a supplier, but then the amount comes through in 2 parts on the bank statement, there is no way to reconcile doing it this way.
I have one transaction coming into the bank for a days worth of invoices paid by credit card.
But a system that OCR'd receipts and invoices and matched to bank statements so all i'll have to do is click "OK", reconciling 100's of transactions in minutes not hours.
When I reconcile matches on paid invoices that show up in the bank statement as matches.
Any email  attachments can be added to the contact (ideal for supplier statements or bank details) and can also be added to bills, invoices or quotes.
##### CLUSTER 138 #####
I future-pay bills, and it would be great to see my maximum exposure on each bank account, at a glance.
£400 was withdrawn from the Main Bank Account to pay for purchases.
I am sending money in GBP (from my bank account) to Currency Fair and then exchange it to USD and pay my suppliers from the same platform.
I buy a product from a supplier (example &#163;400)They offer me a 15% discount on the product (&#163;60)I have to order the product online and pay the full price from my bank account.
However - my pickle - there have been about 10 occasions in the very early days when I had to pay suppliers/providers etc from my personal bank account - some of which are tax claimable (i'm VAT registered).
Is there a way to pay these spend money transaction by simply transferring respective money to a personal or another bank account?
In terms of tax purposes, is it better for me to save this money in my company’s account and pay myself a dividend cheque when I saved enough, or pay myself regularly, and save the money in my personal bank account?
Interac Online in Canada allows the customer to pay for their purchases easily, directly from their bank account.
Or one can have all money concentrated in one account from where you pay bills so you never pay the bank dishonour fees.
The Booking Fees that I put into the Agency bank account is used to to pay our Direct Expenses, our freelancer agents and finally my partner and I. I have not managed this yet.
A couple of employees received an overpayment above their net wages to their bank account in the previous payroll and have agreed to have the amounts deducted out of their next pay.
to make wages record the pay run transaction and subtractin it from bank account?
Again, to keep transactions separated, we wish to pay our employees from a different bank account depending on which office they work in.
##### CLUSTER 139 #####
Hi,We recently opened a paypal account and they made two test transactions of 10c deposits to our account.
Hi,I have a client who has a trust account and a transaction account.
Hi,I have an account set up called Rental Income, this is set up as a revenue account but won’t show whenever I run a P&L.
Hi,I am doing a manual journal entry to account for GIC from the ATO in my Integrated Client Account.
Hi, one of our client has foreign currency gains and losses account (expense account) shown in profit and loss with an account balance -$6000.
Hi,The title mention account appears to have been the previous default account for wages payable.
Hi Guys,Hopefully someone can help me out here, we paid wages for our employees yesterday however one has bounced back due to the employee having an incorrect account number,I now have a credit in my account sitting there to be reconciled, however i don't know what to reconcile it to?
##### CLUSTER 140 #####
Currently we have to wait until invoice is approved to recognise the expense (which in our business takes a while) which isnt correct practice, otherwise we are having to do heaps of accruing at the end of the monthSurely there is a way for expenses to be recognised in the P&L as they are entered into the systemThanks in advance
By storing this at invoice level (and perhaps in P/Os too) - companies can easily monitor information that's key to their business.
I run a small business and we work on providing one quote but request multiple payments and invoice accordingly.
Nowadays especially for small business , for a cashflow reasons you create invoice for the customers first to receive funds which will allow you to go forward and purchase necessary things to carry out project.
It would be great if the online quote/invoice feature looked at the business/trading name rather than the legal name.
Our business has a subscription plan, which corresponds to a repeating invoice.
Our business is Buy/Sell , and Sell/ BuyEvery invoice to a customer generates a purchase order to a supplier.
5% (example) of invoice totalThis is how real world business work.
I paid an invoice for &#163;1,000 last year to my local Business Federation.
As a business we have recently started using Invoice Financing.
My business rents out boats for parties, functions etc and when a customer says they want to go ahead and book a harbour cruise we send them an invoice.
Hello,we run a small no profit business and often deal with grants that have a total budget we invoice for over the months.
Most of the business who do EDI messaging might already have some kind of accounting systems which keep track of their Invoice and other Documents.
##### CLUSTER 141 #####
Hello there-I've just started using Xero and I know this may seem simple, but where do you claim or reconcile for monthly rent for a business?
I have a small real estate business and just started using Xero.
My hubby has just started his own business and I am in the process of setting up Xero.
Our business started in Aug 2012 and we just start using Xero last month.
com/business/discussion/137491/June 2015 - Again, it would be an awesome thing to have in Xero - just not something we'll get to for a while.
We have all (8) our businesses, Trusts, holiday home, daughter's business etc in Xero,  and flick between them regularly, so could you make this Recent list show All businesses under the one login, or at least 10 rather than just the latest 5 it currently shows.
Hello,I run a business that is registered in both Australia & Germany - we've been using Xero for about 6 months in Australia and it's just brilliant.
We're trying to move our business from Sage to Xero and I just wanted to check the best way to set it up.
com/business/discussion/100381/#answer, and just so you know I think Xero is fantastic.
I just started managing a business and using Xero.
I've just started our business on Xero and in the process of transitioning across our data from 1 Jul through to 31 Dec 13.
##### CLUSTER 142 #####
Now that I have been approved for my business checking and credit cards which I have in my possession and using in place of personal, should i delete out my personal accounts?
My finances are all mixed business and personal across all cards, loans and accounts.
The business did not exist in 2014 and the above entry is the only transaction shown on the accounts.
I'm working on setting up my business's chart of accounts and am curious if I'm going about it the right way.
Now we have business accounts.
I have setup 2 business accounts for our startup.
I don't want my employees to see our full list of GL accounts - it's none of their business.
I have paid $700 from my personal accounts in incorporation costs such as ASIC fee, business name registration, logo design etc.
au email address, to get access to our business accounts, given that the email id has been previously been deleted.
To move this from small business 1 or 2 people to 30 people in organisation it needs:User Level Access - Expense Claims Only - No Payables or receivables on the home screen, no contacts, no accounts.
It would be good to have an email template for Payroll, pleaseLuci FerriniYour Business Accounts
We are currently a wholesale business, selling electrical installation equipment and lighting to contractors, on credit accounts.
I tick that to select it, then click the 'Apply Rule' button and select the split accounts rule I've set up for this type of purchase, with business and private %.
I have 2 PayPal accounts for the same business but only 1 is in zero.
During the reconciliation of one particular business accounts I often find I'm reconciling a transaction I already addressed prior.
Designed for business owners and finance professionals who want a fast, accurate and cost-effective way to file their company accounts and tax return.
##### CLUSTER 143 #####
Hi AllThis has been asked a few times but I can only find links to systems such as Cin7 which I am unable to use.
Hi there,We use Capital On Tap as a regular loans service.
Hi there,Along with work use, I have a cashbook subscription for my own personal self for budgeting etc.
Hi,We want to use the expense claims to replace travel diaries, so I was going to collect all the costs of a trip on one claim.
Hi, I'm a designer and use the Adobe Creative Cloud Software Subscription to work.
Hi all,I keep a track of my tax liability manually so as not to get too much of a shock at the end of the year, and use a manual journal entry to (830) Income Tax Payable, so it shows in the balance sheet on income tax payable.
Hi there,  we are a "Sprint" Courier and we use Digital Waybill for our day to day work requests.
Hi XeroI use your files feature extensively.
Hi Support,Can we use payroll cals tax in Thailand?
Hi The payslips should be emailed from a chosen email other than the one we use for log in.
Hi,I am trying to use custom contact links using the Contact ID to link to an internal database system.
Hi All,I use Box (www.
Hi We have had an employee who has created themselves to use the 30 day free trial rather than as an employee.
Hi,Our "holiday year" runs April -> April with a roll-over period until 1st May to use up any unspent days.
Hi, Does anyone know of an app that mostly our contractors and a few employees can use to enter in their hours, what job they are on, attach documents and receipts.
##### CLUSTER 144 #####
Invoices for creditors to show as cost of sales.
For example we have invoices currently using 4000 Sales Type A and 4001 Sales Type B. we want to put for example 50% of these invoices and credits notes in the current year over to 4003 Sales Type C. The find and recode function under adviser seems limited in this case as  we have invoices with multiple lines with different account's codes per line.
I tried importing a CSV to populate sales invoices today that had a discount of 100 set to it (was for free shipping).
Our sales prior to 1st July don't show VAT, which is good, but our payable invoices were always added as Expenses with 20% VAT.
Invoices for inbound money are coded to Sales.
Currently we draft sales invoices and email to client.
Don't really want to get into generating sales or purchase Invoices as this would make the process unmanageable.
We have been adding VAT to some sales invoices for commission which actually aren't subject to VAT.
Last summer we used Square and manully entered invoices with line items to adjustthe square sales.
Then assign the incoming daily sales invoices from our POS to each site?
However, I am left with a mammoth task of allocating over 1000 Purchase and Sales invoices to credits/receipts (as this is not done as part of the conversion).
I only send my customers sales invoices by email.
My question is - when recording sales invoices and receipts what VAT option should I be selecting?
I have reconciled all of the transactions to my sales invoices but have been left with a list of paypal fees.
HiI have tried to import a large bulk csv of sales invoices using item codes.
We get the same error (with no reference to the item causing the issue) when we process our weekly sales invoices, with many product items thereon.
When viewing the customers details pages that shows sales activity and contact info etc, it would be really helpful to have a link to any repeating invoices that are active on that particular customer.
Allow a sales person to draft/send quote without letting him to see other's quote and invoices.
the same feature as in in the purchase/sales invoices section.
We have each store "branch" set up as a Tracking Category and record all sales invoices to the appropriate branch.
I only send my customers sales invoices by email.
Currently our sales team invoices using the App on their iPads and adding the tracking to each item is very tedious.
A very simple one, on sales and purchases when you have a draft item, a number appears in brackets indicating the number of invoices/bills in Draft.
It would be really useful to see the foreign currency invoices in Sales/Purchases translated into the base currency.
I simply want Sales by Customer based upon invoices issued (net of credits).
Currently the match tab for sales invoices only shows:1.
Allow Primary User to perform ALL DATA ENTRY functions :        Create Sales Invoices, Purchases        Receive money/ spend money 2.
It's currently not possible to import data for bills, sales invoices, contacts, inventory etc.
We currently receive 4 sales invoices each day based on the 4 currencies we are currently accepting.
e. g. each of our sales invoices are uploaded to the files area and stored by month.
Moreover, it would very useful if we could have feature which allows to assign bill already to existing Sales Invoices.
Where (Overdue By) is the 'Overdue by' value listed against Sales > Invoices.
Placeholders are a great addition to sales invoices, email templates, etc.
Eg  an option for the user to approve drafts, and see read only sales invoices receipted and bills paid.
It would be great to have a feature when you email sales invoices or statements to a customer with a dropdown to select the from and reply to email addresses.
There should be a way on the sales screen to filter by creator on invoices , drafts etc.
Sales reps and managers often want to be cc:ed on invoices.
Problem we have is that this happened and now all suppliers have voided bills and therefore sales invoices reporting option shows up under contacts when there is no history.
The option to have a detailed view down to invoices or a total sales top line would be great.
When generating sales invoices in our previous accounting package, we could see percentage markup on the product line.
The "All" invoices tab in "Sales" (and the related search) should including the tick-boxes that are present in all the other tabs.
Her sales invoices have been entered (only 30max) but some of the allocations are incorrect.
The system I am exporting the invoices from will give me line items with the quantity, unit amount and sales tax amount.
The sales "invoices" that are polled over are marked PAID and do not populate as a possible match.
On average, I import about 200 sales invoices.
Sometimes this will happen several times before the import works and imports all of the sales invoices in the file.
it worked fine for the sales invoices and pulled through the data that we required, however never gave the option and is not available to process credit notes against refunds.
It is possible to attach documents to supplier credit notes, however, unlike sales invoices it is not possible to view the attached document without selecting - Credit Note Options - Edit.
It would be good to have a quick way to print a list of invoices for a specified customer (or supplier) for a specified date range - same functionality as MYOB's Sales and Purchases Registers.
I have a Paypal button on my sales invoices.
When this user examine the Sales invoices awaiting paid, this appears as normal.
It will export a csv of sales invoices and the column format is designed to import straight into Sage 50.
From excel I used to have a column which showed unpaid sales invoices along with a due date and 'no.
A percentage of the sales invoices is paid straight away by the third party discounting company and the rest paid when the client pays less a fee.
Is there an App that helps me track my expenses associated with a particular sales Invoices?
I also have a similar issue with the woocommerce sales invoices but the volume is a lot lower.
Have all sales invoices and payments imported directly from website to Xero2.
The usability of Dashboard has been expanded and now allows you to directly drill down into transactions, or quickly perform common tasks such as initiate stock reorder or adding sales invoices or bills.
##### CLUSTER 145 #####
Then, we reconcile the invoice with the respective amount in Bank Reconciliation Statement.
We create a purchase invoice, reconcile it with the respective amount in Bank Statement and then again create a separate statement in a spread sheet and mail them.
10 to the customer (my mistake because I didn't read the invoice correctly thus ending up making two bank payments).
- I reconcile the $300 from the bank feed and mark invoice as paid.
I invoice a client for $1000The client pays the full $1000 invoice through an international wire transfer - bank to bank.
The problem I have is that the payments do not show up in the bank reconciliation list, so I have several transactions that I can't match up because they are for a standard amount and I don't know which invoice that they are paying.
- Invoice = IDR 200,000- Bank line = SGD 20 (but I set reference as 200,000)Is there a way to make this easier?
I paid an invoice via internet banking, due to entering the banking details incorrectly the bank refunded the money.
They then settled the Invoice via bank transfer.
So we wait for the funds to come out of the bank, then put the invoice total as whatever we got charged from the bank in GBP, even though the actual paper invoice may be in USD.
Can I reconcile this $800 directly against my net invoice amount on bank reconciliation tab?
I notice that when I have an invoice and a bank feed line matches that amount it allows me to reconcile.
It seems user rights have to be standard in order for them to create or edit an invoice yet this level also allows them to see bank feeds etc?
I have a client who has an invoice finance facility which the bank require a minimum coverage of stock of 2 times (at all times)
This could apply to journals, bank imports or even invoice/bill creation.
This could then ultimately tie into a process that increments the invoice value by 8% pa above bank base rate ( currently 0.
there really needs to be an option to reconcile an invoice by selecting multiple transactions when reconciling bank transactions.
Well, the Bank rules do not seem to allow the action to be 'Match' to this invoice.
I have a Credit note that has published from Receipt Bank, I wish to allocate this against an unpaid invoice.
The first bank statement line can be seen with the invoice total before refund with the refund being seen at a later date on another line.
So, I now have:A bank reconciliation sitting there for &#163;1,000 andA prior invoice for &#163;1,000 being the original subscription costs.
I have one invoice from my solicitor, which I made three bank payments for it.
Now, I have three bank transactions and one invoice.
BUT, this would mean that the bank transaction would be sitting in the feed until the invoice is created, is that correct?
Having the link to the invoice on the bank rec screen is also handy.
##### CLUSTER 146 #####
So when FIS decides to make changes in its code Xero can't log in because Yodlee can't log in and Xero has no means of action with the bank or FIS.
had a lengthy to and fro with a xero customer service chap last month during which he suggested that my bank refferences were coming through to xero incorrectly.
The bank feeds are however somehow mixing up reference numbers and supplier names on import for some items, so in Xero instead of having easily identified supplier names that easily map to all my rules and history I am now having an increased occurance of reference numbers as the payee instead of the vendor which is then throwing out all sorts of wierd suggestions for coding from Xero.
My system setup is Xero for accounting, connected via the integration to Expensify for my expenses tracking, and with Xero linked to my bank to pick up statements.
However in the last 48 hours I have had no support at all from XERO in trying to fix a simple bank feed for a client, despite sending numerous emails to XERO support.
Xero says that the bank transaction of &#163;110 is too big for the Xero transaction (of &#163;100) so I can't do anything, and if I try to match the &#163;10, it can't find the transaction I want as it is a debit transaction not a credit.
Since Xero does not yet support direct connections with Rabobank (NL) I've created two simple scripts to import Rabobank bank statement into Xero and vice versa.
We had set them up on Xero and had their bank feeds active from July 13 and as he is regaling me this story I am internally going "thank God for Xero" as we had enough copies of paperwork to reconstruct the first quarter.
##### CLUSTER 147 #####
I love Xero and really really hate Intuit so I am trying everything I can't to stay and grown with Xero, if you are not prepared or don't have the man hours to manually import all of your transactions then this is not a safe place for your business accounting.
I have a business set up under Xero, and I also volunteer as treasurer for a non-profit, which I set up in Xero as well.
Set the scene:We are using Xero business for clients personal income/expenses as Xero Personal didn't quite have the reporting functionality we were after.
I mean: Can my taxes be reduced because I paid for a subscription to Xero because I think that subscription to Xero could be considered a business expense, couldn't it ?
Why not start "Xero U Credits for Business Owners", starting off with basic knowledge of day to day operations on Xero?
It would be awesome to have a Xero feed so you could combine your Xero data with other business & bigdata sources.
I have only been using Xero for 12months and am still learning how to effectively run our small business using Xero - so bear with me please.
Hello Xero community,We are a small business operating on cash rather than accrual basis and operate through Leap integrated into Xero.
##### CLUSTER 148 #####
21 was subsequently returned to the bank and included in a weekly Cash to bank although some time laterHow do I reconcile this?
If I could copy the conditions from bank rules or copy entire bank rules (w. all conditions) from one client to another client, this feature would save me a tremendous amount of time.
Auto suggest picks up from transactions created previously (incorrect) leaving one to copy and paste 100's of transactions (time waster)This request is to create a bank rule that will draw the description from the imported bank statement line, into the description field on the transaction that Xero creates.
One way to do this might be to allow you to create a condition based on last time bank rule was used and/or how many times the bank rule was used in the last N days or months.
At this point in time they have to refresh the bank feeds on a daily basis and only the person who has logged in with their online details can refresh bank feeds.
csv file that would bridge the missing bank statement entries from the time of conversion to when the bank feeds started.
##### CLUSTER 149 #####
Would be awesome if we could add in our own custom fonts for our own invoice designs.
Normally I add any expenses I incur on a shoot onto the invoice I send my client.
I create an invoice, add the tracked item, invoice is paid.
Because when I write up the purchase invoice I add shipping at the bottom, because I paid actual shipping on my purchase.
Option 1 : Add a negative line on the invoice.
Where do I add their charity number so that it displays on the invoice?
My question is:- is it possible to add the invoice after the transaction?
or do I have to delete the transaction then make the invoice and add the payments again ?
I understand that I can add a credit to a specific client without allocating such to an invoice, which might not be generated for months later.
We want to add other text to an invoice on an invoice by invoice basisSo at the top a heading that says what the project is called and a field so we can add the clients PO number.
My first question is how do I go about bringing the invoice into Xero - do I add it as an invoice for the annual amount, less payments to date and allocate to 433 - Insurance?
I can't find anywhere to change the font size to make this fit or an option to automatically add all of your contact details to an invoice.
I'm also trying to figure out if I can add our Scottish Charity Number to the invoice as it only shows our registered company number.
The invoice settings allow me to add a total net amounts with tax totals that show in AUD based on the exchange rate for that day when the invoice is created.
Is there a way that I can add multiple email recipients to invoice?
To add to the problem, I inadvertently used 2016 as the date for the overpayment, so now the invoice keeps showing up in aged payables, even though it's paid.
If not, I suppose I should add a feature request to Xero that would allow you to modify an invoice with payments as long as the payments don't exceed the final invoice amount.
I currently add repeats to Google calendar that sync's to my phone and a manual diary for making notes to invoice and quote.
It would be really help to add an option to change or copy a bill to an invoice or an invoice to a bill after it has been created.
Fo example today I needed to add more than ten lines to the middle of an invoice.
Oh, and let me add the tracking option from inside the invoice so I don't have to save the invoice, then go add it (oops - I have to jump to the bottom of the page) then change the invoice.
This would be a great feature to add to the custom invoice templates.
It would also be great to have more lines on an invoice without having to 'ádd line' or an easier way to add a line.
Add definable Invoice Period Date Range within the invoice generation function.
If a name has been spelt incorrectly or has changed to add in a spouse, or changed for taxation purposes, at this stage, the repeating invoice continues to be generated with the old details.
Same again happens if I manually enter invoice #12 and "Approve & add", it again will jump back to the blank Invoice #10, rather than continuing on sequentially to #13.
Would be possible to add the client name to the invoice and quote file name.
Enhance the "Assign expenses to a customer" and "Select billable expenses" option by adding/linking the "reference" field from the assigned expense to the window that displays the "select billable expenses" to add to a customer invoice.
One is to add to  Quotes - a link that allows your potential clients to click the No cowboys logo on the invoice or email and it will go straight to their site with Your feedback from other customers on it.
We’ve created this thread to gauge demand specifically for the ability to add/remove line items of a paid/part-paid invoice.
With an invoice, the options are to save in various forms on the left, and on the right, we can approve, approve and add another, approve & view or approve and print.
It is great that you can add a tracking code when you are creating an invoice but this does not seem to be available to 'invoice only' users?
This would allow us to add this link wherever we choose, including as a link to an image placed within the invoice.
Hello,It would be great to have the capability to add the toogle:InvoiceAmountDue("division bars" ) *cardtext ("division bars" ) *caps  Invoice CurrencyIn order to have for instance  100$  => "Namely hundred dollars"Thank you very much,Julie,
It would be much more convenient to add telephone numbers to the contact details when editing the address -- though obviously, we don't want the numbers to show on the invoice.
Add more lines to invoice quickly / in bulk instead of currently having to tab down or click on the button once per line
At the moment we are using the Awaiting Approval step to do two things, one to check that the invoice has been drafted correctly and two to add the PO number or reference.
The ability to either customise the invoice approval workflow with my own steps or simply to add a step between drafting and approval called finalise.
to manually add this cc:ed person onto each invoice email, including either finding their email address in a different system, or hiding their email address in a field meant for something else to make it easier to find if I remember to look for it.
The print double sided would add a blank page after an invoice with an odd number of pages (1, 5, 113, etc).
When you hit the approve button for an invoice, there are a number of options, such as approve and add another, or approve and print.
I think having a direct link to 'add another invoice' would be logical and more efficient.
Is it possible to add a code in the description field that will reflect this and not reflect the month the invoice is generated "MONTH+1"  as a crude example?
Add the filer in the existing "Payable Invoice Detail" or 3.
How can I enter an expense claim for him and make it billable so I can add it to the invoice?
The steps I'm taking:1) Search for the invoice number and wait for results2) Click on the invoice3) In the  section, click in the date field4) Tab to the next field (this auto populates today's date)5) Start typing "un" for Undeposited Funds and click on the account6) Optionally Tab and enter a reference7) Click Add PaymentTry repeating the above 20 times in a row and you'll be a very frustrated user.
We noticed by chance when we were adding an item to an invoice that it did not add to the invoice total.
This has become so annoying when trying to add or edit an invoice.
How do I add a different due date to the items on my invoice?
Is it possible to add it under the current Invoice Total amount, in some easy way?
How do I add additional fields to a custom invoice template that I have downloaded?
If i add an invoice, it doesn't ask if I want to apply the credit.
Currently, we call customers/or they call us > write down their orders > add up the total > ensure it totals up > enter the data in Xero > print off invoice for customers > send invoice to customer.
Does anybody know of an add-on where our client can invoice based a 2 multipliers?
All of the add-on's I have tried / looked at seem to be based around a project or a job or to complex or create a invoice which i have to import etc so maintaining 2 systems and hoping someone has found a product that will help them do the following.
Staff issue a invoice to client and forget to add freight.
Would anyone know whether there is an "add on" compatible with "Zero" which you can search anything or all fields within a quote/invoice.
Search is terrible (see above) so this usually means opening up the contacts screen, locating the contact, editing to add their address, then going back to the draft invoice to click on Print PDF, wait a while for it to generate and then hit download.
##### CLUSTER 150 #####
How do I allocated that direct to them with out having to use the Prepayment GL account Thank you
Should I use another account and if so which one?
or do I use the owner's drawings account?
I'm trying to figure out how to use and account for a certain type of credit card reward:The credit card offers $500 in travel reimbursed as a signup bonus.
We will use the prepayment option to account for deposits received in this financial period.
I have a joint account with my wife that we use for all our home bills and general day to day stuff.
When we log into our online banking with santander (old alliance and leicester account)- we use the following URLhttps://corporate.
The second account we simply use to transfer PAYG, GST, and SUPER to save it for when the BAS comes.
I currently use MYOB Account Right and MYOB Payroll.
If I no longer wanted to use an account, but did not want to archive/delete it then the code ZZZ (to drop it to the bottom of reports) or DNU (Do Not Use) may be useful I guess.
If I use a different account type (such as current liability), then it functions as I would expect.
Is it correct if I use the  account?
I then use TransferWise to transfer the money to my Kiwibank (NZ) account.
What code do i use to account for our payments to him.
It would eb really useful to use account number as well.
It would be great if you had an option to use the account number as the unique ID (and allow contact name and other details to be overwritten if different) for people who are regularly importing from another package.
If we use Reports/Account Transactions, balances are turned  if you turn off conversion to main currency.
QuickBooks allows for their certified advisors to have a free QuickBooks Online Account for their own personal use.
I do use paypal a lot for buying stock, paying other expenses etc as well as transfering money to my main account.
We use PayPal so I set up a PayPal feed in a similar way to our current account.
Can more than one person running the same account use it simultaneously?
Please, do you know which account should I use to reconcile?
Is that the correct approach, and if so, should I use the 'Receive Money' option in the Citi card account?
Is there another category that I should use to label this withdrawal from paypal to my bak account (transaction (b) )?
I'm an account holder with InTouchCRM but i use Kashflow but want to use XERO
For my Amazon account, I use A2X integration software.
We currently use a merchant account with virtual terminal for these but we don't want to be exposed to the customer credit card details anymore.
##### CLUSTER 151 #####
I need to export itemised report showing motor vehicle expenses how do I do this?
We need some kind of reconciliation function where we can do a VAT run, whereby a full list of all transactions are shown, you do a vat run, and then next month when you open up the report it shows all transaction which were not part of the previous vat run or where edited.
In my situation, I need to manage multiple grants from multiple donors and report according to the grant budget requirements.
Say I have one project that is funded by two separate grants and I need to report expenditure on each grant separately.
I do not need anything in the report having to do with spend money transactions.
We’d need a report that shows each fund in a column, with opening balances for each fund on a row, expenses and income on rows, and then a row at the bottom which is the closing fund balances.
I have published a BAS report, I now need to un-publish as there has been a change made to the file since publishing and lodging the BAS.
The check voucher cannot hold this many, so I need some way to print a report or a list of the bills paid with the check.
NZ Payroll - Employee Hours WorkedWe need a report that shows the Employee hours worked for a selected date range.
We need a feature to run a report showing which parts we have purchased from which suppliers, and at what cost.
We need GST report in ledger files.
We need to work out where to report all outstanding payable and receivable amounts at the right labels on the BAS based on tax rates/(codes).
ie I need to run a report showing all amount owing / outstanding for our livestock and buyer contacts.
HiI often need to run a report of Payments made to a group of contacts for a specified date range.
I need to pull a credit note report.
Currently if I want to run a Tracking Report I may need to access 2 or 3 or more GL Groups to find all transactions posted to a particular Tracking Category and then Merge them in Excel.
We need to run this report monthly.
From a US AICPA Peer Review Standard, we need to change title of report to Statement of Income & Expenses - Income Tax Basis.
That way, you only need to look for negative (bad) or positive (good) variances on the P&L report.
We need the ability to create a Profit & Loss Report that shows in the first column the financial year ended 31 March 2014 then beside this the financial year ended 31 March 2013 then in the next column the variance in $ terms and then the variance in % terms.
We need to send this report to clients, and it isn't very attractive at the moment - printing from excel.
For reporting purposes, I know we can export the stock summary report to Excel and tinkle it to show what we need.
We need a report which will provide a breakdown of wages cost by timesheet category.
I need to go to a separate report for this which will only show me leave transactions.
I need to report on payments received for a particular inventory item each month.
I have reconciled June, Yes June isnt a complete month yet (but i need the report for another reason)Even though I have reconciled June it doesn't show in the "reports"Help anyone?
##### CLUSTER 152 #####
Hi all,I work for a small property development company and we have various credit accounts with suppliers.
hi thereI am pulling together a clients accounts from 1 March 2015 to date.
Hi,We had accounts in AUD and CNY.
Hi,I have a number of different "accounts" that I process bills for from a single supplier.
Hi, I have accounts with three banks in Bermuda who are not listed foe receiving feeds.
Hi All,It would be great if it was possible to lock the chart of accounts from being changed by certain users (particularly clients).
Hi,We have clients that have multiple departments, but the with the same accounts department.
Hi all,I have a problem regarding inventory accounts.
Hi,I'm trying to process payroll for a Client today and I cannot open the Payroll accounts.
##### CLUSTER 153 #####
We would like to input the rate at which we hedge the currency as the currency rate on the payment.
In addition to this, the payment we receive in USD has also had a processing fee deducted from it which we'd like to include as well.
We are unable to have the amount refunded by the company, so would like to reconcile it to Bad Debt, so it won't keep appearing as awaiting payment under Bills?
I doesn't look like I have any payment methods either, feeling very trapped at the moment.
So as accounting amateur, I'd like to rephrase the question in two parts:Context: I'm a freelancer, and this payment is $500 to freelance assistant animator.
As this has come as one payment I would like to break it out and reconcile against WET and GST accordingly.
In order to claim a direct debit payment from our clients I would like the ability to export certain fields.
I. e. I like to type up a detailed description of a payment then paste it in instead of having to remember it as I type.
We do not batch all our payments under one transaction as we are still using cheques and would like individually match up each supplier payment rather than have on transaction which includes a multiple of suppliers.
For example in particular we would like to go into reports; Income by contact; select an individual contact and see each individual payment including gst, as well as the total including gst/contact for the period selected.
I would like to to see the function of exporting the batch payment details in a NACHA approved file format.
I would really like to see an auto bill feature connected to the payment services.
I have a number of clients that would like to have the ability to print of the Supplier Batch Payment to enable authorisation / reporting on the batch.
it says something like "Payment received from {Customer} on {Date} for {Amount} with reference {Reference}.
I believe this is important and would like to see options not to include these on the payment summary.
Quick question, it seems like the recommendation is to backdate conversion to after the tax payments or set the date in the future after tax payment.
com looked like a great option until we saw that it takes 5 days for a payment to reach a vendor.
##### CLUSTER 154 #####
Hi people,I need your help.
Hi GuysI need some help.
Hi, Sorry if this has been answered before but I really need to work this out.
Hi allIs there something you need to do in order to get the "Profit after Taxation" line in P&L to show correct information?
Hi EveryoneWe have a situation where we need to run two separate profit & loss reports for one entity.
Hi I need help?
Hi thereI have a few transactions that were posted to Subsistence through expense claims and had VAT claimed but they need to be reallocated to Entertainment, which is not deductible.
Hi everyone, I need some help and i have searched all the help topics to no avail.
Hi, I am checking some transactions prior to lodging a BAS, and have found a few that need to be changed from GST to GST free - I am not getting this option when I try to edit the transaction (Edit Spend Money).
Hi There,I need factor in 'spoilt stock' in to my clients P&L.
Hi there, I need help please!
Hi,I need some assistance recording the details of a loan / line of credit.
Hi, I need some advice on how to deal with retentions.
Hi,We are starting up a tourism venture that will encompass existing assets that have licensing and documents that need to be addressed on a particular date.
Hi, I'm getting completely confused on how to reconcile refunds and after several attempts at trying overpayments, credit notes etc I think I need to ask the expert community.
Hi All,need some advice.
Hi XeroThe Company I run uses Multiple Currency and at times when I am quoting or invoicing I will need to do 2 or more currency?
Hi,We have multiple employees all who require registrations/licences that we need to keep track of.
Hi there,Desperately need some help here.
Hi guys,Need some help.
Hi, I need a little advice with paying annual leave.
HI, I need to amend super & deduction entries for  some random employees on a weekly basis back to 6 Aug 15.
Hi all,I need some help!
Hi ,This is the first month that I need to submit the ATP PAYG Installment activity statement.
Hi,I need some help please!
Hi thereWe are hiring an apprentice and need to process his NI under category H, but there is no such option.
Hi All,Need some guidance.
##### CLUSTER 155 #####
Hi,We've only recently joined Xero and have brought our balanceS across from Reckon and was wondering if it is possible to import a unique code/number for each item in Chart of Accounts using the export/ import button?
Hi All,Looking to switch to Xero and I'm now investigating the Accounts Receivable.
Hi,I laready have directly sigend up multiple accounts for my different companies with XERO.
Hi, I am using Xero as a sole trader, i. e no legal entity,I am not publishing accounts and I am paying GST on payments basis.
Hi,I seem to have had a mental blank in checking through my accounts before starting up with Xero.
Hi,I am moving our companies accounts to Xero at the moment.
Hi Xero, I have two suggestions: 1:  When i (export) send out monthly statements or overdue accounts to customers your system ROUNDS off the cents.
##### CLUSTER 156 #####
I have started a used car sales business (in Scotland, UK).
On a monthly basis, after we have logged all our sales and expenses, our business also makes a provision for accrued costs (for which we will be invoiced in the future) and deferred costs (which relate to projects which will only have income in the future) - these sit on the balance sheet as liabilities and assets, respectively.
I've been perusing the community forum for help setting up consignment sales (for a business where I am the consignee) and I've had trouble finding good information on how best to do it.
Sales tax is exempt on goods for resale and never comes into the business.
Now my question is, how do I then transfer these sales lines (as the whole invoice for the register closure from VEND may also contain products sold that are not related to business 2) over to business 2 so they are recorded as sales there?
Our business likes to track our sales by geographic region.
I run a catering business and although some work will be invoiced predominantly it will be cash sales over the course of a day.
We are a small Deli Cafe business and most of our sales are through our till on daily cash and card payments.
Suited to small business, Mobileezy streamlines sales processes: capture orders, print and send data back to the office, and effectively manage stock and inventory levels.
I own a small helicopter touring/flight school business which uses an app called Rezdy to schedule all of our flights and sales.
Sometimes a business name might have been entered incorrectly by my sales people or we find we have to bill a different entity.
##### CLUSTER 157 #####
Hello,I regularly pay offshore elancers (through sites like Upwork and so on) for services, that form part of a service I charge my customers.
I have started to project manage some projects that I sub-contract out, and I would like some help figuring out how to automatically show how much money I'm making from the jobs after I pay the sub-contractors for their work.
As a freelancer I pay a lot for subscriptions to things like dropbox, adobe creative cloud etc.
For software I pay once for, like a plugin for After Effects, where would this go?
I have a client who has employees with debit cards to pay for expenses like postage or travel.
Would like an option to pay employees on last Friday of the month.
I'd like to request that payslips can be downloaded individually from the Pay Runs section rather than as one PDF file.
Any scheduled feature addition to have the pay now button include EFTs or to integrate with banks like Chase to do so?
I would like something more relevant such as 'click here to pay now' as I'm attaching it elsewhere.
I would like to see a really simple feature added within a pay run that tells you that payslips have been emailed to employees.
99% of our customers are invoiced ** plus gst, but occasionally a client has a gst inclusive amount they'd like to pay.
(Pay runs are conducted weekly)The advance would then be deducted out of pays, like a salary sacrifice agreement.
If I enter a leave form then September pay looks like it pays him an annual leave day for today (when he has already actually been paid for today).
I understand that it's not a requirement however I like my staff knowing that they don't have any sick leave left and that next pay if they take sick leave will be unpaid leave instead.
##### CLUSTER 158 #####
We import and are unable to add the tax rate GST on import to our chart of accounts.
If I run a set of accounts and delete the blank note items then later I want to add a note I have to rerun the template and delete the notes I don't want all over again.
When making transfers between accounts the ability to add a narrative would be very useful, especially when banking cash etc
I can't think why that would be, as it means I have to go back to the accounts tab to add it, when I'm already where I want to be.
Does anyone know if it is possible to add custom columns to the transaction list view, accessed via the Chart of Accounts.
Our firm prints checks on several accounts using blank check stock and there were several add-on solutions available for Quickbooks.
##### CLUSTER 159 #####
I was not happy with the response from Xero support who told me if I pay in a batch then no invoices will be displayed!
On January 1 of this year, we changed from a custom built accounting system with a web portal for customers to login and pay invoices to Xero.
BPAY with DEFT makes it easy for your customers to pay their Xero-issued invoices with BPAY – and easy for you to reconcile.
Pay and reconcile invoices generated in Xero with ease!
Get set up for "Pay Now" on  Xero invoices, fast and easily.
Easily pay and reconcile invoices generated in Xero.
##### CLUSTER 160 #####
Not much point having an 'Audit'  report if you cannot see the invoices that have been paid!
Is it possible to customise a report that shows payments againest invoices.
At the moment I am struggling to get a report or find a way to differentiate draft invoices for each tech.
One of our clients was trying to run a report which showed all of the invoices from a supplier with details of when and if they have been paid yet.
Usually you want to run this report for a specific supplier to confirm the invoices/credits raised in a particular period.
Either a tick box on the Aged Receivables / Payables report which "shows notes" on active invoices, or a separate report from the Invoices screen?
Create a report with the same level of detail for Invoices Waiting Approval or2.
I want to send a client a report that shows my invoices to them and if/when they paid them.
it would be really helpful if I could get a report of a single supplier which lists all the invoices and all the payments made in date order, so I dont have to drill down for every one.
It seems ridiculous to have to run a report on all paid invoices, then export and then sort all when you are only interested in one supplier.
Is there an app that would enable him to enter the orders into software (generating draft invoices) and then print a report that tells him exactly what he needs to buy from market to fulfill that week's orders?
Payable Invoices Summary is a Purchases report, and it does show the repeating Bills, and it has a star next to it.
##### CLUSTER 161 #####
I need to pull it from inventory, which then triggers use tax on the item.
55 x 11) or do you need to use a calculator seperately.
)Maybe I need to change the method I use?
I need to use at least two levels of cost centres in order to track spend against project income.
We need to use the inventory system to track the charity and also campaigns the charities run when a transaction comes through.
We often need to go out to store to purchase product that has run low and we use cash from the till to do so.
They use a PAYE intermediary to manage their staff payroll and from 01/04/17 the monthly return will need to include the contractors at whatever RWT rates the contractors determine.
We are going to need to start running our payroll shortly and I was hoping for any advice on which provider to use.
Often letters we send and spreadsheets we use need to be revised.
Right now I don't use inventory tracking because I don't need to update inventory items more than on a quarterly basis.
It would make is much easier to keep track of every client's hourly rate and we would not need to use paper lists.
My clients often use the Reference field for a site address or other required reference so they need a separate PO Field.
f you are serious about the use of Cashbook for Financial Planners who manage client portfolios, you need to make a version of Cashbook available that has multi-currency at a reasonable price point.
if you use tracking it's quite sure you need to track salaries for differerent divisions or categories or services.
We may need to use our QuickBooks software to track the payroll.
At the moment all your employees need to reside in one of the supported states in order to use payroll.
Maybe it is because I need to get used to it but it seems very complicated to use and lots seems to go wrong.
I need something that is mobile i. e. use on Ipad, and communicates with tennant to alert them of upcoming or late rent via mobile/email if possible.
Help I need to organise inventory asap and am unsure which product to use.
##### CLUSTER 162 #####
HiI am relatively new to Xero and received a crash course in importing bank statements for reconciling.
I'm new to Xero and have started to reconcile bank transactions for my daughter's shop which has been using non-cloud accounting since it opened last year.
We'd love to hear from any other active Xero users who are successfully using Citibank live bank feeds -- otherwise my client may be looking for new solutions.
I'm new to xero (and bookkeeping) and am working with bank reconciliation.
I have a new client using Xero and they have been processing their wage payments through the bank reconciliation screen.
We are new to Xero and we bank with Metro.
I have downloaded an ofx file from my bank website however when I go do import it into xero it says there is no file to download and it doesn't give me the option to browse for a new file
Im new to Xero and cant seem to get the bank feed working.
I am new to Xero and have read the guides about how to reconcile bank transactions.
Xero says that the bank feed is updated but the dashboard still shows a date from a week ago, and no new transactions.
New to Xero this month, loving some parts of it bank reconcilations & web based.
Set up Xero with Bank of Queensland for new client and prepared first payroll.
##### CLUSTER 163 #####
Essentially, I would like to reconcile multiple statement lines in bank statement with one Xero transaction.
Checking the help pages it seemed like there was now the ability to get direct bank feeds from ANZ to Xero.
Looking at xero it looks like I can look at the suppliers individual an batch their payments, but would mean I'd have to upload them at the bank individually.
I wonder if there is a online service company, like csv2cloud, that handles bank statements and imports them into Xero.
I like the fact I did my UK payroll while sitting on my couch with my tablet in hand at 23:00 last night and it posted straight to my bank and xero.
##### CLUSTER 164 #####
Also, is there a way to record this without setting up invoices, that seems like a lot of extra work since we don't actually invoice anyone.
I'd like to grant one of our Invoice Only users the rights to create Recurring Invoices.
I've created a custom branded invoice and I'd like to show the Tax Inclusive amount in right-hand column of my invoices.
But for customers I send large retainer invoices to or don't invoice a lot, I would like to save money on fees and have them mail me a physical check.
I'm setting up some customer invoice branding DOCX templates, and would like to include both the "Contact" details from the contact card as well as the First & Last Name of the "Primary Person" from the same contact card on my invoices.
I would like to see tracking on each invoice line a mandatory field (when tracking is used) as this has caused a lot of extra work when clients enter all their invoices and skip the tracking field.
We create invoices for services or call usage for the previous month, so would like to include in the repeating invoice 'Services for Month-1' in square brackets and it displays 'Services for February'.
##### CLUSTER 165 #####
"Seems like IRD have not consulted with Xero, and Xero have not communicated with users.
Dear Xero SupportWe would like to request Xero to increase the discount percentage in the Invoicing module to four decimal places from the current setting of two.
We have a client that would like this display updated so you view the post dated Xero balance in addition to the current day's Xero balance.
the screen shows a summary of the history, asks me to enter any FUTA tax that's been paid this year and when I click "submit" this message appears at the top of the screen:  I have no idea what this means and have had zero luck finding anything similar in the community forum, and I'm finding (like most other Xero users) that Xero support is unreliable.
We would like these Apps to integrate into Xero if possible and also include all other functionality typically required in both requirements & Xero.
I would like for one of them to do it all though:- Integrate with Xero- Take CC Payments over the phone- Have a fast deposit turnaround- Minimal fees- Link to embed in Xero invoicesDoes anybody have a solution that they're very happy with?
But I would really like to see Xero set an example by getting themselves back onto Xero and dog food their own system.
##### CLUSTER 166 #####
54 and we need to manually create a new transaction to resolve this.
So far I've found the following need to be entered:Client details :  TFN                         Prepare Tax Form                         Agent                         Balance dateJob raised, which will hopefully have the option to "New CTR"I'm not sure if necessarily all these have to be completed, but most seem to be, but I know there has to be more, as I've completed all these and still do not get the option to create a Tax Return in the Job.
Do I need to create a new bill for each transaction even if it's the same provider?
A recruitment company client will need to conform with the new labour-hire rules from 1/04/2017.
We need more control over who creates new contacts.
This will eliminate the need to remember which quote was used for which client, so that it can be copied for a new quote for a different client.
We used to have the ability to copy and edit published reports under the old reports and need this feature in the new reports.
We have many repeating bills with many line items, how ever the supplier bills do change from month to months and sometimes we need to insert new line items in to the bill at specific locations which is not possible.
Right now we need to delete the freight / special instruction lines, insert the new product line and re-enter the freight etc.
I have about 500 lines of transactions that I need to key in a new tracking category.
It's not obvious, but you need to go to Settings -> General Settings -> Fixed Assets -> New Asset Type.
Plus they will need to update the software as it's a completely new tax group.
I have a client who has created new paytypes incorrectly and I need to redo the payrun.
Do we need to set up a new test company and can we copy data from the live company across so we have a large volume of transactions to deal with?
We need simple project management and staff allocation so our director can schedule staff and quickly and easily see what they are supposed to be doing and see what capacity there is to take on new work.
But the response from WFM Help was need to 'maybe' also untick job edit and new job - which sort of defeats the purpose of having people working on jobs.
New features need to be trialed before they go live or it causes the users problems
##### CLUSTER 167 #####
However, I need to claim the VAT back on the mileage which used to be done in Sage as a simple journal by debiting/crediting the respective mileage and VAT Outputs accounts.
I need to tidy up the accounts payable and remove the old bills that have been paid.
HiDuring monthly review of GL accounts, several hotel conference room hires or restaurant deposits need to be transferred from Expense to Prepayments.
However when completing their accounts for the 31st March we have realised a couple of fixed assets that need disposing of.
As a newbee, I need to bring in all data from January 1, 2014, so I can then somehow bring in the year 2013 closing statement and chart of accounts, so I can get going classifying everything so as to get a GL up to date.
If I do the former, do I need to do a manual journal to credit/debit the appropriate accounts?
These are not bills which need to be payed in the future, as I have no trade accounts.
What i really really really need is an option to automatically email all clients with overdue accounts, and inbuilt processing of BPAY payments.
I have a lovely app called YNAB - "you need a budget" for personal accounts which has this feature and it really helps.
To go back to the Expense Claim you were reviewing you need to click "back page" on your browser, or go back into the Accounts>Expense Claim module, then click the "Awaiting Authorisation" tab, then click on the Expense Claim you were looking at to open it up again.
Otherwise you could be left with a whole lot of unsatisfied purchase orders in the system that need to be deleted because the accounts payable people did not know that a purchase order had been created.
As I need to finish my accounts for my tax return I decided to try and import a statement.
I have made some changes to the Chart of Accounts to reflect the fact that we now need to run a workplace pension scheme in the UK.
I am pretty sure i need to change them to liability accounts, but not sure how to do this without affecting my conversion balances?
I need to split my accounts payable up into 2 different categories.
For example, on a monthly basis I need individual transaction reports for multiple departments filtered by their Tracking categories and All Income & Expense accounts.
##### CLUSTER 168 #####
The other account is a Current Asset that I would like to make the correct account.
I'd like to close the year out by apply this $1500 to COGS to reduce the COGS account, and zero out the discount account at year end.
I'm toying with ideas like (i) creating an expense/direct costs account for 'Parts', (ii) not doing the above, (iii) creating a revenue account?
I'd like to see an option to commit real or projected account withdrawals up to 30 days into the future, and then to see that reflected in the account dashboard graph and summary - perhaps a future look past today on the graph, and/or an estimated future balance in the summary.
I would like the option of viewing balance sheet or P&L by account name and having a general setting option to see account codes after the account names.
##### CLUSTER 169 #####
We then purchased some new (second-hand) equipment from a company selling off their kit, and used some of the cash takings to pay for this.
Prior to the conversion I loaned the old company &#163;8,000 which the new company is now in a position to pay back.
I tried adding a new pay run item but it won't let me enter a negative amount.
Currently we set up an new employee who has started during the pay cycle.
I have noticed that during the Christmas, New Year period if a Public Holiday falls on a Sat or Sun Payroll brings this through to the next weeks pay run (Mondayised or Tuesdayised).
I have got around this by adding a new pay Earnings Item for these Public Holidays.
Users roles approve and pay - you cannot see files inbox, so there is no way to upload new bills.
Currently once you process a Pay Run that includes the New Salary amount in it the old salary amount will disappear.
I buy most of the items in the U. S. , have them shipped to a freight forwarder, and then receive them in New Zealand where I have to pay duties and GST.
HiI'm a new user to XeroJust wondering - I pay my employees using the online payroll system called Payroo.
We then set up a new pay item called 'Ordinary Hours @ $99.
However, I had already gone ahead and processed two pay runs in the new year before I realised this.
I went in today to update the next scheduled pay run as we have a new employee and I have accidentally put the period in as a week ahead, now I cant seem to select the previous week as its only showing forward weeks.
I have input a new casual employee and specified the hourly rates of pay.
The problem we have it that one of our new employees was setup against the old annual leave type that did not pay LL.
Trying to check that the Purchases>Bills amounts from July & August (before the new payroll changes) were the same amount as the Pay runs from that date.
Now I mistakenly thought that the new Holiday Calendar would also affect the Pay Run.
I have fixed this for all the pay runs (reverting to draft then adding a new line and changing) up to the point where I started using ClickSuper to process my super payments.
Can someone step me through how to reverse this & create new pay run for same week using correct hours (I seem to remember doing something similar a couple of months back & creating a mess!
I've attempted to make a new pay calendar but this doesn't change the timesheet dates.
But the system will still not let me update the new pay.
In the Pay Template I could not revise the Earnings Type so had to create a new earnings a few months ago.
Can I set that up somewhere when I enter a new employee, or do I have to enter that when I actually do a pay run?
Under payroll deductions I set up a new item called Staff loans taken from the net pay after tax.
HelloI have made a new Pay Calendar for staff and changing them to this.
We are having a close down period over Christmas/New Years and i'm not sure how to put that in our payroll e. g is there somewhere in the pay where you can enter the dates of your close down period?
##### CLUSTER 170 #####
Am I just barking up the wrong tree to try to use Xero to do my property management?
Just started using Xero about 3 months ago and wanted to offer feedback on a few accounting features that our users here in our small office feel could use some enhancements.
I would rather ditch the spreadsheet and just use an on-line tool which feeds directly to Xero.
We moved to Xero tax and only just discovered you dont have the international dealings schedule to use.
When we use Xero most of our jobs are written up with the site address and not the customers name itself, it would be very helpful if we could search the address also and not just the customers name when looking up contacts.
(We started with Xero on 14th September)Shouldn't it just use the leave balance as at the date supplied and accrue from there?
Hello,We have just started to use timesheets within the Xero Payroll system.
##### CLUSTER 171 #####
I'm trying to track my inventory and need to create an inventory adjustment account - what kind of account should this be?
Basically to satisfy the accountant I need to account for all the expenses and end up with a credit to the director's loan account.
the account has been set up as A loan account to myself and the account type is "current liability"i need to balance this out in xero and show it as my wage for the year so i can in turn lodge a personal tax.
The tax accountant suggested that my account codes would need to be identical to his account codes.
I need some help understanding how to book my COGS account vs My Inventory asset account.
I work around the problem by Spending from one account and Receiving into the other using a dummy account where I can allocate tracking, but it would be really handy not to need to.
Having to clear the Payroll clearing account is yet another task in Xero that could be removed to facilitate faster processing and negate the need to reconcile the clearing account.
But this then causes an override of the checking account login feed so I need to update that manually again before I can access the checking account feed.
##### CLUSTER 172 #####
I have 2 prior months (June and July) of bank transactions that I need to import into the 2016 year and reconcile.
The issue is when I go to batch payments to the bank, I often include these Credit Card & Check payments by accident and need to re-batch.
We have paid a sum of money to the exiting director and also paid Stamp Duty to HMRC, so I have two bank transactions that I need to reconcile.
I may need to search for one of these purchased parts later (eg warranty claim) and I won't find it in the bank transactions.
For this to work, we need the contractor's bank details and TIN/SSN.
I need to set up recurring monthly payments to reconcile with the bank repayments.
Once set up will the auto bank feed only download transactions from the last transaction i loaded or do i need to specify a date ?
You may need to create a spend money transaction to reconcile this bank statement line”If it did this wouldn’t I be creating a duplicate of the transaction in the system?
Bank statement shows up and I need a corresponding bill in order to reconcile.
We do a bank transfer of 2,790,000 and need to set aside the other 10% - 310,000 COP - as a payable to the tax authority (which I believe we have to do quarterly).
Cheques will clearly be paid into the bank and will show up on the statement so they will need to be reconciled.
We really need more direct bank feeds in the US.
I need to ACCEPT the bank rule as applied, and then go and find the transaction and then edit it.
I need a way of doing a multiple reconciliation from the bank statement against multiple transactions but I can't see that it can be done?
I need to uses the official central bank rate for my accounting to work.
Do i need to delete the bank feed items?
do I need to change my bank password to 8 digits so It can all be entered or is the passcode referring to something else?
I need an extra data field for my imported bank statements and thought of using the Analysis Code field.
begrudgingly i went back to the 'band aid' version of rectifying the position, deleting some 600 transactions in the system, without finding out why it happened, so i tried their 'technique'sadly all i had been given was hyperlinks, without the forethought to see if the content was actual current, eg, being told to deactivate the bank feed, sadly that option is not available on my screen so i cant even do that, then i delete the statement, again, with no advice given on 'by the way this option will come up so you need to click this answer'.
I'm either paralyzed to do anything in my customers' books, or I need to contact each customer and have them deactivate their bank logins so I can set them up and control the refresh.
##### CLUSTER 173 #####
I've been using Xero for the past 2 years and this is my first time dealing with accounting for long-term liabilities and I need a little help.
I don't want all the different levels of authorisations to approve an expense as it is taking me time and I don't need this function for the moment as I will be the only one using xero.
However,  where there are a lot of contacts to change this exercise might need to be done over a period by which time other changes might have been made direct in Xero.
Every single time I want to import a statement to Xero, I need to first open the CSV file and change all commas to semi-colons and also change the format of numbers to match American formatting.
I have developed an import file to replace the manual process of entering on Xero, however, I need to run an import 7 times (for each day), due to only 1 date being allowed at a time in manual journals.
I've entered every field as i would have done on a direct bill entry on Xero, but it is excessively time consuming to enter them this way and i need a batch entry option.
##### CLUSTER 174 #####
As I track my inventory, I changed the default COGS and Sales accounts in the inventory tabs.
I'm not completely clear on how to customize or set up my chart of accounts so that my consignment sales are treated differently than our items that are produced in-house and sold.
I do, however, purchase items that include sales tax and have set the accounts the purchases are made under to record the tax.
ORa pop-up form, with 2 checkboxes, each for Purchase and Sales Accounts.
This would allow businesses to see quickly (a summery) of how cashflow, sales and expenses are affecting accounts as a whole or on an individual basis.
We have set up petty cash accounts to balance our weeks bankings and petty cash spend against our sales.
It would be great if you could have Sales and Purchases as individual Headers where Dashboard, Payroll etc are, instead of under accounts.
For example, for Suppliers, we normally have the Accounts Receivable contact in the Contact's 'Attention:' field which is fine for sending Remittance Advices but is totally incorrect when sending Purchase Orders to their Sales Office.
Accounts > Sales > Awaiting Payments: This shows ‘Overdue by’ 100 days for example.
I reconciled some eftpos payments to sales only to discover days later that the eftpos amounts included customer payments which should have been reconciled to accounts payable.
*****My work-around is creating the contact first, and then going to Accounts->Sales->Quotes.
##### CLUSTER 175 #####
Company2 pays the invoice from their bank account.
I mark an invoice as paid from this liability and reconcile transactions from the bank feed against this account.
I was wondering whether the correct way of treating this so that the bank rec all ties up each month is to mark the invoice as paid on a prepayment account then set up a manual journal 1/12 of the invoice amount each month to enable a bank rec?
When I create an invoice, do I have the choice to nominate what bank account the funds are payable to?
The reason is that you cannot choose a bank account as target in an invoice, so you can't record the withholding tax along with the received funds.
This is all fine and dandy, however the line on the invoice label 'Bank' isn't importing as posting to my Checking account, as I had correctly mapped it in PE.
The invoice is in AUD, my bank account is in SGD.
I don't know how to merge these three bank transactions into one and reconcile it with the invoice (legal expense account)?
##### CLUSTER 176 #####
Hi everyone, I am trying to see what my total sales are in each month.
Hi,We want to show our direct cost profit by category by running reports on timesheet and sales categories.
Hi there,I'm based in the UK and was really pleased to see the addition of the 'Purchases Only' and 'Sales Only' user roles.
Hi,I have set default tracking categories for each contact (according to State for sales commission purposes).
Hi,Hoping someone has experienced this or got any ideas,I have a client who sells goods via ebay and has mass sales via paypal with their name/email address being the only details I have.
Hi,I have a client who uses a 3rd party Sales system.
##### CLUSTER 177 #####
The customer invoice report is always higher.
Benefits that I see in this method are threefold:Firstly, as an invoice due date comes up it will then (it should then) show up in the reconcile screen, and then I can allocated against the receipts, cross-referenced against the easy debit transaction report.
So even though the 440 only is being shown on the actual invoice, the Contact + Description text is being included in the report.
This would be really beneficial for companies who report in one currency but invoice in another.
To see and have access to supplier invoice attachments from the audit report instead of having to click into each transaction when reviewing claims.
The Bills report is generated with Invoice headings.
Following a "ticking" exercise between the two reports I have now discovered that the detail report is in the actual invoice currency while the summary is in GBP.
Will there be the ability to do a customer invoice report excluding GST?
It would be useful if the Customer Invoice Report status option allowed me to include several options.
HiI was wondering whether you are looking at adding more filters to the Customer Invoice Report so that we can filter it by a single Contact?
Currently we are exporting the customer invoice report and manipulating the data in excel into a pivot table to summarise.
I have run supplier invoice report to see if the amounts there and in the TPAR match up and they don't because of the credit notes not showing in the TPAR.
I am facing a problem that the Trade creditor report pick up one voided invoice.
invoice is sent out before the billable arrive Question, can l put cost of goods in a column and name it something and hide it to the customer when sending, this way we can report on it see % marging by salesperson  and the customer does not see ithope you can help anyone !
I find the Customer Invoice report useful but it shows only Total Invoice value including VAT-it would be great to have the Net Value available in this report too?
##### CLUSTER 178 #####
Now that I'm doing my bank reconciliation, it wanted to match each statement transaction to a separate payment.
I'm reconciling my bank feed and I've made a payment to HMRC for my self-assessment income tax.
(We didn't put a stop payment on it through the bank, since it was a small amount)3 months later, we got a notification that the first check was cashed and now the customer owes us, since the took the refund twice.
We have checked on the bank statement and the payment has not been incorrectly recorded.
Now I'm trying to reconcile this payment amount that has appeared in my bank statement line.
So I have two bank transactions a payment of $1,419.
if I post as a pre-payment and change the transaction date my bank balance is wrong.
94, and the payment taken out of our bank was £17.
Customers are charged on purchase, and funds are held by the payment processor until withdrawal (i. e. bank transfer).
All I find is a payment interface by Bank check.
16), and I adjust the payment for 'bank fees' ($2.
I have made a bank payment I am unable to match to the income in advance.
3) In PaySimple I create an automatic billing entry4) PaySimple makes one batch payment for me into my bank.
I have set up my bank feed and each month and the payment made to the company credit card is listed.
Or how to create a payment without actually processing it through the bank?
Same with One Payrun Payment entry to multiple bank payments to staff?
In my bank feed I have a CC payment that appears twice for the $722.
The temptation has been to hit 'ok', thinking that the bank transfer is in fact one and the same as the payment for goods within PayPal.
That way I won't forget to make the payment, or can reconcile it off when I see the repayment come through the bank.
Could utilize bank information entered in existing Batch Payment section of Contacts.
C) The payment is then returned at the bank.
If I do a payrun and hmrc has 3 different categories for say -  loans, PAYE, NIC etc, yet the payment TO HMRC is made in one go from the bank then there is no way to reconcile all of these payments as they don't match.
Then, we deposit the payment to the bank.
Trying to reconcile bank and will not allow me to create  a "credit balance" with the over payment.
I search for customer "ABC" and I see 3 bank transactions, each shows Payment: ABC on 1/1/16 for $1000 in the results.
The payment later shows up in the bank statement unmatched and still needing reconciled.
C) The payment is then returned at the bank.
Hello,I have imported the bank feed and it shows two lines; a payment of £60.
When the payment comes through on the bank feed I would allocate to 804 which should then make my wages payable balance with a nil.
Some of the team are paid in cash, so money is withdrawn from the bank but this usually needs rounding up or down (i. e. payment due is GBP28 but GBP30 is withdrawn. )
64I have imported my bank statement which has our payment to HMRC which includes various items but when I tick those that apply I am over by 747.
Where do I reconcile the employee payment to in the bank rec screen?
Also the amount in the bank statement needs to reconcile against the iZettle card payment minus the iZettle charge.
Our Shopify store offers two payment methods - PayFast or bank deposit / EFT.
55 credit note from TWHowever in my bank reconciliation I still have ▪	a payment of &#163;308.
I have been attempting to get answers from customer support regarding the change in information provided on Yodlee bank feeds from the end of March 16Prior to the end of March we were at least getting for example: Card payment 000002225555000 GBP payngo parking Since the end of March all we get as a description is:Card payment 000002225555000I have hundreds of small payments by card to reconcile every month which until this change were mostly managed by setting up bank rules to make life easier.
##### CLUSTER 179 #####
I made an incorrect VAT return in the last quarter, claiming too much VAT on sales invoices (put through a pro forma invoice in error).
Unfortunately, our outside sales team can't enter invoices in the mobile apps (and, as 'outside' sale folks, they're always mobile) because there's no "submit for approval" option when saving an invoice.
Every year I have to create individual credit notes for a batch of customers,  all year round I can batch create their invoices in Sales Invoice to a Contact Group.
I am in Sales and want to follow up outstanding invoices however when I click the Send Statements button it shows a fully paid invoice as "outstanding".
HiIs there a way to include on an invoice docx template, the Sales Invoices Default Due Date days?
##### CLUSTER 180 #####
In Xero, i have created a credit note for the outstanding invoices and applied this to a Bad Debt account as advised.
At Xerocon US 2013, the staff and attendees told me i could email pdf files of invoices, documents, etc into a Xero organization's inbox to be attached to either a transaction record or directly to a chart of account.
I have sent invoices from Xero to my email account and all attached documents appear.
I frequently send invoices from one organisation in my Xero account to another, and administering them on both sides brings a lot of manual work with it: once I approve it on the sender's organisation, it could easily be automatically created on the receiver's organisation with all the data available.
Link your Xero account to Dragon Law and easily generate invoices from certain documents.
The newly created invoices stay in your Xero account for easy access.
Link your Xero account & instantly drawdown funds against unpaid invoices.
Import contacts and invoices from your Xero account into Podio bringing your  accounting data into your  project management workspace.
##### CLUSTER 181 #####
Do I need to enable payment to that account?
As a consequence I now have an incoming payment from HMRC I need to account for.
Did I need to allocate the payment to the Misc income account?
We really need the ability to show a payment on a customers account without it being recorded as an 'overpayment" or a "prepayment".
We need to know how much of the super that has been deducted from his wages has actually been paid, and not sitting in the balance sheet control account awaiting payment, so we can be sure that his super contributions don't go over ATO limit.
As I need to assign an account for that payment - yet the original expense claim already had those.
##### CLUSTER 182 #####
As we are a financial services company we operate on the Vat Apportionment scheme and only need to charge VAT on certain sales and not all.
I need to enter cash purchases that are made from the cash sales that my client receives each month.
I am trying to finalize numbers to send an updated income statement to my lenders and need to move some sales between last period and this current period.
Need some accounting help here:Bought a 2nd hand Sales vehicle: 2011 modelPaid Cash: $30kACC: Motor vehicle ; TYPE: Fixed Asset : GST on ExpensesRecorded as Fixed Asset and depreciated over 4yrs @ 40%Problem: Shouldn't this show as a capital purchase in the BAS?
So for one day I took sales tax when I didn't need to.
I'm sure that sales tax we charged we'll need separated out at a minimum right?
Or do I need to make a Journal Entry at the end of the month out of Sales into Income Tax Payable?
Effectively I need to neutralise expenses I charge instead of overstating sales and expenses.
Would i need to unreconcile and void those transactions which have been recorded or sale and change to sales in advance?
HiI need to extract weekly sales revenue for the past two years in order to look at seasonal cycles.
I need to separate sales into different contact groups.
Without the need for doing manual monthly journals between a GL Liability >  GL Sales for £100 every month
And I do need to include that sales commission as a cost for me somewhere.
I'm thinking I'll need to reconcile his cash inventory purchases to Purchase Expense as they come in (almost daily) and then make manual journal entries each month to record Sales, COGS and other fees.
When sending a quote I need this to go from the Sales email address.
and I cannot get past "go" because they need to know who is my sales representative.
XXALL WE NEED IS THIS MONTHS SALES EXCLUSIVE OF GST.
Casual sales staff don't need to know how much we owe to suppliers etc.
I do urgently need help as i have to file my sales tax.
Provides tools small merchants need to accept all payments and grow sales with a free point of sale and card reader.
I have some zero rated sales so they would need to be identified.
When a customer places an order we need to create a Sales Order (either manually or downloaded from an EDI portal)2.
All quotes through to generating sales orders and order fulfilment  are currently done in Unleashed and this seems to be working ok. We are desperately in need of a CRM system to track pre-quote activity with customers including logging phone calls ,emails and customer visits.
We need a lot of sales reporting, including but not limited to:1.
##### CLUSTER 183 #####
I am guessing I need to to add some kind of journal?
We need the ability to add a non taxable reimbursement on a ‘rate per unit’ basis and also linked to the hours worked.
I constantly need to add more rule to fit similar cases.
My shipping charges were $10 total, so I need to add .
We have 5 properties and need to add into these to finalise the year tax return.
I'd then need to add the equipment to my asset register but wasn't sure if this was how it should hang together (it's what happened obviously) or if there was another way I should be doing this?
Therefore I need to add an amount to box 1 and deduct an amount from box 4 in the next VAT return.
I don't understand what add-ons I need to stitch together to get something working.
I need to add components and change the actual rateI've emailed support but the collective wisdom on here might be faster.
Now I need to adjust the inventory item up (add quantity).
If it doesn't , I need to add it in.
We often have the need to add additional comments or wording to our standard email template sending a return out for signing.
Other you have to delete the row, and then next year add it back in when you need it next.
Can't be hard to do and at the moment I need to do a calculation of Opening Cost, less Opening Cost for assets containing a Disposed date and then add them up.
Please add a feature that Accountants need during analysis of Financials Statements.
we need to add much more information for employees such as their emergency contact details, home country details, passport, ID number and expiration date, etc.
When writing a bill I sometimes have the need to add an extra tracking field.
Despite being keen to get on board with this software this is a bit of an issue for us as it would add on a fair bit of work that we currently don't need to do.
The loan was given NET of 1 years pre paid interest and various loan charges so I need to re-add a GROSS loan value and apply a prepaid expense of 1 years interest + the individual loan fees.
Will we need to ask them for their network key to add to their details on our system too?
They don't want or need the Sharesight add-on and only want this to be added manually twice per year.
i need to add the additional 2 times.
Do i need to add BSB number as well ?
I need to add an employees leave balance in for annual leave + personal leave from FY 15 & FY 16 ( Annual leave should  = 52hr 12min) .
We'll also need to add these values to P60/P45s.
HiI need to add in annual leave taken in December 2015.
I have a client who has used and developed a bespoke MS Access database for years, I am trying to update them but would need a replacement add on system that will do exactly the same as Access but with the modern twist of an App.
I need help on finding a quotation/tender add on tool.
- Employee usability With option for employees not to see price- Must have iPhone app with full usability for jobsIf anyone know which add on can do everything we need and point us in that direction you would be a life saver!
Has anyone got a cheaper manufacturing add-on their can recommend other than those available in cin7, unleashed or dear inventory as it is a very simple manufacturing process that does not need a highly complex solution.
I need some advise as there are many add-ons to choose from.
Hello,Looking to possibly convert from Quickbooks, but need additional information on whether there are any add-ons that allow for production tracking.
i. e. adding, ETA, ETD, Port of Discharge etc etcOr would I need a add-on?
The need an Add on to quote, keep track of building expenses/income, linked pricelist to suppliers of building material, etc.
Add manual journals for buys and sells if you need to adjust landing cost or cost of goods sold due to freight, warehouse fees, subcontract costs, adjustments etc.
Basiclaly we're looking at purchasing a quoting add-on, and probably need some sort of CRM as well - what do you all recommend?
##### CLUSTER 184 #####
However the balance has been paid back into our bank account, and I just can't figure how to record this.
Why can't I just provide it the amount pulled from my bank account?
There is no bill associated with these transaction since these small credit/debits amounts are just used to verify your bank account.
So, my question is to reduce liability 881 is it just a debit from the bank account for the loan amount ?
I think it would be better if it started pre-filled with the amount, today's date, and a default bank account (this could be configurable, or could just be the first in the list which I suspect would work for most users).
We don't want to have to set up a number of bank rules as these rules have a common thread and are all going to the same account and contact, we just want them with different descriptions.
I just reconciled with my bank account, and even though I wanted to import all available transactions, I am seeing only transactions from last 3 months.
I have a client with just one bank account.
##### CLUSTER 185 #####
Currently the cash is sitting in the petty cash account, but there is also a payment into our bank account, so what would be the correct way of reconciling this?
P. S. I've intentionally left out my local Payroll UI taxes from above since I simply matched my bank account payment to the "Payroll Tax Expense" account.
I have reconciled the payment with my bank account and put it in the prepayment account but how do I then deduct money from that account so I can then mark it as an expense?
As per my accountants instructions I recorded a directors loan by creating a "payment" to the "Directors Loan Account (835)" from my bank account.
I receive payment in cash (which i intend to record in a 'cash on hand) (and then show the transfers when I make them into my current account)I receive ebay payments on Paypaland I receive my credit card payments directly into my bank account - but I intend on setting up a 'Due from Merchant Services' account to record these until they clear at which point I will do a transfer.
Here's a simple one:When I want to record a transfer (e. g. a credit card payment via a bank account), I have to go to 'manage account' and select 'transfer money.
The account receiving the payment is a bank account.
##### CLUSTER 186 #####
How do we go about exporting all invoice info out of Xero into excel / Google sheets including the nominal code to which it has been posted, date, client account name, amount etc
When I created an invoice with shipping on Xero, it automatically recorded the journal as below:DR. Account receivable                                           33           CR.
What's the best way to account for those transactions in Xero, with out doing a manual invoice for each digital product sold transaction?
"ERROR creating Xero invoice: ErrorNumber: 10 ErrorType: ValidationException Message: A validation exception occurred Detail: The TaxType code ‘EXEMPTOUTPUT’ cannot be used with account code ‘403’.
I currently have some items in Vend closed as on account which creates an invoice to the customer in Xero.
##### CLUSTER 187 #####
It would be really handy when exporting the reports into Excel to have the option of selecting an existing workbook to export the report into or creating a new workbook.
It would be great if the new P&L report allowed reporting within Tracking categories, similar to the old P&L.
I have recently used the "edit layout" feature on the new Profit and Loss report, I added a formula column and re-ordered the months displayed over a financial year from right to left TO left to right.
I run this report monthly for each new project, and it takes hours!
I love the new Fixed Asset report for FAs that have been disposed of.
When transitioning from old report to new - most customers don't understand current, under 1 mth, 1 month, 2 mth etc.
The new profit and loss report allows you to select previous financial year as a reporting option - which is great thank you.
We are using the new report packs for financial statements.
A new report that shows the details of an employee expense claim in a grid format, showing details, amounts, nominal codes, tracking, etc.
There is only one report, in new reports and this is of limited value.
We had numerous requests from our clients to include a YTD total on the New profit or loss report.
It would be great if the new Aged Payables rep didn't automatically populate with today's date but instead gave you the option to choose the date and all the report settings you want first off.
This is possibly a deal breaker for using the new report packs at all!
I love the new report writer functionality.
Firstly, love the new deposit summaries - but it would be really good if our reference could show on the printed report.
Would be great if after edit it returned to the report with the new $$
The new feature in report packs that allows lines to be dragged and reordered is great.
I've also found the "new reports" that can filter reports to a selection of Tracking categories - however these then do not give the analysis by those Tracking categories (only the total) and do not appear to report against budget in any sensible way.
I have set up a new profit and loss report with groups.
Next to come, a new version of the Fixed Assets Reconciliation Report!
I'm looking to create a customised Profit & Loss report for a new client of mine, a pub/restaurant.
I was working with the Aged Receivables Detail "New" report.
I don't see a Profit & Loss report on the reports tab (neither All Reports no New Reports).
On the new transaction report it would be great to have the following changes:1.
Similarly when I prepare year end report - out of 5, 1 day of last week of June falls on July (new FY).
New reports module allows for customised report views and provides info on all data headers available.
Users will have the ability to check on expired or close to expiry Items with the new "Lot Expiry" report.
Not a fan as this new format makes it harder to find a report!
##### CLUSTER 188 #####
and use spend money and transfer from a bank account.
Would that work or is that only intended for use with 'Spend Money' outgoing transactions from the bank account?
Would be great if you could use the cash coding screen to post to a bank account.
The bank account I want to use is not listed.
Use petty cash and then reimburse from bank account.
What WOULD be good is to have a link beneath the "To" box that I can use to open a pop up and enter name, address, phone, email and bank account details when these are available.
It use to be at the top of the dashboard above the bank account charts.
##### CLUSTER 189 #####
Hi,We have a payment for a item of plant & machinery bought on HP which is part deposit (to be filed in plant and machinery) and also the total VAT for the item.
HI everyoneI missed the GST portion of a payment to one of our contractors.
Hi everyone,We have a credit limit with one of our suppliers of 5,000 pounds together with a 30-day delayed payment period.
Hi everyone,The scenario is ATO - Income Tax Payable $7500, payment by monthly installment $250.
Hi I don't understand the auto Super Payment thing.
Hi Guys/Girls,Rather than adding late payment fee.
Hi all,I am in the process of completing our PAYG payment summary for 12/13.
Hi,Can I please get an advise on how to create an ABA file for the final payment to Superannuation Clearing house?
Hi all,We have stripe set up as a payment service and it works very well.
Hi All,One of our customer has made payment directly to our supplier instead of us.
Hi thereI receive bills from a supplier with payment terms for end of the month.
Hi All,I have generated and published my Q1 BAS and made payment via EFT to the ATO.
Hi AllI was wondering if anyone has gone through having an over payment of Govt PPL.
Hi,I am trying to enter some 'Spend Money' transactions to reconcile off my BAS payment to the ATO in July.
Hi,I have lodged my payment summaries for my employees, and the ATO lodgement status is currently 'Accepted'.
Hi all,We have had some issues with the payment files being generated for our ASB online banking.
Hi - seeking advice from users who have online payment solutions enabled.
##### CLUSTER 190 #####
So I created an invoice, under account I assigned it to Advance Payment for XXX (as current liability).
* When I go to Invoice and select "Make a payment', under "Paid To" - USD Account does not get listed.
Does anyone know how to make a payment on account in the purchase ledger without allocating it to a specific invoice?
Is there a way to create a Payment on Account for when a customer pays an invoice in advance, pays too much or we want to leave a deposit with a supplier?
Is it possible to match part of an incoming payment to an invoice and part to an account?
Also is it possible to view a supplier ledger account viewing all transactions i. e both the invoice and the payment( rather than it coming up as bill paid and nothing appearing in the due column)ThanksMick
However, the corrosponding invoice also in $CAD and assigned to the Canadian PayPal payment service account did not "come over" to be reconciled.
Then I went to the invoice and completed the "Receive a payment" section and selected "Wages Payable - Payroll" as the "Paid To" account.
##### CLUSTER 191 #####
This is because Amazon billing is done fortnightly based on: Product sales minus Amazon fees; these numbers then actually match the bank statement which are provided by Amazon and then attached to the reconciled transaction (as screenshot).
I have had sales of stock at an event and one bank transaction is cash, the other bank transaction is funds from credit cards but I want to put to one 'receive money' transaction so I can list all the stock sold at the event but apply the 2 deposits to it.
Now, I'm a bit unclear how to handle bank reconciliation for the sales income.
When I reconcile the bank statement, the transaction date defaults to the current date, but I think it should be accounted for the actual sales period.
These transactions have also been reconciled with the bank as "sales" already.
When we downloaded the app on iphone we only see Sales and Receipts and Bank Balances.
I then match the Bank receipt in the bank statement to each of the sales transactions and payments received, so the end result is Dr Bank ; Cr Sales.
From what I can see so far, the software seems great for managing GST on a day-to-day basis, and I understand that once up and running, bank feeds should manage all GST on sales and expenses moving forward.
Bank link has this feature which comes in handy for those with clients in food sales and health careRegardsMatt
I am trying to reconcile bank deposits (some cash and some credit) against sales data that is imported from clover POS using commerce sync.
There are only two options currently in the "find & match" screen for accounting for discrepancies after selecting the appropriate sales: "minor adjustment" and "bank fees".
For each day of sales I get 5 bank deposits (4 credit card deposits + 1 cash deposit).
Receipt Bank doesn't offer a link to Sales, and I'm struggling to find another app that will carry out the above steps.
##### CLUSTER 192 #####
(Edit - I see the COGS isn't a pay from account by default, what steps would therefore be required here?
These social sites charge our credit card for advertising costs, we then apply the funds receive from our clients and pay the credit card account.
In these situations we'll track what inventory has been sold, total it up and either us or someone else will BACS or pay the money into our current account.
HelloIn my Current Account when I pay for items using a foreign currency, I get an additional line showing the transaction fees.
If I bought it from the company account, I pay it from that.
Unfortunately at times the main account was to low to pay certain bills and money had to be paid back from the holding to the main.
Should I create a ledger in my NIC Payable account for the credited amount and then this will balance out over the year when I pay money from it?
Do i make myself a contact and pay the amount to the directors loan account from directors salary?
We currently had a B Point account so can take credit card payments but it would be much easier to have a pay now button.
I pay a fixed amount per employee per year, and I deduct a monthly account from his/her salary if and only if (s)he also wishes to insure members of his/her family.
Those liquid assets will generally be in various locations, some of which can be set up to pay us directly eg a stockbroker's nominee account.
I have also set up an "Owners Funds Introduced" account from which I assume I would pay these receipts.
1)  To view any approved invoices2)  The ability to pay once to clear their account 3)  The ability to run reports
You cannot pay from an account that is in a different currency to your base currency.
Now we have to reclass the entry after each Pay Run to show the Loan Account being paid off.
All deductions from the employee's pay, including: the amount and details of each deduction and the name, or name and number of the fund / account the deduction was paid into11.
We're currently on a trial account, but I suspect we will eventually be asked to pay.
When I go to pay a bill, I'm asked to "Please select an account. "
We receive a daily deposit to our checking account for all customers that pay with credit card.
The issue I am running into is that the Find and Match does not work to reconcile in our Pay Pal account.
and the outstanding finance would be shown as liability but clearly you can seem to pay a bill via liability account how should i go about this?
So it's rather ridiculous, you only gain the Bill Pay service by giving up the invaluable service of automatically downloading and reconciling your account.
Our Quickbooks set-up seemed to have an account 6848 called "Paid Credit Card" that off-set our payments to pay our credit card bill each month.
Everything made sense - I created a reimbursement pay item and linked it to a suspense account (850).
Detail:When paying employees individually, a Pay Run is generated, and individual payments are made to employees with "Who = <employee name>" and "Account = Wages Payable".
Example: the  "Payroll liability: federal" account (which pays for taxes withheld from employees as well as the employer taxes) shows OK in accrual reporting (taxes are paid sent out the same day the pay run is completed so the debits equal the credits and the net movement is zero).
I tried to pay a $1 account myself and got a message also.
##### CLUSTER 193 #####
At the moment, I am using a future date to avoid same day payment batch file generation first, then manually change the date after file upload to bank, and manually change the date back in Xero.
When I reconcile the single bank line within Xero that shows the total amount of my weekly batch payment - it is a mixture of GST inc payments and GST ex payments.
This would also mean integration of bank feeds with Xero using the same payment gateway.
When a Batch Payment file is created in Xero, payments for multiple bills for a single supplier are  combined in to a single transaction, and therefore only a single reference shown in their bank statement.
I upload dozens of 'batch payments' a month from a different payroll system, and when I reconcile these transactions, xero is adding each batch payment transaction as a contact, so I've got dozens of these 'bank transactions' appearing as individual contacts.
##### CLUSTER 194 #####
I have just processed my first pay run for myself as the employee of my limited company using the tax code from P45 from my previous employment.
However, for some bizarre reason, one of his trainers just isn't getting his pay through since I became their bookkeeper 4 weeks ago.
If we are not diligent, the employee will be paid for the full pay cycle, not just from the employment start date.
I have only just found out about this over the last couple of weeks, today I have created another pay category call leave loading 25%.
Yes, we can send pay slips, but these do not contain details about hours over the period, just totals.
we effectively are just transferring the money on there behalf to pay bills.
I just created 2 seperate batch files to pay creditors.
Just getting started, and am trying to pay a credit card bill.
Unfortunately, there have been lots of pay runs since they were set up so I can't just delete the leave type for any particular employee.
Just for some context, the employee originally was set to weekly pay calendar but then changed to fortnight but that may be irrelevant here.
Just wondering how to reconcile this as my pay run is one amount not a breakup of all the employees.
I am trying to process my first pay run as I have just employed someone.
we have just started our pay run.
We have just discovered that our rate of pay for a public holiday is incorrect.
would i just do unscheduled pay runs until their leave expires towards the end of Jan?
I just found out that my employees should have received a pay increase.
It was just a fulltime pay run so nothing fancy with hours.
Will I have to just keep using the 'unscheduled pay run' function from now on?
I don't want this pay item to be accrued, it's just something that is being given to them.
We just completed our first pay run with you guys.
In the pay run we have just done for September, it has calculated the 6% pension contribution is &#163;185.
Ok, I've just logged in to HMRC which says I'm supposed to pay &#163;463,19.
No subscription, just pay for transactions.
##### CLUSTER 195 #####
Reconciled in xero via Bank account and Cash on Hand account.
The CSV file has uploaded correctly and lists the 4 transactions for reconciling on the left-hand section of the bank reconciliation screen, however Xero is not bringing up the transactions I have entered in the credit card account to enable me to reconcile the account.
In my Xero system I have a regular bank transaction account and also a tax savings account.
I have received two payments from customers who paid into my xero-reconciled bank account instead of my old account.
So my bank account and xero account will never match.
We have a 'bank' account setup in Xero for the Credit Card Liability account.
I could only import 3 months of transactions during setup of my Xero account so I had to manually export a QFX file from my bank account and import into my Xero account.
Will Xero charge me the &#163;3 pound for each account, or both will be considered as one bank account ?
The check account and routing numbers should be automatically filled out from field within the Xero Bank Account.
It would then be possible to see at a glance why the bank account total and the Xero account total are different.
Show the Bank statement balance on the Dashbook screen for each account as well as the Xero balance and reconciled balance to highlight when this occurs (although this would only be useful for the feeds that include the account balance.
I have linked my bank account to my Xero account through the main Xero.
Since there are transactions in my brokerage cash account for buying and selling investments, I don't want to set it up as a bank account in Xero since it would be impossible (I think?
Then, this evening, I hooked my Paypal account into my Xero account, and imported a bank statement for the past six weeks (since year start date).
Since August 2014 (when Xero changed it's payroll reconciliation settings) I have been recording my weekly superannuation savings - which go to a holding account with my bank - into account Superannuation Payable (826) .
##### CLUSTER 196 #####
I've received rental income in my business bank account that should have been sent to my personal account.
The offset account is a personal account, and not directly linked with the business, therefor its staying as a liability and will not be put as a bank account in xero.
So currently I have successfully the following:- A fully correct P&L- A Business Bank Account with the correct cash it inHowever the issue I have is that I have archived the Personal Account.
2) This financial year we have mostly used the business bank account but what is the correct method to record income and expenditure that still runs through my personal account?
HiI have my Business account and Paypal Account set up in Xero and also Bank Feed is activated.
I'm currently using my personal bank account while I get my business account set up and I'm coding personal expenses as 980 - Owner A Drawings.
Being paypal, my business bank account and my personal account.
As a single-member LLC I could legally pull money from my business bank account to my personal account, and the other way around.
##### CLUSTER 197 #####
The problem is they took the $600 that I owed them off the balance of my invoice so now it doesn't match when I try to reconcile my account.
However, no discussion I can find seems to have posted with an Invoice from Customs broker with as many line items to account for.
We have recently purchased a vehicle that we cannot claim the vat back on, does anyone know how to post the purchase invoice without the value of the vat hitting the asset account ?
I have drafted the first invoice to Revenue account - "Other Revenue".
), and then record invoice payments against that clearing account.
So, how can i link my bills with the creditor's control amount so that whenever i enter an invoice for some paticular supplier, i could see that amount in that supplier's account in BS?
The finance company pays us approx 80% of that invoice into our account immediately.
I have tried deleting the non-essential data from the subsequent lines, keeping the invoice # and $$ and account code, but to no avail.
raise an invoice for Customer B only $1000, then applied customer B account $1000.
How do I code their bond on the invoice to them to account for GST then have it put against a liability on our end which is BAS excluded as a suspense?
That would mean the account would not be correctly reconciled until both the credit and invoice were created
The invoice was paid by the Insurance Company with us fronting up with the excess which was paid from our current account.
Since I do not want to go into each individual account and disable reminders for them, why not have an option to send reminders only to invoice numbers or due dates as you specify?
1) Raise Invoice on customer account to nominal 9999 - Refunds and returns.
It would be very handy to have an option so that the bills are not combined and that each invoice with its reference number appears in the file and therefor on their account statement.
Perhaps a solution along the lines of the checkbox recently added to the the view in the 'All' tab of the Invoice account could work?
Not to allocate an invoice number to it as it is not a sale in the profit and loss account but to be included in the VAT return as a sale so the VAT can be picked up.
Each invoice to a customer will require a commission calculation to be made and accrued to the reps account.
1) Raise Invoice on customer account to nominal 9999 - Refunds and returns.
Before that, lost/broken and tasting stock was processed as an invoice and recorded in "Lost/Broken stock" or "Tasting stock" account.
This then paid the invoice and added the deduction amount as a debit in the "Wages Payable - Payroll" account transactions.
Quick question:- When I sell a product, I am currently assigning product-related costs to a Cost of Goods Sold account, in accordance with GAAP accounting rules: EXAMPLE FROM A2X INVOICE:FBAPerOrderFulfillmentFee - Amazon.
I found that for the past two weeks, when I've been applying my Invoice payments done via Square to my Square account (before I tried to Integrate), they're showing up as Debits.
It better represents what happens anyway (Customer pays me $100 to Square Account for an invoice, $2.
##### CLUSTER 198 #####
I would like to do both of the above without having to add checklist entries one by one as it is quite an extensive file.
I have looked at the ShareSight Pro add-on which looks like a great tool, however doesn't support exchange traded options (ETOs) and other advanced trading.
I would like to bulk add and delete tracking items
However, The statement comes out each month, and I tried to add a reoccurring expense like the rent or the electric bill that reoccurs every month and so on.
We are looking into this add-on but would like clarification if it has capability to do the following:1.
it seems like it would be easy to add contact details to the list of options.
I would like to have the ability to Setup more than 10 email templates for a template type, this would provide more flexibility  and save having to manually add/change details into a standard template and.
Add an option to include draft journals in reports like Balance Sheet and Profit & Loss to provide a 'what-if' capability.
Try and be like MYOB where you can already add lines when and where required.
If I add a note to a bill awaiting approval, it might look like this:"Amanda, the tax doesn't look correct, can you check?
I'd like to request for an additional feature, that is to add line item in a paid bill.
You can add data feeds from various online services like Quickbooks online, Salesforce, MailChimp & Google Analytics.
I would like to suggest that you add a tool that will search for and identify duplicate contacts by first and last name, as well as by email and address.
I would like to request the ability to add a custom domain / map my domain to the invoicing function.
I would like to add four votes to this but only one seems to be accepted?
I'd like to add receipts to my transactions.
In all advisor reporting packs - we would like the option to add page breaks so the reports show nicely.
And some places add a PIF, which then gets taxed like it's something I purchased.
We would really like to add this into the fixed costs.
I'd like to add for instance a contract document to a contact.
Good dayI would like to add an accept or decline button to the bottom of my quote.
My version does not have this but I would like to add it.
When you have multiple delivery numbers for a buyer, e. g. , Smiths  it would great if the system could automatically add up to deliverers, to give a total like you can do in MYOB e. g. , 125+ 465+ 34+ 28+ 136+6=794
Hello,I would like to add goods from import and add cost of goods, like a transport, duty, gst, fee of forwarder.
Now I'd like it to appear accurately on the payslip, which means I have to add leave already taken at some point.
In the payroll setup, I can see a place to add deductions, but I have to select a "type" and none of the options is right - mostly employee benefits like retirement and insurance.
We buy in raw materials to make our firewood, mainly Softwood and Hardwood Roundwood, then add value to it by chopping it, drying it and then bagging it, so the finished item in the inventory is made up of raw product cost, then other items like labour.
We mainly deal with weddings/corporate events and the board would like to track profits on an event by event basis are there any particular add on's that could be useful for this?
I've found the below possible solutions, has anyone had experience in a desktop based building estimator tool like Constructor or Interacct that could recommend any of the below add ons?
I would also like a pipeline or task functionality with this add on.
has anyone tried one of the add on's and found one to do this and if so which one do you suggest- was thinking something like a project mgt type program.
##### CLUSTER 199 #####
None of my business purchases have invoices or bills - they are all credit card purchases.
The invoices will not imported into the business.
We have multiple branded theme invoices for the various business lines.
My business invoices most customers the same amount.
2/ I want to give one of the 3rd party contractors access to enter his own receipts and claim expenses but there doesn't seem to be a login profile which allows only this e. g. payroll employee gives access to raise invoices - we want all access to the business accounting locked down so that he can only load and view his expense claims - is this possible ?
I can't see how much profit I'm making on individual invoices, I'm not an accountant or book keeper, this would be very useful to me as a business owner.
This means anyone can alter the banking details on our invoices which is a huge security risk and a very common fraud out in business today.
Have imported 500+ in voices incorrectly to a business switching to XeroHow to I delete them due to duplicate invoices numbers not being permitted.
I am mostly funding the business out of my own pocket until we start getting our first invoices paid.
Squirrel Street provides effortless and accurate capture, management and storage of all your financial documents, business records, receipts and invoices.
##### CLUSTER 200 #####
Xero help seems to only focus on bills or purchase orders or invoices and not ordinary, everyday transactions that I need to reconcile quickly.
)Do I need 2 categories - COGS Income and COGS expense or is Xero being clever and still working out the right amount even though it places the reclaimed amounts on my invoices in VAT expenses?
We need the CFO to be the recipient of all invoices and statements sent from Blue Xero so he needs to be a contact.
Although, most of the files we need to attach are invoices received via email and it would make it so much easier to drag and drop the file directly from the email into Xero.
Invoices recorded in Xero which need to be deleted due to an error, mistake or other requirement.
If you cancel xero can you export your uploaded files and images such as invoices / receipts etc incase you need them in the future?
We don't sell items or inventory using Xero but simply need to create invoices with line totals.
What do we need to do so that everything will still run perfectly from WFM to Xero when we create and export invoices?
##### CLUSTER 201 #####
I'd like to be able to track our revenue streams better by being able to assign specific revenue centers, same with the cost side.
Essentially I would like to be able to scan a piece of equipment on arrival to a location and for users to then be able to identify the location of that item via a web interface.
When a rule is suggested, I would like to be able to see more details or that rule, nominal code etc, and if it doesn't apply I want to be able to select a different rule instead.
We'd like each one of them to be able to login to Xero only able to:1.
Would like to be able to enter each vehicle's details e. g. VIN number and able to separately identified each MV in the inventory system.
##### CLUSTER 202 #####
I manage 24 different Xero accounts some of which seem to have been randomly effected by a new reports format.
We added the reservations into the new system and as expected they added line items to the Xero liabilty accounts through auto sync.
We are a small Not For Profit industry association wanting to implement the NSCOA* as our new Chart of Accounts in Xero.
Using Xero standard accounts, how do I enter an entertainment expense that's 50% deductible (as per New Zealand tax rules).
Now I want to migrate all those accounts with my new accounting company and I want them to bill me instead of XERO.
I have a new client who has used Xero in the past for her accounts.
Other accounts packages will do these as standard features, but apparently Xero programmers see these as not as important as a pretty new dashboard!
My plan is to switch to Xero at the first of the new year but as I was setting up our chart of accounts, something occurred to me and I emailed support about it.
HiWe are new to Xero and have had to make a few changes to the chart of accounts, particularly changing some codes from GST rated to Zero rated.
I am new to Xero, having taken over from the last accounts person.
##### CLUSTER 203 #####
From what I have read the Xero to Xero function would put the invoice in draft?
Hey XeroIt would be great if you are importing a CSV file template into Xero if you could leave the InvoiceNumber field blank and have Xero automatically create invoice numbers for you.
Using WFM, owned by Xero, if an invoice is entered in error, then deleted in Xero, and fixed an issued in WFM, it will push through as different numbers.
It would be fantastic if when in an email an electronic invoice is received - that it could be saved directly to Xero file library without having to save it to your computer and then upload it again into Xero.
Within Xero I have two separate workshops, both vehicle invoice systems are importing direct into Xero.
Daily transactions are brought into Xero, and if there's a Squarespace sale and an invoice paid via Stripe on the same day (a common occurrence), they all come into Xero the same way.
Its there a way to attach your invoice to a sale sent to a customer via the Xero to Xero Link feature?
Currently, only the customer billing details are exported, so we have to manually update the Xero invoice and the Xero customer record to show the delivery/shipping address.
##### CLUSTER 204 #####
I have just discovered I cannot Journal from Bank Accounts.
We have nine bank accounts, and I just want to see a daily snapshot of our total cash balance.
In MYOB I would have just done a spend money between the two accounts allocating the conversion difference to bank fees or whatever.
The amount of tax actually paid and the net amounts to the bank accounts are correct  - it is just the payslips that are incorrect.
TransferWise just released an awesome feature that allows to create bank accounts in dozens of different currencies in 2 clicks : https://transferwise.
##### CLUSTER 205 #####
I've got half a mind to scrap using the depreciation module for clients with the Pool, and just use a spreadsheet we have set up, and do the entry manually.
In other programs you can just tab across and not have to use the quantity and unit costs fields.
Needless to mention, it should also take into consideration foreign currency translation (perhaps just use the GL balance in local currency to plot the chart)This is based on basic charting principles - if more than one chart is presented on the same page, the units should be comparable.
Its just easier to use Excel, even though it gets messyYou guys really have a great product, but as I have said a million times on this forum, you are PROPERLY let down by your reporting!
The ability to enter a budget by tracking code (I notice that your "tracking" option is touted as a solution for people who currently use cost centres, or regions but many of those people will also have budgets for these so this is certainly not just a NFP problem).
)I am desperately looking to replace QB, which has just been getting on my nerves with their constant nagging at me to use this or that additional service or to change to a subscription-based cloud-based plan.
##### CLUSTER 206 #####
HI, i have been using xero for my small business for the last 2 years.
Hi Xero support Team,I have a client - a barber shop; 100% cash business.
HI all,I am in the process of taking over my fathers business and started inputting data into Xero yesterday (start of the fiscal year).
Hi I am trying to allocate staff wages to a business unit for reporting purposes however xero does not seem to allow that for wages.
Hi all,I tried to set up Xero for our business last financial year, but ran into some problems so we didn't continue with it.
Hi Xero community,My business has several agents who accept cash for orders, deliver, refund money, give back change, etc.
HI I am an owner of a small catering business and we have recently subscribed Xero accounting.
Hi,As a small business switching to Xero from an old accounting system, we are keen to know the benefits we can experience in terms of reducing task we required an external accountant to perform at year end.
Hi everyone,I run a small business that's currently tracking salesperson gross profit figures using Xero.
Hi there,We've recently setup a small business (Photography) and plan on using Xero to manage our accounting requirements.
Hi, I've been using Xero for bookkeeping for three years for a small business.
Hi All, I'm currently trailing Xero for a business.
Hi, Xero doesn't appear to auto calculate the PAYG instalment income at label T1 on the Business Activity Statement.
Hi all,I'm in the process of setting up Xero for an E-commerce business.
Hi there,I am currently assisting a business in migrating to Xero.
Hi there, I've recently started using Xero for our business and had to enter in historical payroll information.
Hi everyone, I am Finance Manager of a medium sized consulting company and we are currently using the Xero tracking categories to run our business.
Hi all,I work for a small business (40 employees, creative/web industry) and we are looking at changing from a fairly archaic (but comprehensive) financing solution over to Xero.
Hi - I am currently working with a tree surgeon business based in the south of England, recently started using Xero, and we are reviewing simple CRM software options for such as client mailshots, both e-mail and postal type with a view to other targeted marketing in the future.
Hi,I work for a business that has 4 entities and all the accounting is done via Xero.
Hi,Yet again I am having to write on this business forum to try and obtain a response from Xero.
##### CLUSTER 207 #####
I have recently taken on a new client - a start up who operated via his personal bank account for the first few months.
I make a new bank account and name petty cash.
Our bank was acquired and now has new name/website/authentication and account number.
Within the Credit Card bank account is it possible to date individual transactions within a new 'spend money transaction?
The bank account "Manage Account" button works in a similar way offering a choice of Spend Money, Receive Money and Transfer Money, which are all reached in two clicks, but to enter a new receive money transaction using the New Transaction button takes three clicks which makes this button virtually redundant in its present form.
i have setup a new bank account, which i have added to the feed that I want as the new master/system account and to archive the other one.
Should I transfer it all to a new dummy bank account as a work around?
In the newly created line to enter the new Bank Account details, the dollar amount is a field I can enter an amount in.
He has set up a new trade using the same bank and paypal account.
##### CLUSTER 208 #####
My company's business activity statement has different number of total GST on purchases from the GST audit report for the June quarter somehow.
It is $500 less on the GST audit report than on the business activity statement.
GST Audit Report is simply way too long when trying to review and prepare Quarterly Business Activity Statements.
As we have quite a few clients who run more than one type of business it is necessary for us to report on each of these businesses in a singular factor (separately) due to non commercial losses etc.
Normally a financial report shows a business's ABN - this option is not available.
From 6 April 2013 all business must now report monthly;http://www.
I managed to edit the layout of the report to reflect the specifics of the business and I am pretty happy with it.
##### CLUSTER 209 #####
I'd like to be able to take all of the checking account transactions and reconcile them against a Bulk P/O or simply do a manual journal entry that states $X,XXX Dollars were collected from Y number of individuals to purchase  A, B, C, D Items in inventory.
I would like to be able to sort the budget manager by account code within income and expenses.
It would be very useful to be able to sort on account transactions, like date/description/reference etc on the attachments column too!
I would like to select a contact and be able to see we paid them in total regardless of what account it came out of.
We would like to see account type be able to default (with the option of override) to a percentage to each division.
Would like to be able to set up the account type with a default breakdown of the percentages incurred by each division instead of having to do each charge manually.
I would like to be able to search my expense claims based on a keyword, e. g. I want to see all expense claims against a particular account, or from a particular company, or containing a particular word.
I would like to be able to attach documents (e. g. account application and approval letter) to contacts.
While that Name, Account & Description is fresh in my mind, I would like to be able to sort ALL transactions and have them appear in a batch, together.
##### CLUSTER 210 #####
i. e. a student wanting to pay off what they owe by donating time instead of money.
7) Some members pay 3 months at a time via PaySimple.
I have a salon and my customers (except one) all pay on the day, at the time of their treatments.
I find it frustrating that when I have to pay my US creditors, I can only do the payments one at a time.
Complex rules are used to calculate the amount of time we actually pay them for.
It can be very confusing to try and do 4 pay periods one after the other in a short space of time.
We have 80+ employees and finding these amounts in each pay period can prove time consuming.
In Saasu every time you process a pay run it automatically emails all employees their payslips.
Multiply those two clicks by the number of employees by the number of pay runs and by the number of organisations = a lot of time wasted.
I have no way of knowing ahead of time if they will take the withholding tax out or not; some places pay the full amount, some don't.
I have to pay my staff tonight, and I am stressing big time!
As you all probably know you can only have one draft pay run and one draft timesheet at any given time.
However penalty rates we pay at award and depending on the time, Thursday, Friday nights x1.
If I do a pay run the monthly salary is always subject to the hours I enter on the time sheet.
However, we have a number of different rates of pay depending on the employee, the time of day, the day and also the site they are at.
I was told to allocate payments to Wages & Salaries as there were no correct pay runs done at the time.
We have 80+ employees and finding these amounts in each pay period can prove time consuming.
However, when I fill in a payslip with overtime such as 2 hrs @ time and a half and 2 @ double pay then super of 9.
Welcome anyone's help if I seem to be doing it the slow way, or some support if anyone is finding the same monotony at pay run time.
i've added time sheets and all and ran pay roll.
I currently have a pay item for time off which employees accrue throughout the year.
My employee submitted time for the last pay period, ending 3/13/2016.
I deleted that timesheet, but we still cannot enter time for him in pay period 3/20/2016.
Banding belowThanks Nicholas DriessensTier 	Pensionable Pay (whole-time equivalent)	Contribution Rate from 2015/16 to 2018/19 1	 Up to &#163;15,431.
I have another pay run to process and cant have more than one active at a time.
For example:Employee 'X'Paid hour totals for pay periods 1st July - 30th November 2016:Ordinary Hours: 754 @ 30 p/h Time and a Half: 128.
Get customers to pay on time or get paid for the money you lend!
FlexiTime saves you time on pay day and improves the accuracy of your payroll by combining rosters, timesheets and payroll in one great online tool, check out .
Pay staff correctly for the time they work.
##### CLUSTER 211 #####
In the Chart of Accounts in the Retained Earnings it has next to it "Do Not Use" can that be removed?
We don't budget on such a granular level as individual accounts in my company so can't use at the default level of detail.
However, after realizing that we should use separate accounts to log those revenue streams I found myself at somewhat of a problem.
Is there any community location where users could download specific industry-based charts of accounts for use by other users?
I don't want that to appear on my emails to clients, I want to use accounts@company.
Our Clients are requesting this as some accounts teams are not allowed to use links embedded in emails to retrieve information and require PDF's only.
au) and to set a different email for use when sending remittances (eg accounts@vendor.
com why can't we use our own domain, e. g accounts@mycompany.
Most accounting programs use "Other Expenses" or "Non-operating expenses" as a chart of accounts option in order to show this.
It would be nice if we had a bigger choice of accounts to use as the offset to a Deduction.
I was hoping to use this to correct my CoGs and Inventory accounts back to where they should be.
They currently use different accounts to record wages and superannuation expenses for factory & office staff .
I use PocketSmith to manage my personal accounts and do forecast projections.
A csv file accompanies the deposit and from that I use the data to distribute the deposit to multiple chart accounts (which allows me to track performance of our various contractors who generate the commissions).
##### CLUSTER 212 #####
It's always like 2 invoices plus part of another, or 2 invoices plus a bit of extra cash in credit.
Like: , then those invoices under it with a $$ total, then those, and the total $$ of the invoices I'm not owed yet.
Currently a client invoices in Euros and GBP, sometimes raising invoices of both currencies to one customer, I'd like the ability to allocate Euro credit notes to GBP invoices for example
I have a bunch of unfinished invoices that I would like to change to drafts however I can only find an option to update the invoices.
I like to check the invoices before reconciling them because we do a lot of recurring monthly invoices for the same amount to the same customer.
##### CLUSTER 213 #####
Then reconcile this like it was a bank transaction.
The idea of an automated piece of software logging in to my bank as *me* and scraping the raw HTML to obtain transaction info sounds like a disaster waiting to happen.
Bank feeds and bank rules look like a great way to automate some of this process, but it looks like the bank feed only does the first 500 transactions.
I would like to request bank feeds for Community America Credit Union.
I would like the option of selecting a credit note in the bank rec.
You guys should look into eWise financial aggregation service if you would like to improve on bank feeds in Singapore and other countries.
Would like to see a Available Safe Bank Balance on Dashboard.
I would like an option to copy all the details from a bank transaction to the ledger with one click, rather than having to retype everything.
(Workaround - bank rule if possible)2) Customer used to run like a cashbook coding a lot from the Dashboard.
I would like a date selection feature on bank reconciliation.
I would like to see sensible defaults added to the find and match functions in the bank rec.
I've searched through what feels like the entire community discussion to find an answer to my question about direct feeds from NatWest Bank in the UK.
I have three items that I would like to raise for discussion with regard to the 'bank rules'.
For some reason Royal Bank of Canada records are showing up like this:Transaction Date 	23 Apr 2014 Payee 	 Reference 	IDP PURCHASE x 1406-IMPARK00090436A Description 	 Transaction Amount 	19.
However I believe your product would be a better fit for the client, so I would like to know what the process is to request support of an additional bank that is being supported by your competing providers?
Now I would like to reconcile the bank and I cannot find the transactions.
Similar to Receipt Bank, I'd like to have this process for all orders:* Order are emailed to the App, it gets processed and then be ready for a quick review.
I like what I've seen in demos, and what I've read, about both Receipt Bank and Bill.
I don't like wasting an extra $21 per month simply to reconcile my bank transactions.
##### CLUSTER 214 #####
I want it to be a recurring invoice but I want to be able to adjust the amount to reflect any variations in the amount of the rates so I would like it to "pop up" at the nominated dates but not be "approved" for sending.
We would like to be able to send a receipt from the invoice screen.
I'd like to be able to set up a reminder that goes weekly, no matter how overdue the invoice is.
I'd like to be able to specify an email address which would be CC'd or BCC'd on every outgoing invoice reminder email.
I would like to be able to mark an invoice as shipped or completed once I've dispatched the goods.
Therefore, I would like to be able to insert a unique image into an invoice (currently not available).
I would like to be able to set up a tax called 'GST/PST on purchases' and make it's components 5% GST and 7% PSTIf I make a $100 purchase of taxable office supplies and I apply the tax code ' 'GST/PST on purchases' to my invoice line for office supplies the entry should beDR office supplies expense 100.
When I create a PO I would like to be able to order x cases of n units rather than put the total unit quantity, as this would tie up better with the supplier invoice as well as allow us to specify the particular case sizes required on occasion (i. e. to buy 2 cases of 50 rather than one case of 100, e. g. if one case of 50 is being shipped off elsewhere).
##### CLUSTER 215 #####
There is no option for bank feeds and the loan is paid in as and when we require it (almost like a transfer from a separate account with a loan limit).
I would like my detailed general ledger (and other) reports to show me which bank account the transaction is from.
When using rules in bank reconciliation I would like to see the rule account allocation appear beside the don't apply rule area in the reconciliation screen.
In lieu of adding Stripe as a 'Bank Account-Like' data feed, as Ronan Quirke and David Pollock have indicated this is not the best approach.
Sort of like a cover sheet with all expenses in a month on a certain account, then the rest of the pages with the actual receipts as received from Receipt Bank.
I'd like for example excel to export every day automatically into excel data such as but limited to our bank account statement.
This comes in as a separate transaction and I code it to my Bank Fees account like all other PayPal fees.
The product code field and bank account fields already work like this.
##### CLUSTER 216 #####
I receive 4% commission on all sales, as well as 50c for the sale of a new card.
I'm working with a new CPA to help me submit sales taxes now as well as annual taxes.
The postal and physical contact address is completely non-sensical and require extensive training on every new sales employee and mistakes are still made.
Sales then PurchaseOnly a small thing but I tend to tab through when creating a new contact and consistency is something that make an application nice to usecheersMike Deam
It seems that when I go to create a new budget, there is no provision to hide information and or , simply assign a yearly sales figure, with provision to break it down into monthly targets.
We are a small home based sublimation printer printing fine art items from new artists and photographers helping them develop a market and sales for their art.
##### CLUSTER 217 #####
We are a UK based partnership and have just secured some finance, over 5 years, to purchase a new van.
A friend and I just set up a new Limited company by converting his sole proprietorship to a company and adding me as a equal shareholder.
They have just released their new feature Point & Claim, while it's an awesome feature, we don't really want to stay with them for one good feature.
Hey everyoneWe have just set up a trust and received a new ABN.
)Do you take a similar random approach, or just search for stuff you are interested in/want to comment on or  is there a way you can be notified of new feature requests?
Just on the days that new transactions are recorded.
'Why not just make 'Transfer money' a third option for 'new transfer'?
As far as I can see, at present, the only way to correct this is to delete the statement line and import a new CSV file containing just that one line.
I have just read another closed thread, about community users votes having increased to 10, so am starting this new one as suggested by Brittany in that closed thread.
When we used excel we just set up a new page for each tenderer and copied the page and made the alts, then we had a tidy and easily referenced record.
Just saw the new Inventory feature - this is really a classic situation where a USER with a purely data entry role   into INVENTORY is needed.
Currently we are just doing it in excel after we export the month end balance sheet and we are adding a new section with the net closing balance after depreciation of these parts - as follows.
I have just set up with a new Electricity and Gas utility provider who have estimated my annual usage and charge me a monthly direct debit.
My client just paid first and last months rent into an escrow for a new facility they are renting.
I have just updated a contact details from a New Zealand address to an Australian address.
Just a button next to the network key field "Populate Details" that draws all the contact details of the network key owner into this new contact.
Having set up a new employee in January, I have just realised that the leave is not accruing for him, in fact he is still at zero hours for Annual, LSL and Carer's/Sick Leave.
I have just started in a new Job and they are using very old methods to calculate payroll each week for 85+ Staff.
We have only just taken payroll in-house as from April and am I completely new to it.
The new starter form he completed just asks if you had income - not what income you received/have paid tax on etc.
We have just employed 2 new employees who are married to each other.
Why even bother putting VOTES on feature requests we can't search for previously submitted requests, so we all just create new requests and that gets a vote or 2 and then fades aways into the black hole that is this forum.
Otherwise, I just love the new file feature !
##### CLUSTER 218 #####
Hello,I am new to Xero and I have a client that wants to use accrual accounting and have numbers locked down at the end of the month.
I'm new to Xero and accounting and could really use some help before my trial period expires.
I am new to Xero but finding it very easy to use (so far!
It's userbase is probably a very similar crowd to those who are willing to use Xero, and it would help push forward the transition from old, lame products that don't integrate and cost too much to new, cloud-based products which integrate easily and keep expenses reasonable.
I am new to using Xero and am loving all of the features available - the program is easy to use and very streamlined.
We have a potential new client we could convert from MYOB to Xero but they use Ostendo for their job costing and inventory - manufacturing company.
##### CLUSTER 219 #####
I've banked the cheque into the business account and it's come through in the Xero bank feeds.
The problem I am having in Xero is that the debit/credit card payments money that comes into my bank account from PayPal is grouped from hundreds of small businesses and there is no way to tell how much originates from which small business by using the PayPal download.
Can anyone recommend a Xero friendly UK business bank account that has good online access without a security fob?
I have recently set up my Santander business account to do a bank feed into Xero.
The Xero Business help centre tells me to setup a petty cash bank account.
If I approve all of these purchases, my balance in xero would be for example -&#163;2500, where as in my actual business bank account, the balance would be &#163;1500.
When I want to connect my bank feeds, however, it stated on my internet banking that my business account seems to be connected with Xero.
I have had xero for a number of years and also my business bank account.
##### CLUSTER 220 #####
Can I just delete the transactions, since the sum result is 0 each time?
Just wanting to know if the is possible without purchasing another 3rd party app and to make the checkout time more efficient.
Our NAB banking is done not through an internet banking ID but through NAB Connect (just a fancier version really) but it does mean that whilst I have a set NAB ID, my log in password is generated through a token each time.
it waists a lot of time opening another windows just to copy and paste from contact info
April is just around the corner and NFP organisations will be facing the same challenge again to get this sorted the soonest time for their members.
Could there not be a setting whereby you could store the details so each time you submit your VAT return, they would just be available.
stop wasting time - and just leave reports as you customised them to be.
Having just completed the archiving of over 100 Tracking Items I can tell you from experience that this is a tedious and time-consuming task.
Just thinking, it's about time to remove the 12.
it just doesn;t work and is extremely time consuming.
In terms of the comparison options those would not be affected because 1 previous 'period' would just mean going back an equal amount of time as that defined by the user.
The re-login screen says its a 30min time out but it just seems to be a lot less than that?
Yet when a time off request is input it is just created in a period of days.
Because the exchange rate changed, the second time, we just paid $4,100USD for 28,000RMB.
Is there a way or bypassing the 2 step method of entering a bill with a due date and just paying it at the same time as entering it?
Or is it just gone (a tax time treat).
With a large inventory, this approach can be just as time consuming as entering the information manually.
Just wanted to ask you a question regarding Annual Leave for Part Time employees.
I have only just realized that he has been accruing A/L at the same time.
I have just realised that our employee who went from casual to full-time back in March this year didn't have any sick leave accruing (personal/carers) so I've managed to fix that up but I notice that in his details there is Compassionate leave of 19.
our payslip did not show the time off accrual although we had set up correctly and it was correct in previous month, it just happened in this month that It did not show the leave accrual.
We just want to ensure our employees are happy and feel comfortable with the information they are supplied and also cut down the time we spend here in the office explaining confusing situations to employees.
Easy but time-consuming would be to just extract the data in Excel and manipulate from there, but I don't feel that it the correct route.
We have always just swallowed the time in the past as it didn't take long, probably 20 minutes for each user maximum.
then to ask the issue to be passed to a manager in the hope that it would get some faster replies, doesn't happen, and then i get an unplanned phone call, with a light hearted attitude of 'ill just email him' all because i was trying to do some work, and was unavailable at the time.
##### CLUSTER 221 #####
Finally, I pay monthly for a server monitoring service which I use to monitor my customers' servers (and pass on the fees to my customers).
We pay for 50% of the land from our own funds and use the development finance to fund the other 50%.
However, sometimes we use a different card to pay for stuff as we may not have the relevant card to hand.
We use own personal credit cart to pay some biz bills.
However, they would be happy to use my affiliate number if I had one and they could pay their own subscription and I could benefit in a small way.
We use a monthy pay cycle that ends 28th of each month 2.
I mainly use paypal to pay recurring software subscriptions, but do get the odd person who pays.
We currently use a service with QuickBooks called "Bill Pay" that allows us to issue payments directly from QuickBooks.
Some of my employees use a salary sacrifice scheme to pay for health insurance for their families (not for much longer I know.
Upgraded to use Payroll last month, submitted our first pay run last Wed 29th, it took a while for the submission to appear under RTI Filings, it eventually did.
##### CLUSTER 222 #####
I'm creating bank rules and having a tough time knowing what account code to place each one under.
Each time a client sends an email campaign I receive a small commission paid into my bank account at the end of each month.
Eg, should I set it up as a bank account or a credit card (there was a card issue fee, and other fees for currency conversions etc each time we load funds on to it - currently AUD to USD).
Having a separate notes 'sticky notes' field for each bank account would be very helpful and enable me to be more time efficient.
It is so time consuming to reconcile a bank account that should only take 15 minutes or so.
This would save me time as I could copy and paste the words "milkman" the code and the amount down the spreadsheet and quickly fire it into the petty cash account(bank).
##### CLUSTER 223 #####
2) To deal with Revenue recognition the received payments go into a income in advance account and we have to create a recurring journal for each invoice to convert it to sales revenue over the 12 months.
So I'm wondering when I set up an invoice to send to retailers should I put in the account column "01 - wholesale" or "200 - Sales"?
Is the best way to do it as follows:- Set up a Petty Cash account- Record expenses against it (so it goes into credit)- Book a dummy sales invoice, against petty cash to clear it out to zero?
After I set the default account (e. g.  sales 200) for a particular contact,  then I tried to issue an invoice.
Invoice for the Deposit, using a "Deposits Received for Jobs" liability account instead of "Sales"2.
##### CLUSTER 224 #####
I feel like I should be able to add a placeholder in units to say days per month or working days per month.
I would like to be able to add it as an Affiliation in Practice Settings.
We would like the option to be able to add one contact to more than one group.
We would like to be able to add a percentage based surcharge to some but not all of our customers where a slight increase in price is necessary.
I'd like to be able to add a column to show dates, then item, description etc.
##### CLUSTER 225 #####
I have run the bank reconciliation report.
I can "back-date" the transaction during reconciliation but then I'm guessing the bank reconciliation report will be incorrect.
I have successfully reconciled the item, using bank feed, and it shows up in the reconciliation report as having been reconciled.
When I bring up my Reconcilation Report it is saying that I have an unreconciled bank statement line.
The report generated is therefore absolutely useless for monitoring and forecasting bank cash position.
Our process at the moment is to publish the reconciliation report and include in the name the bank name and date we have reconciled to.
However, the issue I have with this report that it includes money received from all contacts including bank interest and other "Receive Money" transactions.
Also, displaying the REF field within reports would also help, especially on the bank reconciliation report where we have to manually drill down in order to see the name and cheque number.
I've deleted the bank statement from which the transactions were recorded, however my reconciliation report still shows the entries made and my balance is still incorrect.
4 months of bank statement reconciliations later, and we still have zero balances showing on the statement reconciliation report - something is clearly wrong!
##### CLUSTER 226 #####
We run a medium sized manufacturing facility and would like to issue  a production order without the sales figures.
I would like to track per month the sales of these different trading names (or branding).
I would like to track sales of my products separately from my acupuncture/consult.
I would like to break down my sales into 3 different codes - services (massage, reflexology etc), products I make and the products I buy in from suppliers.
What I would like to see is to filter the Sales by Item, or as it is now, the Inventory Item Summary by tracking catagory.
I  would like to see a more user friendly method for checking GST tax codes entered for all transactions, and especially sales and purchases.
Make sales tax more user friendly like it on quick books online.
The Global and US Sales Tax reports do not track adjustments to prior periods like the NZ, AU and UK GAT/VAT returns do.
We would really like the ability to search by tracking category when in Contacts, Sales and Purchases.
For example I would like to compare sales in August 2013 with August 2012.
It would be great to get a dashboard or daily notification in some other way for things like- Clients with large debtors balances relative to sales - Clients who have gone into overdraft- Clients that have had a significant cash injection or high cash balance- Clients who haven't accessed their file for a certain timeThis would remove a lot of the current manual process of regularly reviewing client files and then approaching them with assistance when these events occur.
Give users options to select from various graphic reports for things like profit and loss or daily sales.
We would like to know if there is a way to track inventory items on cash sales, since that makes up a large number of our transactions.
It also seems like some of my sales may not be importing as well.
00And this is what I think it should look like :-Income			Sales	&#163;5,000.
##### CLUSTER 227 #####
I have my accounts setup in Xero and include a percentage of things like the interest on my mortgage, power, internet etc.
That card is listed in xero and I reconcile those transactions to accounts like office supplies, assets, etc.
For example, instead of projecting Contractor and Consultant costs separately because they are two different GL accounts in Xero, I'd like to group into Contractors/Consultants and have an overall expense per month for that group going forward.
I would like to see Limited liability partnership (LLP) as an available choice for organisation type when setting up a Xero organisation, with a tailored chart of accounts to fit this type.
Apart from issues others also have, regarding timing of payments made, between our authorisation / transfer and when a super fund receives funds and credits employee accounts, I have a part of the process I'd like added into Xero.
Xero should have register option from Accounts tab where we can enter Journal Entry, Expense, Cheque, Receipt etc very much like Quickbooks its useful to see balance and enter transaction as well.
M/s Vector Capital (Pvt) Limited has four types of Receivables head of accounts, like: Foreign exchange Brokerage Receivable, Money Market Brokerage Receivable, Commodity Brokerage Receivable, Mutual Investment Commission Receivable, but Xero Software has only One Receivable now advice me that how i arrange remaining receivable,
I'm aware of tracking and I know I could also slim down the chart of accounts - but is anyone aware of a feature like this in Xero.
##### CLUSTER 228 #####
Hi all, I'm trying to send out 1700 invoices today and usually email them out in batches of 200.
Hi,Looking for some advice on how to manage part payments and invoices and fees.
Hi,setting up our repeating invoices today, we notice that tax exclusive is selected by default.
Hi all, Most of my invoices are raised pro-forma up to two years in advance.
Hi:Looking to move from QuickBooks 2005 & Zoho Invoices.
Hi,Can anyone advise if it is possible to reprint multiple original invoices?
Hi, I have recently instated a credit card surcharge for credit card payments made on invoices.
Hi , I have one questions and a suggest improvements:1. on the desktop version i can send in invoices to two contact in an email.
Hi GuysSimilar to what is available for Customer Invoices, it would be fantastic if you could include an attachment with an emailed Purchase Order.
Hi AllI send invoices via email.
Hi allEach month we send invoices out which are more or less the same.
Hi thereI create invoices for a service each month on the 22nd of the month which is a charge in advance for the next month.
Hi,I have imported 399 invoices.
Hi,I click to approve my invoices, but keep getting the "tax amount" column appearing.
Hi,I have a client that has paid off a lot of invoices for the one deposit transaction.
Hi Looking at the placeholders options for repeating invoices and seeing other questions with regards to this, I have another one!
Hi, we are in company in Germany and want to import invoices.
Hi guysI have over complicated my item codes I think and I have a few issues with the way they display on my invoices.
Hi,we received quite a lot of invoices from our subcontractors over the period of a couple of months after our year end.
Hi,At present my employee is generating invoices which get sent to me for approval and email out.
Hi,I am looking for a marketplace app that can potentially help with allocating large bulk customer payments against multiple invoices and credit notes.
Hi,I have all my purchases (receipts, invoices etc. )
Hi,I sent a number of invoices out on 1/4/2016 & unfortunately I incorrectly typed the email address which should have resulted in an immediate bounce back.
Hi, I'm having problems printing invoices and credit notes.
##### CLUSTER 229 #####
I have an account in my Chart of accounts titled "Dealer Sales".
We currently have our cloud based POS system KOUNTA exporting daily sales figures as sales (money coming in) invoices to our 'Sale Income Account: 200' and also to 'cash clearing accounts', 'EFTPOS clearing account's and 'Till surplus/shortage accounts' all well and happy.
Cost of Sales accounts in with Income Account number series.
The way we did this with Reckon was an EFT Clearing account, and an Undeposited Funds account, which we then entered a manual journal weekly that credited Sales accounts and debited these two clearing accounts.
For example, seeing a balance sheet account in GST Free might indicate an error as it would typically be used when posting to cost of sales or expense accounts.
##### CLUSTER 230 #####
Add the use tax the price of the item and add another line to the transaction that hits a use tax liability account.
Sometimes, in order to excite the dealers about our products, we will add in a complimentry item for them to use in demos of the product and such.
Also does anyone else use tracking as a type of job costing although I know this is not the purpose as there is no closing off mechanism but we don't want more costs of add in's and it seems you can get a P&L etc in the tracking.
Add to purchases the automatic calculation of additional "consumer use tax" due.
com/support/Articles/HOW13256Does anyone know of an add-on I could use that would allow me to see the information this way?
This means I have to use a spreadsheet and add up all the payments manually to find the final number for each contractor.
If so, did you use an add-on also?
We are currently looking to use several Add-ons for the same purpose.
I use a ton of other add on's ie deputy and Receipt banking etc.
##### CLUSTER 231 #####
Over time, this rate can vary a lot from the rate automatically used by Xero and our accounts are showing significant unrealised Foreign Currency Gains/Losses, until I manually change the exchange rate at the end of each month.
Reconciling accounts manually is both time consuming and labour intensive, We purchased Xero 4 months ago in order to improve our processes and benefit from  web based software but we have yet to see the benefits.
But this would be REALLY useful to have built in on a future update, other than that one issue it's an amazing piece of software and can;t thank the designers and developers enough for creating something that is essential to the running of our company, I genuinely don't think we'd be where we are no if ti wasn't for Xero as I simply wouldn't have the time to mange and track payments, do payroll and keep up to date accounts etc.
I'm guessing that most Xero users are handling this process via copying-and-pasting from Notepad or Evernote, but to have a default message appear in the box would save a good deal of time for high-volume accounts.
Enable access to multiple Xero files as an Accountant under the same user name to enable reconciliation of loan accounts between entities, and ability to work on more than one file at a time.
##### CLUSTER 232 #####
i. e. if I add a virtual 500 payroll to my directors account it increases the p&l as it sees it as income and the same with expenses.
I add x amount of units at cost price, and it asks for the "Adjustment account".
We have expenditure for book advances that we add to an asset account.
It would be great if I could add multiple account Numbers to one contact.
I cannot seem to add it in the inventory account as a non-inventory item as a percentage only as a dollar amount.
Would it really be that difficult to add an "account column" in the activity view of the contact overview?
Setup a loan account to add the amount loaned to employees3.
So I suppose a workaround would be to add a dummy budget item to every account?
To add to my confusion, the "other half" of the transaction sometimes shows as reconciled in our checking account transaction screen!
com For the first 10 beta testers we will add USD $25 credits to your account.
au and we will add the bonus bills to your account.
##### CLUSTER 233 #####
Hi,We are a relatively new startup and do not yet have company credit cards so we are still running most expenses personally and then filing expense claims.
Hi ,We purchased a new car through mortgage and record the loan as a non- current liability.
Hi there:We are an exporting company, located in New Zealand.
Hi guys, I am new here and I have a question to ask that maybe sb could shed some light on it.
Hi Folks,Last week when I ran the new Aged Receivables Summary, overpayments would show as a negative amount.
Hi we are an Australian company and bought a new car in July 2013 through the company using a Chattel Mortgage and the Director traded in a personal vehicle as part of the sale.
hi, I'm a new user so please excuse this basic question.
Hi all,Happy new year.
Hi I have a case of new fixed asset, where 03 payments were made on different dates to buy the same item.
Hi there, I am quite new to this and coming from a spreadsheet it is quite daunting!
Hi thereReally love the new bulk tax letter feature.
Hi,A manual Journal and a debit note option should be allowed in the contact details under new.
Hi,When adding an contact,  find an address works but when I click on the address to auto fill, it adds the wrong country, for example all other fields are showing an address in australia but the country come as New Zealand or United Kingdom!
Hi,  I am new to zero and am trying to navigate the reporting function.
Hi all,New to this!
Hi all,I know this has been discussed a few years ago (popular topics are from 2012), but I'm hoping new features have been added since then to make this easier to do.
Hi,I'm very pleased that the new quote feature is here - I find it very useful.
Hi,We are evaluating new accounting systems and I have a requirement that does not seem to be available in entry level/mid-market systems.
Hi, I see there is a new release due this weekend.
Hi,I have a client where I've added 2 new employees recently, both on 37.
Hi, I am starting a new employee who is casual.
Hi,When entering a new employee, it gets a bit confusing under the "Taxes" tab where the "Tax Free Threshold Claimed" box is ticked.
Hi there,our company has a new employee.
Hi EveryoneI am new to setting up & using Payroll.
Hi all,The new year has started and my employees have finished all they're holiday hours from last year.
Hi,We have a new starter who might have had some freelance earnings in this tax year before he joined us.
Hi I'm brand new to payroll.
Hi, new to payroll,Have completed my first run and have posted it.
Hi AllAm I being really dim with the new payroll function?
Hi Guys,I'm new to all of this so I was hoping someone could help me.
Hi,Has anyone else on the Starter plan noticed that the "total transactions reconciled for the current month" message has been removed from the new dashboard?
##### CLUSTER 234 #####
I would like confirmation that clients and suppliers have received invoices, statements, purchase orders, etc, possibly a type Read Receipt.
, trying to receive payments and enter our invoices and bills paid, as well as expensed items like computers, office furniture.
There's one particular client's contact and invoices that I'd like to hide from this contractor.
, but a large part of norwegian businesses, like mine, have signed up for access points and 90% of norwegian accounting systems have implemented both sending and receiving UBL invoices.
The problem is when I have come to do the reconciliation, the invoices are showing as income, as well as the money we have been paid by our finance company - effectively making it look like we have made twice as much money.
I saw we could import a CSV to create draft invoices but I would like to modify quantities only without having to import each month a CSV that would create a draft that I would have to validate afterwards.
Is there an easier way of dealing with invoices from vendors like this?
I would like to Export and edit, in bulk repeating invoices.
For example I have set a monthly S/O for customers, when we have a price increase I  have to edit them individually, instead I would like to export the repeating invoices to a CSV, edit them and then import them back in.
This is important to clients who are paying taxes (particularly in Philippines) and using data (like bills and invoices) to be reported in BIR on a cash basis.
A mini-statement like that would be very useful for clients with multiple invoices.
I would like to see the ability to apportion incoming bills to outgoing invoices.
I would like to request an integration with Airbnb to create automatic invoices to record host fees, rental income, taxes, and other fees similar to how the Square integration works.
We would like a feature that summarises the invoices generated each day into a shipping manifest.
Make the value entry fields calculate like they do on invoices.
I would like to see paid invoices on the mobile app.
However, there aren't enough of them for me to make my invoices as complete as I'd like.
I would like to see an "All Invoices" button and "All Bills" button added to their appropriate sections in the dashboard.
I would like to have a reference column on "View Recent Invoices".
Im looking at my statement list and i think to my self did i email or post that statement yesterday, why isnt their a green sent tick box like on invoices?
Even ,if we could export the PO's to excel like the invoices and bills.
I'd like to give this person access to create, approve, print and send purchase orders, without giving them access to all of our invoices.
Several of our clients have stated that they would like to see total outstanding invoices on the dashboard as well, so they can see their total outstanding receivables and commitments at a glance.
At times we would like to quickly go through bills or invoices done on certain date(s) however have to keep going back a page and opening each item one by one, having a next and previous button also maybe allowing keyboard keys to go through them would be great.
Some Credit Notes, like invoices, do not lend themselves to be repeating credit notes, but ability to copy would assist greatly.
I'd love it if I could see 6 months or even a year of data on my dashboard, much like the "Invoices Owed to you" window.
Please make it so repeating invoices can be put on hold - I don't like having to delete them and recreate them later when we put a service on hold.
It would be great if you can edit the payslip layouts like you can do for the invoices.
We have corporate headquarters that would like to see the unpaid invoices of their branch offices.
Now that they are merged, I would like to print out the invoices.
Now if I want to get a full picture of activities related to a contact, Instead of taking 5 seconds as in MYOB, I would have to log into each of these reports, input ambiguous parameters like date ranges, accoutns, invoices, expense or income.
Accountancy seems like a very dark art to me and I struggle to make sense of itI issue clients at my psychotherapy practice in Dublin, Ireland with invoices through my practice management system, Cliniko.
I would like to see a total for each supplier as you tick this so you don't have to be reconciling again the statement or have it totalled under each supplier the total amount once you have ticked the invoices.
##### CLUSTER 235 #####
Please help me figure which of these I should use to report expenses correctly: Dues and Subscriptions, Software, Professional Services, Payroll Admin fee, accounting fee.
Please help me understand when should I use which for correct report.
Do I have to use the GST reconciliation Report for anything?
Personally I never use the formatted version of reports as it is difficult to cross check or analyse the report/data.
Should the VAT Reconciiliation Report work correctly sao that the VAT trial balance matches the VAT Reconcilation and VAT return liability, if you use VAT Reverse Charge entries?
I used to use MYOB, and it had a function that allowed me to view a profit and loss report at the summary level only.
It would be of use to have the ability to link schedules to report fields.
I use this report to lodge the BAS.
At the moment I have to use the Budget Variance Report, export and manually adjust.
This would enable you to use the same report each month without having to update the dates ie YTD progress compared with the previous year.
Very simple changes would make the report actually useful and efficient to use.
(A step further than turning notes on/off would be to have certain notes triggered by the use of the relevant report code - maybe a dream for the future)
If there was a way to print the dashboard into a report format, I think a lot of accountants would use it.
However the only title you can use for this report is "Year ended.
Could take this a little further and include the other basic data as shown in the organisation details page and allow us to use these as report fields.
What report template should I use to file company taxes with HMRC?
We extensively use the "Report Level" feature in MYOB, it lets you run the P&L and Balance Sheet at various levels - from every code to 3 other summarised versions depending on the structure you set up.
I am trying to find out if there is a report that I can use to help me make my personal lodgement.
We use this report to keep track of funding from grants for our clients and sometimes they run for more than 12 months.
I had thought I could use a special symbol as a separator and then piggy back into the Reference field e. g. TheirRef*MyRef but I can't see a way to report on "all purchases with no * in the reference".
Understand that we can use the non tracking feature but there will be no quantity report.
##### CLUSTER 236 #####
Also, if the tax is non-refundable and I want to assign the tax to expense account and do not want that it should get carried to the sales tax account?
Should it be recorded in the awards account not sales account or somewhere else.
In reviewing my 2015 balance sheet, I see that my account "Sales", which is marked as Revenue for account type, is showing up as a debit.
and come out of my sales account as usual and also when i make the adjustment increase what account do i do it from?
Ideally, I would send everything to the control account then journal all our sales by item to a respective account.
Then purchased the item would go to an asset account and when sold the cost value would transfer to a cost of sales account.
The $1000 goes to Credit in 400 sales account and  $600 (Payments) goes to Debit in 120 AR account.
##### CLUSTER 237 #####
Under Payroll Settings in Xero, add a new benefit type (name: "Gym Membership”, category: “Other”, type: Fixed Amount, amount: £13.
We’re currently in the final stages of testing our new add-on for Xero and are looking for about 5 - 10 companies to help beta test the integration before we launch.
In Xero, you have to first select add new.
This feature would allow us to add all of our existing companies information (including Xero Key) into the new company.
On the other hand, Xero may want to add a user vote for each new Feature request created.
It would be great under the new Xero pricing if we could have Payroll as an add-on module for the cashbook.
I am new to Xero and am trying to figure out how to add a bill from a vendor, for which I have already partially accrued the expense.
Also, any plans to add automated provisioning to the app to automatically bring new Azure AD users onboard with Xero for true SSO?
I am very new to Xero so maybe someone already knows of an add-on out there.
)I think this would make for a much more streamlined workflow, and it would open up possibilities for third parties to add new or missing functionality into Xero without having to build standalone "products" of their own.
##### CLUSTER 238 #####
Hi Everybody,I had my inventory management system imported all of my invoices to Xero.
Hi, I am trying to print off my previous invoices from Xero for the monthly subscription.
Hi all,I have a SME client who wants to implement XERO, but has 3 seperate legal entities in 3 seperate currencies - and also transacts(invoices / pays) in 2-3 currencies in each entity.
Hi,I have an ongoing headache with calendars and trying to synchronise appointmentsI am a gardener and have one off and repeat appointments and therefore Xero invoices that are one off and repeat.
If Xero could increase this file limit it would make life for me and for all users who value crisp, hi quality logos on their invoices and quotes, amazing!
Hi thereI have a customer who is not receiving their invoices automatically from Xero.
Hi everyone,I am trialling Xero and want to start recording a small amount of invoices that my company has issued - and have already been paid.
Hi, I can't find a thread on this but I was wondering why when I change the "To" field or contact in the Xero contact file of a client it does not change across previous invoices?
##### CLUSTER 239 #####
But what is Really Really Important to us is that we want to be able to Print out a Bar-code against the customer so we can stick it on the Computer/Laptop so if that device ever comes back into the shop again we can scan it, all history regarding that device comes up and we can add a new job against that customer.
I'd love to be able to add a custom column to the new reports feature that allows me to enter a figure in that column for each row.
It would be so helpful to be able to have the Add New Item in the Drop down list so that we can add the new Inventory item that we may have purchased while we are reconciling.
Furthermore, in this view, you should be able to click on any one of these transactions, specifically on any specific bit of info (for example, the Category or notes) and a field pulls open to search for a new Category to recode and a field shows so you can edit or add the note and then click off and it should dynamically save.
We require the facility of being able to add new training programs or services to the system.
##### CLUSTER 240 #####
Annual renewal: at the time of the initial sale I edit the repeating invoice that would be sent 12 mths later and I change the date to previous month so that the customer gets their invoice 30 days before their subscription renewal date.
As in, f. ex you have 100$ per 3 months, so you send an invoice in june for the period 2014-07-01--2014-09-30 and the next bill will be from 2014-10-01--2014-12-31, but is there any way to put this time period on the invoice?
It would be good if the invoice date would auto-update to the current date each time a draft invoice is opened rather than stay the date when it was first created.
Every invoice I send has an attachment and every time I want to include with invoice.
When I invoice my clients, Xero uses the same invoice number each time so I have to keep track of  actual invoice numbers on a piece of paper.
I have a client who needs to raise a creditor invoice at the same time as raising a debtors invoice.
##### CLUSTER 241 #####
What happens when a customer doesn't pay, but don't find out until the invoice is due - go back into the month the revenue occurred and void the invoice.
Wouldn't it be nice to send a invoice off to a client via email, where they can pay a invoice online with a credit card using xero!
:-)- On the 10th of the month they overpay an invoice (in order to pre-pay for the upcoming invoice) and a credit note is created.
After creating an invoice and submitting approval, we have an option to pay the invoice below.
I have been faced with this issue everytime I email an invoice to a customer and if the customer elects to pay by Paypal, the customer get charged GST even if the invoice is GST inclusive.
I want to send them a draft invoice notice that is payable online that I can convert to a formal invoice when they pay.
##### CLUSTER 242 #####
i use square integration for our cafe and all of our income goes through square as sales.
The key feature I'm wanting to use is to cash up our POS sales each day - so this includes cash & card sales, plus petty cash/float cash use on a daily basis.
What contact do you use for this, would you set up five different customers or do you create a contact named "cash sales" and post the total amount under that contact?
We have Marriott as a client, but 4 different sales people use us within their regions, how are you structuring them?
There quantity sales in coloumns for each month so I can use it to create an average for last 3,6, or twelve months for each product.
Hello,We use the Quotes system as a way of processing Sales Orders.
This cloud CRM system combines Sales, Marketing, Customer Service and Support into one easy-to-use, yet powerful, solution for small businesses.
Intuitive – easy to use cash flow forecasting - a software tool which gives you control of your cash flow and sales pipeline.
Enables you and your team to manage all products, customers, suppliers, contacts, purchases and sales in one easy-to-use system, check out .
Good evening all,We have various clients who use till systems/ POS systems to record their sales, mainly restaurants and pubs throughout the south of England.
I am looking for an iPad sales pad and catalogue app to use when meeting face to face with customers.
I have a multi currency client who use Prestashop for their online sales.
##### CLUSTER 243 #####
I am not sure what code I should use when recording payments to sub-contractors (they issue invoices) if they are not registered for GST.
(P. S. they're marked as 'No VAT' because we use separate HMRC issued C79s or FedEX VAT/DUTY invoices to record 'import VAT' separately upon arrival of goods).
We use the import feature for invoices but I couldn't see anything similar for payments.
Or should I use an excel spreadsheet to record the payments then control+F (to search) on future invoices?
Question #2: If yes above, is there a way to import my spreadsheets rather than entering one-by-one expense reportsI pretty much only use receipts and invoices features.
I use simple Excel to create my invoices.
My idea was to input all invoices and expense receipts going back to then and use the system to manage all the data to pass to my accountant.
Also, it would be good to have a cash flow forecast tile that could use due dates on bills, orders, and invoices to forecast cash flow.
I do not use the automatic email PDF version as we upload PDF invoices onto our client hub.
Several of my vendors/suppliers use a 3rd party to process their invoices and we're required to make our checks payable to them.
Especially when we use recurring invoices and they are on DDR.
Currently if a client supplies one PDF with numerous invoices, we have to use other software to split the PDF.
We use Unapproved invoices as pro-formas.
We use our draft invoices as quotes which we email.
We could then efficiently use the PO (and configurable PO template) to efficiently create repeating Recipient Created Tax Invoices
We use an external warehouse to send out our goods and they require invoices in CSV files to be uploaded to their system.
I use due dates to on all their invoices send reminders etc.
i. e. we use Item 1 on nearly all our invoices but then we have six different categories (i. e. a, b, c, etc) that we use for different types of invoices.
NO instructions on how to use this CSV template to enter invoices with multiple line items.
With only 20 transactions, 5 invoices and 5 bill payments per month, what types of businesses would be likely to use this particular edition?
Is it possible to remove / hide the Money Coming In & Money Coming Out graphs from the Dashboard if we don't use invoices?
In light of thisso I will no longer be recommending it to clients as it is too confusing to use when invoices don't show up.
I don't want to use stripe on all my invoices at the moment.
We use WFM to produce our invoices and mark them as sent from here.
Two issues that seem to be making my life a little difficult are:Invoices received via Xerolink automatically use the 'No Tax' GST option and 'BAS excluded', even though the Supplier's GST code is set up.
##### CLUSTER 244 #####
Hello all, I just noticed that the sales tax paid on purchases is not included as part of the expense and does not show up on my income statement.
Currently my Paypal feed just shows all sales and doesn't show where the sale comes from, I hoped it would have pulled that info from the feed, but I guess not.
We have just signed up with CMS in order to process all our sales by Direct Debit.
Just as a UK Company has to file EC Sales List so does other a Company in Germany and other members of EU I suspect.
it just makes it more personal and increases sales as it looks very professionalthank kindest RegardsBrett
If, instead of a quote, I am asked to order an item(s) directly, I skip #1 above and would just create a Sales Order that gets copied to a PO , if needed.
Just a note: majority of our transactions will be sales via Squarespace.
So similar to a sales statement (activity not outstanding) and with all items and not just those on the aged creditors.
##### CLUSTER 245 #####
Hi I'm running my own small filmmaking business and am still very new to Xero (and accounting in general).
Hi there,I am pretty new to Xero and booking keeping of my business.
Hi,We are a small business and new to Xero so apologies if this is something that already exists, although I have been unable to find it.
Hi all,I'm only a new user of Xero but have found it a real boon to business so far.
Hi, we currently run one of our small businesses in Xero and are about to open a new business.
Hi,New to xero and we have a few business names with different ABN's.
Hi I am new to Xero and running a small business of only 4 people on staff including two owners .
Hi, Our business is moving over to Xero from e-PayDay from the start of the new financial year and i'm trying to have it all set up and ready to go.
##### CLUSTER 246 #####
Whenever I get paid I've been transferring an 'approximate' amount for the Tax, GST & Super components into a personal savings account to keep it saved for when we need to pay it.
Specifically, I need to account for the annual ASIC fees we pay for the company here in Australia.
In Norway, when we pay a bill we need only three things; the account number, the customer reference field (KID) and the amount.
Hello,I need help with the following query:In may we sent a cheque for &#163;40 to a council to pay for some data which they paid in to their account the following week.
We have a directors loan account and take our "wages" from it as the company owes us this money, and there's no need to do a pay run.
##### CLUSTER 247 #####
Hi All,I'm making a single weekly batch payment to all of my suppliers with Xero's ABA file function.
Hi Xero Community,I'm going to start video production workshops soon, and researching payment options for students.
Hi Xero Community,I have accidentally made a double payment against a credit card statement.
Hi Guys, It will be fantastic if xero can Make (1) E signature (2)Payment (3) signed (4) lodged with a click.
Hi Guys,I filed my first VAT return via Xero last month and have subsequently made the payment to the HMRC.
Hi there,I am trying to lodge my payment summary to ato via xero.
##### CLUSTER 248 #####
Hello Everyone,I hope someone out there might be able to help with this bit tricky transaction that I need to record in Xero.
None of them do everything i want, but the xero integration is essential and i might be able to do everything i need if the app also has zapier integrations.
At the moment, we need to save the file on our computer before being able to drag and drop into Xero.
I need to be able to do this with Xero, I don't want to spend hours creating journals for the sake of a few pence.
Xero noted that we need to make a journal entry to be able to claim this.
We have a website and need to be able to import orders from our website into Xero.
I need to log first in (live) company portal then click on help center option to be able to access the back XERO Help Center/Community.
##### CLUSTER 249 #####
We send out an Invoice for £100 to another country, we then receive the payment in minus the said bank fee.
I have uploaded my bank statment which has the 10k item but when I match it to the invoice it unable to reconcile because a match has to be to a full payment amount.
Once payment is received and reconciled, I would send the customer a gst invoice that shows that it has been paid and with the exchange rate for that day, so it would accurately reflect what they see in their bank statements and the gst would be more accurate.
It would be great if this feature was accessible from the bank rec screen by selecting the appropriate invoice and recording the part payment.
How do I remove a payment that's been allocated to the wrong invoice and reconciled with my bank statement.
##### CLUSTER 250 #####
We will use the direct payment option for balance payments received in the next financial period closer to the date of the tour.
However I don't know what their fee is until the 2nd payment is made as this fee is based on the type of credit card they use.
We use eWay as our payment gateway for online debit and credit card payments.
Hey,We use Barclaycard Payment Acceptance for processing debit/credit card payments.
Can I use System Cashier for payment?
We cannot use the batch payment function in the foreign currencies.
However, I cannot seem to allocate the prepayment PAYE credit to the bill - the only option is "Edit"I use the prepayment function with a supplier that I have a monthly payment plan with and it works fine, so I cannot understand why the PAYE bill should be different?
We use batch deposits to manage the payment but it is still very manual.
We often use the "planned date" function to organise outgoing payments, especially for payment in different currencies.
Interac Online is an immediate, secure, and easy-to-use online payment method with minimal charge to the merchant vs the higher fees of credit card processing.
By using this method to create WooCommerce Custom URL's, we can use our own branded WordPress site running WooCommerce to create payment urls.
This would completely remove the benefit that some debtors use to delay payment as well as being a very impressive feature.
Can we have an earnings line in payroll that we can use to calculate on-costs for wages that does not appear on the employees payslip or 'their payment summaries for tax purposes?
I use Squarespace and its partner payment system, Stripe.
I could use some expertise related to an over payment I received from a customer.
HiMy client is an online retailer, they use Paypal, amazon & Braintree payment services.
However, we could use some help on how to post the cash payment from Square.
Inflexible)But a sizable portion of people use Square as a payment processor.
We use 2 payment gateways to accept payments through Shopify (eway & paypal).
##### CLUSTER 251 #####
is there a way I can set up other uses for expenses only and not be able to see sales?
On Sage I'm able to amend allocations on a delivery and print out multiple delivery notes for the one sales order.
It would be really great if we had more control over user access and were able to choose draft only for purchases only, sales only or both.
To allow automatic submission of the EC sales list to HMRC or at least be able to mark the return as submitted and allow the entry of a submission receipt number from HMRC.
It would be a useful addition to be able to view the sales figure quickly without having to keep a separate spreadsheet and download info.
It would be really helpful if the EC sales list was able to tell us if the VAT numbers were correct.
We want to be able to enter the values of sales for a variety of cash code items (e. g. coffee / food / retail) and reconcile those with payments lines received by EFT (next day) and then cash deposits (in bulk weekly).
Want to be able to take bookings by vehicle and manage sales and costs by vehicle to review which run best etc.
Be able to manage sales & purchases and many more .
Finally in an ideal world some of these sales should be able to be made via some kind of handheld technology face to face that would trigger all the invoicing, stock management, picking notes and CRM updates accordingly.
##### CLUSTER 252 #####
My problem is that I am currently having 3 bank accounts in Xero: a regular one, a Currency Fair USD account and a Currency Fair GBP account (I have statements for these two currencies on the platform).
What I thought I would do is create fake bank accounts for each of these businesses in Xero and then when I get to September in entering my transactions I would cancel or close the fake account and then pick up with the real account.
Now I have a debit of $10,000 on my bank account and I am trying to reconcile it to an account on my chart of accounts.
Wanting to archive an account (which is locked due to bankrules related to that particular account) can become a huge mission when there are about 10 different bank accounts, all with their own bankrules.
This drop down list could easily additionally show each bank account with unreconciled transactions in bold, or show reconciled accounts in green and the rest in grey, or a small number in a red circle showing the number of unreconciled transactions in each account.
"Is this something on the XERO roadmap to have multiple record types when it comes to bank accounts, be it a credit liability account or a regular checking account?
One our bank account is imported, I'm unable to select the accounts payable account in order to allocate payments to it.
Further, it appears that the payroll taxes withdrawals from our bank account should be reconciled to the Accounts Payable account.
Cash accounts - I have to make purchases in cash but because its not bank account, its a second class account.
##### CLUSTER 253 #####
Hi Everyone,I am new to Xero and was just going through doing me reconciliation when I encountered a charge to a graphic design company for $299.
Hi allIm new to XERO and I have just completed a parallel run with Sage for the month of July.
Hi I am a new Ltd company, my accountant is going to take care of the accounting side of the directors salary and dividends etc etcI am just taking a set amount of money each week ie a wage how do i set this up in xero?
Hi,I am very new to Xero and am just setting things up having converted from Quickbooks (which I used for nearly ten years).
Hi All,I'm new to Xero and just started my books.
Hi,Just new to XERO and current company.
##### CLUSTER 254 #####
However, I don't seem to be able to run a TB for brought forward balances, either just 31/10/14, or 01/11/14.
I just want him to be able to enter expenses, nothing else.
Shouldn't I be able to just claim the expense and on-charge it?
Alternatively, if that can't be done, being able to bulk select payments through clicking and shift would be helpful as well, rather than just the select all tick box.
I just want to be able to plan and manage my day-to-day household finances.
Could these details be placed in the notes section, or other, therefore just leaving the Activity with a clear financial section to be able to work on more quickly and cleanly.
The purpose of a readonly user should be just as the name says - he should not be allowed to do any edits, changes etc, but he should be able to view reconciled as well as unreconciled items.
just want to be able to make a deposit the same way I would log a receipt in using the app.
It would be great to be able to create a manual journal from the inbox screen just as you can for bills etc.
You should be able to just delete them.
It would be great to be able to give staff access to selected Contact groups rather than just all contact groups.
We want to be able to quickly and easily export reports on a monthly basis of all customers which have used our services (not just prepaid for services not yet performed).
We export a lot and it would be great to be able to create a smart list by Country rather than just city or region.
Logging on via the browser is just not practical when they are actually at the supplier's shop and being able to do so on an ipad or other tablet would be perfect.
We've been playing with the user roles and haven't been able to find a way to restrict their access to just purchase orders.
but would prefer to just be able to tab through this field.
THEN, be able to tick off a box in each item I want to see and it generates a spreadsheet with just those items.
Shouldn't I just be able to match?
##### CLUSTER 255 #####
But this is it's own kettle of fish as it's up to me as to when I withdraw the funds from PayPal to our bank account so it doesn't necessarily cleanly match the sales orders.
So we basically have 6 different streams of income landing in our bank account and seldom if ever (paypal excepted) have a clean line on our statement that can be easily reconciled to a matching sales order.
We receive a feed from the bank direct to XEROMy questions are - Should the sales for both of these transactions go into the same sales account ?
I can create a transaction in my Petty Cash Bank Account: Dr Petty Cash; Cr Sales.
Should we try to set up a bank feed to the card company (assuming that one is available) or simply try to keep track of card sales and card company payments, the only difference hopefully being fees that we can account for e. g. monthly ?
The company sold an item in USD which is ultimately sales and then received the amount in USD account, the bank USD account shows the figure correctly in USD however the sales GLs since those are not currency based but takes base currency and shows the figure in base hence an overview remain confusing until each transaction is reconciled.
Every day we get deposits into our bank checking account from our Shopify sales.
Let's take the example I have 2 sales for 50$ showing in the paypal account  as sales (a), then you can also see a withdrawal of 100£ (b) as I have transferred the money to my bank account.
Currently, DEAR records sales payments coded to an 103 Amazon bank account.
##### CLUSTER 256 #####
We're a small landscaping business, with many ongoing projects that need to be tracked weekly however I'm struggling to find the best/easiest way to do this.
A question has been raised in our office, what happens to client records when they cease business and no longer need to maintain their subscription?
I run a small business (working from home) and I need to reconcile certain percentages for bills:eg.
Ultimately I'm looking to not change softwares every two years while trying to consider my projected growth and need for more features while also keeping my costs low while still a small business with one employee.
e. g. Energy bills each month need to be split across various product lines to show the actual costs incurred for each area of the business.
It creates the need to update inventory more frequently and for a small business, this is added overhead that isn't necessary.
I need to reclaim the amount been paid with non business card.
(first BAS is coming up and I need to enter in some expenses)I have a few split business/personal expenses.
We also need to guarantee business as usual during the migration.
so in simple terms I need to allocate a specific nominal code to each employee to ensure the costing split is correct and present my business correctly.
But running our business day to day we need more than these tax focussed figures.
Need to track the product and the capacity within the business.
I dont need jobbing functionality as that is overcomplicated for my business.
We are in the business of leasing out fixed assets and need to track those contracts, relevant fixed assets, maintenance and so on.
##### CLUSTER 257 #####
We just take the balance owed out of the next quarter's payment, until they are back in the black.
There is not VAT in all the items I sell, just some of them - so at the end of a day on my z read I get a break down - but it is not naturally split between these payment types and is random.
Just a once of payment and all future updates are free.
It would therefore be helpful if this listing could be filtered to include only the suppliers of a particular group so we can then quickly prepare a batch payment for just those suppliers.
If only  contact is used for a batch payment, it would be nice to display just that name (instead of 'multiple items').
My dilemma is that I have just received a 50% up front part payment for a project that I had quoted for via our old system.
I have just had a customer phone in and I have realised that the linked credit card payment service has changed.
Just had a payment through from a customer in Portugal.
Or do I just enter in as payment to Clicksuper?
I wish to make a small payment to myself (&#163;10k) and just setting up payroll.
##### CLUSTER 258 #####
Hi there,Could someone help please as we use Xero and Cin7 for our inventory.
Hi was wonder if someone could help me with this situation :  I have about 60 asset items in my depreciation schedule, I understand and can work out how to process depreciation etc in Xero, my problem lies in that about four of these assets are used 60% for private use, therefore,  I only really want to show the taxable depreciation expense at 40% in my income statement.
Hi all,I'm looking at how to use Xero as a CRM.
Hi guys,I&#180;m an Accountant from Argentina and finally we are starting to use Xero here.
Hi, we are unable to use the Xero system this morning.
Hi everyone, I'm recently started using Xero and am still learning how to use if fully.
Hi We don't use Xero Payroll.
Hi,  We use ServiceM8 and xero.
Hi we currently use XERO and are over the moon with it.
Hi TeamI Use Xero for accounting.
Hi Xero,To reduce our processing times, we use the "copy" option a lot for bills which are similar in nature.
##### CLUSTER 259 #####
Hi All,I have 2 bills I need to record in Xero for international transactions.
Hi I need help, How to setup accounting with xero for company who have 3 branches restaurant.
Hi there, newbie to xero and I need a little help!
Hi, We have been using quickbooks to do our payroll, and I was wondering what is the correct journal I need to post for our payroll onto xero.
Hi , I have a client who has three different companies, I need to set him up on three different xero file as they are all different from each other.
Hi Xero,I have paid the wages twice to all employees and need to adjust it in my next payrun.
Hi, Sorry to ask such a basic question but I'm in need of a little help and not getting a clear enough/quick enough answer from Xero customer support.
Hi - we need to explain definitively to our supreme leader how Xero arrives at this figure - currently we have no idea.
HI,We have a client who has been using Xero for a number of years but is urgently in need of a front desk reception upgrade which will include client point of sale, database and appointment system plus inventory management.
##### CLUSTER 260 #####
We wish to be able to export to excel so that we can see all unreconciled items for each account side by side and check them off, or alternatively print them and check manually.
I want him to be able to log in and post his expenses incurred on the card against the main visa account.
Also an option of being able to view a list of deleted and voided account transactions.
For instance one account is running in millions while other is running in thousands, both should be on same scale to show comparison, and to be able to see the big picture.
If there was a field or a tick box to say that the account had been reconciled to a supplier statement and be able to attach a copy of that statement, this would help have that information to hand.
and be able to revert a published account back to draft?
An account type should be able to default to a division.
It would be very nice to be able to change the view of the account screens.
Improve the Fixed Asset system so that;- Admin users can revalue an existing asset (eg Land or Buildings), - the Fixed Asset register is updated;- an Asset Revaluation Reserve (Equity GL account) created/updated/able to be selected.
I am only able to select a liability account for this deduction.
It would be great if you were able to select an expense account for each employees wages to be allocated to.
It would be nice to be able to export account transactions to Excel.
4 - Every other employee has been able to access their account it is only this one that is having issues.
Previously the client used MYOB and these transactions were able to be imported into a credit card account and then easily reconciled.
##### CLUSTER 261 #####
I am using the new reports that Xero have just released for the NZ Annual Accounting.
Can Xero just show our contacts only when entering new bills?
Just looking on some advice on how to best utilize Xero and needing advice for a new project.
I am completely new to Xero (as in just using the free trial version).
I am new to Xero and just getting started with an ecommerce store through Shopify.
My accountant has access to the system and new book keeper, I just want to know if this has been done in error by someone not sure of Xero or if it is something else.
Hey Guys,I have recently just signed up to xero and plan on using it as my main accounting platform going into the new financial year.
Have just been advised by Xero that figures in the new reports do not round.
We just started using the new payroll feature of xero.
Hello,We are just starting to evaluate Xero's new payroll functionality.
HiI just joined a new company this week that uses your platform, and whilst I was being setup, I thought the following item could be added to the Xero features list.
I too have only JUST started using Xero ( and this is my first kinda of accounting software as Im VERY new to this.
Our year runs Jan-Dec and we have just shifted over this new year to XERO.
Just new to Xero, and so far so good.
Hello, I am new to xero, just signed up.
I am just setting up a new company in Xero and newbie user.
I am quite new to the Xero system and just not sure how it works completely as yet.
We have just started using Xero at the beginning of the new UK tax year.
I'm a new user of Xero and am just setting things up.
I am starting as a bookkeeper with a new client and they are just setting up Xero, having previously used excel to record everything.
I have just set up a new payroll system in Xero.
hey folks, I just wanted to give my perspective as a new Xero user.
##### CLUSTER 262 #####
I have all of my customers names, contact details and account numbers in Xero but when I have tried to pay from Xero it does not happen I have to go into my online banking and pay is this how it should be done or am I missing something.
When you access a contact in Xero you can see the average days it takes an account to pay their bills.
We create the Xero account and we pay for it.
If I pay my telephone bill with my credit card, then that purchase will automatically feed into Xero where I will reconcile it by coding it to the telephone bill vendor and telephone expense account.
Xero's help feature indicates that the net pay should be reconciled with the payroll payable account; this appears to work fine.
##### CLUSTER 263 #####
I just would like some guidance on how to record such transactions in Xero.
I am pretty confused about how to handle taxes in Xero (perhaps its more internationally focused than I can figure out) For some reason this process was much clearer to me in Quickbooks - I just feel like I'm missing something.
I would like to see a "next page" option on the My Xero page at the top of the page, not just at the bottom of the page.
More than just the ability to nominate the email address a Xero-generated email comes from, I'd like to set a reply to address as well.
i would just like to know when missouri payroll will be supported in xero.
Just like what was announced for Xero US: http://blog.
My agreement with Xero was for 25%, how can this just change like that and so much?
##### CLUSTER 264 #####
Basically I want to be able to look at my "Bank Account" and see that $1000 is for Savings, $2000 for Equipment, or $3249 for the next Credit Card bill.
Would be easier if the bank account was able to be used in the manual journal
Would love to have the receivables and bills detail reports able to print per bank account
We would love to be able to have an option within our practice settings so that all tax returns are automatically set up with refund to go into "Client Bank Account" automatically, as well as notice of assessment to be sent to "Client Address".
It would be great to be able to search unreconciled items in a bank account.
You can create base currency prepayments in your base currency bank account, but you won't be able to create prepayments in a currency other than your base currency.
You used to be able to click Manage Account > Bank Statements > Statement Lines.
It would be extremely helpful to be able to have the manual reconciliation process that exists if you don't have bank feeds switched on still in this account.
##### CLUSTER 265 #####
For example this is a payment from my business checking to the credit card accountThis money has already been reconciled in the CC acount so what do I do with this transaction in my checking, do I make it a transfer?
I have a credit card I am using for the business that had a payment applied January 14, 2017.
I own a construction business (scaffolding) and prepare my monthly payment claim on an excel spreadsheet.
Tappr enriches your business by offering the next genre of mobile payment technology.
Many companies rely on deposits or part payment to run there business.
Scenario: "You made a payment on your business credit card 5 months ago.
##### CLUSTER 266 #####
I would like to be able to run a period/interim report that compares the period to the full prior year.
I would like to be able to print out a report on a regular basis that gives me the total of where each of these 3 categories are at and possibly a breakdown of the costs attributed to these categories.
I would like to be able to run full report on that GL code that shows which division each line has been allocated to.
Want to be able to do an Income by Client Summary report, like QuickBooks where it shows all income received, then all expenses against that client, then a net profit/loss for that client.
ie serial numbers, colour, etc and would like to be able to see this if she runs a report.
For example, subcontractors - I would like to be able to run a report to see amounts paid to them over a certain period.
I would like to be able to actually filter the report by the contact group.
I'd like to be able to split the Activity Statement report by my tracking departments.
I would like to be able to report on their hours to each category rather than wage costs.
I would like to be able to create my own list of reports and have it all under one "management report".
This report is landscape and you can only see half on my screen - I'd like to be able to change the column widths.
If a supplier owed me &#163;2,000 at January 14, and paid &#163;1,000 in February 14, I would like to be able to tick a button to include that receipt, and show that, running the report at January 14, only &#163;1,000 remains owed to me.
I would like to be able to report on our revenue by geographic region of the clients that we sold to.
##### CLUSTER 267 #####
My question is how do i show the money coming back into the bank and then going out again in xero so it all balances and doesnt show as extra revenuethanks in advance for answer, i run a small business and dont have an accounting back groundWayne
The client has not done a good job keeping receipts but they have business checking bank statements that can be fed into xero.
Im having trouble figuring out how to manage bank of america business cards in xero.
We are a small business that relies on timely financial information, and if the bank feeds are not working, it would be nice of Xero to inform those of us whom are affected.
All my business expense bills are posted from Receipt Bank into Xero and land in PURCHASES.
##### CLUSTER 268 #####
It requires that I take an item that I purchase and essentially part it out (think of it like purchasing a used dishwasher and then selling the parts from it one by one to folks that need that particular part for repair).
Finally, I know that I will need an accountant/book keeper to help me with my end of year stuff, but I'd like to get to that point on my own.
Can i do something like that, or do i need to adjust the original receive money transaction?
On this one we need mileage calculation and I would like to import some historical expenses on our recent projects to do some analysis.
Sometimes we may need to create Group Invoicing for our Company like "Donation" to different branches, Paying some group members for their services.
HiNow that there is a quotation system we need it improved - and for some I would like to know when:1.
Seems like we need to save after every single page of changes.
However it would make all other returns (Like ones that your need to check are lodged or signed or approved or completed) much much faster to find.
However, some of us like our company, really only need a very simple way to calculate P&L per Job.
I would like to see two features in the balance sheet that would facilitate some of the reporting that I need to do.
Need to have a tick box to select "do not show inventory prices" or "show totals only" or "Decriptions only" or the like.
Some will need the tax column, but non-profits like us do not.
I would like to have a clear list on screen of the payments I need to make, eg:John Smith  &#163;100Sarah Jones  &#163;200HMRC to 120PV0012345  &#163;100Pensions (if applicable)The current list has Gross and Net's which is asking for the eye to pick up the wrong number and doesn't included PAYE payable or pensions.
This is a non taxable allowance which looks like it will need to be set up as a discretionary earnings type and this earnings type does not allowance a per hour rate to be entered.
Now you need to go back to your CSV and manually assign an Asset Type to each and every asset - or you can import the list and manually register each asset like we previously had to.
I need to change the tracking category value for a number of reconciled expenses from one tracking classification to another and I would like a simpler way to do this other than clicking on each individual transaction, editing, reclassifying and saving it.
I need something like this to check quarterly posting before producing the BAS.
My client would like to continue using your software, however we need to allow them to work together.
Have tried a couple like GeoOP but they seem overly complicated what the simple tasks we need.
I don't want to buy it but Sage Forecaster looks like the exact tool I need.
We need your feedback and suggestions on what extra features you would like in your inventory system.
##### CLUSTER 269 #####
We send all invoices via the Xero email feature which saves a lot of time.
I read in the guide that you can upload your own template for invoices but I'm not sure I have time to do this as we're going live on Xero (after 6 years on Sage) from 1st April.
When emailing invoices from Xero to clients, many require supporting documentation ie time sheets for labour charges.
Sync Xero Invoices to ProRata and recognize revenue over time - then generate Revenue, Deferred Revenue, MRR and other SaaS reports.
Save time, attract clients, seamlessly sync invoices & payments with Xero.
Order invoices and contacts are automatically sent to Xero in real-time, check out .
This has been happening with all the contacts in the system, and although it is easily worked around with searching individual invoices and finding them there, I feel as this problem should be addressed to cause less frustration when browsing the Xero software and saving time on certain things when navigating through the website.
##### CLUSTER 270 #####
Issue 1: My vendor has made a single payment towards multiple invoices and has short paid by 5% on each of these invoices.
How do I take one payment and apply it to multiple invoices - can it be done Y/N - if Y - How, if N how do you guys manage a single check given for multiple invoices ?
I have a client who issues over 250 invoices to one of their customers per month and the customer makes a single payment to cover the 250 plus invoices.
On the Dashboard Invoices tab, and in the  tab, we are shown how many invoices are awaiting payment, and their total value.
When reconciling a payment to several invoices there should be a functionality to filter by invoices that have been marked as paid.
International invoices, in AUD, with different payment typesI don't mind if they share the GST format, as the international invoices with have no GST.
Is it a matter of picking through the invoices and splitting the batch payment across the related invoices?
Any recommendations for a system which would allow card payments of recurring monthly invoices, also non recurring invoices which would take payment online and via card machine please?
##### CLUSTER 271 #####
We have two types of payment arrangement for our customers and would love to print an aged receivables report distinguishing the two groups.
I have followed the Tax Payment Report suggestion to create a Contacts folder.
In addition on the printed report where it currently states reference for each payment, it should really show cheque No, as per the entry screen.
However, if you run the same report with Cash Basis, the Reference field is replaced with the Reference information you entered when receiving the payment.
Report that provides confirmation that employees have received the Superannuation Payment in to their Super Funds
Any suggestions, other than exporting the accruals report to excel and then adding the payment information from the auto super screen
Do we have any report to review the bills we are paying today (for instance) where we could review that bills entered, have correct reference & description (amount shows in batch payment screen).
We must report the reportable amount on the payment summary for the 2017 FY.
Clearly this is not a cash payment and shouldn't be appearing on the Cash Summary Report.
We would process that payment, and the report would update to say we paid X.    E. g So Jan &#163;100 owed Feb &#163;100 owed March &#163;100 Owed.
where is a receipt of lodgement for the whole payment summaries, where is the audit trail report, where is some evidence that you can print or save that its been done.
##### CLUSTER 272 #####
Will Xero incorporate an Inventory control where stock can be monitored and levels changed upon sales and purchases, or will the only way to view and control individual items be by using another monthly subscription with add-ons?
It would be really good if Xero could add a feature that calculates the budgeted costs of sales using a percentage of income.
I am looking for a Xero add-on that supports sales orders and deposits.
We have a UK website which is growing daily and are looking to add-on ONESAAS or CTO (Carrythe one) to pull SALES orders from our website done through BIGCOMMERCE in to XERO.
We have been managing stock items in Xero by adding them manually and integrating to GeoOp; selecting them as required to add to a sales order.
•	Sales representative remote ordering•	Comprehensive store look and feel control•	Customisation options for advanced users•	Only a few clicks to add Netfira Shop with Xero items to any Facebook page•	Super fast – 5,000 items and 1,000 customers can be synced in under 60 seconds!
Why can't Xero add a feature to properly deal with overpayments / credits / batches etc on the sales ledger in particular.
##### CLUSTER 273 #####
I set up my vend to send register closures to the 200-sales account in Xero .
When importing Sales into Xero it would be useful to have the Customer Account Number as an import identifier.
As no localised version of Xero exists for Ireland we tweak the Global Version to get the various VAT rates and reporting requirements right however, in Ireland VAT on purchases is always on an Accruals basis even if you account for sales on a Cash Receipts basis.
Seamlessly import sales from your online store into your Xero account.
Import sales and customer data from your Magento or Magento Go online store into your Xero account - automated accounting for online retailers.
Seamlessly import sales from your osCommerce online store into your Xero account - automated accounting for online retailers, check out .
Why does Xero not link a designated sales person to an customer account similar to Myob.
##### CLUSTER 274 #####
We have just purchased a new vehicle and I would like some help with the journal entry pleasePurchase price of the vehicle is $17,000Fees total $702 (included in loan)Loan value total payable is $18,964 with the interest part being $1,262.
I would like an option (a button) to show attachments alongside a the bill data input when I'm , not just creating a new one.
We really like the flexibility of the new reports but were just wondering if there would be some more formatting features available in the near future?
I was hoping this new release was going to be a huge boon for practices like ours as well as clients, but it's just a half-baked disaster so far.
Can you advise if there are any plans to enhance this new feature - sorry if I sound like I'm moaning - but it seems so close to being perfect I thought I would just ask.
##### CLUSTER 275 #####
However, now I want to re-add the PayPal feed because some customers want to pay that way.
I know that each year I am going to have insurances and registrations to pay which will add up to around 3k as well as income tax and super.
Superannuation funds are not populating in the drop down menu when i try to add superannuation lines to pay runs.
Add the Option to import Pay Run from CSV files.
Solution: Add the "Add Pay Run" button / option on the page where pay runs are being posted.
To avoid underpaying staff the payroll administrator needs to review each Payslip individually for possible input errors;  refer to their Pay Template for the correct Earnings Rate information and add an additional Earnings Line to their payslip.
I recently processed my first pay run via the PaymentEvolution(PE) add-on (Canada).
For some reason I do not have the option to add a leave line in an employees pay template.
Do I now add a line deduction for this staff in the pay run?
Create an ordinary earnings type for public holiday and add this earnings type within relevant pay periodsIf you go with Option 1 and leave needs to be accrued on these earnings, ensure that it is set up as a "Multiple of employee's ordinary earnings rate" and the "Accrue Leave for this Earnings Rate" option is selected.
We have staff that pay extra tax every week and we have to add an additional line every week to every staff member.
Manually add a regular pay line for 1 hour of the monthly salary amount.
Therefore I thought I would simply add the refund to their gross pay.
co. uk) and wondered if it was possible to add two pay items on my pay run (so that I can split out payment for Company A and Company B on payslips and reports), as currently when I add a pay item, then go to add another, it overwrites the first one :-)Any help much appreciated!
So I set up a pay item as a lump sum and add this to the employee template with the annual amount and save.
In particular, I am interested in knowing if there are any reporting, budgeting, forecasting, purchase to pay, basic HR and contract management add-ons and what these will cost.
HisI am looking for an add-on to manage Adult Learners, their course and theirs and their Tutor paymentsMost pay a one off fee for a short course and the tutors bill monthly, often across several months.
- do you want your clients to pay money to another add on developers ?
##### CLUSTER 276 #####
With much glee I clicked on the new Account Transaction report to see with intense dismay that you have failed to include an opening balance or have a running total.
Is there a way to set the default for account transactions report to SHOW the opening & closing balances - it is the MOST ANNOYING feature of this new report that it does not automatically show this!
The new Account Transactions report is great, but there's no column for "Split" (the other side of the journal entry for the transaction).
We are using the "Account Transactions" report from your New Reports, and this works well for us.
Currently the Account Transactions report (in New Reports) only displays the results in the base currency.
If the transaction reference ID was included in the (new reports) 'account transactions' report, or the (old reports) 'detailed account transactions' report, I would have a complete and verifiable audit trail.
Include ledger opening and closing balances for the new report - Account Transactions.
The new Account Transactions report appears to randomly not show transaction Reference data.
##### CLUSTER 277 #####
It doesn't look like this customer is going to pay this last little bit, and it's not really worth my time and effort to chase it up.
I know that by the summer time I'd like to have enough set aside in the training budget to pay for a couple of courses.
I'd like to store scanned images of the handwritten time sheets and documentation of the calculations with each pay run.
We have several Pay Items set up as Ordinary Time Earnings but it appears that the annual leave accrual is only choosing some of these (Ordinary Hours from Timesheets in this case) to calculate the accrual and not including other Ordinary Time Earnings Pay Items like Public Holidays.
I have logged a support request but the response time to that is potentially 24hrs, and I would like to pay the staff today.
##### CLUSTER 278 #####
One of our customers wanted to pay a large invoice by credit card, and it was arranged for him to pay one of our major suppliers who does accept credit card payments.
I have an invoice for 21k but my customer decided to only pay half and on delivery pay the remaining half.
When clients pay they see many brands, My Brand on the Invoice, Xero when they click pay now, then SagePay or Worldpay branded pages.
currently it's "Pay this invoice online, Pay online now? "
"Pay this invoice online" or "Pay online now" would be sufficient.
I had a client pay through the pay-now link on an invoice.
##### CLUSTER 279 #####
It is a bit long winded to enter 14 different payments into the actual invoice screen and it would be better if we could highlight a cash deposit during bank import and allocate it to the relevant invoice.
The suggested invoice is never the correct one, even though the name on the bank statement and the invoice match.
So, I've sent my first invoice, but can't see my bank details on the invoice.
We try to tell clients if an invoice is paid to wait until it appears on the bank feed to allocate it to an invoice.
But when I reconcile the invoice with the bank statement, each invoice will be short by $41.
##### CLUSTER 280 #####
They would like the GST credit, as they are registered for GST, but because I'm not, I am sending them the Invoice for their Xero Subscription as GST Free.
We would like to generate packing slips in Xero that are then consolidated for the week into one invoice.
I would like to see a separate dedicated field for entering a customer PO number when a quote has been accepted and that Xero transfer that number to a dedicated field on a customer invoice.
I would suggest if there was a button providing an option to export when you click in to each individual invoice (like the button to download the PDF version) as is the case in other areas of Xero it would be very popular with businesses that have large customers who want that level of automation.
Needs an easy ticks option (like so much of the rest of Xero) that would assign the full (or remaining) invoice amount as well as the existing option of entering a specified amount if necessary (which is the exception rather than the rule).
I would like to see when the invoice amount syncs over to Xero from Bill.
Xero could have default profiles (like the existing Invoice Only, Read Only etc) which would have certain checkboxes checked or unchecked as a starting point, but there would be much more flexibility available.
It would be great if there was a module within Xero to write notes similar to files that could be written or linked at each transaction (like adding a note to an invoice) but then appeared in a separate module that could be searched.
Matching it like this would also allow Xero to automatically show which paypal fee matches with which invoice.
I would also like to see Xero provide a sort of repository of well designed invoice themes & templates.
I would like an option on the Shopify app config to have the Xero invoice emailed to the customer.
I am looking for a practice software that integrates with xero and hicaps we are a 2 surgery 1 lab practice and would like everything to role into one, invoice, calendars etchas anyone used coreplus or getinform or do you have any other suggestionsthanks in advance
In a world of Wanna Cry and Ransomware you have a spammer out there looking like a Xero invoice emailYou may want to let people know.
##### CLUSTER 281 #####
I am trying to use Xero now to produce my annual accounts submission.
I have approached Xero about this and they said "it's functioning as it should be and there are no plans to change it" and that I should tell my staff which accounts to use.
Then there would be a single contacts database and we can use a Xero addon (Re-Leased) to manage the leases (I don't think Re-Leased would work with multiple accounts).
Can I use XERO to manage the accounts for this type of company structure and what package do I have to buy?
We are looking for a tool that can be automated so that we can use the metadata to post to correct accounts in Xero.
##### CLUSTER 282 #####
I like Xero, its good, but I am getting frustrated when trying to add a tax return to a client.
I have tried a number of add-ons, but the one that meets my needs is not yet fully integrated with Xero, and others are not designed for companies like ours.
I would like to add help notes for users to perform specific tasks in Xero.
I like Xero to add assembly inventory to their Inventory.
We would like to see Xero add full Goods & Services Tax (GST) support for Singapore.
I'd like to see Xero help us more proactively manage our clients and add value to them.
I would really like to add the ability to specify source IP addresses that are permitted to login to my company's Xero in the company settings.
I guess I am wondering what are the advantages, if any, to using the integrated payroll system provided by Xero vs using an add-on like Zen?
##### CLUSTER 283 #####
ALSO If I make payment to the purchase (management fees) from the contra account - this will create a balance in the contra account, to which I cannot zero out, due to the recording of his income as stated above.
As an order came in I credited the sale of goods account and debited the payment gateway account.
I would enter a payment in my checking account to the credit card vendor, and expense it against the credit card's liability account.
If I try to enter the payment from the Bill it won't show the USD account as a selectable account.
Following on from this we noticed that the account numbers in the payment file had 3 digit suffixes with preceding zero’s, the odd thing for us was all the account numbers we have entered only have 2 digit suffixes.
##### CLUSTER 284 #####
Invitbox is a data capture service and add-on for Xero that can extract this information from PDF invoices.
Add an 'Approve and Copy' button when posting invoices to improve Xero's bookkeeping.
I am suggesting that Xero add a feature that allows a user to mark multiple invoices and mark them as Paid in bulk.
Anyone else want to see Xero add the ability to print a supplier invoices / RCTIs?
If anyone knows of an add-on that can work with files exported directly from Crown-express Freight Management System to create those invoices and upload to Xero that would solve everything but that might be too much to ask for.
##### CLUSTER 285 #####
Hi, the bank feed for Metro Bank UK doesn't work for me.
Hi,If you import everything from the bank description then we can create more rules because the important things from the bank transactions description is on the end of the description and this is not imported on the reference in xero.
--Hi – Observation – I’ve noticed that for some bank feed transactions (in this case the attached example is from my own CBA feed) the transaction in the Online banking platform clearly identifies the source of the transaction yet the bank feed is lacking that same information.
Hi I bank with The Bank of Scotland and for some reason my bank sync feeds are approx 5 days behind my online banking.
Hi could you please guide me how to hide or delete last financial year bank transaction which have come through bank feeds.
Hi, Bank Overdraft limit increased so the bank balance and the Xero balance don't match.
Hi GuysI have changed my bank and am trying to log in for bank feeds.
Hi ThereMy bank has changed its name (MECU to Bank Australia).
##### CLUSTER 286 #####
My question is do I create these conversion sales invoices in DEAR and then somehow sync them with Xero to be my outstanding invoices.
75, then by saving them I was forwarded to "Conversion Balances › Sales Invoices  Enter invoices sent on or before 31 Mar 2013 that have not been fully paid" window showing me an out by balance for $300, telling me to remove these $300 from the full amount $1946.
We had our Sales invoices added to supplier invoices by mistake.
When updating a contact have the option to change all previously issued sales invoices/purchase invoices or update from now.
He started adding his expense invoices to the invoices heading (which is for sales).
On the Customer Contact information oage we can see Sales Invoices, Money In/Out and history shows invoices sent.
Xero could apply this logic to sales invoices too, allowing more info for businesses who allow instalment payments against their invoices.
Duplicate reference warning on sales invoices the same as on purchase invoices.
I know you can bulk import sales invoices, but can't find a way of doing this with repeating invoices.
My planned workaround currently is to raise sales invoices with GST line items and to post cost invoices with GST line items, each coded to a/c 821.
"When I hit 'Save', I'm being taken to Conversion Balances › Sales Invoices, with the message:  "Enter invoices sent on or before Dec 31, 2015 that have not been fully paid.
I am trying to import a CSV of 596 sales invoices however when I try to import it Xero tells me there is only 540 invoices and no errors.
Every month we raise multiple sales invoices to this client, and receive multiple purchase invoices from them.
If Xero could merge invoices (per the Feature Request Post "Invoicing - Combining multiple sales invoices" in 2013) that would also provide a work-around but as of June 2014 Xero had "no plans" to resolve this.
##### CLUSTER 287 #####
I may also need you to come out at Tax time to make sure I've done it properly.
It will take long time if we fill the form by hand writing and then we need to  scan and send to client.
HiIts that time of the year where I need to increase all my charges on all my invoicingIs there a way of going into all of them at once and putting a % increase on all of my charges without going in individually?
Windows 10 always wants to set my default printer to the last printer used, so I need to remember to manually switch the printer/paper tray each time I switch from checks to blank paper or vice versa (which is frequently).
I quite often have a receipt in front of me and need to scan through them to find the corresponding transaction which can take quite a long time when you have a lot of receipts.
Scenario: Employees working for our client need their time sheets approved and their work ethic rated.
It is not often that you need the whole history of the client or supplier when looking for something and seems a waste of time to have to sit and wait and then specify dates required.
When you submit a VAT return to HMRC you have to enter your log in details every time you need to submit a VAT return.
When you submit your RTI within payroll you don't need to keep entering your details each time as they are stored within payroll settings.
At the moment we need to work out the VAT and overtype it manually which adds time to posting entries.
As of speaking, disposal of multiple assets is very time consuming as we need to dispose assets one by one.
Therefore we need to always do the 20% sum each time we do an at-a-glance at our dashboard and reports.
Setting the default branding theme without need to open/edit the contact record would be a significant time saver.
Currently, we have all staff allocated to all jobs so that they can book time if they need to.
This would save a lot of time dumping the entire data into excel, then manually filtering what we need.
We need to move in internet time :).
Likewise, when I want to plug in the actuals and see what impact that's had on my budget plan for categories where I'll be making purchases in 6 months time, I need to do that in Excel.
we need to edit each employee one by one, which is quite time consuming and frustrating.
We need to produce a a statement run per brand, which is only currently possible if we manually select from a list of over 1000 customers, very time consuming.
Nothing unusual there - however, we need to 'roll-up' several of the lines into one so that by the time our customer sees the bill they only see the first 5 'combined' lines as a single line and a total - as well as the remaining lines.
A lot of time is spent going right back in to client details to find out this information when we need it for deliveries etc.
Currently you need to go into each transaction and mark as reconciled which takes a lot of time.
I have gone into an employee's Time Off area today and need to amend the starting hours as I have noticed the original figure was incorrect.
)This is what we would need:- Clients to be configured- Staff to be set up, with default hourly rates specified for each staff member- Jobs/Projects to be created - time estimated and quotes generated.
We don't need purchase orders, time tracking etc etc.
##### CLUSTER 288 #####
When i add a new bill, for example for web hosting.
Or, new permissions (user access rights) are created to allow specific users to add contacts.
When you a entering in the suppliers or customers name a function to say add new supplier or customer.
Could an option be put in "add new" in highlighted colour, therefore it stalls you so you can enter the right information.
Please add either,All Reports Aged Receivables Summary - Location or Salesman field or,New Reports Aged Receivables Summary - Month name (instead of number).
Unlike 'add file to new', editing doesn't seem to offer a way get attachments to display on the same screen for data entry.
A shortcut to the 'add contact' form would be a great help to people who create new contacts on a daily basis.
they recognize it as new and ask do you want to add ?
In order to change it, I have to delete the email address and re-add the same address with a new name.
Interestingly, shift+tab on the "Add a new line" button focuses the last cell in the details grid, and from there you can shift+tab back through all the cells to the beginning and then forwards again through the form.
So you click the little arrow to get to the Add New Tracking option (which is at the top of the list) and you find yourself somewhere down the long list of jobs based on the partial match.
When I click add to group it asks me to create a new group.
If you want to add a new line it goes at the bottom and cant go nice and neatly where you want it to.
Its a pain having to submit a timesheet then go back to timesheets and click add new timesheet.
Can there be an option to submit and add new timesheet from within the timesheet page.
copy it, paste it to a new spreadsheet and add to it piece by piece.
I should add I am new to accounting so it's best to assume I know nothing!
A new feature I'd propose is to add a new line to an expense claim (or save and add another receipt) in the mobile app.
I would love a way to add them all at once as we onboard each new client.
A user goes to add their first ever fixed asset in the new system.
So seemed pointless to add the new catagories to either Jobs.
I have tried to add a new transaction and put it under wages and salaries, but it doubles up on that figure when I checked reports.
Will you be introducing an add on feature to calculate the new Apprenticeship Levy being introduced from 1 April 2017?
I have tried to add Bereavement Leave (8 hrs) to his payslip through this system - Payroll>Employees>(His name)>Leave tab>Assign Leave Type (Bereavement Leave is not listed in the drop down) Then, when I click on New Leave Request>Type of Request,Bereavement Leave then Description and start and end date is inserted - I get a circular motion on the screen but nothing happens!
Has anyone used the new Preno add-on for booking management for Bed and Breakfast or other accomoodation?
BETA USERSWe are currently looking for beta users for a new fantastic Excel add-on which includes some unique functionality.
We are currently looking for beta users for a new fantastic Excel add-on which includes some unique functionality.
I've finally worked out that it is offering me a drop-down with add new client on that - but why make an extra step for the sake of it?
##### CLUSTER 289 #####
This is the irst time that I am passing the entry for a conversion balance and use Xero that far.
Having spent a lot of time getting to know how to use Xero (and in the most part, liking it), I am approaching the 6 month mark with the software and unfortunately there is one issue which makes me wonder if i can continue with it.
When exporting from xero in to the product we use it will only take 5000 transactions at a time.
it used to be so simple but now, as I cannot find the reports in Xero to use, I am finding this to be quite time consuming.
I'm looking for a time tracking tool (mainly to use for consulting work) that works well with Xero.
However they are looking for a project management system for time sheets, orders and invoicing that is easy to install and use and integrates with Xero smoothly.
How do you use Xero to save you time and boost efficiency?
##### CLUSTER 290 #####
We hare having problems with the statement feeds into Xero whereby it appears that transactions for each card are effectively being imported across each credit card that we have set up in the Xero chart (ie we have 3 cards and all transactions for each card feed through to each account in Xero).
I have started using Xero, when listing my account balances I needed to input an overdrawn amount but on Xero is now comes up as in credit?
It would be useful to see the date the Xero account was opened under the Info button from the green My Xero page.
If I understand the reply I got from Xero Support correctly, every Xero user account always will have two companies, their own and the demo company.
Xero support has been unresponsive for a serious issue that prevents my company from accessing its Xero account.
But Xero does not seem to know this, and now my PayPal account in Xero has imported an un-reconciled transaction of $1.
I have deleted the organisations that I was using Xero to manage, and I want to entirely delete my Xero account.
Hello, I want to set up the xero integration, however I'm unsure about what to do with all the existing entries in my Xero account.
But with Xero these transactions are unable to be imported into a credit card account within Xero, so more frustrating to reconcile and keep track of.
If you are for instance using one of the third party products for payroll which work with Xero, and you want to run your payroll, you have to go to that product's website, login to a separate account there, then when it exports payroll transactions to Xero you have to switch over to Xero to authorize and reconcile, etc.
My Xero account has been suspended and I am finding it very difficult to get someone from Xero to help.
##### CLUSTER 291 #####
I didn't realise that when running the P&L report on Xero, it took all purchases against all sales made in a date range .
Don't get me wrong, I LOVE Xero and think it is fantastic but do not understand that a simple Sales by Customer (Not Contact) report is not included.
I have a many clients and accountants asking me why Xero does not have a percentage sales P&L report.
This is my have moved to Xero, however he misses the percentage sales P&L report, I know you can extract and do the calculations in excel but he does want to.
Xero has majo issues with EU VAT reporting (it already lacks a legally required report being the EC SALES LIST - see the specific thread).
##### CLUSTER 292 #####
I want to send out a sales invoice to a customer with 6 timesheets attached, the timesheets support the number of hours charged on the invoice.
At the very least, if we must manually enter the 1st line of the invoice with the reps name, the rest of the invoice should pre-fill the sales reps name.
Exporting invoice or sales data in Xero results in the CSV containing multiple lines per invoice (ie.
Although the words "Sales Invoice" (or Purchase Invoice if it's a purchase invoice! )
Raise proforma invoice and send to customer (same function as on sales invoice)2.
Customer pays balance of invoice and then proforma converted to a sales invoice for sending.
DETAILS WITH INVOICE NUMBER AMOUNT INVOICE SEND -                                    TO CUSTOMER +SALES REP.
It would be great if there was a Quick print option in the Sales and Invoice (viewing an invoice) sections.
MYOB had a Sales Detail report  for customers which listed among other things, Invoice number, Date of Invoice, Description of that invoice, Status, amount of the invoice.
##### CLUSTER 293 #####
It takes less than 20 seconds of your time to save all entries, for any or all accounts and clients.
To me, I don't know why this is in there, these funds are conversion balance funds and were at the time of conversion - treated as the company's assets (accounts) - therefore it now records as a liability and subtracts from the companies equity.
Secondly, customers that missed payments or have payments reversed, and continue to do so will (short) show up as accounts receivable, enabling easier identification of those with outstanding payments and the length of time outstanding.
When printing monthly accounts receivable statements it would be great if there was a tick box to 'exclude zero balances'We only send out statements with a balance and this would save alot of time and searching at the end of the month if zero balances were not shown
Every time i want to view chart of accounts, i have to change from view 50 to view 200.
I eventually got it figured out but I'm left with a mess of half-reconciled and incomplete accounts from this time.
We require detailed general ledger reports on multiple accounts at one time - pick list of accounts would be useful, rather than one at a time.
This is my first month with you and I have wasted more time and effort asking you to fix it with zero results than working on my accounts.
##### CLUSTER 294 #####
HI, I am trying to add a Fixed Asset of software we have developed internally.
Hi - I was wondering if there is a similar function or possibilty to add activities to job templates, similar to lead manager, so that staff can recieve email reminders at certain points of the job timeline?
Hi XeroCould you add a "next" button to approve or authorise the next expense claim page?
Hi, Could you add a Depreciation schedule worksheet for D5-other work related expenses for individual tax returns?
Hi, it would be great to have a Free Text Memo Field in the Contacts to enable us to add further details of subcontractors / suppliers.
Hi,I'm trying to find an easy way to add a file from library/browse to a statement that was already reconciled.
Hi,I reconciled a load of transactions against Direct Expenses, but now I want to add bills from suppliers and reconcile against those.
Hi,I am trying to add a regulated super funds with api.
Hi,I have an employee who has a State Government level super fund which are not regulated by APRA, so it is not showing in drop down lists when trying to add.
Hi, Would it be possible to put a feature within the add leave request that once it is approved an email can be sent to the employee notifying them that it has been approved?
Hi,  We have a couple of employees who work different hours each week, I can only find the facility to add a fixed number of hours worked.
Hi allI'm looking for advice regarding an add-on for a client.
Hi EveryoneI'm looking for an add-on that allows my client to schedule deliveries and print a run sheet.
Hi, does anyone have any experience in using add-ons for the management of share portfolios and/or rental properties.
Hi all,I've realised that we've not mentioned our latest add-on  in this forum already, so I wanted to let everyone know that if you have any questions about it, you can ask us here.
Hi TeamDoes anybody have summary of the popular add ons which could disclose their specialisation & Price points.
Hi, does anyone know an add-on that has this build in.
##### CLUSTER 295 #####
To use Xero I am forced to enter cheques as ‘Spend Money’ Account Transactions – correct me if I am wrong.
This is of course growing bigger than ben hur, so I am wondering if I were to use tracked inventory and have 1 item in xero per model, how would I assign/account for the differing purchase cost of the same model?
However, we have found we rarely use 70% of these and it makes a Xero bookkeeper managing our account more of a task.
I use Xero integration with my Clio account.
Why do we use the same account and password for Xero to log into a "community" forum2.
##### CLUSTER 296 #####
Hi everyone,I hoped someone might be able to give me a pointer on how to handle stamp duty within Xero?
Hi,I am becoming increasingly frustrated by not being able to contact Xero.
Hi when disposing assets =, Xero then to be able to sort bu Serial numbers.
Hi AllI notice after years of Requesting,  Xero finally added the option to be able to remove customers whos email you don't have when sending out batch invoicesTHIS IS GREATBut we went to send our Statements in batch and it didn't have the same feature?
Hi, it would be very handy if Xero had a similar feature to MYOB; as in you are able under the Employee Tab have a look at the Payruns relevant to that employee; I. E have and additional Tab that lists all the Payslips / payrun that have been processed  for that employee.
Hi,I am hoping some of you Xero savy people may be able to help me!
##### CLUSTER 297 #####
One of our clients is opening a subsidiary in Brazil and we would like to find an English speaking Brazilian Accounting firm to deal with the new subsidiary locally.
One of our clients is opening a subsidiary in Spain and we would like to find an English speaking preferably Madrid based Spanish Accounting firm to deal with the new subsidiary locally.
Hello,my new accounting year starts from may 2016however I would like to bring over my detailed aging customers receivable and vendors payable from my old accounting systemis there a way to do this?
I would like to recommend their products to new clients or current ones looking to make a change from the larger corporate banks.
I'd like to see "first name" and "surname" fields added into the template for adding a new contact.
We'd like to move over to using the new Barclays daily automated feed.
I like that the new Search feature has been added.
The new release looks like it has covered a lot of the things that were missing out of the first release.
I like the new Aged Receivables Reports (Detail and Summary).
I would like to please request for a new feature to be added.
I like the overall look of the new reports.
I like the new quotes features.
I would like a place for NEW ENTRY CONTACTS to go so it could be checked every day or so.
If you are taken away from a working page have a very easy one-click way, like right below the banner that says 'New Rule created' or 'Item deleted' or .
Hello,Very sorry if this sounds like a silly question but I'm new to all of this and am finding the payroll a little confusing.
Dear AllI would like to introduce a new inventory system DEAR Inventory (DEAR does not stand for “pricy” but for Double Entry Accounting Records).
As mentioned to Mark, people might like the new setup but for every accountant that does, there'll be easily another 20 firms not bothering with it and this is important given how much progress Quickbooks and (even! )
##### CLUSTER 298 #####
Up till we started with xero we would give each supplier invoice an entry in a purchase daybook with a date and a sequential number in exactly the same way the customer invoices would have a date and a sequential number.
When I log into Xero and look at my invoices, the history clearly states that they have been sent, however in the summary screen they are listed as 'invoice not sent' and thus no reminders have been sent.
We receive a soft copy remittance with each invoice itemised but there is no way to get this into Xero to match against the invoices - I still have to manually select them all and create batches.
Another reason that they don't want to have an intermediary stage to generate invoice numbers is that they create many invoices manually in Xero and want the numbering sequence and format to remain consistent.
I never receive creditor invoices with the same date of actually entering the invoice into Xero.
Changing the address in Xero for each invoice is a messy way around it and causes problems with statements and copy invoices down the line.
I send invoices to many of my clients via the Xero Network Key, they also get a PDF of the invoice as an attachment to an email.
I regularly attach PDF invoices to the Xero invoice payable.
I've PDF'd them and emailed the invoices, but the function from the actual invoice in Xero is not working.
I've started the project of coding all of our customers in Salesforce by invoice group, which translates easily to a Xero contact group, for sending out batches of invoices.
Invoices have to be synchronised to Xero from WoocommerceXero is synchronised whith the bankaccounts and invoices are matched with the paymentsThe received payments on invoice have to be synchronised from Xero to Woocommerce.
We are reviewing the data exported from H&L (POS) and we noted that the date for invoices coming through into Xero is the date they were actually entered into our POS, not the date that was entered as the invoice date.
Can anyone identify a 3rd party database invoicing sub-application that could capture cutomer, job, cost ,etc information to create these invoices (on behalf of) and then import a separate summary invoice into Xero for management services.
Xero's basic invoices dont allow me to customize the tabs displayed to create a commercial invoice (product #s, # of cases, quantity per case, size, price, etc. )
##### CLUSTER 299 #####
Is anyone able to explain or is this an oversight on the new feature?
I'd love to be able to have an opening balance of amount owing on loan, transactions throughout the month/year, then closing balance of new amount owing on loan.
It would be great if when a subscriber requested a subscription be transferred to someone else that the subscriber would receive a confirmation email that the transfer request had been sent to be able to keep easy track of it and follow it up if the new subscriber hasn't taken over the subscription.
As purchases are often repeated it would be handy to be able to convert an existing bill into a new purchase order.
It would be helpful to be able to set default terms for branded themes as it is tiresome to copy and paste the terms for a new quote.
I think it would be great to be able to import or drag and drop new companies or contacts as vcards.
It would be good to be able to enter a new tracking code when entering a transaction eg job number
Can't see anything suitable in the Old reports and haven't been able to get New reports to work in ages.
At the top of the screen I get a message: "You'll be able to process payroll from the start of the new financial year in April.
Ideally be able to save all the costs of each new product quotation and sent quotes in one place.
I have urgent work to continue placing to keep clients happy and the last issue of not being able to create a new vendor is a huge issue!
##### CLUSTER 300 #####
Hi Xero Forum Folk,I received my first year end from my accountant and see that they have accrued a March invoice amount in the Statement of Financial Position.
Hi,Before I joined Xero we had an invoicing system where we would assign an invoice prefix for each client.
Hi,When we draft a purchase invoice/bill in xero and then we submit for approval.
Hi Xero,We currently direct debit our customers by manually entering invoice details into the NAB Connect interface.
Hi, Ive tried to print and Email an Invoice this morning and it says 'error occured, contact Xero support if you require assistance'Please can you help with this.
##### CLUSTER 301 #####
A Xero organisation has assigned in Financial Settings the Flat Rate Cash Scheme and bank receipts and supplier invoices have both been entered with tax rate 'No VAT'.
This may only apply to a UK bank but under both Supplier and Customer 1- Is it possible to have a sort code 6 digit box added 2- If dealing international a box for the IBAN and Swift (BIC) code 3- The latter might be handy in our own company set up to be shown on invoices  All the above is handy when saving secure information and working from Xero Thanks in advance
net performs a batch deposit at the end of the day including whichever invoices were paid that day and this batch deposit will appear in the bank feed that comes into Xero.
Receipt Bank converts those annoying bits of paper – receipts and invoices - into Xero data, check out .
I'm very familiar with using Xero, but given we do 30-80 orders a day, matching 30-80 invoices to reconcile a single daily bank deposit is too much work.
##### CLUSTER 302 #####
I know Xero can do the BAS too, but this is my first time doing so, so I would like to get  a BAS done both ways and see how closely they match.
I like to keep Xero open all the time and I find it annoying to continually login through out the day after been automatically logged out.
I would really like to see Xero's Direct Deposit lead time be reduced from 5 days to 2 days to be more competitive with other competitors.
I would like to see the time sheets in Xero with more detail.
Every time we email its the same boilerplate response from Xero Support, from our side it looks like nothing is moving on this.
Would really help save us some time on a regular basis and seems like it would make more sense for other platforms looking to integrate with the Xero API as well.
I really like Xero but it does have a two very annoying, time consuming problems.
##### CLUSTER 303 #####
I created a new pay item (called "company loan") which is an after tax deduction pay item, but in that case Xero requires to have a payee for it.
Including but not limited to:who added a new employee and whenchanges to employee's pay rate, bank details, employment statusOpening balances who entered them and whenOpening balances being editedLeave being added or removedLeave opening balances being added or changedWho ran the payrunWhen payslips are sent and by whomChanges to anything in the pay templateChanges in the setting of payroll such as adding new pay categoriesAuto Super - who submitted it for approval
When copying a pay run to a new pay run the due dates for other payments should be transferred intact, not reset to some internal default.
A new staff member started on Tuesday the 23/5 and our pay cycle ends today where we pay wages.
Im new to xero and and are trying to pay my first pay run.
Or is it better to have a previous pay period that I will pay together with the new pay period?
As a consequence I am now processing each new Pay Run as an unscheduled pay run, which works fine in terms of posting the payroll expenses.
When entering new staff on payroll who have YTD Gross pay and YTD pension contributions Xero shows the incorrect YTD gross pay so I have had-to attach a personalised note to each payslip with the correct figures.
The new xero pricing plans mean we are being asked to pay an additional $10 to pay a junior (an 11 year old) $11!
##### CLUSTER 304 #####
This makes it handy to see any spikes/drops in accounts and generally check that everything makes senseYou can do this with the P&L and Balance Sheet reports but it would be good to be able to see these all at once.
To be able to show some different information on the dashboard for accounts on watchlist.
I would love to be able to reconcile clearing accounts.
Allow BECU accounts to work with eachother by having the feed be able to refresh automatically.
Hello all - I would love to be able to freeze the main headings bar (Dashboard, Accounts etc) along with the action buttons immediately underneath which are associated with that choice (eg Reconcile, Cash coding, statements etc).
It would be handy to be able to change the order of accounts in reports.
##### CLUSTER 305 #####
Do we have to enable something on the report or do we have to generate a new report layout?
Instead of re-customise the same layout in new version of report which created in older style report layout.
When you click on the "View Expense Claim Summary Report" link in the Expense Claim approve screen it takes you to a new screen showing the report - but from that screen you cannot click on a link to take you back to the Expense Claim you were reviewing.
Hello Xero TeamThere is a "Report Settings" Option in  your New Reports where you can choose report fields, such as Columns, Filters,etc.
This new report has the correct useful format for an A/P aging report, but the output is plain wrong for any date in the past.
##### CLUSTER 306 #####
I would like to be able to allocate expenses to clients.
I would like to be able to delete archived clients that do not have any activity ( tax returns or BAS returns).
I've even looked in the API documentation to see if I'd be able to pull the data out that way, but it doesn't look like the BudgetSummary endpoint lets me select any budget other than the Overall one either.
I would like to be able to select specific date ranges rather than being limited to 3, 6, 12 or 24 months.
i would therefore like to be able to search all clients that have purchased an Item, ever, using a Keyword in the product description.
I would also like to be able to change the assignment to customers after a bill has been payed.
I would like to be able to swap that.
Would like to be able to enter an amount against an Item without using the quantity and unit cost fields.
I would like to be able to filter the contact list before exporting.
We would like to be able to adjust timesheets submitted by employees.
Due to the 5 year document retention policy with the tax office, I would like to be able to do a bulk download of all receipts in a given financial year, to enable me to present them in the future if required.
It would be great to be able to see how many emails are sitting in the email folder eg 5 in a red call out like what happens on the notifications folder.
I would like be able import the income or loss distribution data from a Trust or LTC tax return directly to a beneficiary or LTC shareholder if both are clients in Practice Manager.
I would really like to be able to print statements in alphabetical order by last name, not first name as it is now.
It would be good if user were able to choose what order they would like statements to be printed in.
I would like to be able to cancel an upload (e. g. by pressing X) before the file has finished uploading when I realise I have selected the wrong file.
I would like to be able to produce multiple supplier payments.
I would like to be able to reorganise the tracking categories that are created.
I really like being able to export receivables and payables.
I would like to be able to access Files and tick all transactions I wanted to do the same thing with, and create transactions using one click.
I would like to be able to select multiple currencies (or "All")
I would like to be able to send all customers receipts of their deposits on jobs yet to be started.
I'd like to be able to:1.
Also we would like to be able to enter a footer on to the front cover which doesn't sppear on the rest of the pages.
Hello,I would like to see an option to take the standard package ($30) and be able to substitute multi-currency in place of payroll.
I suspect others might like to be able to measure income vs some other cost
I'd like to be able to deactivate Tracking options.
At Settings General Settings Conversion BalanceI'd like to be able to import 'balances'.
HiI would like to be able to print receivables/payables reports which show GST as a separate item, so I can see the real value of our in/out goings.
I'd like to be able to make that the default behaviour.
I'd like to be able to show the budget manager to different people in different formats.
Something like min 12 characters, one number and one CAP and Companies should be able to build upon that with their own requirements.
HiI'd like to be able to run a P&L for a client but select two of their 8 tracking codes.
I would like to be able to turn on check numbers.
I would like to be able to have the aged payables reports with a tab to isolate by supplier or customer name so you see only their information.
They'd like to be able to review each programme's situation plus consolidate the lot when required.
I'd like to be able to accept payments from our Australian Members in Australian $ through ANZ eGate.
I would like to be able to pull reports on my PO's.
I'd like to be able to assign a default tracking category to inventory items so those products would effectively be tracked automatically.
Alternatively, or perhaps additionally, I would like to be able to upload a Base-64 encoded X.
On Facebook, you are able to see what your personal page looks like from any of your friends point of view.
I'd like to be able to see when changes were made to inventory items, who made the changes, and what was changed.
Would like a button or link to be able to print custom envelopes for with in zero.
I'd like to be able to select all employees and enter those hours rather than have to submit a leave request for each on individually.
I'd like to be able to track salaries & wages on BOTH tracking categories.
For Example if an Employee puts in a personel leave but doesn't have enough leave accrued, I would like to be able to chaneg part of the leave to unpaid or annual leave.
It would be great to be able to easily match payments up the the payruns to assist identify where the issues are - and or at least tick transactions off, like a elimination process until we are left with the transactions that do not match the payruns or visa versa.
Would like to be able to enter a calendar reminder or automatic accrual for long service leave once employees reach 10 years service with this company.
I like using the program and been able to access it across multiple devices.
On the Payrun History page (Payroll > Payruns), I would simply like the ability to be able to print that page that lists all the previous payruns.
I would also like to be able to drill down on that entry and see what or how it has been paid/allocated etc as well as filter the view.
So I would like to be able to exclude those with Job No's (columns) with no transactions.
I would like to be able to clear this as generally the auto-suggest feature is very useful for me, so I quickly click things that it suggests.
Like I used to be able to do with MYOB
It seems like it should be a fairly trivial thing to do, to be able to create a tracked inventory item and specify that it is a multiple of some other SKU?
I'd also like to be able to track them separately.
I would like to be able to preview attachments on transactions rather than download them
I would like to be able to re-position my logo and increase the side page borders as they are too narrow.
I would like each member of staff to be able to log in and submit timesheets only against one or more clients.
I am using it to track a property development project and I would like to be able to enter quotes that I have received from suppliers so that I can do a cash-flow estimate and get reports on the basis of them.
Ideally I would like to be able to include it with the auto payments  for the March quarter, but not sure if I can do it that way, or how to reinstate the amount as a current liability, specifically for that employee.
I'd like to be able to quickly see on the P&L what our Gross Profit is which would mean having our labour wages going straight to COGS and our admin wages going to Expenses.
I would like to be able to see all Bills in one place, and forecasting of future income/expenses.
Whether you're an existing user or you're interested in giving LedgerLive a try, we'd like to hear your thoughts and hopefully we'll be able to answer any questions you have.
##### CLUSTER 307 #####
I just signed up for a 30 day trial but the interface seems different to the interface for Xero Tax or Xero Practice Manager and there doesn't seem to be a "Clients" tab.
A friend of mine is a UK Sole Trader and has just bought Xero, I have started using Xero to do bookkeeping for a Ltd company, so I'm not completely familiar with it yet.
Just wanted to know if it is possible to view already reconciled transactions (Spend Money or Receive Money) on Xero via the Xero app.
I just did another conversion from QBO to Xero and there were several troubleshooting items that needed cleaning up the QBO file or correcting in Xero to bring forward the properly converted  balances.
I have just started using the payroll service on Xero, having run my first payroll on it, I have now been informed by HMRC that there is a rebate due and it is asking me to adjust future payments, how do I record this in Xero?
HiIv just set up Payroll in Xero we are moving to Xero due to bringing payroll inhouse.
I've just found an interesting discussion "Needed Xero plugins" over on the Xero Group at LinkedIn.
##### CLUSTER 308 #####
Hi Everyone, I'd like to be able to allocate expenses to a client to see, for example, how much entertainment we've spent on them before we won a big contract.
Hi, it would be great if there was the function to be able to assign employee hours (within payroll) to a job so they can easily be picked up when invoicing like a billable expense.
hi thereI would like to be able to compare current master budget with a budget that I have created in budget manager, is this possible?
Hi,Our Employees, like many other companies in Australia, can accrue a maximum of 76 hours personal leave, once they have reached the 76 we should be able to set a ceiling so it accrues no further.
Hi, it would be great if there was the function to be able to assign employee hours (from payroll) to a job so they can easily be picked up when invoicing like a billable expense.
##### CLUSTER 309 #####
This is probably just because Xero isn't made for charities so it hasn't been considered but I was hoping I could add it next to the registered company info.
there are a lot bigger problems in Xero than that for some people, but just to add another option in the dropdowns would be a super easy tweak I would have thought.
Add to that the RTI information just plain doesn't work, doesn't even appear in the list and I'm less than impressed so far with Xero payroll.
I am looking for a recommendation for a SIMPLE Xero add-on that will track income invoiced, and relative direct costs paid out, just by job number.
Just wondering if any one can advise if there are any Xero Add-ons that provide the ability to allocate authority limits to users raising purchase orders and also provide an approval matrix
##### CLUSTER 310 #####
In PayPal, all shows correctly and there is no issue in the payment itself - I assume that this can also be responsible for a mismatch in Xero balance and PayPal account posted balance?
Or must you make the payment and then simply account for it within Xero?
(The payment gets sent to a current asset account in Xero).
For Example, Xero posted these amounts from a recent payroll tax payment directly to my checking account:  $980.
Hello,I'm hoping you could help us out deciding the right payment system for us to integrate with our Xero account.
##### CLUSTER 311 #####
I need the bank feeds coming into Xero ASAP.
That then keeps  Xero income in line with my receipt book and no need to get into town to bank etc (as the figures are quite low) .
I have clients that really want to join Xero but need a feed as not interested in downloading and uploading csv from bank.
there are bank fees we need to enter into xero and i'm wondering what would be the best way to do this?
Will Xero automatically import these missing transactions or do I need to import up to the active bank feed date?
##### CLUSTER 312 #####
Is there a way to log these monthly payments and assign them to an invoice (and make it easy to spot missed payments) or would I need to make up 12 invoices for each years support?
Either create an extra column or remove the due date I need to easily identify when invoices were paid quickly without clicking on each individual invoice so see this information.
I need to have someone with Invoice Only (draft - because that's the only way to not disclosure all invoices) access to also be a payroll admin.
I need to import a lot of invoices every month with multiple invoice lines.
I desperately need to have a UoM column on my invoices, as on the same invoice, I may have to bill for hours and days - which I sell to my client at different rates.
##### CLUSTER 313 #####
HiI pay my rent from my personal bank account and then claim 30% as a business expense.
During the start up stage of the business (before the business was registered and had it's own bank account), we were using our personal bank account to pay for things.
I put all my income into the business bank account and pay myself a set amount via check every two weeks.
I currently have a personal bank account and a business bank account (which all my money goes into from a Paypal Card Reader) and two personal credit cards which I have used to pay for some items.
I've recently got my Suncorp (AU) business bank account set up to enable me to do pay runs with ABA files.
##### CLUSTER 314 #####
We are a 48 seat restaurant, I need to record supplier payments paid in cash or electronic, pay wages, create timesheets that record overtime, double pay on PHolidays etc.
Therefore clients need to manually calculate this figure, my client had this problem over Easter as they needed to pay their casual staff for Good Friday and needed the average daily pay rate to do so.
I followed these steps based on the guide:-----Pay out leaveTo pay out leave on termination, you need to create a leave application for the total hours payable.
From what I can see on Xero help I need to do an unscheduled pay run BUT what I don't understand is whether this Unscheduled pay run is: just for the bonus amount for the one employee OR  is it a replacement for the one employees pay (so original amount + bonus) OR is it a complete replacement pay run so I need to add the amounts for all employees for the pay period.
However Pay items haven't turned up in 'Bills I need to pay"I expected the net salaries and the HMRC Tax/NI to appear?
##### CLUSTER 315 #####
My client (landlord) has payments for invoices (weekly rent) from various sources (e. g. housing benefit, tenant, DWP) and would like to see on his statements where each payment has come from.
I would like to see the existing expected date field to be recognised by the Statement template so that invoices known to be in process but not yet released by receipt of payment can be highlighted.
I would like the ability to reconcile invoices & bills where they are part-paid, and it it known what specific line items the part-payment relates to.
Like when we do batch payments to a supplier ,there would be a list of oustanding invoices that we are paying against and a signature for the supplier to sign and confirm that they have received the payment .
Also I would like to have the info on the date of payment and the possibility to identify the unpaid invoices, which should build up (a component) of the payables.
##### CLUSTER 316 #####
We have a new bank loan.
We are now looking for a new bank.
What field to default from should be bank feed specific - hence a new setting.
The feature requested here is to have the ability to segregate contacts who initiate payments and create a new sub-routine for handling their outstanding credits, adding the ability to apply credits during bank reconciliation for these contacts only, and eliminating the pop-up during credit entry asking if we want to apply the credit to their outstanding bills.
I set up a new bank rule today and realised the billable expenses feature hasn't been extended to that part of the system yet.
Today I created a new PayPal Bank and began importing "Gross Values", with fees reserved for later.
I have set up a new credit card on my dashboard and have tried to get the automatic Bank Feed.
My bank ANZ moved its branch to a new location and subsequently my BSB number changed.
I have been trying to update the bank feed since March 30 and while it says that it is refreshing, when it's finished, no new transactions are added.
^^ squarebracketAny idea on how to achieve this goal without having to append a new suffix to all 600 bank cheque vendors?
I am almost looking forward to seeing new transactions coming through from bank feed for me to reconcile!
I am finding it very frustrating as all bank feeds issue have to be dealt with in New Zealand and our clients are not happy with the delay in dealing with the problems.
We have decided to backdate all bank feeds etc to 1 July 2015 for the start of the new financial year.
##### CLUSTER 317 #####
Problem is, I'd like to run a report for our items sold, but only show items for invoices that have been marked as paid.
I would like to see a report that I could run that shows duplicate invoices.
I would like a report that shows number of entries processed and the number of invoices attached.
It would be really useful to view supplier invoices and payments on the same report like a Supplier Ledger.
I'd like to generate a report with list of all invoices and payments for a particular contact (customer or supplier).
There seems be only one report for customer invoices and it is as at todays date, I would like something historical.
##### CLUSTER 318 #####
Hello,We'd like to be able to show outstanding balance or a transaction summary on invoices (ie.
Ideally we would like to be able to identify the individual against their PO so that they only receive invoices/statements relevant to them.
I'd like to be able to see full info of client on invoices.
I like the email feature for invoices etc but the email text format they get sent out in is pretty ugly and looks very old-fashioned - it would be great to be able to select a default font for emails in the email settings, so we could select something more recipient-friendly such as arial or calibri.
I would like to be able to set a different default branding theme for both quotes and invoices.
I would like to be able to define when invoices are sent.
I'd like to be able to email Files (invoices) directly to a folder within Files.
HelloI would like to be able to bulk upload invoices using a csv file.
The other option is I'm able to look at all the current invoices and select them from the list all together and pick them all out individually like this.
##### CLUSTER 319 #####
The problem was due to the fact that our legal system is linked to our accounting system and any invoices to clients we generate are being populated into Xero automatically and reported as sales.
I have been entering my invoices into xero as sales.
It then transmits those sales invoices to XERO through an API.
Before I switched to Xero we used Freshbooks for invoicing and I particularly liked their ipad app feature where you could scroll back week by week and month by month and see sales invoices raised in a bar chart.
We often require to edit the due dates on the sales invoices in Xero to reflect this.
I'm having an issue with exporting sales invoices from Shopify to Xero.
I'm processing EOM Sales Invoices - and bloody Xero isn't working!
I am setting up Xero and have imported sales invoices and payments against these from WooCommerce.
This involved scanning all bills and converting all sales invoices to PDF and then entering them manually into Xero.
7949 Sales Service invoices into Xero ?
Comprehensive online job management solution that pushes sales & purchase invoices, tracking information and contacts into Xero.
com/documentation/auth-and-limits/xero-api-limits#Systemlimits recommends that we don't generate over 1000 sales invoices per month and have contacts in excess of 10k.
The client processes many sales invoices in Xero.
##### CLUSTER 320 #####
I have just noticed that my reconcile report has many entries, some from 2014 that were reconciled and are now all showing as un reconciled.
After backdating all of my transactions to April 14 and diligently splitting out VAT, I've just made a rather annoying discovery that my outgoing transactions are reported excluding VAT and a huge VAT figure appears in my balance sheet report!
Just wish to code all purchases to Purchases, and do a simple journal monthly to record current stocks and produce P&L report with gross profit showing.
The 1099 Report should allow for the missing items per vendor to show up in that column, and not just say Missing Details.
e. g. if you had a detailed report for the two month period being 01/04/2016 - 31/05/2016 you could just choose the right button to change the dates instantly to the next period range being 01/06/2016 - 31/07/2016 rather than changing each date figure.
com/Reporting/Report/Run/1033) to track the status, not just invoiced: draft, invoiced, paid.
Rather than having to delete a note you didn't want printed it would be much better if you could just tick a box to suppress printing that particular note for the report.
Un-hide transaction details before finalising reportThis method is inefficient and could be much improved if there was just a NET GST Summary Report including Decimals (incl Decimals could be optional - for those out there who firmly believe that there is no cents (sense) in tax!
If this is a problem, just make a report available that does the same thing.
Would be great if it was just saved as a favourite report they could have a quick link to.
Just a little adjustment to the name of the report.
Is there some other way I can save this exact report so that I can go back to it and view the latest version in just a click or two?
It seems that the only way to get this information is from a Payroll Activity Report which seems a rather tedious and manual process just to get a simple list of employee and deduction amounts for a month.
##### CLUSTER 321 #####
I have tried editing the filed code in the report template to add ## after .
To get visibility at the item level, the only way to see item level detail by customer (contact) is to run an Inventory Item Details report, Group By Contact and add the Item Name Column.
We currently have to export this report to excel and manually add in all the credit notes.
at the moment I have to run the report with no grouping, export, add a filter in excel to filter to the contact groups i then copy and paste to another spreadsheet to then subtotal by contact!
It would be really good if we could add reports at a client level to the report packs.
One way of doing this could be to add a drag a drop function in the layout option of the report.
Will the report packs have the ability to add note references to the Statement of Financial Position, to match the Notes to the Financial Statements at some stage?
Would be grateful if you could add these tweaks to make the report really useful.
Looking for a add-on report writer suitable for a small UK Charity - recommendations please.
##### CLUSTER 322 #####
So I added some parts to inventory today for the first time and made several New Adjustments.
A single black dress can come in many different sizes, and fashion rapidly changes so inventory only remains active for a short time, and new inventory is constantly created.
Every time I set up a new organisation I have to hide them, even though I have done this over 100 times.
Can we have a way to choose an existing contact to assign to a client, so that one contact may be linked to more than one client at a time, and then create a new one if needed?
At the same time I want to put money away for some new equipment that I know is going to be released by the manufacturer in the autumn.
The new UK payroll is set up with time off balances in hours.
I have created a new payroll item called "Commission Only Salesperson" and allocated it to ordinary time.
I have a new employee who  works 18 hrs per weekHis full time equiverlent salary is 45k based on 45 hr week.
So for example - Mr. X gets his passport renewed through us and his new passport expiry date is 08/04/2021 - i want to set a reminder for 08/11/2020 reminding him that his passport will again expire in 6 months time.
##### CLUSTER 323 #####
We invoice for each of the treatment sessions, and then allocate the invoice to the pre payment.
When creating an invoice through the Xero website, individual payments including payment dates are displayed on the invoice as they are applied.
We may send several different emails with the same invoice when we chase up payment so if the history showed which email title was sent with the invoice it would help considerably.
Now if I have entered an invoice and approved it, I am presented an option to enter details for payment of this invoice.
Paying the invoice directly in our payment service and then needing to mark the invoice as paid in Xero by hand
Rather than taking an order over email, making an invoice in xero, emailing that to customer and then matching payment to that invoice, would be great to see something more efficient.
When I delete a payment for an invoice I was looking at, give me a breadcrumb back to the invoice I was looking at.
I have paid a USD a pro-forma invoice from a supplier with split payments due to payment terms, and now have received the final Invoice that shows that I have overpaid the initial invoice due to less product shipped.
Currently if a customer pays for more than one invoice you have to open up each invoice and record the payment.
##### CLUSTER 324 #####
Hi,We had some confusion with an invoice, where the amount paid was more than the invoice.
Hi thereIs there any way of attaching a PDF copy of the original Invoice with the automated overdue Invoice reminder that goes out to suppliers?
Hi Guys,Wondering if it is possible to get a placeholder for Invoice Reminders for the 'Invoice Date'.
Hi We applied a credit note for part of the total due on an invoice (ie adjusting down the original invoice total).
Hi there,In order to edit a sale invoice I have removed & unreconciled all of the payments that were attached to that invoice.
Hi,My client has asked that I try to customise an invoice so that it aligns (references) to specific lines entered at the invoice stage.
Hi All,We have a customer who overpaid their invoice via PayPal, we refunded the overage via PayPal and now have two transactions (one received, one spent) in the PayPal feed which don't match the invoice total.
##### CLUSTER 325 #####
As a sole trader I'm keen to understand how I might be able to better leverage Xero to manage my household cashflow budget, have people successfully used Xero for this purpose?
If you're worried about additional costs - then you can always try out my free web app, nomorecraptions(dot)com which enables you to fix up the atrocious automatic craptioning on YouTube videos (as they provide no accessibility benefits or outcomes to me at all):Otherwise I'm at a loss as to why Xero has seemingly ignored my previous requests and as a paying subscriber surely I should be able to get the maximum benefit out of Xero too?
If a VAT return has failed for whatever reason in Xero, or if the return cannot be filed through Xero, then it would be useful to be able to mark a return as filed.
I would prefer (having a large number of clients and feeds in xero) to be able to go to a master feeds console and see a list of the feeds that are working, feeds that are being set up (ie where form has been signed and sent to xero for processing) and forms that have been created and are waiting on client authority/return to xero.
(We won't be able to get the team to start using Xero Quotes, and I don't think Xero Quotes has the ability to do some of the customization and calculations we have setup in Google Sheets).
We have wrongly linked a couple of clients from our system to contacts in Xero through the API and now want to be able to link to the correct Xero contacts.
##### CLUSTER 326 #####
We add alot of our customers on site and this feature is now a real requirement for us to use XERO
In the Xero mobile app (I use the iOS app) add a feature to the "Upload to Files inbox" that allows you to use the device's built-in camera WITHIN the Xero app to take a photo and upload THAT file (i. e. one step) instead of having to use the device's native camera app first, then log into Xero, then add the file by selecting it from the camera roll (i. e. several steps).
We are currently trying to find a UK add on to use with Xero.
Since Xero doesn't provide reporting for all jobs done, I was recommended to use "Add on".
Is there an add-on that we can use to send our customers a credit card authorization form that we either integrate with Stripe or Xero?
However, they're a large furniture retailer who uses MYOB Point of Sale software currently, and want to use a Xero add-on POS software such as Vend.
##### CLUSTER 327 #####
I run both time and materials and fixed price contracts so ideally I'd like to be able to quote and thereafter track costs against a budget too.
(Ideally, I'd also like to be able to group and summarize by these fields, but one step at a time).
I'd like to have the option for managers to be able to approve time off for only certain staff (ie people in their department) if possible?
I'd like to be able to select 10 or 12 transactions and assign all of those transactions to a certain code/category at the same time.
I would like a manager to be able to authorise the time sheets of the staff in their department however for them to do this they have to be given access to the whole payroll system which they can't have.
We would ideally like to be able to compare quotes to actual costs which include quoting, design, materials, labour, travel, & installation time.
##### CLUSTER 328 #####
If I start to use Xero let's say tomorrow, can I re-create the past invoices what I have done in Excel?
We use xero to send subscription invoices to our members.
So even if we were to change our Xero login to use an email address using our trading name domain, invoices would come from multiple different email addresses depending upon who is processing them.
Hello,Our clients can use Stripe for paying invoices we create and email in Xero.
I am having trouble how to use 'find and match' to reconcile the invoices and bills which are already paid/deposited in Xero.
What I want is to eliminate the use of QuickBooks and for the invoices created to be shown in Xero to easily keep track of money coming in and going out in one place.
And they use the great Xero functionality to generate invoices, track cashflow, etc.
##### CLUSTER 329 #####
I'd like to send the data to Xero so that the invoice is created in Xero and sent to the client from Xero.
I would like Xero to include a PDF copy of invoice on a Xero to Xero invoice creation.
Our current work flow is pretty simple and looks something like this:- Quote for project in Xero- Accept quote in Xero- Create tasks in Todoist that team can access on all devices- Create events and deadlines in Google Calendar- Files related to the project (scripts, storyboards, etc) are stored on OneDrive- Complete tasks and eventually project- Invoice for project in XeroThis is workable in a small team, but it obviously has some huge limitations.
We are looking for a solution that incorporates the following (if possible)- Integration with Xero- One warehouse location- Lot code tracking (not individual serial numbers)- expiration date tracking / reporting- Ability to facilitate drop shipments- Integration with Fedex to generate shipping labels & charges back to Xero invoice (UPS is a distant second choice)- Email notification to customers with tracking information embedded in email - Simple kitting (optional)We would like to have 2-4 people with access, if possible.
We would like to see Xero offer more customization options when it comes to setting "Staff" restrictions (view only, invoice only, access to everything in Xero, etc. )
##### CLUSTER 330 #####
I currently use Harvest for expense and time tracking and understand there is some level of integration (I have reviewed it).
We currently use Deputy for Time-sheets.
I work at an Auto Electrician's and several of the jobs we do use the same parts and materials each time.
I use the inbox feature all the time.
We frequently use draft invoicing throughout the month as a form of time sheet on client jobs.
It would save us time and we probably convert a lot more clients to ledger only clients, where clients use their in-house systems.
Toggl is a time based tracking tool with powerful reporting, ease of use and great pricing.
I am happy to spend time with one your analyst to develop use cases.
Every time I use the Cash coding page I am frustrated by continuously needing to resize the column widths of one, then another column.
MYOB has a feature for all recurring items where you can select an option to use previously updated journal/purchase etc and this actually becomes a huge time saver.
I think it could be helpful for those who only use a small amount of time
One of the use cases of journals (and the one in ) is to recognise revenue or expenses over a time period.
I want to use the feature in the balance sheet, for a builder who has stages in construction, and if we can get a summary of the tracking, then it would make it suitable for a construction company, or even for work in progress for time allocations in a service based company.
We're a letting agency and use these when we're paying rent out to landlords each month, so it would be brilliant to have these automatically create each month to save us having to look up all the info each time.
I very frequently use the mobile app to enter customer orders, as our restaurant customers call me any time and any place to put in their weekly order.
Both Dropbox and Google make it easy by allowing you to use Google Authenticator or SMS to enter in a one-time password.
We use the first category as a project list so we know how much time / money we have spent on each project.
our suggestion: we wish to use a tablet at the work site for the staff to login and enter their time-sheets.
I'm the Agency Manager for a design firm and we use job numbers to track time.
This is something that I use all the time in different ways to look at my spending, and that natural roll up of totals doesn't seem to exist.
We are looking to implementing this so staff can enter their time sheets/leave online, but were hoping for a guide so we don't have to guess how to use it.
It's also ridiculous that a template cannot be set up for all Payroll Administrators to use - especially when we have 50 or so employees and two of us have to set up our own templates - what a waste of valuable time.
I usually have to dump to an Excel spreadsheet and then manually detail out each wages journal to individual employees, which takes forever and is not a good use of my client-paid time.
I use a third application for time tracking.
Most payroll systems ask you enter time by day, so I assume they use that to calculate average earnings.
Industrial and professional service organisations use TidyWork as their job costing workflow system to manage time, materials and expenses efficiently.
Looking for an easy-to-use and cheap option which can possibly be integrated with inventory management at some time in the future.
I realise that free trials are available left right and centre, but the time it takes to set them up and actually try to use the them is going to be costly in itself.
We are looking to use "Deputy" as our time and attendance programme (we currently use manual time sheets).
I find this extremely insulting after wasting my time trying to learn how to use the software I am paying for.
At the same time, I am being phoned every week by Iris to ask if I am ready to start to use Kashflow for my clients.
##### CLUSTER 331 #####
After two years of struggling with Barclays trying to refresh bank feeds without wasting hours of my time, I've finally reached breaking point.
I downloaded 2 from the bank at the same time in the same format.
There would be a lot of precious time saved having direct bank links for reconciliation's.
I want to manually reconcile several items at once in the bank statement, instead of having to reconcile one at a time.
Rather annoying to have to turn this off every time you are trying to reconcile bank items.
Would be great to have a rule drop down to apply the rule you want at bank rec time.
When reconciling bank statement items a feature that automatic creates minor adjustment for small rounding amounts would save a lot of clicks and time.
Problem is - you cannot easily identify that this is why your bank doesn't balance, then finding the deleted line from a long list of statements (as in the case with feeds) can take some time.
<some time later>- When prompted to enter a conversion balance with starting bank balance for 31st March, an entry of £3,000 was input.
So my bank recs have been way out for a long time so have decided to deal with this once and for all this weekend.
The guides seem to suggest that you reconcile one transaction at a time, But when I click on the statements tab there are a ridiculous number of statements that have no bearing on my actual monthly bank statement.
Sometimes one of our guys has not done part of a deposit and I have spent time on reconcilling a bank line item.
That time of the year - we have found our short falls in respect of on the record we have paid correctly however when the bank transfer occurred (due to being christmas holidays and cashing in leave) I have underpaid a couple of staff.
Mint correctly categorizes the bank transactions 98% of the time.
##### CLUSTER 332 #####
zipPay is a buy now pay later offering and it would be great to be able to apply and get access to funds in those emergency times and pay off on my own terms.
There is currently no function to be able set up multiple SGL lines at different % rates, and then link  these different 'SGL rates' to specific pay items within an employees pay template.
Being able to right mouse the Pay Run link from the pay run list screen would also be useful.
Finally being able to print a range of payslips for an individual or selected employee(s) rather than having to access each pay run and print the specific page from all payslips for that pay run.
If you want to revert pay runs to draft to make adjustments, you will be able to revert the most recent pay run, per pay calendar to draft.
Nor am I able to Revert the Pay Run to correct the error (receiving a notice - This pay run cannot be unposted).
I have had to create a temporary pay calendar to be able to create a pay run for this final pay.
##### CLUSTER 333 #####
We work with several people from the one company, however they are in different departments and therefore, we need to be able to send the invoices to individuals.
I need to be able to build PnLs (forecats and actual) by project and create and track invoices (paid/not paid) to clients.
I need to be able to track "margin" (total invoices less associated bills) for customers and see with which customers we are, and aren't not doing well.
My staff need to be able to send draft invoices out to clients.
We need to be able to print invoices before the stock is delivered.
##### CLUSTER 334 #####
As has been the case for years, the process of having Xero connect to my bank (Barclays) is time-consuming, frustrating, and entirely unpredictable.
I would simply manually overwrite the incorrect values each time I run payroll, but Xero displays the daily rate for every bank holiday or day's annual leave taken which makes it very onerous.
I would have expected that xero might prompt us for opening or closing balances each time we commence a bank statement reconciliation as have all my accounting systems in the past?
Also I tried to put it as "Time off" and I guess correctly Xero ignores the day as its a bank holiday.
Xero took forever to log in, then when reviewing bank reconciliation, move to next page also takes a long time.
what a time consuming mess for us, plus when activating bank feeds in Xero we were never aware we were signing up to a third party app.
##### CLUSTER 335 #####
The Payroll Activity Detail report lists every single pay for each staff member individually.
It would be great to see a report of how much taxable income and associated tax they have to pay on one page.
Equally, the "Payroll Employee Summary" report has a reimbursements columns but does not show a total including net pay and reimbursements.
At the moment the 'Management Report' is the staple P&L, Balancesheet, A/Rec, A/Pay etc.
It would be useful if we could run a report which shows average days to pay by customer.
I have clients who pay several months in advance and report their activities to a board.
It would be quite handy to me if there was a summary at the end of the report that summed up all the pay items.
If the original Payroll Activity Details report had a summary section at the bottom which captured only the details of that pay run, that would be great
in a perfect world it would be great to have a report that shows a tally of all employees before approving the pay run.
For those who pay their NIC PAYE/NIC over quarterly this would be a simple but very useful revision to the P32 report.
It would be great to see this feature be added to the "Payroll Activity Details Report" which is produced during the Pay Run.
We'd love a report that shows which of your employees haven't submitted their timesheet for the pay period.
Good Morning,As we are in the construction industry we are required to report and pay long service leave to a fund bi-monthly.
In the meantime are there any workarounds to have;- employee name, age / date of birth, and pay rate in a report?
anyhow in wages and salaries report it isnt been recorded when u ran pay.
htm"Although the expenditure is allowable, the employees themselves may have to pay tax on the entertainment received and the employer will have to report this on form P11D.
The report shows holiday pay $ values, but only total of hours for annual leave, not the $ value?
##### CLUSTER 336 #####
I have created a new expense, and approved it for payment but have not marked it as paid.
It may look as though we’ve slowed down, but that’s because we’re currently in the middle of a few major projects that all due to be released this year:New InvoicingNew Expense ClaimsJob CostingImproved Payment ServicesImprovements to ContactsCISPlus a lot more!
I have a problem with a PayPal payment that straddles my financial year end and new financial year beginning.
E. g. a new payment to same company.
As in using the new withholding table for payment dates after 1st of October and still applying the old withholding table for September days.
Today 28th July is deadline for the new superstream payment.
I then attempted to do a new payrun with a negative super adjustment but the end result shows a payment of x dollars and payg withholding, which again is wrong.
After the Payment Summaries are done, do I have to rollover to a new Payroll year as I did in MYOB?
##### CLUSTER 337 #####
It is important to pay taxes and to pay them on time.
Most other payroll packages have the ability to pay the employee and pay the deduction directly at the same time.
This to include the option to select several pay periods instead of having to select one pay period at a time.
I have to do an unscheduled pay run for same period now I have info on employeeOn this unscheduled pay run this employees name does not appear  I have entered a time sheet for him?
I can create these types of pay based on custom "units" but my employees can only enter time based pay.
When he tries to enter time for pay period 3/20/201, that pay period is not available.
##### CLUSTER 338 #####
On the contact, sometimes there is more than one account the gets debited to that particular contact and needs more than one account - It would be nice to be able to store more than 1 account in a contact.
In THIS VIEWYou should be able to see:Date, Description, Account (i. e. Category), Notes, Reference, Spent, Received, Status(Note - you CANNOT see the Account (i. e. Category) or Notes in this view now, so you won't know if there is an error/typo in the category or notes until you click into the transaction = ridiculous.
To be able to sort the Profit and Loss and Balance sheet layout by account code instead of account name?
It would be great to have a "Cash Coding" tab on all reports - for instance: if you run an income statement and notice that all of your revenue transactions went to the wrong revenue account, it would be great to be able to select all and move them to the right account at once.
Ideally I would be able to transfer two sums, to each credit card account, that would reconcile with the single sum on the current account statement.
##### CLUSTER 339 #####
Similar to how the XERO system creates new, sequential Invoice an Quote numbers, there are often times where having the option to select the "next available number" would be useful.
As we quote a monthly fee to new clients we could do with having the option to approve a quote and turn it into a monthly repeating invoice in Xero.
Hell all, I am very new to Xero and want to know how I email an invoice to 2 people within an organisation.
Im a new Xero user and trying to create my first invoice.
I have noticed on Harvest that when I set up a new invoice it has the following message "Apply Tax From Xero".
Hello Xero,Since you changed something in the way it searches contacts when you type in the 'To' field on a new invoice, the search is really slow.
It would be extremely helpful if, when instigating a new action with a customer (or a supplier), Xero could "flag" any special notes or instructions, e. g. "always email copy invoice to Co. Secretary", or "always insert both P. O.
##### CLUSTER 340 #####
Xero should track that the report has already been filed and instead display a message to that effect (e. g. stating the date/time the report was filed and by which Xero user) possibly even with a link to the return reciept (e. g. as is present immediately after filing).
This whole process is cumbersome time consuming and the limitations of Xero report writing features still a huge disappointment.
It would save us a TON of time if Xero would implement a customizeable "customer-type" drop-down and/or a report which would allow you to pull customers based upon item(s) purchased.
However, the way that Xero works means that we have to set up this report from scratch each time.
Afternoon All, I have a supplier who has managed to lose all his CIS receipts, is there a report I can run in Xero which will show all the CIS deductions to a certain supplier over a given time period?
##### CLUSTER 341 #####
Please can you add a bank feed for CAF bank
Please can you add RBS Royal Bank of Scotland and Natwest Bank logos for when a client has a direct feed option set up correctly.
Please, could you add a bank feed for Afrasia Bank in Mauritius.
Add the Dutch bank ABN AMRO as a support bank.
Please add bank feeds for Spanish bank Bankinter.
a very prominent bank in this area is USBANK,, I would request that Xero get in touch with them to add them to our bank options.
##### CLUSTER 342 #####
We often need to change purchase order details on our sales invoices and have to re-open closed periods to do so.
We really need access for Sales staff to only see or create invoices, accept customer payments and view customer contacts - no access to Bills or Purchases or any other area.
On my sales invoices I need to show a bit more detail than standard.
I will need to differentiate between the different countries, producing reports etc, as well as raise sales invoices with three different logos, addresses, and currencies.
Most of our sales are for hard to find, and not often requested items; therefore, we need to manually enter the description and prices into our invoices.
##### CLUSTER 343 #####
I am on the main dashboard of Xero daily, but I only open the payroll dashboard when I need to do a specific task (i. e. do a pay run, file taxes or change employee details).
i am wanting to know if there will ever be a way we can pay bills or do payroll directly from xero without the need to save and upload an ABA file.
Basically, at this point, I don't have need to pay for a more complicated external program, the Xero Inventory Tracking should fit my needs.
Will Xero work it out accurately or does it need me to distinguish between VAT I charge and VAT I pay.
I have no interested in paying myself super as i have an investment property strategy i want to focus on and need to understand what is the best way, to pay myself through xero?
I'm trying to start using payroll in Xero, but all people that i need to pay are considered contractors (1099) not employees.
I've taught myself how to process a payroll in Xero - having used SAGE for 15 years - but now I need to PAY those employees.
Do I need to re-enter the details of all my staff to mimic a pay run on xero?
##### CLUSTER 344 #####
It would be great to be able to hide reconciled bank transactions.
If we were able to find all debors and creditiors that have manual payments made against them but nothing from the bank feeds to complete the transaction it would be much easier.
It would be great to  be able to a) see easily/clearly what date  a bank was last reconciled to.
Should be able to see when an entire bank statement has been deleted and potentially restore if possible.
It would be handy to be able to split batch payments if they come through in 2 parts on the bank statement.
It would be great to be able to send a supplier/payee a Remittance Advice slip for a transaction that has been imported via Bank Feed.
I understand that aba files are able to be changed, but it would be good to get some alert or approval request if bank details are changed.
When on the bank reconciliation to be able to search by date for a transaction not yet reconciled
I have had a couple requests from clients who want employees to be able to reconcile transactions without seeing the overall bank balance.
I have an issue which I have not been able to resolve when dealing with these items in a bank statement.
at <anonymous>:1:15It's critical that I am able to automatically update bank feeds.
##### CLUSTER 345 #####
The ability to input multiple purchase invoices/bills into zero in one screen rather than inputting one then approving then adding new bill etc.
In the new above reports summary you cannot exclude current invoices not due to be paid.
When contact details are updated, including a name change or address etc, repeating invoices should automatically update in line with the new contact details.
A couple of examples - I have a new employee who can only issue invoices.
There seems to be a great new feature that allows automatic reminder notices for overdue invoices 7 days, 14 days and 21 days but there is no record weather or not they are being sent.
It would be useful if they could view & access previous items to assist in the preparation of new invoices / orders especially where the same customers & suppliers are involved.
If I change a contact name in my database (for example correct the spelling of their name) it creates a new contact in Xero instead of adding the invoices to an existing contact.
Can a new field for total quantity be created so we can include on customized invoices.
However, a new US provider charges our credit card whenever our credit with them gets low, but only invoices us monthly.
I adopted a new workflow to help me out with my massive INBOX of invoices etc.
It would be nice if this function was available when entering new invoices.
I actually tried uploading a batch of new invoices yesterday and got an error message telling me "the transactions lines didn't match the total", or something to this effect - so THEN I read the Help Screens on Importing and discovered I'm probably trying to do something that can't be done.
I am creating an new earnings line, so that their hours go to the code 480-Sub Contractor Labour which is what all their invoices have gone to and so I don't get their hours/payments showing up in code 477 -  Wages and Salaries, as they are not employees.
Integrate Xero and Evernote with Zapier - create invoices from new notes in Evernote or create new notes from Invoices, check out .
For example: This simple and very useful feature in New Invoices brings up search matches in the To field.
##### CLUSTER 346 #####
It's such a waste of time and slows down sales order processing.
Would be helpful if there was, a recurring sales feature where you didn't have to stipulate how often it would be used given that it will change every time it is entered.
For example I would want to capture how much in sales (of each type) we have had for a customer for a particular period of time.
However, the PayPal feed does not contain a Country column, so the only way to know which way to reconcile each transaction is to look them up individually, in my sales system, which is time-consuming.
Maybe across any manual figure fields to alleviate all manual calculations (eg) times in time sheets, quantity fields in sales/purchases, etc.
This takes extra time as our company reports revenue subject to sales tax in about 20 jurisdictions, every month.
Generate more sales, slash your admin work, get paid on time and delight your customers.
US state sales tax compliance is confusing and time consuming.
##### CLUSTER 347 #####
If we have the option to add Nicknames for each contact this prevents me from having to change the Supplier's actual name every time I have to write a check.
AT LEAST STATE THIS INFORMATION ON YOUR HELP PAGES so that you don’t add insult to injury by making us waste our time looking & asking for help on this feature.
Or at least include a function to add a personalised time frame - day, night, fortnight, week, half day, contracted hours, morning shit, sleep in shift, waking night, sleeping night.
Within this, I click to add time and start my timer.
So I have to manually add all the references, which takes time.
Why can't I add say 30 lines at a time rather than having to add one line at a time?
The ability to add a column calculating the difference (% change or gross dollar amount) between two periods of time.
This would save having to drill into Approve & add another all the time if it was sitting along side Approve.
Would be really handy if we want to add a lot of options in one time.
eg item is  " HP Canon Inkjet printer" and in the item description we have "HP Canon Inkjet printer Serial Number:", so each time we sell one we add the serial number of that particular printer.
templates and have it print/add in  appropriately each time.
This would add tremendous value to employers as it would show how much time was spent doing what exactly.
currently it show Title, Type, Status, Start Date and End Date there but if you could add a column for Hours that would be great and save a lot of time if you are looking up information on a lot of employees.
It would be nice when my employees add there hours to their time sheet that they could show which jobs they were on.
It is more time consuming to add one bill then move on to the next.
As our team grows I am finding it time consuming to add staff members as users into clients files.
I would do this for one Add-On and then the next - all my time spent gathering information from one party and passing it onto my client.
I have a client that has no more than 10 employees at any one time, but I am wondering if you terminate an employee, can you then add an 11th Employee, being 10 active and 1 terminated ?
Spent a lot of time analysing but didn't find the correct Add-On.
I am setting up Practice Manager for the first time for our practice and I wondered if there was a quicker way to add jobs?
##### CLUSTER 348 #####
Would it be possible to add a contacts VAT registration number as a column to the "Payable Invoice Detail" report?
I can also do a customer invoice report and add a column into the excel spreadsheet to divide all the amounts by 10%, however there are some items we charge, that do not have GST, so some of the figures are not accurate.
To add a check box for customer's phone number to the Receivable invoice summary report.
I was hoping you could add this feature to your standard reports, such as Customer Invoice Report and Supplier Invoice Report .
On the Receivable Invoice detail report is it possible to add an option to include credits issued.
##### CLUSTER 349 #####
It would be extremely handy to add ABN, TFN & business name search fields in the global search function in XPM.
Showing a basic computation that can be edited if required - e. gProfit/Loss    x/(x)Add backs : Depreciation xEntertaining  xBad debt provision xnewnewLess:Fixed asset additions  (x)newnewTax @  x% *( *currently 20% small business)     =    xxx Estimated corporation tax a client is likely to payFollowed by a journal option.
Our business has begun to accept payments in Bitcoin, for example, and we have no way to add that to the currency list.
Can anyone suggest a good add-on software for a construction business that needs Project Management, Quoting, Invoicing and CRM as well as Inventory Management for wholesale of Tools and Parts.
co. uk/business/xero_international_payments/ for a detailed overview of our add-on's functionality.
##### CLUSTER 350 #####
I am of the opinion that the changing the preset unit sale price should be limited standard users and above or more conveniently, the adviser should have the option of preventing the "invoice only" user from being able to change the preset unit sale priceon invoices to be generated.
Imported transactions have the Due Date set to the same as the invoice date, it would be nice to be able to flag multiple invoices and update their due date.
It would be awesome to not have to allocate each credit to an invoice, rather to be able to select a credit note and include it in a batch full of invoices as a reducing amount.
In light of the recent column additions to invoices (discount and the reorder-rows grip), it would be nice to be able to make the invoice edit screen as wide as the screen allows, so the description column doesn't wrap as much.
With SAGE we used to be able to enter a batch of invoices without having to effectively re-create the purchase invoice.
##### CLUSTER 351 #####
It seems strange that I can spend MANY HOURS on Xero each week, using different journals, entries etc, without having any of that time and effort and knowledge recognised by Xero to go towards our annual accreditation?
Say for instance with the monthly Xero subscriptions, if we could set these up at a client level to automatically disburse each month onto a particular job then that would save a lot of time manually entering disbursements, missing on-charging Xero subs etc
Our database is synced between Xero Practice Manager and Xero and the postal address for the client updates in Xero each time we update it in Xero Practice Manger.
I absolutely hate Xero because of this and am probably going to switch my service to Quickbooks or other because of this simple, but very time consuming lack of logic on Xero's part.
Presently a photo of a receipt can be taken in Xero Touch at the time of the receipt creation, and it is automatically uploaded to the Xero financial files.
XERO IS NOW HURTING ALL SMALL USERS AND PROFESSIONAL ACCOUNTANTS, by making us either CURSE XERO for wasted time, tax notices and penalties OR EXCESSIVE FEES.
Also, it would be awesome if there was a way to create the W9 and W8BEN forms in Xero based upon the information entered in the contact so far and send a link to your vendors to complete/verify the information so you knew at tax time the basic information was 100% current/correct in Xero.
The first time I did the import Xero asked me to match the fields to the Xero fields using dropdown boxes.
I started using Xero payroll last month for the first time, after a few mishaps it finally seemed to go ok, except the PAYE figures differ from those on Xero to those which HMRC say we owe?
Lightspeed's integration to Xero seamlessly connects your point of sale to your Xero Accounting software, saving you time and money.
As someone who has taken a considerable amount of personal time to help Xero  identify and fix this problem on their end in order to both help me be assured that future Amex transactions will import correctly and also help Xero improve their software, I am upset that Xero support would indicate to me that I must have edited the file to create this problem.
##### CLUSTER 352 #####
At the moment, it goes back to the first page of the report which is really time-consuming.
This means I have to manually export each individual WIP category to excel and 'cut and paste' to get a full year end report which is very time consuming.
I have many pages making up the report containing many items with 0 stock and at the moment I have to export to excel and delete out all the lines of stock I don't want - it's extremely time consuming.
A simple report which shows the amount held at the current time, together with approved orders and committed quotes would help us manage our inventory items much more easily.
It is a really useful report as part of the year end process and has been promised for quite some time.
A very cumbersome and time consuming way of doing this for what would otherwise be a very good report.
When I export this report to review it takes quite a bit of time to hide the columns with no transactions.
I believe it would be extremely helpful admin-wise, if whenever we exported/downloaded a file the default name of the file would be "Name of Entity - Type of Report - Time Period" i. e. ABC Company - GST Return - 31 March 2014.
(2) If a user has a March financial year and runs a profit and loss report (compare periods) during the months of April - Sept 2014, 99% of the time they will be looking for year ended 31 March 2014. .
I am trying to find a discount report (ie: how many $ have we discounted over a certain period of time) for budgeting purposes.
The report takes significantly more time to run than most reports.
it is really time consuming and difficult to chase up and redo transactions at year end to find the missing transactions from a balance sheet report that is for a selected entity.
Extracting such report in xls would then allow for a clear analysis on product orders and profits over time and geography
However, in Myob  we could print "job reports" and one of the reports we used all the time was the "Job profit and loss" report.
Is it possible to have a "previous financial year" on the date options to make it easier to refer back to the year we are working in, rather then going through and changing the date every time you go out of a report?
In the mean time, we'll update the existing report ASAP.
##### CLUSTER 353 #####
We do job costing through xero and we would like the option to run a profit and loss report for each job.
My P+L report is almost complete but there is one line of income (monthly total for income from writing options in the US) that I'd like to include with my other income sources (all tracked by Xero).
I received a response from Xero support, they write: "We do have a report that can be prepared using the calculations you'd like to set up.
I have put some expense claims into Xero and been reimbused, but I would like these expenses to show up in my quarterly BAS report.
Does Xero provide a report like this?
##### CLUSTER 354 #####
It would be really good if i could use the down arrow or enter to go down a line when typing up invoices, as my invoices are generally quite large.
I use repeating invoices for airtime invoices, they are due on the 1st of every month.
It is sufficiently bad for some Xero users to use invoices instead of the expense claim function (as invoices can be both copied and edited).
We use SmartTrade (ST) for our job costing so all invoices and supplier invoices are entered in there.
We send draft invoices as quotes (because your API still doesn't support quotes and the advice was to use draft invoices).
##### CLUSTER 355 #####
It would save a lot of time if there was some automatic recording/date stamp and or automated button that records that a bank recon has been completed up to <insert date> b) it would be fabulous if their was a box(field) on the bank recon report we could key/type the balance off the bank statement in to as a way of confirming it has been checked against the bank statement.
The bank appeared fully reconciled on the Bank Reconciliation report because I had "reconciled" all transactions that WERE there - obviously I did not reconcile the transactions that were not there!
2) the bank reconciliation report should also ALWAYS show the imported bank statement balance as this may alert the user to the fact that there is an issue.
(I know some banks do not import opening closing balances, which there is nothing we can do about this, but I still think this field should still be added to the bank rec report) -  not a substitute for checking the bank statement, but an early indicator.
It would assist if a detailed report with the bank statement running balance could be run for any period from the Bank transaction screen so that we can resolve the out of balance amount with a bank statement.
I've checked my bank statement in bank reconciliation report, and no duplicate transaction has been found.
##### CLUSTER 356 #####
3) Direct bank feeds:- Why only bank feeds for UK / US / Australia and New Zealand?
I have approximately 20 unpresented cheques sitting in my "Plus Outstanding Payments" section of my  bank reconciliation that are about 5 years old, I am wanting to get rid of these from my bank reconciliation summary without giving new cheques.
HiI've set this bank feed up back in October but we didn't end up converting until January 2014 so I was deleting the statements from October the Bank Statement screen but now it's not importing the new transactions for this one credit card (the other company one is working fine).
Since First State Super  has updated their bank details recently  ,they suggested us checking  with Xero  that  if  system has  linked USI to their new bank details .
HiI have a new client converted with movemybooks, cannot set up bank feed, click on get bank feed and it hangs for ever and then does nothing at all.
##### CLUSTER 357 #####
Hi, I would like have the GST report to have page numbers.
Hi,I would like to see the P&L report by Due Date.
Hi,I would like to see a Profit & Loss report with Opening Stock + Purchases - Closing Stock.
Hi,We would like a report showing how much super has been paid for an employee for a specific period.
Hi,I have a client that would like to report by supplier (contact) based on the location goods were delivered to (the Tracking category).
Hi,we would like to run an aged receivables report with an option to select a certain customer group.
##### CLUSTER 358 #####
How will issues get to 50 votes, the point at which Xero will look to make changes, if you cannot add a vote at any given time, to what is important to, or directly impacts on, the user?
It's from attending the last two Xerocons, first time as an accounting partner and second time as a trainer for one of the Add-On's, that I came up with the idea - how cool would it be to get the information all the Xero Advisors need about the Xero Add-Ons and pass it onto them so they don't have to do it?
Connect Xero and all of your add-ons to create custom reports for complete, real-time visibility across your businessFor more information, check out .
Xero has a number of  CRM add-ons to choose from but we haven't got time to review in detail every single one.
They want me to build an add-on that pushes all the credit card autobilling activity and time tracking information into Xero.
I have a client wanting an add-on to Xero that allows the entry of timesheets once, using that data to then flow into job costing and at same time into payroll.
We have tried both Harvest and minute dock as xero add-ons, and both calculate time tracking by the hour, not the minute.
##### CLUSTER 359 #####
I really like the new inventory management in Xero.
I feel like the answer to this could be really basic, but I am brand new to Xero.
I do not want all the current costs categories appearing in his budget that appear when i try and set a new budget in Xero: things like directors salaries, staff salaries,insurance costs, etc etc.
I have some guide books, but would really like some advice from Xero users in New Zealand as to what are "must see" and "must do" activities.
Any help appreciated - I'm still new to Xero and despite some of the things I see missing, I do like it.
Purchaser of shares in an Australian company has set up his own Xero file and we would like to transfer the employee information to the his new file.
Although the search functionality (points 1 and 2 above) could be considered improvements (or new features), I think points 3 to 5 really are basic features that a beautiful piece of accounting software like Xero should include regardless.
New potential client is using Expensify to capture credit card transactions and would like them to integrate with Xero.
##### CLUSTER 360 #####
I think what Xero need to do is add special support for this or bug Yodlee to do so.
Xero hast all that data, no need to add categories from our side.
I cant seem to find anything in Xero and are happy to buy and Add on should we need to - can anyone point us in the right directions.
do i need to contact Xero to add?
We are contemplating changing over to Xero from MYOB, but we would need two add-ons, we think.
One area that I have realised is not affective for what I need is inventory so I am looking at add on market options that will fully integrate with Xero.
They need an add-on to Xero which handles the memberships and also a POS.
##### CLUSTER 361 #####
Also can you minimize the free trail, or make a seprate link for Clients of Xero customers who are just looking to pay bills.
I am just setting up payroll in our Xero system, and have some employees who have started before the first pay run.
In their respective pay template, the following has been set up:Earnings Rate: Ordinary Hours, 38 hours per week, annual salaryFor each payrun that I have completed I have not changed Xero's calculation for ordinary hours or the rate, I have just assumed that this is correct.
All the other payroll programs I have used seem to know all the all these variables but in Xero it seems to be just a straight 20% deduction - does this mean having to manually override each pay run?
HelloI have just discovered that xero payroll is accruing holiday pay on annual leave taken.
Xero is the only competitor that I've found that really even discusses security and you seem to just pay it lip service.
##### CLUSTER 362 #####
It would be great to be able to forward invoice attachments to Xero's file inbox without having to download and re-upload the document.
It would be great to be able to see more than 50 statements per pageProblem: client has 2 brands operating in Xero and therefore 2 lots of invoice branding.
How about being able to email the supplier invoice to bills@xero.
Its easy enough to adjust the email template on an as required basis, but it would be handy to be able to change the invoice attachment name on the fly, so that the email can be generated directly from within Xero.
We would love to be able to invoice via Dynamics 365, while still using Xero as the back end.
We would then be able to produce a professional looking pdf invoice from Xero and send this to the customer.
##### CLUSTER 363 #####
Invoice entering in Xero is the thing I spend my most time doing.
It would save a second or two per invoice and, with 200k users, that is a lot of time you could save this planet Xero :)
It's the first time I'm using Xero and this problem appeared when I was trying to send my first invoice to one of my customers.
I am sure that I am not alone in finding Xero's method of customising invoice templates in Word very cumbersome, time consuming and painful.
Complete a Xero enabled document to seamlessly create an invoice, saving you time and reducing data entry.
Xero has all the information (invoice - direct expenses / time sheet data).
##### CLUSTER 364 #####
I would love the Xero team to add a quick link allowing me to 'Add New' contacts quickly from the main menu.
It's now adding more work for me as i have to now add a new row delete the old one and add descriptions that i previously would have used.
We have been creating add-ons for a number for years and are planning in launching our new “Cash Collection “ add-on at the end of September.
We are delighted to announce that our new international payments add-on has been added to the Xero add-on store in the UK.
&#160;&#160; We have been creating add-ons for a number for years and are planning in launching our new “Cash Collection “ add-on at the end of September.
##### CLUSTER 365 #####
It would be great if in addition to being able to export your GST return as excel, PDF or Google docs, Xero would also add the feature to Print as PDF (IRD format).
It would be a good idea to be able to add or deduct and see transactions from Xero.
Is there a solution to be able to get these files quickly and neatly through XERO or an add/on app?
For notes containing numbers obtained from outside xero you are able to add custom lines.
It would be great help (for Xero Support and users) to be able to take screenshots and add them a support message as an attachment.
Does anyone have any recommendations on a good Xero Add-on product that will be able to handle job tracking, inventory, work in progress, parts etc?
##### CLUSTER 366 #####
Because Xero only allows one or the other on an employee pay template there is no way for us to track this information in Xero and we are forced to enter them as 10% catchup.
If we import these to xero,  closed purchase bill will become  open status purchase bill (is not paid)As situation myob don’t allow export pay  bill transaction, The question I mentioned is how to import closed status purchase bill into xero, and remain closed status.
HiHow does xero assign pay rates to hours submitted on timesheet through My Xero app?
I found a few typos in the Xero data I entered that didn't match the data as it was paid in the old system after I had posted the pay runs in Xero.
My fellow Xero Community, We are testing out Xero as a platform to take us from the dark ages to the modern world and i am surprised by the limitations of the "Pay Template".
However, when we go to Pay runs under Xero, we get the message:Your pension provider scheme details do not match the details you currently have in Xero.
This is more of a question - if you are a company and pay a subscription but work with Xero with your accountant, is it only your accountant that can access help from Xero?
##### CLUSTER 367 #####
Could you add the option to copy recurring invoices in both sales and purchases.
I'd like to be able to add repeating invoices every 30 days but currently the only options in the pull down are weeks and months.
Add an option to order transactions by Account Code and not just Date.
HI Would it be possible to pay Xero invoices as we receive them when funds are available instead of sitting on our hands waiting for you to take the money?
Hi,We have just hired an apprentice and have to pay a fee (which will later be partially reimbursed).
OK so a supplier just called me, wants me to pay the Overdue account.
Hi there,Currently using Xero for accounting for a small community organisation but wondering how other people have set up their Xero to comply with NZ charities new reporting standards?
(Tier 3 or tier 4)Do you set up new accounts under chart of accounts, matching the required categories charities requires e. g. donations, fundraising and other similar receipts; fees, subscriptions  or other receipts from members; receipts from providing goods or services; interest, dividends etc.
Hi,When entering conversion balance into xero for the Accounts Payable and Receivable, do we need to separate out the GST component or does Xero do that on its own?
Is it possible to use it just as a billing system and not run all accounts through it?
Hi there,I've mistakenly received a payment from the government health care system (from an operation I had) into my business account.
I use Xero to invoice clients for payments with the Stripe Add-On.
We are able to add bills and invoices, why not be able to add contacts straight from there too.
The remove and redo and sometimes the unreconcile functions were used and everything looked peachy,I ran the Bank Reconciliation summery report and lo and behold, at the top are a list of outstanding payments, above my new unreconciled transactions.
Hi There, we have someone who makes a habit of mistakenly paying invoices out of the wrong account.
Invoice #109 was incorrectly paid so we transferred $66 out of our bank account back to her and she's made a separate payment once again for $66.
We want to still be able to send statements etc, if requested, but adding a credit note to the invoices means that we are not able to do this as they're down as 'paid'.
I use a Foreign Exchange clearing account to enable payment from one foreign account to another.
To reduce the loan I have paid personally back to a the business bank account and then coded as 'payment received' .
Hi, I am trying the following transaction:Purchase of new fixed asset with 20% cash deposit (bank account) and remaining balance using a commercial loan.
Hi all, We're a small manufacturing business and have purchased some of our input materials on EBay (via Paypal on the business credit card) I now need to input these expenses into Xero and reconcile, however as we don't receive tax invoices can I still include anything in the GST field?
and now It wont let me enter the payment from Director's account as I only see Pay From: Only Bank accounts and petty cash.
We get an annual statement and I want to account for the growth and show the new account balance on their balance sheet.
I was thinking to tally the total expenses and group it somehow as cash introduced into the business by the shareholder and the payment to the credit card from the business cheque account to be coded as drawings out of the business.
Im not sure the system will be able to distinguish between expenses paid for by a business account and expenses paid for by a shareholder and in turn how should the capital/drawings account all get adjusted ?
Hi all,My girlfriend has made the mistake of paying her GST bill from a personal bank account that doesn't have a feed to her Xero account.
Let's say if I don't want to add new invoice YET due to lack of info.
Hi All,I have built a new Cafe/Bakery business and if you can imagine, we commenced design / construction prior to the actual incorporation of GST.
I have high volume of invoices to enter and would like to add the numbers in only no slashes / as this makes data entry inefficient.
You pay for things like a normal credit card however it doesn't have an account number of it's own and it's difficult for ReceiptBank or anything to really understand it's statements.
I therefore pay the Credit account on an entirely separate date via my main bank account.
My question is, how do I categorise, perhaps maybe within the chart of accounts, a private credit card (i. e. paypal credit) as a source for the payment of transaction and to be paid off by my main account?
I was hoping to record payments in Xero as and when we pay by bacs or card payment over the phone.
Hi Experts,I am doing GST for the first time so i need some advice.
We use DEAR with Amazon integration, and when we recieve a sale, DEAR creates an invoice in xero and a payment against it, currently coded to a 103 Amazon bank account.
We are using A2X to help us to match amazon payments to our bank account with amazon invoices that include all amazon transaction like fees, shippings as well as product sales credits.
Hi all, I run a small insurance agency in Singapore and would like to use Xero as my accounting software.
Hi, Im new in this software so I will like to know if any one can recommend me the best way to record a mortage payment.
I use Cliniko for my business and create single invoices for pateient's appointment thought their system - those get imported in Xero and all ok.
Hi,We're a company in Australia and we have multiple currency in Xero to be able to use USD in addition to the AUD.
Do I just need to add the scheme type and Xero will do the rest or am I being too simplistic here?
These yearly fees are quite large and so I would like to be able to split these bills across 12 months so that I can essentially "pay" a 12th of these bills each month.
So, I wanted to start using Xero for a company by entering some sales invoices, configuring accounts, suppliers etc etc.
But I won't be able to create a new one with the correct name if I have already used the correct name - does Xero think that ABC Ltd and ABC Limited are different organisations?
We recently started a new business - this required purchasing an existing business, what code do I use for the purchase?
HelloI am just starting to look at using the budget manager for our business, we are VAT registered and I wondered if this considers sales including or excluding vat?
I have a purchase invoice for the new machine and have a self billing sales invoice for the part exchange.
So what we need is to be able to enter the annual budget split across some of the codes in the chart of accounts (not all codes in the CoA are relevant for this specific fund) and to easily see what we have left in the budget across the two tracking categories for each code.
Because it was a new business with no clients, I obviously had to pay for the insurance out of my own money.
I was told that filling out and sending in that form would allow my bank feeds to be removed from my old account and transferred to my new xero account.
When I run a supplier or customer invoice report and include any voided or deleted invoices, there are still some invoice sequence numbers missing from the report.
i mean just simply add the numbers from my old account system eith no details.
Hello,  I have been reconciling a bank account and when I go to the reconciliation report a transaction keeps appearing as an Un-Reconciled Bank Statement Line.
We started a new organization and moved one of the bank accounts from one of the orgs to the other.
I need help with recording one transaction in the business completed in the foreign currency and i need to record that.
I have an invoice that I'd like to delete or apply a credit note to but Xero won't let me because apparently there is a payment associated with it.
It's a very old invoice and it's making my Xero bank balance not tally with my physical bank balance.
- Due to our subscription based business model, I need to create manual journals to apply VAT calculations to cash coming into the bank account from sales through our payment service provider.
I basically need a way of adding a Euro equivalent amount to our business' GBP invoices.
Do I need to create a new expense account like "Loss on asset theft", and put the insurance compensation into it as well to balance it?
I am trying to add a bank account to a new client.
2) If yes to question 1, would I have to create a user account for the person that wants to claim the expense and have the new user account input their expenses?
my bank account only lets me pay in whole numbers using notes at the atm machine no coins, as a vat registered company my invoices are rarely whole numbers.
Hi all,I'm in Canada, and my business is able to file GST using the "quick method".
Hi allSo am slighty new to xero and have been using the bank statement reconcile screen to enter in purchases or sales  that i have not made invoices or bills for assuming they would be made automatically.
so figured out that is not the case but now i have to submit return end of the month but the accountant is asking me to attached all the paperwork ( i have no printed paperwork)Problem is ive managed to attach all the invoices for the bills but there wasnt much there so after a few hours googling, i worked out spent transaction are the no the same as bills etcnow i need to find all my spent transactions and attached the docs to each one but i can see noo way of having them all in one list, and also no way of knowing which spent transaction has something attached already or not in list viewi feel like giving up to be honest  and telling the accountant i will do it correctly going forward and not bothering attaching anything for previous and just wait for hmrc to come knockingXero would be doing everyone a massive favour by telling us that reconciling on the bank statement does not create invoices.
Hi Community,I am setting up my non-profit business in Xero and need some advice on how to handle two layers of tracking for each transaction.
I just started a business, but haven't opened for business yet.
I have been paying my business credit card from my personal account (won't be doing that anymore) but I don't have my personal accounts loaded into xero.
I am relatively new to Xero and have encountered a problem with the recording of invoices with an existing Xero account with which I have been engaged to "clean up".
It appears that some of the invoices were recorded with a net amount to receivables, gross to sales, and an amount to a factoring expense account.
Hi,I am new to Xero and am trying to reconcile a Shopify payouts vs my bank account transactions.
When I click "find and match" ("show spent items" is selected) for the bank account transaction that I am trying to reconcile, I do NOT see either:1) Invoices that were automatically created by Shopify (only see manual invoices that were created in Xero for sales closed manually).
Hi Just need to find out is there anyone out there using Xero for law firm accounting ?
Hi all,Our business in the UK has just switched away from Flat Rate VAT to the standard cash accounting scheme.
I receive orders in 3 ways, and receive payment in 4 ways:(1) Online orders(2) Direct orders from the brick and mortar store (very few orders as we carry very little inventory)(3) Quotesand payments:(1) Credit card through the online store(2) Paypal through the online store(3) Bank transfer for online purchases and quotes(4) Cash at the brick and mortar store for payments against online purchases and direct purchasesTo avoid duplication of information, I use the online store back-office for invoicing all online purchases.
Because the Electricity Account for the premises is in my Business name, I invoice my landlord for his share of the electricity and have an revenue account code called 'recovered utilities'.
Hello,I have a receive money on my bank reconcilation screen that is a refund from a supplier that I would like to allocate off other invoices from this supplier, the find and match option is not working.
Hi I am still using basic PAYE tools for wages, how do I reconcile a single bank payment to HMRC into accounts 825 PAYE, 479 EMP NI,  826 NI.
This obviously worked at the time but has put my profit and loss out for the month before by nearly £6,000 and Xero is requesting me to pay the bill, which obviously I dont need to.
And are unfamiliar with XeroWe have a chart of accounts in Xero, bank/loan/CC statements and csvs, and any other documentation we might need.
Xero's income by customer report should be called invoice by customer, because it includes shipping and sales taxes and any other items on an invoice that are not REVENUE, and doesn't reconcile to the income statement.
My business is relatively small and I am an accountant and know my way around excel very well, so to get what I need, I run a transaction report for all of my income accounts and export them to excel, then copy and paste all of these exports into one file, then sort/filter and sometimes create a pivot table to summarize by customer.
I have all my business accounts in Xero and love how easy it is to reconcile and track these accounts.
Client enters invoice for each sale, customers pay all invoices by credit card, credit card merchant service then groups payments received that day into 1 deposit per day into client's bank account.
Some credit card companies do not forward the funds on the same day as they post the transaction so there may be a lag time of 1 or more days before the merchant service receives the payment, bulks everything received that day and deposits to the client's account.
We are importers and use 3rd party foreign currency payment provider to pay our overseas suppliers.
We receive a pro-forma invoice from our supplier , we then need to pay a deposit sowe contact our 3rd party provider, they then they give us an exchange rate and we acceptThey then issue an invoice for the local currency equivalent of the the foreign amount we are paying our supplier + a transfer feeWhen we need to pay balance  the same procedure happens.
I added these personal accounts credit cards to my Xero account to pick out the business expenses.
I need add also in sales, as in bank will enter ony a part of it (sales less fees).
UK small business: I normally pay myself as the director and only employee at the end of the month, and let the Payroll add-on process it.
Hi, I would like to know how to reconcile my bank statements to suppliers that I pay amounts that do not match any of the invoices entered.
I own a small business, and would like to pay a bookkeeper to help me.
Accounts receivable and sales tax show the total of invoice instead of separating vat and income.
But, the major liability to us is, out of the payment we receive, we incur liabilities like paying to Charities, Staffs, Card Holder a certain percentage of the amount recognised as Sales.
As we need to invoice the merchants and customer monthly as a Statement, we create a spread sheet outside of Xero with all the balance received from them for the last month and mail them.
What I did is, from the chart of account, I edited the sales account with account type as Pre-payment and the tax rate being "GST on Income".
As a new Xero user (transferring from QuickBooks), I have just spent 2 days planning my Chart of Accounts, so I have a template for all clients.
From what I am being told, providers like FIS don't want services like Yodlee to be able to work its a security issue for them, which would effectively make Xero's ability to pull account data impossible.
uk/expenses-and-benefits-trivial-benefitsDo i need a new 'gifts' entry on the chart of accounts?
Hi there,When I started my bar business a few months ago, I purchased a commercial property and had to contract a loan by the bank.
HiI'm new to XERO, and need to be able to add payments and receipts from the bank statement manually but I can't see where to do this, I've searched the guides etc on help but the topic keeps coming up to switch on bank feeds which in my business is not possible and never will be.
I am a new user to Xero and when experimenting with Report Layouts last week, I successfully managed to move Inventory from Current Assets (Balance Sheet) directly to Direct Costs (P&L).
Out of all, I did copy, then deleted items that I didn't need and saved under new vendor for making payment to each vendor.
Do you hold a master invoice for a company and list each invoice line by line (Issue is you seem to have to undo and redo payments as you make further payments on the account)OrLog each invoice individually which is causing reconciliation issues where a total balance has been cleared rather than specific invoices.
Hi, I was wondering how I would go about categorizing a transfer between my bank accounts?
For example, I have a business chequeings, and savings accounts, and a business credit card.
Hi , I just recoded some transactions done in Jan17, It is actually recode from the Sales tax GL to GST liabilities GL.
I currently log PAYE expenses through my bank account on Xero, as PAYE is handled by my accountant; but my quandary comes when I do not want to actually pay the money, but retain it in the business until I am able to pay myself.
I go to invoice in question and fill out the "receive a payment" with the amount and select "paid to" as the bank account.
We don't want to invoice them as you'll have to pay and then reclaim it back later which is just a complicated paper exercise.
I have recently printed out my BAS GST Audit Report and some of my payments to suppliers only shows our company name in the reference box, and not the invoice reference like it used to.
I have since discovered by my own research that there is a section in the supplier contact file that now (for some unknown reason) includes our company name on some of my suppliers (I didn't enter this info as our company name is spelled incorrectly as must have been a behind-the-scenes change to xero), and this is what is preventing the invoice number displaying on the audit report.
I would like to pay my monthly salary into a director's loan account, rather than paying to a bank account directly.
This means accounts are unable to be fully reconciled and is hard to keep track of budget as money has been spent but Xero hasn't been able to reconcile it.
I don't need to track debtors or creditors and just need to be able to enter the balances for the 2016 Financial reports with Prior year balances (I am reconciling in another software program).
15 but then I need to know which account to offset it against and for the accounts payable it could be multiple accounts that I can't identify doing it this way.
Hi everyone,Insurance issued a cheque payment deposited in to bank account ( bank feed to Xero directly) for a motor vehicle written off caused by accident.
Because i don't have access to the bank accounts myself i ask the business managers to export a qif or csv file, with an overlap of dates by a couple of days either side.
Hi, Everyone,we pay employees every month, and I have the habit of recording just a single transaction in xero for all employees wage payment monthly, however, in the bank statement, the net salary paid is comprised of several statement lines because we pay employees individually.
The only way I can think to bring the transactions over is to use the Manual Journal and debit the Owners Distribution account and credit the Sales account.
Currently the team raise an invoice each day reflecting the income from the apartment accommodation and then spend considerable time matching payments into the bank account from online and offline banking to settle the sales invoice to zero.
I now have a bank line for Transaction A123, and need to reconcile it against the Invoices for both of those clients.
I've just been asked to do a month long free trial of Xero - we currently use Sage 50 Accounts and I have to process everything on both systems for one month and compare.
Bank Ref    Customer Ref   Credit  Debit  Running BalanceThe Xero template looks nothing like any bank statement I've ever seen.
We also need to merge 2 bank accounts, one is a Bank account I created in error after setup and have already put transactions to it.
For about 18 month to 'track' payments I've been creating 3 invoices per client and this permits me to see cashflow far superior that a single invoice and we 'split' the payment to each invoice when received.
I need to account for - gross pay, net pay, income tax and NICs.
Now next month I want to do Vat run and the report looks something like thisVat ReconInv 1 - R300    31/1/16               Submitted 31/1/16Inv 2 - R400    31/1/16               Submitted 31/1/16Inv 3 - R100    31/1/16               Amount edited, previously submitted R500 -  31/1/16 Inv 4 - R300    31/1/16                Inv 5 - R1000  31/1/16               Submitted 31/1/16Inv 6 - R300    1/2/16Inv 7 - R200    1/2/16Inv 8 - R400    1/2/16Total R3000               Total Submitted R2200As you can see i need to still claim R800but if i had done a February vat report on the current xero report it would of shown Inv 6 - R300    1/2/16Inv 7 - R200    1/2/16Inv 8 - R400    1/2/16Total R900, as it did not pick up inv 4 new and invoice 3 adjusted.
Is the invoice number correctly incremented ; when creating an invoice manually i have to look at the MAX value i already have and add 1 (seems like software could do that itself?
Hi, I am trying to reconcile my bank statement but some of my customers pay a different amount to what I have invoice them.
I also now have the invoice for the equipment, that doesn't have the money coming out of our bank acc, because it was never IN the bank acc.
I just formed a new LLC and opened a checking and savings account for this business.
I also just created my Xero account, so I have been trying to form the Chart of Accounts.
Hi,I'm wondering if anyone can helpWe want to start using Xero to make payments directly onto our HSBC Net bank account but we are unsure how to do this.
So now can I just mark payment for bills as '881 - owner a funds introduced' and link to the $50 transaction from business bank account?
Hello,  I need to set up a Dishonoured Payment account in my chart of accounts to record the fraudulent "receive money" transaction from our customer and the bank retrieval "spend money" transaction.
Xero is very user friendly, and seems like you could just add a sort button at the check printing stage.
I like all the other feature, just seems like this one is missing.
Every month my company puts a percentage of revenue (from the previous month) aside to be used in two ways:1) 30% is split amongst the employees as a bonus on the following pay period2) 70% is donated to a local non profitFor each I have a monthly journal entry that moves the appropriate funds to liability accounts:Bonus: Debits 'Wages and Salaries' (expense) and credits the liability accountCharity: Debits 'Charitable Contributions' (expense) and credits the liability accountWhen the time comes to pay the charitable amount I simply create a check payment and assign the payment to the charitable liability account.
- Is there a way to add a note onto the invoice to reflect that the supply is subject to the reverse charge or should this be done manually each time?
Hi everyone, As part of my EOM invoicing procedure I cross check my P&L income amount compared to my customer invoice transaction report to ensure both amounts match (I know then that I am okay to move onto the rest of my reporting) however, for November my P&L is showing a $38.
70 GREATER amount thenbwhat my customer invoice report is which leads me to believe that something during the course of the month was allocated to the income account incorrectly.
Xero needs to add a posting Period to allow management Accounts to be correct, particularly as we are using Crunchboards to report to our management Team.
Hi,I am going through my accounts for the year and looked at my balance sheet where I have a sales tax liability.
Steps to do this in MYOB Accountright Plus/Go to the Purchase register/Type in the suppliers name/Type in a date range if wanted/Toggle between All/Open/ClosedAt no time do I have to re-enter the suppliers name Steps to do this in Xero/Go to the Purchase register/Go to awaiting payment - As the invoices are showing outstanding on the suppliers statement/click the search button and then type in the suppliers name/Reconcile the statement.
At this point the statement doesn't reconcile and there is a need to look at the paid invoices to see if the supplier has yet to enter your most recent payment.
I use one business credit card and one business checking account, and both are connected via feeds to Xero.
Hi All,I process accounts for a tourism business.
Tracking Per TourAn OtherI need to produce a report which shows all my customers/supplier invoices split:Per TourPer An other.
Just wanted to double check that when I'm reconciling my HMRC payments, I need to split them between the following codes:479 Employers National Insurance826 NIC Payable825 PAYE PayableOne related query is that I'm just doing last year's accounts and 479 above is showing correct values for last FY and also YTD, whereas 826 is showing YTD value as the value in total of all of last year's plus this year's, how can that be?
I avoid using business card for non business items, but have just found an example of exactly that.
Hi, I reconciled a payment from my account but that transaction has now been refunded less a small fee.
One option I was considering was creating a new set of accounts with no vat, e. g. "Direct Expense (PreVAT)" and the updating transactions to use this.
Please help your Japan based customers to be able to connect their Xero accounts with Japanese banks.
The IRD is clear with the GST guidelines that the time of supply is the earlier of:  1. 	 the time an invoice is issued by the supplier or the recipient in respect of that supply; or   2. 	 the time any payment is received by the supplier in respect of that supply.
We manage several individual entities on Xero - which means that any amendments to nominal accounts need to be replicated for each entity, to ensure they remain consistent.
When I started with Xero I added some invoices that had been paid in my old system but had to remain unpaid in Xero in order for my balances in Xero to match my bank balance.
A new xero plan with does not involve employees but allows for GST and unlimited sales and purchase invoices.
Hi,I've just found a client that has outstanding invoices has gone in to liquidation and therefore is unlikely to pay.
Hi,We have purchased some new computers for our Business but not sure on how to account for it.
I want to know if using Xero I can chose to don't pay the VAT on sales until I get the invoice paid from my customers and if I can do it can you explain to me how can I do it?
Hi all, I'm trying to allocate a bank statement line into two bank accounts I've created for to different credit cards.
My bank has charged me a singe payment to cover the expense of two credit cards and a small bank fee.
I used SAP previously and just need to DR AP(customer account) and CR inter- company loan.
Hi, Have just started a new business and ready to start with Xero.
Hi everyone,I have a slightly complex problem with regards to bank accounts I need to sort out.
As part of leaving, it was decided that as there wasn't very much money in our bank account, that we would just setup a brand new bank account which the business would continue to use and the partner would just keep what was in the old business account.
50  - I'm not sure which account I should use for this as I don't have a "Drawings" account in my COA?
I pay a number of my accounts via standing order so the amount I pay doesn't necessarily pay the bill in full at any given time often leaving a residual amount outstanding.
So if I have my water account, currently I pay £5 per month towards it and I receive an invoice every 6 months.
Can I just add the £5 to the water account or do I need to reconcile it split across the various bills?
I then pay the credit card bill out of my normal current account and transfer this payment over to the credit card account, where this then shows as unreconciled, how do I reconcile this transaction?
Hi all,I need to produce a report for a big potential customer which shows our on time payment performance over the last 6 months.
I thought the best way would be to create a new bank account in xero called Gift Cards, then when I buy a card using the checking account, I would decrease the checking account $90 as in asset, increase Gift card Account $10 as income and $90 as asset.
Hi there,I'm a freelancer and don't operate with a proper business bank account, rather I have a separate current account and all my business related payments go in/out from there.
When I set up an account for a new Credit Card I inadvertently selected Bank Account.
Periodically I have my printer produce new cards to put into inventory, so I may have, for example, 50 inventory items, already in the system, which need to have their "Quantity on Hand" increased due to the new print run I did to increase stock on that item.
Here in New Zealand, I have our Personal Government Assistance (Working for Families tax credits) for our child being paid directly into our Business Account.
I assume we need a specific account in chart of accounts.
orsetup the online broker as a bank account in xero by clicking on "add it anyway" and transfer the money across from a cash account.
Hi all - we sell a product and pay commission on it to the sales person on the invoice using the tracking options.
How to I handle the balance for PayPal Credit since I can't add that account to Xero?
com/business/discussion/7032238-> create a money spent/ money received transaction, depending whether the Amazon statement is positive or negative-> add line items for product sales and Amazon fees as per statement.
My subs bill me, I enter the bill in Xero,  pay the bill and then record the payment in Xero.
I see three scenarios where inventory adjustments should be made, but since we aren't tracking, not sure how many new accounts I need to build:1.
Hi Guys,I am looking for the way to process a part payment of an invoice made via EFT.
Hi,I have 3 invoices that I have received payment for via direct deposit.
Hi, My bank returned a creditor payment due to incorrect bank account details.
The situation is like this: - The owner frequently uses the business current account for his personal expenses.
We have 1 pay pal account however there appears to be 2 separate accounts set up on Xero.
I don't need to process another payroll as the amounts he has been paid FY to date are correct (I did a manual transaction to the correct account) however I do need to record these two transactions.
Cash on hand - as business pays bill via cash and only banks cash from time to time.
My guess is, the unreconciled bank lines need to hit the Profit and Loss accounts, so we can claim the GST credits and expenses as deductions against our income in financial year .
My question is: As I did the VAT return manually using our old accounts system and added July's invoices from Xero - is there any way of marking off the July invoices (both sales and purchase) which I included in the VAT return?
I then see that I would have to go to the chart of accounts and select the default drop down tax code for each nominal account, but this can be overridden at the time of invoice input.
For example, a YE balance sheet in Xero shows the following:Common Stock                                             10,000Current Year Earnings                                   55,000Dividends Declared During Current Year     -50,000Retained Earnings (from prior year)                1,000Total Equity                                                    16,000When it should just be showing:Common Stock                                                                          10,000Retained Earnings (net, accumulated, as of end of this year)     6,000Total Equity                                                                                16,000You can do a manual journal entry to net out the Current Yr Divs vs Retained Earnings as follows (which is the classic way of closing out dividends declared during the year):DR Retained Earnings                                       50,000CR Dividends Declared During Current Year     50,000(you cannot DR Current Year Earnings instead of Retained Earnings in the above entry because Xero calculates such on the fly (i. e, there is no "real" Current Year Earnings account in Xero).
I need to avoid creating additional separate accounts unfortunately because I have to abide by our German chart of accounts, which doesn't meet our needs and is very limiting.
Hello, I have just started using bank feeds for our US based business.
Hi which Xero account should I use for refreshments bought for interviews with external candidates?
Whilst I would like to revert to the old format of reports,  if that is not possible I either need to find the old bespoke templates or find someway of saving the new under a new name.
I can see where the option is to name the new report  under the new editor.
"Capital Introduced"I have found other features great but this seems like a lot of double handling as a sole trader we don't always use the business account or credit card so there are going to be "cash" or "personal account transactions we need to allocate and it needs to be a simple process to just record them and not want re-imbursing for them as the business money and personal money is all our money so we don't need the refund just need to show the expenses for tax purposes.
I have been following the guides around this message board and else where, and have started to set up a daily 'invoice' to record my retail sales, positive sales lines by department and then negative lines into accounts I have set up to handle different payment types ie cash, card etc.
The problem I have run into is that my guests might have a meal which is run through the till one evening, but pay for it the next day, so the sales will appear on day one, but the payment will be on the 'invoice' for day to, so that invoice is a negative.
I am sure there is a simple way of doing this, like handling the weekly summary on one invoice, but it is a 24 hour business, so Sunday night's sales will always usually be paid for on the Monday, which would be the following week, or monthly, in which case the last day of the months sales would be paid for on the 1st of the next month.
This works for the profit and loss sheet report, but the sales tax report is including those purchases.
Can't I just DR and CR one account for shareholder advances instead of using two accounts?
I'm new and with a new business and I've read lots of the articles and help on entering GST on imports/freight bills etc, which are great and think i'm starting on the right track.
I need to find and accountant who is able to deal with my returns in both Australia and New Zealand .
We would like to use the "Xero to Xero" function for intercompany recharges.
Hi I am helping someone with his accounts, but I am new to Xero, he has a company with one business account but using his personal and credit card accounts on Xero as well, all receiving live feed from the bank, I would never have added the personal account and the persoanl credit card account to Xero in the first place but he has done so, it has been months and now there are hundreds of personal transactions unreconciled, nothing to do with the business, as it is a company, any ideas, how can he deal with this?
We have just set up a new business, and I have used my personal money to fund it, plus a cash loan from a relative.
Hi all,I have a services business where we run multiple projects for multiple clients at one time.
Client AProject 1Project 2Project 3I need to be able to report a P&L for each project.
The issue we have is that we sell in currencies which we don't have foreign currencies for (e. g. CAD), yet because of the payment process that exists the payment is actually made to a different FX account (e. g. USD) rather than our base currency accounts.
As such, when we post the invoice in Xero in CAD and try and match the payment in our USD account it won't come up under "Find/Match".
If we open the invoice and add a payment, only our base currency accounts (i. e. GBP) appear.
Whenever I tried posting a manual journal to move the balance from the RE account to Sales, it posted in each account twice - which makes me think that Xero treats these accounts as one in the same.
(retrieved from Aged Receivables report)All new sales, payments and credit notes (activity within Xero) in the middle.
He has been paying back this debt back to the business as a service, so it looks like the business is earning a income.
Click New Transaction, New receive Money, and was expecting to see 'Director's loan account' as an option to receive the money from.
I need to run a vat report for a past quarter in Xero but for a date period before the oldest date option that Xero gives me.
I am new to Xero and am finding it difficult to get a clear position (sales and total expenses) of my business on a cash accounting basis.
The best I seem to get is if I run a Cash Summary Report, except it counts all my Owner A Drawings (amounts I have transferred from the business account to personal account - essentially my income) as Operating Expenses.
Is there a better way to get a clear business position on a cash basis - I don't think I am asking anything substantial - I just want to be able to see in one clear spot:Total Income (sales) receivedTotal Expensesand if possible GST and PAYG movements Or am I incorrectly allocating drawings?
New to XERO - How do I decrease the amount set in an invoice without applying an actual payment to it.
I use the card exclusively for business, and now I have a potential credit sitting there which could be used, but I can't seem to think how to use it and then account properly.
I have worked out which reports I need for most of the accounts but am stuck on the Accounts payable report, I think it is to do with the revaluation of the payments.
- Customer advance pays me in full for $300 invoice (they wanted to pay before june 30) which goes into my bank account.
When getting paid checks by the larger company there are no taxes taken out so I put 30% in our business savings account so we can save it for when it comes time to pay taxes.
I am just unsure of which "account" to put it in when I reconcile our bank accounts.
Hi there,I'm trying to sort out our accounts for end of financial year - everything has been reconciled just fine.
I have just started using Xero with a new business and I have imported a whole lot of inventory items that we purchased from a previous business that is closing down.
Hi All I run a non-profit organisation and I am battling to set Xero up to allow me to report as I need to in order to comply with the requirements of multiple donors.
In order to report against separate budgets, I need to be able to map transactions in my accounts to fit within the grant budget account codes.
In order to accurately gauge my expenditure on a particular budget,  I need to create a profit and loss report, filtered by that particular grant and then manual add all of my separate Comms accounts together.
When I make a provisional tax payment which Income Tax account am I meant to use for this?
Hello,I need advise setting up Xero to  GST - Sales tax.
Do I need to set up bank accounts for Worldpay and Paypal, and reconcile individual sales against them or is there a more efficient solution?
I would normally log the payment against the bill, and add the exchange rate the credit card used at the time of payment.
Hi Xero community,I'm converting from QBO to Xero my hubbys business starting today 1 July.
I want to be able to allocate these expenses to a chart of account but there doesn't seem to be anything set up in Xero for donations.
Just in the process of preparing our accounts from our first year of using Xero.
During payment batchesFirstly - I would like to separate the supplier accounts 1.  to manage payment batches, in order to make the process quicker and easier.
Secondly - I would like to be able to choose more that 200 items for payment!
Should we start a fresh Xero account and wind down the old Xero trading account gradually or just change the company name in our existing one?
So, I have been using the transfers tab to manager funds going in and out of the business bank accounts.
I use '740 buildings' (a fixed asset) with tracking for each property, and increase (debit) it every time I a) buy a new property, and; b) undertake capital works on an existing property.
Specifically, what type of account should I use for 'XXX - Unrealized capital gain': - (contra) fixed asset - non-current liability - (contra) non-current assetI guess 'YYY- Capital gain on disposal' should be some type of revenue account, maybe: other revenue?
The money that we used was put in to a brand new bank account and then spent on various things for the business which I recorded in Xero.
My question is with the new financial year beginning I would like to start fresh and was wondering what's the quickest way to delete all transactions and have bank feeds continue as they do from 1st of July?
I have to pay annual subscriptions for software modules that I use in the business.
How do I code Dropbox which I use in my own business - I make an annual payment, so is this also an asset with a depreciation of one year?
Hi all, We are a limited company who moved to using Xero from Excel for our third accounting year and importing all our records has been fine, except for the Opening Balances/Conversion Balances for two in Credit Directors Loan Accounts and an overdrawn Business Bank Account.
We are new to Xero and setting up for a business that invoices our customer for a 12 month Direct Debit this is set up via Gocardless on our website.
I need to the total of tax exempt sales in the sales tax report.
I want to set this up in repeating invoices and most of the features I need are there, I can add placeholders to say what month is being invoiced, set it up for the 31st as the invoicing date and it will invoice on the last day of the month.
The advice I have received so far is to forget about doing invoices for each day and just do a receive money entry for each bank deposit but I'm wondering how I go about getting the GST Free portion correct if I do it this way - or is it a matter of calculating the GST amounts and breaking it down for each entry?
We are a new business and to support the cash flow, I am asking my new customers to pay a deposit of $500 towards their account (While I use the capital to purchase plant and equip) and their account is then credited with stock against their pre-payment.
issue: invoice goes to client from company B, the client pays the amount to company A bank account (payment SHOULD be made to company B account).
I need to move the payment in company A account over to company B account.
Also, in some cases there has been an invoice sent from both company A and company B to the client, and the client has paid the full amount of both invoices to only 1 of the company accounts.
One way we thought to handle the second example is- remove the transaction in the bank reconciliation (in company A)- create a payment received (in company A) for the amount that applies to company A invoice- transfer (via our bank account) the remaining amount from company A to company B- then we can reconcile the amount in company BDoes that make sense?
Hi, we tried to pay an account via bank transfer which has bounced back.
Hi All, I started using Xero to add all my inventory, however, What do i do when i want to use my inventory as a shop use ?
Hi,I am new to xero, the past 2 years I have just recorded my accounts on a spreadsheet so I have no opening balances for creditors, debtors, suppliers or customers.
I have also just opened a new business bank account so no opening balance for that.
Hi guys,We accept 3 types of payments on our website:- Bank transfer- Invoice for selected customersHence we have 2 records:- Bank statement- Website recordFor bank transfer, it will go into our website record after we received funds in bank account.
Hi All,We are receiving Purchase Orders from clients for services to be provided in the future and we invoice on a fortnightly basis against the received PO for the time spent.
Hi, First time using Xero, just setting up conversion balances for year ended 31 March 2015 (so I can use Xero for 2016 financial year), but not sure about client overpayments.
We have a few clients who over pay their invoices, (e. g. invoice in 2015 for $100, client pays $200, leaving $100 overpayment), which sits in our bank account and gets applied to future invoices when they are created (next financial year).
We are based in NZ, but one client is in AUS who we invoice in AUD and they pay into a foreign currency account (AUD).
I have seen a few suggestions to use Tracking Categories to allocate the Sales / Costs of goods brought to order, however I cannot see how this would work for items sold from stock, i. e. a large volume of one item purchased and then partly sold over several invoices later on.
Hello, I am new to Xero and need a little help with setting up how to account for our revenue.
I'm a sole trader and as such have all my invoices paid into my business account.
We will need to charge New Zealand customers GST and according to the GST tax act, this needs to be converted to NZD and be shown somewhere on the invoice (so both the supplier and customer will enter the same amount in their GST records).
65When I have created this invoice in Xero, it just states everything in USD and doesn't do any conversion anywhere on the invoice of the GST amount to NZD.
I have noticed that if you use the bank reconciliation function to create a transaction and the invoice date on the transaction is different from the date of cash payment/receipt, Xero incorrectly takes the date of the transaction as the date to be used for the purposes of VAT cash accounting - thereby totally disregarding the actual date cash was paid or received as per the bank statement.
My husband has just started a business and is a sole trader and has just been paid by the builder.
Just filed my quarterly sales tax payment to the state of California.
Between the rounding discrepancy and the use tax, the balance on my Sales Tax liability account is -15.
I would like to create an expense account called Use Tax and Sales Tax Rounding Adjustments which would absorb the balance of the sales tax liability account.
To clarify we'd like to see this at the report level almost like a G/L line (new business, open opportunities, etc. )
Because people purchased wine dinner tickets in advance and they were rung in through my point of sale, I can't remove them from my daily sales invoice or I can't reconcile my bank account.
Hi I have followed a few guide and force created a bank called 'Stripe' to essentially reconcile my stripe payments against sales invoices individually which works well for me.
I have just amended our invoice with new bank details and uploaded it back to Xero, this has caused an issue in regard to layout and no information showing on the invoice when i click any in any account to view.
I work full-time and have my own part-time business which I operate as a sole trader.
Hi folks,So here's the scenario:A non-EU customer pays for an order (partially for fully) for which the UK based business must generate the 'the full' invoice (in line with HMRC advice on 'Time of supply' or 'tax point')The goods are shipped in 3 lots - the above invoice can't be used for shipping as the 'commercial invoice' because the consignee will end up paying the full duties/taxes at their end 3 times.
Or am I missing the correct way to create a new account as an "accounts payable" account to which bills can be created from (as in QB)?
In Washington State businesses must pay a Use Tax on all items that when purchased, do not have sales tax added on the sale.
When I mark the invoice paid in that billing program it marks it paid in xero and creates a transaction in my bank account.
Objectives:1) Each satellite office to be able to use Xero as if for an independent business.
We have a invoice spread over the year that we pay monthly, however the last payment of the invoice has been terminated and cleared off and is not required.
Actually is this possible with all accounts (not just bank accounts)?
Hiya, new to Xero and having a few issues, can anyone please advise me:I have bank fed and reconciled my accounts so that they balance.
Now I'm trying to move to Xero (due to needing to use A2X) but getting very confused about how to account for these payments, as I seem to only be able to code them to one thing in Bank Reconciliation.
i am new to a small business and am confused about how to account for expenses when i charge fixed price for an engagement.
Hi,Ive recently converted from MYOB, and in MYOB I had set up a liability account as our mortgage offset account, and from the offset account I would pay our credit card bill each month.
Hello,I am a small business owner who has been using Xero for some time now.
Hi Guys,I'm new to Xero and need a little help, i'm using TripCatcher to monitor mileage so we can claim the 45p back per mile travelled.
Money received into bank was $ 4985 (person deduction of 15 bank charges)5. again made payment of $5000 to right bank account.
Hi, I'm new to xero and am having trouble getting my brain around setting up a purchase that is on a payment plan and incurs interest each month (varies depending on the balance).
I'm assuming I need to add a new "Earning Type" but should it be set up as "Cash Tips" and what expense account should it be linked to?
I also don't see anyway to add it to their pay on a daily basis so I'm guessing that I will just need to keep track of it somehow and then add it to each paycheck when I do a pay run?
Hithe following occurred and we need some help in trying to reconcile- 1 bank deposit consisting of 5 chqs covering 4 invoices- 2 of the 5 chqes related to 1 invoice- 1 chq cleared, 1 chq bounced- bank debited back 1 chq amount- customer replaced with valid chq which was banked and appeared as chq credithow do we account for all of the above events to reconcile the account?
The guide I am following states that I need to create the following accounting entries:DR Share capital: £50DR P&L reserves: £29,950CR Bank / loan account (see above): £30,000DR P&L reserves: £50CR Capital redemption reserve: £50This is where I get a bit stuck :) If someone could point me in the right direction in terms of what transactions I need to create/which accounts to update, I would really appreciate it!
Given this, if we were to correctly account for Owner Funds Introduced I imagine we would need to create a prepayment (e. g. , for payment on 15 June) and then that would be used as credit to the invoice (e. g. , dated 30 June) however I can only see an option to create a prepayment from a bank account and not a funds source?
From time to time one business borrows money from one of the others and then repays it back at a later date or over time, it is becoming so regular that we need a better way of managing it that manually reconciling them all the time.
HiI have a business bank account set up in Xero, however some of my business expenses like phone, subscriptions are set up to be paid by direct debit from my personal account.
What would happen if i add a line and enter a negative figure in the sales invoice and assign the account as discount?
When I enter a new invoice and make it tax exclusive (under Accounts are).
It looks to me as if Xero can already do the basics required to make this work; for instance, to follow HMRC’s example (under “How much to payroll each time you pay your employees”), in Xero one might do the following:1.
He is now asking me to enter old invoices into xero which have previously been paid by a seperate accounts dept in our head office from another state as he would like to claim the GST etc.
At our small business from home we have customers who pay cash and customers who pay in bank account.
I know how to reconcile with bank account, but have not opened a "cash sales" account yet.
Can I just recon my bank deposits to my SALES account rather than matching it to the individual invoices?
If I decided to not delete my invoices from Xero, then given my scenario, how am I able to match my bank deposits to my invoices?
Texas gives a "timely filing discount" when you pay your sales tax on time.
My partner paid a prepayment from his personal bank account for an invoice for which we will pay the balance through the company's bank account.
Right now I just have the standard invoice and feel like I should be able to tweak that but can't seem to figure it out without the complicated looking docx solution.
I also need t be able to add shipping.
I am relatively new to business, in particular Xero and PayPal Here business services.
My apologies if this seems like a silly question, like i said i am very new to all of this.
This may not be directly related to Xero, but there may be a report or add-on our there that someone has used before!
I currently reconcile these to an Other Income account using a credit note paid to the said credit card to be able to see the rebates in a report.
Is there some guide that I sholuld use when I need to add a new account, be it an expense or sales.
I have just read a blogpost by Go Cardless from 2013 about how if someone pays an invoice online using the link on their Xero invoice, it will automatically mark the invoice as having been paid and (I assume) put a transaction in the relevant bank account.
Any time the law firm is issuing an invoice on behalf of their client they will code it against Dummy in Revenue and anytime they Make a payment to their Client they will code it as Dummy in Expense.
Next we customise the profit and loss report and remove both these accounts from appearing in the report.
So all up, all the GST I have paid on expenses and to purchase things for the business should add up in 1B and all the money I have earnt, GST is calculated on that and add up in 1A?
It would be great to somehow treat this like a bank account feed, so we can code and reconcile to the merchant account deposits.
I do not need to make a purchase order, I just already purchased things and have my receipts and need to record them but do not know where!
I am so used to using MYOB account numbers that I find that I am just sticking to their accountcodes but I am starting a new file and would prefer to set this up with recommended Xero Account Codes.
Me:- US Company- USD Bank AccountCustomer: - Canadian Company- CAD Bank account (irrelevant)The Situation:- CAD Invoice- Different exchange rates for every line item, and very often different rates within quantities of each line item (because these are each separate transactions.
Event ticket sales)Details:I use Stripe Connect to charge fees when customers use my software to process their payments.
Seems like Xero needs to add a check box somewhere that would allow these transactions to flow into the 1099 query report.
There are a number of accounts that have payments on account that have not been matched to an invoice.
I deposited cash into this account and they use it to pay for parts as needed.
Hi all,I've just paid my corporation tax for 2014/15 and now I need to reconcile this.
Just about to change accountants and have now set up a new Xero subscription in our name (previous one was the accountants) so is it possible to export data from old Xero (1 Apr to 31 Dec) into our new Xero for the whole accounting year (1 Apr to 31 Mar)?
Hi,I need to enter every single sale invoice .
I have opened Paypal bank account and customer account called Website sales.
It appears I won't be able to track items on the supplier invoices because the unit price is never going to add up.
I want to categorize the transactions to the correct expense accounts, but I do not need to be reimbursed, I just want to code it to Owner's Contribution.
Hi there, I’ve just started a new business which is just 2 weeks old so I’ve started fresh and from scratch with Xero.
BusinessNameA and BusinessNameB Can we have another Xero account that only sends invoices and gets a feed from a separate bank account “Example Pty Ltd 2”  (For this to work I imagine that the original Xero account and Example Pty Ltd bank account would have all original client invoices and all expenses go through it, and Example Pty Ltd No 2 bank account would be attached to new Xero account).
We are considering setting up a whole new Trust/company/name just so we can have a separate Xero account to send invoices with the correct branding on them.
Hi all,I'm new hereI know that the freight charge is not allocated in xero yet to the cost of the inventory but i'm wondering what is the proper way to solve this , i know i can add and item called fright in the PO but should i code it to the normal expense account for freight or i should make a direct cost account  (Cost of Sales-Freight )?
The VAT audit report is correct and it all correlates to give the correct figures in Box 1 - we haven't had a vast amount of sales so it's been easy to check and I just can't workout why Xero isn't outputting the correct figure.
Or add that account to Xero?
We would like to be able to make adjustments to VAT returns before submitting with HMRC via Xero, currently Xero doesn't allow VAT returns to be adjusted (so a manual adjustment has to be made and then submission via HMRC website) we think this would be a great option to have as from time to time returns do need to be adjusted.
We use the account group (and account code) to group the factored customers.
Xero compiles 3 reports - a GST Calculation Worksheet, a Business Activity Statement and a GST Audit Report.
Hi, in Australia when I add an expense for an International expense (under $1,000) which doesn't have any GST, which setting do I use:- BAS Excludedor- GST Free ExpenseSam
I use my business credit card to pay for my business vehicle insurance.
The thing I need is a clean way to separate invoices that are shipped and DUE, vs invoices we haven't filled yet.
I'd like to be able to easily look at my PO's and see who I actually need to send payment invoices to, and see whats due.
When I make an actual payment, presumably Xero would take care of it, and the amounts would wind up in the tax expense accounts, right?
To match the invoice record to an estimated cost, for realistic P&L, we would like to set some sort of Accrual account for estimated costs.
I was thinking that on the invoice I'd send, I'd mark it:WIDGET ITEM- 10PC    $100EA   = $1000 ACCOUNT: WIDGET ITEM- 10PC    $ 50EA   = $500    ACCOUNT: WIDGET ITEM- 10PC    $90EA   = $900     ACCOUNT: --Total: $2400However, XERO won't let me use the account "Advertising" to categorize the free item (I consider the comp item a form of advertising).
Apparently you can only reconcile against open invoices or receive money transactions, by applying the bank transaction as a payment.
Due to existing system constraint or something, I can't do the below:1/ STEP 1 - 31JUL15 (Accrue for the upcoming invoice)Dr ExpensesCr Accrual2/ STEP 2 - 19AUG15 (Recog liability)Dr AccrualCr Accounts Payable3/ STEP 3 - 20SEP15 (Record Payment)Dr Accounts PayableCr BankIn order to ensure an accurate capture of Foreign exchange difference, I did this:Recog exp in SGD (PCF - CLEARING ACCT) - In Jul15.
We need to be able to see the 2 sales categories to do GST and PST returns correctly, and also she would like to be able to see the 2 different categories for her own knowledge, therefore we have set up a "Services" income account and a "Retail" income account.
Our main business loaned &#163;20000 as start up costs to our new business, this loan is sitting on our balance sheet as non-current liabilities.
We have sold our business premises and I am unsure how to account for this:- I will not be invoicing anyone – it was a property sold at auction- I have a deposit and final settlement payment in the bank account-I have six assets – the building plus improvements/alterationsWhen processing the sale what account do I debit:•	Buildings?
Hi:I having problem of the tax code on the exports sales invoice, we are livestock exports company.
I used to be able to fool MYOB - there was no approval system within the programme so my invoices (provided they were in the system before I did my month end close) sat in the correct timing on the AP report.
For April and May it worked perfectly fine, but from June onwards any time money is drawn from the bank to make a payment through PayPal the expenses are being netted off with the receipt drawn from the bank and so either no transaction is being entered onto the PayPal account on Xero or a small difference is depending on how much was drawn to cover the payment.
We have Doctors who work as consultants we charge them 30%+ gst of their earning and pay the rest into their bank account and we create a invoice for them send it, adjusting our accounts showing deducted at source.
If I purchase some parts to use in my business from overseas and use this card, I was thinking I would claim this back as an expense claim.
I've done the conversion online, reconciled my bank accounts, and have the accounts the way I'd like.
Can I just create a new entry when reconciling without adding them to an invoice (and assign them to designated accounts instead)?
This may have been discussed somewhere in the forum but I would like to seek help on this query of mine:We do bank transfers between foreign currency denominated bank accounts.
I love the idea of being able to email an invoice to a customer with a big PAY NOW button, which will let them simply input their CC details secureley and pay their invoice.
I have just setup a new account and linked my bank accounts.
I'm thinking that the escrow account might be treated like a current asset account (but created as a "fake" bank account because it's in USD and not my base currency of NZD).
I also need to Post entries to P&L account, but there is none in Xero, Where else could I post this?
There is a credit card also, as bank feeds are done automatically, I need to post journal entries, but Xero does not allow me to post to this account.
I am a self employed person and i have lots of receipts that i need to enter into my xero as money i spent on business items.
i don't have business account and personal account its all just one thing so i don't want the business to pay me back and that is where I'm getting confused.
What I need is for a credit to be applied to that customers account which I can then pay directly to their bank account.
We have a lot international freight cost weekly, and currently need to create a new account "International freight cost" ( No GST), just wonder whether this account should be classified under "Direct Cost" or "Expense"?
I need to be able to run a report showing sales by invoice, showing VAT as a separate item.
Right now I am just manually flipping back and forth between Squarespace and Xero to build a purchase order, but it is tedious and time consuming.
My current thinking is to start bank reconciliation from, say, 1st July (using the starting balance at that date) and to make 3-month single entries in each account for sales/expense etc up the end of June so that the whole process based on Xero starts from that point using daily or weekly updates.
I need to reconcile the payment we made to the tax office - however, I am not sure what account code to use - because the payment is for payg and gst amounts.
I have read countless articles on the web about a directors loan account which i have set up from chart of accounts add new bank account.
The universal comment I see is 'just treat it like a bank account'.
Well I am sorry, it is NOT just like a bank account.
Hi,I am a new starter at my company and would like to ask how people deal with currency differences when currency is purchases and held within a separate account.
I would like to have a very similar table on invoices using just the default currency.
It wasn't done as a conversion balance - I just need to be able to input a starting balance so we start accurately from hereon in.
I have a credit card that does not offer an auto bank feed like my Santander business account.
Hi I'm a Small Personal Training Business that accepts Cash Sales and Dank Deposits.
Now the bank recon is out, the sales invoice is in credit.
com) and transferred to the business bank account at the end of the month, which is then reconciled in Xero as a sales entry.
For example, if the sales amount was $5000 and only $200 of it was eligible for GST then we need to have Xero account for it accordingly when we reconcile the bank feed.
I am new to Xero (and bookeeping), and need to know how to deal with funds being received from clients without the need to process an Invoice.
My boss wants me to run a report of all our customers showing their payment terms Vs how many days on average they actually take to pay.
However what I would like to do is see a combined P/L, Balance Sheet etc, to give me a group wide view of my accounts without having to login to each business and manually record the data.
We are a new business and it took some time to setup banking.
We want to remove the option of clients paying us via PayPal, however, we do not appear to be able to remove the PayPal option when clients select to pay on line.
Hi thereI pay rent out of my business account, now I know that some of this is drawings and some of this is my home office rent which is a business expense.
Hi,I have a regular supplier who bills us in CAD but we pay it out of our NZ based USD account.
HiI just recently got a debit card that linked to my business account.
I am a new business owner, and completely new to accounting.
I am trying to figure how to properly set-up the charter accounts for business checkings account, business credit card, Square (received income), sales tax, expenses, etc.
I am trying to enter my outstanding invoices from sage to xero, i have a customer who we pay before they raise their invoices, therefore i have a few credit balance how do i enter these payments?
For example, if I first posted a transaction as a Sale, but subsequently created new custom accounts distinguishing between different types of sales .
20 (Payment expected imminently)The match function in the bank reconciliation doesn't appear to let you mix two payments and two invoices together.
Since incorporation, I have been able to open up a business account, with the paid up capital being transferred from the lawyer's account to the new business account, where it currently sits.
Eventually, could be sooner than later, that $50,000 paid up capital will need to be returned to my own personal account, once the business starts generating sales.
The paid up capital isn't necessary an business expense and I would like it returned to my personal account without any tax implications, which I've been assured there aren't/ won't be any.
I have two active bank accounts for the business - one current and one as a savings account.
I think I need to create a new 'Spend money' entry in there and code it to the 'Rent' account.
Hi, I need to set up a recurring sales ledger client receipts for those that pay me by DDR.
That tax savings account was a regular savings account with my bank, but yesterday I upgraded with the bank to a new savings account.
In my bank, I moved the money which was in the old account across to this new one and I used Xero's 'Manage' > 'Edit Account Details' function to change the account number in Xero.
Do I need to add a whole new bank account again to Xero?
It's seems that when we enter a new invoice, we have to manually add VAT unless the customer has 'VAT on sales 20%' added to their profile.
The hand over of the company has yet to be completed and as a result names at companies house have yet to be changed and as a result new bank accounts under the new names can not be set up yet.
Our plan is to use Xero and the old accountant software of my dads partner side by side until the takeover is complete - using the old bank accounts with the old software and just inputting invoices and bills into Xero without it being connected to any accounts.
They new accounts will start with starting figures from the old accounts, i. e. a completely fresh start.
HiThis is my first year end with Xero and I'm just trying to put in a manual journal entry for Work In Progress, i. e. work that has been completed but not yet invoiced (normally against 200 Sales).
HiCan someone help me please, I am in the Compilation Report (V2s) and would like to putwould not need to sign every single Financial Accounts we prepare, it is already done.
Hi, I had a customer that couldn't pay the full amount across 4 different invoices, so we setup a payment plan.
So:Account one owes $100 (bill)Account two owes $200 (bill)I get a general discount of $20 (credit note)I need to pay $280If I allocate the $20 to either Account one or Account two it looks as though I've short paid that account.
I'm new to xero and just started a new company.
We have a donations code that we can allocate these to however we are unsure how we "pay off" these invoices since there is no payment for them.
I'm able to reconcile sales invoices with payments and PayPal/Shopify fees, and on simple invoices the sales tax comes out correct too.
A) I edit the invoice to add a new line, a negative amount assigned to a Discounts Given expense account.
I would ideally like to be able to see the status of these credit accounts from within Xero.
Also if we enter the bank account into xero at it appears on the suppliers invoice statement,  the bank import to Direct link adds a zero to the account number and to the suffix.
I, as the sole director, use another personal account to dump/withdraw money in/out of the business account.
Hi,Do anyone can advise that the report pack from Xero is most updated?
It is added to the invoice so the invoice will showBoat Hire - $6,000Food - $4000Drinks - $4,000Security Deposit - $1,000The security deposit is held in code 811 on my chart of accounts.
They almost need to be sub accounts of the Bank Account.
Just setting up an investment property and keen for feedback on whether to use tracking categories or a new / updated chart of accounts.
For example, I have a computer sales account I need to add to record our computer sales in.
With Quickbooks I  normally would just set sales tax (7%) per invoice or per item I was selling and the item would be tied to the correct sales account.
For debtors, we receive one payment in our Bank Statement, and receive a text file from the third party that displays every debtor / sales invoice / amount paid.
Every line item on every invoice is listed making the Audit report very long, I feel that only one line per supplier / debtor invoice is necessary per GST type.
Hi allI am using sales invoices to split my takings between cash, card and Amex payments, as described in this link: http://developer.
com/uk/Q_PettyCashI thought the best way to do this would be to add another line to the sales invoice for petty cash and reducing the cash received line by £100.
Hi Guys, Just wondering if I just started a xero account from this financial year and I get the final payment from my debtor on an invoice that was part paid last financial year how do I reconcile the payment as there is nothing to match it to?
In terms of work flow, we view the order as a "Sales Order" that we invoice prior to shipping and the invoice is paid at that time.
Hi , we received one invoice, but we just need pay half of that invoice, and another company will pay the other half.
I have a business checking account connected to Xero (my Asset account), and all of my business expenses go through it (reconciled to transactions against Expense accounts).
We added the monies paid to the invoices in Checkfront and as expected it is showing a deposit to our bank account for the fees and updating the liability account.
Do I just make two new accounts and do manual journal entries as expenses to adjust?
We have our personal and business banking accounts all set up with the same bank.
These Spend Money transactions were posted to an asset account, and are also not showing on the 1099 Report in Xero.
HiI have received a full refund to my bank account for an invoice paid from the same account.
Hello, I need to make a manual journal entry that effects my company's checking accounts and credit card account.
Each time we draw funds they are paid into our business current account, which is set up as a bank account in Xero with live bank feeds, from which we obviously pay our suppliers.
Hi Guys, I paid an invoice and reconciled it against the bank feed.
I also have some expenses that come out of Paypal so I do need to import the account and use it to process my books.
Bank account = SGD (Singapore Dollars)Invoice = IDR (Indonesian Rupiah)Let's say invoice A is for  and customer pays from our website.
12Monthly payments: Reconcile against Principal and Interest accounts as per scheduleFBT return:-	Car is privately garaged and pooled so individual payment summary reporting is not required-	As GST is claimed, use higher gross up rate of 2.
It seems like we need something more like a bill.
I have a couple of accounts that have come across from my old accounting software as current assets, but I really need them to be bank accounts.
We would like to pay US contractors using the Xero Batch Payment mechanism.
Our business has monthly repeating invoices and annual repeating invoices I had to copy and paste the repeating invoices into XL to do a monthly sales income budget as xero doesnt have one.
Meaning, we typically pay all invoices 28 days later, EXCEPT where our cumulative balance goes over 100k - in this case we have to pay up front the amount by which we are over the credit limit.
Firstly I have a new business from July this year and am just setting up Xero after my previous s/w proved to be substandard.
I have a business that is primarily cash based, and I use the add-on Timely for bookings and invoicing.
Do I need to set up a new Xero company for each one (like they are currently doing) or can I use one Xero company and delineate between the companies within that through job number usage?
I need to add first receipt paid by personal card in Expenses and second invoice which I paid by business I want to add in purchases.
Is it correct if I made reconcile for my purchase with 2 account, private like expenses and business like purchase ?
I need to mach 2 payment for one bill, but from private and business account.
So, at the appropriate time, I pay registrar, invoice automatically sent to my client, year after year.
We imported our chart of account in XERO and opened sub-accounts for suppliers under the creditor control account.
The entry looks like so:dr  135000 to Fixed asset account (purchase price of new asset)cr   5,494.
4 to Fixed asset account (book value of the two old assets)cr   120,000 to Accounts payable (purchase price of new asset AFTER trade in)cr   9,505.
I need to change my settings so my GST report only covers 16/9 - 30/9/2014 (currently 1/9 - 31/10) as we started our business mid month and our GST return is late for this period.
Apologies if this has been covered but I'm a double newbie (new to Xero and new to accounts)My accountant (not too helpful so I'm looking for another in NE Scotland) has given me a trial balance for end of last financial year.
I know the principles of depreciation and the xero guides and community are very helpful, if anyone could suggest where I should create the above accounts to correctly start using xero i'd be very grateful.
uploaded invoices after bill was created and check issued - had to 'remove & redo' payment to be able to upload the invoices to the bill.
Hi,I have a bank loan for my business and have borrowed more money from the bank.
We have only just changed to Xero and while it doesn't appear to have time billing without purchasing add-on software, I was hoping there was some way we could continue our time billing without setting up an item for each charge rate.
I am manually adding information to Xero such as old invoices that I sent out and I am also sending out new invoices through Xero.
Should I go into settings and create a new account for "Supplier Payment" ?
Hi,I have a new business in Australia.
Once I select an entry and edit it, then a totally different screen comes up, being the "account transactions" tab, but for only ONE of the FOUR accounts I am using - ie after I edit my entry, I then have to click the "back" button three times in order to get back to the Detailed Account Transaction Report (which is a combination of entries for all four accounts)!
I did account for all my business transactions in ynab, the program I use for my personal budget.
Hi,I need help urgently to enter a receipt against an invoice.
For invoices that I generate within Xero, I have to go in and manually add a transaction fee for each invoice payment made through Stripe.
Hi My employees/contractors occasionally use their own cars to collect items from local suppliers; they claim for the mileage in an expenses claim form and I pay out of the company's petty cash account.
Hi Guys,I just noticed on the home page that Xero have dropped their pricing, i'm still paying $50 a month for the standard plan (unlt users, 5gb storage, pay up to 5 employees, bank feed) which i believe is the same as the new standard plan for $30.
Ideally what I would like to be able to do:From bank feeds, click on few lines for payments from the same &quot;supplier&quot; and be able to generate an invoice at the end of the month that summed up all those small payments within the month.
Hi, A while ago I uploaded an invoice template into xero (through "invoice settings"), but I cannot find how to upload a template for a credit note.
For example, I have created a couple of new fixed asset codes in my Chart of Accounts and then booked purchase invoices to these codes.
I would like to be able to present this report to the principles of the business but I have no confidence in the ROI being reported.
I intend to spend some quality time with a Xero test account, but I thought I'd tap the forum's expertise, too.
Our inventory, reporting and invoicing system for parts is separate from Xero, but we already enter simple Invoice and Bill entries in Xero for our primary business (heavy trucks) -- we just don't use Xero to print or send them.
I was considering setting up a new Xero file just for the business and loading in correct balances from bank statements and exploring the real debtors / creditors (virtually disregarding MYOB) and then having them use PocketSmith for everything outside of their business such as their rental property etcThanks in advance for you inputCheers,Mel
Is anyone able to give me some direction as to how I clear out amounts which are showing in the superannuation payments detail when I go to add a super payment under Auto Superannuation Payments.
We will create the 2nd store under advice from our accountant as a new registered PTY LTD and we want to keep both stores under 1 Xero organisation so we can track/report across the whole organisation.
Both stores will be compnay owned so will send their revenue and pay expenses from the same shared bank accounts.
We pay our accountant every month by direct debit, and so we process this as part of our bank reconciliation and it ends up as a 'Transaction: Spend Money'But occasionally we get an extra bill, which we add as a purchase invoice, and pay by Faster Payment when if falls due.
Hi Everyone,Does anyone know if there is a way to add a new account type.
For example, I would like to add a new account type 'Expenses - Other'
Hi,To check our general ledger effectively I would like to export details for general ledger accounts.
Hi Xero CommunityMy bank feeds from my business bank account stopped feeding all of a sudden and I have no idea why?
There is no major problem in entering as you have (SOH, COGS), and some small companies account for it like you do as it makes accounting easier, but it does make analysing your accounts difficult.
I just started using zero (like it very much so far) but have a specific issue with reconciling Bank of America credit card feeds.
Hi there,I recently paid a suppliers invoice directly, that our client was meant to pay.
So I have:One supplier invoice and payment - reconciledOne payment from customer in bank - to reconcile.
Because we are in the building/construction industry, I need to somehow reverse the supplier invoice in full, otherwise it will show up on our taxable payment report in error.
Here in Minnesota, sales and use taxes have changed and I need to start paying taxes on things that I didn't previously.
Each month I am charged $30 from Xero but I now need to pay Use Tax on that.
I want to mark the Xero invoice as something that needs use tax to be paid, and then run a report at the end of the month that shows me what use taxes are owed along side my sales tax, and then I'll pay all total use taxes alongside my sales tax.
HiI have just been registered for VAT and I need to invoice VAT for 3 invoices that I have already created in Xero and had paid.
Hi there, As of last night,neither we nor our accountants are able to use Xero properly.
com/blog/product/recurring-invoices-recurring-jobsIt explains how to set up recurring jobs in WorkflowMax that somehow integrates with recurring invoices in Xero, but I just don't understand it.
There is quite a few payroll bank transactions that were processed in MYOB (i. e. May & June), I gather I just do the unscheduled pay runs from the last financial year, keeping in mind the old 9.
Need to be able to select all accounts or if possible specific accounts
Are we able to allocated a cash receipt to an Invoice from the bank reconcile (or other screen?
Talking on a phone or chat would not leave new (and old) customers feeling so helpless and confused unable to setup their new accounts.
We only offer PayPal payment so we chose Xero as it seemed like a no-brainer due to their PayPal, bank feed, etc compatibility.
So we purchase Xero, setup the bank feeds, and connect to PayPal with it pulling the feed all the way back to Jan 1st (no extensions or anything at this point just Xero and PayPal).
Until I noticed that none of the PayPal invoice info is coming through for the most part like what the items were, shipping that we charged the customer (not that we paid), or even the sales tax we charged the customer.
I do not use Xero for invoicing as I need to use the notifications my system generates to do it correctly.
Hi,One of my clients is asking: "Hi, just wondering how I reconcile two expenses that fell in last years financial year?
Am I able to add address details to a drafted invoice.
Do I really have to create a new contact with the exact same information to be able to raise an invoice?
com/xero-integration" We export daily all your sales invoices to Xero, so the 1,000 limit should not be a problem.
Hi  Guys,I am new to Xero, all good and like it but there is one thing I cannot work out.
After the correct setup my invoice (using the Standard built-in template) looks like this:Then I used a custom docx template, and that one looks like this:My problem is the Unit Price.
Something like the "Detailed Account Transaction Report' but for draft creditor transactions would be ideal.
I'm struggle to understand how Xero works when applying a payment that was made to a GBP bank account on a EUR invoice (or any other foreign currency invoice for that matter).
Our business, for the purposes of PSI need (on occasion) to split income generated on an invoice.
Hi Everyone, Just wanting to know if there is a way to view the sales invoices as Inclusive once they have been raised and sent to clients?
I often receive funds in which pays off multiple invoices for the same client, at the moment I go into each invoice and mark of individually - can I mark off more than one at a time?
In Norway, we pay incoming invoices (bills) with an account number, a customer ID number (KID) and the amount.
Every time my client tries to pay our invoice with a credit card through the link provided on the invoice, a NO symbol flashes up while it says "payment processing" indefinitely.
If I get an incoming invoice with 10 line items and each items goes to a different client, how can I transfer the line items into that project/client account, so that when I make a new outgoing invoice to the client, I get these line items included?
I now have credit, and when I use this service I receive an invoice for the amount I use of my prepayment.
What is the best way to record Assetts bought on Hire PurchaseWe need to be able to first record the purchase - Including Total of Asset, (recording the Asset) Deposit Paid, Booking Fee etc and then the balance owed being paid through Finance, and then being able to record the repayments showing principal paid and interest paidThanks
In effect, the 2nd payment into the sales ledger and the payment out of the expense/purchase ledger cancel each other out.
I really only need the Xero to be recording my property rentals and refurbs etc, but sometimes we use the joint to buy some stuff / pay people.
HI,I am paying ACC (New Zealand) for the first time since moving our accounts to Xero.
Hi,We use on line shopping cart for salesOur sales can be either  - paypal - sale and payment happen at the same time.
We receive a feed from paypal direct to XERO- bank transfer - sales happen first then payment much later.
I have had the suggestion of importing the chart of accounts into a new file, but then I wouldn't get all the bank reconciliation rulesThanks,Jeremy
Hi All,As of now in our organization, we use a separate number sequence for invoice and credit notes.
These are unnecessary fields and add time to processing when entering masses of supplier invoices!
HI there Im just getting a new client going and=d going through his standard chart of accounts for him tailoring as necessary but he keeps asking fairly innocent questions that I have trouble answering so help required pleaseeg's.
I'm new to Xero - and have one fixed asset - purchased on July 1 last year - configured with a "Depreciation Rate" = 25%; "Depreciation Method" = Straight line; and "Depreciation Account" = "450 Depreciation" (an expense account).
The information coming from the underlying Xero tables would be structured in a normal csv format then collated into the format to fit the Xero view of the report.
We want to be able to group these youth together and run a accounts receivable report on them.
I would have to remove the bank feeds from the original organisation but still retaining the information and add the feeds to the new organisation which would be named the same?
I need advise about inter company expense claim,  i have hospitality management business (hotel operator / hotel management) and we often paid one of my client (hotel) expenses, example : electricity cost, gas, groceries or any other expense related to their business, and usually they will paid us by the end of the month, for this particular expense we do not charge any fee's , so this is like expense claim from my company to my clienti need advise how to record this transaction in my company side1.
Aother questions is when we are paying an of invoices in foreign currency, let say we want to pay a invoices in EUR and paying from our USD bank account.
If I pay the $8 I mention above, my "Sales Tax Payable" account will be -($0.
Or do I just do a manual adjustment on the actual return meaning when my refund appears in my bank account, it won't agree with the VAT control account.
I am new to Xero, and by new I mean just born new.
ABA files to create payments for payment to international banks accounts?
Hi,  We use the audit report in the GST Returns before finalising the GST.
Hi All,We purchased a vehicle for our company via a bank loan and have a few questions about how to setup / account for this in Xero.
Hi there,We are currently using Xero and freshbooks, we want to only use  Xero .
Having lots of inventory items is less of an issue than lots of extra GL accounts but I'm also not sure how well Xero handles services as inventory in general as inventory doesn't seem to be Xero's strong point.
This would require the bookkeeper (not me) to diligently use this feature when reconciling the bank each month and I'm concerned that it would be too easy to forget to use this feature every time and hence end up with incomplete/misleading reports.
I have entered conversion balances from Trial balance and now need to enter sales invoice details for invoices unpaid as at my conversion date.
If I have a payment from a supplier than doesn't equal the amount of any invoices, if I then use the 'create' tab, use the suppliers name and the account that it relates to, i. e '207 Insurance', will this then have an effect on the Purchase Ledger, and make the outstanding balance of that supplier less?
I am wondering if I should unreconcile the second batch payment and apply the invoices to the first payment that went through the bank account or leave them attached to the second payment and reconcile the first amount as an overpayment.
I can see how to record it if they deposit the cash first but I need to be able to show them the breakdown of what they are paying for but still not include it in our current year sales.
I would like to know how to enter sales without issuing an invoice.
We need to do this urgently for a bank report and do not have time to bring system fully up to date (have only recently transferred from MYOB to Xero).
I need to be able to assign petty cash purchases to match the particular cost codes therefore I can't just set up Petty Cash as an account, it needs to be a Bank Account I think?
I am wanting the person to come to my house (Montmorency (suburb of Melbourne)), and go through my Xero set up (in particular how to do the COGS) so that at tax time I can just run a report and enter the appropriate information into eTax.
I have received a couple invoices against this payment and created an over payment to account for the rest.
I'm just a little confused now if this over payment amount is reflected in the balance of the bank account.
It's a substantial amount for me, and I am having trouble discerning weather the balance in my business account is accurate and if I am able to spend this money as needed.
I see the over payment appears as receivables, so I am guessing the bank account balance is accurate and that I am ok to proceed like that is the case, but I would like to be sure.
ISSUE: I now sell the Item by creating an Invoice, on the Income statement I see the sale for the amount of the Invoice, the Item is properly deducted from the Inventory item summary report, but the balance sheet still shows the amount of the item in the Inventory and there is no recording of cost of good sold in the income/expense statement.
I have spent a lot of time customising my theme, to get anywhere near the right level of customisation I need as a creative business, however, I am getting there and have something I am reasonably happy with.
I changed/added new income accounts but now I need to change those transactions in which I need to have allocated to those new accounts.
com/AU/#InvestmentPropertythat says the following:"From your bank reconciliation, as appropriate, against the 200,000 mortgage statement line, code as:Debit of 250,000 – coded to the property’s asset accountCredit of 200,000 – coded to the property’s mortgage accountCredit of 50,000 – coded to Owner’s Funds Introduced"I'm just not exactly sure how to do this during bank reconciliation.
Morning guysWe have a small family run garage business as a client I want to be able to show p& l for each job I. e. Each car reg booked inBest suggestions pleaseJo:-)
Some clients also pay a monthly fee, should this be just a separate invoice for simplicity?
Hi,I understand how to show a list of invoices (or bills) awaiting payment, but is it possible to see the number of days overdue?
Each runs completely separately - premises, payroll, creditors, customers, bank accounts etc etcWe seem to have an issue with setting up Auto superOn first pass we seem to need to pay from one account and nominate one ABN for ALL the payments.
A quick example is that within one bank account, I need to continually carry a balance of things like, Youth, Women, Children, Benevolence, etc.
Is there a way of getting this report in Xero or by way of an add-on software?
We want to find out if you would like the ability to instantly ‘cash in’ any of your outstanding sales invoices, any time you like, from within your Xero account?
Here, upon selecting an invoice to ‘cash in’, our plugin will advance you 60-80% of the invoice value instantly to your bank account.
Hi,I was wondering if anyone knows with tracking options when you run a report on the expenses of that tracking amount why it doesn't show the GST as well, as we need to send the report to clients and they need to know exactly how much we have spent on there job as we also do for billing.
I just need to add this number to Xero so my monthly PNL and balance sheet is accurate.
But we do need to be able to group our programs into departments and so are looking at how we might be able to report at departmental level as well as program level.
Is Zero able to group and report on tracking categories for budgets and actuals by month & YTD at account and summary level?
We've just been building our report packs and have noticed when we use the predetermined report feild "Organisation Address" it pulls the postal address into the report and not the actual organisations physical address, has anyone been able to amend this to put the correct address in or is it something people are just adding a custom feild to correct?
Do I need a liability account like "Client Deposits" to assign the credit to?
It appears that the Capital Gain and Gain On Disposal accounts want a revenue account (like "Other Revenue" or something), but that won't create any transactions in my bank account.
I have three entries in my bank account:The money being allocated from the chequeThe money being withdrawn from the chequeThe money being allocated from the bank transferHow do I handle this given I only have one Invoice against which these three lines need to be reconciled?
Now I need to assign the 10k to the 21k invoice as a part payment like most account packages allows.
Banks that work well for my clients are:- Chase- Bank of America- Royal Bank (Canada)- ING direct (Canada)- Citizens National Bank (Tennessee)Banks that don't work so well or provide cryptic statement lines are:- CIBC Canada- First Bank and Trust (Louisiana)- First Bank and Trust (Indianapolis)Feel free to add, I often get questions from clients about which banks to use for Xero and thought I would share.
Im guessing I need to go to Chart of Accounts and create a new Account, if so,  what type of account?
I accidentally Matched a bank transaction to a Sales Invoice.
I reconciled the bank transaction, however the invoice is still stating its paid on the incorrect sales invoice.
Hi When preparaing a Business Activity Statement I have interest earned on bank accounts reporting as part of Total Sales (G1).
They have just contacted me to say that the company name and address that we have been using on their invoices is incorrect and they would like me to issue credit notes for each of these invoices and then re-issue new invoices with the correct name and address.
How do I set up in Xero we would prefer to only have one bank feed which will bring in all transactions or do we need to set up multiple credit card accounts.
Hi thereSo I have a high interest savings account into which I transfer the following amounts and I would like to be able to track the balance of each amount within the total balance of the account.
I have two bank accounts I created a couple of years ago to try and track excess funds to get them out of my main transaction account (don't ask why, I was learning at the time).
Why does Xero ask for an account code and tax code to be allocated when making a supplier payment on account?
Hi,this may seem like a stupid question but I just need to ask.
The invoice has been booked against my account reference is 327My share capital account reference is 950Therefore i need to reduce 327 by £500 and increase 950 by £500 - is this correct?
My question is do we use a new account for tracking and accounting for this in Xero or should we be using the general GST account.
Hi, we have 6 departments and I would like to split the payrun data across 6 GL accounts for the relevant employee.
Do I then need to edit every single transaction that debits the sales tax account?
We know this because it we go to Accounts -> Purchases -> Awaiting Payment, we see the partial payment amount and the apparent balance payable (viewable ).
Additionally, the "Amount Paid" field in the "Make a payment" box defaults to the amount that Xero thinks is left to pay (and this amount is normally the invoice amount less the amounts listed below the invoice total as already paid).
I am new to accounting and I am doing the accounts for my own business.
So I want to say CustomerX paid $250 and when I invoice it this payment/deposit will be applied to this or multiple invoices I might have at that time.
Also like in QB is there something called undeposited funds account or should it be directly sent to a "bank account" ?
We pay this credit card to the liability account, so it shows through on our Xero bank account reconciliation as one total.
I received my orders in separate system from XERO, but I'd like to use XERO for my accounting.
I have an affiliate agreement with a third party to pay them sales commission on new customers.
I'm hoping there is some linking mechanism so that I can easily report on it, such as "show me all sales invoices for this affilliate".
Upon doing this we are entering all invoices and sales back to Dec 12 when our new financial year started.
I logged an invoice payment to a revenue account in my chart of accounts.
I in turn did a partial funds transfer back into their account with the balance of the invoice remaining in my account.
Hi AllI am just starting up Xero for a new client and I work as a freelance bookkeeper and am also new to Xero.
Need an accounting procedure which includes raising sales invoices, receiving customer payments against those invoices, recording factor fees and correctly records output VAT in Xero so that the VAT report is accurate in this scenario.
Hi, i am new to xero and am just wondering under what code/ account do i put my refund that we received from the ATO from our recent BAS?
I purchased a new vehicle, which is 100% business use.
If I just delete the transaction it will have incorrect historic balances - and I don't think I should need to pay the person via a bill to get correct dates.
I have just been working on a client's accounts in Xero, and as usual, was manually reconciling the bank.
Hi Xero Forum Folk,I have had my accountant complete my personal return, I have a property in the UK and for the first time they have included foreign exchange gains - the flat runs at a small profit and no monies have been transferred from my UK account, so I'm wondering why there should be any FX gains?
So this one GBP payment in the bank rec needs to be allocated against USD and EUR invoices but as soon as we match against one EUR invoice the USD ones are no longer visible and vica versa.
This being the case, is Xero set up in our name so I can simply provide a username and password to the newbie or when an external bookkeeper does the set up it's in their account with a company as a form of tenant withinWe pay the monthly fee however so I suppose in summary I'm wondering if I were to change who does our books and payroll would I need to redo the whole set up, which is 8 years worth of clients and data!
Hi,A client I am about to convert to Xero has sales orders in MYOB with amounts applied to them.
I'd like to be able to allocate this payment with one click.
HI I have raised an accounts payable invoice to the Inland Revenue Department for $308.
Gday, Justin-Australian, new to Xero, novice at accounting, recently changed from sole trader to Pty Ltd. setup xero only recently and trying to get a few things sorted myself before I need to see an accountant about things,on starting my company I opened a bank account and a credit card, transferred $50,000 personal funds into my business transaction bank account.
On my Xero business account, I can add multiple bank accounts - that I then need to reconcile to have the accurate picture of my business.
Should one of those bank accounts be my personal account, or not, because it's not necessarily related to the business?
So, 1) Do I have my personal bank account listed, just for the above, use the 'transfer' tab and still have to reconcile my entire personal account (somehow)?
The way i've been working with this so far is to set "Tax on purchases" to zero percent and just add a note to the label as to what the state sales tax is, so it reads in Xero something like "Tax on purchases 8.
I would like to see a report detailing what receipts have been claimed and what have not been claimed by jobMaybe I need a job management solution?
Zoho Invoices allows you to create an Expense, assign it to a Customer and either add it to the Invoice or create a separate Invoice directly.
We have just purchased a new business.
For now I'm just using Xero's default chart of accounts but understand that over time hopefully I'll customise it more and more to my specific needs.
Hi AllI've just completed my first year of self employment and need to prepare my schedule C?
With regular invoices, it is still possible to edit and change the Account name even after payment.
When I receive a bill/invoice (e. g. from Xero for the Xero accounting software) I am required to calculate a 25% Sales Tax which I can immediately deduct.
To paint a clearer picture I will outline how I /think/ I might be able to do it:Create a new tax rate called "Sales Tax Abroad, 25%" with the component "High Tax".
Create two current liability accounts: "2761 Basis for purchases abroad" and "2760 Set-off: Basis for purchases abroad"Then, when registering the invoice from Xero in Xero:Unit Price, Account, Tax Rate100, "Consulting & Accounting", "Incoming Sales Tax, 25 %"(100), "2761 Basis for purchases abroad", "Sales Tax Abroad, 25%"100, "2760 Set-off: Basis for purchases abroad", "Tax Exempt"The first line subtracts 25 from my Sales Tax account.
Do I need to issue new invoices in Xero?
I have jsut started using Xero/accounting for my new business and had a question about which account to use when I buy stock.
In  the past with sage i would just use the batch invoice windows and enter a batch at a time, check the total and then click the save button and that would be the batch entered.
My client has two Xero separate login accounts and they have different bank accounts, one Xero account (say 'A') is looking after the other Xero account (say'B').
Now the accounts receivable invoices are on 'A', but the customer paid the money to 'B' bank account that is different from 'A' bank accounts.
5) To reconcile my bank statements, I print a report of all people who paid automatically and mark invoice in QB as paid6) Those that paid by check (some people refuse to do automatic withdrawal) are handled with an invoice as well.
I have a bank feed for a credit card, which I use for both personal and business expenses.
HI allI have an invoice from a supplier which I am going to pay in shares rather than cash.
Is the only propper way to work with them to create a daily Invoice from Facebook in Xero and then to match it with the imported bank statements?
We pay sales people commissions on invoices.
Hi All,Sometimes we use our factoring company to help with cash flow of the business.
Hi everyone,Just curious to see how you choose to treat a rejected payment (to a supplier) by your bank.
If that is so I'd like to be able to add a link to the online quote held by Xero.
Hi Guys,Can someone advise me on the best way to do this, We pay a monthly direct debit of a fixed amount to the government in payment of employee income tax, then at the end of the year we do a balancing payment.
Firstly there are the merchant fees to account for, and secondly whilst I can easily reconcile 1 payment to a few invoices, I cannot reconcile many payments to a single invoice.
I have just run my Sales Tax Report for June and July and it does not agree to my VAT Control account.
We just acquired a working capital short-term loan and I've created a current liability account through the Chart of Accounts screen.
We are about to migrate from MYOB AO to Xero for our whole practice and I am just assessing the ease of actually processing annual accounts within Xero.
Is it more sensical to setup a reoccurring invoice to track these disbursements or should I just manually be adding them through Spend Money as the pay dates arrive?
I have limited knowledge of Xero, or accounting in general, but if i made multiple Sales accounts, for each contractor, and then a sales account for me.
Hi,I'm just getting set up with Xero and hoping you can advise me about the correct way to handle this situation:I run a software service (SaaS) business.
At the moment I've just been reconciling the bank transactions against the Sales account.
I'd like to setup a Directors loan account & perhaps other loan accounts using the 'add bank acct' using 'credit card' type.
It would mean selecting a bank under false pretenses (since it's not really a bank) but this won't be a problem because you won't need a live feed.
Instead of making a cash payment out of bank account, I want to credit it to pay off my directors' loan.
Hi, this is an ongoing bug / thread on the personal section, but I was redirected here because the same issue is occurring in the business version of the product:I am experiencing this issue with two credit cards that use automatic feeds: one is a Bank of America card, another is a Capital One card.
Hi All,I recieved a an invoice from someone who uses MYOB, and on the bottom of their Invoice, they had a link, which would provide the customer with a secure page, where they could enter their credit card details into and make payment.
I need to delete the transaction out of the business bank account and into the expense claim facility.
Hi there, I have written up some instructions on how to create a Shareholder Current Account report in a report pack using a balance sheet template.
The customer would like to use that deposit to make a payment against their final invoice.
I've received a credit for overpayment on my companies National Insurance Contributions and I'm wondering how I should add this into my accounts since I don't actually get any money directly into my bank account.
I've set up repeating  invoices for £500 a month to be paid to "200 - Sales" from Invoice "Letting agent X" and repeating  invoice for £29.
What are the methods NZ Xero accountants have found simplest to bring Home Office expenses (e. g. electricity, rates, insurance etc), paid from a personal account not the business account, into the Xero ledger?
I would like to know if its ok to just add the details and upload my invoice copy as I do the bank recon.
I expected that when I received an invoice from my credit card provider, I would be able to enter an accounts payable invoice to be applied against the credit card account in Xero.
I want to be able to manage stock takes, stock losses, and sales (via invoice) but need an opening quantity.
I just downloaded my first set of bank transactions (checking and credit card), and a credit card payment shows up under both.
Since we cannot raise an invoice at the time of receiving the deposit, and do not want to raise a proforma just for the deposit, we are unable to post the deposit to the clients account in the sales sales ledger.
Hi all, apologies for the spamming here but my accountant seems very stuck in the past and won't accept that I'm looking to move beyond their simple Excel spreadsheet system and use a proper account product but need some guidance on how best to use it.
The bank is listed in Xero and it states that bank feeds are available, but it specifically states 'Personal Banking' after the bank name, and there is not an option for 'Business Banking'.
The repayment of this loan to me has come out of the Company Current Account as a cash payment (we withdrew the money from the bank as a singular transaction with salary/dividends as well) so the bank statement shows a much larger withdrawal than that of the Director’s Loan paid.
I could import via excel sheet, another option would be to create journal entries or place in all the historical accounts payable and receivable invoices and then 'pay' them and at the date and exchange rate set by paypal at a particular point in time.
Hi there,We're just starting to use Xero and are wondering whether we should use the multi-currency feature or not.
To me it would be rather easy to just take a pic, upload it to xero and then allocate it to an account in your chart of accounts.
Hi - I am wanting to create a budget customized to how I need it to look, I have been on youtube and can see it can be done, but I don't seem to have the right buttons to do so, perhaps if I subscribed to the more expensive xero catergory I would be able to?
I thought linking Xero with iZettle would save me time and effort and all my sales would happily take care of themselves!
HiI have a company that has converted from Sage to Xero, but the accounts receivable report is showing that there are a lot of sales invoices outstanding, even though the payments are showing on the report, but if I look in the contacts then they are clearly paid off.
On the bank feed I would like to go to find and match and find each invoice and credit note that applies to that weekly statement - the credit notes we have do not apply to any invoice from our supplier.
Hello, I've just created a Xero account for my business and pulled across our bank fees.
Hi,I am new to Xero and in the middle of setting up bank feeds.
Hi All,We need some small business owners to put their hands up, to be the first to trial this productivity app .
Hi guys,Weird one here I guess - I sold my business around 18 months ago, closed everything off in Xero, provided everyone all their letter and forms etc, backed up what Xero would allow me to, and closed my account.
And as an aside, does the tracking drop-down box need to appear on every transaction, or can it just be made to appear when certain account codes are used?
I am just moving from Sage to Xero and have a query about recording VAT on my sales as they go into my bank account.
I use eWay in Australia for Customers to pay via a link of invoices, taking them to an online credit card payment.
I have a current liability account to assign it to on the money received end however I need to invoice the client and they have paid GST as part of their bond.
It turns out they wanted 3 and were able to edit the invoice and pay for it.
So, if I use the 'assign expenses to a customer', then all these items will come up as options to add to their invoice, which I really don't want.
I have the receipts, and want to account for these purchases (and the business to pay me back! )
I need to put in all motor expenses as 80% business use.
Hi there,I have purchased a couple of wholesale orders from my personal credit card/account for my small business.
Confused also because I need to split the transaction so I pick up the leftover $100, not the client, and then I guess I need to edit the original invoice to include the transactions as well.
Hi Im changing from a sole trader to Ltd company on 6/4/17, can anyone advise what I do regarding my accounts, do I start a new setup with Xero under the new company or cn i keep using my existing subscription
I'm currently with HSBC and am getting sick of using the fob as it limits when and where I can pay new people and i have to use it every time I work on Xero.
I would like to set up a Global Gateway payment system for online payments that is compatible with Santander and Xero so that invoices sent via Xero mean that customers can pay online into the Santander bank account securely.
Will I need to set up a brand new account?
Should I just save those files and import then to my new account that is under the Trust?
In short started dealing with a new company and sent a test payment to there account to check BACS details are correct.
Someone did some work for me, then when it came to payment time of &#163;150, he told me to just make it a donation to a particular charity he nominated.
Because I earned so little last year, I did not pay any UK income tax so I can't pay myself and then gift-aid it, and I'm not sure if there's something like Gift Aid for companies?
Do I need pay the bill via Xero separately from the bank account?
2 - We use the personal account for both business and personal transactions however we only import business transactions into Xero.
Again like the above do I just credit 1 rule that is crediting/debiting the same account?
Hi,I have two RBS bank accounts and have recently sent off the RBS authority bank feed form to have direct bank feeds in place.
My question is how can I reconcile these (both GST refund and PAYG payment) with my bank feed, as I have only one bank transaction that showing me paying the ATO?
do i have to ask Xero admin to delete one of the feeds and if so should it be the troubled account feed, start a new and do a manual bank import from last year to now?
Hi there, A customer has paid twice so I am wanting to allocate his payment as a credit to him, there is no invoice to allocate it to.
I am new to Xero and would like to file my first VAT return directly using the function in Xero.
I have a user with "Invoice only" permissions and able to "pay & approve" invoice payments.
User able to input invoice nad do batch payment.
We are a small third sector organisation with invoices to pay and we invoice other organisations for services like training and membership.
We pay GCVS to handle our payroll so I just have to record the amount we pay them then run a journal to split this between departments (I've not even tried to figure out how to do a journal entry on Xero yet).
We don't need our software package to do a lot but we do need to be able to see activity for each department.
Most of our customers currently pay by bank wire transfer - which is OK as we invoice in NZD and the only cost to us is the bank fee at this end, usually $25.
I need a simple report that shows what payments have been paid against invoices and be able to specify the dates range ie daily, weekly.
Also,  I don't plan to use xero to track inventory, I'm going to track cost of stock on hand separately through my sales channel, so what's the best way to set that up in xero.
I intend to use Xero's Repeating Invoice function to send out invoices automatically each month.
Until they do get paid however, why do they appear under the Sales account in Revenue instead of the Accounts Receivable account in Assets?
Can they be split into multiple accounts - one for principal, a second for interest, and a third for escrow payment?
I recently had an experiment in using our own corporate payment page instead of the XERO page that opens as have invested time and energy in to developing our own payment pages that hook up to our stripe API in a different way as we are a subscription based company so retain credit card information for automatic monthly renewals.
Am I able to allow clients to pay by credit card by adding a section on the invoices or do I have to be registered with a payment service.
I use the Big Commerce feed to get my sales into Xero.
It puts the sales into my Business Checking account (intergrated).
We also sometimes use our business card to pay for some personal stuff (my son saids this is a bad habit and we should not use it, he's a second year accounting major) So I my question is how do I pay myself in the accounting software, do I match the checks that clear in my personal bank account as an Owner's Draw Transaction and also do I need to transfer funds into that account.
Hi, We have an online store and have started using AfterPay (buy now pay later interest free) as another payment option.
Hi,I have recently taken on my business's bookkeeping myself, and the former bookkeeper has set up an "Owner Capital In/Out" account (withdrawals and deposits by the owners), as a Liability account.
I have been using the "Owners' Drawings" and "Owner Funds Introduced" accounts to reconcile personal expenses made from the business and introduced to the business.
Hi There,We only use Xero to create our invoices and I was wanting to know if it is possible to send the amount directly to our eftpos teller machine (CBA Albert) as we have now entered the incorrect amount two times now.
Just wondering is there a way to import the information off our suppliers website into Xero so that each individual item is in Xero and we just type it in and it comes up with the price to save us checking it online each time?
When I imported a spreadsheet to a Xero Cash account I now realise that it contains both cash and bank payments (payments in two different Xero accounts).
I added a new field column to the invoice template for my business.
I have used xero to file my VAT since day one, this time it popped up asking me for my gateway username and password which I entered (I checked I could use it for logging on to the Government gateway so I am 99% sure it is correct) and the filing failed with the error message :The Gateway ID, Password or VAT Number submitted was incorrectLast time I logged on to the gateway it offered me two step authentication via mobile phone text message and I set this up, has this broken Xeros filing?
How to reconcile expenses related to business social /annual events (eg Christmas party) in Xero; basically which accounts I need to pick from the chart of account list ?
Hi AllI have just started using Xero, I have put in all receipts and invoices for 2016 but I would like to put in totals for each customer for all the years before 2016 so I can have a report of total turnover with each customer and supplier without giving me a huge job of getting the vat and bank to ballance for all the years prier to 2016.
Our invoice numbers and amounts have been intercepted and sent to clients during the email process, the bank details also changed during this process, obviously the new bank details are not ours.
However i was wondering if there was a way to add fields to existing reports or create a new report, with appropriate fields, which can be used like any of the standard reports already available?
I'd like to be able to split marketing expenditure into different categories eg events, materials, consulting, advertising, Pay per click etc.
Dear Xero,I need to see why my Xero bank balance and my statements from the Bank do not agree.
Hi,We pay our Credit Cards via Direct Debit each month and I would like to know in my reports and graphs on my dashboard that I have a transfer due from my transaction account to my Credit Cards including the amounts owing.
Xero seems to be communicating with my Paypal account correctly as 'bank statement' payments are being imported and invoices are automatically matched and marked as paid.
Hi there, i recently formed a company, and as part of that process the formation company we used provided us with a cheque for cashback which ive paid into the business account.
Hi I am a new business and have not used this before.
You only need to code a transfer in one bank account (Account #1).
You just need to go into the other bank account (Account #2) and match it.
Should I have paid it from "owner drawings" which I use when I take money from my business account for personal use?
Hi all,This is just to let you  know that we have developed an application for helping users who need to account for VAT in more than one country.
Hi thereWe use eway as a payment portal for our business.
80 i need to reconcile not to an invoice but to an account).
I have set up a Directors Remuneration account as a bank account as advised for business expenses going through their personal bank account and just post any payments coming from there into that account.
We do however need text boxes titledJOB NUMBERJOB ADDRESSDATE STARTEDDATE COMPLETEDWe then need to be able to input data to the right of these boxes.
So my questions are1) how/where do we record the various capital expenses against a property such as acquisition costs, refurbishments etc2) where can we record the new market value of a property as this will change every year with inflation and I would like to reflect this increasing equity in the accounts
Hi, Could you please let me know if anyone has migrated from a filemaker database for sales, into xero.
I issue invoices to clients in multiple countries / currencies, and would very much like to use xe.
I would like Xero to have some kind of warning pop up that come up if you try to leave that invoice screen before you have emailed the invoice.
Hello,I am wondering if theres a way to speed up the process:I have 2 sources of payment from Worldpay, this is how they appear on the bank statements imported:Virtual Terminal appears: MV-96258073-DDMMCard machine appears: MV-96257503-DDMM(DDMM is the date of the transaction)I need to "transfer" these payments in order to reconcile.
I have looked at a timesheet integration option and we can create our invoices in the external timesheet system and it will track wages and invoices, I can't see that we can add any expenses to allow those to be tracked also.
So I would like to record an amount each month to deduct from the amount in my interest bearing account to have in hand to pay these when they fall due.
I am trying to use Xero (USA Version) to complete invoices and pay my companies agents (subcontractors / 1099) via ACH Transfer and/or direct deposit.
I've just started using Xero, and am unsure where I should be placing our 'Drawings' and should I set up a new account.
Now that I'm into the second financial year of using Xero, I'd like that account to reset to zero.
I buy Jams for example and add them as a purchase to inventory as 30 jars of jamsI then sell a hamper that has 2 Jams inI then invoice for said hamperWhat I would like is, that when I sell and invoice for said hamper it to remove the 2 jams from my inventory, How do I set this up in xero?
Hello, I would like to add a logo to the invoice.
Can this be set up so Xero brings up that customer account number when choosing which customer/invoice to allocate payment to (most of our customers pay by a set AP not specifically for an invoice and we allocate it to outstanding invoices).
Hi Everyone, I am helping a friend out who is a sole trader who has just started out and need some clarification on how to to fix up his mess haha!
I am not sure if this is done with someone within our organization or recent Xero update has caused this but even now when I create a dummy invoice and go and void it, not only it won't list the void under activity but it won't even has a trace of any invoice ever being made prior to that for that account.
Hi all,Sometimes when I reconcile the bank statement I will find payments that I haven't received an invoice for.
I am in the process of setting up our bank feeds and we have received a payment for multiple invoices.
Hello there,I have an invoice to pay for an insurance, it consists of several client names that have been insured for a period of time.
00Amanda Biz  amount $300Peter Ciz amount $600then next month the insurance company double charge me John Woz - Will XERO be able to advice that a payment for Amanda has been made on a previous bill?
I set up a new CBA bank account feed into the correct business however it appeared in both businesses and it only feeds into the wrong business.
Hi there, wondering if anyone has found a way to add multiple inventory items in a quote for your own use, however have multiple lines join together, so they present as one line (similar to how you can add multiple "billable expenses" to an invoice as one line)?
I'm assuming that it doesn't because I have received bank deposit payments on invoices that are only marked as sent, however every time I receive an online credit card payment the invoices are marked within Xero as 'Viewed'I supposed I answered my own question, just really looking for confirmation on this.
I'd like to clear everything, and have a fresh start (with proper categories that I now understand, three bank accounts, etc. )
Can I use Xero without bank accounts.
Hello All~I am just starting my business and new to Xero.
We want to use Square as a payment processor, so when a client clicks "Pay Invoice" on Xero, they are directed automatically to a Square payment screen.
We are a small business and require somebody who is competent working with xero who can help us input our invoices to enable us to do our quarterly VAT returns etc.
We are based in Hertford - HertfordshireCandidate needs to be self-employed and be able to work from home, but also have means to come into the office from time to time to pick up and drop off invoices.
Hi,Each morning I need to crank out 30 invoices in 20mins.
My only issue with this is, I am accrual reporting which means - if an invoice goes past due and then is paid after I pay my BAS and I then change the amount, I would then need to do an adjustment.
an everyday business account and a business saver that I transfer my Super and PAYG into weekly ready to pay at the end of the month.
Hi guys need to reconcile account with one invoice paid more.
We interface all bank transactions back to Xero and use that opportunity to categorize collections and payments into our chart of accounts.
Hi all,Just wondering if anyone else in business has a supplier (regardless of what they are supplying) that will simply not take a phone call from you at all.
In my sales Invoice main page I have all my invoices arranged in number order and the newest invoices numbers are at the top, however if a credit note has been issued they appear first.
I'm looking to report if How many Invoices Generated in a week Average spend etcAny ideas what I need to do / reports I need to pull up to produce this information.
Shopify feeds all cash and non-cash transactions to XERO as follows: Dr Payment ; Cr Sales.
Xero creates a transaction as above: Dr Payment; Cr Sales.
I pay my EUR Invoices via Moneycorp using my USD bank account.
Xero gives the option to use GBP or EUR to pay the EUR invoices, however I am actually using my USD to settle the invoice.
I would like the invoice to display two extra lines showing "Invoice Total" and "Less Payments Received" if payment has already been made prior to generating the invoice.
Or if payment has not been made, I would like it to just display the invoice total.
One account is in a foreign currency with the same invoice going out to the same person, the rest of the invoices are payable to my regular income account.
but im wondering how i add in (paypal / ebay) and all my amazon accounts (uk,de,us,ca) would these all need to be separate bank accounts and does anyone have experience of getting amazon monthly data into Xero?
It is very important that I am able to reference past invoices without going to my previous system and I'm just looking for a bit of guidance on the best practise for this conversion.
Hi, I recently took over the books of a business who's bank reconciliation was out of control, mainly due to their POS system I think.
The business often doesn't know that customer x paid an invoice today, so cannot apply the payment to the invoice in Xero.
If I create a Purchase Order when sourcing parts from supplier, then Xero provides option to either create Bill, or add to Customer Invoice.
Hi,I've recently started using Xero and I've imported sales, purchases and bank statements from the start of my financial year (30th September) I've reconciled the statements with the sales and purchases.
At the moment I am just paying off each, individual, tedious, receipt as a personal expense from the business account.
When the payment is received and reconciled in bank feeds do I need to do something special or can I just match it with the payment as I normally would?
Do I set up a CL account (Client Prepayments), and then set up auto-debits from the new CL account to the Sales account?
I would like the ability to adjust (ONLY in the GST report and not in my Accounts) that $500 to lets say $250 and then the GST should recalculate.
I have made two transfers from my business bank account to cover the total of three invoices.
So there is nothing in the bank feed to match against the expenses, and if you just book the net takings to Sales, then Sales will be understated.
B)The ability to create invoices, email invoices just like Xero does but for what will probably be 'one off' transactions so I then don't need to have thousands of accounts in Xero.
When I have been making invoices I have been coding everything (labour and materials) to 'Sales' (200) account Is this ok to keep doing this?
Hi there, i need to reconcile my general bank interest received and the withholding tax paid.
Is it possible to create a sales report by user - ie according to which user entered the invoice?
Hi there, just doing my first months accounts.
We have bill smoothing set up for our energy bill - do we pay a standard $62 per month - this payment comes out of one of the transaction accounts linked to our Xero account.
Hi AllWe are new users to Xero and wanted to utilise the payment services in Xero so that our clients could pay us direct using a credit card or bpay or their internet banking.
I pay $210 dollars on that bill and enter a payment of that amount in Xero.
Can I use the business account to pay myself back for these costs and if yes what accounts do I need to create.
So far, the incoming is easy - it is just showing account (200) Invoice revenue on the dashboard watchlist.
My POS gives plenty of figures, however due to not banking often, Xero customer care thought using the sales figures from our bank statement would be a more true indication of income as EFTPOS is deposited immediately, customers pay accounts with direct credit and cash and cheques are eventually banked.
Hi there, I was just wondering what chart of accounts code to use when purchasing miscellaneous materials for a plumbing firm.
Hi everyone, Our business is not currently registered for GST and I'm a little confused about how to enter supplier invoices/bills if the supplier charges GST.
When i first started I received 3 small payments of invoices into a personal account before opening up an account for my business.
Hi,I've just started using Xero for my self-employed activity and I've opened a new business bank account.
My problem is that I have several invoices that have  from clients into my old personal bank account during this financial year, that now I don't now how to reconcile in Xero.
I went into settings (Chart of Accounts) and adjusted the Sales Tax settings for invoicing so that I wouldn't have to fiddle with it every time I invoice.
If we did exactly the same sales every day for those three days my sales according to the till will be &#163;1575 in cash, however, because i only bank notes (like most businesses like mine, and is not unusual) the deposit i make will actually be &#163;1425.
Hi, it's not possible to set invoice reminders at different frequencies for different customers, or set them at frequencies of 'business days' after due date rather than just days.
I am attempting to track item that I sell via there serial number, I have tried to use tracking but there's no option here for this, so I tried to add a line to a invoice with the serial number and then search invoices with part of that number, but that will not work either, Has anybody done this,  any ideas on how to do this, I didn't think that this was a non standard option on accounting systems.
They use their personal bank account to fund costs directly related to their business as well.
I have been using the app to photo and add reciepts/invoices from suppliers so that i can reconcile them off my accounts.
Hi there, I am trying to create a true cash flow report on Xero.
For example they may have overdue invoices going back five months but elect on their payment advice to pay an invoice from last month.
After consideration, I'm after a feature that will allow me to link bills to invoices so I can see i) if a sales invoice has multiple bills attached to it, and ii) if any invoices are missing bills entirely.
We do have an ebay account which is linked via paypal but i cant see anywhere to add daily takings and small payouts like cleaning materials etc.
Some of our customers are required to pay different bank accounts.
Also I would like to be able to add a visible note onto the customer invoice, again, I cannot find a way of doing this?
HelloMy client just change from MYOB to XERO but I am a new XERO'S user, so I am a bit confuse about how to manage some accounts.
Hi we are  freight forwarding company want to use xero accounting software but in invoiceing we cant put details of shipment  consignor consignee etc etc and other info on invoice suggestion please to use this software
I have no idea how to input the information into Xero (I've set up a separate dummy bank account called Factoring, and I've input the invoices which have been assigned).
My son has just started a company and isn't registered for VAT, so his Invoices should not show the VAT line, which is standard on the invoices template.
We need to allocate each client's amount to their "account" so that it is effectively treated as a prepayment or credit against their invoice.
At the moment we do not use Xero for this or indeed for any element of our Sales Ledger, just for reconciling the bank account, we use our (soon to be changed) CRM for this purpose and generate a monthly report from the CRM of all receipts (at the macro level ie not detailing by client) as a spreadsheet then code into the spreadsheet the nominal codes that these payments need to be allocated to and send off to our accountant for them to code into Xero.
We are in the process of changing the CRM and whilst the new CRM can run this process pretty much as before, it would be much slicker to use Xero; to reconcile the receipts from 3rd parties to client accounts in Xero, to produce invoices from Xero showing the credits / pre-payments.
I should mention I did investigate the payment link button on xero created invoices, however that is manual process.
Hi All,             We currently use HSBC Business Internet Banking.
We use Stripe to take card payments for our invoices via the 'pay online' link.
We have a client who will be making a pre-payment and to do this, would like to pay by card using the link in the invoice.
Hello,I have just started setting up Xero and have a question regarding disbursements; We are a consultant engineering company a lot of the time we pay out for maps/application fees/agreement fees etc.
Hi, I would like to restart my account and prefer to update the banking info with the starting dates of June 2015.
So it's not in a report, just in account view.
Hi, I own an online gluten free grocery and use the products I sell for personal use for my family.
However I need to send a report to the Management Company listing all of the outstanding invoices for all of their sub branches (this report must group each branch together).
Hi allI have a client who uses batch payment to pay his trainers (he runs a gym).
I tried to reconcile the bill, to use split bill function, however, it could be only use for bill amount higher than bank statement amount.
Hi, I've just come to check my account and its no longer there.
My Daughter's shop sells three types of items which we need to account for separately so clearly these will have separate accounts in Xero.
I would like to be able to generate a monthly sales report that is broken down by revenue category and by tracking group, in my case personnel.
The company is setup, new bank accounts setup, etc.
I have just gone through to send an invoice and the "draft" I had done is missing, Figured I hadn't saved it properly then remembered that you cant send them unless its saved, so it must me somewhere I have checked the customers statments, draft invoices, unpaid, paid you name it.
Hi there,I just noticed  PAYG tax withheld doesn't automatically add up in BAS.
This should only take a few minutes of your time and will involve transferring data electronically from your Xero account.
Currently in our paper system I have a paper copy of each invoice, I enter the invoices and then pay the ones I need to by uploading the batch payment file into our bank account.
Each one checks the paper copy of the invoice with a print out from the bank account of the batch file from Xero.
This would be too time consuming considering we're talking about 100 invoices in each payment run.
We may also have to look at changing how we do things but if there was an easy way to download each of those invoices and be able to save them in a folder so they just flick through the folder to see the invoices paid, or something like that, that would be helpful.
Initially it was just linen, photo frames etc and I was expensing these items because we weren't actually itemising these on customer invoices - they were just 'part of the hourly rate'.
We have just changed accountants and I am finding out new things all the time.
I am needing a report that I can generate monthly that details the transactions of my bank accounts it must include: INCOME date, invoice no, debtor, transaction description amount.
Could I set up an account of sorts where I can place this amount of trade dollar or do I just leave them as outstanding sales account.
I need to get a number of invoices added in to make it easy for tax time.
The buyer sent the $200 purchase payment to my business account and now I would like to reconcile that payment.
I have the following accounts listed in the Plugin which I have to add the relevant matching Code for Xero to track:However not one of these accounts are listed in the Chart Of Accounts on my Xero dashboard.
I see the option to "Add New Account".
Hi AllI have just started a small business and will be using a ute I purchased personally.
i need to reconcile my bank by matching a payment  to the right customer balance.
In plain English we explain exactly how to get your business on the front page of Google and how exactly you can take advantage of all the new features Google is releasing to help local and small businesses owners like you grow!
Google Business is a free tool that Google provides and it acts kind of like a Facebook company page or a LinkedIn business page.
I am arranging for her to set up bank feeds as she wants to stop using spreadsheets and use Xero alone.
Hi,I've done some work developing an Excel add on that allows you to create draft invoices in Xero using Excel data by simply clicking a button in Excel.
If you create your quotes or do your pricing in Excel then I may be able to automate the process of creating Xero invoices for you.
I am wondering whether I will be able to reconcile a net receipt (sales minus credit note) directly from the bank reconciliation tab?
Fore example, I have receipt of $800 showing as my bank transaction which is a net of a sales invoice of $1000 and a credit note I have created against that invoice of $200.
eg any credit would have the bank refference contained in the first line and the refference field would contain the payment method (POS/MIS)  like this.
2) when we invoice using the app, we enter the inventory code, but when we go to save it it says "You must assign invoice items to accounts before approving" it is all set up correctly and this message has only just started to appear in the last few days when we have made no changes to the inventory and have been using the same codes for years!
Hi AllI run a small telecoms consultancy business and have recently switched to Xero for my accounts.
I am aware that the payment would be reconciled as a simple transfer between my actual bank account and the credit card 'bank' account in Xero, but it would be good to have a way of seeing upcoming payments required for the card.
When we had an invoice from a supplier that we were only going to use once, or if its was a receipt for fuel from one of many servo's we would enter the name of the supplier in the payee section, not create a new card for every single invoice.
Ideally I would like to have as much pre-printed as possible and just print the variable fields on each invoice.
I need a solution where I can quickly create invoices with stock items and print off the invoices.
I currently use sage for bookkeeping and inventory management but writing out the invoices and uploading them to sage is time consuming,  any ideas?
My line of business is a trade and I would like to be able to have a job card template that could automatically pull through the customers details and be assigned a job number.
I'm a sole trader running a business well under the VAT threshold - I don't charge it and am able to claim the full VAT inclusive amount for expenses, invoices etc.
Hi,My business is based in Australia, however my customers and market are in the USA, so my payments and receipts are in USD and need to be converted into Australian dollar invoices for reporting purposes.
Basically I just want to know how to allocate a credit to a supplier account (putting me in credit) rather than having to allocate it to a specific invoice.
The add-on allows you to import your Xero contacts and users, and Invoice time and expenses they track through Xero.
Hello All,We've been using Xero for over 15 months and have recently switched from Bank of America to M&T Bank for business purposes.
but they take their 'fees' out before they deposit, I know I could just put what I received, but I would like to know the total amount of fees I pay to Certegy / Take Home Layby at the end of the month/ year.
Every report I've looked at, including the new Account Transactions report, lists every line item on an invoice.
When we buy in the goods we coded it to these accounts and when we raised the sales invoice to our other centres this was also coded to the recharge account meaning we could see a Debit and a Credit transaction place (the overall thought being that this account should net of to zero if all recharges have been processed correctly)Recently we have been asked to change this process and begin to stop using the recharge accounts we have set up as mentioned above to issue the sales invoice to but to use a set of specific accounts that all of our recharge sales should fall in to for example advertising recharges or staff recharges.
These recharges to our other centres will now mark up applied meaning not only do we have to be able to make sure all of the recharges have been registered as a purchase and then also as a sale afterwards but we also need to be able to see how much each recharge is making us as a mark up.
I have 3 clients and need a way to track expenses, time spent on projects, and be able to bill these clients.
I'm a single person business now but that new product should garner the need for employees, cost of goods tracking, inventory as well as the typical expense/income reporting and of course sales tax payments.
* Shopify connection* Amazon FBA (sell on Amazon)* Budgeting* Expense / Income reporting* Invoicing* Auto-bank transaction importing* Accurate Sales Tax tracking and Reporting for multiple states* Inventory tracking with cost of goods reporting* Payroll for multiple employees* Features that are more robust of a small business that retails productsThe two options I'm considering are Xero and Quickbooks Pro Desktop 2015.
Hi, I've recently signed up to use Xero and added my accounts for last year.
I bought an awning for &#163;630 - made a payment for this and got an invoiceHowever a month later I exchanged it for a cheaper one, so got a refund for &#163;281 and a new invoice for &#163;350My bank statements therefore show 1 payment out for &#163;630 and a credit for &#163;281I only want to claim the VAT on the &#163;350 invoice thoughAny help would be appreciatedThanksDan
Like to use Xero to invoice clients in-home and email receipt.
5% to be paid to the man after charging 20%, but do I need to set up a 'new' rate or can I just use the 20% rate available in the selections?
I made a draft Sales Invoice for &#163;1,500 but need advice on how best to proceed.
However, I do need to set up a new bank account and transfer all my funds to the new account.
I'll be using the same credit union that I already use, but I'll be setting up a completely new account, and I'll start using the new account right away for all business transactions.
I still have outstanding invoices in the old account, and I need to have all my records available and everything has been based on that account for 2014.
Is it necessary to create a whole new account in Xero, keep the old one around for past transactions, and manage bank accounts?
We now have a new person (Jane) who will want to use the <accounts>@businessname.
It also asked Jane to setup which company she wants to join, so it looks like it has set her up as a new user not attached to our business.
Is it possible either within xero or via an add-on to have an invoice created in xero when a customer makes an online purchase via payment express?
I've been using Xero for over a year, and had been creating a Purchase Invoice (Bill) with, say, 30 line items, then approving, then reconciling in bank account after payment made.
For everything other than issuing invoices to customers I am just using spend money (when I make a purchase cash or by debit card) or receive money (For when I make cash sales at markets) .
What do I need to add to my Chart of Accounts?
Hi,Does anyone know how to run a report for all accounts filtered by more than one tracking options, I just moved from MYOB and was able to run this kind of report on MYOB.
We are looking for some Add-On's to work in line with our current Xero system, specifically a piece of payroll software that will directly integrate with Xero, but also pull details of employee hours from a job tracking/time tracking system Does anyone use a similar setup, and can recommend the Add On's for us to use?
Hi,Our business has an NAB cheque account (automatic bank feed is set up) and a Business Visa Card which I want to have bank feeds on.
Hi,When I run aged payable detail report today, under invoice reference column, it was not shown anything in it today.
Hello I currently have bank feed enabled for my standard business bank account and at present it shows up with my monthly credit card which is direct debit as I pay it every month.
I found it a complete pain to generate an invoice (or receive money transaction) each week to reconcile the bank entry to revenue, sometimes the amount of customer payments exceeded 250 each time.
I am a sole trader using Xero so do not need to approve expense claims for payment, I approve all my expenses because I pay for expenses myself!
I would like an add on to Xero because we will be tracking the financials associated with the equipment in Xero i. e purchase/maintenance costs, sales invoicing, depreciation.
Ideally we would like to export contact & invoice details, add to the new company subscription.
I have started a new business with a new bank account and from 1st April the new business sent out invoices to some of my old companies customers who have moved across to the new company.
)My problem is that some of my old customers have accidentally paid new invoices into my old company's bank account.
Hi All,Some of our major clients use invoice imaging and automatic receipt and filing systems for emailed invoices; often managed by a third party like UniData based in India.
I have applied for a Bank Feed from the new account that will be permanently linked to Xero.
I have tried running the Detailed Account Transactions report on a cash basis, but this does not match the money going in/out the bank account (which surprises me, but that's another story).
Hi all - I've just tried to set up my first pay run in Xero and whilst it all flows through and adds up correctly, it doesn't use the PAYE payable or NIC payable accounts (825 and 826) on the balance sheets.
It's just me and my husband employed in our small partnership business, and want to make sure that adding our personal details and bank accounts in the payroll is the correct way to pay ourselves a weekly salary, according to tax obligations etc?
Once my business starts generating money I need to pay back the debts it owes.
In MYOB I used to be able to set up a sales template that I would reuse every day to input the daily sales figures in from the restaurant.
Hi thereWe don't raise Xero invoices for our occasional suppliers, instead we'll simply create the transactions at reconciliation time, adding a new contact as necessary.
Instead, I'd like the discount amount to be coded to an account in Xero.
HI there, I need help urgently and hopefully someone can, I have downloaded my bank statements from my bank into Xero and for some unknown reason the dates have changed to months before and months after April this year when I started using Xero but the amounts and names on the statements are correct,   I have pasted below a couple of them in the hopes you will understand what I am saying and how to fix it - and if I cant hoe do I get rid of all the statements and start again, I sincerely hope that the spacing does not drop down below when I post this if so I'm sorryCreate ruleCredit4 Sep 2014M1374883 09/04Part=Bc 0.
Company A based in New Zealand (NZ)Company B based in Australia (AU)While we were getting our Company B setup for banking in Australia, all of our transactions in Australia were going through our Company A bank account (Visa)(I think) We need to transfer these into our Company B organisation in Xero and I was wondering the best way of doing this.
Can Xero create invoices using my sole trader (normal) name and ocassionally can I create invoices using my business name?
This is the GST account - we operate with 2 main GST accounts not the 1 like Xero does, this creates a huge problem when rolling the file into Handisoft - we have been able to get around it by mapping our accounts correctly and putting the Xero GST account into out GST clearing then manually altering this to make the GST collected and GST paid read what they should - this seems to be the opposite of what we are wanting as an accounting in the terms of time saving firm has anyone found an easier way?
I am quite new to Xero and business in general as a small business owner, so I appreciate all of the help I can get.
Hi,What tax code in Xero do I use for sales to USA.
Hi guys,When using xero online invoices and the "pay now" button would you or your clients like the ability to add a credit card surcharge to the total transaction value and help absorb costs?
I am trying to consolidate and just use Xero but have some questions about the scanned (photographed) receipts coming into Xero.
e. g. It would be fery useful to be able to include the Description as one of the field on the report so that I don't have to cross reference to find out what an invoice is for?
For my business, I need to create packing slips or delivery slips before invoices.
Hi ThereI have a client who would like to keep product warranty records for his customers linked to product sales invoices.
I am learning how use Xero invoices and need some assistance.
I am new to Xero, and trying to do my first pay run.
Hey Guys,Just wondering if you had considered adding zipPay as a tender type for consumers to pay off on their invoices.
Hi,  i am a small business user using Xero for the business accounting.
What the Xero folks recommended was to create an Undeposited Funds account, have the sales go there, then manually do a journal entry at the end of the day clearing that out and moving the monies to the checking account.
That's what I figured I would have to do and while it doesn't sound like much, it's just enough of a pain that now I'm wondering what else is going to be just enough of a pain such that perhaps Xero just isn't for me.
The account that I need to bill this to would be Cost of Sales correct?
We have all forms of payment deposited into a clearing account and deposit from these into the main business checking to match the deposits on the bank statements.
I need at any time to be able to pull off a report to tell me how that department is performing against their own personal budget (including all expenditure and revenue costings).
I just need to know what my account balance was two weeks ago.
Staff member uploads bill/invoice received into a Xero accounts payable workflow.
They are sold as a package and we invoice the client the price for the "Package"; however, we still need to record the individual items as sales.
Perhaps some useful add-ons or questions that your clients have asked that are related to their industry and how the operate their business on Xero.
Once an invoice has been approved and a payment put against that invoice it is not possible to make changes to that invoice, other than the accounts column.
We need to be able to (fairly regularly) change the quantity column after an invoice has been approved due to clients changing their mind and adding more.
Hello, as a sole business owner I often take cash out of the business bank account to pay small expenses like taxis.
HiI would like to allow my customers to pay by direct transfer to my bank account.
When we invoice a client (carpentry business) we need to allocated specific material expenses to each client from supplier of materials bill.
We started using xero 1st June 2013 and copied over April and May data for IAS and BAS reporting purposes, and although come the time to report our IAS for june in two weeks time it all looks good.
PayPal and my Business account wll have an automatic feed, and my personal account i will leave to do manually when i transfer money to myself (so my balance for that account will basically just say what iv spent of my business).
Hi To set up a Petty Cash account I have set up bank account called Petty Cash.
The account itself is setup within Xero but every time I try to set up the feed itself it gets rejected stating that my login details are incorrect.
However, in Xero I'm not able to credit the bank account directly to reflect the funds we bring to closing.
Hi, I'm new and so am just trying to add our companies onto our new Xero software.
I have finished the setup of the business and I am wanting to include the individual accounts receivable and accounts payable balances as at the conversaion date.
What my query is, is there a specific method to add the individual creditor and debtor balances into Xero, or do I simple record these balances as normal sales invoices and then include the due date and set the reference as opening balance?
The clients pay direct to my NZD bank account but are now asking for correct invoices rather than a watermarked statement on the PDF invoice that the amount is in USD or AUD.
I use VEND for my point of sale system and it is integrated into Xero with Sales going into the following accounts;The Sale itself  goes into:Debit     Accounts ReceivableCredit    SalesThe payment goes into one of the following:Credit Card ClearingCash ClearingOnline Sales Clearing (people who do bank transfers)- these are reconciled against my bank account for eftpos sales, bank transfers and cash depostisNow I accidentally put a sale through VEND as Credit Card instead of cash so no my accounts are all out of wack.
Hi,I run a bar and would like some advice on the most efficient method for processing sales/takings in Xero.
I want to be able to break both the cash and EFTPOS sales down to show what is a:dry sale - foodhire sale - room, PA & lightingwet sale - beveragesShould I:Set up two bank accounts: Cash and EFTPOSAllocate Cash and EFTPOS deposits to "200 - Sales" in the Chart of AccountsUse tracking to show categories: dry sale, hire sale, wet saleOr:Create two "Receive Money" transactions, one for Cash and one for EFTPOSCan those then be tracked?
I would also like to import some historical time data for them to see which consultants we use the most.
2) For time tracking we don't need any kind of web-based clock etc - we just need our consultants to enter their days worked weekly (Monday, Friday and half-Saturday for example) - we then need to approve it - and ideally we would be able to track consultants daily rate in the tool and pay their invoice (also would be good if that can be created automatically).
Just send myself a test invoice by email for the first time.
Hi All;I've been working on a service that's specifically aimed at small businesses that need to get invoices in and out of xero from other systems.
I use my business debit card to pay.
00When I go to Accounts Payable > New Invoice, to add the invoice; I add the details and the total comes to $330, it won't add the $33.
We use a pick/pack warehouse here and it has proved a very effective way to free up time to grow the business here.
** Using Chrome we have Plugins  for understanding who we are talking to** ^^ , for tracking the sales pipeline for our bigger business* CRM we use , it's easy, understandable by all the family and is copied most all emails we entertain*  for what, when, where, how.
Hi - we use tracking for our sales and purchase invoices.
jpg/Much of this (for example gross sales of $9700) will automatically be fed into xero via all the transactions that take place between PayPal and my Business bank account.
Also  from what I understand – purchases will pop up (after the money is deducted from either my PayPal or Business Bank Acct) and then I will reconcile by adding in purchases in the money going out via a payable invoice.
I was trying to use this section for expenses like eBay fees etc, but I just read that this is to be used only if you make a payment that’s business related out of your personal account, for example, petrol.
Similarly, for all things “expense” related if I made an automatic payment to eBay, website hosting, australia post postage fees which deducted funds out of my paypal and bank accounts, this would show up in xero as needing to be reconciled, and I would then need to create new expense items such as eBay fees, postage etc and it’s as simple as that (or use one of the categories listed, such as "fees" and "advetising")?
Hi, I invoice customers and some pay by cash which goes into my wallet, I dont bank it.
Bilbus is a new Xero Add-On - a working capital financing hub that allows businesses to use e-invoicing to present a stronger borrowing case and find commercial financing through lenders matched via the Bilbus platform.
However, most of the time the 2 payments dont add up to the amount of the invoice.
I like how with an Overpayment, it shows up as one amount even when you have used it to pay various invoices.
Hi,When creating a New Invoice the 'To' field is no wider than the Date fields and actually smaller than the 'Invoice #' and Reference fields.
Other than information for my add-on, I'm actually just interested in how other people organise their business.
I'm a sole proprietor and I use my business account even for things like buying groceries, clothes, etc.
I also use my personal account at times for business purchases.
So, I guess I would also need to know how to categorize a business expense from my personal account.
I'd love to use something like PostalMethods for sending out invoices, however looking into their pricing reveals they are USA based, and the cost of posting a letter works out to approx $1.
After a search in the Bank statements tab, to then be able to open the resulting statement lines as new tabs instead of clicking one and losing the search.
What I need, is that when you copy an Invoice it copies everything, not defaults back certain information to whatever Xero has decided it should be.
Need to be able to change the multiple of ordinary earning pay items.
When you have a lot of pay rates eg Restaurant Industry it is very time consuming to have to re create new multiple penalty rates eg Saturday, Sunday etc.
I would like to see a total to pay to employees, including reimbursements each month, so I can reconcile it against what I've entered into the bank batch payment.
50 per hourHe will also work in the same week as an in house coach at &#163;15 per hourHe will also work in the same week as an external coach at &#163;20 per hourI need Merrick to be able to select an option when submitting his time sheet so I know what hourly rate to pay him.
However if you make a "Batch" payment to one supplier for multiple invoices you are returned to the Bank Account option and then have to navigate through to the Awaiting Payment screen again.
is a shiny new online bank providing business accounts in several EU countries, but it's primarily based in Germany.
Specifically the new payables invoice summary report.
I LOVE the new micr upgrade to your check printing feature that allows me to print checks from multiple bank accounts on blank check stock!
Tax bills – GST, PAYE, Kiwisaver, ACC, etc – are still bills and ought to be included in the "Bills you need to pay" report.
The other option is to select and pay the invoices individually, not only is this time consuming but I have had an instance where my credit card has been suspended due to multiple transactions to 1 company - the bank were protecting me as they thought I was being scammed.
Can Xero send out a system generated invitation with guidance on how to use My Payroll in Xero whenever the payroll admin sets up payroll for new members and sends employee invite?
I understand you can add them when customising the report, but if you do so, then you will not be able to change the number of comparison periods in the report when you run it each time.
- Minor Adjustment when reconciling an incoming payment (e. g Part payment or minor mismatch )- Cannot add a photo when reconciling an expense (though you can when creating a receipt).
i. e if a payment comes through that you haven't already added a receipt and you want to add an attachment , you cannot process, instead you have to go back and create a new receipt with that attachment added.
Basically, what we'd like is to have a system whereby our accountants can have a special group account on Xero, which may have sub-accounts for individual members of staff, and then we can invite the *group* account to access our Xero data, which then passes on the necessary rights to anyone that our accountants have set up a sub-account for.
For those of us creating inventory as we sell it, when we add a new item to our inventory,many times we don't have a numbering scheme already in-place to number new items.
Perhaps there could be a check box to activate the account as a supplier paid on account basis, not invoice basis.
I would like to be able to differentiate between repeating invoices that are charged to the bank account and those that are charged to the credit card, as it would make looking at cash flow forecasting easier
Hi there, As our business has grown and we've setup more and more direct debits where our suppliers can take what they're owed by us at the end of the month or the following month or similar, the number of invoices sitting in 'bills' column looking like they're overdue gets a bit out of control.
It would be really swell to be able to label or separate the invoices that will essentially pay themselves so it's more clear which ones I need to pay manually.
Suggestion: Mark them out of 10 for: 1) ease or use 2) layout presentation3) pages it unnecessarily takes up4) time it takes to build a basic report with useful data from the default options
When drilling down on the balance sheet into a bank account, it would be helpful to be able to see the payment references (check numbers).
Hi Xero Team,Would be nice to add a small checkbox on the right from the Account dropdown, which will record the account chosen as default for selected Contact.
Hi there, I would like to be able to quick edit billable expenses in the 'Billable Expenses - Outstanding' report.
In our small business I sometimes manually add bills, assign to a billable expense to a customer and make a payment to our supplier.
In that case I would have to go into the bill, remove payment, re-assign customer, update, re-apply payment and then switch back to my billable expenses report.
I Just find having to 11 steps to set up a time sheet so time consuming and boring every fortnight and then having to do it for every employee which means 25 times.
I wish there was a drop down list with everyone's name on it and I could tick the employee timesheets I would like to create and then another box asking would you like to use their template then you could tick that off too.
We prefer to report by month of the date of invoice and so would like to have that option instead of just having the aged months from the date the report was run.
It would be useful to be able to directly compare the new expense claim report with credit card statements.
1ST COLUMN:                        FOLDERS:-Bank accounts-Invoices        -Quotes                         -Etc                                            2ND COLUMN: INV1INV23RD COLUMN:Preview of actual invoiceIt would make life easierEasier to search and go from one invoice to another without clicking back button or to go through the ACCOUNTS button, then Invoices all over again.
I feel like this should be easy to do as all the information is there in the tax return estimate, I would think it just needs to be pulled from those areas into one easy to read report.
As far as I can see, to repay an overpayment to a customer you would need to manually log into your Banking software & create a payment, then record this payment against the overpayment, then make sure they reconcile on the bank statement.
I was wondering whether it's possible to add a column for the invoice reference when doing a recent invoices report.
As a small business whenever we go to input an invoice we now have hundreds of business names come up - none of which we deal with or will ever deal with.
Why would you suddenly pollute our contact lists with thousands of business names that we dont deal with and at the point of creating an invoice or new contact rather than a separate optional list ___________________________________________________________________________________The Business Directory is not useful to our company as it contains businesses that we do not deal with.
It would be a good feature if you could access it when you wanted - as a separate list - But to have it come up every single time you input an invoice or try to enter a new contact is frustrating and misleading.
I have already had staff create wrong invoices for companies on this list - All I want is the list of my customers - not every single business that Xero has Why would you add something like this and not give people an option to turn it off or edit it / or be able to filter it in someway so we can see businesses in sectors that we deal with ?
It would be useful to be able to exclude draft invoices from the Customer Invoice Report (Australian Dollar).
We use tracking for job numbers which are client specific, so it would be great to be able to create the job number when setting up the new client.
Hi,It would be very nice when adding a New Pay Item, if you were able to add a Calculated Field (choice in the Pay/Tax Type drop down).
For those of us who need to calculate diesel fuel litres for our clients to claim the rebate, it can be frustrating obtaining this detail from Xero, especially when using other add-ons like Receipt Bank to push bills into Xero.
After training my staff to ONLY enter the litres (and no other detail) into the Description field in Receipt Bank, so ONLY litres push across to this field in Xero, I was alarmed when running the Report - Account Transactions = Plant Fuel & Oil, to discover that without choice, Xero shows BP - 440 in the Description field on this report (for example, when the supplier was BP).
It is such a time vampire to go to chart of accounts and add it.
I access Lloyds Business Banking and our two bank accounts work fine to Xero.
I want to be able to use this to be able to better manage and group to give us more meaningful information.
Also include in this report W1 & W2 figures included so you could reconcile this each month/quarter to see if you're on track just like you do with GST
)To make time sheet entry really fast, we would also like to see:*  Ctrl + or Ctrl - on date and start/end time to go up or down 5 minutes*  Autocomplete for job # & task, which searches by job #, client name or job nameI don't think it needs a mobile version because we only use this with a real keyboard.
Hi Xero, If you could run a profit & loss report for a given period & then have the ability to select which accounts you would like a copy of the account transactions printed as well it would save a lot of time when preparing work papers.
At present we use, Reports -> Account Transactions-> select multiple accounts & then print the various GL's as required.
It is tedious and time consuming to open a new tab go to contacts, we then need to click on Edit so we can now see all the email addresses to be able to choose the one we want and then cut and paste.
I want to be able to produce a report, with general ledger expense code "cost of goods sold", showing which customers were billed, by adding an option of "billable expenses" to the report.
It would be great to be able to get away from having to have bank access in order to use xero and be able to be comfortable with complete and accurate bank feeds.
We use the discuss tab to communicate with alot of clients however when they send a receipt/invoice into Xero via receipt bank for example, we have no way of knowing they have sent anything in without clicking on each Match tab in the bank rec screen.
Hi,Account Transactions can be sorted by pressing on the header of one of the columns, but it can only happen to one column at a time.
Every time I create a new Bill, and have a 'new item' to add to the inventory the created bill disappears.
This time I'd entered over 50 items, had to add one new item into the inventory, and the whole 50+ item Bill I was partway through disappeared.
If Xero already integrates with PayPal to receive sales invoices payment, it would be nice if it would also integrate with PayPal the other way around so we will be able to pay bills from Xero through Paypal.
It basically skips the process of clicking the link to then view the invoice, why not just email the pretty looking invoice in the email content?
Rather than having to click the cog for each item in Inbox add a shortcut button by each file to quickly add file to a new bill or invoice.
We'd like more choices: Bank, Invoice, Bill.
Hi AllI would like to have the current balance of my customer to appear on the sale invoice.
Alternatively it would be good to be able to delete that section so we can replace it with a new schedule/text block using the correct wording, but the section cannot be deleted either in the current report.
I've tried splitting payments and creating an over-payment but this only allows me to allocate it to one account - I need the overpayment to be split over 5 accounts.
Tables need to be more customisable - we need to be able to pick alignment options so we can left align for words and right align for numbers.
We use MailChimp that integrated with Xero and being able to segment client communication would be a great advantage.
Reconciling data from our bank account with invoices for sales that were done on Amazon doesn't work because Amazon transfers funds to our bank account in bulk, not per sale.
Hi,Small change but would be useful if invoices could show the year instead of just the day and month.
It would be helpful to be able to use the "Display Name" on email templates, invoice reminders, and the actual invoice itself.
We would like the ability to add a switch rule to the report code so they all GL accounts linked to that report code show without being grouped.
Hi,When we have a contact up on the screen in to mobile app, it would be great to be able to see their outstanding invoices (along with a total) right there.
This would allow to easily lump together different invoices in foreign currency to be able to see what payments need to be made (for example) in EUR, GBP and USD and hence easily separate and plan payment batches / currency purchase requirements etc.
i. e. If I just posted a very detailed transaction and want to recycle the notes from the last posted receipt, I should be able to copy and paste it into a new receipt, just as I should be able to copy and paste notes from a text message into the notes screen of the app.
I often run profit and loss reports per job (ie tracking category), then I add tabs for each account code showing the detail behind the report.
It would be good to not have to click into each account to add it to the report.
I need to be able to amend sales invoices by amount.
As part of our monthly management accounts we need to be able to report on the expenditure for that month which might not have been approved yet - due to various approval chains.
It would therefore be good to have a setting in Xero to provide companies an option to report unapproved invoices on reports.
Hi,Nice touch of flexibility with the new options for copying an invoice.
I always push invoices through to xero and send out from there so I have to seperate it all in xero by adding lines and typing manually which is very time consuming.
Can we also please get the option to display balances at the transaction levelThe intervals to be:NoneEntryDayWeek4-weeklyMonthlyQuarterlyHalf yearlyYearlyThis will save a lot of time in downloading to Excel and adding formulae at the transaction level when we want to see the balances at key points within the selected date range, which is practically every time the report is run.
It would be great to have a Payroll widget we could add to the main dashboard that would show upcoming tax deadlines, time sheets/time off to approve, etc.
When you have a lot of low value bank transactions over a short period of time it would be great to show just unreconciled transactions.
Currently we have a few files on our practice's Xero list for our staff's businesses which we would like to be able to set a password at a practice level for confidentiality, so our staff can still receive the benefits of us holding the Xero subscription.
It'd be helpful to be able to set the default currency for sales invoices based on the branding theme.
Being able to import invoices into Xero would make things immeasurably easier.
At the very least, being able to insert new lines into an invoice (or multiple new lines at once) at any row would be a lot easier than having to add a row to the bottom and dragging it up to the top.
Already in a contact group for by claim date, I would lie to able to export thier Name / Account Number / Invoices Due to Excel for simple upload to our claim system.
I have multiple clients who like to manually add a payment/receipt to an invoice or a bill instead of matching it to the bank statement line.
When entering sales or purchases - selecting from the dropdown to change TAX to Exclusive, Inclusive or NO tax is very time consumingA keyboard shortcut would help eg Just typing "E" (Excl), "I" (incl)," N" (No Tax) would be very helpfulMaybe you'd also need to change the text too  .
Without having multiple line items on a client's invoice, I would like to invoice on one line item and be able to track it by the recruiter and salesperson for reporting purposes (and later commission calculation).
I would like to see the ability to sort bank statements/account transaction lines by date AND time.
We run the payments schedule for the current months 20ths on only the accounts due for payment on the 20th of the current month.
We currently use paypal as our payment processor solely because Xero treats PayPal as a bank account, which nearly automates the process of separating out payment processing fees from gross sales and reconciling everything.
At the moment the result is the invoice will not send as it thinks I do not have the item in stockThe ability to be able to hire equipment and not sell it is imperative to my business.
Dear Xero Support,I would like to let you know that you don't have Banesco Bank (USA) as a bank feed, this is strange as Quickbooks and Zohobooks do.
: Awaiting Approval and Awaiting Payment don't look significantly different ,and are hard to distinguish at a glance - can't tell you how much of my time has been wasted clicking backwards and forwards between the lists of invoices to see why I can't allocated a bank line to a specific invoice that I know is there only to realise , that it's a draft , and the status is inexplicably showing as Awaiting Approval instead of Draft DRAFT is a much clearer word and better status for the GUI Please change it back
At the moment if accept a payment for a couple for instance with separate invoices, zI have to make the multiple item deposit to another bank account like cash, and then transfer it over to paypal account.
I really like working within Xero and like how when a receipt is logged/reconciled against a given client, it can automatically be appended to the next invoice if still outstanding.
You would be able to see how much you're selling from any time period you want, this would useful for me as I book labour out and I would be able to see how productive the staff are in a given month or 1/4 or year
This will reduce time to reconcile by hours by eliminating the need to search then check then search then check over and over again for multiple invoices associated with one bank statement line item.
I have the multi currency edition and would like to be able to pay my vendors via cheque from all currencies that I have bank accounts in.
Hi, I would like to request a similar feature to batch payments but for those businesses that still use cheque's to make their payments.
I would like to be able to select all the invoices we are paying and then there be an open field for us to enter a cheque number which be allocated to all those invoices that have been selected.
It would be really helpful and save so much time if the pdf attached when creating a repeating invoice/bill would also transfer over to each new invoice/bill created every month.
I am aware that there is a feature for Amazon sellers to integrate sales from Amazon to Xero, but it would be incredibly helpful for me and my clients to be able to integrate Amazon purchases through Xero.
An example is below:Business "A" >  A-QU0001Business "B" >  B-INV0003This would make it very easy to identify the business involved based on the invoice/quote etc.
We'd like to have an option where we can see how many items there are on a certain invoice so we can add that discount to the order.
Hi,It would be great to have merge accounts function in chart of accounts as it has in contacts.
As accountants when we do our clients year end accounts and some clients have annual GST return we really need to be able to run the GST reports, currently we have to put them onto GST cashbooks just do the accounts which then causes admin issues of having to keep track of which files need to then be downgraded.
I would like to be able to use Xero Payroll software as a stand alone system.
However I need to be able to pay for a worked or unworked day on the original day.
We use an approval process for sales invoices, largely because there's a big "Awaiting Approval" tab in Xero that makes that workflow possible, and because our business process requires it.
When you're working on a bill payment (and probably in a sales payment too) that involves accounts from two different currencies, a box opens where you can enter an exchange rate.
have larger storage facility up to 400GB and pay for extra storage if needed so that we can use the file storage as a server to save all our client data in the cloud otherwise our option is to use google drive be nice to have everything central on our xero accounting
Very simply, having set up the new contact and their sales invoice details, we would click "Take Card Payment" and a virtual terminal pops up allowing us to enter the card details.
I would like a link next to my on-screen sales invoices allowing me to enter customer's card details please.
It would save me so much time each yearIn conjunction with this I am adding a request for batch payment of credits like you do with purchase invoices, currently I have to go into each individual credit, enter the date, account and reference for each credit note to be paid.
Just had to re add an investment notes after just deleting it.
Suggestion:Be able to record time spent on certain clients / jobs, then link it to a sales invoice.
I would like to be able to add blank lines to Invoices and PO so that the 'footer'of each is displayed at the bottom of the page and not immediately under the last item added.
I really like the New Account Transaction report format, but it would be nice to have a column that shows a running balance.
Hi XeroI think it would be great if you could export/print a GST audit report by sorting the expenses/income by account code instead of the default 'sorted by date' - as clients like to see how much they are spending for each 'expense item'.
Considering how often users need to log in to their accounts, and having seen Xero's refusal to add a 'remember me' functionality, can we at least propose having the last used email/username to be pre-filled in the account login?
But, like a big percentage of Xero users, I use Safari on a Mac - and Xero says you can only get photos into Xero with Chrome or Firefox.
Would be great to be able to run a report which has the running balance, so that we dont need to keep exporting to excel.
Every entry into Xero, every line item should be able to be billable to a client - not just a whole transaction, but each line item, to help build this report.
For example:I can create a 'VAT registration date' custom field but it would be logical to add this to the pre-existing 'Tax and Company' heading so it appears after the 'VAT number' fieldORI can create a 'second email address' custom field but then can't add that to the pre-exsiting 'Contact Details' headingIn general more customisation would be useful for custom fields including being able to add data tags
Dear Support,I noted that XERO is currently pull the last "reference"data for interconnected documents into Account Transactions Report , for example, in serial sales invoice and receipt transaction; system will equate "reference" information for both- by using one that is captured in receipt transaction.
While in the other hand, I need to substantiate the sales invoice issuance i. e, to pointing its invoice number within the report to auditor and tax authority.
Hi,I am just trying to make the values as blank in Payment Terms (Sales terms) of contact.
I would like a third digit to handle customers who group payments together into one and pay around 120-150 days after the end of the invoice month.
Now, I need to go to Accounts, Sales then "See All" above Quotes.
Add an audit log for leave requests, date and time of sumbission and who created the request, date and time of approval and approver.
How can I print a report that shows-Supplier A - total payment (for more than one invoice)Supplier B - total payment (for more than one invoice)At present all I can find to print is a report that showsSupplier A - one invoiceSupplier A - one invoiceSupplier A - one invoiceSupplier A - one invoiceSupplier A - one invoiceSupplier B - one invoice Supplier B - one invoiceSupplier B - one invoiceEtc etc.
it makes for a very long report without totals for each supplier, just a list of all invoices paid.
Hi we are starting to get a lot of cashbook clients who would like to add to their chart of accounts.
However the ability to add a comment column would make it much easier for me a track the status of each statement, such as "contacted, customer said they will pay on Friday, no response, need to call, send to debt collector".
As this comes up whenever I next post an invoice to that account, it is irritating and time consuming to have to keep bypassing the option and have to select add another invoice.
Foreign currency transactions in the Business Activity Statement currently use the invoice date, not the payment date, as the conversion date.
I work for a UK Multi Academy Company and as part of our VAT 126 claim we need to provide a report that provides the details of all invoices paid with VAT.
We would like to be able to put our best foot forward when emailing our clients and as we work mainly B2B we would like to show the EX VAT amount in our emails.
It would be a nice feature to be able to set a default email template to a customer as we have two three types of customers factoring account customers, direct account customers not factored and cash/credit/debit card customer, this is need as we have to but different banking information etc on the email template I need to use.
Is it possible to add the total sales for a period to the sales tax (for period) report?
I would like Xero to add the ability to flag the Taxable Payments Annual Report (TPAR) as an amended report.
I want to be able to add credit notes faster, Currently you can add another credit immediately after finishing a credit however it skips the allocating step and in doing this it ends up wasting more time trying to track down the credit notes as they get lost through all the invoices (To be honest they can be found easily enough but it does take extra time)I want to be able to add another credit note straight after entering/allocating a credit with out having to go to any other screens.
You are restricting Xero users to only be able to use Invoice numberCurrencyAmount dueShortcodeOften back office, or xml exports, or reconciliations have references that are required.
I would like to be able to display the Contact's Account number in the new Aged Receivables Summary Report
Being unable to use a font consistent with company design (I am not asking for every font under the sun, just say the top 10 in use worldwide – Times, Arial, Trebuchet, etc) presents an UNPROFESSIONAL image to my employees & consequently all the other organisations who may end up seeing our employee payslips courtesy of Xero.
Sales or management staff would be able to see which of their clients have paid without relying on the accounts department.
Would save the accounts department a lot of time and empower the sales staff.
I suggest this as I've just been stung with a large fine for forgetting to pay my VAT bill even though I submitted the return in time, I use the Purchases ledger to remind me to pay my bills - as it wasn't in there I forgot to pay it.
So all in all, i would like an "online payment on/off feature" per every invoice.
Hi Support,I have 8 accounts and 2 staff (users) whom I need to urgently suspend all their Xero access.
Often contact people & details are the same for multiple entities - we should be able to select an existing contact to add to another entity instead of having to add the same contact each time, with no link or correlation.
Again nothing stopping someone from just entering any old balance or copying it from the bank recon report but it introduces/enables accountability and transparency.
I would like to see the software recognize that you have just emailed the invoice & it should be marked as sent at that point automatically.
Barclays feeds are currently available for ordinary current accounts, however multiple business accounts and services provided via the website Barclays.
Secondly even though I have removed the tick from the Chart of Accounts against various account codes that I do not want to show on a expense claim - new receipt window on mobile/tablet.
HI,It would be nice to have the net vat payment total at the bottom of the sales tax report.
You need to pay multi-currency invoices indivdually. '
Hi XeroYou have recently added the Add last items option to invoices and bills allowing the previous content to be copied into a new invoice or bill, which is absolutely brilliant, but can this feature be extended to include spend money transactions as well for those entries that are neither an invoice or bill?
OK, like me, I'm sure that you love Xero,   I use Xero for my business and love it so much that want to be able to .
All these details are on the statements already, just need to be able to get it happening automatically.
The facility to be able to export all unpaid invoices into Excel and changing invoices which have been paid from status with awaiting payment to paid.
When a new recurring payment is set up on my Paypal account it automatically creates a repeating invoice in Xero.
I would like to be able to change the effective life in the event that I would like to reassess the effective life.
We need a way to be able to move the individual fields on a check to align with the checks that we use.
It would be great to be able to use the Invoice reminder tool to also include hyperlinks, so that a client can just click on a link and it would take them to an external site.
How the report appears on the view page is quite acceptable and the colours are good but when you download the report to a PDF it comes out just as boring black!
To be able to schedule invoice payment dates.
I would like Xero to have some kind of warning pop up that come up if you try to leave that invoice screen before you have emailed the invoice.
I would like to be able to set the Chart of Accounts to show the newest date first, Instead of always having to change it, it would be nice to set this as a default setting
I THINK THAT TO BE ABLE TO EXPORT SELECTED ITEMS ONLY WILL BE BENEFICIAL TO EVERYONE FROM TIME TO TIME.
ie My business does not have a credit card, and I have to pay for Xero every month from my personal card.
Hi,I'd like the ability to manually initiate a refresh/update of a direct bank feed like when using a Yodlee feed.
The pay run shows this as three separate rows:Ordinary hours = 24Annual leave = 10Sick leave = 4I would like to add a total at the bottom that shows it as 38hrs in TOTAL for this pay run.
On the Sales tab and Purchases tab it would be a nice feature if you could add a column to include the tracking categories.
Is it possible to have the new reporting features extended to be able to provide a sales by customer report that is able to be filtered by tracking category?
Hi Guys, great new report but can I suggest a couple of tweaks?
I would like to be able to select and move more than one row at a time when editing draft sales invoices.
Right now it takes a long time to group like items in an invoice and it would be good if there was a better way.
I would like the ability to create a new credit note to reconcile to a payment.
It would be good to be able to upload the bank statement to the reconciliation report as per the facility with bills and invoices.
Therefore we just want to be able to run a report / log to show when items are approved; who approved them; and if approval was done in Xero or Add-on.
You would need a screen to enter the data of directors and shareholders (often the same) where you need to retain their physical address and also the anniversary date of the company so you don't forget to pay the ASIC bill.
We would like the ability to create Intrastat Supplementary Declaration reports from Xero in addition to the current EC Sales List.
I want to be able to run a report that shows all the 'transfer money' transactions from our UK (GBP) bank to our French (Euro) bank.
Report should include ;- summary showing average rate, total £ and € amounts- option to select date range, all or some bank accounts (so we can remove transfers between French accounts)- all transactions (both sides), dates, amounts, ex rate.
Hi,I would like to make a suggestion regarding purchase invoices potentially being duplicated.
e. g. For sales invoices awaiting payment for one company you would have: https://go.
Would be really handy to be able to filter this report by bank account
Preparing and importing statements is time-consuming enough as it is, owing to the lack of bank feed, so it's a complete pain not to be able to correct mistakes directly in the reconciliation screen.
When you have , mark this as billed, then create a bill and save this as awaiting approval - if you were to search using the search tab (magnifying glass button) using the  # (as this is what our suppliers reference their invoices against, this the best way to find the correct bill in our business) , go to the notes section of this P. O where it says "copied to bill" - follow the link and it will take you to the invoice that is awaiting approval.
Hi, I'd like to be able to check each invoice reminders before they go out automatically and give the OK for it to be emailed.
Hi,It would be great if I could add an automated customer statement to an invoice reminder and other attachments (letters of demand, debt recovery notice etc) to later reminders.
I have been advised by Xero that amendments to the Taxable Payments Annual Report TPAR, are NOT able to be lodged through Xero, therefore a paper copy needs to be ordered from the ATO.
To ensure all transactions in that suspense account have been linked to a customer, one need to have:1. the ability to display the 'assigned customer' in the Account Transactions report (https://go.
I really like the new Reporting Framework, but I want to describe a feature that I think should be added to the P&L reportsAdding additional information in the Rows - To be able to breakdown Row (account) by Contact or Tracking Category.
When a customer is on the phone placing an order we want to be able to see there and then that they have outstanding invoices that need paying before we accept a new one.
Partner Beneficiary Shareholder mapping codes don't go far enough with the limitation of 1-5, also there should be separate Opening Balance Mapping Codes to be able to automate Report Template Creation of Shareholder Partner Beneficiary & Owner Accounts.
We should be able to add a Client Report field in these reports to automatically name each Shareholder/Partner/Beneficiary rather than tediously having to do this each time we start a new client report template.
1-99This plus the ability to insert a FIELD CODE in the Group Account Name in Report Templates would enable the necessary Shareholder Partner Owner Beneficiaries to be fully automated at Green Xero Template level rather than the current time consuming repetitive process that is necessary with the current Xero limitations.
It would be helpful to be able to EXPORT and IMPORT report template creation to excel to enable editing of mapping codes and column layout & ordering outside of Xero browser at the MY XERO or CLIENT level (like we can do with can do with Chart Creation and Mapping Codes.
When setting up a new codes in Chart of Accounts, it would be great if you had the function to attach the relevant Report Code here, rather than doing separately.
We would like to have the ability to determine what bank accounts feed into this report.
It's so inconvenience when I need to edit a existing schedule to meet certain requirements or there are added charted accounts needed to be included in the existing report draft.
I'd like to be able to split up a payment to go to different accounts -- all on one screen instead of having to waste all the time switching between screens.
Hi,Just noticed this functionality is only available when 'Adding a Purchase' from the Bills window - but not if I tick on the image in my online xero folder and add the bill that way.
Hi,I don't need to log into Xero every day so sometimes forget to pay bills on time.
It would be good to be able to have in the business performance ratios a wages to revenue ratio.
Within the annual accounts we're currently able to add new balance sheet and profit and losses from the templates.
In addition, we should also be able to format P&L and BS within the Annual accounts and that formatting then matches the quick reports outside of the accounts.
but surprisingly there is not a dropdown option to "add payment and add another" .
Hi there,Our client has several saving accounts for different purpose, GST saving account, PAYE saving account etc.
However, our partner wants to show these bank account names as per bank statements in the financial report.
Just wondering if Xero can set up reporting name option for the bank accounts, just like other account codes.
We run a customised report pack and have multiple options for reporting notes which we have to edit on each set of annual accounts, when we make a change we have to manually press save everytime and this can result in a few changes being missed - resulting in minor changes appearing on the annual accounts.
I'd like an "attach document" button on the Receive a Payment/Add Payment section of a Invoice that adds the document (a customer remittance typically) to the payment (not to the invoice).
I would like to be able to group suppliers that I need to report on.
On my dash board, I would like to see with my bank account not only how many items need to be reconciled, but also when have I reconciled until.
We'd like to request that Xero implement the ability to include the option to update the Inventory cost on a per document (Quote and/or Invoice) basis, so that we can easily calculate the sales margin per transaction.
So searching for account code makes it really easy to create a single report of all the transactions through a group of accounts.
We would like to just be able to hit a from: earliest transaction date to: latest transaction dateThis way all costs/sales allocated to that tracking job would be included within the P & LAnyone else think this would be useful
In good old MYOB Accountants Office, when you made a change to a Report Field, that new data automatically came through to the report next time you ran it.
Hi, I would like to be able to view the Activity where it shows only the financial transactions, eg, invoice issued, receipt received, credit note issued, etc.
When adding a new client my financial details are always the same for every client, i. e. Tax exclusive, VAT rate, payment terms, invoice theme etc.
I would like to be able to remove an expected date if need be.
When looking at transactions in a general ledger detail report, or when I have drilled down into a financial report, I would like to be able to click anywhere in the transaction detail to then open that particular transaction.
Hi,Would it be possible to add a bookmark at the start of a new invoice when "printing" multiple invoices to a single PDF file?
Hi,Soooo excited by your new Uncoded Statement Lines feature BUT I have clients who like me to use Google Docs for their reporting so I can't use this feature.
Hi Xero, I know that you can physically type into G15 "Estimated purchases for private use or not income tax deductable" in the activity statement report, but that won't download the adjustment into our financial statements program (i know that we should be using your system to generate financial statements, but currently Xero does not cater for livestock trading statements & SBE pooling of assets so we are not able to do so yet).
We would in green xero like to be able to sort by subscription, or get a report from xero to tell us which clients that are not on our sub but we have access to their xero file.
I would like to be able to choose to set a lock date on only purchase ledger, sales ledger etc.
In Practice Manager we need to be able to add a 'receipt' while creating a purchase order and receipting the payment.
We prefer a template for this type of  "repeating invoice" which only repeats the basis information like creditor's name, G/L code, Tax code, description etc but does not specify the 'repeating date", so that the repeating invoice wont automatically pump up on the repeating date, and we can select to use it  only when we need.
When we invoice or run statements we are only able to allocate one (or more) contacts to receive every copy of every invoice/statement irrespective of whether they want it or not!
You can schedule supplier invoices for payment but can't produce a report listing them.
In order for directors/managers to approve supplier payment runs  this report is essential  We have a copy and paste work around into a google sheet but now that we have clients wanting this functionality it looks crap explaining to them that Xero can't actually report on itIf MD's were keen to be hands on with accounts it would be fine - they can see the total due and scan through the invoices live in Xero.
I need to select all 200 invoices, print to PDF individual documents, and be able to choose a naming convention for each using the "Client Account Reference, invoice  number, tax date.
Making paperless less time consuming - Being able to scan multiple paper purchase invoice and allocate each one to  be directly attached to related purchase records already synced to Xero from integrated third party CRM software .
Also being able to use the Xero app to select and attach photo record directly to purchase records already in Xero as above.
I would like to be able to forward-date sales invoices for work I have planned in the future with an auto-send feature to be sent on the invoice date so I don't have to remember to go back and send it on time.
We need the ability to be able to import contact notes as well as being able to export all contact notes.
Examples where this would be great include:- Business changes company structure and requires a new Xero account to be created and you want to be able to import all your existing contact notes into the new Xero file- Creating a new Xero account and you want to import all contact notes from your existing accounting systemAs this information is already within Xero, there must be the ability to export this data.
Hi XeroThank you for making it able to pull the Sales Tax report by Account Type.
I would like to be able to identify how many new customers my company has added over a given period but there does not seem to be a way to do this on Xero.
I would like the system to automatically calculate and display a total of all items returned by a search,For example if I search invoices that contain "Lake" and it gives me back a list I'd like a total to be shown.
Hi Could a new additional Insert Placeholder be created for sales invoices email template to show the figure before Taxes.
Hi There, when approving Sales invoices it would be great if there was a link to take you back to the list of Sales invoices "awaiting approval".
Otherwise each time you approve you have to go back to invoices, then click on "Awaiting Approval" again and if you like me that approves many invoices a day its very slow at present.
Suggestion of allowing the "Add Payment" having a drop down to allow for "Pay and make another payment" or similar.
HiI have printed and emailed the aged payables detailed report from 'new reports' and I need to see the 'description' field on the report aswell as the supplier and invoice number.
This would allow easy matching in the reconciliation screen as Xero would already have the information recorded in it and would be able to match the transaction to the info recorded in the cheque butt area either by cheque number or transaction amount (and could exclude some entries based on the date range)The cheque butt screen would not record expenses into any accounts until such a time that the cheque is presented and the transaction is reconciled.
Our line of work like a lot others use the term estimate instead quote due to legal terminology We give an estimate of works due to not knowing any unforeseen issues til beging the job, as an estimate is a legal terminology that binds us to that price which may below out to unknown and invoice can't be adjusted
Create a report pack for SMSF - we want to be able to use Xero for all accounting needs and not have to separate between products.
I would like to see a new report or query added to the smart lists under the contacts tab.
It would save me a lot of time if the Profit and Loss report could give a detailed report by all expenses rather than having to individually open each expense and generate the detailed breakdown of expenses and then patching them all together in one spreadsheet.
Hi,Our client uses PayPoint to process credit card sales receipts for their business.
Instead of having only Paid and Awaiting Payment can we also get a Part Paid notification in the Sales list with a new due date option.
In our business many clients are issued a monthly invoice but pay weekly for fortnightly.
I'd like a way to use working days instead of calendar days for our payment terms.
As part of my job I have to obtain updates on all sales ledger invoices outstanding and apply comments to each invoice, however when I download a report to excel showing all invoices due for payment none of the notes I have added on Xero show on the report.
This means that invoices need to be sent from different accounts@ emails depending on which trading entities sold the goods and services.
When completing Xero workpapers, it would be great to be able to drag and drop files which are already saved to a transaction in Xero, or in the Xero File Library, and add it as the supporting document in Xero workpapers.
Hi Xero CommunityI have been in touch with Xero Support and apparently there's no solution to excluding non-cash accounts in their Statement of Cashflow Reporting or in the Cash Summary.
It would be great if we could add documents into the balance sheet report (like you can when you create an invoice) so that we don't have to take that info into our accounts.
It would be a really good idea if the billing subscription on my partner edition could be billed direct to my Xero inbox then i wouldn't need to take images of the invoice or manually enter it every month.
Hi We want to be able to report the amount received for each of our inventory items, in a given period.
We issue invoices and receive donations for about 600 inventory items in a 6 month period, and then need to report the exact amount that each one received.
We would like to be able to Copy and Edit the prior year's published report pack when we start the new year's job, but currently the Report Fields are switched to text only, so fields don't update.
When we use the Copy and Edit function, I would like it to look to the Report fields, and update accordingly.
Hi,Nuapay is a fantastic package that allows any business  to send an online SEAP Direct debit mandate to a client, authorise it from the dashboard and then Nuapay process the mandate and deposits the money in your account.
Not all companies use Credit cards so this means Stripe, Pay pal ect are not useful in a situation were a company like ours invoices for small regular amounts on a monthly basis.
We invoice many of of customers for internet (broadband) services on a quarterly basis, so for example we invoice on 15th November 2016 for the period 01/01/2017 to 31/03/2017It is not currently possible to get "01/01/2017 to 31/03/2017" to print on a repeating invoice using the (Month Year) placeholder as although I can get the"from" date to print using the syntax "1st (Month Year+2) I cannot use 31st (Month Year+4) due to the next quarter having a month ending on 30th June.
Currently every account is available when entering an invoice therefore I have to sift through all accounts or use a listing from a separate excel sheet as to what account to use for that job.
Generating a "new" Profit & Loss report, it would be very handy to be able apply filters of various Tracking Categories only to specific groups in the report.
Is it possible to have the From and To options come up before the report loads so you can enter just the time period required?
On the dashboard under 'Bills you need to pay', can you include a button to raise a new PO (alongside raising a new Bill)?
We use the P&L Report to show in real time the costs incurred to each product line.
I would like the list in reverse order, with new invoices at the top, with the old invoices at the bottom.
I have some suppliers where I am getting up to 100 invoices per month, so this list of invoices can be extremely long, and I waste too much time finding the latest invoices owing.
Say I have just finished sales Invoice #9, then I "Approve and add another", the sequence jumps to 10.
If I want to continue on without 10 for the time being and I populate and finish Sales Invoice #11, "Approve and add another", my next invoice reverts back to Invoice #10, rather than continuing on the sequence to #12.
There is a bit of a design flaw when trying to navigate through a new sales invoice which makes things very awkward, slow and difficult to zip through the invoice using only your keyboard.
For this to become our stand alone client database, we need to either rename or add a few new fields to the contact table.
Hi thereWe use Practicepanther software to manage invoices and clients.
Also, the 'new reports' are unable to break out a report for each contact, so rather than getting receivable invoice detail unique to the contact we're focusing on, we receive a huge report for all of our contacts, again hundreds of pages long.
I would LOVE to be able to run a report showing ONLY bank transactions that have NOT got a file attached to the transaction.
It would be helpful if Charities wanting to prepare their own annual accounts in Xero could have access to the report templates.
I would like to suggest being able to modify the parameters of a budget to be able to get a more detailed budget report.
I would like to be able to use say 10 tracking classes but only put in specifics for say a couple accounts - Repairs and Maintenance, Fuel, registrations, and wages.
As it currently stands (to the best of my knowledge), you have to go back to the home screen to see which bank accounts need to be reconciled, or go through each bank account in the drop down list until you find an account with unreconciled transactions.
We have lots of bank accounts and run an online store and hence need to book keep every day, so this small improvement will save us a lot of time.
This is because we are a serviced based business, like many other Xero users I imagine.
There should be an option to add new account type.
So what we have to do is create a new Tax code for non-taxable sales, and make sure we use it for all non-taxable invoice lines, and then at least they will be totaled correctly on the report.
Put the graph on another tab since it's more of a report than a functional screen unless you can make it clickable like the sales graph.
We would like a way of being able to flag a transaction as having an element of private use (with a choice for the %) which then handles reducing the VAT accordingly.
In the "New Reports", it would be helpful if we could select all GL accounts of a type - eg all Income Accounts, all Expenses, all Assets etc.
It would be great if you can add calender feature in the dashboard which I can add time table or calender roaster for our employees.
It would be great to select the time period  which you want to check Bank Account Transactions for, before the Account Transaction Screen loads, showing every single transaction from when you first started on Xero.
If an error is made its time consuming to correct and it would be easier if the information to which account funds are received are marked on the invoice.
In general, a : * Need to make it faster - always loads slow * Need to add Reporting / Business Intelligence * Ability to see upcoming bills you need to pay * Ability to see a pie graph and list view of % and dollar amount by vendor/customer of what was spent this month and what was earned this month.
We give our invoices to Invoice financing Companies and we need allocate the receipts from the "Invoice Financing Company" which Shows as a Current Liability in our books
Current workflow is:On supplier page, see bills that can be marked as paid or paidClick DashboardClick BillsClick Awaiting PaymentFilter by supplierSelect and payI'd like it to be:On supplier page, select "Pay Bills"Opens Bills->Awaiting Payment with supplier name filtered
At this time, Tax Touch does not support my bank so I cannot use that application.
It would be great it there was a report code created that would enable the use of memorandum accounts.
If, like us, you have team members working just on sales, just on purchases or indeed in both areas (and you don't want them to be able to view the full company accounts), there is currently no way of doing this.
If you could just hover over the attachment icon in the Sales > invoice listing page it would be a nice user experience and save some time.
I would like to be able to switch on an 'advanced invoice' setting so that along with the 'invoice date' and 'due date' you can select a 'journal to' date when entering invoices.
it would be great if xero develop and feature like attach files during reconciliation to the unreconciled Bank Account transactions on the Xero Mobile app or even discuss and attach is a good idea.
Hi In New Zealand it is only legal to send or print a copy of an invoice that has copy stamped or printed on it.
When we have uploaded a PDF Quote to the Folders section -  from the drop down menu it would be handy to have an ADD TO NEW PURCHASE ORDER not just INVOICE, BILL ETC.
We have our own chart of accounts which we commonly use for all of our clients based on their nature of the business.
When we come to Xero , we have to edit existing default chart of accounts or upload our accounts accordingly at each time when we setup a client.
Xero needs an API to sync emails sent (invoices, statements etc) with the outgoing email folder of the 'accounts' email address, rather than just blind copying to the logged in user.
It would be great if, like the other columns in Bank Transactions / Invoices / Bills / Journals, you could sort by whether an item has an attachment or not.
I would love to see a legible, simple, NET GST Summary Report including Decimals (NOT THE GST CALCULATION SHEET)Currently, I export the GST Audit Report (just to make it fit to a page better than printing the monster direct from Xero - all that white space!
Hi Guys, When going through the Statement Exceptions in a Reconciliation Report, it would be great if each line  could link back to the bank statement that the transaction orginally came from.
With the new report templates, we have noticed a problem where accounts do not appear in alphabetical order.
If you add the Date Paid field under Date Search on the New Reports Payable Invoice Detail Report then this would be simple.
Would love the ability to run a purpose built transaction query report across multiple accounts at the same time for those clients who don't wish to jump into Xero and use the discuss tab.
Hi, I intend to use Xero for our company and for our India market I wanted a payment gateway to be integrated with Xero, which would enable me direct payment transfer from our our corporate bank account to our vendors/supplier and also employees.
Ideally, it would be great if you can post a bill with no unit price, but be able to manually input the VAT element which you want to pay to the supplier and reclaim in your VAT return; without the hassle of having to have a two line invoice with negative/positive values.
Every time you select some accounts you have to open the Edit report code mapping box and then go back again.
When I make a payment to the credit card from the bank account and use the "transfer" tab I would like to be able to store the bank generated statement with the payment.
Hi, I wish to generate a Detailed GL, similar to what MYOB offers where the accounts show with Account headings and Total, each grouped under there section of the Balance Sheet and Profit and Loss.
Introduced at the Xero Roadshow to a new feature of applying for loans directly with bank thru Xero, can this or a similar facility be used to send data (tax returns, financials, cashflows) to banks for other purposes, ie.
When recording receipts in Xero it would be great if after adding the payment the screen would return to the same place in the Invoice queue instead of returning to the first page of Invoices again.
Each month I have many receipts to record from a large payment received and it is time consuming to have to always move through the outstanding invoices, or type in the client's name all the time, to record the next receipt.
It would be great to be able to either have a save and add another payment button or a new line button to add another line of payment before saving.
I would really like to be able to Sort or Edit the order of the accounts that appear on My Xero Practice page.
If you change account name or details it would be useful if you have an option at that point for it to update in repeating invoices as well just like it asks you when you update an email address.
It would be handy to have this feature, at the moment Xero Support have said I need to  remove the payment for the Invoice to check the links then reconcile again.
For example, Vat Report instead of Sales Tax Report, and possibly a few others like Creditors instead of Accounts Payables.
Hello,it will be nice if you could add a reconciliation date while manually reconciling a transaction so it will show in the bank transactions the date payment was released/received and after reconciling it shows reconciled date which the transaction took place in bank.
sometimes released payment takes a quite time to be presented in the bank and then cleared so it will be very handy if have a reconciliation date also to appear beside the transaction date for reconciled transactions.
Hello good folk at Xero,I love the ability to have automated invoice reminders, and would love it even more if we could include or exclude by selection through a tick-box option like you provide for email and deposit functions in the invoices awaiting payment screen.
Hi all,I have requested a simple report entitled Sales Report.
I need to be able to move those liability accounts out of the cash balances to make this report actually do what it's supposed to do .
Would like to be able to export date to other software systems based on physical bank transaction date as opposed to account transaction date and to retain all the transaction detail eg: code, GST rate etc,.
It is fantastic that I am able to go into an added file in the librar, add to an invoice/bill and copy that info over easily and quickly.
I can do a income by contact however, I need it broken down in the same way as a customer invoice report so I can easily report on projects instead of customer.
Hi,In the bank reconciliation report, is it possible to export the comments in the "discuss" tab?
Is it possible to add a layer of reporting, not just location, but also by business unitFor example we have a hotel with a golf courseWe report the golf course as a separate location, but I'd like to report the 'kitchen' as a separate business unit within the hotel - I could do this as a separate location too but I want to see the performance of the hotel as a unit (including kitchen, bar, rooms etc.
Hi,Just as you can in WorkFlow Max, i would like the ability to be able to download the quote as a WORD document before sending to make any adjustments to the template, add in extra information etc.
I have to dig deep in reports and exporting to excel get meaningful sales data out of Xero that should just be charted out on the dashboard for us.
Hi,I am relatively new to xero having come from quickbooks, and I am taking over some accounts done by my book keeper previously.
I am looking for similar in xero and indeed just had an example where it took me ages to find a transation which I eventually found had been entered as a bank transfer.
), could someone give me a comprehensive list of search facilities on various pages which I would need to search in order to cover off all transactions within xero, e. g. Purchases, Sales, Bank transfers etc.
I use it for each job and many transactions are filed over periods of time to these category's but if I want to run a report on a supplier for a particular category I am unable.
The ability to report on items sold each month (by quantity) on a month by month basis, like the new Inventory Item Summary showing Item Name and Sales but to be able to look at month by month for up to say a 12 month period.
Being able to add the account this has been paid to or paid from.
HiWould Xero be looking at a function where we could add a mobile phone to our customer account allowing SMS reminders to be issued for any overdue invoices past a certain date.
We would like to reconcile our sales against our bankings and petty cash weekly without having to use Excel and get our petty cash accounts back to our float amount each week.
- Next time I need to login with the credentials and once again meed to select if I want to use Tough ID to log in.
My client's understood this and could bring a certain amount of pressure to their accounts departments to pay certain invoices.
With owners changing regularly we use the property name as the account name and want to be able to sort the customer list by Account number within the view screen.
So many business owners can't recall, understand or remember this data, just like in dragons den.
Xero notified me my payment to Xero had failed.
Greetings I have 1 suggestion regarding find and re-code feature, to add remove and redo like bank accounts so we can remove or void the search results for example if i have 10 bills in different dates and i want to adjust them i can't i have to search one by one and i can remove them all or void them all if the bills are still awaiting payment, also to link each invoice or whatever you searching for so we can open it in new tap to adjust it, or we can adjust all search result amounts.
On the front page of a contact card, would it be possible to add drop down boxes to allow you to search by 'payment' 'invoice' or 'note'?
On the Sales Invoices page there are different tabs to look at different subsets of invoices - ie 'all', 'draft', 'awaiting approval', 'awaiting payment', 'paid' & 'repeating'.
Spending a lot of time just opening these three tabs every time I work on a client, then get interupted and have to do it all again.
We want to be able to use the e-sign system for our returns but want to be able to add covering letters and other internal forms we get our clients to sign.
I would like to be able to send remittance advice one I pay and expense claim.
And need to do lot of sorting and deleting from New report spreadsheets.
Further to this, when we go to assign the expenses to the client we just need to assign the entire supplier invoice against a specific customer invoice.
Some clients get invoiced for 10+ different jobs each month, so it is impractical for us to track each individual expense line, we just need to assign one whole supplier invoice to one customer invoice.
Xero should be able to intelligently handle business credit card accounts that have an umbrella/master account number with tiered individual credit cards numbers beneath it.
com/business/discussion/2321871) and other programs like Wave and Quickbooks support reconciling and payments to a business credit card accounts without issue.
Am currently in transition from Netsuite to Xero - one thing i would like in search is ability to find/go to Inventory items - i like finding clients and invoices, but items/inventory would be a help, IMOthank you,jon higginsacornfarmvets
We use it on a daily basis to find the data we need at any given time.
Thus, in the bank rec the match feature will find all invoices of the correct amount, but the invoice it should be finding has a $0.
com/145096723We now need the option to be able to force all users to use 2FA.
My client doesn't want the Summary and Ratios (doesnt understand) nor the Cash summary ( not needed) However they would like also a Specific Event P&L (Mothers day Fun run for example ( which I 'track') and a suppliers invoice report (so they see who and how much I have paid) So now they get THREE pdf files.
Archived accounts should have some method to prevent them from appearing in dropdown menus, such as the Account Transactions report.
Problem is, a lot of our customers have same value invoices repeating udring their business with us and even manage to find old statements to use .
Be able to choose print branding on Invoices without having to edit invoice, like you are able to to do when printing statements.
com/blog/checkout-new-featuresThe Xero/Stripe payment screen doesn't include Stripe's Remember Me feature.
For example, I would like some of my users who have company credit cards, to be able to assign bills/payments to their own cards, but not to see all of our other bank accounts.
With add-ons being able to push transactions into Xero en mass, this can create enormous headaches when someone has set up the add-on incorrectly.
We have experienced issues with clients who have incorrectly configured the mapping of accounts or usage of tax codes on transactions in add-ons, which then imported into Xero.
We need to export the GST Audit Report to Excel, sort the transactions, locate the journals from the add-on and then go and hunt down the ones that need editing.
Hi,I would like the ability to add notes to files, when I forward files to invoices inevitably there is something I need to remember with each, having the ability to add a note to a file via the email or even just being able to edit/add notes inside xero to a file would be amazing!
Hi,Now that you've recently added Invoice Reminders, it would be great if there was a way to see which clients had Invoice Reminders turned on (or off) from the Aged Receivables report.
(We can't use Invoice Reminders for all clients because for some clients there are different email addresses to use for different invoices.
That way, really small businesses that don't use a third party add-on for payroll/time tracking could make sure that labor hours are captured on the appropriate invoices.
I was disappointed to see we wouldn't be able to use it as there is no feature to only send reminders to customers who have made no payments on an invoice.
Also for a new user it would help where to go to create something new as they may not be used to drilling down through the various sections to create new invoices/expenses.
When we add a new invoice - we use the awaiting approval function until goods have been delivered.
HI When entering contacts you have the contact details then finance sales then purchases then further on you go to invoice settings purchases then sales .
I would then like to see the bill screen appear with my first invoice in the preview window, once saved a new Bill screen would appear with the second invoice in the preview window, this would continue till all bills were attached and processed at which time I would be returned to the files window to create my next batch.
In our project management system, I'd like to be able to construct links to Xero invoices.
Could Xero add support for viewing invoices by the invoice number, perhaps with a syntax like https://go.
Would like to have additional columns on Accounts Transaction Report - Name, Tax ID, and Address of Contacts.
It would be great if there was a feature whereby Xero would automatically send a remittance advice when you reconcile an invoice within the bank rec
I have created tracking numbers to group invoices, furthermore we have to sort invoices by account numbers, and create accrual- and prepayment journals in Euros.
For this reason I would like to be able to archive locked accounts.
Unfortunately, I'm unable to reconcile a single USD receipt in our bank account with multiple USD, EUR, GBP, and CAD sales invoices.
When you are in a particular bank account (reconciliation screen) it would be very time saving to have the page search function at the top of that screen and then you would not have to scroll down the to the bottom of the page all the time when you see the dates come up and know they are not what you are looking for.
Hi,It would be great if when you drill down, through reports, gst reports into an old GST period you could right click to open in new tab like most other things in Xero.
It would be extremely helpful for us to have a Pay Now button on Sales Invoices directly in the Xero interface.
Sending ourselves the Sales Invoice email and clicking the Pay Now button in the emailor2.
After you receive a payement for multiple invoices you are taken to Bank Accounts › account name ›  Transaction: Batch Depositon this page should be an add another payment where you can enter in the next contact name, and it show your invoices to accept payment to
Sales Staff, especially in outside sales who creates invoices often, don't need to be exposed the entire Payables and Receivables system.
Hi TeamThe Xero to Xero sales/purchases function is awesome, but we still need to go into the draft invoice and attach the file, whereas if we use the view and pay online function instead of Xero to Xero the document is automatically attached.
At the moment we like to invoice the billable expenses for each project on separate invoices (i. e. Customer Bob has projects A and B) At the moment when the billable expenses come up to add to the sales invoice, we don't know if the expense was for project A or B. I also think that it's important you add a report to track billable expenses that have not yet been invoices out.
I need to be able to add things like: the name of the person's Sales Rep, the customer's gender and birthdate, or even something like whether or not they're on our Christmas card list.
I would like to see Xero add a traditional format general ledger report to the reporting tab.
Hi,I've been using Xero shortly after it became available and one of the things that really annoys me is not been able to select a date range when reconciling invoices, and also would like a longer list and improved scrolling.
It would save so much time and avoid mistakes if you could add a date range to filter on invoices.
It would be great if you could allocate expense claims to customer invoices as you can when you spend money from the business bank account.
I would like to be able to give restricted access to our junior staff members in Xero to be able to enter Accounts Payable, but not have access to any other part of Xero - i. e. bank accounts, wages etc.
Eg, if the client is preparing several invoices for the 1 job over say, 6 months, is there a way to create templates or macros for the description on the invoice, rather than type it in every time?
Ideally with this feature, we would like to be able to create a Report per client (LOB), but often we also need to select just a specific project within that Client.
When breaking down the contacts into groups, such as 'subcontractors', it would be useful to run the 'expenses by contact' report, and to be able to limit that to just the groups I have created, to see how much I have spent on that group as a whole, as well as individuals.
I want to be able to see these in the 'sales by item' report, so they must be entered as an item.
When sending a report of invoice payments to someone I often have to send three seperate reports, one for each currency we use.
Is it possible to add an option in the settings under the Payable Invoice Report so that you can exclude deleted and voided invoices please.
i use 'copy' invoice to create new invoice with same clients month after month.
I'd like to limit the invoices on screen to perhaps last three months or whatever period as it will save time and possibility of error.
I often have invoices that need over 30 lines and I have to click the 'add line' button for every single one.
If they choose "submit for approval" it submits that individual receipt as an individual expense claim in Xero for approval and payment, one receipt at a time.
Staff may as well just use the website only and do all their receipt entry and claim submitting in one hit at the one time.
I think there should be the option "add another new quote" button after creating and printing a new quote - like when you enter a sales invoice.
It seems to be a pretty big waste to have an import but still have to manually go into each of the invoices to tell it to use the sales tax lookup feature.
I'd like to suggest that Xero add in a 'Dividend Calculator', much like FreeAgent, which has the ability to calculate the estimate tax liability for shareholders based on declared/paid dividends in the current accounting year.
Hi guys,When adding billable expenses to a sales invoice, it would be great if we could select a margin % to be added to the core expense.
At the moment this must be calculated per line for each separate expense brought into the sales invoice, so it would be a great time saver if a % mark-up could be nominated at time of billing.
Once the bill is assigned for that invoice it can be reviewed same way as any other Sales invoice,  for e. g. having an extra column with 'assigned bill' and where you would be able to click on it and by clicking that it would take you to purchases and would open that Purchase Bill.
I want to go through it from largest expense account to smallest though, so currently I need to export to excel, sort there, then cross reference back to Xero to look into those accounts in that order.
Seems like it would be a lot faster than having to choose each time we pay an invoice.
Hi,I really don't like the new feature of having today's date pop up for purchase and sales invoices.
We are now able to add "billable costs" (supplier invoices) to a customer, but when will we be able to do the same with supplier credit notes?
I had hoped however that I would have been able to reduce the amount of time creating invoices with the information generated by Checkfront.
As part of our process, after we process the batch payment (and receive confirmation from bank that the payment was accepted) we mark the invoices as paid in our electronic document management system.
Most of the time I need to go back and forth between those or know all the invoices linked to a single quote.
As a new user - I am shocked to have just run a detailed transaction report.
Would be great if when you create a new sales invoice / purchase bill, Xero reminds if you have any Draft and/or Unapproved transactions already created for that same customer/supplier.
Ability to add multiple profit & loss reports with different date ranges when creating a new report pack.
Hi,As the really long subject line explains, I have a few invoices that have part payments made, I've paid off the amount paid to the invoice and have an amount outstanding that I have followed up.
What I would like to request is a report in the same format as the Income by Contact report, but which only reports on sales invoices and credit notes.
Please add a transaction number column for detailed account transaction report.
It would be really useful if you were able to drill down into the unfiled VAT figures on the VAT reconciliation report and create an individual report showing the breakdown of this.
As we pay the majority of our bills as a batch payment, it would be great if the reference on the suppliers bank could always show the invoice number.
I know you can put it in every time on the batch payment screen under details, but this is very time consuming.
We are a service based company that runs multiple programs and so it would be very useful to be able to create a different sales invoice email template for each different program.
As I use Xero for more than 1 company, I would like to be able to change the 'send me a copy' email address, to an email address other than my login email address.
Would like to be able to edit the saved Terms and Terms and Payment details on quotes and Invoices as needed to be able to be more specific on a particular Invoice or Quote when necessary.
It would be great if we could hide notes that we don't need when preparing accounts, otherwise if we delete a note and then need it later we have to create a whole new template and lose all the customisations we have done which is a real pain.
Xero - please add more reports to your new "Report Templates" so that we can include an accounts receivable, accounts payable, cash summary and executive summary on customised reports.
When we add notes to the overdue invoices in the Expected Date column - it would be really handy to be able to print a report showing these.
21 High StreetHIGHTOWN NSWI'd like to be able to break the line at the end of 'Safety' with 'Department' on a new line.
its will be very useful if there is a post dated payment /receipt beside the overpayment and downpayment like if i issued a cheque on a future date and handed it over to my supplierwhen i open the supplier invoice page it should show a total of PDC payments at the end or in an extra column until its cleared from the bank.
We could achieve this by posting the invoice payments using bank rules and attaching the invoices to these transactions, however, the client really needs their books prepared on an accruals basis rather than cash basis.
My request is to have at step 3 when we have the filtered bills list, the ability to edit the amount to pay, check the balance and then be able to add, delete or edit the payment amounts until it balances, before finalising the batch.
We run a mobility store and most of our clients come through Occupational Therapists however Orders come from a Government funding body and so on our invoices we need to be able to Invoice this funding body and also have on this invoice who the goods are being sold to.
For example, I would like to be able to mark all of my expense accounts as "Show in Expense Claims" or be able to make sweeping changes to taxes, etc.
I would like to be able receipt several payments against an invoice previously created in Sales.
It would be great if we could have some more formatting in the footer and schedules of the report templates (eg alignment, font etc)On the bottom of all the pages of a set of accounts we are required to have a disclaimer that the notes & compilation report form part of the statements etc.
When i have created a credit note, and want to add another credit note, there is no 'Credit Note' button to create a new one as with 'Create New Bill' so i have to go back to purchases to create a new note ( a bit long winded).
I would like to be able to go to the amounts receivable and select customer groups to print directly from xero showing the account name and number, amount owing and for how long they have owed.
The new 'merge sales invoice' functionality could be very helpful, however,  there currently many issues from both a practical use perspective and also an auditability point of view as: (a) the old invoices remain in the system (b) there is no 'pointer' from the old invoices to the new 'merged' invoice.
If one is running a business with a lot of invoices - it is easy to forget that one should delete the single invoices from which the merged invoice is formed.
Please Xero, match the reference on the bank statement line to the reference on the invoice so I can just click OK OK OK OK OK OK OK OK OK.
This would be great If if they had one invoice, but wanted to pay it off in three separate payments, or split the payment up between two cards.
Page numbering would help (especially when you have a large report that you have just dropped and need to put back in order).
From the Dashboard select New Invoice and then select New Bill.
PLEASE change the New Invoice screen back so its appearance and layout is just like the New Bill screen.
Would like to see the Search buttons on the Dashboard next to "Invoices owed to you" and "Bills you need to pay".
We would like Xero to enable customers to pay a quote without our first having to create an invoice.
But for that to happen:1) they need to first accept the quote2) then we need to get notified of their acceptance via email3) then we need to manually convert the quote to an invoice4) then send a copy of the invoice to ourselves so we can extract the online payment link (since not available within Xero)5) then write the customer a new email using our own custom email templates outside of Xero (since Xero email templates don't allow embedded graphic/logo additions for branding)6) and finally copy & paste the payment link into the email and send to the customerOnly then does the customer get a link to an invoice from which they can submit payment.
We would like to see Xero:a) allow us to enable a payment link right from the quote (if the customer pays the quote, an invoice is automatically generated based on the quote and the payment applied to the invoice), orb) we can pre-approve the quote for payment so, after the customer accepts the quote, an invoice is automatically created and the customer is immediately given the option to then pay the invoice right there from the same pageOtherwise we're jumping through all these unnecessary hoops when Xero could eliminate about a half dozen extra steps for us and our customers.
Often suppliers stamp please note use new bank account on invoices for months and months and I can not remember if I have updated their details to new bank account and it is cumbersome to check at the moment.
The Batch Deposit only works if I have all the cheques, not being able to edit a Batch Deposit to add in another payment limits the use of this function.
This would be great when you have finished reconciling one bank account to be able to see in the drop down list of other bank accounts - which ones needs reconciling.
It would be a great tool if we had the "History and Notes Activity" report under the Advisor tab amended so that we had a greater set for "search selection" criteria and the ability to extract the "Add note / Expected Payment Date" printed/extracted into Excel/PDF/Google Docs .
I understand that the annual account format is based on NZ GAAP but I would like to know if there is anything in process for getting a format acceptable for use in the UK?
I would like to see a report similar to the Payables Invoice Detail report so that I can perform an analysis of expenses claims that will allow me to identify what types of costs are been expensed (to see if we can centralise), identify where VAT (or GST) has not been claimed and to identify who is making the claims.
Hello, Refreshing Barclays accounts takes the best part of 5 minutes of loading, and having to enter the Pin Sentry details each time is simply ineffective for a start-up business doing its own accounts where time is already stretched.
As I understand it "Invoice Only - Draft" users are not able to to view previous invoices & orders which is problematic if they are new to an organisation.
Hi there,I often have to wait for an Client Invoice to be paid before I pay the Supplier Bill.
Hi, We would like the use the "Summary Return" print option in AU Tax.
By limiting the number of invoices downloaded it will take less time to get to the invoice, or series of invoices, that I need - saves me money!
We would like to be able to include a simple subject line from the Invoice created in the other package to the statement created in Xero.
Instead of creating the same layout and regrouping all the accounts in reports each time a client is set-up since we are using a stand Chart of Accounts.
This should be reasonably easy to do by just entering one sales invoice with a range of dates over which the income needs to hit the P&L.
I. e We have the disposal schedule in our report pack, we prepare all the reports, no disposals and so this report is removed, later we find out something was disposed of and we need to add it back in.
It would be a really great time saver if Xero could either get Digital Waybill on board or come up with a quick and easy way to transfer the invoices from Quickbooks to Xero each month.
Hi, I would like to be able to view my invoices, one at a time, stepping through next > next > next > previous > next, as needed, much like I can when viewing my emails in outlook.
To counter this, without having to delete their data after sufficient correspondence, a suspension to the particular client account would be useful until they've paid their account, thus also suspending what we have to pay Xero on their behalf.
I would like to be able to run a report using the Ledger Code as the driver rather than the account name, is this possible in the New Reports please?
We have NFP with many of them under 10 employees and would love to be able to use super stream in Standard platform, given ATO is moving to compoloustry reporting is Xero planning to make available on all versions of Xero with payrollAlso would be great to be able to create new Super Members from with Xero via Click super rather than having to first register employee with fund before initial payment via click super
I was just want add a field to the INVOICES table to refer to a second contact.
Btw, anyone understand why an ACC invoice (a "bill" in xero) wouldn't have an "invoice number" or "bill number" or "account number" field for data entry and tracking?
I currently have 8 organisations and being able to see which need reconciling is great but I would also love to see the dollar value of outstanding sales and purchases invoices.
Would be good to be able to print the business performance graphs
I would use this facility a lot in the course of creating new names/accounts.
I would like to see a calculation summary on the pay templates that breaksdown the annual and suggested payrun calc so that you can check how something is entered and will turn up on a slipSo if your playing around in an employee or directors salary you dont have to keep jumping out to do a dummy pay run to check itIe                           Annual                       Payrun  Gross                120 000                        10 000SGC                      11 400                        950Tax                     24 000                          2000Net                    96 0000                         8000
To do this you have to export each account to excel - you should be able to do a Job Transactions Report like MYOB has - much easier to cross check.
I would like to suggest that Xero look into adding the Square Inc. Payment System into its software.
Hi all,In the new Xero templates it allows you to create a blank report which provides greater flexibility in being able to prepare custom reports into our financials.
With clients that have multiple items that need to be discussed for their bank recon, this would save some time.
Hi Xero Development Team,I have just watch the new webinar for Utilising Xero's report templates and it was very good.
Hello Dear and All,In these days many small business are using American Express card for business sales and purchase.
add an 'account' column in the draft bills section and even a 'tracking' and 'description' column (if able) to facilitate faster approvals (vs. clicking into the draft bill - time suck).
Hi AllWhen creating a new batch deposit the PayPal bank account doesn't show in the list of accounts.
I would like a feature that would allow them to create quotes and send them as well, but should not be able to send invoices or view others quotes / invoices.
I run a wholesale distribution business with over 400 SKUs and reports like these go long ways in improving productivity of business and I don't mind paying a little bit more for it as long as I can see everything I want to see in one software or place.
If customer want to pay the overdue invoices only e. g. up to certain date before the statement date, they have to manually calculate the total amount to pay.
New reports area is good, but it still does not allow multiple-selection of Tracking Categories, whilst also being able to report against Budget for month/quarter/year-to-date.
When I'm checking draft invoices, rather than having to click 'Approve and view next', I would simply like to be able to view the next invoice.
Hello We need more description for items like manufacturer name, item model etcAlso we like to have non inventory itemsI have attached few screenshots from quickbooks to show you example how you should handle items.
To be able to add other reports to the standard Management Report packs?
Don't like the new feature of default date of today's date on creditors invoices.
Hi,I am not able to customize a chart of account (for example suspense) as it comes with account start date and 25 items appears on the same page.
Upon starting an invoice for a client maybe a selection could be made, "select current vehicle" or "add new vehicle" could be made available for the numerous motor vehicle repairers which would be using Xero.
It takes too much time to look through 3 bank accounts and 6 credit card accounts to find the source of the payment.
I would like to be able to set up the business performance tool to look at individual aspects of the business against separate charts of accounts depending on the activity with the company.
and I would definitely be able to get more done if the Xero app was capable of doing more than just invoices.
For example, dividends paid need to come off retained earnings and beneficiary accounts need to balance forward to the "opening balance" account rather than sitting in drawings.
Simple, it would be great to be able to use the "line of business" as shown in the Organisation details as a report field in our practice reports.
I often use the Contacts as a starting point and would like to be able to see quotes for the contacts as well as invoices when I click "View Recent Invoices"Sometimes I am not sure if I have already created a quote and it takes a while to search for them separately to check before I create a new quote.
I like the new report but comparatives are terrible.
Hi,I am reviewing a Supplier history which shows a list of past and present  invoices - data displayed;date, invoice number and instead of PAID date shows due date.
It would be great to see this object/database exist in Xero so Time/Invoice add on's like Harvest could push in this data.
Our practice currently has invoice only (approve & pay) access for staff so they can create and send invoices to our clients.
The current placeholders on repeating invoices are handy but being able to include the date would be really useful to us as we often do 4-weekly invoices for period dd/mm/yy to dd/mm/yy.
I use custom Tracking codes and Customer Account numbers to track income /expenditure/ disbursements by project, if I could manually add "Account number" or "Tracking category" as one of the columns it  could help a lot.
We would like to be notified that they are happy to accept but there is a process we need to follow before we can change it to accepted as some editing will still need to be made.
New Reports - Inventory Item Details ReportWe would really like the ability to be able to run this report with the ability to be able to filter by either individual or selected items.
This means that apps like LivePlan aren't able to differentiate between an asset and a liability when pulling bank accounts from your Xero account.
Hi there,Where you have a large annual invoice like business rates, can you enter one invoice but split the amount into when the installments will be due.
This takes considerable time and I am always worried that I will copy over one incorrectly and the payment will go to the wrong account on the electricity company's system.
Our business uses WorkflowMax for all of our Jobs / Sales, we draw from our inventory for these jobs / sales.
As we complete VAT returns through Xero for several of our clients, I would like to suggest a feature which would enable us to email the client directly with their VAT return figure from Xero, meaning that we do not need to export a PDF of the workings and create a bespoke email each time.
Also the ability to add a user to multiple or all entities under the same master xero account.
I'd like to omit some parts of the Sales Tax Summary and the Sales Tax Audit reports so I could just see the parts I need.
It would be great if Xero could add 'Like' or 'Like/Reply' options under peoples comments.
We would like to have a sales report by customer by month as well.
It would be better/easier if the Chart of Accounts appeared in Drop Down lists in the order they would appear on a  Trial Balance, so many incorrectly allocated transactions just because of the order of the list, or clients and/or their bookkeepers forgetting the fundamentals because Xero makes it so easy!
We have many agricultural clients and a key part of there business is to be able to generate a self billing invoice.
Currently when we are processing and invoice or a quote if we save the item the sytem takes us back to the main sales page, it would be great to be able to save as we go along without this happening so that we don't accidentally go out without saving.
We would like to be about to use the "XERO TOUCH" app to reconcile items which need to be split over multiple lines/COA.
Would it be possible when running an aged payables report that it shows the difference between entered invoices and ones that have been entered with an invoice uploaded?
Iwant to be able to give my administrator access to one bank account only and have him be able to add purchases etc to that account, view reports etc for that specific account.
He also needs to be able to add new Bills in Draft for the other main cheque account, so I guess I am looking for an access level between Invoice Only and Standard.
I love the functionality of online invoices, and I know that clients would be happy to look at an online invoice is the standard form, but when it comes to PDF invoices, it really makes sense for them to still be able to be customised to match the company branding.
Suggestions for improvement:- Auto update "current date" fields on draft report packs- Be able to copy last years publish report for the current year report, so that you retain the layout and notes etc that you want- Be able to add back a schedules from the draft reports if decided later that you need it- Appropriation section on the P&L which effectively reconciles back to Equity section on Balance Sheet- Be able to have sub accounts and then group those sub accounts under one main heading e. g. for div 7a loans we track an entities loan by using separate accounts, but we can't group them together in the reports- Introduce an inbuilt livestock reporting feature/report which includes stock numbers- introduce automatic rental schedule reports so we don't have to manually create them
It would be really great if we could add new employees with just a name and email, and have them self complete the relevant required HR details, such as:- address- DOB- bank details- super details- making their own electronic TFN declarations- uploading required documents such as identification documents (passports) and visa details
That way we'd be able to reconcile the bank entries against those expected and the overdue invoice reporting would be correct too.
More and more small businesses / sole traders are working from time-to-time in coffee shops (not serving coffee - i mean running their business!
Is it possible to add the ability to batch deposit into a suspense account instead of just the bank account.
It would be ideal for our warehousing person to be able to receipt in inventory, then for our accounts person to be able to convert the receipt - instead of the PO - into an invoice.
I would like to be able to record multiple payment methods on the sales invoice, without having to save invoice each time.
(I use multiple monitors in portrait)This is just simple html coding that would take a competent programer very little time to "fix".
I have asked for this feature many times and in the last year I have seen so many new reports and features being added  EXCEPT  one great report that I would like to see.
Programs like QUICKEN , etc  have always allowed you to view a TRANSACTION and see where the MONEY is coming from (BANK ACCOUNT or CREDIT CARD) , The PAYEE, the DESCRIPTION of the item and even a MEMO (Reference in XERO) but the best part is it also shows you what CHART of ACCOUNTS item it is going to .
Would be helpful if Xero can produce a customer activity report which shows  the bulk receipt to an account as one figure - rather than it split out between each invoice.
In the US the sales tax situation is very complex and companies like ours that sell or subscribe customers via the Internet spend a tremendous amount of time and energy trying to keep up with the different taxing jurisdictions and changes in rates.
What we would really like to see is a direct integration with Xero to ensure accurate application and collection of sales tax with auto remittance through Avalara.
I need a report that shows the quantity and unit price on sales and purchase invoices.
I need the ability to add quantities to inventory imports of new stock.
It would be very advantageous to have this feature to be able to attach the document in the xero inbox to an existing document/bill, not just new ones.
We want to be able to take out the quantity for just one line, and keep the other lines on the invoice with quantities.
We run two businesses from one Xero account and need customers to reply to the business that has sent the invoice.
From then i will definitely recommend XERO and advise others to Request a new feature in order to be able to work with your software.
It's great that we can now calculate our EC Sales List in Xero, but as the list is always submitted to HMRC quarterly, the default setting should be "Last Quarter", not "Last Month", as this is the option that will almost always be used for submissions and it's all too easy to accidentally download the wrong data set at the moment, assuming that (like VAT) the correct option is selected by default.
You should have the ability to be able to import Excel spreadsheets from files straight into Xero Work papers to assist in substantiating a clients Financial accounts.
I would like to be able to see the GST total on a batch payment as well as the payment total.
It would be good if you could use the custom receipt template on spend moneys not just reconciled invoices.
Certain workpapers like balance sheet items need to be carried for from year to year like Borrowings Costs and Even a provision for Carried Forward Losses.
Would it be possible to have the customer invoice report or client invoice report to allow for this sort of breakdown across multiple sales accounts while also being able to select particular periods of activity.
We need to add the address we worked at and name of property on each invoice.
:)Xero could calculate average number of days between invoice date and pay date by customer, then allow the option to automatically apply that average to predict the expected payment date.
Hello,The new Quotes module has the option to add the payment terms.
Most of our customers pay on account so we use the overpayment feature to record their transaction.
Can we have the ability to have negative stock on handIn my small business I take the order, invoice and receive payment before I place my inventory order with my supplier.
As many clients don't bank their cheque and cash receipts daily, they end up with various unreconciled receipts under the Account Transactions tab as they don't want to wait until they bank the cash & cheques to record it into Xero & use the existing Deposit option to batch them together.
What we would like is to be able to select various receipts from the Account Transactions tab and batch them together & produce a bank deposit slip for them.
I'd like to be able not just to delete items, but move them around and add items as well to repeating invoices/bills.
Ultimately it would be great to be able to have supplier details entered against the items as well, and be able to automatically create purchase orders directly from the above report, based on default order quantities.
We raise an invoice at the same time but do not allocate payment against the invoice as reservations can be months in advance.
As a general observation, from a Xero newbie, this is a recurrent theme in Xero, the requirement to use several different screens and areas in the program to execute a normal business process.
I would have thought it better to add the "paying bills" section to the bank account section when you "Spend Money".
Accountants need to be able to amend the Totals line wording to show something more appropriate like.
With other accounting software, accountants are usually given access to headings, totals lines and all sorts of things to amend them as they need to and this is the sort of flexibility we need when preparing accounts.
Hi,I was wondering if you had looked at two reports1- A sales and margin report for Inventory items show comparsion periods2- A Sales Report for customers by inventory items showing selling price, cost pice and margin
I read on Xero that employees would be able to request time off through dedicated smartphone apps, when is this coming as I don't see a facility for this yet?
Instead, I'd have to create duplicate accounts (one for program and one for support) for every account that could have both and then create a new group.
HI , so far I have only been able to find and export file for contact detail which is in xcel fromat, this of distorts the bank account field as unreadable and drops off digits.
If this top bar could be frozen, it would ensure that all options were quickly accessible rather than the mindless scrolling up and back down to select other options or identify accounts/contacts etc etcPlease let me know if this function exists already, I haven't been able to find it to date but I am only new.
It would be nice to be able to pay multiple expense claims with ohttps://community.
Hi Xero,I’d like to be able to get a .
So I have to go and scan in all the receipts and then “join” the receipts to the “Expense Claim Summary Report” before attaching to the invoice (OUCH - doing this takes time and it hurts).
I THINK ITS VERY BEAUTIFUL IF YOU CAN ADD FEATURE OF  SMS ALERT TO THE CUSTOMER AS FOLLOWSWHEN RECEIVING PAYMENT ,-                                    TO CUSTOMER+SALES REP-       DETAILS OF AMOUNT ,TIME AND DATE.
As a BAS Agent, I'd like a report to: Automate checking the GST code per transaction, against the default code, nominated on the Chart of Accounts.
I would like to have an option (i. e. drop down menu) to choose between looking at sales by product (as it is now) and by invoice onlyThanks!
This can present big problems where clients go crazy and add all kinds of new (or multiple) accounts across the P&L and Balance sheet.
While it's great that we can now search for quotes from the sales page; it would be great if we could search for customers or keywords across both quotes and invoices at the same time.
Hi,It would be very useful to have a role that is more designed for a credit controller, only has access to relevant reports for a credit controller, but can still add in things like expected payment date etc, notes on invoices.
Once I approve an invoice, the section called "Add Payment" appears.
Since Xero has the customer's information, the same as required by PayPal's Virtual Terminal, add new functionality to the "Add Payment" button to allow entry of the customer's credit card info and pass the information to PayPal's POS Virtual Terminal via their API.
I use Deputy to import timesheets into Xero and we sync the pay template rates using deputy xero share.
I would like to be able to batch create overpayments/payments on account - through cash coding or preferably through bank rules.
My client wants to set up default payment terms so that the invoices is payable by the end of the following month after invoice date (i. e. invoice dated 19/02/2015 due 31/03/2015).
We use the GeoOp job number as our purchase order when ordering stock for a job and we really need to be able to track all purchases that we have made to that particular job.
I develop docx templates for clients and now need to be able to use Office 2013 to do so, or use my old computer, which is not ideal.
Hi,I think it would be helpful if there was a 'Tax expense' account type in the chart of accounts so when we or the client create P&L's it automatically pulls out the tax expense amount and chucks it under profit.
I can only view repeating invoices if I come out of the individual account and look through my list of all repeating invoices.
I have been informed by Xero that Bank of America uses two accounts for debit and credit on its Business credit cards.
When are you going to provide a proper chart of accounts for a partnership so we don't have to modify every partnership we add to Xero because the chart of accounts you provide is for a company?
When entering a date for a new sales invoice, I use 5.
Hi,I would like you to add a new option to description in bank rules, namely: differ fromFor example: Description differ from 02546VATRegards,Tomasz
The report we run requires several accounts to be displayed in the same report.
It would therefore be very helpful if we could save the particular configuration that we use for this  "Accounts Transactions" report, so that we can simply re-run it with different dates each month.
Our business operates in several currencies and so we need to be able to run the Account Transactions report for different clients in the currency that we traded with them.
I have just spent time at the XERO CON 2015 in London and I am green with envy of the level of functionality our near neighbors in the UK have on their XERO Version compared to the efforts we have to go to in Ireland with the global version trying to make a square peg fit into a round hole.
XERO global cant handle the reverse charge requirement for purchases from other EU countries - XERO solution - set up a dedicated vat rate (at  0%) call in EU Purchases post the EU invoices to this rate and when they appear on you sales tax report take the net figure on to say excel and create a notional vat amount to be added (externally & manually) to the Vat on Sales and Vat on Purchases figures to be submitted to Revenue, (loads of room for error here?
It would be useful if when you hovered over a Report Title it popped up with a description of the report (i. e. ) incl or excl GST, inclusions (e. g. ) cash summary includes invoiced items but a P&L does not and a brief explanation on the report use.
It slows your work because every time you need to go to the next cell or previous cell etc you need to use the mouse.
Hello,To have an option to set up e-mail notifications to receive a report when an invoice payable becomes due as well as invoices receivables?
Would it be possible to add the GST BAS reports and GST audit reports to the reports you can add to report packs so we can create a BAS review reporting pack under all adviser reports?
When a client needs a new brand, most of the time that actually means they need multiple quotes presented in a clear holistic way (logo, business cards, website, email template, brochure, etc.
Right now when we want to put something like this together in an organized manner that won't confuse our clients we have to just use Adobe InDesign.
I've been asked from the Xero team to open a theard about this feature request:We need, for legal reasons, print EACH invoice for our account.
At the moment is possible to print just 200 invoices in a row, splitted in Payment and AWAITING PAYMENT, not keeping sequence and numerical order.
I need to unvoid it as Xero links to our external system so the invoice numbers need to be the same.
I would like to see the same feature that is available in the invoicing section; where we can add documents to the invoice.
Just looking at a VAT audit report for the first time and it's not very clear as to which transactions make up each Box total on the VAT return.
The issue our clients are having is that if you create your purchases invoice (bill) to the PO ( e. g. using Receipt Bank to create all your invoices in Xero ), its of no use to convert the PO into a bill as one exists already.
Especially when entering payments, as I'm usually entering a payment in full on today's date and only really therefore need to enter the payment reference.
Then I'd only have to enter the payment reference and hit save which would save me a bit of time over a whole batch (certainly would feel like it was, anyway).
This would enable us to produce a report that we could use for accounts payable/receivable detail to see what is going on with one supplier/customer.
I'm just new to Xero but I have noticed that you are not able to load conversion balances with tracking category level details.
Since we collect and use email information in Xero, it would be great to be able to send out a general bulk email to our suppliers and customers.
I have found this really helpful with auditing a data set as you could easily review new transactions, in the sales tax report you could identify transactions posted in previous periods since the last tax report was run etc.
I use Xero Payroll which has all my employees details/notes/pay records etc.
Hi, We would like to request an improvement to the 'Income by Contact Report', and have the ability to tick to exclude 'Prepayments' from this report.
I know in the future you are looking into xero to xero payments etc so with this purchasing system in place, customers could pay  for order on the spot with just their xero pin.
Currently you can only select all tracking categories or just one, but I need to show two jobs in one Profit and Loss Report.
Therefore, also,  since the invoice number is the fundamental identity of a sales invoice, irrespective of the Reference field being blank or not, the sales invoice number should be displayed on the GST audit report to enable identification of the sales invoices included in the GST return.
HiI am looking for a report (for Sales Invoices) with the following information:invoice number, invoice date, customer, item code, quantity, amount after discount, invoice sum net, tax in % and amount and of course account!
At the moment I have to either change each invoice which becomes hard to remember or create a separate template for each different rate, time consuming and honestly time wasting.
I have a few clients who work in the building industry and would like to be able to use the budgeting feature.
Although the current buttons to "add new" are nice, Xero assumes that is all I ever need to do by only have that "add new" buttons for each category This makes accessing all of my invoices or bills quite cumbersome and annoying as I should be able to quickly get to them without having to click my way through.
I would prefer a quick link button to see all of them listed so I can do what I need to do, like re-print an invoice, modify an invoice, modify a bill, etc.
Xero already has:- contact- quotation ("soon")- accounting- file storage- purchase orderSo why not just add new feature "CRM" using all those above?
Hi all,I would like the unique account number to be added as a placeholder in email templates.
The problem is that you then need to scroll all the way to the top of the list to select Add New Tracking option.
It is possible to link this via html to XERO for payment of invoices but their needs to be a smoother easier interface for XERO users to set it up.
There is a lot of flexibility to change titles of headers in the report, but I also need to be able to change the title of the report.
This is particularly helpful on other products like sage as it allows you to see more information about the invoices to pay.
Are you able to include a check-box option on the Aged Payables Report to enable us to see the actual due date, instead of just the month?
I run a home care business and invoices to my clients need to be clear and simple.
It would be wonderful to have tick boxes down the side of the published new report list with the option to:Print PDFGoogle SpreadsheetDeleteArchiveIt is time consuming to need to go into the report to choose an optionHope its in the plan!
E. g:Hi <Contact Name>,Here's your remittance advice for payment of <Supplier Total> to your bank account: <Supplier Bank Account>If you have any questions, please let us know.
If the invoice has come via email, it not efficient to have to save the file, just to rename it and then attach it to another email to send it to Xero.
I would like to add line numbers on my invoices, quotes & packing slips.
You ask them to create a Xero Account to view past invoices from my Business.
For example, I'd like to create a Bank Rule where supplier contains either "Daniel" OR "Craig" AND amount is greater than 1,000:Description contains "Daniel"ORDescription contains "Craig"ANDAmount is greater than 1,000This way, it doesn't matter if the person setting up a payment enters "Daniel Craig", "Mr Craig", "D. Craig" or even just "Daniel" in the description, as the bank rule will always pick it up.
Rather than send two invoices, I'd like to add the extra items to their next repeating invoice.
It would be great if this new report showed the Tax column and also a net movement - currently using the Detailed Account Transactions report which all blurs into one due to the accounts not being separated.
The new 'Account number' field on a contact would be really useful if we could use this field within custom links.
We will often find assets mis-coded as P&L items and have to adjust these as part of the year end accounts and it would be great to be able to add these to the Xero fixed asset register with an opening depreciation charge.
They are going to need to•	Identify and record the state each customer is in•	know the appropriate VAT rate in each EU state•	calculate and add VAT at the appropriate rate to sales made in each EU state•	create a VAT invoice for sales in EU states which comply with the VAT rules in each stateNetsuite have announced that they have a solutionhttps://www.
I would like to ability to be able to reorder line items in the Xero bills just like you can with Xero invoices.
Hi,Perhaps this is possible but what I would like isThe ability to set a standard date - or standard date report favorite where when you go to run a report so you don't need to keep changing it back to year end 31-03-14 or similar.
To be able to add this to their card just like the discount percentage would be excellent.
In the Account Transactions Report (part of the new reports) it would be great if you could choose to Group by Account Code, not just by Account Name (in Report Settings).
If this can't be done then it would be helpful if you could create a rule for these (won't let you create a rule posting to a bank account), as Xero doesn't seem to be able to recognise the same transfer to 2 particular accounts as the reference is different each time, so I can't even just tick off some of these, I have to select transfer and select which account it's getting transferred to.
I'd like to be able to automatically attach a file to all invoices I email out from Xero.
At the moment, each time I create an invoice, I have to manually add the same file from the File Library.
Under Xero Reports, there is a report named "Supplier Invoice Reports".
If there was a possibility to filter out this report contact wise (to be able to run this report for a particular contact) it will be very much useful and time saving.
net provides a "Sync for Quickbooks" function which synchronizes transactions - eliminating the need to add these transactions manually and/or rely on another 3rd party app for creating/reconciling invoices & customers from shopping carts/hosting control panels/etc.
For updating the credit control status of customer invoices it would be great o be able to see the last conversation/note had with the client about the invoice and include that in the aged debtor report as an optional column.
We love the "notes" function against invoices, and online is great, but sometimes you need to deliver a report and not having to re-key the latest position/excuse for not paying would be fantastic!
This is something that we need to do on a regular basis, quite time consuming if we need to drop the data in excel and manually work it out.
It would be great to have the ability to sort the new improved General Ledger report by account number not by account name.
I have a large credit note that I would like to allocate to lots of small individual invoices (my example is on the sales ledger but purchase ledger works the same way).
Could Xero add unique reference numbers to transactions so that we can search by the Xero reference number?
Hi I would like to be able to print my invoices to a matrix printer
I send the pdf report to my clients and they then pay supplier invoices according to what's shown on the report and therefore miss off the pence.
When we add a budget, a report needs to show our current cash levels and according to the Budget, when is there an expected cash crunch so that we can allocate more funds at that time or budget for more cash.
Currently we get approval via email and then process payment(tedious task of checking emails and following up on approvals)I know Xero has the functionality of setting of setting Draft only and Approve & Pay access for bills.
Would like to see a feature that allows you to label sales as either existing customers or new business to help analyse growth.
I have a client where credit notes are almost as normal as issuing an invoice (it is just the nature of their business) and the customers will pay them less the credits each week/month.
This would save so much time in allocating credits and would allow a full audit trail of where a credit was allocated (the system could auto-allocate it across many or one sales invoice)If a client has 5 invoices worth $1,000 each outstanding, but also has a credit note for $100, it is likely that the client will pay $4,900, which makes using a batch deposit unworkable, because you can only include invoices.
Hi I have noticed the new feature of being able to issue a receipt on invoice payments.
We just really really really need to be able to see the Reference used on Invoices, for many reasonsPLEASE help us stop having to open every single invoice till we find the one with the reference we are looking forThanks
We really need a sales report based on these groups!
Apart from our company logo, we need to add 2 more logos to our invoices.
I need a feature that will restrict staff to only putting in invoices and no access to financial info such as outstanding invoices and total sales etc.
So we would love to have the ability (like MYOB) to be able to insert a line where we want and need to insert that line appropriately.
Can you please implement functionality to export sales invoices in an ABA file for upload to bank to process direct debit payments?
Hi I would like to be able to easily see who our top 20 customers are on a report that I could share with Directors.
At the moment it doesn't seem to be possible to see this data easily, I don't need to see every single invoice, just a sum of the amount spent per customer in a date period.
I send a month by month profit and loss to my clients each month when we have updated their accounts, however once the financial year goes over into a new year i lose this ability and therefore they can never see a 12 month report month by month,  Is there anyway i can get this report for the "previous year"?
so I request you to add new field "Description" for two report option:Aged ReceivablesCustomer Invoice Reprotwaiting your replyThanks,Nirav Mehta
It occurs to me that if there is a bank account reference associated with each transaction (as in MYOB Enterprise products) it should be possible to use that to extract the transactions related to each programme, and presumably it would be  a short step to apply a variation of the standard report templates to the information to establish the financial performance and position.
Once we have approved our sales invoices we then send "some" via emailWe cant see from the selected invoices whos email we have and whos we dontSo we have to select all - Click on send by emailThen write down who Doesnt have an email addressGo back to our Invoices listUnclick the ones we dont have email addresses for andSelect "send email" againQuite tedious when you are doing an invoice run of about 100 invoicesMy Question is - Why cant we just deselect the invoices from the email list of those who dont have email addresses attached to them - (their is no view prior to this stage showing who has an email address and who doesnt, so you have to select all)I know xero gives the option and wants you to ADD the email address, but when you have a list of approx 100 invoices it is not the time to contact all your customers for their email addressI Hope this makes senseIf you put the theory into practise it will
As an optional extra feature, I'd love to be able to use something like 'Item Sales Summary' which would give me gross sales per item for the given period, comparing each tracking category (in an identical manner to P&L by tracking categories - columns for shopfronts, rows for items sold).
I;d like to suggest a couple of new options when importing CSV files as bank statements:1.
Hi,It would be extremely useful to be able to add the sort code to the Supplier Account Details under 'financials'.
Use contact list in Xero to email reports directly from report screen.
I would really like to be able to copy and paste these cells from Excel directly into the Xero invoice.
This is a new Payment Service similar to the one you have for DPS in New Zealand.
This is because there is no report showing the bank statement lines, as they appear on the bank statement and then showing the corresponding accounts they have been coded to.
We want to be able to set up on our balance sheet the ability to show things like GST, Income tax, related receivables/Payables, bank accounts etc both as an asset or as a liability depending on weather is a debit or credit if the previous year is the opposite way around.
It would be nice to be able to add users and be able to restrict their access to specific tracking categories, accounts, etc.
Ability to add you company Instagram account in "General Settings - Organisation Settings" and your customer Instagram account in "Contacts - Contacts Details"
It would be a major time save to be able to go to the Sales>Invoices>Paid screen and check all of the invoices I would like to copy and click a copy button.
If a business pays suppliers by cheque the only information in the Bank Feed is Amount and Cheque Number, not enough to set up a Bank Rule.
Make Xero able to quickly post batches of invoices as lines on a page rather than having an individual screen for each invoice you post to Xero.
-smile- ) and has decided they don't need a feature like A/R, A/P, why nag them with these "reminder links" and waste screen space every time they open their Dashboard?
In Sage however, you can enter multiple invoices quickly as lines in a batch of invoices which are all posted at the same time.
Xero should add a Xero Response to New Feature Requests.
Only the originator of a New Feature Request should be able to use the Best Answer.
It would be really convenient if when creating a new invoice for a client to have a pop up reminder feature to remind you of such things as "client payments can be applied to credit card up to a limit of $250, or client prefers all invoices mailed in the post rather than emailed"If this already exists and I am unaware please let me know where to find it.
Ideally this feature would allow the selection of an existing repeating invoice for the client at the time the overpayment is recorded (i. e. during bank rec).
Also, after an overpayment has been applied to a repeating invoice and up until the repeating invoice is next automatically created and approved, the overpayment should still be available to be allocated to other regular approved invoices for that client, and if this was to happen the repeating invoice should no longer attempt to allocate that overpayment the next time it is generated and approved.
Being able to search the bank rules via a downloadable report would help us determine which accounts are being impacted by bank rules.
Xero is allocating this payment to the $121 for March rather than the $121 for Feb.  Can this be changed to have Xero allocate to the oldest unpaid invoice.
As we know, Accountants need to use a number of additional Chart Of Account Codes for the purposes of statutory level reporting.
Currently we have to export a P& L to excel and remove the columns with no data, but it would look much nicer to be able to print a report straight out of Xero
I would like the ability to add the address and email detail directly at the time of inputting a new Sales invoice.
As we do mainly single jobs for clients, and often several a day, we are inputting multiple jobs at a time, and then wasting a considerable amount of time jumping through the various screens to input the address and email details seperately in the draft invoice stage.
I wish to change the default account code for retained earnings and should be able to do this automatically when I import my custom chart of accounts.
It would end the need for third party software or job books, and also save time checking invoices before there sent at the end of the month/week/day.
I use XERO and have a detailed invoices so I have to add the Tax Rate per line, I am hoping we can add a function at the top that applied the provincial tax rate to the whole invoice, as opposed to having to add it each line?
In our business, we have users who enter invoices and journals so need Advisor access but I want them to be warned if they are posting an invoice or journal in a locked period.
We'd like to see Xero prompt us at the time we Create New Invoice , to complete and the use the Invoice as the base for Create New PO to the Buyer.
The information is in Xero and it would be great to be able to use it to monitor the business growth.
A client running a small restaurant would like to be able to enter daily sales figures to a cash account and then set up a rule in the bank feed to automatically post all the bankings to the cash account.
1) Click on Accounts2) Click on Sales (Page loads) 3) Click on + New  This could also be applied to +timesheets, +purchases, +credit note etc as it would save a lot of time jumping through different pages.
Abiity to flag this (e. g. using a checkbox) when I submit expense items would help a project manager be able to report on billable expenses when preparing an invoice.
Anyway, I would like to use the 'Repeating invoice' feature of Xero to send subscription renewals to clients.
In particular it would be great to see the following:1 automatic VAT filing reminders sent to the clients from us via Xero, 2 reminders about business tax due dates  3 automatic corporation tax forecasts4 estimate of net profit and dividends (so that a potential illegal dividend can be spotted)5 more exception reporting on the adviser dashboard to highlight potential problems 6 personal tax forecast and deadlines7 weekly update emails to clients showing outstanding invoices, bank rec items outstanding etcI'm not aware that any of the above is possible currently?
As there are multiple users of our a Xero account, we need the ability to message each other within xero to alert to things that require that users attention.
HiI'd like to be able to have multiple email templates for sales invoices which I could then use to attach to different sales invoice templates - whether singular or recurring.
It would be super handy for us if we could input the overdraft attached to an operating account which could then effect the displaying of an available balance under the 'balance in Xero'this would be great in a scenario where you had allocated cash using the purchases invoice section but it had not yet hit the bank account, you would then be able to easily tell how much of your overdraft was still available to allocate.
I really need to be able to add an attachment to the xero generated remittance advice that includes details on the payment made not covered in the remittance.
It would be great if Etsy could be linked to Xero directly to save the time it takes to gather the specific sales information from each deposit from Etsy and itemize the transaction.
The number of sales we have on Etsy has been increasing and hopefully will continue to do so, and I'm sure there are plenty of others who use Xero and Etsy that would benefit even more than me.
This new user should be able to read only sales invoices.
Anyone with access to creating a contact record is able to enter bank information on the record, and change that at any point in time.
Our business runs on 7 and 14 day accounts and I would like to see the report have the ability to break the report down so I can see who is overdue by user defined increments ie 7 days 14 days 21 days.
As we also now need to manually enter the date of the next visit on each invoice, this is taking a lot of time and means our office person has to work after midnight for one or two hours each night or we now have to post somewhere between 10-30 invoices a day.
While this is nice, if I need to make a financial decision (like do I have enough money to cover a payment), I never make it on Bank Balance, I make it on Book Balance.
I need employees to be able to "spend money" and also receive money into trust and general accounts without actually seeing the bank account balances or transaction history.
I use a draft invoice and then copy it each time for each new date to save entering each line from the till.
I have an AirPrint printer at my stock storage facility, and sometimes need to be able to reprint a packing slip (draft invoice) or invoice.
For those using the Xero to Xero link up if Person A sends a PO to Person B, Person B should be able to change this into an Invoice just as Person A can change the PO into a Bill on their system.
When issuing a statement our business has two separate business names that we send Invoices from.
I use different branding themes or business names, on our Invoices.
When I want to issue a statement to one customer, that we send invoices to from both business names, it asks for which branding theme would you like to apply to the statement.
When looking at a contact's record, it is possible to create a new sales invoice, recurring sales invoice, bill or recurring bill.
We are finding it very time consuming drilling down into the Xero system, just to view a few paid expenses files etc.
Some SMALL changes to default selectors that would add to SIGNIFICANT time savings for users:Problems:(1) When it's Jan 2014 and users are loading expenses or invoices by typing a date as "31/12".
When adding a new organisation it would be time saving to be able to add all or a group of staff to that client.
This is essentially a bill that we should be able to add to AP and track it for approval and payment just like any other bill.
I would like to be able to run a tracking report for all account groups.
Currently, you can add files to transactions created in your bank reconciliation by going Create>Add Details>Selecting the File Icon.
Hi it seems as though it is impossible to limit the user's level of access to bank accounts?
(This would only be necessary if one could not enter a quantity, in which case both fields would need to allow negative values) This will end the need for our clients to tell us that they cannot get their invoices to read the correct values when they have return lines on the same invoice.
It would be good to have some additional options in the Xero Trial Balance Report 'Sort By' drop box like:* Account Type then by code* Include accounts with zero balances (maybe an additional filter?
In the Sales by item Report at present it will not show up anything we add to the description on the invoices, one has to drill into the separate invoices for that.
Now that Xero Files have been implemented, it would be great if Xero could "read" the attached PDF or Word invoices semantically and automatically convert that information into a Xero invoice data format (i. e. a Bill).
Many of our customers pay on 60 days EOM (end of month) but there is no option in Xero to set this as a default so it means I have to type it in each time manually.
Different business heads with different budgets- Need to be able to assign a PO to a budget holder for approval.
Xero quite prominatly reminds me, at the expense of being able to easily get to what I want to do, that bank feeds are available for this account.
I'd rather just tell Xero to stop offering these so I can just get on with managing the account manually.
Just a little check box in setup, something like 'Enable Automatic Bank Feeds' so I can uncheck it.
It would be MOST useful to have a 'Pay Now' icon when viewing a client invoice in the invoice header - so that Xero users who have payment gateways can run a credit card straight to the client invoice while logged into Xero - that could head towards integrating Credit Card reading hardware for Smart Devices being able to take payment straight through Xero Apps :)Check out image I put on Xero FaceBook
I often want to use a bank rule for many, but not all, bank and credit card accounts.
For those who want to save their invoices as attachments in Xero they have to upload the invoice to Xero manually.
Hi,Singapore is a growing market and we now have a urgent need for bank feed and Payroll to be handled in Singapore.
I understand the NZ version of Xero allows payment of monthly fees for Xero by direct debit to a bank account (in addition to payment via credit card).
It's easy to overcharge someone by accident if we add the items with tax then set the invoice to tax exclusive they pay the GST twice.
We want to structure our CoA something like this:Legal Entity – Department + project – Core Account NumberBeing limited to 10 characters is too restricting - we would like a minimum of 15.
I want to be able to track sales by Sales Person or Account Manager (same thing).
If you could just list who the Sales Person was for each Customer then it would be easy to run a report listing monthly revenue by Sales Person.
The only way to do this now is to add a sales person to every invoice as a tracking code but this is a timely exercise.
In order to service potential clients who may be interested in trying out Xero, I believe Xero Partners need access to set up "Trial Accounts" for clients under their Xero Practice.
Not only will we be able to monitor leads more effectively, but most importantly, smoothly transition leads over to a full business account once they make the decision to come on board in our practice.
I would like to have a box to put our accounts filing ref and a separate box for supplier invoice no.
Finding budgets aren't being used enough with the SME's I'm working with, if Repeating Bills, Sales and Bank Rules are included automagically would help to encourage the use.
Then, the receive money allocation needs to be able to allocate against the Bounced Payment type as well as Invoices.
When making a batch payment in Accounts Payable it would be good to have the payee name automatically generated in the Particulars box so it doesnt have to be entered each time but still the ability to over type if needed
Then all I would have to do is just add new clients to the Xero Medium or Xero Large group and all the invoicing would happen automatically.
It would be useful to enter the same notes and expected date of payment to multiple invoices at the same time.
My bank already offers online bill pay - why aren't you integrated with the major banks for utilizing their online bill pay?
I shouldn't need to pay for another service (another $40+ per month) to use online bill pay because my bank offers it free.
Xero, PLEASE add a running balance column to your GL (Account Transactions reports) both on screen and in Excel.
I currently have to take the payment off of the invoice in order to change the invoice to a different template and then after printing the delivery note revert it back again to the original invoice and re add the the payment.
Sometimes its important to be able to report for a period excluding the end of period adjusting entries - particularly for larger clients using Xero who want to see pre and post adjustment reports.
However, every time we issue a Credit Note, this throw out the sequence meaning the invoices no longer match in both packages and clients are sent the wrong invoices.
A second line item could then be entered where the total equals the VAT element of the invoice but this should be entered as a negative figure and coded to the VAT account (account 820 in the default chart of accounts) with a tax rate of No VAT.
This would be a great feature, preventing the need to either use a calculator or Excel to work out our margin before finalising a sales price.
Please could the Xero development team adjust the way the sales invoices are produced so that the next new line is added automatically when the last line of the invoices is filled, rather than the operator having to press the button "Add a new line" continuously?
Please see also my suggestion that an "add multiple lines" button be added to sales invoices to save having to add lines one by one - a pain on vast invoices.
Good Afternoon,I think it would be a great feature to be able to flag an invoice or bill as 'in query / dispute' and then to be able to add notes, email a copy invoice & the notes to the appropriate sales person and then run a report listing disputed items to ensure you don't miss one.
I suggest to add HSBC Business Internet Banking feeds to Xero.
Xero gurus, is there a way to have Xero's own invoices--that is, what I pay for using xero.
Add ability to add range of codes on Account Transaction Report.
I would like the ability to select a Bank Feed field (per bank account) to automatically use as the payment Reference.
The code behind this new button would call something similar to the image transfer protocol TWAIN or a similar windows system or Mac local API to grab whatever document is in the scanner at that time, pass it straight to Xero through this protocol/API in 1 click.
I would like to be able to print the Audit Trial Report for BAS Excluded only and make changes, the list can be quite extensive so having a report to work off would be handy.
Author of report for us is not normally reported unless we enter our trading name but gets frustrating to change it every time I publish a report.
But I need to manually change this for each time I use the publish feature.
For those who use both Xero and WorkflowMax, it would be great if you could login once to Xero and be able to access your WorkflowMax under the My Xero tab.
However, you need to assign GIFI codes to your accounts in the following instances:Assigning GIFI codes to accounts■If you file your corporate tax returns (T2s) electronically, you are required to assign a GIFI (General Index of Financial Information) code to each account.
In Xero we need to  be able to store and show this information on the customer contact data, and to be able to add this “Vendor Number” detail to invoices/statements etc.
I have a potential customer who would like to use a STATEMENT as a tax invoice document.
There is just one Name field and I need to use Business Name and Fantasy Name.
Similarly, a common size Balance Sheet allows a business owner to understand if they are overweight in particular areas of their business like Inventory of Account Receivable.
To get this information at present you need to run a Customer/Supplier invoice report, export this, them delete unwanted columns.
I like that you can enter your own invoice numbers, but sometimes you just want auto-generated numbers in the Xero standard format.
I would like to be able to clone a new expense claim from one that already exists - whether that one has been paid, or is to be paid.
HeyWould love to see the online invoice show complete details to customers when we use a Custom Invoice template.
With the new Payment integration would love to start using the online invoices more but this is the only thing stopping me.
It would be great to be able to add a discount to an accounts receivable invoice by either:1.
For example: I'd like to report on the sales YTD compared against Last-YTD.
If Xero could generate statements for a group of contacts it would save these guys tons of time as they are currently working around this by manipulating the customer invoice report at end of month.
Having both those problems means that one must use touch gestures to either select the default value or move the cursor to the right side of the field just to be able to adjust the value.
What we would like to see is the ability to add a receipt in a foreign currency such as HKD$, take a photo, provide expense details and add the amount in a currency that users can select from a drop-down.
I'd like to see a number of tools added to Xero that would help client and accountant work more effectively together but might be equally as useful to a business owner and bookkeeper or owner/manager working alone.
It would be great to be able to add columns to invoices, such that there could be check boxes that I would select based on the columns I want to see on the invoice, or something similar.
At the moment, we either need to put in the full depreciation and journal the business portion to a private use account (cumbersome if there is many different rates and assets), or only put through the whole or net amount and adjust at year end after putting the information through our main accountant's software (e. g. APS) to get the correct figures.
What I mean is if my base currency is AUD, and I have 1000 USD sitting in a US account and I report in USD, I see $999 due to currency fluctuations because over time I've transacted and those transactions occurred at different times with different conversion rates relative to Australia.
I would like the ability to search by reference in bank accounts.
Currently I have to use a separate App and then send the report to the accountant to enter into Xero.
Suggested features:  Xero Expenses:* Add expenses into Xero while offline or online* Quickly add photo of Receipt* Add currency converter so when traveling abroad you can convert the expense back to your normal trading currency* Chart of accounts drop down list* Paid options:  I. e.  Cash, Check, Credit Card, Debit Card.
Most business need to reconcile their supplier statements before paying them in Xero.
Hi,All businesses would save a considerable amount of time if they didn’t need to manually enter Supplier Invoices into Xero.
I just know that as a user I need to be able to deal with duplicates every single time I reconcile some of our accounts.
Then for us it would be like having our standard chart of accounts that we import for various types of clients, we could import or apply the appropriate standard 5 or 10 bank rules that we are entering every time.
The reason we need this functionality is that we sometimes ask clients to pay their monthly bill earlier than the date of the invoice.
To remove a few keystrokes from the process how about being able to nominate a default bank account for paying an invoice (or receiving for that matter).
Most businesses use their current account and it would be good to be able to tab through the Pay from field rather than having to select it from the drop down list.
00So in order to achieve this I would have had to specify my  'GST/PST on purchases'  tax code components to post the 5% GST to sales tax and the 7% PST to the applicable expense for the invoice line   (or second choice would be just to specify a specific GL code)
In the above example of a UK and a German VAT registration, Xero would have 2 VAT CONTROL ACCOUNTS and report the VATs separately.
Can you add a button on the dashboard  "Add New Journal" so you don't have to go through "Reports", "All Reports", "Journal Report" and then "Add New Journal"?
You also won't be able to create prepayments in any bank accounts other than your base currency.
From the chart of accounts ,have a check boxes that allow you to always use tracking against this account or not.
Sometimes companies need to merge transactions using two or more account into one new merged account.
The interface we need would work like this:1) search for the transactions that need to have their account and or tracking changed.
We need the ability to budget for all accounts, not just P&L accounts.
Bank feeds should either refresh at 6am daily - or we should be able to configure the daily refresh time.
E. g. if we have a number of payments with the word Phone in them, we would still want to differentiate once those transactions are coded:We pay three mobile phone bills, on our bank statement these come in as:"Mobile 1 - Phone bill""Mobile 2 - Phone bill""Mobile 3 - Phone bill"We have a bank rule set up which captures all three of these transactions based on the word "Phone".
I've just had a case of my customer not getting(and I sent it twice to him) - so I would like just to IM him the direct invoice link, and I would prefer the invoice link instead of a pdf of the invoice so he can use the "pay now" by paypal featureany advice - or should this be a feature request?
I would like to just take the batch report that comes from this system and put it into Xero as a Receive Money entry.
I still, need to pay some suppliers by cheque so I need a remittance  I can pop it into the envelope with the cheque.
The ability to apply a prompt payment discount to an Accounts Receivable invoice from the match items screen in the Bank Reconciliation.
)1) Usually only applies to payments >= $6002) Usually excludes Corporations3) Usually excludes payments made by credit card or 3rd party network like PayPal due to 1099-KFrom the IRS Website: Form 1099-K. Payments made with a credit card or payment card and certain other types of payments, including third party network transactions, must be reported on Form 1099-K by the payment settlement entity under section 6050W and are not subject to reporting on Form 1099-MISC.
Hi Can someone tell me, i use contractors to input there own expenses on there own xero logins that are set to draft and invoice only i just found out they can export the entire contact database some 1200 customer details at risk.
I would like to be able to go to my other client's account when I am on the current client without clicking on the "go to my Xero" .
There doesnt appear to be anywhere I can specify a period for an invoice, just an invoice date and a due date.
Well I just lost another long invoice I was working on as I got called away from my desk, and by the time I came back I had been logged out.
I really like the NEW feature that allows you to set customers payment terms, my public customers have to pay the balance in FULL before the date of their event and so it would be a fantastic addition if we could put:"number" DAYS prior to invoice date
I would love to be able to use the Sort by Account Code function in the reports (eg P&L and Balance Sheet) but have the option to not show the account codes.
And going out of the bank screen to go and add an invoice, pay it then go back and search for it prior to reconciling is several extra steps, and takes time.
For me, Xero is all about working efficiently and this would save lots of time currently spent entering invoices and marking them as paid just to clear the bank reconciliation.
While the accounts posted to can be edited even tho payment is attached, currently we cannot edit the amounts or tax codes of an invoice without deleting the payments first.
It would be good if we could just issue a receipt for money received, without having to create an invoice, reconcile the payment against the invoice, then create a paid invoice to send to the donor.
So, within the checking account, I simply apply a rule to 'transfer' that amount to the PayPal account and expect to be able to assign category etc within Xero/PayPal, ie accurately bookkeeping the money flow.
In MYOB, when I called up a Supplier which was already set up, it was linked to an Account, for example : ORIGIN - Electricity which brought this info straight away into the accounts field I have about 150 suppliers which I use a lot each month, which means I spend a lot of time entering all this info into Xero over and over and over and over again.
I am very new to Xero and just looking at setting up an account.
One particular customer has about 700 outstanding payable invoices and of that at any one time i would like to select invoices to pay but they are on different pages.
When you click 'next' to go the next page all the ticks on the invoices that you are wanting to pay disappear which is really frustrating and takes up more time and it needs to.
Great to have email remittances up & running - would like to be able to add a logo as with invoices etc.
When I am reconciling, and I come to the need to make a bank rule, it is very simple to make a new rule.
This shouldn't be too difficult to change as Xero already has this feature available in Accounts Payable when setting the expected payment date.
SCENARIO:  In accounts payable, I use the "Planned payment date" option, to schedule payments and manage cashflow.
Hello, I am new to Xero and prior to moving over, I have been able to track job costs by line on each invoice (I was previously using Quckbooks).
I tend to pay multiple foreign currency invoices in one batch payment to my suppliers.
Would be very helpful to be able to select multiple foreign currency invoices (of the same currency) and mark as paid in one payment.
We also need a basic report that lists the items quantity and values in the inventory account and a simple stocktake option to allow counting and changing of the quantity and values.
In the UK version, I would like to be able to run an EC Sales List report
Just as the traditional mail invoices would be stamped with a Red stamp or sticker before mailing to remind the customer we are aware the invoice is overdue and to take action immediately.
Firstly I love xero makes my life SO much easier and there really isn;t anything else I could ask from it except for the following point:When you add multiple lines to an invoice (for example batch paying on a pay run), it then seems to screw up your reconciling, as you can't match individual payments to each member of staff.
Apologies if this has already been asked before, and I know you are keen to make Xero Expenses more "slick", but I would love to be able to pay expense claims by bulk payment, generating a bank file, just like we do with Accounts Payable.
I appreciate it would need employees to be set up in contacts, but we already have that - just need to add bank account details.
I suggested once (as there is no special revenue module in Xero) to add another date field to payable and receivable invoices called something like "posting date".
accounts/accounts receivable/awaiting payment), it would save a huge amount of time if you could display the invoice description alongside all of the other fields - so at a glance I could scan through all invoices, and see what they were for.
Hi all,I have just found out invoice number sorting field "isn't specifically designed as a sequential numerical reference field.
While I find the Dashboard's at-a-glance display very useful, I still have to drill down a few clicks to see my current GST (sales tax / VAT) exposure, and at this point (new business) it would be very helpful to have that.
Late Payment FeesWhen clients just won't pay you on time, set up late payment fees.
Would love to be able to add subtotals to invoices.
It appears that Xero sorts these accounts alphabetically, this is sometimes confusing as I prefer to see Sales codes on top, then Expenses etc.
I should be able to use Xero myself and I would like to see my monthly progress.
I would like to see an additional tab in the Accounts receivable titled "Bad Debts", invoices make it onto this manually by selecting a box on an overdue invoice which then hides it from overdue and shows it in the bad debts tab.
1. provide a payment portal (perhaps include a link when sending email invoices)2. be able to reissue payment link if required (overdue's)3. fees for providing the gateway should be competitive against existing online payment gateways for NZ.
Bring it back to a landing page with details like company logo and registered company office shown to customer to proceed with online payment, even particulars of details entered into invoice for visual reference.
It would be good to be able to apply a discount on accounts payable invoices.
com/forums/5528-xero-api/suggestions/874335-credit-notes-apply-as-invoice-payment-refundhttp://xero.
We would like to be able to create some inventory items in USD so that we can advertise the price as a neat USD figure like $100.
I use Xero to manage my SMSF (among other things)I have several different Bank Accounts and I have both Accumulation and Pension phases The problem is when transferring money between accounts, there is no 'from' tracking category or 'to' tracking category so the balance sheets show them as unallocated.
One example I am thinking right now is when I, as approver of expense claims and invoices, will receive notifications that new draft invoices/claims were sent to me for approval.
I am having issues on controling my accounts receivables - our terms are 7 days due - our expectation is payment before 14 days.
I would like a quick report that I could use as a "calling list"I need to be able to monitor these at a business and staff preformance level also - Xero reports only report by the calander month, I need to monitor these in in 7,14,21 days -  Customers outside their terms need to be blocked - I have multi users working from different sites, I am unable to alert them to a account on "STOP DELIVERY" or an exceeded credit limit  - Do you have some suggestions?
We've just move one of our companies to Xero and was shattered to find we could not combine and hide line items on an invoice like we can in Quickbooks.
For many issues I have with Xero I've been able to find a bodgy, time consuming and rough work around.
I currently use draft invoices as a way of tracking sales orders and generally this would suffice apart fro the printing.
In particular it would be great to be able to record it for sales of wine to a wine distributor which does not attract the WET on their invoice, but you need to calculate it and report it on top of each sale to a distributor each BAS so you claim the WET rebate (if applicable).
Hi, I would like to see an additional Status Option within the Customer Invoice Report which says "Approved Only" (or something to that effect).
Just a small thing but it would be great if the "QTY" filed could be displayed as an optional extra in the account transaction detail report.
Xero currently allows us to track the livestock sales into categories or by adding separate accounts in the chart of accounts, however, unless we can easily see QTY (alongside debit/credit) in a summary report then it will take us a significant amount of time to manually look through all transactions associated with livestock sales and purchases in a period/year.
We all often need this when clients create new accounts because they do not know they should use an existing account for a transaction.
net account and pay directly from invoices.
Doing so could reduce the number of support requests that Xero's staff need to handle personally, while also providing a pre-sales advantage, as those unsure about whether particular features exist or are in the pipeline will be able to find much of this information within the Community pages.
So basically need to be able to add the company name, accounts email address, phone number etc, then also need the ability to add individual contacts under the same contact/company with their own contact emails, addresses, phone numbers etc.
Need to be able to choose which contact for the company to use on invoices.
So if you have the scenario of a late invoice where you receive a partial payment, you will have many headaches to add additional interest to the invoice after the first payment.
I would like to see Xero add an ability to add late fees or interest to invoices, even after a payment is made.
Well, they are not actually cash, but automated sales via PayPal for which we cannot pre-generate an invoice, and going in and creating invoices after the fact would be too time-consuming.
We'd like to be able to apply item codes to those incoming transactions to track inventory sales, but can't see a way to do so.
I bank with ANZ - they support and even promote the use of xero to their business clients.
I know that you can search by name & do each individually - but sometimes you need to pay a number of suppliers but not all & to do this individually is quite time consuming.
Whilst there is logic to this, in that there should be no need to enter Jnls against a bank account, there are situations in Xero where pseudo "Bank Accounts" need to be established.
When using these "Bank Accounts", there may well be a legitimate need to be able to post manual journals to these accounts (Financial Adviser Access only of course).
It would be handy to be able to selectively update prices on repeating invoice templates so a change in price can be implemented across all invoices with the item rather than having to edit each invoice or template and re-select the item.
Can see the business rules getting complex though so maybe just a simple push button process to update selected draft invoices in a list?
Ideally I would like to be able to upload an entire folder of payable invoices to xero.
Instead of saving the email on my pc for processing, would it be possible to forward the email containing the invoice directly to my account at xero, where it could live until I do my monthly accounts?
As a software developer who has just moved my business onto Xero, I reckon I would like to have a go at hacking the API to integrate with some of the other database apps I use in my business.
I'd really like to see Xero add a report builder to the solution.
We need the ability to set up customer credit accounts so that they pay in say 30 days and only then do invoices become overdue if they are not paid.
As an IT company, pushing the use of "Cloud" to our business clients, and also pushing, as appropriate, the use of Xero to small business, it irks me that I can't use my Android device (I have 3 with me at all times, so yes, I'm a dyed in the wool geek), to do invoices and also see what's outstanding on statements etc.
Xero guide is not helpful and their support just gave me instructions on how to do leave requests and pay runs - I know how to do this - what I need is instructions on ETP's and an explanation of what exactly doesn't flow through to reports that you need to do a manual journal as well as the pay run - where do the amounts go then if they don't flow through to GL?
If you haven't processed a pay run, it should be stoppable, immediately, cleared from the system like it never even happened, instead you have a reconciliation item in the bank and one has to go out his/her way to fix things.
Being able to double check the hours entered on the main table of the Pay Run Screen without having to enter back into each employee would save a great deal of time.
It would be great if there was a way to do this automatically in Xero or at the least to be able to generate a report that shows the information they will need to do this calculation.
This affects the calculation for new starters, for leavers, and for bank holiday and annual leave pay.
Currently, you can only Submit for payment once you have selected the contributions you need to pay.
It will be good to have the ability to export the employees information to a spreadsheet, like a report or something like it.
This report also needs to be able to be exported to Excel like other Xero reports so that we can adjust the numbers as required.
This is quite a flaw in the design and i would like to see a way that we can prevent an employee from being able to choose their level of pay.
Have just discovered the new Leave Liability Report and it is exactly what is required to create journals for leave liability - thank you very much for adding this report.
To do this I need to use my Excess Leave Report that depicts my 14 days notice report and Labour & Leave Flash Rates Report.
This report serves a purpose to capture staff that need time to be rested with family and friends to return to work refreshed by issuing the 14 days notice.
I would like to have the ability to edit the pay runs numbers, or alternatively to add a editable reference field to pay runs in a similar way as for invoices and bills.
Context: There was an incorrect tax setting to my account last month, and I was forced to void previous pay runs and re-create them, which messed up my pay runs numbering used in the employees payslips.
When an employee enters their timesheet it would be good to have default pay Items and Tracking categories so they didn't need to enter the same things each time
I use Xero for a motel business, in the past have used Crystal Payroll, I have just started to use Xero as the payroll.
We have literally have 2-3 new employees each fortnightly pay period and setting them up as a new employee can be time consuming.
When processing Auto Superannuation, the new payment process would benefit from a column reflecting the pay run 'Payment Date'.
We currently use WorkflowMax for our timesheet entries and wonder if Xero Payroll allows importing of timesheets from WorkflowMax which we are able to do with our current payroll.
Hi there, I have just been looking at the new feature where leave available to be taken in advance can now be shown.
It'd be great if when I selected a specific employee that it new automatically that I would be needing the blank Housekeeping Hours Template and not need to be selected manually and possibly risking accidentally entering their hours on a different pay rate template.
It would be great if we were able to add more details to the timesheet such as start time, finish time, break times, and a section of where we can put some information on what the staff member worked on that day.
In a typical case the business will buy a laptop for a staff member for say $2,200 (GST inclusive) and the employee will pay, say $200 per pay for 10 pays as a payroll deduction.
I would like xero to take into account the negative holiday or sick leave and deduct the hours off the payslip.
When payment summaries are lodged with the ATO directly with Xero I would like an email confirmation when the ATO Online Lodgement Status turns to Accepted.
It would be fantastic if we are able to set the default minimum monthly earnings in the Payroll Settings so that we don't have to remember to manually change the amount each time a new employee's pay template is set up.
I like to suggest new features to be added which allows annual leave hours calculated and accrued at each pay run.
Payroll summary report (able to export to CSV) to show clearly the Gross, Tax, NIC, Student Loans and Net pay for each employee.
When in the Auto Super area - I want to click on a payment processed and have the ability to Export to pdf, excel etc just like other areas in the program.
Conversely if they work less hours in a week I need to add in extra hours on their payslip in order to pay them their set fortnightly salary.
For example:  We want to show different types of ordinary pay and assign tracking to it and we don't have the ability to hide items we don't use in the time-sheet function.
A business with only full time salaried employee who has exact same pay every week, that you can set it up so that the payrun posts automatically.
A few suggestions:1) Would like to see that you can add a customised field with free format text for staff to add comments against time being recorded2) Would like to not use the Earnings rating code as this is not managed by staff but by the Job Manager from a finance perspective3) Currently can only see the client, would like to be able to track against another tracking category4) Would like to see public holidays auto populated so staff do not need to enter details5) would like to be able to choose the week start/end display I. e: Mon - Sun that is aligned to the business tracking
I would love to be able to create a cool pay stub that has company logo and rearrange the payroll information to look less bland that the Xero default.
Some feedback from a client of ours using Xero Payroll:They need to change the ability to reinstate a past employee, allowing you to copy the details (bank account, tax number and codes and email) while also with the option to change if required - although a change is not usually required in my industry.
We need a simpler, streamlined way to Void a Payroll check from a completed Pay Run, WITHOUT creating a new check number for it.
In the bank we need to add a Receive Money transaction, and then upload a .
We started our own business on a US military base overseas and our address is APO (city), AP (state) and we will like to add payroll runs and update certain information but there is no selection and only shows the 50 states.
When using the automatic superannation processing, it would be great to be able to enter a date when you would like the super funds to leave your account so that the payment of super is separate to the process of reviewing and submitting super amounts for approval.
Just like the P/L or Balance Sheet, just a print and/export button at the bottom would be fantastic.
As we do monthly management accounts i need these figures in the accounts dated the month end date.
As we are a service based business, being able to see staff costs relative to tracking categories would be hugely informative.
HelloI would suggest to add an option to pay leave in advance -  I needed to pay off accrued Annual leave balance to our employee who goes on Maternity leave in her last pay.
Hello,It would be helpful and useful to have a 'NET Payment' total in monthly pay run summaries alongside the other totals given at the top of the pay run summary (Gross earnings, Employer NIC etc.
I would also like to see leave requests automatically embedded into the time sheets to stop staff from entering leave and then duplicating the leave within their time sheet.
Payroll should be able to be posted directly from a chosen bank account, especially where ABA files are created for payment.
We have been using Xero Payroll since April 2015 and I need to use the information held in the RTI file (as submitted to HMRC, the UK tax authority) each month, in order to re-allocate salary costs (Net and Employer's) to separate budgeted departments, using an MJ.
My son has to pay wages on Xero - and would like to be able to use an iPad, as currently that is all he has got, unless he calls around home and uses our computer.
Then I have to add it together with all the other pay items that are subject to SGC and do my calculations manually to pay Super.
setting out example:company namestaff member                                                                                                                week end dateDate/ Start Time / Break 1 Start/ Break 1 End/ Break 2 Start/ Break 2 End/ Finish Time/ Total ord hrs/ Total ot hrs/ (add extra column for Total DT Hrs) if required
The option to add the YTD for previously active earning lines need to be added so the figures add up correctly.
Automatic Wages reconciliation journal like bill payments to allow the wages payment to be automatically matched up to the bank account like a bill payment would be.
We process a fortnightly payroll for around 100 employees who do manual time sheets (as they are mostly computer illiterate), it takes so much time to enter their personal and annual leave in their employee files & it would be so helpful to be able to enter it directly in the pay run screen.
Hi Xero SupportIs it possible to look at adding a function to be able to use "tab keys" on keyboard to move around Timesheet, particularly moving from "Earnings Rate" to "Project" across to "hours" columns, then just moving across to new line.
Need to be able to pay 4 weeks at a time and the pay rate should be reduced to weekly rates x4
Problem: XERO makes me navigate back to (meaning: reload) the pay run page to add another pay runI am a small business owner and don't do this every week.
Payroll reports Please add a report that will show the number of employees on leave for a period of time and the type of leave each is taking.
The problem that I can see is that the person (often the business owner) needs to click on the pay run and download the summary but this report is on several pages depending on the number of staff and includes everything, not just net pay.
It would be really good if generating a pay run automatically created an invoice that could then be matched with the payment in the bank feed and reconciled.
You are able to run a report a report and select the fields you want to report on.
edit, remove their bank accounts (lots of people like to distribute their salary among various accounts) and also to be able to add, edit, delete their superannuation details.
Simple payslips more like invoices in Xero than payslips where we can do the salary deductions ourselves and a time sheet.
Hi, we have permanent full time, permanent part time, casual and fixed term contract resources.
Need to be able to do more than 1 draft pay run at a time, especially at xmas time when you want to create multiple weeks for holidays and then be able to review and submit at a later date.
It would be good to add an expense account to pre tax deduction pay items that auto posts the debit to the appropriate expense and credit to the wages expense account.
I'd like to import expenses (payroll checks, specifically) as unreconciled transactions, so that they could still be matched to bank statement lines from the connected bank account.
I would like to be able to see what I have paid and what is due not just what has been posted as super.
As a user I want to have the ability to either specify the payment date when I mark the taxes as paid, or I want the ability to change the payment dates once recorded, so that the dates in Xero match the dates in the bank account, and there is no ambiguity about whether or not the taxes have been paid on time, and Xero stops complaining that the taxes have been paid late.
Lots of people need to provide this information on a weekly basis to Centrelink etc for Child Support and other reasons and so we have to generate a payroll summary report as well as the pay slip.
I am needing to review multiple pay runs and it would be great to be able to jump between payruns and have multiple posted pay runs open in several tabs at the same time.
This needs to be changed, as you should be able to amend your Chart of Accounts and remove/archive any accounts you no longer need - eg tool & loan accounts for ex staff.
Need an "calculate leave on this pay type" button on all pays types (like you already have for overtime), so that we can have multiple base earnings rates.
Are you able to at least double the size of the text we are able to currently use?
Would be helpful to be able to 'exclude all' from entire list of employees and then be able to select only those to be included in current pay run.
They might use an employee in one pay run and then not the next, but will use again in future, To be able to search from employee list for name to be included would streamline process.
I currently use Xero Payroll (Australia) and would like to send out payslips so that they look like they come from a different email address to my log in user email address?
Wasting time switching to an employee to add leave (sick,annual,termination) could be solved by a Leave option in the pay run.
Hi All,Just realised that on a payslip, Xero hides all earnings lines other than those which are active in the current pay period.
I would love to see the ability to send time sheets from within the posted pay run, and have staff be able to log into Xero and view ones created by the employer.
For casual employees who are granted leave entitlements, their leave balances should appear on any screen and report just like a permanent employee.
I would find it useful if Xero payroll supported Business and Personal Services Income PAYG Payment Summary types.
It is critical to be able to sort the Transactional Activity Summary report by Employee Groups or to have a report that details the Payroll Activity Summary by each employee (like the Old Payroll Activity Report).
The use case for the report is all Xero Subscription holders that use Australian payroll and have multiple job descriptions.
If the items are being setup in the pay template area it is extremely likely year to date figures will need to be entered in the payment summary area aswell.
As well as paying the employee via wages, also pay the expense claim from the new account.
I am transitioning from MYOB to Xero & in MYOB I am able to successfully over-ride the warning that payroll deductions are usually  a liability account that pops up when I setup a payroll dedcuction category in MYOB.
It would be good to be able to report on all groups in the payroll reporting system instead of just one group at a time.
I will probably delete the new fixed asset but would like to be able to have both the deposit and balance payment transactions linked to the asset record.
Hi,I have a client who has received cash from their parents to pay off a supplier's account (not in full).
It would be so much easier if we were to be able to clear deposit and/or checks on the Bank Rec Summary - if there was a box we could check that items cleared and then clear them all at one time instead of one at a time.
I have a Business Development Manager, however I don't want this person to be able to see the bank accounts, but raise quotations.
How do we get either Xero User to be able to update the bank feed?
For example:- I have a $10,000 bill from a vendor- I have already accrued $8,000 of expenses for that year (or across two calendar years)- When I receive bill from vendor and add it into Xero, Xero forces a $10,000 increase to Accounts Payable, as well as I need to choose an account to which is expensed the entire $10,000.
With the presentation of the new financials like on other Accounting system (MYOB Products) I have here a question:I have the following 2017 and 2016 figures but as you can see from the screen shot (Sadly I am not able to post a screenshot here; I did wrote to Xero too) the closing figures from prior years need to be showing under a shareholders’ opening balance so the start of the financial year should have no balances showing in Funds intro, drawings, salaries untaxed.
Currently I have it set as a bank account and have just seen it as a payment service.
Hi,I am starting to use Xero for my PTA account (as I am the treasurer).
Xero > Reports > 1099 Report > Setup 1099 Rules > Paid from drop down should allow the selection of asset accounts because in construction we have to pay vendors to an asset account (this is called capitalizing an asset; we cannot expense construction cost as they happen)
I've been a Xero user since 2011 and never once have I managed to defeat the ridiculous load of nonsense Xero calls the Profit and Loss report.
Reason being, we used movemybooks to import all our data from Sage, and it created a PAYPAL bank account which we just could not find any way to get it to be connected to our actual Paypal account to download transactions.
I'd like to match a bank transaction to an invoice and a bill.
I'm not a book-keeper or accountant, just love being able to track all spending and see totals each month, and I do use it to track my rental properties and prepare GST returns.
When I look up a supplier or customer's account, I would like to be able to see all the invoices, all the credit notes and all the payments on that account.
This is getting really annoying as I again need to find a customer payment received and find what that has been allocated against - on this system I have to wade through each invoice and try and find it.
something like payment owed and payment repaid?
For sales invoices, I need to have a job number reference (our ref) and a customer PO reference (their ref) as well as our invoice number.
Is it possible to filter the new income statement by one tracking category and use a custom layout to add columns for the other tracking category?
I would like either the Account Transactions report to have a beginning & ending balance, OR be able to select accounts to show on the General Ledger account.
Hi, I recently joined Xero as Ive just started up my own small business and was wondering how I can access transactions that took place before I joined Xero?
I did observe two things that make the live impossible and if Xero fix this, we won't have double up in Transactions and errors and won't lost many time (and time is money that some company could save) correcting and checking these:1) In xero the back button clicking should be deactivated (lot of people seem to code something, than check for what ever reasons and click on the back button, the transaction appear again new to be coded2) If you have some transfer between account taking for example ANZ(a) and ANZ(b).
So what we need is to be able to enter the annual budget split across some of the codes in the chart of accounts (not all codes in the CoA are relevant for this specific fund) and to easily see what we have left in the budget across the two tracking categories for each code.
It would be really helpful to be able to see what account the vendor's bills were posted to without having to select "view"  or creating a custom report.
Why there is no option to use 210-Goods for resale account in Expense Claims while adding a new receipt?
It would be nice to have a link to Quotes under the Accounts Dropdown so that you do not need to go via the Sales link to get to Quotes
Small value sales of commodity items find xero too clunky to operate efficiently (think dairy/convenience store timings for a certain amount of interactions), but an add-on like vend e. g.  seems for my needs overly ambitious - and thus bringing a price tag higher than xero itself.
There is a new great report "Payable Invoice Detail".
Hi,If I have purchased an item using my business account for someone else, and I just want to recoup my money, ie charge the exact same amount on the invoice, how do I enter it so that I don't end up paying tax on it?
Hi,Can anyone tell me if there is a report that just shows a list of all invoices YTD, I don't really need much detail in it, just sales value for each invoice.
Hi,i have added a few new entries into my chart of accounts but they do not appear in my Overall Budget.
Hi allNot sure why but for some reason when I print an invoice it now downloads rather than just print as it always hasI use Firefox and have not changed anything.
We also track employee performance by examining fee income and, although we can do that in Xero in other ways, there does not seem to be a way to view the Fee Income account in a way that includes invoice details (such as the invoice number).
My business is seasonal and I would like to be able to make comparisons with financial data from previous years.
We also have different addresses to invoice to within the same client and I can't find any way to tackle this, without setting each department up as a new customer (which then affects account statements).
As it is I can only "add a new line" at the bottom of the Invoice therefor the Invoice is not in date or customer order!
It would be great being able to  the GST Audit Report by 'account code' rather than just than just by 'date'.
We are a UK company and we use Pay Run but not Payroll on Xero.
Hi all,Looking to set up a new chart of accounts by function, e. g. Sales would have a salary & wage expense, as will Marketing, as will Admin and so forth.
Hi,I need to add our T&Cs to every invoice as a page 2.
It would be MUCH better if we could for example, generate a Sales By Item report and be able to have a search option so instead of a date range of all items, I can choose a line item and all it's versions.
I think it would be great if it was possible to add a new tracking category option when you create a sales -> invoice or purchases -> bill.
Some of my clients use job numbers for tracking the sales and costs of job projects so there is a lot of new tracking category options being added every month.
It would be good once you pay an invoice whether a single or batch payment that when you have paid the invoice and a remittance is sent that a note is put on that invoice that a remittance was sent on that day and time in the notes for that invoice.
Can we have a P&L Report that displays account groups only without all the detailed accounts that roll up into that group?
HiI have just started a new job using Xero for the first time.
And it would be great if I could add the Reference (invoice) number in the area on the Bank Reconciliation instead of having to click "Add Details" just to put the invoice number in.
I would like to know if there is a way to add a GoCardless payment link into emailed statements so a customer can pay all outstanding in one go rather than via individual invoices?
I know they can view and pay all outstanding invoices if they have a Xero account but it seems a bit clunky as they HAVE to have a Xero account in order to see them.
So my question is should i set up a "Shareholder current account" in liabilities and recode all drawings/introduced funds payments to the new account?
To show what I have done already, I made 2 accounts within the Chart of Accounts: BF = Booking Fees, I have 1 x item in Booking Fees, just BFAF = Artist Fees, I made 2 x items in the Artist Fees, AF in and AF out, so that takes care of the Artist Fee flowFrom here I have reconciled Artist Fee's through the year within the Artist Account, with fees going in and out, and I have reconciled all the Booking Fees into the Artist Account.
Do I need to make an item - 'BF outs' and turn that money into an new account, say - Agency Assets, which then in turn pays off any outgoings?
I would like to add expense codes that are not listed in the drop down menu when itemizing the expenses in a credit card payment.
Hi,I have two account feeds in Xero - My business checking account and my business credit card.
My process going forward will be to:- Run GST report- Populate BAS- Once bas refund/payment made/received allocate this into GST account to offset and PAYGW to PAYGW payable account.
I have just started a Norwegian AS (corporation) and would very much like to use Xero for our accounting software.
Hi all - I know how to edit a previously entered transaction in Xero to add it to a tracking option, is there a way to do so for multiple transactions under say, a specific contact or expense account?
We use several invoice templates and I would like the email body to be different depending on the customer/contact.
Hi, I have set up a property company and have 2 accounts, Office Account and Client account.
net software just shows the details text which is supposed to be for my account on all of the transactions i. e. I put March Batch 3 in the details box at the top near the narrative box, and all of the invoice numbers for my suppliers in the correct column but when it comes through Barclays software it shows March batch 3 on all suppliers payments and this is what shows in their bank account?
I've seen some people mention that it's possible to integrate your Amazon Seller account and Xero to import sales transaction data (not invoice).
I need to match the invoice with Amazon Seller Account's transaction that would be imported into Xero.
I am selling in person and it is great to be able to quickly set up and send a new invoice using the iPhone app.
Hi guys,I have about 36 items that I invoice regularly and each different item also attracts a levy of 12% which I need to add on a separate line.
The plan is at the end of the year to add this account with the other recorded sales tax (when I do use a rate for inclusive/exclusive) and get the total.
Hi, I'm trying to use a tracking category just for expenses but once a category is created it appears in both sales invoices and bills.
I have an un-reconciled payment in Xero that I need to refund.
Or if you save & add another bill, and you don't know there is unallocated cash on that supplier's account, then you have to skip that, go back to bills, and then click add invoice.
It would be great if when a business invoices through Xero the customer could click a link to "pay now by credit card".
I need to run a report for a specified time period that reports all revenue for the period on an invoice/journal basis (not line item).
The 'Customer Invoice' report doesnt include non-invoice/cr note activity.
The 'Account Transactions' report shows 'Reference' not the invoice number.
Hi there,In my bank feed I have a series of statements like this pair:Honour/Overdrawn Fee (amount in spent column)Waive: Honour/Overdrawn Fee (same amount in received column)Is there any way I can group these together so they cancel each other out?
I believe the bookkeeper/accountant have set up rules for transactions from my personal accounts, i. e. whenever I buy anything from that same milkshake shop, it is registered as me taking money out of the business (adding to the total of what I owe the business).
Hi There Is there are a way to do bulk invoicing for more than a client in the same time let's say if I do change my client annual subscription (same amount for all) and I am asking if I can tick all my client in one go and create invoices for all of them with the same value
Hi,Just starting a new discussion based on a problem raised back in August 16.
I am unable to add a receipt when reconciling transactions against a bank account.
I am in a business that I receive money every week from the same client but they don't always pay the exact amount of their invoices or could pay weekly,fornightly,monthly so I am forever searching.
They all use the exact payment details each time so if there was a rule where you could put there bank reference details as the match not the amount.
But in this case CreditNote goes to Debit in 400 account and therefore reduces the balance, which mean that when invoice is finally fully payed I'm not able to reconcile 400-sales ($700) with 090 Checking ($1000).
Statement option for Contacts and Suppliers should be there in Report menu like Account Transaction for general ledger as it would lead to have better option for audit and to track transactionsStatement option for Contacts exists in Xero but this report also do not provide complete information about a particular transaction
I then made a payment to my business to reimburse my business for this mistake.
I want this report to mirror my bank statement, not show each invoice amount contained in that payment.
Hi I am running our BAS statement report and realised that a zero figure is against W1, even though when I print a Payroll Summary report for the same period there is a figure recorded against Earnings.
Sometimes a client will pay and invoice using their credit card and sometimes they request a refund so we use BPoint again to issue the refund.
I would like to change the initial date that I chose for Xero to have access to my bank account.
Hi I exported Xero Csv chart of accounts amended and am now trying to import my amended CSV chart of Accounts.
Hi everyone, I'm new here and trying to recreate an invoice similar to what I used previously, The only thing i'd like to change is the middle section where you have 'item, description, qty etc.
They need to be able to access Spend Money in order to take pictures of their receipts and code to gl accounts for their debit card purchases.
HiIf a small amount is credited into our account (in this instance a gift from the bank who made an error on another issue), do I just add it as a credit note?
Good Morning,I have an imported bank transaction that is a payment for 10+ invoices.
For example : if my old accounts system at the end of last year looked like this :Bank balance = £10,000 (actual balance of my bank account at 01/01/2017) Accounts receivable = £5,000 (invoices we've raised for our customers that have yet to be paid)Accounts payable = £7,000 (invoices for goods we have yet to pay)how can the debit and credit columns zero each other out?
We're trying to import a large number of new products and we'd like to be able to enter the data into the csv import file so that the Description field is formatted over multiple lines.
Where a client  is not given access to input any information or does not want access , Would it be possible to  export or construct one report of all unreconciled  bank transactions of a client who has multiple bank accounts ?
Hi All,I would like to know how to record thisCash loan from existing bank (no bank account or feed) into business, so I have created a new non-liability account - called 'SME LOAN'.
So, I thought about creating a Bank Account in US$ and marking the invoice as paid to that account.
Just recently I noticed that there are extra spaces appearing in my emailed sales invoices.
So when I receive a payment on a sales invoice it creates a dupe line in my bank account transactions.
Also, sometimes if there is one invoice that is queried or not due at the same time as the others I would find it helpful for a payment screen similar to the batch one to make the individual payment, rather than just adding the details on the invoice and manually creating the payment through the bank.
HI,I have received 2 payments which cover three invoices:Payment 1:Invoice 600 and part of 621Also need to adjust for paypal transfer feePayment 2:Part of invoice 621 and invoice 628How do I reconcile this?
Hi All,Anyone else having trouble emailing/printing  invoices, I am trying to email an invoice  and the send email box comes up them the waiting thing is just going around and around, so ok  I will print to PDF and email myself, but no luck there either,Error box comes up , then preparing to print box appears then same thing the waiting thing is just going round and round,Anybody have any suggestions,Thanks
I have just gone to make a payment for a customer who wants to give me their credit card details over the phone, and the online payment option within Xero has gone.
Hi, I need to download the Xero logo to use it for marketing on our training courses.
If 10 payments are sent out how do I reconcile my accounts so that only 1 payment goes our each month for each creditor for payment of their 30 day account.
Hope someone can help only new to zero in the last couple of weeks have always used myob at the other companies I have worked where you pay the account via a clearing account and then create a file to upload to the bank, which only has one payment for each creditor.
Hi There,I would really like to be able to able to search all bank accounts in both sterling and Euro amounts, as one search.
Hi teamI've recently discovered that a number of transactions seem to have been disrupted - and not appeared - in our bank feeds around the time of the Kaikoura earthquake on the 14th of November.
However once saved and batch payment report prints it appears to just put them in a random order.
My supplier used my second payment to cover a new invoice and then refunded the difference.
Xero wanted me to input every single outstanding sales invoice and purchases bill, which I figured was pointless because I was going to do that once the new database was up and running anyway.
I then imported the outstanding invoices (which caused a new set of problems - see below) and then voided the 'invoices' I'd created during the set up since all the correct invoices were now in the system.
I still need to be able to add everything individually for purchase orders but not every customer is bothered with knowing every single individual price, most just say " whats it going to cost me.
We invoice through xero in customers currency and overseas customers pay to our Western Union account in their currency (USD, EURO etc).
Do I need to set up separate Western Union accounts in Xero for each currency?
If I buy fuel and want to add it to the xero app I way want to split it as 80% business and 20% private use
HiWhen do you use a reconcile rule to reconcile a payment, and when do you manually create a Bill and attach an invoice to it?
However, I can't easily add a document to this, so I just figure that I can download the invoices whenever I need to show them anyway.
I'd like to be able to tick a box somewhere and have Xero prompt me to add a document when using a rule a to reconcile.
However, this doesn't allow me to easily add the actual invoice from Xero.
Does anyone know whether we are able to have two accounts within Xero linking to the same subscription or whether there are discounts available for users who have multiple accounts?
I have a client who receives a lot of monthly bank receipts from the same people for the same amount every month, it would be great to be able to set up recurring bank receipts instead of having to create invoices for each and every receipt.
I'm new to Xero, and I am hunting for a report that I fear doesn't exist.
With 15 staff, several dozen field sales coordinators and hundreds of field sales agents, we use Xero for invoices, accounting and to track the status of credit sales.
Unfortunately, payment was made to the fraudulent bank account with no recourse from the client's bank.
Hi,I have a sales invoice from September which was wrongly coded to a No VAT PAYE account instead of Sales.
My question is can I just amend the account on the original sales invoice to sales?
My client has given numerous members of his staff access to Xero (approve and pay access only) but would like one person to have access to petty cash but not see his other bank account balances.
Hi there,I'm starting to send invoices using Xero, but am having problems issuing invoices that are not VAT Invoices (as in, an invoice before payment with the VAT invoice coming after).
I will then use the business cash account to pay for some business expenses.
That way, I can use a "spend money" from a Xero (normal, current) bank account to pay off the credit card via a Xero "transfer" action.
Hi,We have several clients where their Xero is either slowing down due to the amount of data stored in their records, sales invoices that are being raised or purchase invoices that run through their accounts each month.
I cannot seem to find any info on how to set-up xero to xero for our supplier to be able to send us, via their xero account, their automated repeating invoices?
Hi,I've been using QB in my business, with Bill Pay.
The payment of the invoice was done in a batch reconciling a payment from Pay Pal against 5 invoices.
As a newly certified Xero Advisor, I would like to start using Xero for my own personal use, so as to familiarize myself on a deeper level with the software.
So my question was if you have a group of companies (with separate subscriptions) under one billing account and with one Xero Network key (companies 1A & 1B for example) and you connect with another company with a different billing account and Network Key (Company 2) can you send invoices separately from company 2 to 1A or 1B?
Is there any way to modify an existing report or create a new one that would essentially provide me with the ability to examine sales of a particular item that also accounts for returns on credit memos and provides an accurate count of that item sold.
To do this create an invoice and select your new Pro Forma Invoice branding theme instead of your original theme-Once filled out save the Pro Forma invoice by pressing the down arrow on the save icon and select save as draft-Now if you go back into your current invoices page select the Draft invoices bar, your new Pro Forma invoice will be there.
You are able to print and send this to your customer as normal-Once you receive payment from the customer go back into the Pro Forma Invoice in drafts and approve it-Once approved you must edit the Pro Forma Invoice and change the branding theme back to your original branding theme that you normally use for invoices, you can change the reference number if required.
Hello there,I would just like clarify if I could use the Xero Certified Advisor logo on my business cards?
Hi there I wanted to know are there any circumstances where a user can make a payment out of your bank without an approval text message being sent to the owner for approval first?
Hi - when I import purchase/sales invoices using the template, the account code field (which I'm assuming is for the GL nominal) doesn't upload and I have to input them manually on each invoice.
Hi,I have recently started my small business, and have opened a xero account.
Hi,Until recent days I have been able to reconcile multiple invoices to a single payment using the "Find and Match" function.
This function is no longer working (ie Shift & Mouse) for multiple selection within Bank Reconciliation yet it does work in other Xero functions eg Sales or Purchases where I can select Outstanding and use Shift/Mouse to select whatever I want to rather than individual selection (frustrating).
I would really like to take advantage of the live feeds and save myself a TON of time, but I cannot find a way to fix this is settings for the account.
If you are on the VAT cash scheme and input any transactions as spend or receive money at the invoice date (and a different date to the bank statement line), Xero over-rides the the bank statement  date and puts the transaction in the VAT return as the date of the spend / receive money.
– no longer able to send single invoice to contact group of 100+ customers which was one of the major time saving attractions to take out the subscription to Xero.
Support  slow and  – to quote response verbatim “We are currently aware of an issue which is preventing Xero from being able to create invoices for Contact Groups.
Hi allI have just set up a multi currency subscription as we run NZ and AU accounts.
I tried to use the new Receivables Summary Report.
I would like to avoid having to export the either the Customer Invoice Report and customising each month the columns and splitting customers apart etc.
We have just moved our data over to Xero and it seems that in the previous accounting system sales and purchase invoices were not marked off as paid.
Taxation - VAT system accounts -> we need separate VAT accounts: one for purchases, one for sales and one offset account- VAT reverse charge entries for EU transactions- we need to generate xml files for EU VAT statement (VIES) and other local tax reports (standard provided structure of XMLs)2.
Accounting- we need to have available some report in Romanian language (trial balance, journal of entries etc)- exchange rates - we need to use National Bank of Romania exchange rates for unrealised gain / lossesThanks!
We only moved to Xero this year and did so under the understanding that we would be able to use the SmartLists function because it is crucial for our business that we are able to track clients that have not used our service for a specified period of time.
I was just doing my bank reconciliation and XERO automatically and randomly reconciled my bank statement lines, leaving invoices and bills I paid / received money from my customers  unpaid.
We invoice them separately for each individual job, and they pay us for those jobs in one batched payment.
When they view their invoice online they can see the strip fee (not something I want them to see) and also they can pay by credit card BEFORE I have a chance to add the fee if they have the link from a previous payment
I use the same template invoice for everything and the calcs are all correct (on the invoice and the VAT returns), but just this box is invisible.
There are some app partner solutions like Cin7 but we don't need a huge add on, just a simple solution.
So, say for example I invoice in GBP, the customer pays in GBP, and then I accept that money in PayPal and have it convert to CAD and pay into my bank account.
Andre Biganovsky from Kinetyk will showcase some amazing Xero add-on’s which integrate into Xero and can take your business to the next level.
If not, a statement on this from Xero would go a long way to reassure me I won't be having to change accounts software in just under 2 year's time!
When reconciling it seems I either need to select a contact or create a new contact in order to be able to reconcile.
Now that we use Receipt bank to scan our invoices in, we have a lot of them in our drafts.
Hey Everyone,I am new to Xero and am a partner in a new Importing Business.
Hi, I am a business subscriber of Xero, and use Xero for more than 3 years.
Hi,I'd like to be able to add our email to the header of our invoice.
I would like to manually include my annual budget into Xero and then be able to compare actual versus budget for a specified period in a report produced from Xero that can be published.
The Search Bar seems to be no longer able to find and Invoice NumberFor Instance if we want to bring up an Invoice, we could enter the Invoice number in the Search BarWhats Happened?
I would like to request one report that I can run to ensure all the bank accounts are reconciled.
Currently, I am running a Bank Reconciliation report for every bank account (some organizations I deal with have around 10 accounts), and would much more efficient if it could consolidate into one report.
I dont need any help with what to do with interest or payments against the tax owed just getting the initial amount owed onto the liability account?
Add more features and customization, If we are tracking a rental property, do we really need to put rent received under Sales Revenue?
How can I setup a new user so that they are able to prepare and send sales invoices, upload and request authorization for invoices, etc.
Hi all,I have a general question about the balance sheet report for division in xero:In Xero, I have a bank feed account and I have been allocating transactions from that bank account to different accounts for division A (for argument sake).
It would be useful to be able to add additional reference fields within invoices.
And afterwards we doing the payment approval on the same date for all the Expenses Claims The question is,once we doing the report for account detail transaction1.
Hi, We regularly receive deposits from our Payment Express facility that reconcile against a number of different invoices.
Hi I am reconciling accounts during a sage to xero switch over and have one customer with  unallocated payments on account for the last financial year (Sage) resulting in a credit balance or payment on account at the year end.
Would love to be able to further filter customer invoice report to allow us to input a date range for payments received, thus enabling a report showing figures for debtors owing as of a certain date and any payments received to date,  and within a date range.
Some debtors pay extra for the next invoice however, in Xero you need to create a received money transaction.
This is made up of: product sales + postage charged – amazon fees = amount paid into my bank I don’t make enough sales to justify using a2Xaccounting and I don’t want to track every order individually.
The payments are made up of: product sales – stripe fees = amount paid into my bank I want to be able to record the product sales fees and stripe fees.
3 i have questions about:1) Select "Add new account" to create a separate account in Xero for your iZettle card payments.
2) Select "Add new account" to create a separate account in Xero for your iZettle cash payments.
3) Select "Add new account" to set up a separate account in Xero for iZettle fees.
Xero just changed something I use ALL THE TIME.
XERO have just removed the ability to add a line without an account and charge!
Hi there, I produced a management report from Xero every month and as I did it for the end of July, I have noticed that my retained earning figure has changed.
in this report you were able to print so each job would be on an individual page as a new profit and loss report.
We don't use headers for our columns and new to xero so want to be able to use the system to generate our exisiting invoice format.
I've received a bank payment from a customer and am having trouble getting a remittance, how do i apply it as a payment on account so i can then send out a statement that will include this or see it reducing the balance in the aged receivables report.
Hiwe run a small enterprise and act as an agency/space rent for our retail sellers and new to xero, having used sage before but a novice there too They send us a sales invoice for the full amount earned, we send them invoices for the fees and commission and deduct the commission from the payments then made via the bank account, occasionally we deduct fees if they are behindBecause of this their bills to us are showing as being underpaid and we have a matching set of invoices from the other side.
She had not paid by the time her next "payment" from me was made so I deducted the "monies owing" (invoice amount) from the bill amount I paid her.
the payment I made to her looks like a part payment of a bill -ie I created the bill as usual for her consulting fees -then deducted what she owed me.
We use our own money to pay on the credit card of the business.
I just went to look for a method to get a report of expenses for a contact with a breakdown of account allocations and hit a blank.
We are looking to use PowerBI to report on Xero data through the new Content Pack, however want to add a second data source (an Azure SQL Server) in order to meet our clients needs (i. e. it has some supplementary data which we want to report along side).
I have a New Zealand Invoice (I am in Australia) that I have just paid via Forex (so in AUD into a Forex bank account here in Australia).
Hi Help I cannot figure out how to pay purchase invoices using the directors Loan account Is there a way to do this in zero or delete the invoices and do a manual journal?
8 (for 80% business use) and again as $100 in the loan account with quantity 0.
We've had an amount transferred from PayPal to our account however this amount is made up of sales invoices being paid and an amount that we have paid out - so a purchase invoice.
Hi,We need to be able to create an invoice in Xero which has 10/15 lines on it, each with varying prices and nominal analysis codes.
When i run a report on Account A, I am looking for a way to see the bank accounts the fed into Account A and possibly filter out separate bank accounts.
Hello,I'd like to run a profit and loss report for only a few account codes and i cant find an easy way to do this Im sure its easy when yo know how, can anyone help?
However, I've just noticed when I look at the account transactions tab on the bank account, not a single one of the bills shows up with the document attached.
I need to be able to see beginning and ending balances for each account in the General Ledger by Account number.
Hi AllJust wanted to share a step by step I have created to easily allow export from stripe and import to Xero, and takes only minutes once you get the hang of it:Log in to StripeSelect Balance under the transactions headingSelect Filter – Date – Is after – then select end date of last import then select doneSelect ExportRemove following columns:•	Column A: ID •	Column B: Type•	Column C: Source•	Column G: Currency•	Column I: Available On (UTC)•	Column K: Customer Facing Amount•	Column L: Customer Facing Currency•	Column M: Transfer•	Column N: Transfer DateThis leaves you with:•	Amount•	Fee•	Net•	Created (UTC)•	DescriptionAdd a column at the end and headline it – Payee – fill each row with StripeAdd a column at the beginning and headline it – Transaction Type – enter ‘credit’ against all positive amounts in column B (Amount) and enter ‘debit’ against all negative amounts in column B (Amount)Rename Column E 'Created (UTC)' to ‘Transaction Date’ then change the formatting of the column to ‘Short Date’ this will remove the time on the end of the dateTotal the fee’s column, then add a new row to the bottom of the data, the row will look like this:Transaction Type:	DebitAmount:		        $ Total of the fee’s columnDate:			Date of last day of which the exported data refers tooDescription:		Transaction Fee’s 01/07-24/07 (first and last date of exported data)Payee:			StripeNow remove column C (fee) and column D (net)You are now left with columns – Transaction Type, Amount, Transaction Date, Description and PayeeSave file as a CSV and Import to Xero!
I would really like to start using Xero for my business, I just have a couple of hesitations.
Hi, I paid an invoice but was refunded a week later as it was paid to an incorrect external bank account.
I find the batch deposit function in Xero works well if one cheque pays off one invoice but I have clients who pay several invoices by one cheque.
I'm used to the bank deposit function in MYOB where you can use 'receive payments' to allocate one cheque to multiple invoices.
With my business my customers pay 25% of their overall invoice at time of booking and they pay the remainder 1 month prior to their event.
Hi Guys, I am new to Xero and I am trying to clean up some accounts for my company.
Hi therewe are opening up a legal entity in Argentina and would like to use XERO for everything but Payroll.
being able to create invoices/bills from the bank feed screen (and have the item check to see if it matches) would save some time.
3) We then need to raise an invoice to the agent for the reservation minus commission and  record or reconcile once payment is taken.
We have a lot of tracking categories in Xero, and lot of small everyday purchases, Is there any possibility to collect the cost on proper account, with splitting them once per month by tracking categories with total amounts to each category or I need to split every purchase by category?
Hi community,I'm new to XERO and just reconciling the statements on my accounts.
Hi completely new to xero so want to make sure that I am using it correctly, I have 3 accounts I need to reconcile, if I have a load of incoming payments do I need to have an invoice to pay them against, For example I have lots of parking paid for but no invoice to pay against do I need to raise and invoice for the parking to offset the payments against?
Or is it just a matter of disabling all tracking inventory items and just starting to use them in an external program?
The acid test there is dumping the Supplier Invoice Report into Excel, and adding up all the INVs, less CRs, less PPs and that should give the current Account Payable for that supplier - which it doesn't.
Hello, I'm hoping someone can help me with this or suggest an alternative method:I'm currently importing sales invoices into Xero via a CSV file (generated by our system) and I would like to get PDF files for each of the invoices that are generated.
To do this I am currently selecting all of the relevant invoices and "printing" them to one big PDF file, and then manipulating the PDF file manually to separate into individual invoices (which involves printing and re-scanning the relevant pages of each invoice into a new PDF file).
What I would like to do is split the large invoice PDF into individual files in a more automated way - so I was wondering if the "multiple invoices in one PDF" method produces a PDF with tags or section breaks or something that I can use to split the document?
Hi,We have been using use Xero for nearly a year, mainly for Bank reconciliation, using the rules that we have created as we process transactions.
The whole reason for bank rules, as far as I can see, is to speed up the reconciliation process, the less time that you have to go and add additional information into a bank rule the quicker the reconciliation process will be.
Hi,I am having a lot of trouble importing batches of sales invoices into Xero recently.
Hi,We run a few 'business divisions' (set up as tracking categories) with separate 'accounts' email addresses.
I don't want my Xero account email to be used, but rather (depending on the business division) accounts@businessdivision1.
A little background,I run a business using trade specific software integrated into Xero, we invoice clients and they pay by cash, cheque or EFTPOS.
in Detailed Account Transaction Report can we have our own accounting codes (not just the 4 you provide) This will enable us to get gross payment reports.
Hi,I'm running a setup with multiple currency accounts but when I import purchases/bills from Unleashed Xero only offers me my current account as a payment option.
My question is whether I should use Xero's built-in expense app or something like Receipt-Bank or Entryless?
Can I set up my invoices so that they look like they come from my accounts department?
I know this is in the frequently asked questions but I can't seem to just set it up so all my invoices, statements and remittence advice etc all come from my accounts email.
I need to be able to filter the Payable Invoice Summary on the "new reports" page as I need some detail for my month end reconciliations.
We're a ltd company, so I want to use just the director's loan account and therefore need to consolidate owners funds introduced and owner drawings into the DLA.
I've imported my HSBC cvs bank statements from July  1 2014 to Jun 30th - Our Financial Year 2/ I've reconciled the statements with the sales and purchases and naturally a report has been produced.
3/ Everything seemed to me seemed ok on the reports4/ My accountant has access to this now, to make life easier (which is what swung me toward using the software as I like the mobile functionality of which I KNOW i can pass on and teach to my colleagues within the business just to help streamline things on a daily basis and stay completely upto date.
It would be helpful not just at audit time but throughout the year for me, so I'm hoping I've just missed a better way to do this?
Then we used our GBP account to pay it in USD let's just say spent &#163;3,000 for $4300 to pay the bill.
Somehow, Bank of China just directly returned the payment to us with $4,200USD to our USD account.
Is there an icon that can be introduced on the clients Xero Business Plan file that shows them what business plan they are actually on, rather then them having to contact us everytime they need to know their price plan/what plan they are on.
If I go to make a new account, say, 430 non-deducible expenses, under "account type" there doesn't seem to be any type I can select that does not infer a claim of some kind.
We are new to Xero and it is very disappointing to walk into a problem like this immediately we try and use it.
Hi all  I've been having some issues as the HSBC Credit Card bank feed has not worked since 6th May and while this has been reported to support I decided to try and find a work around to reconcile the accounts, I now realise this was a massive mistake!
Hi allI pay for my travel and parking, amongst other things, with my business debit card.
Once this has gone through we would like to process their accounts via Xero (they are a seperate legal entity) but I understand we will be using the US version of Xero?
Also, I have been looking for a good no nonsense guide to what we need to report to the US regarding the ongoing business, i. e tax, sales, etc?
The main reason I'm considering switching from QBO to Xero (besides improving speed of transactions and better order processing) is we are also considering an EPOS system to do counter sales with cash or card payments and the EPOS provider (EPOSNow) say they have good integration with Xero and also some Ecommerce solutions which we may look to use in the near future also claim integration with Xero.
Also, if I remove and redo will the item codes remain or will everything be wiped except the bank feeds coming in, which would now need reconciling with new entries?
b) how can I part-pay a purchase invoice that was raised in GBP, but was paid out of our AUD bank account?
Currently you have to leave the bank rec screen, go into the invoice and create a part payment, then you go back to the bank rec and match it with the cash in the bank.
Hi There,I'm currently researching new accounting platforms for my company and wanted to check in with you Xero users as to the feasibility of Xero for our use case.
As a design firm, we use Xero tracking extensively and it would be great if we were able to update multiple line items in each invoice with the same tracking item / name.
Allow us to use different customer contacts e. g. Sales Contact, Accounts Contact, Purchasing Contact.
Currently I do this by using the "Customer Invoice Report" and filtering to show paid invoices by day or month.
Once an invoice is paid via an allocated prepayment, we need it to show in the paid report.
When I create a new bill and then want to pay that bill, Xero only gives me 4 of my bank accounts to "pay from".
Does anyone know if there is a report within Xero that allows you to show accounts will zero balances/no transactions.
A client is wanting to clean up their chart of accounts and we need to identify which accounts have not been used.
I don't use Xero for invoicing, I create my invoices elsewhere then import the data to Xero.
Hi, I'm new to xero and just setting up my accounts.
Or do I have to leave everything in the bank statement line until I have found the invoice (don't always get one - unless I logon to a website, go to account, find transaction and then print the invoices), added a "bill" and let Xero match them up?
The contact details on the top of the invoices details should be able to be different to the details in the payment advice slip.
If I were to use Xero's batch deposit however, where I select multiple invoices to include in the batch, then I'm unable to record and allocate the processing fee to an account for reporting later.
Hi, just started using Xero, and need to enter my opening bank balance from start of our financial year which is December.
They do not necessarily need to be in the US but need to be able to understand thinks that might be unique to the US (or not).
The only thing that might be relatively unique about my situation is I had Chase merge my old personal online profile into my new business profile when they setup my new business checking account, so after I login with my new business credentials, I also see my personal accounts.
I don't want them to be able to view anything else apart from their own expenses and don't want them to undertake any other activities in Xero such as raising invoices or adding contacts etc.
Do you need to void the invoice and create a new invoice?
HiIt would be use if the purchase invoice entry page allowed separate supplier invoices to be entered on a single page rather than each one individuallyTerry
Hi, We need to set up another template for a client whom we invoice for periods of time that vary every month.
In the address column I add "Accounts Payable" this way invoice goes to the correct department.
Hi, the new reports allow you to add schedules to those reports.
When I add notes to an invoice (usually following up on outstanding payments) I use the "TAB" key out of habit to move to the next field.
HI All,I do not know why Xero has just been stopped on providing me a Detail account Transaction whenever i try to Download the VAT Return.
Every time I try to send a new invoice to a customer and I try to amend the template email with a different name/content, I loose the box with the content in it and I can't get it back - any ideas?
It would be much better if there was a facility within the system itself to enter batches of purchases invoices, as if it was a spreadsheet, or even better and more feasible, to have a 'check' in Xero, so if you key a supplier onto the import spreadsheet that doesn't exist, rather than importing the invoices to a new supplier account, it could prompt you to open a new supplier account or amend the import.
Any chance we could get the MD/CEO email address as we've contacted Xero and still not been updated, also informed Xero about the problems with the expense app - users being able to see contact bank details and still not received any news about an update.
Hi When i add a receipt to claim, when i go to the drop box for account, i have none come up, how do i get them to show.
Hi,New to Xero and trying to add my first receipt to the app.
I am just setting up a new account and importing my bank CSV into it.
Hi All,Just wondering if anyone out there using tacking codes in Xero has a scenario where they need to use more than 100 tracking codes at any given time and what your expierence is with running reports out of Xero with a large number of tracking jobs?
I need a report that shows revenue matching the P&L in detail to show invoice/journal date and reference, client, reference, net amount, vat amount.
I've just spent the last 20 minutes Googling and clicking all over Xero trying to find out how to preview an invoice.
I have a bank account Cash In RegisterIn my account, i keep track of my cafe's sales and petty cash expenses.
Customer payment was made on 31/03 for the invoice from 29/03 and his payment reach my account on 1/04.
Hi allNewish user here and my google-fu has failed me completely - at present Xero dumps all my printed invoices into my downloads directory and I'd like to save them somewhere sensible by default.
Sometimes retrospectively accounts, sales tax or other details need to be changed after a bill has been paid and reconciled.
In addition, we use xero for credit cards which do not have bank feeds for, so we set the statement up each month as a bill.
Hi,I use details once a month to keep tabs of my small business.
It is now showing up on my Payable Invoice Detail report even though obviously it doesn't need to be paid as I deleted it!
Hi I want to add an opening balance from previous year to a supplierIt needs account code and tax codeBut if I complete this with account code the expense will be affected and its not correctWhat is the correct way of adding balances?
I am using a customised invoice (which was done for me- I am not fluent with Word) but would like to include an overdue amount on a new invoice.
We don't really want to create new accounts for these jobs as they tend to be one off small jobs, but obviously we want to create invoices, is there a way around this or would we have to create accounts for everyone?
Hi, I am just getting started with Xero and my bank feeds are not up yet - we need to apply with HSBC and then wait to set them up.
We assign our customers unique account numbers which we've spent A LOT of time entering in Xero, however I can't see how to search on a customer's account number.
Hi, I am looking for a contact to set up syntax codes for pay rates (advanced) with tracking as our business is integrating with a rostering/timesheet program.
Hi folks,I've been running the accounts my small software business for the past ten years on a big spreadsheet, a simple cash ledger for income and expenditure with category columns; through a few simple formulae it works out my VAT and CT too.
I have lots of bank accounts, sometimes I need to check which bank account an invoice has been paid into.
When i use the feature to assign something on a bill to a customer then do a invoice it just uses the cost price.
If I set their user permissions as "Invoice Only", they can only add expense receipts through the app, however, these are not expense receipts, they are business expenditure.
I would like them to simply be able to capture receipts as money is spent from the business bank card and capture the detail.
What i am trying to do is;When i create an invoice for a customer - I would like to charge customers Credit Card (or maybe Paypal account) instantly customers stored credit card on Stripe or Paypal Pro.
I am older credit notes that i would like to allocate to sales invoices.
Hi I just need to clarify that I am doing this right.
But what account do I use for the percentage that is not being claimed (since this has already been paid through a personal account and I don't need to reimburse myself for any of it? )
I'm getting a bit confused with expense claims because I don't need to reimburse myself back, I just need to add the expense percentage into the system.
I have a couple of staff members who need to be able to enter / print / email invoices and enter payments against them, but I DON'T want them to be able to be able to look back over years of historic invoice data, which basically gives them full access to our turnover.
In MYOB you used to just tick the box "Tax Inclusive" and it would adjust all the amounts to include 10% but Xero is different and doesn't update the amounts so I'm manually having to add the GST as I prefer to input my invoices as "Tax Inclusive"It would also be handy if it could bring across the tracking options too.
If I switch back to the standard invoice template then I get the business logo on the pay now page, BUT.
Hi ,I just started to use XERO , and would like to know how do we make payments with cheques and also at the same time receive payments by cheques from customers .
All of the invoices are pushed through to Xero (for obvious reasons) but because they have different invoice prefixes, it is fairly easy for me to assign them to their own pay-pal and current accounts.
I know the Netherlands use IDEAL a lot and there is also Paypal, will XERO look at using these payment systems or accepting payments by direct debits for subscriptions?
I'm new to Xero and looking for a way 2 staff can easily view all the attached pdf invoices when we make a payment by batch file, before they authorise transactions within our banking software.
Currently the process is quite time consuming requiring the publishing of a supplier invoice report showing payments made on the batch processing date, and then the staff click through each transaction and twice again to open the attached pdf invoice to double check the amounts.
I have sent an invoice Xero to Xero however they were not able to see the banking details that I have on my invoice (that would be displayed on a PDF).
I am using Xero for an non-Aus/NZ based business where the bank does not support Xero and I can't download bank transactions.
I don't want to use items at all in my file, and all my items are at the moment is just a doubling up of my account codes.
We're currently entering the order into Xero as an invoice and need the capability to select certain items from that invoice that will be shipping that month so we can create a packing slip to include with the order.
This month I paid the bill from my personal account because I couldn't get on to the business account and didn't want to be late with the payment.
I am trying to put all information into Xero via the API from our private application, and then process a batch payment from Xero.
Hi, I would like to be able to create a list of new customers for each country, USA,UK,NZ, AUS and Canada.
Metro Bank take my aged receivables and immediately pay us 80% of the total value of each invoice.
Hi,Just wondering how Xero deals with overpaying a supplier invoice.
I have gone thru all inventory accounts and allocated them to new income accounts - Sales 2, Sales 3 etc.
All invoices now being entered go to the new updated income accounts as set in Inventory.
The newspaper for which I do bookkeeping has many ad customers who pay for their invoices by credit card, and MANY subscibers who pay for their subscription with CC's.
Why can't it work just like a payment-by-check (where it would be deposited into the checking account on Xero), so it can then be reconciled when the payment from the credit card processor hits the checking account a day or two later?
I run an advertising business and need to add multiple advertising dates to a quote/invoice e. g. one date per month for 10 months.
I want to be able to create an invoice for (Lets say) an iPhone 6 and when i confirm and send the invoice, it deducts 1 iPhone, 1 cable, 1 box, 1 headphone from my inventory automatically.
I'm new here and just created and sent my first invoice, hooray!
I also use Stripe to allow folks to pay invoices online.
Hi all, I hope someone can help me with this: Our newest distributor is asking for a sales report for a specific group of inventory items per customer per month for Jan - Dec 2015.
Hello Xero,We have set up a new bank account called (PayPal Canada) to handle invoices created in $CAD and paid in $CAD.
Today we created the first sales invoice in Xero and the amount charged shows up in the PayPal Canada account properly in $CAD, perfect.
We also created a PayPal Canada Branding theme on the invoice (approved and paid to PayPal Canada account) also set to that account.
Business sold and they just want this important historical info for the new owners.
I am getting used to using Xero and one question I have not been able to answer for myself is related to the bank transaction results in searches.
In the past I've tried to keep my main bank account reconciled by moving payments that I need additional info about into the suspense account.
Hi there,We have just migrated over to Xero from Free Agent, and have noticed we have a tonne of sales invoices listed under our "awaiting payment" tab, that aren't marked as "sent".
One thing I thought of was temporarily renaming the new correct subscription and mailing off a new bank feed form.
I'm mainly using Xero to generate invoices and track basic expenses related to my business.
I'd like to be able to copy an Excel spreadsheet version of my invoice into Xero.
Hi Xero, I find it really astonishing that you deleted the old sales per item report and suggest that the inventory report is the replacement?
As there is not feature that enables clients to print out their payment allocations of invoices (aka batch payments / payment runs) have had to get creative with issuing clients a "Payment Run Report".
My clients log in and set a planned date (their payment run date) for all the invoices they are wanting to pay, they allocate the payments and then email me.
If credit notes have been applied to the invoices this report does not show that those invoices have been reduced by the credit note amount.
Hello I have just started using xero for a customer, they have been using it incorrectly for some time and none of the bank accounts have the correct opening or closing balances.
I am beginning as if Its a brand new business as I need to start from scratch and get rid of all those years of bad accounting.
Hi,For businesses which aren't GST registered, the Australian Tax Office (ATO) requires that invoices do not show the words "Tax Invoice" but rather something like "Invoice".
I'm trying, unsuccessfully, to add these two accounts, along with their corresponding savings accounts to my file.
Do I need to filter out the income transactions from the bank statements (i. e just leaving expenses) so I don't duplicate the income represented by the Square imports?
We have setup several repeating invoices for our clients but can't see how its possible to add one-time items to an instance of a repeating invoice.
I see the new Reports seemingly is going to have the ability to add multiple reports to a single report in the "CONTENTS" section Finally allowing for customization of a reporting package being able to combine a Custom Income Statement and other financial reports.
When the funds do hit the bank account the bank feed then produces another transaction that needs to be reconciled, but I can't because the invoice has already been reconciled against the eWay transaction.
I would like to request a feature in Xero that will have an option when sending the invoice to the client to show only the amount due and not the breakdown of the invoice.
I would like to use this feature to speed up our payment process.
Oh boy, this is a real Dummy question that I am going to ask and I am sure a lot of you are going to roll your eyes at this; but here goes:I would like to set up a specific Budget for our Sales rep in Xero: I have a range of products that I would like to assign to him from our product and services range that are new.
I understand partially that the bank feeds may be only tied to Bank accounts, but as far as a business is concerned shouldn't it be a Liability Account and still be able to tie bank feeds ?
If you don't use automated bank feeds the manual bank reconciliation process is easy, you can tick from a list of transactions and then reconcile a whole batch of them together by selecting "mark as reconciled".
We set up a "logical" bank account where we reconcile all our sales paid by credit card against the funds that have been received in the bank so that at any point in time we know the value of funds that are "on their way" to us.
Because Xero uses actual bank clearing dates, each time we convert a new company we have to unreconcile the entire period that we are converting and re-reconcile to the actual bank statement dates.
We are using tracking for sales reps and want to be able to run a report to the screen with the ability to filter by tracking category.
I am having trouble finding a add on that will create the sales credit notes for any refunds made via Paypal.
I was wondering if there was an add on that will be able to create both sales invoices from payments received and then credit notes for the refunds made?
Hi, I am a new user to Xero - I used to use MYOB.
I am unsure if I should be creating a new bill each month under 'bills you need to pay' OR put it in under 'Transaction - Payment.
So I went to the bank to add it to our account.
I need to reconcile balance transfers between the business current account and the business reserve account.
I want to reconcile entries in a mock bank account which doesn't physically exist and so can not have bank statements, just payments in and payments out, which should balance.
My bank recently closed my local branch which meant the BSB on all my business accounts changed and affected it synching with Xero.
Hello,I'm new to Xero and had a question regarding what was considered 'best practice' when setting the accounts for items on an invoice.
Hi All,I design business cards and when done, I invoice my client for the design and print (which I also make money from).
Hi everyone I'm hoping someone can help sort the mess I seem to have created with my Xero account :)I have used a personal transaction account and a personal credit card to make several business purchases.
To track these in Xero, I created a bill for each purchase and then used an 'Owner's Loan Account' to track the payment of these from the personal accounts.
Hi -  I am looking for a report that can tell me expenses by Contact with the Account Code / Account Name.
Hi,I'd like to post a payment on account to a suppliers account, ie post the payment ahead of receiving the invoice.
HelloWhen I invoice a customer and have added a delivery fee to the invoice (sometimes it is what I actually pay, sometimes its a nominal fee towards the cost if I deliver) I have classed these in two ways260 Other Revenue and lately 425 Postage & FreightI am still getting to grips with Xero and accounting really but it seems that when I ran a profit & loss report for the week the 245 is an operating expense.
Hi everyoneI am taking online payments via Paypal and the bank feed shows both payment in to me and my bank fees.
Hi,I issued an invoice months ago to a customer and they partially paid it, the work has now been completed and I've issued a new invoice, which includes the remainder that they owed from the previous invoice, plus extra work (The customer wanted just 1 invoice rather than the old one plus a new one for the extra work!
Do I need to go through the approval process with the new Xero account?
I thought that maybe using secondary accounts in the new P'n'L report might be the way to go but wasn't sure.
Hi all, I need to set up an employee on Xero so that he can add and approve invoices and purchase orders, but the owners dont want him to be able to see the bank account balance/ins and outs.
If setting up a new business bank account and depositing funds for the business, of  $xxx, as an opening balance, which would be the correct method to ensure Bank and Xero have the same balance, or would either be ok. a) After I setting up the bank feed just reconcile that deposit using account code 970 - (Owner Funds Introduced) with reference "Opening Balance" and description of "Capital Introduced"b) Goto Conversion Balances and add Opening Balance there using same account code.
Hi,It would be great when you are editing invoices if you could insert a new line anywhere on the invoice.
Should we keep it simple and just use Xero's automated sequenced invoice numbering by itself or is it worth also adding our own Reference?
Hi,We use a Xero Add-On called VEND for our inventory and POS.
I thought the BAS report would just look up the transactions in these accounts to populate the report.
Hi,Just setting up a few items as tracked inventory and I have a negative balance in my Inventory (630) account.
Later on we want to add this item (and the picture of the receipt in the Xero cloud) to the invoice.
I suggested they move to Xero, one reason being the number of add-ons that covered various business needs they have (Note I am the founder of  - this company currently uses Satago with their Sage50 account).
Instead of downloading reports and saving an excel file for clients that have left or are no longer trading if we could zip the file or achieve it so we can save the transactions and lock it from use and stop having to pay for it, then maybe in future be able to re-active the subscription if we need the ledger again.
Hello Xero community,New business, new user of Xero and clearly still getting to grips with it all.
I need to be able to customise my invoice templates to show addresses and names in reverse order (I am in Japan)I have found reference in obscure places to fields such as 'ContactFirstName' and 'ContactLastName', and for addresses 'ContactPostalAddressLines' (and hopefully City, etc.
Hi,I just wanted to throw this out there to see if anyone else has had this come up within their account.
I would like to sent the quotations to the main contact for approval and once the job is complete and ready to send invoice I would also like to cc the accounts department.
Here's my predicament:I use Xero to email invoices to my clients with the option to pay using Stripe or by mailing a check.
The overpayment hasn't been refunded, or used to pay an invoice, and yet if I try to edit the Customer name, the account in the transaction (accounts receivable) is lost (the account shouldn't be editable anyway.
Hi all,Under chart of accounts, I created the following current liability entry"883 - Owner John P Funds Introduced"I have injected $20K into the business i. e by transffering money from mypersonal account into the company bank account.
In xero, do I just select my business bank account and pick Receive Moneyand set the folllowinge.
HiI am trying to amend some of my expense accounts to allow transactions in these accounts to be zero-rated for GST (as opposed to just No GST, as they are specifically zero rated supplies).
Hi Guys,We have a payment hitting the bank in the next few days but when it arrives into Xero I need to be able to set part of the payment to one Nominal account and the rest to another Nominal.
I need &#163;4,000 to be posted to Nominal Account (a)I need the remaining &#163;6,000 to be posted to Nominal account (b)Is the easily do-able?
However it looks to me like Xero has no easy way to prepare an invoice and record a cash payment at the same time - am I wrong?
I'm converting from quickbooks, and quickbooks had a nice little "pay sales tax" and "adjust sales tax" options to use for remitting sales tax to my state.
So today was the day for my repeat invoices to generate, 120 plus However XERO generated over 150 Time to sit down and go though them all, If yours is set for automatically sending invoices, might be worth to stop them and check that only one per customer is sent,
We then would receive bulk invoices from our suppliers for the orders we make on behalf of our clients which means we can’t just assign a whole bill to an individual invoice.
I would like to import all of the transactions and all of the sales invoices to Xero.
I would like to use the cost of goods sold section (code 310 onwards) to add accounts 311, 312 etcI am likely to have significant extra codes included as direct costs and it would appear I only have the possible range from 310 to 399.
It's just camera equipment bought online with the business account debit card.
Enter invoice as Spend money from that Premium Funding account to allocate expense to correct accounts with or without GST.
We are finding when Creating or Entering Invoices, Xero is slow to find an existing customer, if at all sometimes, and the typist speed over picking up the existing customer is causing issuesIE for those of us who "Know" the customer exists we have to stop, wait for Xero and sometimes (lately more often) make several attempts or scrolls to help Xero find the customer, but for those who don't, we are finding this can create a lot of double ups of the same customer being entered, or they are even being entered as new when they are notWe really need to eliminate this issueIs anyone else experiencing this?
Just wondering if it's necessary to use two different tax rates for sales and purchases.
Can I not just use my Standard VAT rate on sales and purchases?
I would like to be able to match 2 (or more) bank deposits to 1 Invoice PaymentThis occurs regularly via add-on's when they apply 1 Payment to a Daily Sales invoice even though that payment may be received in the account separately e. g. When they use 2 Merchant Terminals but 1 Payment Method i. e. EFTAt the moment we are having to use clearing accounts which can get messy & take time to reconcile if something isn't quite right.
Hi,This may be a silly question and may relate to my client's email program or internet security, but all my invoices seem to be going to her Spam/Junkmail file and this keeps delaying my payment received from her as she keeps forgetting to check it.
good afternoon,am a coming convert from netsuite coming to xero - one thing i'd like to be able to do is add the quantity of items to an invoice(am a farm vet practice - items include hourly services and supplies both)but not the actual item cost, be it hourly rate or item.
); but also larger data sets, like when you get a client with a year of bank records that you need to allocate.
My query is about reconciling PayPal payments and PayPal fees against a single invoice, and I have two scenarios that I need to be able to do this for.
It would be nice to be able to reconcile both the payment and fee against a single invoice, and mark the invoice as paid even if the full total hasn't been covered by the payment due to the fee.
When i receive it i need to forward it to the accounts person or they need to ask me if i have received ut yet, once or more each month.
Hi, I have never really had this issue before but I am reconciling my account and I have deposited cash to my bank and this is split over several payments/invoices.
Can I create the Holding Company's account in Xero and later on add it's subsidiaries account and link it to the holding company to do a consolidated account?
Hi,I just need some clarification on the Repeating Invoice functionality.
Would I change the recurring entry in July to the new invoice amount and then when it comes time to create the invoice, it would create it with the new value?
Hi there, thank you in advance for your support,I was able to add the TD Canada bank, with all my feeds, I have 4 accounts added into it.
Is it possible to add like 2 cards from the same bank, and having 2 set of differents feeds for them?
"Currently I need to click each invoice, select Date Paid, select Paid To, then Add Payment.
I want to be able to run a report that takes the accounts from all 3 companies and creates one Group Company report.
Would like to be able to a a dynamic date range based on the invoice date, like you see on utility bills, for repeating invoices.
Hi,I'm sure this very simple and obvious but I'm a newbie and I’ve run into a question as I’m setting up my accounts:When reconciling bank accounts, what account should I use for credits that should not be part of my taxable income?
Can we update our bank details, including it's name (doesn't appear to be an option), while maintaining the Chart of Accounts (i. e. so that it doesn't look like the closing of one bank account and a whole new bank account)Luke
I have 3 accounts set up with transactions 1 business bank account, 1 business credit card account, and 1 personal credit card account.
So, for example, a new computer component which cost $100 paid by my personal card would just get reconciled into a new transaction in my Computer Supplies expense account the same way I would do it if the purchase occurred in my business Visa.
This way I will not use journals or need to play around with expense claims in Xero.
Hi,I'm looking for a report which gives for each customer an 'average time taken to pay', aka as 'days to pay' I think.
Am I able to email draft invoices to customers and accept payment on them via paypal?
Do I need to add the original bill, add payment?
Is it possible to "fake" out the system and create invoices using the time, then go back and void the invoice?
Hi,I would like to customise my invoices so that the amounts shown are GST inclusive rather than exclusive.
where clients over or indentfiably pay we were looking for how that can show up on their statements so you can discuss and agree what is billed and paid and what to allocate against what  as talking at cross purposes is a major area for burnng time resolving sales purchase ledger accounts ?
WE have 30 day accounts with our suppliers and in myob I liked how I was able to look at an individual supplier and compare their invoices against a statement and then flag it for as prepare for electronic payments, move onto the next supplier and do the same, and once I'd finished I could batch all the payments together.
so I need the best way to add this upfront payment to the system, and would I still need to create an invoice?
Hi,When booking a purchase invoice in Xero, it would be good to be able to copy the line above when entering many lines and splitting the costs between various trackings.
Hi guysI need to run this report mid month as there has been a change in company ownership.
One of the accounts that was imported (with several years worth of transactions) was my business Paypal account.
The previous bookkeeper and other admin staff have been posting invoices from subcontractors to direct wages account, rather than to a subcontractors account.
One way I could fix this is by manually changing each invoice so that it is posted to the correct account, but due to the large number of transactions this would be very time consuming.
Is there a way of selecting all of the invoices that need changing and telling Xero that they are all in the wrong account and ask it to change all of them to the correct account.
So I'm assuming I need to first create a Bill for these tx's and then match the BillOr do I just enter a payment for the converted AUD amount that appears on the bank statementAppreciate any advice
would we need to create a bill and add a payment on to that?
I invoice companies multiple invoices, due on the same day so they pay one lump sum.
The current alternative of using a quote invoice or draft is not acceptable to my client as the sales order functionality within MYOB is far supplier and gives my client what they need.
I would like to be able to set up an invoice template that uses the details of our other currency bank accounts.
We have business clients who do not use our base currency and we would like to tailor our invoice templates to include our other bank account details for payment on their invoice.
Our company has 2 business units, hence we have 2 different bank accounts at the same bank, which use the same online banking login credentials to access both accounts.
I would have thought that -like CODA, Xero would have alerted or blocked the invoice from entering into a previous year which had been closed off instead it just accepted it.
Xero should report, or have an option to report, sales without the sales tax added to each invoice.
I have just had a client find and match the majority of a &#163;6k payment into the bank made up of piddly amounts i. e &#163;16 here , &#163;8 there etc.
We don't like to send out unrounded financials and the other option is posting a journal to account for the rounding which takes a long time.
Now all of our clients have been using Xero for months, if not years, some of them producing and/or receiving hundreds of invoices per month, the transactions being listed oldest first is becoming very inconvenient as it can take such a long time to get to where it is most likely you need to review input i. e. most recent activity, right at the bottom.
Hi,I paid a number of invoices last night one by one however when I check my bank account the transactions aren't showing.
HIWe are finding more often than not that the Approve button is taking soooo long to approve invoices, if at all, the circle spins around and around - too longOr, you enter your invoice details then click on the approve button, and you think you have entered the invoice, only to find it hasn't been approved/entered at allThis is really noticeable today, since the update/new features, but i cannot find where you look to see what technical issues Xero is aware ofWe really need this sorted so we can get on with businessAt the moment the Approve button is a shaded grey (not the usual Green) and not even giving us the option to Approve?
Hi, Is there an option to add a telephone number and email address to invoices?
Mobile App needs to be more advance, so we can do more things without using pc every time, there should be new mobile app design in the way that we can do everything regards to receipts, quotes, invoices, expense claims.
In New Reports: Account Transactions, please add functionality so that we can memorize recurring reports.
It would be a real time saver not to have to select every single account and tracking category each time we run a report for each department.
Many business owners use USPS, UPS, Fedex or other services like DHL to ship their products/items.
If i look at the entry on the bank statement the first method shows up as Bank account:transaction:spend money, whereas the 2nd approach it appears as transaction:payment.
We receive payment of some invoices via Credit Card that we process via our in house EFTPOS bank terminal and we add 1.
I need it be able to fit the followingImportant noticeYou have been served with a payment claim under section 20 of the Construction Contracts Act 2002 (the Act).
I've tried looking around in Xero to figure out if I can re-enter the bank feed info so that then I will be the special *person* with the permissions, but I haven't been able to find any way to do that.
This function is already available when coding and reconciling your bank account, however, you do not have the ability to do this in the journal screen and you need to close out of the journal, go to the chart of accounts and add the new account in.
I have a stripe feed automatically posting to my xero accounts but currently all my sales are being recorded gross of VAT.
We are holding a Xero User Meetup for users, small business and new or existing users of Xero.
We would like to print this as a monthly period, and a 12 month period, and also compare to previous financial YearsI can currently get totals listing every single sale, but we would just like the total for the month There is  layout similar on other report options, just cant seem to get a transaction sales report one yetieSalesMarch 14             Feb 14               Jan 14           Dec 13             Nov 13 etc$                         $                         $                     $                       $and then compare to previous financial yearsMany Thanks
The problem I have is that due to the nature of the business, and since the invoices are all pre paid before the cruise date, a very high number of people never pay as they end up deciding that they do not want to go ahead and book the cruise.
So my questions area) Can we make it so that invoices do not count towards our sales unless they actually pay the invoice?
HI Community:)We have a small cafe / retail business and can't figure out an efficient way of reconciling our EOD accounts.
Once again, this should look very similar to the accounts transactions tab in the bank reconciliation report.
As we're only small and still growing in the space, i've just been keeping it simple and manually calculating invoice amounts and setting up re-occuring invoices where i can.
I have clients that pay upfront for session they can pay for 1 to 20 sessions in advance, is there a feature that allows me to record the advance payment then draw down on this as they use their sessions, would be good if i can track the date the draw down was used and get a notification when the client is getting towards the end of the advance payment?
I use the 5 days between reporting and report delivery for report preparation.
Additionally, being able to use odd dates could be helpful when trying to find things like reconciliation errors.
Hi,We would like to see tracking option added for the bank revaluation set up.
We would like to demonstrate the features to our prospective clients and, given that our software like yours, undergoes regular updates and improvements we need the ability to test the integration.
Perhaps a sales demo license would mean Xero white-listing a set of 'dummy' companies for integrators like us.
We use this function where we've reconciled a customer's payment to the wrong invoice.
As far as I'm aware, "Remove & Redo" was working fine last year but it looks like a bug has been introduced in a recent release where you can "Remove & Redo" and it'll remove the payment from the invoice, but Xero fails to mark the transaction line as "Unreconciled".
The ability to select multiple transaction line items and reconcile in one action would save a lot of time on accounts like Petty Cash.
Hi, is it possible to run a report that lists all of the unreconciled transactions across all the bank accounts?
Scenario:I run a small business form home, when I get say, my water bill, I enter this into Xero and I code invoice as 2 lines.
01 - ACCOUNT: Drawings - TAX RATE: No GSTThe issue is, as I enter line 2, even though I have selected the new account, Drawings which is set in the Chart of Accounts for No GST, it defaults to the GST rate for the line above (in this case it selected 15% GST on expenses which is wrong) and I must remember to change this manually every time.
I would like a feature that allows me to tag more than one Accounts Receivable invoice at a time to be paid within the Accounts Receivable screens.
-does show everything relating to an account-not contact specific, one would have to know what account to use first before being able to locate a contact.
Hi,so far I've gotten bank accounts linked and inbvoices reconciled yay.
But I just got a call from one of my customers trying to pay an invoice asking where my BSB and account # were.
I would like to be able to select a statement of activity within a certain time period and see a list of only those customers who actually had activity during that time period.
So instead of totals for each person paid, which is all I need for the report to do, it lists out each and every payment to each contractor.
I now therefore have 31 transactions in my Paypal bank account on Xero which need to be reconciled.
I'd like to select multiple bills, for one vendor (an ACH or WT payment) or maybe I pay a bunch of utility bills online.
Im an doing a run of entering invoices Each new invoice page is showing as GST inclusiveI am manually changing each new one as exclusiveWhy has this happened without any setting being altered?
I would like to request for a 'Mark As Reconcoled' button on the Account Transactions Page in each bank account, just like there is a 'Remove and Redo' button on the same page.
Whenever a sale is completed the eCommerce store it automatically sends an Invoice and a payment to Xero and it matches them up so the invoices are marked as paid.
But then my PayPal bank account statement gets imported into Xero, which includes all the sales amounts.
Hi,We are just starting out with Xero (changing over from MYOB) and the change gives us the opportunity to review our websites and accounting integrations as we hope to grow rapidly with lots of online sales.
Hi Xero,I'd like to ask how to permanently delete a Bank Account in Xero so that all its related transactions will be deleted as well.
When I go to "Match" the bank statement lines with my transactions in Xero, I'm not able to do so for these payroll entries.
My thought was to split them up into two different accounts; Product Sales and Services Sales.
Hi,I need to be able to produce a bank report which shows all of the activity (for all ex-Sage users think Nominal Activity Report) but includes the description field.
Hi,My business is a restaurant and I would like my bank feeds to automatically reconcile to my daily sales invoices (imported from excel).
The deposits are often different (lower or higher) than the actual sales invoices generate by my POS system, however we keep and excel that lists any variances, so we know what the deposit in the bank feed will be.
Need to create Bills and Invoice OR some other alternate like manual journals?
For example, I'd like to create an invoice containing line items like:------------------------------------Product 1 @ $10 AUDProduct 2 @ £5 GBPTotal: $19.
We currently use the receive money in accounts to raise invoices for deposits for our clients, and although it works well some-times the problems we have found are that:1.
Given a Xero invoice can't be edited after a payment is received, we resolved to use the process of 1.
When it is time to invoice for the balance, issue an invoice for the full amount using the "Sales" account and then post the Deposit across to Sales and record it as a part payment.
I would like to be able to enter our 'promocode ONCE, and this promocode is linked to my business.
This means we dont need to enter our promocode every time we enter a new client.
I can't seem to work out how to reconcile these two bank statement lines against one invoice, no matter how I add / remove credit notes.
I have access to - Sales- Invoices- All Awaiting payment.
I would like to copy the Xero contact group code from my customer record in Salesforce to my contacts in Xero, so I could easily search contacts by contact group, place the customers in the appropriate group,  and invoice customers in the same group at one time.
I like to run my eye down the account transaction to make sure that ever transaction has an invoice attachment.
I started a new company and signed up straight away for a Xero account to make sure everything is aligned at the same time without any issues.
I think if Xero is wanting to attract medium sized clients, with larger customer and product bases,  to its product, then they need to add this function, particularly as more clients are wanting to move away from products like MYOB and Quick Books, whose online accounting software is lacking and slow and cumbersome.
As I have no sales being made till now, I need to contribute fund from other bank account of mine to the business bank account I just have bank feed activated with to make essential business expense.
So for instance 'Business 1' brand has a different income to 'Business 2' brand, can I generate a report somehow just for 'Business 1' if the branding is the only thing that is separating the two businesses.
Hi all,I just started a trial version today and am trying to add new bank accounts.
I pay my credit card from the business checking account every month.
I deposit my invoice checks into my business checking account, subtract 35% of it for taxes, and pay myself with my business check.
Our two bank accounts, for Trust, and for Business, have working feeds in Xero (no problems here).
Since our bank feed is already in Xero, we've been doing this: - Reconcile Account- find the unreconciled deposit that client Joe X. made for $500 - add the client's name in "Name" (it will autocomplete the name from the bills we imported from Clio)- put the deposit for $500 in account 400 - Sales - Save transaction and move alongHowever, when drilling down on the reconciled item and viewing Joe X's transactions, the amount I reconciled does not show up as a credit.
I am developing an add-on that will allow Xero users to initiate collections from credit card or bank accounts (using third party payment providers that process Direct Debits, Credit Cards, ACH check payments, PAD payments etc) based on the invoice Due Date in Xero.
Automatic OK:Xero can automatically assign imported entries to accounts in the chart of accounts, which can save you a fortune in time.
It does this using Bank Rules or, less effectively, when it imports entries like those previously assigned to accounts.
It politely asks you to add any missing accounts, to the target chart of accounts, so it can do this.
I am still having problems with one of my clients being able to maintain regular bank feeds through the Bank of Scotland.
I have two types of invoice formats that I need to use.
Hi, I'm trying to apply a single payment to multiple sales invoices.
Luckily (or not as it would appear) all our sales are paid using Stripe (we take payments for events online), but it would appear we cannot import transactions or better still just daily totals taken from Strip UK into Xero.
Good morningI would like to suggest to add a new feature.
Hi, I'm working on a custom docx invoice layout and have also just added the GoCardless payment option to my invoice.
Hi Just as we can attach a file with an sales invoice, my client is asking if they can attach a document with their purchase order.
I have just completed entering opening balances in the conversion balance, once I click on Save, it takes me to add invoices, which I have many.
As a cloud integrator and Xero Ecosystem Trainer, I spent hours and hours last year, researching, interviewing and gathering information from Add-On's about how their system worked, what types of clients it supported and testing whether it really worked with Xero like they said it did.
I've noticed a weird issue when using any of the date picker on all screens that it appears - entering a new invoice or bill date or expected payment date etc.
We need another Xero account.
Hi,For over a day now I am not able to refresh my bank feed for Lloyds Bank.
I've been a Xero user for some time now, but am only just setting up my public profile.
I have been using xero for short time and as I was looking for a way to print check vouchers, I noticed that there is no Pay by Check option box on my Make Payment section.
I know you can reconcile but I also like to print out a transaction listing of the bank account so I can look at the clients physical bank statement v data in Xero.
I would like to allow people to create invoices, but NOT create new inventory items.
Mind you, users still need to be able to create invoices and take payment, but I just don't want people to create new items willy-nilly.
I am looking to use Xero for our boat charter company in Croatia, but not sure how to invoice sales to be able to track payments and satisfy VAT reporting requirements.
This means I need to track the booking date, the payment dates and bank rec, as well as the final invoice date once the clients charter is finished.
It just seems like it would be a nightmare, as you can't code all the sales to sales.
At the moment I have to go into the customer TEST'S invoice and "make payment" to a suspense account and then go into the supplier TEST'S purchase and "make payment", I would prefer to go into say the customer TEST and select to offset the customer TEST invoice against the supplier TEST purchaseI would also like to be able to post journal to a supplier or customer account
I am fairly new to Xero and have just tried running a Profit and Loss Report breaking the columns down to individual projects or jobs for the current financial year.
Just need to tag certain invoices.
Add the ability to add Sales person name to invoice so that we can report on sales per salesperson easily in Xero.
Hi, I've got an automatic feed set up for a PayPal account and I'm wondering how best to reconcile entries which are just conversions from one currency to UK.
You will learn:  - What new updates and features have been released- How to use the new features- What clients will likely use and need the new features- How to sell the new solution to your clientsThe software systems included each month currently are:- Xero- Unleashed- GeoOP- VendTo register for this free event for next month, register here: To see past updates, review recorded sessions here:
Hi,I need to add my Westpac US$ account as a bank account in my Xero account.
Would be great to be able to be able to create docx invoice templates and just have the item description come up and not the item name etc.
I would need to export two files:Contact Code: A unique key for the clientNameType: Whether supplier, customer or employeeAccount No: Accounts receivable / payable / wages payable Journal Type (INV, Bank, MJ.
When I go to Accounts > Sales > New Invoice and enter the information I get an error when I click Approve, which says "Account Must be Valid".
Hi All,Can anyone give any recommendations on the best way to print a supplier specific purchase ledger transaction report to use for reconciling an account ?
I am setting up recurring sales invoices for customers who pay an annual subscription to one of my services.
I set up my Sales Invoice but It took a few weeks to set up my Bank Account.
We are having huge troubles, we are send repeat monthly invoices, we have just discovered most (possibly all) our clients have not received the invoices for the last 2 months.
I just want to add the transaction description so I can see which ones I may have coded to the wrong Account.
How do I put this sort of transaction in Xero given that no money for the difference between our invoice and their bill went through our bank account?
A good example is our business insurance which we pay monthly but don't get an invoice every month.
So if you create a spend or receive money to reconcile your statement line (when you should create a bill or invoice) your transaction won't show on any invoice-based reporting, e. g. the Aged Payables report.
Hi,I have two separate VAT registered companies that use the same shared bank account.
HiIs there an update on when Xero will be able to automatically check for an existing supplier invoice (bill) with the same supplier and reference number combination like it used to until recently?
Hi,I'm looking at trialing new book keepers for our business but don't want to stop my service with my current book keepers.
Whilst we do not need to capture inventory, we still need to enter this item as 'product we intend to sell'Through the setup I imported the suggested/default Chart of Accounts and tweaked a few here and there, but there's nothing in this default list that even  it's product to sell, so that concerns me that perhaps I could be entering it in the wrong method or area of Xero?
The invoice items are set to the revenue account and there is a check for "enable payments to this account" within the revenue account.
We need to be able to do the same thing with a brand new check.
This is a common occurance in our business, since customers pay us 50% down on certain production orders before we have even cut an invoice for them.
My client offers lessons to clients during a month and we use one invoice for each client for each month - as clients can have up to 6 lessons a month we didn't want to be writing 6 invoices per client.
Hey all,I am having some trouble splitting up a bank transfer as a payment to my business credit card.
I also have a checking account bank feed that I use to pay off the credit card active in Xero.
Hi - I am new to Xero (ex Sage user) and I'd be grateful if someone could help me with my query belowOn sage, at every month end I'd post a salary journal effectively showing the cost in the P&L and the salary and NI/PAYE amounts on a balance sheet control account.
We have just migrated to xero and last night I sent my first invoice.
Ive just imported my pay pal account and got the feeds but im confused.
I have receievd a few payments via paypal and then withdrawn the money into my business bank account, so therefore i have had to account for them so i have matched them up with the invoice that the amount relates to.
Will I need to create a normal invoice with payment terms and then a credit note for the same amount?
Hi everyone,I'm very new to Zero and have just set up my accounts.
Just wondering if I need to add an account for this and what type it should be, eg: liability or Asset.
Last several months I have been trying to pass a decent journal entry, see a simple general ledger account, a simple sales report I am trying to see my payable situation.
It's worth noting that we need to have a separate login for each credit card user because Xero won't allow us to add multiple feeds to the same 'bank' (Barclaycard) with different credentials.
Basically I'm just wanting to know if this is an issue that has been noticed by anyone else, to figure out if it is an issue across all xero accounts or if it is just an isolated issue with my particular account and is something that will likely be fixable.
Very basic question - I've just linked Xero to my bank account.
I commenced using xero at same time as starting business.
I make a lot of sales and this took me many late nights to get it all imported, now i feel like iv wasted my time.
Hi I'm new to Xero and our first Bank Statement does not have an opening balance.
I would preferably like a way to print this list out so I could post it so members know how much they need to pay.
When we enter the payment for an invoice in xero, we must pay $900 towards the invoice and $100 as TDS into our income tax account.
Hi , I have only just started using Xero and need to enter the start up balances off the accountant for the 2012 year.
I want all our stuff to work easily together and I'm a little confused - I suppose the main one is, should I even be using Xero if I think my business will get to more than 17 invoices a day soon?
Hi thereWe run a flooring and property maintenance business, and as such need to send prospective customers / current customers Estimates.
Hi,I need a hand to delete a trial business account so I can use that email address to sign up to the paid account that my company has now bought.
From this file the following invoice will be imported into Xero: •0 new DRAFT invoices will be imported •1 invoice has errors and will NOT be imported: •Row 2: Paid to name cannot be empty.
What i'm curious about is whether I should directly reconcile bank expenditures as fixed assets via the chart of accounts (for instance, a new computer we bought could go in category 160 that Xero sets up automatically), or if i should record the expenditure as an office equipment purchase via a different expense category (one I've called Computer, Electronics and All Large Appliances) and then add it as a fixed asset separately?
Hi GuysSometimes we need group a number of invoice lines under a general heading that provides a context for the line details underneath.
For those of us, doing manual reconciliation, having to enable the reconcile button every time you switch to a new account is a major inconvenience and time waster.
Hi, Just wanted to know if when switching from Accrual scheme to Cash scheme in VAT, does it include invoices which would have already been accounted for vat in previous returns.
Currently I need to dig in to each bill before making batch payment via Xero.
The problem with this is we never had anything show on the bank statement and have both an invoice showing as paid and a credit note showing money refunded by nothing in the bank account to reconcile them against.
Hi all We added a bank term deposit to our accounts list to represent funds we moved into a term deposit from our business bank account.
Hi Xero,Our business has just started using the Xero android app - we love it for receipt entry and storage.
Hi,I have two business subscriptions and one personal subscription account tied to my Xero login.
I don't want to keep recording all these transactions just to find out that theres no way to take that company and tie it to a new user so it is completely separate from my other business and personal account.
It just takes a bit of time to go to the contacts or products page and add the item and then have to go to the sales invoice page to write out the invoice.
It would be good to be able to change the delivery address when writing up an invoice rather than having to change the address every time through the contacts page.
Also before my business accounts where setup and someone paid me in cash (we are just a new business) I just kept the cash basically, (so it would be Owner Drawings).
I have my Paypal account linked to my business Xero account (as well as my other bank accounts) and I am fine with processing payments FROM other people for sales, but how do I reconcile purchases?
I have started to use the cash summary report, but I´m a bit confused as it shows non-cash items such as depreciation and other costs that have been accounted for but which did not affect the bank balances which are then added back again in the non-cash movements.
It would make it easier if we can add a description for each repeat invoice just to easily identify it in the list.
Hi,I receive wire transfer into our accounts and of cause th bank charge me $10 fee every time a deposit is made, when i reconcile the customer payent, where do i put the missing amount?
To do this, I think you need a new transaction type whereby you put the initial debit to the prepayment account, and then are able to enter the various lines month by month to put the debit to the P&L by credit to the prepayment account.
I'm thinking like 1000 - I need about 900 for my business.
I am a website designer - and like hundreds of other website companies in NZ, I need annual invoicing ie) the ability to set invoices for annual repeat.
Now, as well as being able to send invoices as a PDF, Businesses now have the option to send customers a link to a live online invoice - giving them the most up-to-date information and the ability pay online, via a ‘Pay Now’ button connected to your PayPal account.
Using paypal the payment is deducted from their credit card on a monthly basis, but then they will need an invoice that shows them that it's been paid for.
Some good features released today - supplier remittance advice, tracking on budgets, export contact groups, address verification (for NZ and Australia), Chart of Accounts update (for the US), some more bank feeds and improved invoice totals for groups of multi-currency invoices.
Xero is great, these few short comings make life a misery for a many clients that really want to understand their expanding business and hope their accountants have quick and responsive data and be able to trust XERO's ability on a frequent basis.
We can import the credit card statement transactions into Xero, could we use the expense claims feature for people to individually submit their credit card receipts and then simply choose to 'pay' the expense claim from the credit card account setup in Xero, rather than a normal bank account?
I have just closed two Kiwibank accounts (and opened a new one), and want to cancel the automatic transaction feeds to Xero.
I have read a thread elsewhere that states I should create an accounts payable invoice for each item and pay this from the Business Credit Card account.
I don't know if this should be labeled as something wrong, but there seems to be a change in how we must enter data for New Invoices and I'm not sure if it's just me but it just seems like a pain compared to how we used to enter data.
This probably should go under feature request but I really wish that when it comes to entering invoices with GST-able and Non GST-ale components we could just enter how much gst was paid in the gst column and let Xero calculate the rest and then when we tab to the next line it would automatically fill in the amount that was gst free.
If I am able to set up somehow already, would love to hear how :)I would also love to hear from other retailers who use Xero as their POS - or which add on you use for Point of Sale Thank you in advance, Kassandra
My client is a sole-trader and therefore the 2 accounts i am looking to use are (a) Owner A Drawings and (b) the bank account in question.
It would be usefull if you could include an option to show invoices on the sales by item report similar to the way the accounts receivable report works.
I find it quite time consuming to edit each draft invoice to re select item codes especially if rhere are multiple invoice lines and invoices.
A client of mine has been using the new discount feature on sales invoices which is a really handy feature, the problem is that the discount does not appear in the standard .
This is ok except the system has updated the address on all the previous invoices to the new Australian address which at the time of supply the goods were supplied to a New Zealand Address.
As a small business, I have interaction between personal and business in my accounts.
I have a client who I'd like to recommend Xero to, but before I do, I need to know if it can prepare a particular list/report for me.
I need to be able to code all my accounts payable line items on my invoices with one of 4 different codes.
I would then also need to be able to create a report that I could see amounts in each code if that makes sense.
Credit Notes = Credit Memos and Bill Credits, that one I was able to sort out easily, and I see that check printing was recently added for US version, but what about reporting needs or other issues that may affect your ability to use Xero for a US business.
What issues you have come across in adopting Xero for US Business use that new users should be aware of ?
Just thinking that we could do a purchase for the opening inventory and then use this report as a basis for tracking stock on hand.
Dealing with a number of different Accounting firms in my training on Xero, I can see that they get  their clients to treat their Accounts Payable/Expenses in many different ways when using the Business Edition of Xero.
It would be extremely helpful and valuable to be able to drill down through the GST Audit Report to determine what transactions make up the balances of the GST in Accounts Receivables and GST in Accounts Payables.
For example "accounts payable" invoices can be sorted by date of invoice or due date, but not when the transactions were entered or in the order they were entered.
On my own business I can refresh the bank (Natwest) as often as I like and no problems have arisen to date.
However, on the client's Xero I cannot refresh the bank feed (Santander), where it would normally say "Refresh Bank Feed" under "Manage Accounts" it just says "Activated" and there are no other options.
Xero has a report called Account Transactions which is similar but it only shows one account at a time.
As a Quickbooks user I am used to being able to create accounts with heirarchy ie I can set up an overal account called Motor Vehicles and then have daughter accounts under that.
Unfortunately when this occurs Xero is continue saying, last time the payee field had "Internet Transfer" you put it to this account, would you like to do it again?
is there a payment option in for xero to allow me to keep access to MY data but without having to pay for a full version every monthi have half a year of transactions that m having to back date to do my quartly reports, i have asked for help on several things from the Xero twitter team and havnt gotten a replyand no i cant afford for an accountant to do it, im now unemployed, out of money and out of options but if xero dont get their $ they lock me out.
i basically would need to make new invoices but they would all be on last years datesthanks for your time.
Hi, We run a lawn mowing business and have 2 clients who direct credit $ into our bank account on a weekly basis.
We don't need to send them an invoice each month, but more just a means of keeping track of payments vs mowings.
I then unreconciled these transactions, thinking that I would then be able to reconcile using the new Bank Rule.
Hi everyone, I am new here and just looking at switching over to xero from invoice plus.
As far as I understand, when I add a Pay Run, XERO records it within accounting system like this:            .
80So to reconcile bank transaction do I need just to record the actual payment as:           .
Hi,In August last year (10 months ago) I processed a pay run but one new employee had provided incorrect bank account details so her payment was returned.
I coded that returned payment to the Wages expense account and added the amount to the next pay run with correct bank details.
At the time she didnt have a super account so we had to set one up for her, however I've forgotten to add her super details into her Payroll file in Xero, and have just realised this.
Hi, I am new to Xero and I have created and approved all time sheet for my employees however when I go into the pay run "fortnight ending 21st May" I cannot see anything!
By complex casual and permanent part time and full time employees, who are paid using different Award Schemes, different pay rates for working different hours - eg would get paid more for working an evening or weekend as during the normal 8 - 5.
Just wondering whether employees who have regisned and been paid out unused annual leave only receive a normal PAYG summary or whether I need to fill in an employment termination payment summary for them.
We need some sort of way of tracking our employees (clocking on & off) that is compatible with Xero and easy to use.
I've just noticed a new staff who has only worked on the weekend, not accruing any annual leave or sick leave in the pay run.
Hi, I have an employee who has received a pay rise which has been back dated and we have done an adjustment and produced a new payslip.
(We already have the ability to select a gl account for the  other Pay Items – i. e. Earnings, Deductions, Reimbursements, just not for Leave pay items. )
I have all my employee's setup and I use the time sheets/pay runs in XERO, they then give me a figure of what tax/super/gross I have to pay etc.
I use my bank account to transfer the pay to my staff members.
The following day I reconcile my account and the pay that I have just sent to my employee's I reconcile it under wages and salaries.
Each time I create a new payrun, I still need to skip past employees that no longer work here.
It shows the Date I am running the report not the period I am paying my employees, like the Bank Payments report.
Hi Guys,I have commenced an Unscheduled Pay Run for one employee for a commission payment.
We have used Xero clearing house consistently in the past and this is the first time the payment has failed.
We need to make this payment urgently as the super payment deadline is looming!
Hi Xero, i am a sole director of a pty ltd and contract in IT professional services and receive a day rate of pay.
I had not mastered the leave record keeping in xero with a new employee who started in September and had not entered his leave taken as I did not need to change amount paid due to accumulated leave.
Hi ,I have just added a new employee to my system and upon trying to process her very first pay, the tax and super lines are not automatically generating?
I have just started using time sheets to track employees hours across four different tracking categories which have been set up to analyse the performance of four cost centres in our business.
Hi, I have just realised my part time employee has been accruing annual leave incorrectly (nearly 20 hours per fortnight when it should only be 1.
I want to do an audit on my pay items (settings>payroll>pay items) so I would like to just export all in a spreadsheet or list to make sure all are allocated correctly.
We had 3 people working on this to try and get it done in time to pay all the employees on time.
I have added a new pay item going through Settings, General, Payroll and Pay Items but I cant put in a special calendar item that isnt a specific time period ie weekly, fortnightly etc I need a One Off.
Hello we use the NAB Bank and I am wondering how do I enter a description in Xero for it to come across into the NAB bank when I upload the payroll ABA file.
Our pay cycle changes today and I would like the payslips to feature the correct pay cycle dates when they go out today.
In his Employee Bank Account Section, when I enter in a new Bank Account his primary account says 'Balance' in the dollar amount.
Since the new withholding is effective from 1st of October, does it mean Xero will pro rata based on payment period?
Is there a third party that i can use to pull this report out of xero?
Hi as bookkeepers for many clients we use Xero for speed of use and we use add ons like Deputy to import time sheets and these need to be check individually.
Hi We currently use Xero just for payroll and therefore don't have live bank feeds at the moment.
Are we still able to use the Xero clearing house to pay the super?
For payroll can l set up the payroll system using one xero account or do l have to set up different accounts for each business and have separate payroll for them?
We created our report and have received our email from Xero telling us that the payment authorisation code has been sent by text .
Now I use XERO to pay employees - will I double up on my employee pays if I keep reconciling the same way?
Hi There Xero Payroll We have reversed a manual PAY journal and then reprocessed these amounts as unscheduled payment runs  - PE journals.
Except apparently the 22nd of February was missed, including a pay run that was generated in Xero and paid from that bank account.
Just a request, if there was print function on the Superannuation payment page showing the status of each superannuation payment.
I guess I would use an unscheduled pay run, but not sure of what steps to take and if I need to add a leave request to balance it all out.
Hello,We use the Xero Superannuation function to pay employee super contributions.
Now that you need to have a Superstream compliance system set up before the 30th June 2016 to pay superannuation, I am setting up Xero payroll for these contractors (some are transferring to employees as the business grows!
I follow these instructions, To set up a regular Super salary sacrifice you need to go to Payroll > Employees > select employee > Pay Template > Add a Superannuation Line > select the super fund and for contribution type select Pre-Tax Voluntary Contribution (RESC).
Hi, So me and my business partner have recently registered a new Pty Ltd company and have just started using Xero.
I am only new to paying employees I ran a pay run which told me what tax and super etc I need to pay.
Hi there, I'm hoping to find out what the difference is between 477 - Wages and Salaries and 804 - Wages Payable Payroll with regard to where I should be reconciling to once I pay wages from our bank account.
Hi, It would be great to have an option to set up a pay run for staff on a salary (that get paid the same amount each pay) and forget about it until you need to change it because they have got a pay rise, left etc.
Hi TeamIf I have set-up a specific leave area - Time in Lieu (TiL) - how can I run a report on this specific leave type?
When a pay run is processed it is still coding the entire expense to 'wages', therefor i am required to manually adjusted the wages figure on the profit and loss against the payments made to the liability account i have linked to the pay item - deduction.
My employer wants me to be able to pay employees direct from zero without accessing online banking.
Hi, Over the Christmas/ New Years period our office closed down, these hours, I processed as annual leave through my normal pay runs.
I have just been notified that I need to pay child support payments for one of our employees.
If I do add it as a deduction, is a Suspense Account, the correct acc to 'hold' the money in until I pay it?
When there are so many things that need fixing on xero (like supplier reports that we have been waiting on for years)  I am not sure what has been gained by changing the leave format.
New company, AU, wrestling with Xero in order to pay 2 x company directors, no other staff.
I have just started using Xero and have  noticed that when I reconcile wages that it double enters the payment for some reason and so my wages bill is effectively twice as large as it should be.
We paid her wages through the Xero Pay run and later we received those reimbursed wages to our Bank Account.
I need to process time sheets and pay runs for our Christmas shut down period on our normal 38 hour pay week but some employees will be working various days during that period and some won't (no one knows when at this stage!
The only work around I have found (yet another work around due to Xero's limitations) is to create two pay-runs as follows:1 - Normal weekly pay2 - Add a pay calendar to be able to process the advance pays.
I would like to see in the Deduction Pay items the ability to choose any account in the chart of accounts.
in Settings > Payroll Settings > Pay Items > Deductions, I created a new deduction (called Normal Deduction) with the liability account being the default Wages Payable - Payroll.
Hello, I just would like to know how could I delete a pay calendar?
HiI have just set up a new business and will be teaching myself to use xero accounting.
I have just conducted Xero training with a client and he asked if Xero imported pay rates automatically based on the classification field on the employee card.
Hi there,Recently I found I over paid to an employee, so I tried to use unscheduled pay run to reduce the salary paid to the employee.
Hi ,I pay $500 per week to my staff for basic wage, when he sold some property, I need pay him bonus.
Hi  Can some  one  help  me   that  how  can I  adjust   a  pay  run  after  eight  weeks  ,  apparently I  can not do a unscheduled pay run after eight  weeks RegardsBoby
Do we transfer the employees holidays across to the new system or pay them out and start again as the new company?
The only solution I can think of currently is to set up a "paid" category called "unpaid leave" and try to make sure I remember to manually zero out the wage rate each time I use it, which is just silly.
Hi,I am trialling Deputy and need to edit the description of pay items in payroll settings to include the Deputy Syntax.
Vend would post the invoice to Xero and then i'd like to link that invoice to the deduction.
We would like to be able to pay it from the corresponding bank account.
To be able to create a the file I have to select all the employees again not just the employee where the payment summary has been amended.
If looks like the Next Pay Run Data is just wrong.
First few pay runs had the earnings pay items set against an incorrect expense account (one grouped under operating expenses instead of cost of sales that we want).
We've updated the Settings > Payroll > Pay Items to use the correct account but that didn't affect past pay runs - how do we do this?
Whilst bringing forward the pay run to 24th July, how do I adjust the Annual/Personal Leave Type>Hours>Rate for Simone bc I have already paid her manually from my ANZ account transfers, I wanna make sure I do not want to pay her twice!
For example I should be able to set up my chart of accounts with various Wages & Salaries allocations relating to different departmental cost centres, so that they then report as separate cost lines on the P&L.
Hi there, I need to change super payments for 2 employees to RECS and I need to process an unscheduled pay run to make this adjustment.
I think it's because each week after I process our pay-run I have recorded each payment into the account Wages Payable - Payroll (804).
I have just processed my first auto-super payment and now need to reconcile it.
Hi there, we have just realised that we have been paying staff their holiday pay, but their hours accruing have not been reducing.
Do we just do an unscheduled pay run, put in all the past leave requests and schedule them for the next pay run?
If you need to use an earnings rate that has different time units to the employee's ordinary earnings rate, we recommend you change it in Payroll Settings.
as i need to include final leave acrual in my termination pay I need to complete today.
I have been able to add other Payroll Pay Items, but am unsure on how to add an RDO Pay Item in terms of it's accrual and such.
Hi, I has a wages payment returned due to wrong account details.
We currently have a function set up for Time-in-lieu accrued and taken for our employees, however i am struggling to find where and how i can add this in our Pay setup.
Hi,Just wondering if anyone know how to set up a Payment Summary for a director?
They put 40 hours on their time sheets therefore Xero want to pay them 40 hoursReally confused ThanksGab
Birthday   Report   so  that   it  can  be  generated  each  fortnight  to  check   which  staff  have  a  birthday  Report  needs to  show  the staff members  name,  date  of  birth,   classification  and  rate  of  pay.
We would like to set up a payroll leave item for them to add when they are unavailable, just like when you would apply for annual leave.
Hi,Im new to Xero payroll but I have a client that will need payroll.
Hello,We are trying to process the payroll to ensure payment prior to the Easter break and all of a sudden, when we try to post the pay run, we are given a raft of errors like this for a number of deductions and reimbursements:"The account for the deduction type 'Travel Allowance - Accom' is no longer active.
Can anyone tell me if there is a way of adding tracking to pay runs that have already been processed without having to delete the payment and re-enter the pay purchase.
Hi guys,I have posted payrun and for some reason it is not appearing in draft bills so that I can actually pay it from my main transaction account?
I have just reinstated an employee who worked here a few years ago, however, when I enter his new start date (today), a message comes up "start date cannot be after current payment summary financial year".
Hi, I have accidentally paid wages from my personal account instead of the business account.
I have set one up like this:Settings / Payroll Settings / Pay Items / Earnings / Add Earnings Rate:Earnings Name: SalaryEarnings Category: Ordinary Time EarningsRate Type: FixedHowever, when I try to go and select this earnings rate for the employee (Payroll / Employees / Select Employee / Employment Tab / Ordinary Earnings Rate dropdown box), my new category doesn't appear to let me select, thus I can't select my new category in the employees pay template.
I do need to enter their timesheets to reflect the hours they worked as we need to use the tracking information.
I need it to appear in the bank so can be reconciled when hits bank on the day.
When we post our monthly "Pay Run" say for the month of October 2014 with payment date 05/11/2014, it is posted to financial ledger accounts on payment date 05/11/2014 instead of 31/10/2014 as we are doing books on accrual basis.
We have just migrated from MYOB to Xero and did our first pay run today only to realise that Xero is adding the accrued leaves to each employee and displaying these on payslips, and where an employee has put in a leave application deducting the leave from leave balance.
Do i need to do this manually by adding in completely new superannuation funds, or can it just be updated to include the additional USI?
By the time this was complete and I went to do a new Pay Run it was August.
HiI've been telling people how great Xero is, but now it's time to use the auto super feature for the first time & I'm told there are long delays with no idea how long it will take to get online.
The Bank Payment Report which summed net wages on a departmental basis is gone!
Now it's just one total at the end meaning I now have to export a Payroll Employee Summary Report from the Reports section into Excel where I add a column and write next to each person's name which Department they work in (good thing I know them off by heart now).
Hi all,New to Xero and seem to be having issues with importing pay run ABA files into our Westpac account.
He provides an invoice fortnightly so perhaps I should be making a payment by generating a normal bill after receiving his invoice, instead of running a pay run like for a normal employee.
Like I said I would like to be paid at the middle and end of the month, so the easiest way to set that up, even if our pay had to be prorated to start with.
I have added the pay item in settings, added this to the pay template, but still it does not show up when I create a new time sheet.
Pay runs and pay calendars are a nightmare, and they are not necessary, you should not have them, and should be able to do a pay run any time you want.
I have always been able to journal the payroll as I was able to create a journal to the bank accountI now have to record my first payrun in Xero and  cannot work it out.
In reconciling the Payroll activity report to the General ledger report I discovered an issue relating to an unscheduled pay run.
I love Xero and use it for my own company, I thought if I could do this and speed up the current speed of payroll - it wont be long before they see the light and give me more freedom to utilise Xero a lot more in the business.
I am fairly new to Xero but I have done a couple of pay runs over the last couple of weeks and Xero has always calculated the correct amount until now.
If I need to do this manually, do I set the payment against code 825 (PAYG withholding), and why isn't Xero doing this automatically for me?
Hi, we have entered a new employee with a start date of 10th July and assigned him to a the next pay run on 11th July however he doesn't show up on the pay run that he has been assigned to.
I've just made a super payment by using the normal invoice process.
While we're working on a fix for this report right now, I thought I'd share a reasonably straight forward work around which is;Run a Transaction Listing Summary report and group by Pay Item Type.
Hi All,I am new to Xero and attempting to reconcile transactions from our main business bank account.
I need to be able to enter these details in a 'one off' type pay run and Xero only lets me set up a pay run as a 'weekly', 'monthly' etc type of calendar.
Ideally I'd like to be able to set up an allowance that doesn't automatically get added to the amount paid to the employee and goes to a different accounts payable account.
We'd love to know if you're using Xero Payroll in your business and any tips you'd like to share with others as you become an expert!
However, when I run the same report in cash basis (last quarter), the same account is showing the same amount of credit but zero debits (again, all taxes are paid the same day the pay run is done).
Being new to Xero, when I started using the product last year, I incorrectly set up a health insurance pay item.
However, it doesn't seem like Xero is going back to the previous pay runs (which are closed and locked) and updating with the proper corrections.
Hi,We have a C-corp with 2 co-founders, we need to pay an unscheduled salary to one of the co-founders, we will run the payroll with different amounts and in different months, depending on how the company goes.
I am a new user and errantly set up my payroll direct deposit account to my business checking account.
We use Bank Account B to pay the payroll taxes.
I don't see an option in Xero to list these transactions in Bank Account B, it automatically defaults to Bank Account A when I pay the taxes under "Taxes and Filings".
It's been a headache every time I've set up a new client's direct deposit payroll account via Xero and Forte.
In quickbooks I'd just add a new tax and enter the percentage.
It also appears that Xero creates a debit in the payroll taxes expense account and various credits in the Accounts Payable account.
I have an S-Corp and pay myself on payroll, so I want to add my employer contributions as a new benefit type, but I don't see a SEP benefit category.
I'm converting my payroll from Wave to Xero, and a problem I've run into is that Wave let me set pay period dates manually (more or less just "whenever I approved a pay run") and Xero seems to be much more rigid about pay dates.
Specifically, I have my opening balance date set to 10/1/2015, and Xero insists that my first possible pay period is "semimonthly ending Oct 25", but I have a pay run from Wave covering 10/1 - 10/15, paid out on 10/31, and then another one for pay period 10/16-10/31 with a payment on 11/8.
It's time to make my first pay run in Xero!
Are we supposed to add Holiday Pay as a Pay Item that the employee uses on their timesheet?
I currently have software that handles my scheduling and time sheets, so I would like to be able to just enter the amount of hours the employee worked and generate a paycheck.
When I go to reconcile by bank account, my balances don't add up since my expense claim shows as unreconciled at $100, and then locked payroll transaction of $3100 linked to my initial pay run.
We’re working to bring full state electronic filing and payment support to the above states as quickly as possible and then we'll begin rolling new states including electronic filing and payment support.
I'm sure we will be able to manage our US Payroll just as easily in xero but our lack of confidence with US Payroll has stopped us from doing so.
We're launching Payroll a few States at a time - first up: California, New York, New Jersey, Florida, Virginia & Utah.
Hi We recently moved from Quick books to XeroOn Quick books each quarter we ran a report that generated how much PAYE we (as a company) needed to pay the inland revenue.
I would like to post our monthly payroll in 2 lots due to the fact that I don't have all of the details I need to process everyone's pay just yet.
I've set uip Xero for my business only recently and am about to carry out my first pay run.
Hi all,We've been setting up Xero's Payroll to use NEST as it's pension scheme, and we've set up what we believe are all the necessary pension details between Xero's employees, and the matching employees within the NEST scheme.
An employee has been set up with 2 lots of his weekly hours so triggering a payrun looks like this Regular hours 45 @ &#163;xxxRegular hours 45 @ &#163;same Now, I correct this within the draft run each week and try and add new employment details - hoping it will replace the information - but it appears to always revert to the original employment information.
Now I need to just add manual amounts to their salary.
So, for example, one person with a salary payment of &#163;2,000 setup i need to now add &#163;475 commission this month.
I would like to link my Xero Payroll with my Lloyds Business Account.
Hi all, I've been using Xero for a little while but would like to centralise my payroll with Xero as well.
Hi I am new to payroll in xero and I have just completed my firs pay run, pay day Thursday 13th April for hours worked 1st - 31st March.
Hi, I have set up a monthly salary pay type and need to change the number of hours and the rate being used.
I ideally want it to say - you need to pay &#163;x for Quarter y on date Z; but if it can just tell me x and y that'd do!
I work out my employees' entitlement in hours and they book their time off in hours, which means I currently have to manually put in their holiday pay as an "other payment" that I've had to create manually and call "holiday pay".
But I was hoping to be able to set a "reset" date alongside the tax year so that everyone would need to use their holiday by April 5th and then we'd start again on April 6th.
Hi fellow Xero users,I'm choosing a pension provider for auto enrolment - they all seem pretty standard but I'd like to chose one that is simple to set up and run in Xero - any advice of who to or not to go with from your experiences setting it up?
We would really like to allow all our subcontractors who are paid hourly to use MyPayroll, so they can fill in timesheets, track time off, etc.
Previous payroll information has been posted to Xero via The pay run under accounts.
For me to use Xero payroll I would need to be able to import/update employees and then import their hours and pay rates for every payroll run using CSV files - what's the chances of that happening?
Until today i was using both i mean, i run the payroll in 15 of each month so what i run this on xero i also do in in same date on Basic PAYE Tools , toady i made the payment of salary using just xero, do i need to submit this using Basic PAYE Tools?
Hello,I have been requested by our pension provider to pass some reports onto them, unfortunately, I don't seem to be able to find them on Xero:Member file ( sometimes referred to as Assessment Report) and Payment File (sometimes referred to as Contributions report).
We have an accountant that pays our payroll independently and not through Xero so i'm just trying to reconcile it correctly from the bank statements.
I will then set her up on Xero and need to arrange for her redundancy payment.
Even still, the amount Xero deducts in hours doesn't add up to a day's pay when compared with http://www.
Hi,I pay my accountant to record payroll runs for me; and I then record these into my accounts as bank account transactions.
I would like to find out how the payroll year end and Start of new year process will be I contacted support and they have said the p60 report in not available as yet.
we had applied for a dispensation on some expenses and benefits we provide to our employees, so we don&#180;t do P11Ds, as we don&#180;t need to report them to HM Revenue and Customs (HMRC) or pay tax or National Insurance on them.
Hi, Is there a way to set up a payment reminder so that I am reminded when I need to pay HMRC for PAYE/NI or do I need to set the payment up as a bill and then reconcile against the bill once the payment is made?
Hi, we have just discovered that since using Xero HMRC has not noted the payments we have made to them against our account.
Just trying to use payroll for first time.
She has no P45 so i need to use tax code 1060L  but there is no place to add starter declaration code B. ?
Pay rises etc are fairly common and i'd like to see the changes noted on Xero.
I'd like to be able to post each of my employees to different accounts in my P&L but at present I believe everyone defaults to the same nominated account.
Hi Xero - would it be possible to close or archive old payroll calenders so for e. g. in this case weekly staff will now be paid monthly so we need to just take off the weekly payroll from the payrun options to save it being selected in error?
Hi, it doesn't look like xero is calculating pay properly to incorporate the deduction for childcare vouchers - for example if someone's gross salary is &#163;4,000 and they have &#163;100 of childcare vouchers and then &#163;1,000 of PAYE and NIC, Xero is telling me that &#163;3,000 should be paid to the employee rather than &#163;2,900 - have i got my calcs right and has anyone else experienced this?
I can't now understand if I have to pay the employees from my business bank account or what I have done has generated a payment to them.
Hello,I have just completed the first new payrun and the scheduled payment date was 27th April 2015.
Hi, I ran our April payroll last week but have just been informed that a redundancy payment was omitted.
I want to input the figures into Xero accounts and the easiest way would be to run the payroll in Xero for April as I've already input all the employee details etc.
HiI don't want to use the new full payroll system, but just want to be able to add the pay, NI etc myself to create payslips.
Id like to be able to see how much leave they have took and how much is remaining based on their requests (not just the dates that have been).
Am i correct in that the only way of doing this is to add a new pay type and work this back to a daily SSP rate?
So why now do we have to go back to control accounts - the problem with a control account is you have balances at key balance sheet dates such as month ends and year ends and these need to be 'reconcilable'.
The plan now is to move to Xero in time for next Monday's pay (i. e. week 2).
Hi Xero TeamOne of my staffs can not read her balance of Holiday Pay from her payslip as it is not displayed there.
I now have a new business in NZ and with Easter approaching, I want to make sure I enter the Holiday Pay correctly for my employee.
Hi there,My colleague and I have trawled thru the threads here at Xero and was wondering if someone would be able to help me in understanding how to calculate an employees final pay.
Hi,We have just started employing people in out business and this is the first time we need to pay stat holiday pay.
Hi guys, might seem like an easy question but recently as a sole trader I have just started paying wages to one staff member.
I have to process monthly journals to account for the provision of holiday pay - now that some employees have been on the system for more than 12 months the Annual Leave owing is showing as hours - I need to know how to get this as a dollar figure using the employees average daily pay.
Hi Xero,Our staff have reached their anniversary date but their "Holiday Pay" has not become "Annual Leave".
Hi, I need to deduct a weekly amount from an employee for child support payments for IRD can this happen automatically or do I need to make this adjustment manually weekly to their pay?
The wages payable code allocated for payroll is not included in the drop down box when entering the payroll settingsNor is there an option to "add"  or enter the code manuallyNot being able to fill this in means cannot use NZ Payroll
We use a few sub-contractors, and for June I will need to "end employment" for a sub-contractor who we paid WHT on behalf of;  so that the end date is picked up in the Xero/IRD EMS.
Secondly, we had been unable to successfully import the payment file into the ASB online banking and received these errors relating to the bank accounts not being formatted correctly.
Xero support suggested we manually add dashes to the account numbers in the CSV payment file, this overcame the issue and the payment file was imported successfully.
So another test we did was to remove the preceding zero’s from the bank accounts in the CSV payment file, this also resulted in a successful import to the ASB online banking.
Hi there,When I go into an Employee's payroll set-up and add New Salary & Wages, it doesn't appear to update their Pay Template under the Salary & Wages - Earnings Type?
I have just tried to add a new employee in preparation for 1 April, and the Date of Birth field is mandatory.
Hi I have an issue for which I have put forward to Xero - Xero says they calculated correct, but I think this calculation could be costing business thousands of dollars.
Xero:  As a customer I want to be able to record Holiday pay to and from the anniversary date.
Help is appreciated, fustrated now as I have xero for my small business and I work part time as a payroll administrator grrrrrrrh
Hi, I was just wondering how we are expected to handle 8% holiday pay for employees in Xero Payroll?
IE the pay slip has multiple line entry's of ordinary time - 1 for actual ordinary time and 1 for each public holiday.
Hi,This is my first payroll pay run with Xero.
How do you account for a business which has workers on hourly wages but also GST registered subcontractors who also pay Withholding tax?
You don’t need to set up a separate BPAY Biller code – just BPAY with DEFT and a Macquarie bank account.
You’ll love the real-time sync of customers and sales to Xero.
Automatically syncs your business and multi channel data (sales, purchases and adjustments) to Xero.
Add your Xero account for free and receive no-obligation quotes for advancing the money in your unpaid invoices.
Retrieve international invoices from Xero, pay with UKForex and send back to Xero – all in real-time with no fees and a competitive exchange rate.
Retrieve international invoices from Xero, pay with NZForex and send back to Xero – all in real-time with no fees and a competitive exchange rate.
Build and grow a successful online business with BigCommerce, plus automatically sync sales and customer data with Xero.
Upload your daily sales to Xero with just one click.
Create a beautiful Shopify store and seamlessly connect your entire business to Xero for a single, real-time view of sales and business finances.
ExpenseCheck connects to Xero to provide intelligent notifications about when its the right time to move to a new supplier.
Track your time for Xero contacts on your phone, then send to Xero as draft invoices.
Pay RIGHT AWAY is a new mobile payment solution that offers you the best way to improve your businesses' cash flow as well as save time and money!
Connect your Stripe or Paypal payment gateway with your Xero account to automatically create charges, fees, and to feed your online bills into your Xero account.
Automatically creates new bank transactions in Xero when new charges and refunds occur in Stripe.
Bring Xero inside Gmail to better track your suppliers & customers directly from within Gmail, see payment status & contact details, open invoices.
Spend less time tracking down your customers & more time finding new ones.
Intelligent real time job management and billing tool to keep track of jobs, quotes, monitor profit margins as well as add labour time and materials.
A powerful, transformative solution which is totally tailor-able to match your business processes with added power of end-to-end integration with Xero.
Make better business decisions by creating smart budgets and sales goals and then tracking your progress towards those goals with one easy-to-use dashboard.
Fundbox helps your business overcome short-term cash flow gaps by turning your unpaid invoices into money in the bank.
With Legrand CRM you can import your Xero contacts & business name, create Xero customers and quickly view sales summaries and transactions associated with your customers.
Brings together people and workplaces in real time with unified scheduling, tasking, attendance, business procedures & Xero payroll integration.
Get your Xero online invoices paid instantly by adding real-time credit card payment and reconciliation.
Import sales from Loaded Commerce into Xero: automatically import orders and customer information into Xero in real-time, check out .
Enter sales and payment transactions in SugarCRM, associate with accounts, projects and even cases and have seamless data integration with Xero.
Hi thereI use Xero now for a year or so and want to add Workflowmax into our processes.
This causes me to spend a lot of time logging into bank accounts, downloading statements and zooming in on individual check images so that I can code the transactions properly.
com/gb/blog/transferwise-launches-borderless-accountsIt would be awesome to be able to integrate these accounts in Xero, as they can help so much reduce banks fees and help businesses that sell a lot abroad like mine.
We are a construction company so a lot of our staff have multiple qualifications and we need to keep track of when these qualifications are due for renewal, WE would also like to upload copies of the work tickets, keep contracts and pay rate variances, performance reviews and letters, what vehicles and phones are issued to the employee, what uniform and PPE are issued and when they were issued.
However I have been running with Xero for a few years now and would like to be able to integrate in one program being Xero.
i have installed a Xero plugin into my Woocommerce, so when a customer books a service online a new invoice is automatically generated by Xero.
i have installed a Xero plugin into my Woocommerce, so when a customer books a service online a new invoice is automatically generated by Xero.
We have a jewelry manufacturing business and need to be able to scan barcodes for materials to make jewelry then for finished products to be sold.
We are looking at using A2X to allow us to match amazon payments into to our bank account with amazon invoices that include all amazon transaction like fees, shippings as well as product sales.
Hi allWe have a client with a T-shirt business selling off-the-shelf and bespoke designs and with a need for an EPOS system that can cope with almost limitless permutations:Shirt type / manufacturer / size / colour Design: Print / embroidered etcDoes anyone have recommendations?
We are looking to prepare a cash flow budget and at the moment it looks as though we need to use an add-on for this, can anyone recommend one that does not cost a fortune>
I would like to be able to use 1 Accounting system that has the ability to invoice customers as well.
and I am really comfortable using Xero so my first option would be to find an add on app that will communicate between the water meter software and Xero.
Do I have to have full access to the business XERO account to be able to export ?
We're running a small business in Switzerland and are invoicing our customers with repeating invoices on Xero.
I need an Inventory Add On for Xero which allows me to be able to produce Sales Invoices for tracked items which are currently not on hand.
Hi,I have a small accounting practice, i use xero for bookeeping and taxcalc for returns and accounts etc.
The end result must be easily searchable and I need to be able to report on those purchases that do NOT have it.
They have engineers who fulfil the customer calls daily, so the process would be,Customer calls, paperwork raisedEngineer receives jobs, does the work and reports backOffice raise invoices and close the job or raise further paperwork if requiredAnd so the cycle continuesAt the moment with running Xero and Access there is duplication of invoices, I'd like to streamline the processing and produce Quotes, Sales Invoices and Purchase Orders straight from Xero with each document available in the database/CRM, the program to use must be able to store,Customer nameCompany nameInvoice addressInstallation addressEmail, or multiple email addressesTelephone numbersCalls (open and closed)Kit list(s)If this can all be done linking Access and Xero it would be okay but I'd prefer to integrate a new system that can do what I want, note I have spent an hour or so with Capsule, it may do what I need but guidance may be required.
Hi, I was wondering if there exists an app that we can use to create a delivery run sheet from the invoices entered?
Hi all,I'm in Darwin NT and we are just setting up Unleashed to work alongside Xero, both packages are new to me so we need support on both sides.
Hi can anyone recommend a Xero add-on that they use to log constructions costs that we pass on to one of our clients.
Hi,We're looking for folks interested in testing our new report distribution & collaboration app.
need pay commission from sales.
Rezdy will connect to Xero, and it will produce invoices in Xero for all sales.
However I'm a pilot, not an accountant and I need some heavy help making sure that I have all of the integration settings correct between Rezdy and Square, along with making sure I have Xero setup correctly to account for how and when we receive payments on the invoices.
We need to send out invoices in Japanese and would love to be able to do this without a separate task to duplicate the invoice details.
I'm looking for a way to pay our bills using Xero, i. e. make payment without having to log into our online bank account.
I want to linkup everything inc bank accounts, car deposits, money coming in from the finance company per car, warranties, car tax etcI haven't even started figuring out how to use Xero, unless I can get a motor trade app that works for us,  so any help would be appreciated!
ioWe plan to evolve payaway into a fully-fledged SME AI payment system which splits payment processing so that a seller can register with multiple gateways and the system will use whichever is cheapest for each type of payment being used by your customer.
For example if a user had a Stripe, WorldPay and SagePay account and Stripe is best for Amex, WorldPay for Visa Debit and SagePay for MasterCard / Visa Credit, a payaway user would then be able to use them all to always process payments with the lowest cost provider .
looking for an App/Add-on that all employees use to record - job tracking (start, finish)- material and supply costs with upload of store purchases receipts- intergration with Australian Government Building and Asset Services Work Order/Job number platform would be a god send,  currently requires duplication in invoice recording.
Hi All,We have a client who is looking for a Xero Add On to Manage Client Reminders & Service Bookings for their watercooler sales & maintenance business.
Need to find a Cargo and Ferry Passenger Business add on- is there a proper add on for mobile POS working with XERO ?
Is there a sales order processing add-on that could be entered by salespeople in the field using a smartphone or ipad and then automatically entered as an invoice in Xero?
We also need to collect data each time we visit a client to report progress to medical insurance companies.
My client has tried different browsers, but each time she tries to connect, iZettle says she doesn't have a Xero account,  which she does.
In particular I would like to automate the following process:- we provide a quote- quote accepted by advertiser- artwork is requested from the advertiser by a deadline- a list of all advertisers is passed to production- an invoice is raised and reminders sent out to each advertiserTwo things to note are: 1. quotes may include online and print adveritising and 2. quote may cover multiple issues of the print magazine and will need to be invoiced individually.
I am looking for some advice or assistance in regards to add ons or other online programs or options that are able to connect with Xero when our clients require more complicated asset registers than what is available within Xero.
We currently invoice a client every week around 100 invoices and then at the end of the month the client will pay the 400 or so invoices with one batch payment and provide remittance.
I need an integration or Api developed where it would cross reference the remittance and automatically allocate payment towards the invoices paid.
Hi all,I'm new to both receipt bank and xero, I've 'linked' the accounts is there anything else I need to do or just wait for the softwares to speak to each other?
This is the first time for me to use receipt bank.
Hi all,A little while ago our business came across this great add-on program for reporting on customer sales and performance.
Hi,  I would like some guidance of which add-ons might be able to help.
HiThe volume of sales invoice lines a client of mine creates is making Xero unusable and Xero have advised us that they need to seek an alternative system - but they really like Xero.
Most of our aircraft contracts are on call for the day and have to be able to do the cleaning in the small maintenance downtime gaps, we also have a couple other contracts with flying schools etc where we have a lot of recurring jobs every 2-6 weeks that we can grab a job from when we need a gap filler which is what we are mainly looking for an add on.
I can see the payments (minus charges) coming into my bank statements and I have separate Xero accounts for card payment transactions and charges.
Hi,I'm looking for a service similar to Receipt Bank, but for Sales.
I'm looking to reduce the time it takes to setup a new invoice, copy and paste over PO number and line details, etc.
I am looking for an add on to xero that can control a workshop /fleet for;-- inventory of parts- vehicle maintenance records- record time of labour- record kilomteres and hours per vehicle/machine- report on costs per km or hourregardsChris OddieCFO Spectran Group
Hi, since enabling the store credit function within Vend, my daily sales invoice posting to Xero won't reconcile automatically like it used to.
So far, I have use the bank reconciliation feature, and tagged all the cash I put in the bank, as 'bar sales'.
I manually go in and change the invoice to reflect the correct expense account in Xero as I understand this is a Harvest feature they need to implement.
You will be commissioned to help DataDear customers who need to integrate the DataDear App into their reporting packs or who will need to create custom Excel-based models to meet key business requirements.
Hi all,I would like to store my customers' credit card details to process payment on their behalf.
I like to generate my invoices through Xero as they automatically have my payment info on them (GoCardless & PayPal) whereas theWorkflow Max ones do not have this information by defaultIs there a way so that when I am ready to invoice a job that the invoice is sent from Xero and not Workflow Max so customers don't get 2 invoices generated or is it a case of issuing but not sending in WFM and then actually sending from Xero?
Then I need to be able to add in all the product codes used on the job - from Xero inventory & finally a field to add details about what the job entails.
We want our reps to be able to use it to purely raise invoices for customers and only be able to access the selling prices, the customer contacts only and only be able to see invoices they have raised.
We dont want them to see buying prices, supplier details or info or any invoices raised by other reps. We tried using Invoice only Sales Only and Invoice only Drafts only but this revealed too much information.
My business is a fashion retail business and I have sales through the website and face to face etc.
So I want to essentially have an add-on that I can import an Excel file to that will take that and automatically create an invoice that shows more detail than Xero's and that also uploads that to Xero to keep track of.
We are a steel fabrication business and just started using Xero and now are looking for an add-on were we can do job costing - Purchases to jobs- Chargeable hours including overtime rate- Invoicing- Job planningWe are looking for something were we only have to enter the information once and it flow in-between Xero and the add-onHoping some one may be able to helpJames HaddinBosmac PTY LTD
The cash payments I would like to post to the petty cash account before I transfer to the business current account.
Tradify also overwrites the contacts address details in Xero each time an invoice is sent and each time adds the 3rd address line from Tradify to the 2nd address line in Xero - very frustrating as these need to be manually edited each time too.
We are a small Not For Profit membership association seeking a new way of managing membership that is integrated with Xero such that member invoices are *automatically* created in Xero when members complete their renewal or joining forms online.
However, I use the add-on Fergus, which I invoice from.
With just a few clicks it syncs supplier info from your Xero account, so no need for tedious data entry.
ThanksUpdate: I discovered that I can just make a report not using my policy that uses Xero and close it out.
Hourly rate to be over-ridden for some tasks (eg: increased for specialised tasks)- Users to be able to easily add time to jobs (I quite like how Practice Manager works) - although we would also need to view our timesheets in a weekly "grid" view.
Problem we have is that when reconciling bank records with these "payments" we often need to use partial payments because the CC company closure doesn't always align daily with the cash registed closure (because of time and date of closure, multiple outlets etc)a.
Very Important: We have customers in all US states and Canada where we charge sales tax based on applicability, exemptions etc so we use Avalara/Avatax for sales tax calculation.
If I delete all those little invoices, I would use A2X to also post the aggregate biweekly sales from Amazon.
1) Create a Sales Returns account in the chart of accounts and assign the chargebacks  (with a negative balance) to that account?
Hi,We like Xero & Workflow Max but are struggling with project management and i dont think WFM is going to be able to deliver.
Hi Anyone knows or recommend an invoicing add on which can support the below:1: Large amount of info in invoice, e. g. 400 or 500 lines of info with item number, item price and description.
Hi All,I have a client who's about to convert over to Xero from SAGE, however they currently use SAGE Pay for their website orders and have asked what equivalent Xero has for this.
I've gone through the Add-ons and Stripe only appears to be an add-on for invoices issued from Xero, whereas they're currently using SAGE pay for online orders, which are therefore paid on the spot and would be before the invoice is raised on Xero.
What we need to be able to do is- easily adding receipts to our account (through an app or similar) - Individual merchant name - Amount (and ability to change currency) - Multiple Tag and project levels - ability to mark expenses billable/reimbursable or both - ability to create multiple monthly expense reports - reimbursement from our AUD account to employees AUD account on a regular basisand we basically need to do all possible combinations of the above things.
Hi Everyone,Does anyone know an add on suitable for a self storage business.
Most add-ons I see focus on accepting electronic payments, and I'm having a hard time turning up features related to making electronic payment.
Hi I am looking for away via an add on or other avenue (not export to excel) to report consolidated tracking codes.
One of the recipient accounts is a suspense account from which I would like to raise RCTI's to pay the contractors their share of the revenue.
Hi Xero Users and Add On Providers,BACKGROUNDWe are an Australian company with two main businesses operating across the breadth of Australia and New Zealand – a training and development business and a retail merchandising business.
We recently switched from MYOB to Xero and are seeking add-ons to Xero to perform our order processing, client recording and invoice production.
We we want to be able to transfer our daily sales from Ebay to Xero uploading customer name, address and purchase details into Xero and marking as paid in Xero.
We average approximately 1500 sales a month and have been using OneSaas  for the past 18 months, which as our business has grown we have found issues to the point that we now have not been able to use our integration add on for the past 3+ weeks due to a daily API limitation that OneSaas need to correct.
Possible some sales process management add on?
Thus you create invoices in Quickbooks or Xero, run the payment via Square and 'pay' the invoice in QB/Xero.
Maybe set the Invoice to 'Approve' and make the payment to the checking account and mark the 'sales' against the Square Account' The problem is the Merchant Fees don't actually come out of anywhere account wise as it's done IN the invoice so the only real transaction you have is the merchant debit and checking deposit.
The bank rules in the checking account will handle the daily deposits and refunds, just like QB (good).
I am looking for a new time tracking tool with 3 specific features when we switch to Xero on Jan 1We use T-Sheets right now to track are time which provides us with all three features.
Time tracking needs to be able to sync with accounting system (Currently Quickbooks but soon to be Xero) to pull in customers/contact.
The only problem is that we have a lot of cash sales and we also pay purchase invoices using cash.
iZettle only lets you post cash sales to a Current Asset Account, and not a bank account.
Hi there,I'd like to run a report to see how many bills are entered directly/manually into Xero and how many come from addons such as invitbox and Fergus
For example:- Look at all sales invoices in Xero- Determine relevant invoices based on a set of criteria (ie date, customer, etc etc)- Generate a purchase invoice from supplier X for say 60% of each of the invoices identified in the step above, with a specified expense line, tracking category etc.
However, if I were to reconcile the deposit amount to a revenue account within Xero, then Xero calculates GST on the entire amount which includes the overseas sales (GST free).
The only solution I can think of is to run a monthly report in Shopify to work out the orders from overseas customers, and then do a manual journal entry in Xero to make an adjustment to the sales & GST accounts at the end of the month.
This is because eway's cut off time is 6pm each evening, so the funds deposited into our merchant account also include sales from after 6pm from the previous day.
However the business has suddenly escalated and we ideally need some kind of integretation of the sales invoices between these three sites and Xero.
Hi,We are conducting a webinar about how to use Xero with Zoho-CRM to increase sales-efficiency.
We are a new user to Xero and wish to manage our contacts from initial contact through estimating to final invoice, being able to assign staff time and purchase invoices to jobs in order to better understand, manage and cut down on paperwork our processes.
Bill & Pay is an invoicing and payment solution that works with Xero.
Use the invitation code  when creating your user account to receive one month of free service including free credit card transactions using your existing merchant account.
Designed for the small to medium business and designed to be simple, cheap and time efficient to use.
I've been using the link between Xero & Transferwise to pay some Euro invoices, I'm UK based, but I'm having issues reconciling my bank account, I think I've done everything correctly but I don't know how to reconcile the differences and I'm guessing I'm not the only person using Xero/TW so wondered if anyone else could help me, I've also asked support who are working on it.
33 which I assume is the difference between the XE rate on the day it was paid and the rate I got from TW but I don't how you can manually enter the exchange rate from TW until you go to pay by which time the invoice is paid and you can't manually enter an exchange rate.
when we Export Kounta Takings to Xero, we end up with an invoice with a zero balance because they're putting entries into clearing accounts that seem to offset the Revenue.
However, we want to -be able to use the barcodes already printed on the boxes the goods being delivered to us-Keep track of inventory levels and notify the moderator via email when a certain items inventory level is running low-Allow of easy inventory counts using the barcode reader-Creates a usage frequency for each item so that we know how much of each item is used monthly-The program should be simple and easy to use for multiple users on the shop floor.
HiI am looking for an add-on that will automatically create a purchase order when a sales order in inputWe do not hold stock and therefore only place purchase orders when a sales order is receivedI want to avoid double entryKind RegardsAdam
We are an existing Xero user and wish to implement a Sales Add-on, where customers are Billed & tracked in the Add-on with accounting information sent to Xero.
I like the principle of being able to use standard MS tools such as Excel to manipulate data and extend the use of Xero.
Hi,We are currently using WorkFlowMax to log time and create client invoices.
We have built the tasks by business unit, and have assigned the appropriate accounts and business units to the various tasks in WFM and everything flows perfectly into Xero when creating invoices.
HelloI have a client who is in Pest Control and they are looking for an Add-On that is easy to use to maintain their customer contact details and allow them to report by date on when they last contacted them and then complete Mail Merge Letters (or straight to Email) to send out a reminder that their next inspection is due.
I am trying to integrate a client's Retail Express with Xero and am getting the following error message:JournalEntry - Failed to upload journal entry 'CS150708 - Cost of Sales 8/07/2015'-You cannot save this transaction using an inventory account typeAfter numerous failed attempts to resolve this with RE they finally said that it was an accounting issue, which makes no sense (the accounts are mapped correctly from an accounting perspective) since this issue is related to RE requiring a certain setting in XERO to post the import journal to, and this requirement not being met.
I'd like Xero to be able to recognise a receipt from a customer, look up the introducer in the purchase ledger, and automatically create a purchase invoice for 10% of the receipt in that introducer's account which will then be paid at the end of the month.
Does anybody know of a Xero add-on that can produce an invoice that lists each delivery including item and date of delivery.
I am looking for an inventory add-on that would suit my business; we manufacture a variety of cakes and I would like implement a system that not only enables me to raise PO's to purchase ingredients, bring them into stock and then combine them so that a final product (cake) is available for sale but which also facilitates FIFO and inventory tracking / stock take etc.
Ideally we want to be able to have a payment service setup in Xero that would attach a payment link to the invoice we send out.
I would like some recommendations as to an add-on(s) to use for the same purpose.
Hi Guys,I'm new to XERO and I need some assistance.
Hi,With our Ostendo, when we raise a credit for a sales invoice -  we then apply the credit in customer payments to the invoice.
However, in xero these invoices still show as awaiting payment, and the credits raised batch across as well to xero as unallocated.
Hi,I am looking for a Xero add on where I am able to send template emails to individual clients and bulk marketing emails.
It must be able to handle sales invoicing, deposits/part payments & receive supplier invoices & partial supply of goods.
Hi thereI am trying to find if there is an "add on" company for Xero that does offer software to be able to book multiple rooms, e. g. 8-12 spaces/equipment.
Only a few transactions appeared in Xero, and needed further work and authorisation to update Xero accounts.
A request has been made of iZettle to include the product details (which should be quite simple, as the sales appear as an invoice with just one line, and this could be extended to list each product on multiple lines).
Hi All,I'm looking for an add-on to link two Xero organisations for the purposes of creating a joint Profit and Loss Report and a Balance Sheet.
Is there an add-on that I can use to import csv files as a 'Receive Money' bank account transactions instead of an invoices to be received against.
OneFitStop is seeking Beta testers for our fitness business management software and in particular to test our latest add-on with Xero accounting automation.
We are a hire/equipment rental company that fully uses XERO but we need additional software that assists with Point of sale  software for our growing business.
Hi allI need to export my invoice data on a daily basis in a .
The system includes full document production, accounts management with all client and creditor invoices including instalments sent to Xero and full payment management including bordereau sync.
Hi all, I have a new client who I need to move away from timesheets being entered by staff onto Exel spreedsheets.
Hi Xero Community,We need to develop an application that add "addon" in Xero Application.
Would any one be able to suggest a suitable add-on that may be able to track inventory / stock for a small business in motor industry e. g. caravans.
Therefore they need to use the same order for two separate invoices.
This should be really simple and a lot of the addons are too complex for this and yet still do not appear to be able to account for the order by two invoices.
We enter sales/customer info in Xero to produce an invoice and track payment.
We accept several forms of payment and generate all of our invoices in Xero for our accounting firm.
I am looking forward to completing a month and refining our processes to give us more time to work on our business and enjoy life and see both cin7 and xero offering many advantages to manage our business.
Hi just wondering if employees can upload their receipts using receipt bank paid with personal funds to create an expense claim for reimbursement?
Hi, We use Workshop software that links with Xero for our business.
Can anyone point me in the right direction as to where I can change it to be GST inclusive so when all our invoices from Workshop Software sync over it doesnt add on GST again to that invoice.
Hi,We are just starting to use both Xero and WooCommerce on our WP website.
HiWe use receipt bank for purchase ledger scanning and inoput to Xero, however I have a client that needs sales invoices to be scanned in (they are produced by head offie who are on an entirely bespoke system) can any one advise?
I want new Shopify orders to show up in Xero as “sales" but not "invoices.
If I import Shopify orders as “sales,” do these transactions show up in the “Bank Accounts” section AND in the “Sales” section?
Kagazz is a simple receipt and invoice management application which allows you to scan and store your receipts/invoices digitally on our cloud platform as well as allowing you to upload to Xero in real-time directly from your smart phone.
Hi All, I'm a IT Consultant looking for a simple time tracking add-on to help reduce my admin time.
* From a desktop or mobile device be able to select a client, enter a time (or use timer if onsite) and enter a description of the job done* Once the job is done and I want to invoice it should push the data to Xero and it enters the information into an invoiceI currently use a app on my phone which just tracks time but I have to then export a report then copy paste into Xero and the data is only available on the mobile device so would be nice to have web based editing from a desktop.
We then need to align these to a (repeating) Xero invoice, minus the Ezidebit fees.
We'd then like the totals for all our projects' expenses to auto add to our direct costs on our Xero budget in Xero.
Hi, I'm looking to move my business to Xero and have been struggling to find a decent add-on app to help with managing a student database and timetabling.
We'd like to be able to print monhtly sales/purchase VAT reports which would include the following data/ columns:- date of sale- date of invoice- name of the customer/supplier- GST/VAT number of the customer/supplier- Total amount from the invoice- VAT from the invoiceCan this be done in xero or should we use an add on?
If you happen to use xero and make international payments, there is a great addon that allows you to book all of these payments from within Xero in seconds saving you a ton of double entry back and forth between your bank and xero.
We have clients who handwrite their sales invoices and are looking for an add-on where we can scan a handwritten sales invoice, import this into a piece of software and convert the data (including the description of work done) on the invoice into meaningful accounting information within Xero.
Hi everyone,our German company wants to start using xero, but it is highly problematic that you can't send reminders for overdue sales invoices.
I'm looking for an add on so that 200+ (and growing) part time contractors can enter their hours against a client (fixed price per hour and no of hours, NOT re-chargable hours) and payment of these contractors.
Hi, I love Xero and am looking for an existing Xero add-on for online booking software with time zone options and online payment capability.
Hi all can anyone recommend an add-on that does automated calculation and payment of NSW Payroll Tax.
It ultimately allows clients using Xero to book and pay multiple foreign currency invoicesat once and cheaper and faster than using the bank tooBest regardsBarry
Ideally the POS system we would like touch screen based suitable for staff with limited computer skills or even iPad as we could operate with more than one sales counter Our stock is varied from standard hardware / building lines  through to Animal health and stock feed, so we need to be able to sell in the same item in different formats.
About a year ago, I remember coming across a website of a company who offer a third-party Xero add on for custom nicely designed Invoices, Credit Notes and Purchase Orders etc which is basically an alternative to Xero's docx-based template system which I find rather difficult to use and which does not produce great results.
I want to be able to add an estimate cost for each report which will feed upwards so I can see the total project cost, sub project costs and task costs.
Unfortunately we need to currently use Checkeeper as Xero does not support MICR blank check stock printing, however we need to reinput check info again in Checkeeper.
ADD-ON FEATURES INCLUDE:Build new spreadsheet tables directly from Xero dataRefresh your Excel workbook with pre-established Xero data linksRefresh Excel with any Xero table in raw formatRefresh Excel with selected reports in raw format (such as Trial Balance)Exploit our Report Generator Data Toolkit (which allows you to download the specific fields you need from tables)Drill Down selected transactionsUse across multiple Xero accountsFriendly names & filtersShare with staff members across your organisationUser friendly web-based dashboard (includes usage statistics, history and other features)Windows XP+ (recommended 7) & MS Office 2007+ (recommended 2013)ROADMAPThe product features a very exciting roadmap which will include a unique way of posting directly to Xero from Excel (targeted for Q4 2014) WITH respective supporting documents as attachments .
Can any of you with a medium size business that use a Xero Add-on for Management Reporting recommend a good Add-on to use for Cash flow forecasting and Month end Management & consolidated  Reporting.
We are a small website design and development business currently using xero and various other online programmes to operate and need to consolidate all functions (leads, quotes, timekeeping/costing etc) into one smooth process.
Hi,We looking for a handful of users to beta test our new foreign currency payments add-on.
If you are currently paying foreign currency invoices via your bank our add-on will.
- Provide access to the most competitive exchange rates;- Process payments to the beneficiary bank accounts;- Eliminate all payment charges;- Store on all onward payment beneficiaries for future use;- Fix exchange rates in-line with invoice terms;The add-on is free of charge and in return for testing we will pay 0.
I was just wondering if there are any companies in New Zealand who use Dear Inventory systems with Xero (and potential integration with Magenta).
We need to be able to record half-a-dozen names (under the main business name they work for), email addresses etc and brief comments of last conversations and notes to follow-up.
Build new spreadsheet tables directly from Xero dataRefresh your Excel workbook with pre-established Xero data linksRefresh Excel with any Xero table in raw formatRefresh Excel with selected reports in raw format (such as Trial Balance)Exploit our Report Generator Data Toolkit (which allows you to download the specific fields you need from tables)Drill Down selected transactionsUse across multiple Xero accountsFriendly names & filtersShare with staff members across your organisationUser friendly web-based dashboard (includes usage statistics, history and other features)Windows XP+ (recommended 7) & MS Office 2007+ (recommended 2013) The product features a very exciting roadmap which will include a unique way of posting directly to Xero from Excel (targeted for Q4 2014) WITH respective supporting documents as attachments .
Hi Im looking for an add-on that incorporates time tracking and incidentals such as printing costs, travel etc.
We need to have an inventory add-on as we are wanting to track stock and the Sales vs COGS.
Is there an add on partner which would provide this functionality or would I need to export each report from Xero into excel.
I just want an app that will track how many kilometres I do in my car to and from jobs and the either directly integrate with Xero or be able to download a file which I can then import into Xero.
Hi we are fairly new to the Cloud base solutions and have been using Xero along with the RentalSaas Rental add on.
We are looking for a basic CRM package that  is basic to use, as this is a fairly small business,Like any business we are  just trying to do things a bit smarter and am sick of the Post It notes all over customers details
Hi there, I have connected me Xero account with my Receipt Bank account and have pushed receipts through successfully.
Probably a daft question but I am new to xero and first time user of receipt bank.
The currency is all USD and we are currently using openerp system but ts not able to handle the accounting module like it should so we switched over to Xero and planning to get an inventory add that will help us.
I'm new to Xero and I'm wondering what other accounting firms using Xero are using for the practice time and billing add-on?
I need some help choosing an add-on for our business.
We have a client with a very seasonal business converting to Xero and will need a payroll add-on.
We are new Xero users who have also started using Geo-OP and have noticed that the Tradesman field doesnt come accross into the Xero created invoice for our customers.
Since Zen integrates with expense and liability accounts in Xero and syncs automatically, I'm curious to get everyone's opinion (hopefully from people who have used both) as to the advantage of Xero's integrated system vs an add-on?
Hi,I am looking for an add on that will run a fee request system / application for payment system, to assist me promote it to clients using this method of billing.
Hi there,I have a small Plumbing Business looking to move to Xero if there is an add- on that will import and keep updated the Plumbing Supplies Price List for their invoicing needs, can anyone recommend ?
Hi,An organisation using Xero wants to create and send sales invoices within their Xero organisation on behalf of other companies, although it is VAT registered and this would corrupt sequential invoicing numbering required for VAT registered businesses.
I would like to know if anyone has used Xero invoices and their 3rd party add-ons to create invoices that can be transformed into a commercial invoice and packing slip for my customers to clear goods when their goods arrive at their destination country.
Hi everyone :-)I'd like to use one of the e-commerce payment plugins.
Although we have a PayPal account, we don't want to use that because it doesn't mark the invoices in Xero as paid, it uses the PayPal system.
Ideally I would like something that can keep contact details in sync, push orders into Xero, and show inventory levels when with customers (or at least be able to show "out of stock")I've had a quick look at some of the inventory management systems, but they don't seem to offer what I need when face to face with customers.
I'm looking for an add in to help work with payables so that I can migrate one of the last few non-Xero clients to Xero.
Firstly, there are hundreds of invoices that need to be paid so we would need to search by supplier.
I've looked at Harvest, Shoeboxed, Receipt-Bank, Entryless AP, invitbox and I'm missing the actual bill payment process that I need to simplify or report on.
Realistically, I need to be able to schedule the payment in the addon as well as report on what is scheduled by supplier (ie not broken down to each invoice)It is possible that I've done this process so many times that I'm suffering from MYOB think and would appreciate any ideas that can help me move this one over!
This is not a complete list, but they include:•	Links to a number of payment processors including PayPal•	Shipping charges calculations for dozens of major freight companies via Temando – Allied Express, TNT, Couriers Please, Fastway, Australia Post and more•	Orders inserted back into Xero•	Extends Xero items with quantities, images, weight and sizes•	Unlimited Xero items and customers•	Add item attributes colour, size, style etc•	B2B support – wholesale pricing and ordering•	EDI Support via Ariba PunchOut!
Ideally - I would be able to assign costs and invoices to job numbers and then be able to review job specific P&Ls to review job profitability.
Out of the current inventory add-ons offerred which add on would be able to provide this functionality to my client?
I went add the Stripe integration for an invoice profile and there's only 2 fields for the Stripe service which is what I want to name it and to which payment account I am depositing funds.
Hello Xero Team,Hope you could find a way to give more options or add more columns when doing invoices to Xero.
As I use Zapier to input data from a Wufoo form to create a new Contact on the fly it would be great to be able to also select the contact group (or groups) they are part of.
We need to expand the use of Xero to include some additional Inventory management features and have this integrated with a simple online ordering portal (for invoicing and distribution to internal use sites (ie franchisees)).
We also need to put in a robust CRM system that can track all of the sales, account details, prospects and notes.
I have a manufacturer who is seeking a Xero Add-on that will allow the use of multiple items to create a new item, with purchase orders and production orders.
Shopify seems to be a popular solution, which it looks like has to go through another provider like stitch labs or CarryThe1, which is just fine.
Hi All,I am looking for an add on solution for a Real Estate agent to be able to track commissions on sales.
Hi there,I'm just in the process of setting up Xero for my business, I'm looking for an add on that will help me with Asset Tracking.
We are a small brewery and wholesale business in the UK currently using Xero and looking for an add-on.
Hi thereWe use Xero and also we use spreadsheets to build forecasts (P+L, BS and cash flow).
We are after a Xero Add-on that we can schedule client calls on a regular set frequency and generate invoices that integrate with Xero.
We are primarily a services company but we also resell hardware from our major vendor partners so I need to collect and account for multi-jurisdictional sales tax.
I've been using a trial of WorkflowMax, which I love, but unfortunately it only allows the setup of two tax rates compared to the "layered" tax model that Xero natively offers and I HAVE to be able to track and report on multi-jurisdictional sales tax(es).
Hi,We are a new business and started using XERO from the start of the business.
RECEIPTING OF INVOICES AND PURCHASE ORDERS AND EDITINGPer Xero, need to be able to EDIT invoices, purchases orders, etc AFTER issued or receipted - and then this is also pushed to Xero and updated.
Hi,I have recently created an account with Zapier, to create Xero Invoices from new lines on a google spreadsheet.
HI There,I run a painting business and I am looking for a 'add on' to Xero that has the following function:Sale price - materials / hours on job.
HiCan someone please help me with how does SimPro and Xero communicate - just had a couple of clients of Simpro call and want to setup with Xero and I could use some advice
Import payment transactions from XERO•	Sale quotes, Sale Invoices, Pick, Pack, Ship, Return from customers, Re-stock.
In my company, we have a large volume of receipts for expenses and invoices that are mainly job costs, and I am considering using RB as an efficient way of getting both expenses (from project managers) and invoices (from a central point) onto the jobs in WFM, so we can report on job profitability (something that we are not doing at the moment).
I have just joined a business which is currently using Xero and WorkflowMax and I am totally new to both of these products.
I have a new client (UK based) who requires add on software to be able to make Xero do what he needs it to do.
I don't have much experience of add ons and would really welcome any suggestions or tips for the following requirements bearing in mind the cost element too: a)	a ‘Job Costing’ add on, to allow him to accumulate both time charges and material costs by individual job;b)	he anticipates maintaining a stock of regularly used items, and so would like some form of stock control to control both issues and stock re-ordering;c)	if there was a quoting or estimating ‘add on’ which allowed him to use current prices without having to consult price lists, that would be a real timesaver too;d)	a basic CRM system to allow him to contact past customers with special offers   This needs to  provide customer contact details, the property on which work was carried out, and keep a brief record of what work was done;
I am more a virtual, part time controller type that is Advanced QB and Xero Certified; but new.
Hi I have just converted both businesses to Xero and so far am very impressed - One business requires inventory and realise Xero is very limited - I would like to know if anyone is using Cin7 or Unleashed.
It would be great to see an integration with Xero, specifically:- Automatic raising of invoices from WooCommerce to Xero- Inventory data from WooCommerce to Xero- Customer data sync from WooCommerce to Xero- payment sync from WooCommerce to Xero (WooCommerce is already integrated with many payment gateways so this would be very useful)There's many more and I haven't had time to think the integration through clearly.
Any invoices issued in the 'add on' software would need to be pushed through to our chart of accounts.
We need to track jobs and employees and need CRMWe would like to issue a quote to a company who will issue purchase order  for x amount of hours of work and allocate the hours on that job to the different employees working on it (in the various areas of our business. )
Which is the minimum Paypal  package needed to integrate with Xero (to ad "pay now" to invoices)The guide speaks of PayPal Premier or Business account - so Paypal must've changed the naming of their merchant packages sine then.
cmd=_render-content&content_ID=merchant/compare_wp_productsI think both thees accounts allow people to pay without a paypal account - the major differences is that one "integrates with your checkout experience" and the other doesn't.
We'd like to be able to add more than one freshbooks account to sync with.
I want to be able to produce a weekly report of my customers and when they last ordered, when there last invoice was due, how much they owe me, how much they have spent and what their previous orders were.
I just need a little bit of time with someone that could maybe help.
Would you have a suggestion about nice Point of Sales add on for Restaurant/Cafe Industry
To give Tasks a start and due date you can go into the Job and add new Task but if you have several tasks this defeats the object of using a template and saving time but I cannot see where within a Job template you can set up predefined start and due dates for Tasks?
Bilbus is a new Xero Add-On - a working capital financing hub that allows businesses to use e-invoicing to present a stronger borrowing case and find commercial financing through lenders matched via the Bilbus platform.
I see that Freshbooks and Xero integrate but why, if Xero does invoicing, would I need to pay for Xero and Freshbooks?
we need to have a simple add-on which enables us to compare our quotations costs for a job against the received invoices received from suppliers and contractors without double entry to our Xero accounts.
I sent an email 5 days ago to explain that we need our pay pal data feeds fixed and that manual imports don't show the paypal fees etc properly and we had to add them in manually later.
BUG REPORT - add new bank account fails on Firefox - v 53.
You need to add an actual bank reconciliation like QB does.
I also do not like that I cannot put customer payments to a undeposited funds account and then combine so that the deposits on the bank register match the bank statement.
Now I'm not asking what the difference is, obviously it allows you to select an expense and income account, I'm just using this as an example where I'd think you'd want to explain or give a couple of examples to users  they'd want to track separate expense and sales accounts for an item.
Using chromeEntering an InvoiceScroll down to click on SaveHave to click again - Now get the Drop down BoxClick again - to Select "save and add another"Screen prompts to higher in the pageScroll down again to click on saveNothing happensSo Invoice not savedNow cant even select "save and add another"have cleared cache, etchave logged in / out / inhave gone out of invoices and back inGet to do a few morethen it happens againFrustrated 200 plus invoices to go
- Entering Supplier and customer invoices - Why force the use of both Quantity and unit price - why not just allow amount (inc or excl vat)  - if people don’t need the qty or unit prices.
- Excel invoice import - why not allow a more simple template just to import invoice numbers, date and amount?
- When entering a supplier invoice - when typing in the account (contact) why bring up customer accounts as well?
You can pay me if you like, i work with multinationals normally on customising ERP's, payment systems and financial processes.
For some very odd reason the entering of a new clients details have become so much more difficult - I used to be able to just type it in and tab to the next field however now it simply deletes it.
Just more time and effort that didn't need to be expended.
The new report give just a total.
Hi,Just some Feedback, we have all our monthly invoices set to go out on the 1st of the month.
I need it for my Financial Report issue, no time to waste&waiting.
Yes, we can Remove and Redo payments or create new invoices, create overpayments and copy and paste invoices to merge as one, however this is an extremely long process when you have to make upwards of 5 or 10 changes in a week and there have been multiple part payments made along the way.
I also don't get why, after paying multiple purchase invoices, I have to delete the batch payment again in order for Xero to be able to reconcile properly.
We keep receiving the same email from Xero Support passing the buck to Yodlee:Hi ____, We're just checking in regarding your bank feed.
- Access levels - As a small business allowing staff to see payments to other staff (including wages) because I have granted them "approve & pay" permission for sales & purchases is a show stopper.
We currently have to manually deduct the 4 monthly payment outstanding total balances from the Bills You Need To Pay total to get the real picture.
I need to send a customer a receipt today and only one specific invoice that I need to apply the payment to is inaccessible due to the Error 500.
I am very new to Xero and have found it increasingly frustrating to get the help I need during the set up process, in particular conversion balances, and getting all my chart of accounts in order.
Basically what I am understanding is Xero is saying that I, for some reason, decided to download multiple OFX files then for some reason combine them all into one super mega OFX file and then when it doesn't work waste my time and Xero's time with the technical support emails all while being prohibited from doing the work I need to desperately do in Xero.
In order for me to get a history report of invoices and payments I had to extract an activity statement which only prints to PDF and not able to exported to Excel.
We should be able to extract per customer/supplier on a separate report so we can see all transactions on EACH account and be able to send to excel.
I dont like the new look buttons at the bottom of the invoice screen.
The new Account Transactions report is good, but it would be great if Xero offered the same function as in Quickbooks with a FIND FUNCTION.
Each time I am doing an invoice and attempt to click on something up or down the page it skips screen position and I loose my place every time.
I just went to process a payment to an invoice and I got this:An error occurred while processing your request.
While it would be lovely to have different coloured buttons in Purchasing vs Sales section (just as a reminder of which side I'm in when I'm going full tilt), I'd also like to be able to see the buttons clearly.
You then emailed me indicating that you wanted to call me  within 24 hours to finally fix it so I can start working on the transactions I have not been able to reconcile because your system is not linking to the bank account (it was before in the case of 2 of the 3 accounts not feeding the data).
After just setting up a company and advising my client to join Xero, I was very surprised to be told from the Xero support team that cause I only have one client I can not become a partner as I need to come with many clients.
Hi, I have selected pay now more than twice aswell as updated my payment details.
When reconciling bank transactions, Xero doesn't make full use of my widescreen monitor (commonplace nowadays).
Especially the new feature of allowing us to add payment to invoice.
Its such a shame as Xero seemed to be the new thing, after years of working on sage I was introduced to Xero - but sadly Xero bank feed with Lloyds bank stopped working, should now be up and working but here I am two weeks without a bank refresh feed - numerious emails between the registerd accountants, pleading for someone from Xero to give me a call, but nothing no support what so everBring back Sage at least they have support, and get to the bottom of things, Im just left hanging scrambling around in the dark without any way of getting an answer
Also the ability to add new contacts completely from the bill & invoice screen would be great.
I don't even have the option of creating an invoice that doesn't have NZD all over it which I used to be able to do in the early Xero days, so I now share the same cost as a large business @ a whopping 75$ a month.
You used to be able to add a customer complete an invoice and send it in 1-2 minutes now everything just gets sooo damn frustrating.
I now would like to use your 'Invoice reminder email' feature but that means manually marking each invoice (over 500) as sent!
When are we going to be able to check invoices in a client's screen and just hit 'send'?
The second line of support is XERO support (using phonetic correctness), I really detest the idea that we all stop working for up to 24 hours whilst you contemplate our problem, add to that don't bother ringing XERO as all we get is a "we (XERO) don't sell anything" message on repeat; absolutely useless!
When adding new transactions to my bank account and using the drag and drop feature (to attach photos of invoices) I have found a bug.
2) It would be great to be able to generate delivery notes from sales invoices or quote3) It would be useful if we could view in all areas who has put e. g. the purchase order, quote or sales invoice on the system without having to click into it.
4)  It would be great to be able to either have more tracking options or to be able to report on sales generated by individuals within a team.
It has been extremely time consuming frustrating to customise sales invoice templates in MS Word.
After many emails back and forth and useless calls to Xero support (which isn't 24 hours) I have to say that anyone based in USA or overseas should NOT use Xero at this stage for their business accounting softwares.
4-6 I email Ben Johnson, xero billing team, Andrew Whitelaw, payroll and support at xero - advise that we require urgent escalation of this account as we have now had no access to the account for an extended period of time.
Just a few minor UI defects I found in the new Find & Recode feature on first use.
I am using iOS app for the first time and could not add new receipts.
To this point it's been a very frustrating experience, and Xero's claims on the website have been generally misleading – if we  able to get Xero to assist us, they'll help us in moving over the current and previous fiscal year if we're lucky, and then we don't have access to the previous seven years of accounts which we have to retain on a laptop somewhere.
We will need to go create a new bill first before we are able to create the invoice to bill customer.
Being able to put a title and summary into the quote is great, but not much use if that info doesn't properly transfer to the invoice.
The reference field normally holds a Purchase Order number for our invoices, and I initially thought that being able to set up the quote with the PO in the reference field would make converting the quote to invoice a dream, as I would not then need to refer back to the PO when actioning the invoice.
It is so frustrating that Xero still have not given a supplier payment report!
Our business is fairly new and I just finished (mostly) setup in XERO.
"Si I now have to e mail myself the invoices, then forward the invoice with attached pdf to client MANUALLYThis takes time, and defeats the purpose as to why I transferred from sage to Xero in first place.
It is also open to error , if you forget to send the invoice ( people walk in disrupt our thought pattern  etcare xero going to let us users use our OWN bespoke e mail addresses to send out invoices.
co. nz/myob/more-than-just-skin-deep-xero-verse-myob/I wonder if Xero would like to provide a response to the article, given a lot of what in written in the article about Xero is completely false.
Instead of me being able to change their contact file and have it updated across their invoices it doesn't change the previously created or waiting on payment invoices.
Currently if I had to change the business name on an invoice or correct it I have to change the contact file to the new details, void the invoice and then re-create it so that I can re-send with the correct details in the "To" field.
The issue I raised was that Xero had unilaterally decided to switch off the Yodlee Natwest feed in a year's time, and force those customers affected to take a new direct feed at an extra cost of £3.
A week ago Xero informed its customers who use the Yodlee Natwest bank feed, that a new direct feed had been put into place.
I am mostly happy, but I am extremely disappointed that when I want to send a follow-up statement because an invoice payment has been missed, it includes the invoices that have been paid as well as the unpaid invoice.
I really like the new Practice Manager interface however I notice that the Business Structure description Discretionary Trust has been misspelt as Discretionery Trust.
Anyone with access to creating a contact record is able to enter bank information on the record, and change that at any point in time.
Hi Xero,I'm using Xero API, trial account, and my application is integrated with Xero.
I use Xero to run a small revolving loan finance book providing clients with cash to fund purchases and sales.
I need to keep my books bang up to date if I'm to successfully use Xero fully for new client advance decision making.
Well, we are 23 days into the new pricing plan and are being compelled to pay more for Xero.
I just wanted to express how much easier Xero has made my job, especially integrating with add-on programs, saves so much time with double handling.
We're after a couple of small business owners who use Xero, and a couple of employees of companies who use Xero.
I'm loading transactions for a new ASB bank account into Xero.
By matching on more than just Payee, or by ignoring certain common values (DEBIT, probably others), Xero would be able to provide a much better matching algorithm and improve the user experience.
It appears like this is a new feature, that only the person that set up the bank feed can refresh the feed.
You need a small business focus group for how you handle new users
Instead of sitting in my office and grudgingly working away on the weekend as I used to do, I can lie on the couch in front of the fire and do all our bank recs and pay all our bills, and it feels like fun instead of yet another weekend chore I have to face.
I created a new account Thursday and the bank feed has been down all this time, This is not a great first impression and does not fill me with confidence.
I used to have accounts receivable open in another tab in the browser and cut and paste the invoice number fro the bank rec into the search to get to the invoice.
